BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to improve the actuarial soundness of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 while also continuing the state commitment to maintain the actuarial soundness of benefits promised to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 by merging the assets, liabilities, and membership of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 into the teachers' retirement system plan 1. The legislature further intends that this merger of assets, liabilities, and membership, and any administrative changes necessary to implement the merger, be accomplished in a way that does not impact benefits provided to members of either the teachers' retirement system plan 1 or the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1.

The legislature further intends that the merger of assets, liabilities, and membership of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 be administered in a way consistent with plan qualification requirements in the federal internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The assets, liabilities, and membership of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 are hereby merged into the teachers' retirement system plan 1.

(1) All liabilities of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 as defined in chapter 41.32 RCW and as funded pursuant to chapter 41.45 RCW remain liabilities of the teachers' retirement system plan 1. This includes all benefits payable to the teachers' retirement system plan 1 members pursuant to chapter 41.32 RCW.

(2) All liabilities of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW and as funded pursuant to chapter 41.45 RCW, are made liabilities of the teachers' retirement system plan 1. All pension benefits, including survivor benefits, payable to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 pursuant to chapter 41.26 RCW must be paid from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 retirement fund established in RCW 41.50.075(3)(a). Following the merger on the effective date of this section, the membership and pension benefits of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 shall be administered as a separate tier of membership and benefits within the teachers' retirement system plan 1.

(3) All liabilities for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 medical benefits provided pursuant to RCW 41.26.150 remain liabilities of employers, as defined in RCW 41.26.030(14)(a).

(4) All assets of both plans are merged as described in RCW 41.50.075.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The merger of the assets, liabilities, and membership of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 in section 2 of this act may not impact benefits for members of these plans. Specifically, each member of each of these plans is entitled to receive benefits immediately after the merger on the effective date of this section that are equal to the benefits the member would have been entitled to receive immediately before the merger in accordance with plan terms. If the director determines that any provision of this act directly impacts benefits for members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 or benefits for members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, then the department is instructed to administer this act in a way that neither reduces, nor grants additional benefits, for members of those plans. The department may also conduct rule making for this purpose as provided in RCW 41.50.050.

(2) The department must submit a request for a determination letter from the internal revenue service indicating the qualified status of the merged plan that results from the merger of assets, liabilities, and membership in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The merger of assets, liabilities, and membership of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 in section 2 of this act does not impact the disability boards established in RCW 41.26.110 or any official action of those boards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The unfunded actuarial accrued liability rate charged to employers in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 from September 1, 2016, to August 31, 2017, is 4.24 percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW under the subchapter heading "Plan 1" to read as follows:

(1) The assets of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement fund transferred to the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund by RCW 41.50.075 shall fund the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 lump sum defined benefit created by this section.

(2) Law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 1 active members, term-vested members, retirees, and survivors eligible for benefits under the plan 1 provisions of this chapter on the effective date of this section shall be eligible to receive the plan 1 lump sum defined benefit pursuant to the conditions established in this section.

(3) The lump sum defined benefit is five thousand dollars per member or survivor, payable on January 3, 2017, or the member's retirement date, whichever is later. In the case of multiple survivor beneficiaries, the lump sum defined benefit shall be divided equally.

(4) If a member is active or term-vested, interest on the lump sum defined benefit as determined by the director of retirement systems shall accumulate from January 3, 2017, until distribution to the participant upon retirement from service or for disability. For the purposes of this section, a "term-vested member" is a member who has rendered five years of service, has not withdrawn his or her member contributions, and who has not applied for retirement.

(5) If a member dies after the effective date of this section but before distribution of the lump sum defined benefit created in this section occurs, the distribution shall be made according to the member's beneficiary designation under this chapter.

(6) The lump sum defined benefit created in this section is subject to RCW 41.26.053.

(7) If sections 1 through 5 of this act or this section are held to be invalid, by section 15 of this act or otherwise, recipients of the lump sum defined benefit provided by this section shall no longer be entitled to this benefit and shall be required to return any funds received according to the provisions of RCW 41.50.135, 41.50.136, 41.50.137, and 41.50.138.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.26.030 and 2012 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest credited thereon.

(2) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be available on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's future benefits during the period of retirement.

(3) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present monetary value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary value of future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among active and retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement, withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.

(4)(a) "Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be computed and upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be based.

(b) "Basic salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay. In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of having such member's basic salary be the greater of:

(i) The basic salary the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature; or

(ii) Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required because basic salary under (b)(i) of this subsection is greater than basic salary under (b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions.

(5)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit described herein.

(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(6)(a) "Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically disabled as determined by the department, except a person who is disabled and in the full time care of a state institution, who is:

(i) A natural born child;

(ii) A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter;

(iii) A posthumous child;

(iv) A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter; or

(v) An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable under this chapter.

(b) A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of twenty years and eleven months while attending any high school, college, or vocational or other educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which it is located, including the summer vacation months and all other normal and regular vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which the child returns to school.

(7) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.

(8) "Director" means the director of the department.

(9) "Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county disability board or the city disability board established in RCW 41.26.110.

(10) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability retirement. The definition contained in this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(11) "Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.

(12) "Domestic partners" means two adults who have registered as domestic partners under RCW 26.60.020.

(13) "Employee" means any law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in subsections (16) and (18) of this section.

(14)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative authority of any city, town, county, or district or the elected officials of any municipal corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or firefighter, any authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of RCW 41.26.150, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the firefighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over 20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or firefighters as defined in this chapter.

(b) "Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to the extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or firefighter:

(i) The legislative authority of any city, town, county, or district;

(ii) The elected officials of any municipal corporation;

(iii) The governing body of any other general authority law enforcement agency; or

(iv) A four-year institution of higher education having a fully operational fire department as of January 1, 1996.

(c) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an "employer." The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an "employer," but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an "employer" under this chapter.

(15)(a) "Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed, computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of vesting.

(b) "Final average salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly average of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty service credit months of service prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of final average salary.

(c) In calculating final average salary under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include:

(i) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer; and

(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or a local government employer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases.

(16) "Firefighter" means:

(a) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member of a fire department of an employer and who is serving in a position which requires passing a civil service examination for firefighter, and who is actively employed as such;

(b) Anyone who is actively employed as a full time firefighter where the fire department does not have a civil service examination;

(c) Supervisory firefighter personnel;

(d) Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire protection districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of this subsection (16)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;

(e) The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section), if such individual has five years previous membership in a retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (16)(e) shall not apply to plan 2 members;

(f) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil service examination for firefighter;

(g) Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW; and

(h) Any person who is employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis by an employer as an emergency medical technician.

(17) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, but not including the Washington state patrol. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a limited authority law enforcement agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board, and the state department of corrections. A general authority law enforcement agency under this chapter does not include a government contractor.

(18) "Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with the following qualifications:

(a) No person who is serving in a position that is basically clerical or secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be considered a law enforcement officer;

(b) Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a different title pursuant to county charter, who have successfully completed a civil service examination for deputy sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those persons serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;

(c) Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police department which have been specifically created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by city charter provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be considered city police officers;

(d) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section) if that individual has five years previous membership in the retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (18)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members; and

(e) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The provisions of this subsection (18)(e) shall not apply to any public safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(19) "Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.

(a) Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own behalf, for

(i) Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is required by the attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii) Necessary hospital services, other than board and room, furnished by the hospital.

(b) Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered "other medical expenses", provided that they have not been considered as "hospital expenses".

(i) The fees of the following:

(A) A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;

(C) A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii) The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily resides in the member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member or the member's spouse.

(iii) The charges for the following medical services and supplies:

(A) Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;

(B) Diagnostic X-ray and laboratory examinations;

(C) X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D) Anesthesia and oxygen;

(E) Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F) Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G) Professional ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H) Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within ninety days after the accident;

(I) Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J) Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;

(K) Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;

(L) An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(20) "Member" means any firefighter, law enforcement officer, or other person as would apply under subsections (16) or (18) of this section whose membership is transferred to the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system on or after March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and firefighter who is employed in that capacity on or after such date.

(21) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(22) "Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977.

(23) "Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(24) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(25) "Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the retirement system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.

(26)(a) "Retirement fund" for plan 2 means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement ((system)) fund" as provided for herein.

(b) Pursuant to the merger of assets, liabilities, and membership in section 2 of this act, beginning September 1, 2016, "retirement fund" for plan 1 means the teachers' retirement system plan 1 retirement fund established in RCW 41.50.075(3)(a).

(27) "Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system" provided herein.

(28)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of employment for an employer as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also include service in the armed forces of the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit shall be allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.

(i) For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also include (A) such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension act, and (B) such other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular member under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160, or 41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such prior act.

(ii) A member who is employed by two employers at the same time shall only be credited with service to one such employer for any month during which the member rendered such dual service.

(b) "Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for ninety or more hours per calendar month which shall constitute a service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours per calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for less than seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service credit month.

Members of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a state elective position may elect to continue to be members of this retirement system.

Service credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the total number of service credit months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a service credit year of service as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.

If a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during any calendar month, the individual shall receive one service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered; or one-half service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is rendered.

(29) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(30) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(31) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(32) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.

(33) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member. "Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member except as provided in RCW 41.26.162.

Sec. 8. RCW 41.26.080 and 2007 c 492 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as set forth under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the total liability of the plan 1 system shall be funded as follows:

(a) Every plan 1 member shall have deducted from each payroll a sum equal to six percent of his or her basic salary for each pay period.

(b) Every employer shall contribute monthly a sum equal to six percent of the basic salary of each plan 1 employee who is a member of this retirement system. The employer shall transmit the employee and employer contributions with a copy of the payroll to the retirement system monthly.

(c) The remaining liabilities of the plan 1 system shall be funded as provided in chapter 41.45 RCW.

(d) Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the contribution made and provided for herein, and shall receipt in full for his or her salary or compensation. Payment less said contributions shall be a complete discharge of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by such person during the period covered by such payments, except his or her claim to the benefits to which he or she may be entitled under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) No employer or member contribution is required after June 30, 2000, unless the most recent valuation study for law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 indicates the plan has unfunded liabilities. The legislature clarifies the enactment of section 907, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess. and affirms the suspension of employer and member contributions to plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, effective June 30, 2000, as provided in this subsection. The legislature intends this 2007 amendment of this subsection to be curative, remedial, and retrospectively applicable to June 30, 2000.

(3) Pursuant to the merger of assets, liabilities, and membership in section 2 of this act, beginning September 1, 2016, no contribution rates may be charged to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 1 members and employers, except for the administrative expenses charged to employers under RCW 41.50.110.

Sec. 9. RCW 41.45.010 and 2009 c 561 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature to provide a dependable and systematic process for funding the benefits provided to members and retirees of the public employees' retirement system, chapter 41.40 RCW; the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW; the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement systems, chapter 41.26 RCW; the school employees' retirement system, chapter 41.35 RCW; the public safety employees' retirement system, chapter 41.37 RCW; and the Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter 43.43 RCW.

The funding process established by this chapter is intended to achieve the following goals:

(1) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2, and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 as provided by law;

(2) ((To fully amortize the total costs of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, not later than June 30, 2024;

(3))) To fully amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 within a rolling ten-year period, using methods and assumptions that balance needs for increased benefit security, decreased contribution rate volatility, and affordability of pension contribution rates;

(((4))) (3) To establish long-term employer contribution rates which will remain a relatively predictable proportion of the future state budgets; and

(((5))) (4) To fund, to the extent feasible, all benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working lives of those members so that the cost of those benefits are paid by the taxpayers who receive the benefit of those members' service.

Sec. 10. RCW 41.45.060 and 2009 c 561 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state actuary shall provide preliminary actuarial valuation results based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035.

(2) Not later than July 31, 2008, and every two years thereafter, consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes to:

(a) ((A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1;

(b))) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system; and

(((c))) (b) Basic employer contribution rates for the school employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system for funding both those systems and the public employees' retirement system plan 1.

The council may adopt annual rate changes for any plan for any rate-setting period. The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:

(a) ((To fully amortize the total costs of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 not later than June 30, 2024;

(b))) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2, and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section; and

(((c))) (b) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1, including benefits for members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system tier 1 beginning September 1, 2016, in accordance with RCW 41.45.070, 41.45.150, and this section.

(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate a combined plan 2 and 3 normal cost, a Washington state patrol retirement system normal cost, and a public safety employees' retirement system normal cost.

(5) A modified entry age normal cost method, as set forth in this chapter, shall be used to calculate employer contributions to the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1.

(6) The employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system and the school employees' retirement system shall equal the sum of:

(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3 normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus

(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus

(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.

(7) The employer contribution rate for the public safety employees' retirement system shall equal the sum of:

(a) The amount required to pay the normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus

(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus

(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.

(8) The employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system shall equal the sum of:

(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3 normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155((;)), plus the amounts in (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.

(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period.

(i) This amount must be calculated using projected future salary growth and growth in the teachers' retirement system membership, and does not include salary and system growth for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1.

(ii) This amount is subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150((; plus)).

(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009.

(i) The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in the teachers' retirement system membership and does not include salary and system growth for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1.

(ii) The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.

(d) The amounts required to amortize the cost of any benefit improvements for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system tier 1 that become effective after the merger of assets, liabilities, and membership in section 2 of this act.

(i) The cost of each benefit improvement must be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in the teachers' retirement system membership and does not include salary and system growth for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1.

(ii) The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.

(9) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the office of financial management and department of retirement systems of the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative modifications.

(10) The director shall collect those rates adopted by the council. The rates established in RCW 41.45.062, or by the council, shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

(11) The state actuary shall prepare final actuarial valuation results based on the economic assumptions, asset value smoothing technique, and contribution rates included in or adopted under RCW 41.45.030, 41.45.035, and this section.

Sec. 11. RCW 41.45.150 and 2011 c 362 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2015, maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of the employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010

2011

2012

2013

2014

2015

1.25%

1.25%

3.75%

4.50%

5.25%

6.00%

(2) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015, maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of the employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010

2011

2012

2013

2014

2015

1.25%

1.25%

3.75%

4.50%

5.25%

6.00%

(3) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015, maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of the employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements for the teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010

2011

2012

2013

2014

2015

2.04%

2.04%

6.50%

7.50%

8.50%

9.50%

(4) Beginning July 1, 2015, a minimum 3.50 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system equals one hundred percent of the actuarial accrued liability.

(5) Beginning September 1, 2015, a minimum 3.50 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system equals one hundred percent of the actuarial accrued liability.

(6)(a) Beginning September 1, ((2015)) 2016, and ending August 31, 2021, a ((minimum 5.75 percent)) contribution rate of 4.24 percent is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system((,)). This rate is to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, ((2009)) 2016. ((This))

(b) Beginning September 1, 2021, a minimum contribution rate of 4.24 percent is established and shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system equals one hundred percent of the actuarial accrued liability.

(7) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state actuary shall review the appropriateness of the minimum contribution rates and recommend to the council any adjustments as may be needed due to material changes in benefits or actuarial assumptions, methods, or experience. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 12. RCW 41.50.055 and 1991 c 35 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The administration of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system is hereby vested in the director of retirement systems, and the director shall:

(1) Keep in convenient form such data as shall be deemed necessary for actuarial evaluation purposes;

(2) As of March 1, 1970, and at least every two years thereafter, through the state actuary, make an actuarial valuation as to the mortality and service experience of the beneficiaries under this chapter and the various accounts created for the purpose of showing the financial status of the retirement fund;

(3) Adopt for the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system the mortality tables and such other tables as shall be deemed necessary;

(4) Keep a record of all its proceedings, which shall be open to inspection by the public;

(5) From time to time adopt such rules and regulations not inconsistent with chapter 41.26 RCW, for the administration of the provisions of this chapter, for the administration of the fund created by this chapter and the several accounts thereof, and for the transaction of the business of the system;

(6) Prepare and publish annually a financial statement showing the condition of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement fund and the various accounts thereof, and setting forth such other facts, recommendations and data as may be of use in the advancement of knowledge concerning the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and furnish a copy thereof to each employer, and to such members as may request copies thereof;

(7) Perform such other functions as are required for the execution of the provisions of chapter 41.26 RCW;

(8) Fix the amount of interest to be credited at a rate which shall be based upon the net annual earnings of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' fund for the preceding twelve-month period and from time to time make any necessary changes in such rate;

(9) Pay from the department of retirement systems expense fund the expenses incurred in administration of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system from those funds appropriated for that purpose;

(10) Perform any other duties prescribed elsewhere in chapter 41.26 RCW;

(11) Issue decisions relating to appeals initiated pursuant to RCW 41.16.145 and 41.18.104 as now or hereafter amended and shall be authorized to order increased benefits pursuant to RCW 41.16.145 and 41.18.104 as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 13. RCW 41.50.075 and 2004 c 242 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Two funds are hereby created and established in the state treasury to be known as the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement fund, and the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement fund which shall consist of all moneys paid into them in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW, whether such moneys take the form of cash, securities, or other assets. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, and the plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.

(2) Pursuant to the merger of assets, liabilities, and membership in section 2 of this act, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement fund is closed, and all moneys are transferred to the teachers' retirement system plan 1 retirement fund established in subsection (3)(a) of this section. All moneys payable to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 or paid to finance benefits for members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW, whether such moneys take the form of cash, securities, or other assets, must be paid to the teachers' retirement system plan 1 retirement fund established in subsection (3)(a) of this section.

(3) All of the assets of the Washington state teachers' retirement system shall be credited according to the purposes for which they are held, to two funds to be maintained in the state treasury, namely, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund and the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund.

(a) The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1, ((and)) including benefits for members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system tier 1 beginning September 1, 2016.

(b) The combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 2 and 3.

(((3))) (4) There is hereby established in the state treasury two separate funds, namely the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3.

(((4))) (5) There is hereby established in the state treasury the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the school employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3.

(((5))) (6) There is hereby established in the state treasury the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2 fund. The plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2.

Sec. 14. RCW 43.84.092 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 107 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle charging infrastructure account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, ((the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account,)) the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. (1) The merger of the assets, liabilities, and membership of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 as provided in section 2 of this act must be administered so as to comply with the internal revenue code, Title 26 U.S.C., and specifically with plan qualification requirements imposed on governmental plans by section 401(a) of the internal revenue code. Any section or provision of this act that is susceptible to more than one construction must be interpreted so as to meet this requirement.

(2) If the federal internal revenue service issues a determination letter stating that section 2 of this act is in conflict with the plan qualification requirements for governmental plans in section 401(a) of the internal revenue code, and the conflict cannot be resolved through administrative action or statutory change, then sections 2 and 6 through 14 of this act are null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. This act takes effect September 1, 2016.

--- END ---