BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.18.200 and 2014 c 77 s 1 and 2014 c 6 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Special license plate series reviewed and approved by the department:

(a) May be issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license plates for vehicles required to display one and two license plates unless otherwise specified;

(b) Must be issued under terms and conditions established by the department;

(c) Must not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW; and

(d) Must display a symbol or artwork approved by the department.

(2) The department approves and shall issue the following special license plates:

LICENSE PLATE

DESCRIPTION, SYMBOL, OR ARTWORK

4-H

Displays the "4-H" logo.

Armed forces collection

Recognizes the contribution of veterans, active duty military personnel, reservists, and members of the national guard, and includes six separate designs, each containing a symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces to include army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, and national guard.

Breast cancer awareness

Displays a pink ribbon symbolizing breast cancer awareness.

Endangered wildlife

Displays a symbol or artwork symbolizing endangered wildlife in Washington state.

Gonzaga University alumni association

Recognizes the Gonzaga University alumni association.

Helping kids speak

Recognizes an organization that supports programs that provide no-cost speech pathology programs to children.

Keep kids safe

Recognizes efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect.

Law enforcement memorial

Honors law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty.

Music matters

Displays the "Music Matters" logo.

Professional firefighters and paramedics

Recognizes professional firefighters and paramedics who are members of the Washington state council of firefighters.

Seattle Seahawks

Displays the "Seattle Seahawks" logo.

Seattle Sounders FC

Displays the "Seattle Sounders FC" logo.

Seattle University

Recognizes Seattle University.

Share the road

Recognizes an organization that promotes bicycle safety and awareness education.

Ski & ride Washington

Recognizes the Washington snowsports industry.

State flower

Recognizes the Washington state flower.

Support public schools

Displays a red apple symbol and an education-related motto.

Volunteer firefighters

Recognizes volunteer firefighters.

Washington lighthouses

Recognizes an organization that supports selected Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental education programs.

Washington state parks

Recognizes Washington state parks as premier destinations of uncommon quality that preserve significant natural, cultural, historical, and recreational resources.

Washington's national park fund

Builds awareness of Washington's national parks and supports priority park programs and projects in Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging communities, and providing educational opportunities related to Washington's national parks.

Washington's wildlife collection

Recognizes Washington's wildlife.

We love our pets

Recognizes an organization that assists local member agencies of the federation of animal welfare and control agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery on Washington state pets to reduce pet overpopulation.

Wild on Washington

Symbolizes wildlife viewing in Washington state.

(3) Applicants for initial and renewal professional firefighters and paramedics special license plates must show proof of eligibility by providing a certificate of current membership from the Washington state council of firefighters.

(4) Applicants for initial volunteer firefighters special license plates must (a) have been a volunteer firefighter for at least ten years or be a volunteer firefighter for one or more years and (b) have documentation of service from the district of the appropriate fire service. If the volunteer firefighter leaves firefighting service before ten years of service have been completed, the volunteer firefighter shall surrender the license plates to the department on the registration renewal date. If the volunteer firefighter stays in service for at least ten years and then leaves, the license plate may be retained by the former volunteer firefighter and as long as the license plate is retained for use the person will continue to pay the future registration renewals. A qualifying volunteer firefighter may have no more than one set of license plates per vehicle, and a maximum of two sets per applicant, for their personal vehicles. If the volunteer firefighter is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or a felony, the license plates must be surrendered upon conviction.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.220 and 2014 c 77 s 2 and 2014 c 6 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE

INITIAL FEE

RENEWAL FEE

DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) 4-H

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(b) Amateur radio license

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(c) Armed forces

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(d) Baseball stadium

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

Subsection (2) of this section

(e) Breast cancer awareness

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(f) Collector vehicle

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(g) Collegiate

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.430

(h) Endangered wildlife

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(i) Gonzaga University alumni association

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(j) Helping kids speak

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(k) Horseless carriage

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(l) Keep kids safe

$ 45.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(m) Law enforcement memorial

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(n) Military affiliate radio system

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(o) Music matters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(p) Professional firefighters and paramedics

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(q) Ride share

$ 25.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(r) Seattle Seahawks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(s) Seattle Sounders FC

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(t) Seattle University

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(u) Share the road

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(v) Ski & ride Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(w) Square dancer

$ 40.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(x) State flower

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(y) Support public schools

$ 60.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(z) Volunteer firefighters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((z))) (aa) Washington lighthouses

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((aa))) (bb) Washington state parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(((bb))) (cc) Washington's national parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((cc))) (dd) Washington's wildlife collection

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(((dd))) (ee) We love our pets

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((ee))) (ff) Wild on Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.425 and 2014 c 77 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall:

(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW 46.17.220;

(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection expenses incurred by it; and

(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.

(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special license plate fees to the following accounts by special license plate type:

SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE TYPE

ACCOUNT

CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

Armed forces

RCW 43.60A.140

N/A

Breast cancer

awareness

RCW 43.70.327

Must be used only by the department of health for efforts consistent with the breast, cervical, and colon health program

Endangered wildlife

RCW 77.12.170

Must be used only for the department of fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife program activities

Keep kids safe

RCW 43.121.100

As specified in RCW 43.121.100

Support public schools

Section 4 of this act

As specified in section 4 of this act

Washington state parks

RCW 79A.05.059

Provide public educational opportunities and enhancement of Washington state parks

Washington's wildlife collection

RCW 77.12.170

Only for the department of fish and wildlife's game species management activities

Wild on Washington

RCW 77.12.170

Dedicated to the department of fish and wildlife's watchable wildlife activities, as defined in RCW 77.32.560

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The safety corps account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the sale of support public schools special license plates created in RCW 46.18.200 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only by educational service districts for:

(a) School safety training for administrators and security officers including, but not limited to: Security assessments of school facilities; violence prevention and reporting training for staff as appropriate to the particular duties and responsibilities of the specific staff, including administrators; nonviolence and leadership training for staff and students; and school safety plans. The educational service districts may contract for any services under this subsection (1)(a);

(b) Monitoring and mapping of school facilities pursuant to RCW 36.28A.060(3); and

(c) Training certificated staff and security officers in emergency preparation.

Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) By January 1, 2019, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must submit a report to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate detailing the progress made in implementing subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Firefighter memorial license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol honoring firefighters in Washington killed in the line of duty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect January 1, 2017.

--- END ---