BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the implementation of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes has had adverse impacts on some drivers in the corridor and that efforts should be taken to mitigate these unintended consequences. Therefore, the joint transportation committee must conduct a study on the implementation of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes and identify potential improvements.

(2) The joint transportation committee must also convene a stakeholder group to provide input on the study and conduct a review of the findings of the study. The stakeholder group must include representatives from the trucking industry, regional business communities, regional and local governments, transit advocates, commuters, the Washington state transportation commission, and the Washington state department of transportation.

(3) The study must include, but is not limited to, a review of the following topics:

(a) Eliminating the requirement to use a flex pass when operating a vehicle in the express toll lanes, including an analysis of alternative methods of tracking vehicles and collecting toll fees and the potential benefits and consequences of each alternative;

(b) Allowing two-person carpools at all times in areas of the corridor where there are express toll lanes. This portion of the study must also include:

(i) The impact of reducing the occupancy requirement on average travel times and speeds for all vehicles as well as for carpools, through the entire corridor and in the portion of the corridor where there are express toll lanes, both in the express toll lanes and the general purpose lanes;

(ii) The impact of reducing the occupancy requirement on the number of vehicles and the number of carpools operating in the entire corridor and in the portion of the corridor where there are express toll lanes; and

(iii) The impact of reducing the occupancy requirement on corridor capacity and the variable toll rate;

(c) The impact of providing more continuous access to express toll lanes on reducing conflict points;

(d) The impact of a phased approach to future expansion of the tolling system on toll lane implementation and commuter satisfaction; and

(e) A survey or profile of commuters using the corridor to determine how commuters use both the express toll lanes and general purpose lanes. This survey or profile must include, but not be limited to, socioeconomic status, trip purpose, and mode of transportation.

(4) The joint transportation committee must submit the findings of the study to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2016.

(5) This section expires November 1, 2016.

--- END ---