BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.37.530 and 2009 c 275 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful:

(a) For any person to operate a motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle not equipped with mirrors on the left and right sides which shall be so located as to give the driver a complete view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of the motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle: PROVIDED, That mirrors shall not be required on any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle over twenty-five years old originally manufactured without mirrors and which has been restored to its original condition and which is being ridden to or from or otherwise in conjunction with an antique or classic motorcycle contest, show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no mirror is required on any motorcycle manufactured prior to January 1, 1931;

(b) For any person to operate a motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle which does not have a windshield unless wearing glasses, goggles, or a face shield of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol;

(c) For any person under the age of twenty-one to operate or ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a state highway, county road, or city street unless wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle helmet except when the vehicle is an antique motor-driven cycle or when the vehicle is equipped with all of the following:

(i) Steering wheel;

(ii) Seat belts that conform to standards prescribed under 49 C.F.R. Part 571; and

(iii) Partially or completely enclosed seating area for the driver and passenger that is certified by the manufacturer as meeting the standards prescribed under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.216.

The motorcycle helmet neck or chin strap must be fastened securely while the motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle is in motion. Persons operating electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters shall comply with all laws and regulations related to the use of bicycle helmets;

(d) For any person to transport a child under the age of five on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle;

(e) For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet that does not meet the requirements established by this section.

(2) The state patrol may adopt and amend rules concerning standards for glasses, goggles, and face shields.

(3) For purposes of this section, "motorcycle helmet" means a protective covering for the head consisting of a hard outer shell, padding adjacent to and inside the outer shell, and a neck or chin strap type retention system, with the manufacturer's certification applied in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.218 indicating that the motorcycle helmet meets standards established by the United States department of transportation.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.30.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to registration under chapter 46.16A RCW in this state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with liability limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate of deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Proof of financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified under RCW 46.30.030.

(ii) This subsection (1)(a) applies to persons age twenty-one or older who are not wearing a helmet while operating a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304.

(b) A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in another state that requires drivers and owners of vehicles in that state to maintain insurance or financial responsibility shall, when requested by a law enforcement officer, provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance as is required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.

(c) When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to display proof of financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation as specified under RCW 46.30.030 creates a presumption that the person does not have motor vehicle insurance.

(d) Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a traffic infraction and is subject to penalties as set by the supreme court under RCW 46.63.110 or community restitution.

(e) For the purposes of this section, when a person uses a portable electronic device to display proof of financial security to a law enforcement officer, the officer may only view the proof of financial security and is otherwise prohibited from viewing any other content on the portable electronic device.

(f) Whenever a person presents a portable electronic device pursuant to this section, that person assumes all liability for any damage to the portable electronic device.

(2) If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section appears in person before the court or a violations bureau and provides written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be dismissed and the court or violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five dollars at the time of dismissal. In lieu of personal appearance, a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance before the court or violations bureau, submit by mail to the court or violations bureau written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in which case the citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court or violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five dollars at the time of dismissal.

(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:

(a) The operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW 46.18.220 or 46.18.255, governed by RCW 46.16A.170, or registered with the Washington utilities and transportation commission as common or contract carriers; ((or))

(b) The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304, ((or))by a person who is wearing a helmet; or

(c) The operation of a wheeled all-terrain vehicle as defined in RCW 46.09.310.

(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle liability policies required by this chapter but only those certified for the purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.59 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission must work with the appropriate state and local agencies to collect statistics related to motorcyclist fatalities during the helmet use pilot program created in this act. The commission must provide a report on the statistics collected in the pilot program to the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(2) This section expires December 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect September 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire September 1, 2022.

--- END ---