BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

September is the month of the kindergartner. Each September elementary schools are encouraged to determine a method to celebrate new kindergartners as they begin their life in K-12 education.

--- END ---