BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature that a regional transit authority receive additional approval from voters if the cost to complete a regional transit system plan approved by voters in 2016 increases beyond fifty-four billion dollars or any additions or subtractions of projects or significant project scope when compared to the system plan are made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Once an authority has expended eighty percent of all the funding elements identified in a regional transit system plan adopted by the board of an authority in June 2016, the authority must hire an independent auditor to determine if remaining unspent funding elements are sufficient to complete the system plan as approved by the authority's voters in 2016.

(2) If the auditor hired under subsection (1) of this section determines remaining unspent funding elements are insufficient to complete the system plan as approved by the authority's voters in 2016, the authority must propose a ballot proposition to be submitted to the voters of the authority. The ballot proposition must seek approval for an authority to expend funds beyond those in the system plan as approved by the authority's voters in 2016. The ballot proposition must receive a majority affirmative vote before an authority may expend funds beyond those identified in the system plan as approved by the authority's voters in 2016.

(3) If an authority proposes to make any additions or subtractions of projects or significant project scope when compared to the system plan as approved by the authority's voters in 2016, an authority must propose a ballot proposition to be submitted to the voters of the authority. The ballot proposition must identify changes to the system plan as approved by the authority's voters in 2016, and seek approval of these changes. The ballot proposition must receive a majority affirmative vote before an authority may continue funding additions or subtractions of projects or significant project scope when compared to the system plan as approved by the authority's voters in 2016.

--- END ---