BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.220 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 506 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship. The program established under this section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education offered by school districts.

(2) Each school district shall make available to students the following minimum instructional offering each school year:

(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be increased beginning in the 2015-16 school year to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for students enrolled in grades nine through twelve and at least one thousand instructional hours for students in grades one through eight, all of which may be calculated by a school district using a district-wide annual average of instructional hours over grades one through twelve; and

(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.

(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each school district shall include:

(a) Instruction in the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards under RCW 28A.655.070;

(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete twenty-four credits for high school graduation, beginning with the graduating class of 2019 or as otherwise provided in RCW 28A.230.090. Course distribution requirements may be established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;

(c) If the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards include a requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian languages;

(d) Supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065;

(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled students and exited students whose primary language is other than English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;

(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and

(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030.

(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.

(5)(a) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one hundred eighty school days per school year according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.

(b) Schools administering the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills may use up to three school days at the beginning of the school year to meet with parents and families as required in the parent involvement component of the inventory.

(c) In the case of students who are graduating from high school, a school district may schedule the last five school days of the one hundred eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from school upon the request of a student. All such students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. Any hours scheduled by a school district for noninstructional purposes during the last five school days for such students shall count toward the instructional hours requirement in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

(6) Subject to RCW 28A.150.276, nothing in this section precludes a school district from enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as offering additional instruction or providing additional services, programs, or activities that the school district determines to be appropriate for the education of the school district's students.

(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.195.010 and 2018 c 177 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any specific educational or other programs for private schools except as hereinafter in this section provided.

The administrative or executive authority of private schools or private school districts shall file each year with the state board of education a statement certifying that the minimum requirements hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. The state board of education may request clarification or additional information. After review of the statement, the state board of education will notify schools or school districts of any concerns, deficiencies, and deviations which must be corrected. If there are any unresolved concerns, deficiencies, or deviations, the school or school district may request or the state board of education on its own initiative may grant provisional status for one year in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the requirements. The state board of education shall not require private school students to meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of academic achievement, or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from high school, to master the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary basis, to have their students master these ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards, take the assessments, and obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement. Minimum requirements shall be as follows:

(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall consist of no less than one hundred eighty school days or the equivalent in annual minimum instructional hour offerings, with a school-wide annual average total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours for students enrolled in grades one through twelve, and at least four hundred fifty hours for students enrolled in kindergarten.

(2) The school day shall be the same as defined in RCW 28A.150.203.

(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state certification except as follows:

(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a state certificate to teach those courses.

(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without certification may teach students so long as a certified person exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be submitted to the state board of education reporting and explaining such circumstances.

(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a minimum that:

(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of an employee of the approved private school who is certificated under chapter 28A.410 RCW;

(b) The planning by the certificated person and the parent, guardian, or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;

(c) The certificated person spend a minimum average each month of one contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;

(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the certificated person; and

(e) The certificated employee shall not supervise more than thirty students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.

(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent records against loss or damage.

(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district: PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and fire safety requirements. A residential dwelling of the parent, guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.

(7) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.

(8) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and operation of the school or school district.

All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching material, curriculum, except as in subsection (7) of this section provided, school rules and administration, or other matters not specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility of the administration and administrators of the particular private school involved.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.200.010 and 2004 c 19 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the duty to:

(a) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction. The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the statement by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the superintendent of the public school district within which the parent resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the student shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district. Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;

(b) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review of the child's records; and

(c) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the state board of education is administered annually to the child by a qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently working in the field of education. The state board of education shall not require these children to meet the student learning goals, master the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards, to take the assessments, or to obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.155.045. The standardized test administered or the annual academic progress assessment written shall be made a part of the child's permanent records. If, as a result of the annual test or assessment, it is determined that the child is not making reasonable progress consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the parent shall make a good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.

(2) Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section shall be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school without valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(4).

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.210.360 and 2004 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Consistent with the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards for health and fitness, including nutrition, the Washington state school directors' association, with the assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of health, and the Washington alliance for health, physical education, recreation and dance, shall convene an advisory committee to develop a model policy regarding access to nutritious foods, opportunities for developmentally appropriate exercise, and accurate information related to these topics. The policy shall address the nutritional content of foods and beverages, including fluoridated bottled water, sold or provided throughout the school day or sold in competition with the federal school breakfast and lunch program and the availability and quality of health, nutrition, and physical education and fitness curriculum. The model policy should include the development of a physical education and fitness curriculum for students. For middle school students, physical education and fitness curriculum means a daily period of physical activity, a minimum of twenty minutes of which is aerobic activity in the student's target heart rate zone, which includes instruction and practice in basic movement and fine motor skills, progressive physical fitness, athletic conditioning, and nutrition and wellness instruction through age-appropriate activities.

(2) The school directors' association shall submit the model policy and recommendations on the related issues, along with a recommendation for local adoption, to the governor and the legislature and shall post the model policy on its web site by January 1, 2005.

(3) Each district's board of directors shall establish its own policy by August 1, 2005.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.230.095 and 2011 c 185 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By the end of the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall have in place in elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools assessments or other strategies chosen by the district to assure that students have an opportunity to learn the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness. Social studies includes history, geography, civics, economics, and social studies skills. Health and fitness includes, but is not limited to, mental health and suicide prevention education. Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit an implementation verification report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may not require school districts to use a classroom-based assessment in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness to meet the requirements of this section and shall clearly communicate to districts their option to use other strategies chosen by the district.

(2) Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall require students in the seventh or eighth grade, and the eleventh or twelfth grade to each complete at least one classroom-based assessment in civics. Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, school districts shall require students in the fourth or fifth grade to complete at least one classroom-based assessment in civics. The civics assessment may be selected from a list of classroom-based assessments approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit implementation verification reports to the office of the superintendent of public instruction documenting the use of the classroom-based assessments in civics.

(3) Verification reports shall require school districts to report only the information necessary to comply with this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.230.130 and 2011 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program, directly or in cooperation with a community college or another school district, for students whose educational plans include application for entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a high school diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050.

(2) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program, directly or in cooperation with a community or technical college, a ((skills [skill]))skill center, an apprenticeship committee, or another school district, for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a high school diploma. These programs may:

(a) Help students demonstrate the application of ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards to the world of work, occupation-specific skills, knowledge of more than one career in a chosen pathway, and employability and leadership skills; and

(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to prepare for industry certification, and/or have the opportunity to articulate to postsecondary education and training programs.

(3) Within existing resources, all public high schools in the state shall:

(a) Work towards the goal of offering a sufficient number of high school courses that give students the opportunity to earn the equivalent of a year's worth of postsecondary credit towards a certificate, apprenticeship program, technical degree, or associate or baccalaureate degree. These high school courses are those advanced courses that have accompanying proficiency exams or demonstrated competencies that are used to demonstrate postsecondary knowledge and skills; and

(b) Inform students and their families, emphasizing communication to underrepresented groups, about the program offerings and the opportunities to take courses that qualify for postsecondary credit through demonstrated competencies or if the student earns the qualifying score on the proficiency exam. This information shall encourage students to use the twelfth grade as the launch year for an advance start on their career and postsecondary education.

(4) A middle school that receives approval from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide a career and technical program in science, technology, engineering, or mathematics directly to students shall receive funding at the same rate as a high school operating a similar program. Additionally, a middle school that provides a hands-on experience in science, technology, engineering, or mathematics with an integrated curriculum of academic content and career and technical education, and includes a career and technical education exploratory component shall also qualify for the career and technical education funding.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.300.130 and 2016 c 72 s 804 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To facilitate access to information and materials on educational improvement and research, the superintendent of public instruction, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, shall establish the center for the improvement of student learning. The center shall work in conjunction with parents, educational service districts, institutions of higher education, and education, parent, community, and business organizations.

(2) The center, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, and in conjunction with other staff in the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall:

(a) Serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding successful educational improvement and parental involvement programs in schools and districts, and information about efforts within institutions of higher education in the state to support educational improvement initiatives in Washington schools and districts;

(b) Provide best practices research that can be used to help schools develop and implement: Programs and practices to improve instruction; systems to analyze student assessment data, with an emphasis on systems that will combine the use of state and local data to monitor the academic progress of each and every student in the school district; comprehensive, school-wide improvement plans; school-based shared decision-making models; programs to promote lifelong learning and community involvement in education; school-to-work transition programs; programs to meet the needs of highly capable students; programs and practices to meet the needs of students with disabilities; programs and practices to meet the diverse needs of students based on gender, racial, ethnic, economic, and special needs status; research, information, and technology systems; and other programs and practices that will assist educators in helping students learn the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards;

(c) Develop and maintain an internet web site to increase the availability of information, research, and other materials;

(d) Work with appropriate organizations to inform teachers, district and school administrators, and school directors about the waivers available and the broadened school board powers under RCW 28A.320.015;

(e) Provide training and consultation services, including conducting regional summer institutes;

(f) Identify strategies for improving the success rates of ethnic and racial student groups and students with disabilities, with disproportionate academic achievement;

(g) Work with parents, teachers, and school districts in establishing a model absentee notification procedure that will properly notify parents when their student has not attended a class or has missed a school day. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consider various types of communication with parents including, but not limited to, email, phone, and postal mail; and

(h) Perform other functions consistent with the purpose of the center as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall select and employ a director for the center.

(4) The superintendent may enter into contracts with individuals or organizations including but not limited to: School districts; educational service districts; educational organizations; teachers; higher education faculty; institutions of higher education; state agencies; business or community-based organizations; and other individuals and organizations to accomplish the duties and responsibilities of the center. In carrying out the duties and responsibilities of the center, the superintendent, whenever possible, shall use practitioners to assist agency staff as well as assist educators and others in schools and districts.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the legislature by September 1, 2007, and thereafter biennially, regarding the effectiveness of the center for the improvement of student learning, how the services provided by the center for the improvement of student learning have been used and by whom, and recommendations to improve the accessibility and application of knowledge and information that leads to improved student learning and greater family and community involvement in the public education system.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.300.440 and 2012 c 198 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The natural science, wildlife, and environmental education grant program is hereby created, subject to the availability of funds. The program is created to promote proven and innovative natural science, wildlife, and environmental education programs that are fully aligned with the state(('s essential academic)) learning ((requirements))standards, and includes but is not limited to instruction about renewable resources, responsible use of resources, and conservation.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish and publish funding criteria for environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and agricultural education grants. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall involve a cross-section of stakeholder groups to develop socially, economically, and environmentally balanced funding criteria. These criteria shall be based on compliance with the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and use methods that encourage critical thinking. The criteria must also include environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and agricultural education programs with one or more of the following features:

(a) Interdisciplinary approaches to environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and agricultural issues;

(b) Programs that target underserved, disadvantaged, and multicultural populations;

(c) Programs that reach out to schools across the state that would otherwise not have access to specialized environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and agricultural education programs;

(d) Proven programs offered by innovative community partnerships designed to improve student learning and strengthen local communities.

(3) Eligible uses of grants include, but are not limited to:

(a) Continuing in-service and preservice training for educators with materials specifically developed to enable educators to teach ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards in a compelling and effective manner;

(b) Proven, innovative programs that align the basic subject areas of the common school curriculum in chapter 28A.230 RCW with the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards; the basic subject areas should be integrated by using environmental education, natural science, wildlife, forestry, agricultural, and natural environment curricula to meet the needs of various learning styles; and

(c) Support and equipment needed for the implementation of the programs in this section.

(4) Grants may only be disbursed to nonprofit organizations exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code that can provide matching funds or in-kind services.

(5) Grants may not be used for any partisan or political activities.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.300.462 and 2011 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts are encouraged to voluntarily adopt the jumpstart coalition national standards in K-12 personal finance education and provide students with an opportunity to master the standards.

(2) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the financial education public-private partnership shall provide technical assistance and grants to support demonstration projects for district-wide adoption and implementation of the financial education learning standards under this section.

(3) School districts may apply on a competitive basis to participate as a demonstration project. The office and the partnership shall select up to four school districts as demonstration projects, with two districts located in eastern Washington and two districts located in western Washington, if possible.

(4) Selected districts must:

(a) Adopt the jumpstart coalition national standards in K-12 personal finance education as the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards for financial education and provide students with an opportunity to master the standards;

(b) Make a commitment to integrate financial education into instruction at all grade levels and in all schools in the district;

(c) Establish local partnerships within the community to promote financial education in the schools; and

(d) Conduct pre and posttesting of students' financial literacy.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, with the advice of the financial education public-private partnership, shall provide assistance to the demonstration projects regarding curriculum, professional development, and innovative instructional programs to implement the financial education standards.

(6) The selected districts must report findings and results of the demonstration project to the office of the superintendent of public instruction and appropriate committees of the legislature annually.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.305.215 and 2009 c 310 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The activities in this section revise and strengthen the state learning standards that implement the goals of RCW 28A.150.210((, known as the essential academic learning requirements,)) and improve alignment of school district curriculum to the standards.

(2) The state board of education shall be assisted in its work under subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section by: (a) An expert national consultant in each of mathematics and science retained by the state board; and (b) ((the)) mathematics and science advisory panels ((created under RCW 28A.305.219)), as appropriate, which shall provide review and formal comment on proposed recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education on new revised standards and curricula.

(3) By September 30, 2007, the state board of education shall recommend to the superintendent of public instruction revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations in mathematics. The recommendations shall be based on:

(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;

(b) Study of:

(i) Standards used in countries whose students demonstrate high performance on the trends in international mathematics and science study and the programme for international student assessment;

(ii) College readiness standards;

(iii) The national council of teachers of mathematics focal points and the national assessment of educational progress content frameworks; and

(iv) Standards used by three to five other states, including California, and the nation of Singapore; and

(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment periods.

(4)(a) By February 29, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall revise the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and the grade level expectations for mathematics and present the revised standards to the state board of education and the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4).

(b) The state board of education shall direct an expert national consultant in mathematics to:

(i) Analyze the February 2008 version of the revised standards, including a comparison to exemplar standards previously reviewed under this section;

(ii) Recommend specific language and content changes needed to finalize the revised standards; and

(iii) Present findings and recommendations in a draft report to the state board of education.

(c) By May 15, 2008, the state board of education shall review the consultant's draft report, consult the mathematics advisory panel, hold a public hearing to receive comment, and direct any subsequent modifications to the consultant's report. After the modifications are made, the state board of education shall forward the final report and recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction for implementation.

(d) By July 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall revise the mathematics standards to conform precisely to and incorporate each of the recommendations of the state board of education under (c) of this subsection and submit the revisions to the state board of education.

(e) By July 31, 2008, the state board of education shall either approve adoption by the superintendent of public instruction of the final revised standards as the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations for mathematics, or develop a plan for ensuring that the recommendations under (c) of this subsection are implemented so that final revised mathematics standards can be adopted by September 25, 2008.

(5) By June 30, 2008, the state board of education shall recommend to the superintendent of public instruction revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations in science. The recommendations shall be based on:

(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;

(b) Study of standards used by three to five other states and in countries whose students demonstrate high performance on the trends in international mathematics and science study and the programme for international student assessment; and

(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment periods.

(6) By December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall revise the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and the grade level expectations for science and present the revised standards to the state board of education and the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4). The superintendent shall adopt the revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations unless otherwise directed by the legislature during the 2009 legislative session.

(7)(a) Within six months after the standards under subsection (4) of this section are adopted, the superintendent of public instruction shall present to the state board of education recommendations for no more than three basic mathematics curricula each for elementary, middle, and high school grade spans.

(b) Within two months after the presentation of the recommended curricula, the state board of education shall provide official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction regarding the recommended mathematics curricula. The superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based on the comment and recommendations from the state board of education and adopt the recommended curricula.

(c) By June 30, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction shall present to the state board of education recommendations for no more than three basic science curricula each for elementary and middle school grade spans and not more than three recommendations for each of the major high school courses within the following science domains: Earth and space science, physical science, and life science.

(d) Within two months after the presentation of the recommended curricula, the state board of education shall provide official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction regarding the recommended science curricula. The superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based on the comment and recommendations from the state board of education and adopt the recommended curricula.

(e) In selecting the recommended curricula under this subsection (7), the superintendent of public instruction shall provide information to ((the)) mathematics and science advisory panels ((created under RCW 28A.305.219)), as appropriate, and seek the advice of the appropriate panel regarding the curricula that shall be included in the recommendations.

(f) The recommended curricula under this subsection (7) shall align with the revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations. In addition to the recommended basic curricula, appropriate diagnostic and supplemental materials shall be identified as necessary to support each curricula.

(g) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose and availability of the curricula, at least one of the curricula in each grade span and in each of mathematics and science shall be available to schools and parents online at no cost to the school or parent.

(8) By December 1, 2007, the state board of education shall revise the high school graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090 to include a minimum of three credits of mathematics, one of which may be a career and technical course equivalent in mathematics, and prescribe the mathematics content in the three required credits.

(9) Nothing in this section requires a school district to use one of the recommended curricula under subsection (7) of this section. However, the statewide accountability plan adopted by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130 shall recommend conditions under which school districts should be required to use one of the recommended curricula. The plan shall also describe the conditions for exception to the curriculum requirement, such as the use of integrated academic and career and technical education curriculum. Required use of the recommended curricula as an intervention strategy must be authorized by the legislature ((as required by RCW 28A.305.130(4)(e))) before implementation.

(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall conduct a comprehensive survey of the mathematics curricula being used by school districts at all grade levels and the textbook and curriculum purchasing cycle of the districts and report the results of the survey to the education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2008.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.320.173 and 2018 c 266 s 409 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Public schools may develop curricula that:

(a) Links student learning with engagement in seasonal or nonseasonal outdoor-based activities, including activities related to academic requirements in science, health and fitness, and career and technical education;

(b) Aligns with the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards under RCW 28A.655.070 that are a component of the state's instructional program of basic education; and

(c) Includes locally administered competency based assessments that align with the Washington state learning standards.

(2) Public schools that develop curricula under this section may request authorization from the superintendent of public instruction as provided in RCW 28A.300.790 to consider student participation in seasonal or nonseasonal outdoor-based activities as instructional days for the purposes of basic education requirements established in RCW 28A.150.220(5).

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.320.240 and 2015 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of this section is to identify quality criteria for school library information and technology programs that support the student learning goals under RCW 28A.150.210, the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards under RCW 28A.655.070, and high school graduation requirements adopted under RCW 28A.230.090.

(2) Every board of directors shall provide resources and materials for the operation of school library information and technology programs as the board deems necessary for the proper education of the district's students or as otherwise required by law or rule of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) "Teacher-librarian" means a certificated teacher with a library media endorsement under rules adopted by the professional educator standards board.

(4) "School library information and technology program" means a school-based program that is staffed by a certificated teacher-librarian and provides a broad, flexible array of services, resources, and instruction that support student mastery of the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and state standards in all subject areas and the implementation of the district's school improvement plan.

(5) The teacher-librarian, through the school library information and technology program, shall collaborate as an instructional partner to help all students meet the content goals in all subject areas, and assist high school students completing high school and beyond plans required for graduation.

(6) The teacher-librarian's duties may include, but are not limited to, collaborating with his or her schools to:

(a) Integrate information and technology into curriculum and instruction, including but not limited to instructing other certificated staff about using and integrating information and technology literacy into instruction through workshops, modeling lessons, and individual peer coaching;

(b) Provide information management instruction to students and staff about how to effectively use emerging learning technologies for school and lifelong learning, as well as in the appropriate use of computers and mobile devices in an educational setting;

(c) Help teachers and students efficiently and effectively access the highest quality information available while using information ethically;

(d) Instruct students in digital citizenship including how to be critical consumers of information and provide guidance about thoughtful and strategic use of online resources; and

(e) Create a culture of reading in the school community by developing a diverse, student-focused collection of materials that ensures all students can find something of quality to read and by facilitating school-wide reading initiatives along with providing individual support and guidance for students.

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.410.046 and 2011 c 209 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this section, an elementary mathematics specialist is a certificated teacher who has demonstrated at least the following knowledge and skills:

(a) Enhanced mathematics content knowledge and skills necessary to provide students in grades kindergarten through eight a deep understanding of the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and performance expectations in mathematics;

(b) Knowledge and skills in a variety of instructional strategies for teaching mathematics content; and

(c) Knowledge and skills in instructional strategies targeted for students struggling with mathematics.

(2) The legislature encourages the professional educator standards board to develop standards for and adopt a specialty endorsement for elementary mathematics specialists as defined under this section.

(3) School districts may work with local colleges and universities, educator preparation programs, and educational service districts to develop and offer training and professional development opportunities in the knowledge and skills necessary for a teacher to be considered an elementary mathematics specialist under this section.

(4) School districts are encouraged to use elementary mathematics specialists for direct instruction of students using an itinerant teacher model where the specialist rotates from classroom to classroom within the school.

Sec. 14. RCW 28A.600.310 and 2015 c 202 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received the credits required for the award of a high school diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education.

(b) The course sections and programs offered as running start courses must also be open for registration to matriculated students at the participating institution of higher education and may not be a course consisting solely of high school students offered at a high school campus.

(c) A student receiving home-based instruction enrolling in a public high school for the sole purpose of participating in courses or programs offered by institutions of higher education shall not be counted by the school district in any required state or federal accountability reporting if the student's parents or guardians filed a declaration of intent to provide home-based instruction and the student received home-based instruction during the school year before the school year in which the student intends to participate in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. Students receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students attending private schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not be required to meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from high school, or to master the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards. However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or programs in participating universities only if the board of directors of the student's school district has decided to participate in the program. Participating institutions of higher education, in consultation with school districts, may establish admission standards for these students. If the institution of higher education accepts a secondary school pupil for enrollment under this section, the institution of higher education shall send written notice to the pupil and the pupil's school district within ten days of acceptance. The notice shall indicate the course and hours of enrollment for that pupil.

(2)(a) In lieu of tuition and fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041:

(i) Running start students shall pay to the community or technical college all other mandatory fees as established by each community or technical college and, in addition, the state board for community and technical colleges may authorize a fee of up to ten percent of tuition and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041; and

(ii) All other institutions of higher education operating a running start program may charge running start students a fee of up to ten percent of tuition and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 in addition to technology fees.

(b) The fees charged under this subsection (2) shall be prorated based on credit load.

(c) Students may pay fees under this subsection with advanced college tuition payment program tuition units at a rate set by the advanced college tuition payment program governing body under chapter 28B.95 RCW.

(3)(a) The institutions of higher education must make available fee waivers for low-income running start students. Each institution must establish a written policy for the determination of low-income students before offering the fee waiver. A student shall be considered low income and eligible for a fee waiver upon proof that the student is currently qualified to receive free or reduced-price lunch. Acceptable documentation of low-income status may also include, but is not limited to, documentation that a student has been deemed eligible for free or reduced-price lunches in the last five years, or other criteria established in the institution's policy.

(b) Institutions of higher education, in collaboration with relevant student associations, shall aim to have students who can benefit from fee waivers take advantage of these waivers. Institutions shall make every effort to communicate to students and their families the benefits of the waivers and provide assistance to students and their families on how to apply. Information about waivers shall, to the greatest extent possible, be incorporated into financial aid counseling, admission information, and individual billing statements. Institutions also shall, to the greatest extent possible, use all means of communication, including but not limited to web sites, online catalogues, admission and registration forms, mass email messaging, social media, and outside marketing to ensure that information about waivers is visible, compelling, and reaches the maximum number of students and families that can benefit.

(4) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, participating institutions of higher education, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and distribution of the funds. The funds received by the institution of higher education from the school district shall not be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall be counted for the purpose of meeting enrollment targets in accordance with terms and conditions specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

Sec. 15. RCW 28A.655.061 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 31 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be limited to the statewide student assessment, opportunities for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which the student was not successful, and, if approved by the legislature pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student assessment for each content area.

(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of academic achievement shall be obtained and is evidence that the students have successfully met the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate. With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045 ((or 28A.655.0611)), acquisition of the certificate is required for graduation from a public high school but is not the only requirement for graduation.

(3)(a) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 through the graduating class of 2015, with the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who meets the state standards on the English language arts and mathematics high school statewide student assessment shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. The mathematics assessment shall be the end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school mathematics that assesses the standards common to algebra I and integrated mathematics I or the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics that assesses standards common to geometry and integrated mathematics II.

(b) As the state transitions from reading and writing assessments to an English language arts assessment and from end-of-course assessments to a comprehensive assessment for high school mathematics, a student in a graduating class of 2016 through 2018 shall earn a certificate of academic achievement if the student meets the high school graduation standard as follows:

(i) Students in the graduating class of 2016 may use the results from:

(A) The reading and writing assessment or the English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium; and

(B) The end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school mathematics, the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics, or the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium.

(ii) Students in the graduating classes of 2017 and 2018 may use the results from:

(A) The tenth grade English language arts assessment developed by the superintendent of public instruction using resources from the multistate consortium or the English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium; and

(B) The end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school mathematics, the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics, or the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium.

(c) Beginning with the graduating class of 2019, a student who meets the high school graduation standard on the high school English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium and the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.

(d) Beginning with the graduating class of 2020, a student who meets the high school graduation standard on the high school English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium and the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium to be administered in tenth grade shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.

(e) If a student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement, then the student may retake the assessment in the content area at least twice a year at no cost to the student. If the student successfully meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the state standards for that content area if the student has taken the statewide student assessment at least once. If the student successfully meets the state standards on the objective alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.

(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2021, a student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the statewide student assessment, a retake, or the objective alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement. The assessment under this subsection must be a comprehensive assessment of the science ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards adopted by the superintendent of public instruction in 2013.

(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.

(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.

(7) School districts must make available to students the following options:

(a) To retake the statewide student assessment at least twice a year in the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or

(b) To retake the statewide student assessment at least twice a year in the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of public instruction and the state board for community and technical colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these programs can be assessed.

(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the superintendent of public instruction.

(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be available to each school district.

(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop options for implementing objective alternative assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores, for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student assessment and be objective in its determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.

(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or writing portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on the statewide student assessment. A student's score on the science portion of the ACT or the science subject area tests of the SAT may be used as an objective alternative assessment under this section as soon as the state board of education determines that sufficient data is available to identify reliable equivalent scores for the science content area of the statewide student assessment. After the first scores are established, the state board may increase but not decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state standards.

(ii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing portion of the statewide student assessment; and for the English language arts portion of the assessment developed with the multistate consortium, once established in the 2014-15 school year. A score of three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition, macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history, world history, United States government and politics, or comparative government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for the reading portion of the statewide student assessment; and for the English language arts portion of the assessment developed with the multistate consortium, once established in the 2014-15 school year. A score of three on the AP examination in biology, physics, chemistry, or environmental science may be used as an alternative assessment for the science portion of the statewide student assessment.

(iii) A student who scores at least a four on selected externally administered international baccalaureate (IB) examinations may use the score as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that the student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. A score of four on the higher level IB examinations for any of the IB English language and literature courses or for any of the IB individuals and societies courses may be used as an alternative assessment for the reading, writing, or English language arts portions of the statewide student assessment. A score of four on the higher level IB examinations for any of the IB mathematics courses may be used as an alternative assessment for the mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of four on the higher level IB examinations for IB biology, chemistry, or physics may be used as an alternative assessment for the science portion of the statewide student assessment.

(iv)(A) Beginning in the 2018-19 school year, high school students who have not earned a certificate of academic achievement due to not meeting the high school graduation standard on the mathematics or English language arts assessment may take and pass a locally determined course in the content area in which the student was not successful, and may use the passing score on a locally administered assessment tied to that course and approved under the provisions of this subsection (10)(b)(iv), as an objective alternative assessment for demonstrating that the student has met or exceeded the high school graduation standard. High school transition courses and the assessments offered in association with high school transition courses shall be considered an approved locally determined course and assessment for demonstrating that the student met or exceeded the high school graduation standard. The course must be rigorous and consistent with the student's educational and career goals identified in his or her high school and beyond plan, and may include career and technical education equivalencies in English language arts or mathematics adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.230.097. School districts shall record students' participation in locally determined courses under this section in the statewide individual data system.

(B) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a process by which local school districts can submit assessments for review and approval for use as objective alternative assessments for graduation as allowed by (b)(iv) of this subsection. This process shall establish means to determine whether a local school district-administered assessment is comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student assessment and is objective in its determination of student achievement of the state standards. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall post on its agency web site a compiled list of local school district-administered assessments approved as objective alternative assessments, including the comparable scores on these assessments necessary to meet the standard.

(C) For the purpose of this section, "high school transition course" means an English language arts or mathematics course offered in high school where successful completion by a high school student ensures the student college-level placement at participating institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. High school transition courses must, in accordance with this section, satisfy core or elective credit graduation requirements established by the state board of education. A student's successful completion of a high school transition course does not entitle the student to be admitted to any institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(v) A student who completes a dual credit course in English language arts or mathematics in which the student earns college credit may use passage of the course as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that the student has met or exceeded the high school graduation standard for the certificate of academic achievement.

(11) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are on track for high school graduation, each school district shall:

(a) Provide students who have not earned a certificate of academic achievement before the beginning of grade eleven with the opportunity to access interventions and academic supports, courses, or both, designed to enable students to meet the high school graduation standard. These interventions, supports, or courses must be rigorous and consistent with the student's educational and career goals identified in his or her high school and beyond plan, and may include career and technical education equivalencies in English language arts or mathematics adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.230.097; and

(b) Prepare student learning plans and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as provided in this subsection. Student learning plans are required for eighth grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content areas of the state assessment during the previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the family. The plan shall include the following information as applicable:

(i) The student's results on the state assessment;

(ii) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;

(iii) Any credit deficiencies;

(iv) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;

(v) The student's progress toward meeting state and local graduation requirements;

(vi) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for graduation;

(vii) Remediation strategies and alternative education options available to students, including informing students of the option to continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until the age of twenty-one;

(viii) The alternative assessment options available to students under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;

(ix) School district programs, high school courses, and career and technical education options available for students to meet graduation requirements; and

(x) Available programs offered through skill centers or community and technical colleges, including the college high school diploma options under RCW 28B.50.535.

Sec. 16. RCW 28A.655.068 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 31 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, the statewide high school assessment in science shall be an end-of-course assessment for biology that measures the state standards for life sciences, in addition to systems, inquiry, and application as they pertain to life sciences.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction may develop or adopt science end-of-course assessments or a comprehensive science assessment that includes subjects in addition to biology for purposes of RCW 28A.655.061, when so directed by the legislature. The legislature intends to transition from a biology end-of-course assessment to a more comprehensive science assessment in a manner consistent with the way in which the state transitioned to an English language arts assessment and a comprehensive mathematics assessment. The legislature further intends that the transition will include at least two years of using the student assessment results from either the biology end-of-course assessment or the more comprehensive assessment in order to provide students with reasonable opportunities to demonstrate high school competencies while being mindful of the increasing rigor of the new assessment.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop or adopt a science assessment in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070(10) that is not biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.

(c) Before the next subsequent school year after the legislature directs the superintendent to develop or adopt a new science assessment, the superintendent of public instruction shall review the objective alternative assessments for the science assessment and make recommendations to the legislature regarding additional objective alternatives, if any.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction may participate with consortia of multiple states as common student learning standards and assessments in science are developed. The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, may modify the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and statewide student assessments in science, including the high school assessment, according to the multistate common student learning standards and assessments as long as the education committees of the legislature have opportunities for review before the modifications are adopted, as provided under RCW 28A.655.070.

(4) The statewide high school assessment under this section shall be used to demonstrate that a student meets the state standards in the science content area of the statewide student assessment until a comprehensive science assessment is required under RCW 28A.655.061.

Sec. 17. RCW 28A.655.070 and 2018 c 177 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards that identify the knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state board of education.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:

(a) Periodically revise the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards; and

(b) Review and prioritize the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the grade level content expectations to be assessed on the statewide student assessment and used for state or federal accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing the statewide student assessment.

(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if each student has mastered the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system may include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.

(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the Washington assessment of student learning and continuing with the statewide student assessment, the superintendent shall redesign the assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in all grades except high school by shortening test administration and reducing the number of short answer and extended response questions.

(c) By the 2014-15 school year, the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, shall modify the statewide student assessment system to transition to assessments developed with a multistate consortium, as provided in this subsection:

(i) The assessments developed with a multistate consortium to assess student proficiency in English language arts and mathematics shall be administered beginning in the 2014-15 school year. The reading and writing assessments shall not be administered by the superintendent of public instruction or schools after the 2013-14 school year.

(ii) The high school assessments in English language arts and mathematics in (c)(i) of this subsection shall be used for the purposes of earning a certificate of academic achievement for high school graduation under the timeline established in RCW 28A.655.061 and for assessing student career and college readiness.

(iii) During the transition period specified in RCW 28A.655.061, the superintendent of public instruction shall use test items and other resources from the consortium assessment to develop and administer a tenth grade high school English language arts assessment, an end-of-course mathematics assessment to assess the standards common to algebra I and integrated mathematics I, and an end-of-course mathematics assessment to assess the standards common to geometry and integrated mathematics II.

(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards or the statewide assessments, then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards before the modifications are adopted.

(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational support for students who have not mastered the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards at the appropriate periods in the student's educational development.

(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content areas from one school year to the next.

(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide educational support to individual students, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance information as possible within the constraints of the assessment system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school districts:

(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may provide additional achievement information for individual students; and

(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily shared with parents and students.

(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.

(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be integrated in the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and assessments for goals one and two.

(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly related to the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards, and are not biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.

(11) The superintendent shall review available and appropriate options for competency-based assessments that meet the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards. In accordance with the review required by this subsection, the superintendent shall provide a report and recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November 1, 2019.

(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique needs of special education students when developing the assessments under this section.

(13) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments under this section.

(14) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness.

(15) The superintendent shall integrate financial education skills and content knowledge into the state learning standards pursuant to RCW 28A.300.460(2)(d).

(16)(a) The superintendent shall notify the state board of education in writing before initiating the development or revision of the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The notification must be provided to the state board of education in advance for review at a regularly scheduled or special board meeting and must include the following information:

(i) The subject matter of the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards;

(ii) The reason or reasons the superintendent is initiating the development or revision; and

(iii) The process and timeline that the superintendent intends to follow for the development or revision.

(b) The state board of education may provide a response to the superintendent's notification for consideration in the development or revision process in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Prior to adoption by the superintendent of any new or revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards, the superintendent shall submit the proposed new or revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards to the state board of education in advance in writing for review at a regularly scheduled or special board meeting. The state board of education may provide a response to the superintendent's proposal for consideration prior to final adoption.

(17) The state board of education may propose new or revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards to the superintendent. The superintendent must respond to the state board of education's proposal in writing.

Sec. 18. RCW 28A.655.071 and 2010 c 235 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By August 2, 2010, the superintendent of public instruction may revise the state ((essential academic)) learning ((requirements))standards authorized under RCW 28A.655.070 for mathematics, reading, writing, and communication by provisionally adopting a common set of standards for students in grades kindergarten through twelve. The revised state ((essential academic)) learning ((requirements))standards may be substantially identical with the standards developed by a multistate consortium in which Washington participated, must be consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.655.070, and may include additional standards if the additional standards do not exceed fifteen percent of the standards for each content area. However, the superintendent of public instruction shall not take steps to implement the provisionally adopted standards until the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate have an opportunity to review the standards.

(2) By January 1, 2011, the superintendent of public instruction shall submit to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate:

(a) A detailed comparison of the provisionally adopted standards and the state ((essential academic)) learning ((requirements))standards as of June 10, 2010, including the comparative level of rigor and specificity of the standards and the implications of any identified differences; and

(b) An estimated timeline and costs to the state and to school districts to implement the provisionally adopted standards, including providing necessary training, realignment of curriculum, adjustment of state assessments, and other actions.

(3) The superintendent may implement the revisions to the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards under this section after the 2011 legislative session unless otherwise directed by the legislature.

Sec. 19. RCW 28A.655.075 and 2007 c 396 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, by December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations for educational technology literacy and technology fluency that identify the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to know and be able to do in the areas of technology and technology literacy. The development process shall include a review of current standards that have been developed or are used by other states and national and international technology associations. To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the technology ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards.

(a) As used in this section, "technology literacy" means the ability to responsibly, creatively, and effectively use appropriate technology to communicate; access, collect, manage, integrate, and evaluate information; solve problems and create solutions; build and share knowledge; and improve and enhance learning in all subject areas and experiences.

(b) Technology fluency builds upon technology literacy and is demonstrated when students: Apply technology to real-world experiences; adapt to changing technologies; modify current and create new technologies; and personalize technology to meet personal needs, interests, and learning styles.

(2)(a) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, the superintendent shall obtain or develop education technology assessments that may be administered in the elementary, middle, and high school grades to assess the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards for technology. The assessments shall be designed to be classroom or project-based so that they can be embedded in classroom instruction and be administered and scored by school staff throughout the regular school year using consistent scoring criteria and procedures. By the 2010-11 school year, these assessments shall be made available to school districts for the districts' voluntary use. If a school district uses the assessments created under this section, then the school district shall notify the superintendent of public instruction of the use. The superintendent shall report annually to the legislature on the number of school districts that use the assessments each school year.

(b) Beginning December 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the relevant legislative committees regarding the use of the assessments.

Sec. 20. RCW 28A.655.130 and 1999 c 388 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent funds are appropriated, the office of the superintendent of public instruction annually shall allocate accountability implementation funds to school districts. The purposes of the funds are to: Develop and update student learning improvement plans; implement curriculum materials and instructional strategies; provide staff professional development to implement the selected curricula and instruction; develop and implement assessment strategies and training in assessment scoring; and fund other activities intended to improve student learning for all students, including students with diverse needs. Activities funded by the allocations must be consistent with the school or district improvement plan, designed to improve the ability of teachers and other instructional certificated and classified staff to assist students in meeting the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards, and designed to achieve state and local accountability goals. Activities funded by the allocations shall be designed to protect the teachers' instructional time with students and minimize the use of substitute teachers.

(2) Schools receiving funds shall develop, update as needed, and keep on file a school student learning improvement plan to achieve the student learning goals and ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and to implement the assessment system as it is developed. The plan shall delineate how the accountability implementation funds will be used to accomplish the requirements of this section. The plan shall be made available to the public and to others upon request.

(3) The amount of allocations shall be determined in the omnibus appropriations act.

(4) The state schools for the deaf and blind are eligible to receive allocations under this section.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt timelines and rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to administer the program, and require that schools and districts submit reports regarding the use of the funds.

Sec. 21. RCW 28A.655.140 and 1999 c 388 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical assistance statewide, the superintendent of public instruction, subject to available funding, may employ school improvement coordinators and school improvement specialists to provide assistance to schools and districts. The improvement specialists shall serve on a rotating basis and shall not be permanent employees.

(2) The types of assistance provided by the improvement coordinators and specialists may include, but need not be limited to:

(a) Assistance to schools to use student performance data and develop improvement plans based on those data;

(b) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their performance on the ((Washington))statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) and other assessments;

(c) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and the ((Washington))statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) and that meets the needs of diverse learners;

(d) Assistance in the identification and implementation of research-based instructional practices;

(e) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional strategies and classroom-based assessment;

(f) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community involvement programs; and

(g) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to improve student learning.

Sec. 22. RCW 28A.710.040 and 2018 c 75 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A charter school must operate according to the terms of its charter contract and the provisions of this chapter.

(2) A charter school must:

(a) Comply with local, state, and federal health, safety, parents' rights, civil rights, and nondiscrimination laws applicable to school districts and to the same extent as school districts, including but not limited to chapter 28A.642 RCW (discrimination prohibition) and chapter 28A.640 RCW (sexual equality);

(b) Provide a program of basic education, that meets the goals in RCW 28A.150.210, including instruction in the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards, and participate in the statewide student assessment system as developed under RCW 28A.655.070;

(c) Comply with the screening and intervention requirements under RCW 28A.320.260;

(d) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW 28A.410.025. Charter schools, however, may hire noncertificated instructional staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as specified in RCW 28A.150.203(7);

(e) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW 28A.400.303;

(f) Adhere to generally accepted accounting principles and be subject to financial examinations and audits as determined by the state auditor, including annual audits for legal and fiscal compliance;

(g) Comply with the annual performance report under RCW 28A.655.110;

(h) Be subject to the performance improvement goals adopted by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130;

(i) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW and public records requirements in chapter 42.56 RCW; and

(j) Be subject to and comply with legislation enacted after December 6, 2012, that governs the operation and management of charter schools.

(3) Charter public schools must comply with all state statutes and rules made applicable to the charter school in the school's charter contract, and are subject to the specific state statutes and rules identified in subsection (2) of this section. For the purpose of allowing flexibility to innovate in areas such as scheduling, personnel, funding, and educational programs to improve student outcomes and academic achievement, charter schools are not subject to, and are exempt from, all other state statutes and rules applicable to school districts and school district boards of directors. Except as provided otherwise by this chapter or a charter contract, charter schools are exempt from all school district policies.

(4) A charter school may not engage in any sectarian practices in its educational program, admissions or employment policies, or operations.

(5) Charter schools are subject to the supervision of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education, including accountability measures, to the same extent as other public schools, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Sec. 23. RCW 43.06B.020 and 2013 c 23 s 83 are each amended to read as follows:

The education ombuds shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To develop parental involvement materials, including instructional guides developed to inform parents of the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards required by the superintendent of public instruction. The instructional guides also shall contain actions parents may take to assist their children in meeting the requirements, and should focus on reaching parents who have not previously been involved with their children's education;

(2) To provide information to students, parents, and interested members of the public regarding this state's public elementary and secondary education system;

(3) To identify obstacles to greater parent and community involvement in school shared decision-making processes and recommend strategies for helping parents and community members to participate effectively in school shared decision-making processes, including understanding and respecting the roles of school building administrators and staff;

(4) To identify and recommend strategies for improving the success rates of ethnic and racial student groups and students with disabilities, with disproportionate academic achievement;

(5) To refer complainants and others to appropriate resources, agencies, or departments;

(6) To facilitate the resolution of complaints made by parents and students with regard to the state's public elementary and secondary education system;

(7) To perform such other functions consistent with the purpose of the education ombuds; and

(8) To consult with representatives of the following organizations and groups regarding the work of the office of the education ombuds, including but not limited to:

(a) The state parent teacher association;

(b) Certificated and classified school employees;

(c) School and school district administrators;

(d) Parents of special education students;

(e) Parents of English language learners;

(f) The Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs;

(g) The Washington state commission on African-American affairs;

(h) The Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; and

(i) The governor's office of Indian affairs.

Sec. 24. RCW 79A.05.351 and 2015 c 245 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The outdoor education and recreation grant program is hereby created, subject to the availability of funds in the outdoor education and recreation account. The commission shall establish and implement the program by rule to provide opportunities for public agencies, private nonprofit organizations, formal school programs, nonformal after-school programs, and community-based programs to receive grants from the account. Programs that provide outdoor education opportunities to schools shall be fully aligned with the state(('s essential academic)) learning ((requirements))standards.

(2) The program shall be phased in beginning with the schools and students with the greatest needs in suburban, rural, and urban areas of the state. The program shall focus on students who qualify for free and reduced-price lunch, who are most likely to fail academically, or who have the greatest potential to drop out of school.

(3) The director shall set priorities and develop criteria for the awarding of grants to outdoor environmental, ecological, agricultural, or other natural resource-based education and recreation programs considering at least the following:

(a) Programs that contribute to the reduction of academic failure and dropout rates;

(b) Programs that make use of research-based, effective environmental, ecological, agricultural, or other natural resource-based education curriculum;

(c) Programs that contribute to healthy life styles through outdoor recreation and sound nutrition;

(d) Various Washington state parks as venues and use of the commission's personnel as a resource;

(e) Programs that maximize the number of participants that can be served;

(f) Programs that will commit matching and in-kind resources;

(g) Programs that create partnerships with public and private entities;

(h) Programs that provide students with opportunities to directly experience and understand nature and the natural world;

(i) Programs that include ongoing program evaluation, assessment, and reporting of their effectiveness; and

(j) Programs that utilize veterans for at least fifty percent of program implementation or administration.

(4) The director shall create an advisory committee to assist and advise the commission in the development and administration of the outdoor education and recreation program. The director should solicit representation on the committee from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of fish and wildlife, the business community, outdoor organizations with an interest in education, and any others the commission deems sufficient to ensure a cross section of stakeholders. When the director creates such an advisory committee, its members shall be reimbursed from the outdoor education and recreation program account for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) The outdoor education and recreation program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Funds deposited in the outdoor education and recreation program account shall be transferred only to the commission to be used solely for the commission's outdoor education and recreation program purposes identified in this section including the administration of the program. The director may accept gifts, grants, donations, or moneys from any source for deposit in the outdoor education and recreation program account. Any public agency in this state may develop and implement outdoor education and recreation programs. The director may make grants to public agencies and contract with any public or private agency or person to develop and implement outdoor education and recreation programs. The outdoor education and recreation program account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25. RCW 28A.655.010 (Washington commission on student learning—Definitions) and 1993 c 336 s 201 are each repealed.

--- END ---