BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes the many benefits of having skills in a second language, particularly with respect to the development of dual language skills at a young age. As students move through school and their respective careers, dual language skills provide an immense value to students and expand education and career opportunities. In addition, the legislature recognizes and commends students who come to school with skills in multiple languages, and that further development and recognition of these skills can improve educational outcomes for all students.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.575 and 2014 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state seal of biliteracy is established to recognize public high school graduates who have attained a high level of proficiency in speaking, reading, and writing in one or more world languages in addition to English. School districts are encouraged to award the seal of biliteracy to graduating high school students who meet the criteria established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this section. Participating school districts shall place a notation on a student's high school diploma and high school transcript indicating that the student has earned the seal.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules establishing criteria for award of the Washington state seal of biliteracy and as necessary for implementation of the world language competency credit grant program established in subsection (4) of this section. The criteria for award of the Washington state seal of biliteracy must require a student to demonstrate proficiency in English by meeting state high school graduation requirements in English, including through state assessments and credits, and proficiency in one or more world languages other than English. The criteria must permit a student to demonstrate proficiency in another world language through multiple methods including nationally or internationally recognized language proficiency tests and competency-based world language credits awarded under the model policy adopted by the Washington state school directors' association.

(3) For the purposes of this section, a world language other than English must include American sign language and Native American languages.

(4)(a) The world language competency credit grant program is established.

(b) Grants administered under this subsection shall be provided to districts to cover costs associated with world language proficiency tests for low-income students.

(c) For the purposes of the grant program established in this subsection, a student is considered low-income if the student qualifies for free or reduced price meals.

(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall administer the grant program established under this subsection.

--- END ---