BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.93.220 and 2014 c 76 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is the coordinating and administrative agency working with the departments of natural resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and recreation commission in developing a biennial budget request for funds for the various agencies' litter collection programs.

(2) Funds may be used to meet the needs of efficient and effective litter collection and illegal dumping programs identified by the various agencies. The department shall develop criteria for evaluating the effectiveness and efficiency of the waste reduction, litter control, and recycling programs being administered by the various agencies listed in RCW 70.93.180, and shall distribute funds according to the effectiveness and efficiency of those programs, with a priority given to litter control along state highways. In addition, the department shall approve funding requests for efficient and effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling programs, provide funds, and monitor the results of all agency programs.

(3) All agencies are responsible for reporting information on their litter collection programs as requested by the department.

(4) The department shall contract with the department of transportation to schedule litter prevention messaging and coordination of litter emphasis patrols with the Washington state patrol. Additionally, the department of transportation may coordinate with the department to conduct litter pickup during scheduled maintenance closures as situations allow.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as the welcome to Washington act.

--- END ---