BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

Special occasion licensees that are agricultural "area fairs," "county fairs," or "community fairs," as defined by RCW 15.76.120, may have multiple vendors and service locations within the fair venue for the sale of spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at the event, if the fairgrounds are enclosed by fencing and access is controlled.

--- END ---