BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.12.700 and 2011 c 171 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Titling options. An owner of a manufactured home shall establish ownership in the manufactured home by either:

(a) Applying for a certificate of title as required under this chapter; or

(b) Eliminating the certificate of title under chapter 65.20 RCW.

(2) Exemption. This section does not apply to a manufactured home held for resale by a dealer or manufacturer.

(3) Transferring ownership.(a) A registered owner of record must sign the certificate of title releasing the owner's interest when transferring ownership of a manufactured home. If the manufactured home was manufactured before June 15, 1976, the registered owner must sign an affidavit on a form approved by the department. The affidavit must state that the purchaser was notified that failure of the manufactured home to meet federal housing and urban development standards or failure of the manufactured home to meet a fire and safety inspection by the department of labor and industries may result in denial by a local jurisdiction of a permit to site the manufactured home.

(b) When a manufactured/mobile or park model home is sold at a county treasurer's foreclosure or distraint sale, the registered owner of record, legal owner on title, and the purchaser are not required to sign the certificate of title and title application to transfer title. Any lienholder interest in a manufactured/mobile or park model home is extinguished by the county treasurer's foreclosure or distraint sale, provided that such lienholder has been provided a copy of the notice of the sale at his or her last known address, by registered letter, at least thirty days prior to the date of sale.

(4) Evidence of taxes paid. Before accepting an application for a certificate of title for a manufactured home, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to provide evidence that any taxes due on the sale of the manufactured home under chapters 82.45 and 84.52 RCW have been paid. Acceptable evidence includes a copy of:

(a) The real estate excise tax affidavit that has been stamped by the county treasurer; or

(b) A treasurer certificate that is prepared by the treasurer of the county in which a used manufactured home is located and that states that all property taxes due upon the used manufactured home being sold have been satisfied.

(5) County assessor notification. The department shall notify the county assessor of the county where the manufactured home is located when ownership of a manufactured home is transferred. The notification must include the name and address of the former owner and the new owner.

(6) Title elimination. The certificate of title for a manufactured home may be eliminated or not issued when the manufactured home is registered under chapter 65.20 RCW. If the certificate of title is eliminated or not issued, the application must be recorded in the county property records of the county where the real property to which the home is affixed is located. All vehicle license fees and taxes applicable to manufactured homes under this chapter are due and must be collected before recording the ownership with the county auditor.

(7) Rules. The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.56.070 and 2015 c 95 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county treasurer must proceed to collect all personal property taxes after first completing the tax roll for the current year's collection.

(2) The treasurer must give notice by mail to all persons charged with personal property taxes, and if the taxes are not paid before they become delinquent, the treasurer must commence delinquent collection efforts. A delinquent collection charge for costs incurred by the treasurer may be added to the account.

(3) In the event that the treasurer is unable to collect the taxes when due under this section, the treasurer must prepare papers in distraint. The papers must contain a description of the personal property, the amount of taxes including any amounts deferred under chapters 84.37 and 84.38 RCW that are a lien on the personal property to be distrained, the amount of the accrued interest at the rate provided by law from the date of delinquency, and the name of the owner or reputed owner.

(a) The treasurer must without demand or notice distrain sufficient goods and chattels belonging to the person charged with the taxes to pay the same, with interest at the rate provided by law from the date of delinquency, together with all accruing costs. The treasurer must proceed to advertise the distraint by posting written notices in three public places in the county in which the property has been distrained, including the county courthouse. The notice must state the time when and place where the property will be sold.

(b) The county treasurer, or the treasurer's deputy, must tax the same fees for making the distraint and sale of goods and chattels for the payment of taxes as are allowed by law to sheriffs for making levy and sale of property on execution. Traveling fees must be computed from the county seat of the county to the place of making distraint.

(c) If the taxes for which the property is distrained, and the interest and costs accruing thereon, are not paid before the date appointed for the sale, which may not be less than ten days after the taking of the property, the treasurer or treasurer's designee must proceed to sell the property at public auction, or so much thereof as is sufficient to pay the taxes and any amounts deferred under chapters 84.37 and 84.38 RCW that are a lien on the property to be sold, with interest and costs. If there is any excess of money arising from the sale of any personal property, the treasurer must pay the excess less any cost of the auction to the owner of the property so sold or to his or her legal representative.

(d) If necessary to distrain any standing timber owned separately from the ownership of the land upon which the same may stand, or any fish trap, pound net, reef net, set net, or drag seine fishing location, or any other personal property as the treasurer determines to be incapable or reasonably impracticable of manual delivery, it is deemed to have been distrained and taken into possession when the treasurer has, at least thirty days before the date fixed for the sale thereof, filed with the auditor of the county wherein the property is located a notice in writing reciting that the treasurer has distrained the property. The notice must describe the property, give the name of the owner or reputed owner, the amount of the tax due, with interest, and the time and place of sale. A copy of the notice must also be sent to the owner or reputed owner at his or her last known address, by registered letter at least thirty days prior to the date of sale.

(e) If the county treasurer has reasonable grounds to believe that any personal property, including mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park model trailers, upon which taxes have been levied, but not paid, is about to be removed from the county where the property has been assessed, or is about to be destroyed, sold, or disposed of, the county treasurer may demand the taxes, without the notice provided for in this section, and if necessary distrain sufficient goods and chattels to pay the same.

(4) As an alternative to the sale procedure specified in this section, the county treasurer may conduct a public auction sale by electronic media pursuant to RCW 36.16.145.

--- END ---