BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2021, out of the several funds specified in this act.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Fiscal year 2020" or "FY 2020" means the period beginning July 1, 2019, and ending June 30, 2020.

(b) "Fiscal year 2021" or "FY 2021" means the period beginning July 1, 2020, and ending June 30, 2021.

(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose.

(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2021-2023 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.

(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2019, from the 2017-2019 biennial appropriations for each project.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

Division III Roof Replacement and Maintenance (30000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$262,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$262,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Library Archives (30000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the library archives building.

(2) The secretary of state must enter into a financial contract for up to $103,143,000.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

State Archives Minor Works Projects (30000042)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$573,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$573,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (20074009)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$62,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$199,760,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$199,822,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other requirements for community projects administered by the department.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,447,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$8,020,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$12,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,141,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,937,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,532,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$18,469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,931,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,906,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$278,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$12,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$70,816,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$83,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2015-17 Community Economic Revitalization Board Program (30000834)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$10,588,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000835)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1035, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ultra-Efficient Affordable Housing Demonstration (30000836)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,655,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,363,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,665,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$47,639,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$7,513,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$96,817,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,972,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$110,789,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Economic Opportunity Grants (30000873)

Rural Washington Loan Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,750,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (30000875)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,907,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,907,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building for the Arts Grant Program (30000877)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Construction Loans (30000878)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6001 of this act and shall be expended for the projects listed. However, if upon review of applications the public works board determines that a project is ineligible for a loan, or if the entity responsible for construction of a listed project declines a loan, the department may transfer any excess funding to other public works projects as recommended and approved through the public works board, provided those projects meet eligibility criteria.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$65,117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,103,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$77,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Plus Health Matchmaker Program (30000879)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1014, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,818,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,934,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$16,752,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,748,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1013, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,472,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,065,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,934,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$45,471,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$629,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$46,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000882)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6015 of this act.

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,478,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,162,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$10,640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building Communities Fund Grant (30000883)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6003 of this act.

(2) The Interbay public development advisory committee shall provide a report to the legislature and office of the governor with recommendations by September 15, 2019. The Interbay advisory committee's recommendations must include recommendations regarding the structure, composition, and scope of authority of any subsequent state public development authority that may be established to implement the recommendations of the Interbay advisory committee.

(3) The Interbay public development advisory committee terminates June 30, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$90,642,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$39,799,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,441,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning Facility Grants (40000006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Clinic Capacity Grants (40000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,534,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,534,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

PWAA Preconstruction and Emergency Loan Programs (40000009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $5,000,000 is for the public works board's emergency loan program.

(2) Up to $14,000,000 is for the public works board's preconstruction loan program.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6017 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$85,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,876,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$90,876,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Housing Trust Fund Program (40000036)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $154,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation and $21,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for production and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $17,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grant awards for high quality affordable housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. These funds must be awarded to projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $125,000, excluding the value of land, off-site infrastructure costs, and any capitalized reserves, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a twenty-five year period.

(b) $35,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with behavioral or chronic mental illness. When evaluating applications for this population, the department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that show:

(i) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more behavioral health regions;

(ii) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in the applicant's region;

(iii) A commitment by the applicant to provide, directly or through a formal partnership, necessary treatment and supportive services to the tenants and maintain the beds or housing units for at least a forty-year period;

(iv) Readiness to begin structural modifications or construction resulting in a fast project completion; and

(v) Program requirements that adhere to the key elements of permanent supportive housing programs including choice in housing and living arrangements, functional separation of housing and services, community integration, rights of tenancy, and voluntary recovery-focused services.

(c) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing that serves people with developmental disabilities.

(d) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing that serves people who are employed as farmworkers.

(e) $12,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a state match or state matches on private contributions that fund the production and preservation of affordable housing. Awards must be made using a competitive process.

(f) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

Bellwether Housing (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Crosswalk Teen Shelter and Transitional Housing

Project (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Housing (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

FUSION Emergency Housing for Homeless Families

(Federal Way). . . .$1,500,000

Highland Village (Airway Heights). . . .$3,500,000

Home At Last (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Mary's Place Family Center (Burien). . . .$1,500,000

NorthHaven Affordable Senior Housing Campus (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Plymouth Housing (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Roslyn Housing Project (Roslyn). . . .$2,000,000

Seattle Indian Health Board - Low Income Housing

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Tenny Creek Assisted Living (Vancouver). . . .$1,000,000

Veterans Supportive Housing (Yakima). . . .$2,500,000

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

(4)(a) The department, in cooperation with the housing finance commission, must develop and implement a process for the collection of certified final development cost data from each grant or loan recipient under this section. The department must use this data as part of its cost containment policy.

(b) Beginning December 1, 2019, and continuing annually, the department must provide the legislature with a report of its final cost data for each project under this section. Such cost data must, at a minimum, include total development cost per unit for each project completed within the past year, descriptive statistics such as average and median per unit costs, regional cost variation, and other costs that the department deems necessary to improve cost controls and enhance understanding of development costs. The department must coordinate with the housing finance commission to identify relevant development costs data and ensure that the measures are consistent across relevant agencies.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$154,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$175,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$175,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Tower Capital Improvements (40000037)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,311,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Board (40000038)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations may be used to address fish barriers consistent with the comprehensive strategy to maximize habitat values of culvert correction investments, as recommended by the fish passage barrier removal board established in RCW 77.95.160.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$200,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$205,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$205,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Building for the Arts Grant Program (40000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Seattle Theatre Group. . . .$310,000

Music Center of the Northwest. . . .$300,000

Seattle Symphony Orchestra. . . .$912,000

Broadway Center for the Performing Arts. . . .$586,000

Bainbridge Artisan Resource Network. . . .$1,057,000

Nordic Heritage Museum Foundation. . . .$2,000,000

Imagine Children's Museum. . . .$2,000,000

Seattle Opera. . . .$526,000

KidsQuest Children's Museum. . . .$816,000

Central Stage Theatre of County Kitsap. . . .$964,000

Roxy Bremerton Foundation. . . .$51,000

Port Angeles Waterfront Center. . . .$1,112,000

Rehabilitating Fort Worden's Historic Warehouses. . . .$712,000

Sea Mar Museum of Chicano/a Latino/a Culture. . . .$654,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$48,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Community Economic Revitalization Board (40000040)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$8,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$34,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$43,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (40000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.135.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Boys and Girls Clubs of Benton and Franklin

Counties. . . .$1,088,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic. . . .$737,000

Tulalip Tribes of Washington. . . .$425,000

YMCA of Pierce and Kitsap Counties. . . .$1,200,000

YMCA of the Inland Northwest. . . .$10,000

Bainbridge Island Child Care Centers. . . .$90,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle-Camp Orkila. . . .$250,000

Plus Delta After School Studios, dba The Club. . . .$80,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle-Camp Colman. . . .$250,000

Boys and Girls Clubs of Snohomish County. . . .$400,000

Camp Korey. . . .$545,000

Woodland Community Swimming Pool Committee. . . .$805,000

Volunteers of America Western Washington. . . .$1,200,000

MLK Fame Arts Mentoring and Enrichment Center. . . .$11,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,091,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,091,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Transition 4 (40000042)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including communities with high environmental or energy burden.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring, and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department is entitled to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) $5,143,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grid modernization grants for projects that: Advance clean and renewable energy technologies and transmission and distribution control systems; support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources, and sustainable microgrids; and increase utility customer options for energy sources, energy efficiency, energy equipment, and utility services.

(a) Projects must be implemented by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(6)(a) $4,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies. These grants will be used to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult and coordinate with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the grant program. Clean energy organizations who compete for grants from the program may not participate in the design of the grant program. Criteria for the grant program must include life cycle cost analysis for projects that are part of the competitive process.

(c) The program may include, but is not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, battery components recycling, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(7)(a) $2,857,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely as grants to nonprofit lenders to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that will provide matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The department must select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(8) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington maritime innovation center. The center must be used to support technology acceleration and incubation, and act as a focal point for maritime sustainability, including, but not limited to, supporting technology development for maritime decarbonization and electrification.

(9) $8,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for scientific instruments to help accelerate research in energy storage for the electric grid at a new facility at the Pacific Northwest national laboratory. The state funds are contingent on securing federal funds for the new facility, and are provided as a match to the federal funding. The instruments purchased with this appropriation will support collaborations with the University of Washington and Washington State University.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$73,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$98,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Building Communities Fund Program (40000043)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.

(2) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Mercy Housing Northwest. . . .$820,000

Northwest Indian College. . . .$232,000

Refugee Women's Alliance (ReWA). . . .$392,000

Coastal Community Action Program. . . .$3,120,000

West African Community Council. . . .$387,000

YWCA Pierce County. . . .$750,000

Work Opportunities. . . .$25,000

Whatcom Dispute Resolution Center. . . .$118,300

University Heights Center for the Community. . . .$271,300

Chief Seattle Club. . . .$1,700,000

HomeSight. . . .$3,000,000

Unity Care NW. . . .$3,000,000

Rainier Valley Food Bank. . . .$950,000

Peninsula Behavioral Health. . . .$200,000

Compass Health. . . .$3,500,000

Blue Mountain Action Council. . . .$750,000

Encompass Northwest. . . .$1,500,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of the Olympic Peninsula. . . .$575,000

Community Action Council of Lewis, Mason & Thurston

Counties. . . .$475,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle. . . .$2,000,000

South Sound YMCA. . . .$3,500,000

Downtown Emergency Service Center (DESC). . . .$2,000,000

Friends of Youth. . . .$210,000

Holly Ridge Center, INC. . . .$600,000

Partners with Families & Children: Spokane. . . .$500,000

Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe Health and Wellness

Center. . . .$2,000,000

Willapa Center. . . .$260,000

Lynnwood Neighborhood Center. . . .$2,000,000

FareStart Capital Improvements. . . .$200,000

Ethiopian Community Village. . . .$750,000

Spokane Guilds' School Capital Campaign. . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$36,785,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Early Learning Facilities (40000044)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573.

(2) $4,186,000 is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects in the following amounts:

Toppenish School District. . . .$111,000

Manson School District. . . .$400,000

Kettle Falls School District. . . .$395,000

North Thurston School District. . . .$324,000

Ellensburg School District 401. . . .$800,000

Everett School District. . . .$800,000

Tukwila School District 406. . . .$196,000

Richland School District. . . .$800,000

Lake Quinault School District. . . .$360,000

(3) The department of commerce must assist the department of children, youth, and families in developing a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(4) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the department of commerce must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556.

(5) The department of commerce must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Weatherization (40000048)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners in making sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support via training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings; this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants Program (40000049)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $1,666,000 for fiscal year 2020 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts and state agencies for operational cost savings improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(b) At least twenty percent of each competitive grant round must be awarded in small cities or towns with a population of five thousand or fewer residents.

(c) In each competitive round, the higher the leverage ratio of nonstate funding sources to state grant and the higher the energy savings, the higher the project ranking.

(d) For school district applicants, priority consideration must be given to school districts that demonstrate improved health and safety through reduced exposure to polychlorinated biphenyl. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(2) $3,333,000 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for products manufactured in Washington.

(3) $5,000,000 is provided solely for efficiency and environmental performance improvements to minor works and stand-alone projects at state-owned facilities that repair or replace existing building systems including, but not limited to, HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request. Prior to awarding funds, the department shall submit to the office of financial management a list of all proposed awards for review and approval.

(4) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed and cost of energy saved.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Rehabilitation Loan Program (40000052)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Behavioral Health Capacity Grants (40000114)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the health care authority, to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with the establishment of the facilities. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services. The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more behavioral health regions;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds; and

(g) If applicable, the applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(2) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (3) of this section, the department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and behavioral health regions, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(3) $101,500,000 is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1) and (2) of this section:

(a) $5,000,000 is provided solely for at least two enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of geriatric or traumatic brain injury patients and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for at least four intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $2,000,000 is provided solely for at least one facility with secure detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) $2,000,000 is provided solely for one or more facilities to add at least sixteen crisis triage and/or stabilization beds in the Spokane region that will address both urban and rural needs and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases, consistent with the settlement agreement in A.B., by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al.;

(e) $7,500,000 is provided solely for at least five mental health drop-in centers that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. No more than one mental health drop-in center should be funded in each of the nine regions;

(f) $15,000,000 is provided solely for at least two enhanced adult residential care facilities for long-term placement of dementia patients that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(g) $21,300,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals, freestanding evaluation and treatment providers, or freestanding psychiatric hospitals to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on ninety-day or one hundred eighty-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the department of social and health services;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the omnibus operating appropriations act for these purposes.

(h) $39,562,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

Detox/Inpatient SUD Building (Centralia). . . .$750,000

Evergreen RC Addiction Treatment Facility for Mothers

(Everett). . . .$2,000,000

HealthPoint Behavioral Health Expansion (Auburn). . . .$1,030,000

Issaquah Opportunity Center (Issaquah). . . .$3,000,000

Maple Street Clinic Behavioral Health Expansion

(Spokane). . . .$411,000

Multicare - Auburn Campus. . . .$15,000,000

Peninsula Community Health Services Behavioral Health

Expansion (Bremerton). . . .$1,700,000

Providence Everett. . . .$4,200,000

Regional Stabilization Campus (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$6,600,000

Sea Mar Community Health Centers Seattle BH (Seattle). . . .$371,000

Tri-County Sub-Acute Detox and Crisis Center

(Oak Harbor). . . .$2,300,000

Virginia Mason - Yakima Valley Memorial Hospital. . . .$2,200,000

(i) $10,000,000 of the community behavioral health account—state appropriation is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs.

(4) $5,000,000 is provided solely for a behavioral health permanent supportive housing pilot. The department must work with the department of health and the health care authority to develop criteria for applicants. These must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more behavioral health regions;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a twenty-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds; and

(g) Program requirements that adhere to the key elements of permanent supportive housing programs including choice in housing and living arrangements, functional separation of housing and services, community integration, rights of tenancy, and voluntary recovery-focused services.

(5) The department of commerce shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(6) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, shall establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate enhanced services facilities, intensive behavioral health treatment facilities, secure detoxification facilities, crisis stabilization units, mental health drop-in centers, community hospitals or freestanding psychiatric hospitals, enhanced adult residential care facilities, and evaluation and treatment facilities.

(7) If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5537 (behavioral health facilities) is not enacted by June 30, 2019, and ratified by the people by December 5, 2019, then the community behavioral health account appropriation provided in this section shall lapse.

Community Behavioral Health Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$107,362,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$117,362,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$400,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$517,362,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) $615,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for replacement and repair of dock facilities available for public use at Van Riper marina, without requiring matching resources, and provided that a grant and lease term of thirty years is offered to the recipient from the state.

(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

?al?al "Home" in Lushootseed (Seattle). . . .$947,000

2020 and Beyond Updated Small Water System Plan

(Index). . . .$23,000

Aging in PACE Washington (AiPACE) (Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Airport Utility Extension (Pullman). . . .$1,626,000

Aquatic and Recreation Center (King County). . . .$1,050,000

Battle Ground YMCA (Battle Ground). . . .$500,000

Blue Mountain Action Council Comm. Services Center

(Walla Walla). . . .$1,000,000

Bothell Downtown Revitalization (Bothell). . . .$1,500,000

Boys & Girls Club ECEAP Facility (Monroe). . . .$200,000

Boys & Girls Club Parking Safety Improvements

(Arlington). . . .$100,000

Boys & Girls Club Roof and Flooring Repairs

(Federal Way). . . .$319,000

Brezee Creek Culvert Replacement/East 4th St Widening

(La Center). . . .$1,500,000

Browns Park Project (Spokane Valley). . . .$520,000

Carbonado Water Source Protection Acquisition

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Carl Maxey Center (Spokane). . . .$350,000

Cathlamet Pioneer Center Restoration (Cathlamet). . . .$165,000

Cheney Reclaimed Water Project (Cheney). . . .$2,000,000

Chief Kitsap Community and Education Center (Poulsbo). . . .$750,000

Chief Leschi Schools Facilities & Safety Project

(Puyallup). . . .$250,000

Civic Center Parking Lot Paving (Shelton). . . .$283,000

Community Services of Moses Lake Food Bank Facility

(Moses Lake). . . .$2,000,000

Dakota Homestead (Seattle). . . .$155,000

Dungeness River Audubon Center Expansion (Sequim). . . .$500,000

East Hylebos Watershed Cons. Prop. Acquisition

(Federal Way). . . .$500,000

Eatonville 3rd Water Filter and Clear Well

(Eatonville). . . .$1,400,000

El Centro de la Raza (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Evergreen Speedway Capital Improvement (Monroe). . . .$150,000

Expanding on Excellence Capital Campaign

(White Salmon). . . .$500,000

Felts Field Gateway Improvement Phase 1 (Spokane). . . .$100,000

Filipino Community Center Roof (Wapato). . . .$40,000

Flood Plain Stabilization, Habitat Enhancement

(Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Foothills Trail Extension (Wilkeson). . . .$500,000

Fort Steilacoom Park Artificial Turf Infields

(Lakewood). . . .$1,015,000

Fourth Plain Community Commons (Vancouver). . . .$800,000

Gene Coulon Memorial Beach Park Play Equipment Upgrade

(Renton). . . .$618,000

Grand Connection Downtown Park Gateway (Bellevue). . . .$1,000,000

Granger Historical Museum Construction (Granger). . . .$150,000

Granite Falls Police Dept Renovation Project

(Granite Falls). . . .$200,000

Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial (Maple Valley). . . .$99,000

Green Bridges, Healthy Communities; Aurora Bridge I-5

(Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Healthpoint Dental Expansion (SeaTac). . . .$1,545,000

High Dune Trail & Conservation Project (Ocean Shores). . . .$140,000

Historic Olympic Stadium Preservation Project

(Hoquiam). . . .$515,000

Historical Museum & Community Center Roof Replacement

(Washtucna). . . .$24,000

Howard Bowen Event Complex (Sumas). . . .$1,712,000

ICHS Bellevue Clinic Renovation Project (Bellevue). . . .$1,600,000

Illahee Preserve's Lost Continent Acquisition

(Bremerton). . . .$335,000

Imagine Children's Museum Expansion and Renovation

(Everett). . . .$2,000,000

Infrastructure for Economic Development

(Port Townsend). . . .$675,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center Phase 1

(Yakima). . . .$500,000

Interactive Educ. Enhancement/Friends Issaquah Hatchery

(Issaquah). . . .$113,000

Japanese American Exclusion Departure Deck

(Bainbridge Island). . . .$150,000

Japanese Gulch Daylight Project (Mukilteo). . . .$200,000

Keller House and Carriage House Paint Restoration

(Colville). . . .$45,000

Key Kirkland Sidewalk Repairs (Kirkland). . . .$537,000

Key Peninsula Elder Community (Gig Harbor). . . .$1,000,000

La Conner Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$700,000

Lacey Veterans Services Hub Facility Renovation

(Lacey). . . .$2,000,000

Lake City Community Center Replacement (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center Phase II (Lake Stevens). . . .$1,000,000

Lake Wilderness Park Improvements (Maple Valley). . . .$200,000

Land Use & Infrastructure Subarea Plan (Mill Creek). . . .$300,000

Larson Gallery - West Campus (Yakima). . . .$875,000

Legacy in Motion (Puyallup). . . .$1,750,000

Legacy Site Utility Infrastructure (Maple Valley). . . .$150,000

LIGO STEM Exploration Center (Richland). . . .$1,700,000

Little Mountain Road Pipeline and Booster Station

(Mount Vernon). . . .$1,300,000

Lopez Island Swim Center (Lopez Island). . . .$1,000,000

Mabton City Park (Mabton). . . .$54,000

Main Street Redevelopment Project - Phase 2

(University Place). . . .$985,000

Mariner Community Campus (Everett). . . .$2,250,000

Marymount Museum/Spana-Park Senior Center

(Spanaway). . . .$1,000,000

McCormick Woods Sewer Lift #2 Improvements

(Port Orchard). . . .$800,000

Mercer Is/Aubrey Davis Park Trail Upgrade

(Mercer Island). . . .$500,000

Mt Adams Comm. Forest, Klickitat Canyon Rim Purchase

(Glenwood). . . .$400,000

NEW Health Programs, Colville Dental Clinic

(Colville). . . .$1,250,000

Newman Lake Flood Control Zone District (Newman Lake). . . .$415,000

North Elliott Bay Public Dock; Marine Transit Terminal

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Northshore Senior Center Rehabilitation Project

(Bothell). . . .$500,000

Northwest Native Canoe Center (Seattle). . . .$986,000

Opening Doors - Permanent Supportive Housing Facility

(Bremerton). . . .$750,000

Orting City Hall and Police Station (Orting). . . .$600,000

Outdoors for All (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Pendergast Regional Park Phase II (Bremerton). . . .$50,000

Peninsula Community Health Service Dental Mobile

(Bremerton). . . .$340,000

Pet Overpopulation Prevention Vet Clinic Building

(West Richland). . . .$300,000

Port of Hadlock Wastewater Facility Project

(Port Hadlock). . . .$200,000

Port of Ilwaco Boatyard Modernization (Ilwaco). . . .$545,000

Protect Sewer Plant from Erosion (Ocean Shores). . . .$155,000

Redmond Pool (Redmond). . . .$1,000,000

Renton Connector Trail (Renton). . . .$500,000

Richmond Highland Recreation Center Repairs

(Shoreline). . . .$500,000

Ritzville Business & Entrepreneurship Center

(Ritzville). . . .$350,000

Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex (Woodland). . . .$500,000

Sea Mar Comm Health Centers Port Angeles Dental

(Port Angeles). . . .$195,000

Sea Mar Community Health Centers Tumwater Dental

(Olympia). . . .$170,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Sedro-Woolley Regional Library (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$500,000

Sewage Lagoon Decommissioning (Concrete). . . .$255,000

Shoreline Maintenance Facility - Brightwater Site

(Shoreline). . . .$500,000

Skabob House Cultural Center (Shelton). . . .$350,000

Skagit Co. Law Enforcement Emergency Communication

(Mount Vernon). . . .$1,000,000

Snohomish County Sheriff's Office South Precinct

(Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Snohomish Fire District #26 Communications Project

(Gold Bar). . . .$27,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Activities Center

(North Bend). . . .$400,000

South Fork Snoqualmie Levee Setback Project

(North Bend). . . .$250,000

SOZO Sports Indoor Arena (Yakima). . . .$600,000

Springbrook Park Expansion & Clover Creek Restoration

(Lakewood). . . .$773,000

SR 530 "Oso" Slide Memorial (Arlington). . . .$300,000

Stan and Joan Cross Park (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Starfire Sports STEM (Tukwila). . . .$250,000

Sultan Water Treatment Plant Design (Sultan). . . .$246,000

Sumas History Themed Playground and Water Park

(Sumas). . . .$288,000

Sunnyside Airport Hangar Maintenance Facility

(Sunnyside). . . .$500,000

Sunnyside Yakima Valley-TEC Welding Program (Yakima). . . .$25,000

Sunset Multi-Service & Career Development Center

(Renton). . . .$1,000,000

SW Washington Regional Agriculture & Innovation Park

(Tenino). . . .$1,500,000

Tacoma Beacon Center Renovation (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Tam O'Shanter Park Circulation & Parking Phase 2

(Kelso). . . .$1,030,000

Terminal 1 Waterfront Development (Vancouver). . . .$1,000,000

THA Arlington Drive Campus for Homeless Youth

(Tacoma). . . .$800,000

The AMP: AIDS Memorial Pathway (Seattle). . . .$600,000

The Cutter Theatre Roof Replacement (Metaline Falls). . . .$30,000

Town Center to Burke Gilman Trail Connector

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$500,000

Tukwila Village Food Hall (Tukwila). . . .$400,000

Twin Springs Park (Kenmore). . . .$155,000

Union Gap Library and Community Center (Union Gap). . . .$2,000,000

Van Riper's Marina Replacement and Repair (Sekiu). . . .$615,000

Veterans Dental Clinic (Yakima). . . .$455,000

Volunteer Park Amphitheater (Seattle). . . .$500,000

WA Poison Control IT (Seattle). . . .$151,000

Wallula Dodd Water System Improvement (Walla Walla). . . .$1,000,000

Washington Park Boat Launch Storm Damage (Anacortes). . . .$200,000

Wenatchi Landing Sewer Extension - Phase 1

(East Wenatchee). . . .$2,000,000

White Center Community HUB (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Willapa BH - Long Beach Safety Improvement Project

(Long Beach). . . .$225,000

Wing Luke Museum Homestead Home (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Wisdom Ridge Business Park (Ridgefield). . . .$2,000,000

Yakima Valley Fair & Rodeo Multi-Use Facility

(Grandview). . . .$200,000

YMCA Childcare Center Tenant Improvements

(Woodinville). . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$98,796,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$98,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Washington Broadband Program (40000117)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511 (broadband service). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

(2) The funding in this section is provided solely for grants and loans. Of the total funds:

(a) $10,000,000 is provided solely for loans. Moneys attributable to appropriations of state bond proceeds may not be expended for loans to nongovernmental entities.

(b) $6,550,000 is provided solely for grants.

(3) The public works board must collaborate with the community economic revitalization board on at least:

(a) Existing universal communications account funding that will be used for grant or loan distributions in the 2019-2021 biennial period; and

(b) New grants and loans from the new statewide broadband account created in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511.

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$16,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Behavioral Rehabilitation Services Capacity Grants (40000124)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section may be used for the renovation or construction directly associated with behavioral rehabilitation services settings. The funding provided in this section is limited to projects at facilities that are not state-owned, that add capacity to address unmet need, and are maintained as behavioral rehabilitation services capacity available to the state for at least a five-year period.

(2) It is the goal of the legislature to achieve an additional twenty-four beds of behavioral rehabilitation services capacity by the conclusion of the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. To the maximum extent possible, the department shall prioritize the use of the funding provided in this section in a manner that facilitates achieving this goal and consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues.

(3) The department shall consult as needed with the department of children, youth, and families to ensure that, to the maximum extent possible, the use of funding provided in this section facilitates placements that will better accommodate permanency plans including, but not limited to, parent-child visitation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for the Homeless (91000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$28,660,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Homeless Veterans (91000455)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1064, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$72,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,295,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1065, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,178,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,872,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$88,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,931,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,019,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Broadband Infrastructure (91000943)

The reappropriation and appropriation in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation and appropriation are subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 298, Laws of 2018. The community economic revitalization board may continue to make grants and loans until the end of the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$3,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Stormwater Pilot Project (91001099)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019 Local and Community Projects (91001157)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$28,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,569,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Central District Community Preservation and Development Authority (91001280)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 is provided solely for the department of commerce to support the establishment of the central district community preservation and development authority in order to facilitate the transfer of the Seattle vocational institute property located at 2120 South Jackson Street, Seattle, Washington 98144 from the Seattle central college to the authority established in House Bill No. 1918 (community preservation auth.). The department must contract with an entity that is familiar with the project, the community, and the state agencies to organize the central district community preservation and development authority.

(2) If House Bill No. 1918 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Port and Export Related Infrastructure (92000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 306, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$32,450,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$33,109,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Youth & Families (92000227)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1079, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,377,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$30,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Behavioral Health Beds - Acute & Residential (92000344)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$39,399,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local & Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$107,169,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$128,919,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Disaster Emergency Response (92000377)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,759,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Rehabilitation Services Capacity Grants (92000611)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1015, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Landlord Mitigation Account (92000722)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5600 (residential tenants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

(2) $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section shall be deposited in the landlord mitigation program account.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,653,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$86,034,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$87,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000039)

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$2,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,458,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,440,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

OFM Capital Budget Staff (30000040)

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$1,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,222,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,260,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,797,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (90000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, a request letter for emergency funding signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The request must include a statement describing the health and safety hazard and impacts to facility operations, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project. For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

East Plaza - Water Infiltration & Elevator Repairs (30000548)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,778,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,328,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-Term Management Planning (30000740)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1034, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$881,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

State Capitol Master Plan (30000760)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a comprehensive capitol master plan.

(2) The master plan must include:

(a) An assessment of the preservation needs of each facility on the capitol campus, to include estimated costs;

(b) A prioritization of the assessed and identified preservation projects on the capitol campus, to include the rationale for the prioritization of the identified and estimated costs;

(c) An assessment of the programmatic needs of each facility on the capitol campus, to include estimated costs;

(d) A ten year planning period;

(e) Future development opportunities for land or facility use on the capitol campus; and

(f) Future development limitations for land or facility use on the capitol campus.

(3) The department must collaborate with at least the city of Olympia and the administration of the house and the senate.

(4) A preliminary master plan must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by December 31, 2020.

(5) The final master plan must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by June 30, 2021.

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$1,271,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$240,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,511,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Transportation Building Preservation (30000777)

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,982,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Elevator Modernization (30000786)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for elevator modernization.

(2) Reappropriation funding is for the following elevator modernizations to be completed:

(a) Plaza garage, elevator number one; and

(b) Capitol court building, elevator number one.

(3) Selection of the elevator to modernize with the new appropriation must be prioritized based on safety and security.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,691,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,091,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$309,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,091,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Systems Rehabilitation (30000791)

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$843,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Physical Security & Safety Improvements (30000812)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,625,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$710,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$415,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

Enterprise Services Account—State
. . . .
$207,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,246,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State
. . . .
$79,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,532,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$368,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Building Envelope Repairs (30000829)

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,537,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,167,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,704,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$518,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Engineering & Architectural Services: Staffing (30000889)

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for architectural and engineering services to manage public works contracting for all state facilities pursuant to RCW 43.19.450.

(2) At the end of each fiscal year, the department must report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature on performance, including the following:

(a) The number of projects managed by each manager compared to previous biennia;

(b) Projects that were not completed on schedule and the reasons for the delays; and

(c) The number and cost of the change orders and the reason for each change order.

(3) At least twice per year, the department shall convene a group of private sector architects, contractors, and state agency facilities personnel to share, at a minimum, information on high performance methods, ideas, operating and maintenance issues, and cost. The facilities personnel must be from the community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher education, and any other state agencies that have recently completed a new building or are currently in the construction phase.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$64,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$94,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Childcare Center (40000030)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for predesign, design, and construction of a capitol child care center at the Pro Arts site on the capitol campus.

(2) The child care center will serve a minimum of 84 children.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,023,000

Capital Budget Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$10,023,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,273,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Roof Replacement - Cherberg and Insurance Buildings (40000032)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for roof replacement of the Cherberg building and the insurance building.

(2) Roof replacement and construction for the Cherberg building must be completed prior to roof replacement and construction for the insurance building.

(3) Architectural and engineering design documents that were worked on in the 2017-2019 biennium for at least the Cherberg building roof must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by July 31, 2019.

(4) A schedule for the Cherberg building roof construction must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by August 31, 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,299,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,798,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$101,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Exterior Preservation Cleaning (40000033)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for exterior preservation cleaning and repair of the legislative building.

(2) Repair work must be completed on at least the:

(a) Stonework and tuck pointing;

(b) Plaza skylights;

(c) Replacement of the balustrade on the plaza level;

(d) Skylight over the north vestibule;

(e) Failed drain at the north vestibule;

(f) Colonnade windows;

(g) Bronze doors, to include restoration;

(h) Metal roofing repairs and waterproofing;

(i) Minor roof repairs and waterproofing; and

(j) Interior finishes due to water damage.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,453,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

2019-21 Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (40000082)

Enterprise Services Account—State
. . . .
$849,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,734,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$773,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,356,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,864,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

2019-21 Statewide Minor Works - Programmatic Projects (40000141)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,289,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus-Wide Electrical Service Panels - Arc Flash Study (40000151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for a campus-wide ARC flash hazard analysis study to assess safety risks and improve worker safety.

(2) Funding must be used to at least conduct a full on-site evaluation, evaluate the need for specialized personal protective equipment requirements, identify electrical repairs from the electrical service entry panels to the subpanels for code and safety compliance, and identify panel labeling deficiencies and solutions, fiscal costs, and recommendations to resolve safety risks.

(3) The department must submit a preliminary status report to the legislative fiscal committees by December 31, 2019, on at least:

(a) The estimated duration of the study, and when it will begin and end;

(b) How many staff will be trained, and by when; and

(c) How much the personal protective equipment costs per person that was identified as necessary, and how many staff need this equipment.

(4) The study is due to the legislative fiscal committees by November 30, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$260,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Conservatory Demolition (91000442)

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$579,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$71,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capital Campus Utility Renewal Plan (92000012)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$516,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,820,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,336,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Newhouse Replacement (92000020)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for design and construction documents, and finalization of the predesign, for the replacement of the Newhouse building with option C outlined in the phase I predesign options submitted by the department. This funding will establish the final budget on the project.

(2) The complete and final predesign, started in the 2017-2019 biennium, must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by August 31, 2019.

(3) The design must assume:

(a) Replacement of the Newhouse building located on the west block of opportunity site six;

(b) A building with at least 26,000 gross square feet;

(c) Member offices of similar size as member offices in the Cherberg building; and

(d) Space for at least ninety senate staff.

(4) The design must evaluate as an option the addition of the legislative support services staff as a separate floor for the building.

(5) The schematic design must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by June 30, 2020.

(6) The construction documents must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by June 30, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$256,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Skylights (92000027)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for restoration of the legislative chamber skylights.

(2) The funding is to replace the skylight openings that are located above the house of representatives and senate chambers in the legislative building with safety glass to allow as much natural light as possible into the chambers. The replacement glass must be of a quality that will provide for a reasonable assurance of safety in the event of a catastrophic event such as an earthquake.

(3) The skylight restoration project must include work on at least the following:

(a) The bronze ceiling laylight to include at least:

(i) Reducing the number of light fixtures from forty to twenty;

(ii) Utilizing energy efficient LED fixtures with a high level of light output;

(iii) Restoring the 20 laylight bronze panels;

(iv) Replacing the existing security camera;

(v) Replacing the smoke detector with a smoke sampling system connected to the existing fire alarm system;

(vi) Removing and replacing the insulation panels; and

(vii) Replacing the current speaker cluster at the center of the laylight;

(b) The skylight attic, to include at least:

(i) Painting conduit, pipes, structure, walls, and railing with a highly reflective white paint; and

(ii) Addressing the heat gain from the skylight above;

(c) The roof and skylight system, to include at least modifying the existing roof system for the new skylights; and

(d) The chambers' acoustics.

(4) The project must use a design-build process and be completed in the 2019-2021 biennium while also ensuring stakeholder work with:

(a) The city of Olympia building department;

(b) The department of archaeology and historic preservation; and

(c) Legislative stakeholders to include the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,982,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Cleaning (92000028)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for exterior preservation cleaning and repair of one of the legislative buildings listed in subsection (3) of this section each biennium.

(2) Repair work must be completed on at least the:

(a) Stonework;

(b) Tuck pointing;

(c) Skylights;

(d) Windows;

(e) Minor roof repairs and waterproofing; and

(f) Interior finishes due to water damage.

(3) The legislative buildings referenced in subsection (1) of this section include only:

(a) The legislative building;

(b) The temple of justice;

(c) The John A. Cherberg building;

(d) The John L. O'Brien building;

(e) The insurance building;

(f) The Irv Newhouse building; and

(g) The Pritchard building.

(4) The funding provided in the 2019-2021 biennium must be used for the insurance building.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Insurance Commissioner Office Building Predesign (92000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a predesign study to determine space needs and cost estimates to construct a building on the capitol campus to house the office of the insurance commissioner and the state auditor's office.

(1) In determining the program space required, the predesign must consider:

(a) The necessary program space required to support the office of the insurance commissioner, to include detail on current space usage by facility compared to proposed space usage;

(b) The necessary program space required to support the state auditor's office, to include detail on current space usage by facility compared to proposed space usage; and

(c) Parking impacts of new office space construction.

(2) The study must consider, at a minimum:

(a) The potential to fund design and construction of the building from sources other than state general obligation bonds;

(b) The financial cost analysis of current facility leases compared to the cost of a financial contract for the new building, to include operating budget cost impacts by fund source by fiscal year; and

(c) The following opportunity sites for the building, detailed in the 2017 state capitol development site study:

(i) Site 1, the general administration building;

(ii) Site 12, the professional arts building;

(iii) Site 7, the old IBM building; and

(iv) Site 6B, the visitor center;

(3) The building must be a:

(a) High performance building and meet net-zero-ready standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than thirty-five;

(b) Building construction that must be procured using a performance-based method such as design-build and must include an energy performance guarantee comparing actual performance data with the energy design target; and

(c) Design that includes cross-laminated timber products.

(4) The predesign study must result in:

(a) A preliminary report being submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by February 28, 2020; and

(b) A final report being submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2020.

Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1089. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

King County Area Readiness Center (30000592)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to acquire land in King county for a readiness center. If the department has not signed a purchase and sale agreement by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$83,900,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$88,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1090. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$28,881,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$427,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,978,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$37,286,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,666,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,952,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1091. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tri-Cities Readiness Center (30000808)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$499,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$11,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,800,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$15,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,201,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1092. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2017-19 Biennium (30000811)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,071,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$51,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,385,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,507,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,298,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1093. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2017-19 Biennium (30000812)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$20,395,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,814,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$22,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,413,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,697,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1094. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Centralia Readiness Center (30000818)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,289,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,287,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,576,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$174,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1095. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Kent Readiness Center (30000917)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,150,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$380,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1096. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Anacortes Readiness Center Major Renovation (40000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $75,000 is provided solely for a predesign.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1097. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2019-21 Biennium (40000036)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,224,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,756,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,980,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1098. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2019-21 Biennium (40000037)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$21,630,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$109,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,259,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$23,998,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1099. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Soldiers Memorial Park (40000062)

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1100. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Stryker Canopies Kent Site (40000073)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Stryker Canopies Bremerton Site (40000077)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Montesano Field Maintenance Shop (FMS) Addition (40000095)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Joint Base Lewis-McChord (JBLM) 3106 Helicopter Port (40000100)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Air Support Operations Group (ASOG) Complex (40000163)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,766,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$27,622,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1105. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Mission Support Group/Logistics/Communications (MSG-Comm)Facility (40000167)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,114,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,284,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,398,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic Cemetery Grant Program (30000021)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$444,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$56,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Rehabilitation of Beverly Bridge (30000022)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Upon the completion of the rehabilitation of the Beverly bridge, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of natural resources, and the department of archaeology and historic preservation shall enter into a memorandum of agreement which includes, but is not limited to: (1) A requirement for the payment of fees for conveyance of electrical utilities across the bridge; (2) certification of the safety for vehicular use of the bridge; (3) use of the bridge by motorized emergency vehicles; (4) motorized use of the bridge by workers of orchards within a one mile radius of the bridge; and (5) a traffic management system and schedule to avoid conflicts among recreational users of the trail and permitted vehicular use.

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$429,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,146,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,575,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Historic County Courthouse Grants Program (30000023)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Columbia. . . .$122,000

Benton. . . .$34,000

Lewis. . . .$120,000

Klickitat. . . .$304,000

Clark. . . .$39,000

Jefferson. . . .$300,000

Spokane. . . .$200,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,119,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,119,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1109. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000024)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,060,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Historic Cemetery Grant Program (40000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,060,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Ebey's National Historic Reserve (40000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Heritage Barn Preservation Program 2017-19 (92000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1113. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic County Courthouse Grants Program 2017-19 (92000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1057, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,137,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (40000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

L&I HQ Elevators (30000018)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$342,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$342,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$684,000

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,934,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Cooling System Replacement (30000019)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$1,283,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,283,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,566,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,566,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects (30000035)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$1,244,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,239,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,558,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,041,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Modernize Lab and Training Facility (30000043)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for design and construction of a new lab and training facility.

(2) The new facility must be shared between the department of labor and industries and the department of agriculture.

(3) The facility must be at least 53,000 gross square feet.

(4) The new facility must include labs for both the department of labor and industries and the department of agriculture.

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$45,223,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$7,980,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$53,203,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$53,203,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2003, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,190,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center: Kitchen & Dining Room Upgrades (20081506)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Back-Up Power & Electrical Feeders (30000415)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: New Boiler Plant (30000468)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$387,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,764,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$178,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide (30001859)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$855,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,191,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,685,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$2,425,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,464,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,889,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,080,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,111,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-South Hall: Building Systems Replacement (30002735)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$2,294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,156,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$45,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: New HVAC DDC Controls (30002759)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Forensic Services: Two Wards Addition (30002765)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$329,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$28,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,471,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Repairs & Upgrades (30003211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Water System Replacement (30003213)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$508,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: Wards Preservation & Renewal (30003241)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$550,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: Building Systems Replacement (30003244)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,488,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$912,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: CLIP Capacity (30003324)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,244,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-King County SCTF: Expansion (30003564)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2010, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

State Psychiatric Hospitals: Compliance with Federal Requirements (30003569)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Master Plan Update (30003571)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2016, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Yakima Valley School-Multiple Buildings: Safety Improvements (30003573)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-Community Facilities: New Capacity (30003577)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department must consult with the communities that are potential sites for these facilities.

(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2027, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$399,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$101,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: New Security Fence (30003578)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,060,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$660,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Fire Suppression (30003579)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Elevator Modernization (30003582)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,468,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,275,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,743,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Windows Security (30003585)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Forensic Services: Roofing Replacement (30003603)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$955,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Emergency Electrical System: Upgrades (30003616)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Behavioral Health: Compliance with Systems Improvement Agreement (30003849)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6008, chapter 4, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,616,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,284,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 28: Treatment & Recovery Center (40000024)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$467,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$133,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Wards Renovations for Forensic Services (40000026)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,246,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$314,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital Renovations for Treatment Recovery Center (40000029)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$123,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000381)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$4,125,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,180,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$14,305,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$174,305,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000382)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,155,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,540,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Emergency Power System: Essential Upgrades (40000383)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: New Emergency Power Generator (40000384)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,265,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: New 500-Bed Hospital (40000385)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5537 (behavioral health facilities) is not enacted by June 30, 2019, and ratified by the people by December 5, 2019, then the community behavioral health account appropriation provided in this section shall lapse.

Community Behavioral Health Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$299,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School-PATs A, E & C: Cottage Cooling Upgrades (40000391)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Fire Doors Replacement (40000392)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Campus: Fire Alarm System Upgrades (40000393)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,835,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Multiple Buildings: Fire Alarm Upgrades (40000395)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School-Multiple Buildings: Fire Alarm Upgrades (40000396)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,465,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,465,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Eastlake & Westlake: Fire & Smoke Controls (40000404)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: Fire Stops (40000405)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-Fire House: Electrical Upgrades (40000422)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-EL & WL: HVAC Compliance & Monitoring (40000492)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Operated Community Civil Long-Term Inpatient Capacity (92000029)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH and WSH-All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$2,900,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,969,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,869,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital Forensic Ward (91000050)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: Additional Forensic Ward (91000062)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Wing Addition (30000301)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,805,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,829,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$5,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$550,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000336)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,875,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public Health Lab South Laboratory Addition (30000379)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$196,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$27,229,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

New Central Boiler Plant (30000381)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$558,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,065,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Construction Loans (30000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2034, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$51,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$66,721,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$118,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2035, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Preservation (40000011)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Program (40000012)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$417,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$417,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000025)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$128,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$163,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000027)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants to well-managed, publicly-owned group A water utilities for the repair and consolidation of group A and B water systems under the following conditions:

(1) A grant can be provided when a water system has been voluntarily transferred to a publicly owned water utility within the last three years. The grant may be used for repair and consolidation costs.

(2) The grant applicant must provide the department of health with an accounting of rehabilitation costs and the value of the system. The grant must be used primarily to cover project design and construction costs, and only in limited cases to cover the cost of system acquisitions, as determined by the department of health in evaluating grant applications.

(3) Grants must primarily be used to cover project construction costs that customers benefiting from the project cannot afford to repay through loans, as determined by the department of health and the publicly owned utility receiving the grant to complete the project.

(4) Applicants must provide a plan demonstrating that project completion will occur within three years of the grant contract execution.

(5) Each grant must be less than twenty-five percent of the total appropriation.

(6) The primary purpose of this appropriation is to fund water system repair and consolidation construction costs. However, the department may use up to $75,000 under this section for grants for feasibility review of water system repair and consolidation projects that would meet the objectives of this section and RCW 70.119A.190.

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water Construction Loans - State Match (40000029)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$51,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program 2017-19 (92000025)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Washington Veterans Home: Bldg 6 & 7 Demo and Grounds Improvement (30000002)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,371,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,313,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,445,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,129,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Program (30000131)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$670,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,380,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSVC - Additional Internment Vaults and Roadway (30000215)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,700,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Retsil Building 10 (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$125,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen-Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Statewide-RA Community Facilities: Safety & Security Improvements (30002737)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School-Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen Children's Center: Academic School (30003242)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$37,976,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,176,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School-Campus: Security & Surveillance Upgrades (30003580)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000400)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$54,110,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$57,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen Children's Center-Infrastructure: Fire & Duress Alarms (40000421)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,015,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,015,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Benton-Franklin Juvenile Justice Center At-Risk Youth Services (92000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the final design and construction of an at-risk youth services center in Kennewick, Washington. The department must contract with Benton and Franklin counties to carry out this project.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Boiler Replacement (30000130)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2025, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$830,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,120,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,120,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$170,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,120,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,300,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$22,685,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$43,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Replace Roofs (30000654)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$675,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,595,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,810,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Replace Fire Alarm System (30000748)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$180,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$175,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,639,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Security Video System (30000800)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,738,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,038,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: Bldg E Roof Replacement (30000810)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,674,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,022,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,696,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: Security Video Camera Installation (30001066)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Program and Support Building (30001101)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,085,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Prison Capacity Expansion (30001105)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2059, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC ADA Compliance Retrofit (30001118)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW IMU Recreation Yard Improvement (30001123)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC Security Electronics Network Renovation (30001124)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MLCC: 128 Bed Minimum Camp (30001168)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2053, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,780,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,900,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,680,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$661,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,341,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Reclaimed Water Line (40000058)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,987,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

AHCC: Reclaimed Water (40000059)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,943,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,943,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: Security Fence at MSC for New Medium Capacity (40000173)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: Sewer System HABU (Highest and Best Use) (40000185)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $800,000 is provided solely for the pumping of biosolids from the sewer lagoon.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works - Preservation Projects (40000187)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,442,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$73,965,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$88,407,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: BAR Unit Door Conversions (91000431)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to implement the settlement agreement in Disability Rights Washington v. Inslee, et al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Case No. 18-5071, for the portions of the agreement that require modification to existing booth-controlled cell door mechanisms in one treatment unit in the Washington state penitentiary. If the settlement agreement is not fully executed and approved by the court before June 30, 2020, this appropriation shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,250,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water Supply Facilities)—State
. . . .
$295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,116,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,411,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3002, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Site Closure Account—State
. . . .
$8,505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,928,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$594,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,484,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply

Development Account—State
. . . .
$2,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$89,424,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$91,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$69,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$381,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,721,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,813,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$71,296,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and section 3002, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$324,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$38,710,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,034,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$432,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,568,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$19,152,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$43,712,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,864,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,041,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation (30000278)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$52,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,879,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,855,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$553,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$247,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,526,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$46,474,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000328)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,620,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,956,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,044,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Dungeness Water Supply & Mitigation (30000333)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$924,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,126,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3044, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,095,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,565,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects - Programmatic (30000335)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,115,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,431,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000372)

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply

Development Account—State
. . . .
$45,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
$514,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$73,941,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$74,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000373)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$926,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,174,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$10,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$51,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,537,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000389)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3080, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,977,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,171,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,436,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,893,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000431)

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$8,908,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$992,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$32,753,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,994,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$52,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000490)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$672,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,328,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000534)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3061, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal
. . . .
$18,711,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$118,465,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$137,176,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$65,824,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$203,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$27,816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,384,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000536)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,149,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,411,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000538)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$3,669,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,146,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$7,917,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,464,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000587)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,286,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$714,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000588)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3068, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
$1,317,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,082,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,399,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,601,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000589)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,655,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,954,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$4,079,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,033,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,967,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000591)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,960,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000670)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$23,926,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,834,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000671)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3004, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$389,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$111,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000672)

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$655,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$345,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000673)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,178,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,506,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,684,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000674)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,528,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$472,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000704)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,403,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$33,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,436,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Centennial Clean Water Program (30000705)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$33,976,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,024,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design 2017-19 (30000706)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$35,054,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,464,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Remedial Action Grants (30000707)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$5,877,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Flood Control and Cleanup (30000708)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,700,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000710)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal
. . . .
$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$160,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$210,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$210,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000711)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,497,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,603,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
$12,203,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,541,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$33,744,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$56,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey Headquarters Facility Preservation Projects (30000713)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$601,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000714)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3017, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,898,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$102,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000740)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3018, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$716,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Regional Office Improvements and Stormwater Treatment (30000741)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,410,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,966,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$510,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,886,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000742)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (30000749)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,099,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$83,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,182,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000763)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$5,098,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$142,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000796)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$36,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Stormwater Financial Assistance (30000797)

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$28,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,093,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Catastrophic Flood Relief (40000006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3023, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$45,075,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$55,075,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,925,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

VW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3025, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$112,599,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$101,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$112,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Healthy Housing Remediation Grant Program (40000108)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reduce Air Pollution from Transit/Sch. Buses/State-Owned Vehicles (40000109)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology to enter into and administer grants to scrap and replace old, high-polluting diesel school buses, transit buses, and other vehicles, with low-emission and zero-emission vehicles.

(2) All expenditures from this reappropriation must be spent on projects that will reduce air pollution, improve public health for thousands of Washington residents, help prevent violations of federal air quality standards, reduce operating costs, and improve transportation reliability for public fleet operators.

(3) Up to $12,000,000 of the reappropriation is for scrapping and replacing pre-2001, high polluting school buses across the state with diesel or alternate fueled (propane, compressed natural gas, zero emission, etc.) school buses that meet current federal emissions standards.

(4) $5,000,000 of the reappropriation is for the department to fund electric vehicle charging station infrastructure at state facilities for state-owned vehicles through an agreement with the department of enterprise services. The agreement must contain a requirement to provide a report to the legislative fiscal committees by December 31, 2019, to include:

(a) The list of state facilities that will be impacted, and for each state facility:

(i) How many state-owned vehicles will benefit from the infrastructure; and

(ii) The date when the work will be completed at each state facility;

(b) The total statewide count of charging stations that will be available from these funds;

(c) The list of state agencies that will be impacted;

(d) The amount of funding used for new installation compared to the amount of funding used to upgrade electrical equipment to accommodate charging station installation;

(e) The methodology for how the funding was distributed; and

(f) The amount of funding state agencies anticipate to spend in operating budget dollars, as applicable, due to this project.

(5) Up to $4,400,000 is for the Northwest seaport alliance for construction of shore power electrification infrastructure of Terminal 5.

(6) $1,200,000 is for the Northwest seaport alliance for a clean truck fund managed by a certified community development alliance.

(7) The remainder of the appropriation is for scrapping and replacing pre-2007 diesel, high-polluting transit buses across the state with new electric, zero-emission buses.

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$26,483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,917,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000110)

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal
. . . .
$56,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$148,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$204,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$816,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,020,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000111)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,234,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,936,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 ASARCO Cleanup (40000114)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$6,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$15,650,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (40000115)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000116)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial program grant.

(2) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded clean water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$140,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$170,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000117)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$28,888,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,888,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (40000126)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (40000127)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Mercury Switch Removal (40000128)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Floodplains by Design (40000129)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$42,828,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$242,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Clean Up Toxics Sites – Puget Sound (40000130)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$12,475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000144)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grants to local governments implementing projects that reduce the impacts of stormwater on Washington state's waters.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$178,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015 Drought Authority (40000146)

State Drought Preparedness Account—State
. . . .
$669,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (40000147)

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey HQ Roof Replacement (40000148)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,089,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,089,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000149)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish and administer a program to provide grants to persons intending to remediate contaminated real property for development of affordable housing, as defined in RCW 43.185A.010. The grants may only be used for:

(a) Integrated planning to fund studies and other activities necessary to facilitate the acquisition, remediation, and adaptive reuse of known or suspected contaminated real property for affordable housing development, including:

(i) The activities specified under RCW 70.105D.070(4)(e)(iv); and

(ii) Entry into development agreements pursuant to RCW 36.70B.170 through 36.70B.190 to accelerate the development of the contaminated real property into affordable housing; and

(b) Remediation of contaminated real property for affordable housing development.

(2) When prioritizing grants under this section, the department must consult with the department of commerce and consider at a minimum:

(a) The ability of the project to expedite the cleanup and reuse of the contaminated real property for affordable housing development;

(b) The extent to which the project leverages other public or private funding for the cleanup and reuse of the contaminated real property for affordable housing development;

(c) The suitability of the real property for affordable housing based on the threat posed by the contamination to human health;

(d) Whether the work to be funded under the grant is ready to proceed and be completed; and

(e) The distribution of grants throughout the state and among public and private entities.

(3) Any remediation of contaminated real property funded under this section must be performed:

(a) Under an agreed order or consent decree issued under chapter 70.105D RCW; and

(b) In accordance with the rules established under chapter 70.105D RCW.

(4) Prior to a grant recipient conveying any interest in the real property or entering into any leases, the real property must be restricted to affordable housing use for a period of no less than thirty years.

(a) The department may require a grant recipient to record an interest in the land in accordance with RCW 64.04.130 or use other means deemed by the department to be no less protective of the affordable housing use and interests of the department.

(b) Any grant recipient who refuses, without sufficient cause, to comply with this subsection shall be subject to enforcement pursuant to any agreement or chapter 70.105D RCW for the repayment, with interest, of funds provided under this section.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$10,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 State Match - Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000151)

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$48,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000152)

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,100,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$180,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$220,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000177)

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000179)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$128,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$168,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Zosel Dam Preservation (40000193)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000194)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,260,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for reimbursing the Lakewood water district for costs for the Ponders drinking water treatment system, including costs incurred prior to July 1, 2019.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$9,637,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$49,637,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey HQ Facility Preservation Project—Minor Works (40000207)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000209)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $16,257,000 of the appropriation is for advancing the long-term strategy for the Chehalis basin projects to reduce flood damage and restore aquatic species including project level environmental review, data collection, engineering design of future construction projects, feasibility analysis, and engagement of state agencies, tribes, and other parties.

(2) Up to $33,747,000 of the appropriation is for construction of local priority flood protection and habitat restoration projects.

(3) The office of Chehalis basin board has discretion to allocate the funding between subsections (1) and (2) of this section if needed to meet the objectives of this appropriation.

(4) Up to one and a half percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the recreation and conservation office to administer contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section. Contract administration includes, but is not limited to: Drafting and amending contracts, reviewing and approving invoices, tracking expenditures, and performing field inspections to assess project status when conducting similar assessments related to other agency contracts in the same geographic area.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Chemical Action Plan Implementation (40000210)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $400,000 is provided solely for the department of ecology to continue the characterization of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl (PFAS) chemicals in source areas that impact the Issaquah valley aquifer and to design a pilot corrective action cleanup plan. This work shall be done in coordination with the local municipality and fire and rescue agency. The pilot plan shall help inform the development of statewide regulations for this contaminant.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,704,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Remedial Action Grants (40000211)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$150,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$254,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$404,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$47,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,802,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,849,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$304,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,966,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,274,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Integrated Planning Grant: Port Townsend (91000338)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3026, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Availability (91000343)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$13,558,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$42,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Water (91000347)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3028, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$42,734,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$54,266,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$97,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplain Management and Control Grants (92000078)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3069, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$45,166,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought Response (92000142)

State Drought Preparedness—State
. . . .
$1,559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,164,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,723,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port of Tacoma Arkema/Dunlap Mound (92000158)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,165,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Program Demonstration and Design (30000001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State
. . . .
$335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,465,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Program (30000002)

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$3,683,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,317,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000669)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,102,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,106,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financing Assistance Program 2019-21 (30000702)

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$92,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2019-21 Leaking Tank Model Remedies Activity (30000703)

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State
. . . .
$764,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$764,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm 2017-19 (92000001)

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$12,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$24,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Twin Harbors State Park: Renovation (30000086)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$267,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$229,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$13,954,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92000014)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$33,638,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,638,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

St. Edward Environmental Education and Research Center (92000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,596,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$242,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Marine facilities - Various Locations Moorage Float Replacement (30000496)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$458,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Willapa Hills Trail Develop Safe Multi-Use Trail Crossing at SR 6 (30000519)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,961,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$397,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,383,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Schafer Relocate Campground (30000532)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$433,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,024,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$309,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Beacon Rock Entrance Road Realignment (30000647)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$151,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,050,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,416,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Expansion (30000709)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$551,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,793,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,344,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,437,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,062,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,165,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Clean Vessel Boating Pump-Out Grants (30000856)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Local Grant Authority (30000857)

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—

Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—

Private/Local
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Federal Grant Authority (30000858)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$350,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Replace Failing Sewer Lines (30000860)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,493,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,061,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,554,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sequim Bay Address Failing Retaining Wall (30000861)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$387,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,122,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$959,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$141,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Pier & Marine Learning Center Improve or Replace (30000950)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$613,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$121,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,269,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,003,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst & Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,123,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$145,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,268,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way (30000959)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,921,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$587,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes - Dry Falls - Upgrade Failing Water Supply Systems (30000962)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$644,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$106,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Depression Era Structures Restoration Assessment (30000966)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,086,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,272,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dash Point - Replace Bridge (Pedestrian) (30000972)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$468,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$279,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works Program (30000975)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$386,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition (30000976)

Parkland Acquisition Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,240,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000977)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$647,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructure (30000978)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,610,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,591,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works—Program (30000979)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$646,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$845,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Moran Summit Learning Center - Interpretive Facility (30000980)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$112,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,015,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Penrose Point Sewer Improvements (30000981)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$130,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Sunset Beach Picnic Area (30000984)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,615,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$145,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Water System Renovation (30001016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$236,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Septic System Renovation (30001017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$185,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electrical System Renovation (30001018)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$288,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - ADA Compliance (30000985)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$467,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$533,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide New Park (30001019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$267,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$46,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,006,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,319,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Buildings and Ground Improvements (40000005)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,226,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Fish Barrier Removal (40000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$53,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$247,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electric Vehicle Charging Stations (40000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Preservation Minor Works 2019-21 (40000151)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,447,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Nisqually New Full Service Park (40000153)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,994,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,700,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Pearrygin Lake Consolidated Park Access (40000160)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,406,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Comfort Station Pilot Project (91000433)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3043, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,063,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$104,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,167,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - WW1 Historic Facilities Preservation (30000100)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,091,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,295,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,963,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,349,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Simcoe - Historic Officers Quarters Renovation (30000155)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$900,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,192,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes State Park: Dry Falls Campground Renovation (30000305)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$338,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$64,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,442,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,844,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$726,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse Falls Day Use Area Renovation (30000983)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,900,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,120,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden Replace Failing Water Lines (30001022)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$214,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$163,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,013,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,390,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steptoe Butte Road Improvements (30001076)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$466,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$466,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$69,380,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$69,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A, developed May 24, 2011.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$886,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$41,114,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,901,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$68,161,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3161, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$3,010,000

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$1,332,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
$504,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$3,761,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,607,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$56,393,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000206)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3162, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$7,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$67,350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000210)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2013-2B, developed April 10, 2013.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$232,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,768,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$62,360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000212)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,519,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Land and Water Conservation (30000216)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3170. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-1, developed June 30, 2015.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$4,225,000

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$1,644,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
$1,510,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$5,486,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$12,865,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$42,458,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$55,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3171. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000221)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3164, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$17,139,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,973,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$20,112,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$46,388,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3172. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,019,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3173. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000223)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3025, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities

Program Account—State
. . . .
$465,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,705,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3174. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000224)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3167, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,506,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3175. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000225)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-2, developed June 30, 2015.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$1,044,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,269,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3176. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000226)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3169, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,611,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,389,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3177. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,716,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3178. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000228)

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$81,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$499,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3179. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreational Trails Program (30000229)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,002,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,998,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3180. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000230)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$965,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3181. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Land and Water Conservation (30000231)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,738,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,262,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3182. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000233)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$239,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,761,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3183. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000408)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$44,171,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,775,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$55,946,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,765,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$69,711,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3184. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2017-42, developed July 20, 2017, and LEAP capital document No. 2018-6H, developed January 3, 2018.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$29,705,000

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$6,992,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$27,817,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$64,514,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,486,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$80,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3185. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Facilities Program (30000410)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$15,085,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,090,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3186. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000411)

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program

Account—State
. . . .
$11,352,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,843,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3187. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000412)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,262,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$815,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3188. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2018-9H, developed March 5, 2018.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$1,360,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,794,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$10,154,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,131,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,285,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3189. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000414)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$35,097,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,903,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3190. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000415)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,685,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3191. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000416)

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$762,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$51,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$813,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3192. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreational Trails Program (30000417)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,283,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$717,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3193. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000418)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$550,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3194. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Land and Water Conservation (30000419)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3195. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (30000420)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,860,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,640,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3196. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,765,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3197. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (40000002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2019-300S, developed March 27, 2019.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$40,500,000

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$40,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$90,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$320,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$410,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3198. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000004)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$50,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$300,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$375,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3199. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Boating Facilities Program (40000005)

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$17,872,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$71,488,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$89,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3200. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000006)

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program

Account—State
. . . .
$11,411,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$55,644,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$67,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3201. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,035,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,035,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3202. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2019-301S, developed March 27, 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$26,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3203. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding amounts include Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration Local Grants, the Middle Fork Nooksack Diversion Dam Removal, and Riverbend Floodplain Restoration Construction.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$45,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$205,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3204. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3205. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (40000011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2019-302S, developed March 27, 2019.

(2) The agency may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed four and twelve one-hundredths percent of the appropriation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,438,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$49,752,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3206. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2019-303S, developed March 27, 2019.

(2) The board may retain up to three percent of the funds appropriated in this section for its administration. The office may retain up to two percent of the funds appropriated in this section for its administration.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$30,588,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,588,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3207. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Firearms and Archery Range (40000013)

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,940,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3208. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Recreational Trails Program (40000014)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3209. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Boating Infrastructure Grants (40000015)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3210. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000016)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3211. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3212. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Coastal Restoration Grants (91000448)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3177, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,346,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,839,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3213. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Brian Abbott Fish Passage Barrier Removal Board (91000566)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,671,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3214. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreation & Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3086, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,780,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$1,337,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$15,117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$18,885,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,002,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3215. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Community Forest Pilot (92000447)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5873 (community forests pilot), including the following list of projects:

Nason Ridge Community Forest. . . .$4,973,000

Mt. Adams Community Forest, Outlet Creek Tract. . . .$213,000

Gold Hill Community Forest. . . .$676,000

The office may retain up to four percent of the appropriation for administrative costs. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,096,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,096,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3216. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3033, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,465,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,065,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,810,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3217. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 CREP Riparian Funding (40000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3218. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (40000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for continuing erosion control at North Cove, including beach restoration, erosion control, sediment abatement, soft berm, and dynamic revetment projects.

(2) Up to five percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for natural resource enhancement and conservation projects.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3219. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Natural Resource Investments (40000005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to help landowners boost environmental stewardship and agricultural sustainability. The commission must consider funding needs for those districts involved with chinook salmon recovery that will have the most benefit for southern resident killer whales.

(2) Up to five percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for natural resource enhancement and conservation projects.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3220. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Match for Federal RCPP (40000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a state match to the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership.

(2) The commission must, to the greatest extent possible, leverage other state and local projects in funding the match and development of the regional conservation partnership program grant applications.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3221. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (40000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and grants to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies. The state conservation commission shall give preference to projects located in the sixteen fish critical basins, other water-short or drought impacted basins, and basins with significant water resource and instream flow issues. Projects that are not within the basins described in this subsection are also eligible to receive funding.

(2) Conservation districts statewide are eligible for grants listed in subsection (1) of this section. A conservation district receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be placed as a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights program to enhance instream flows. The proportion of saved water placed in the trust water rights program must be equal to the percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency. The percentage of the public investment may not exceed eighty-five percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency.

(3) Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section may be allocated for the purchase and installation of flow meters that are implemented in cooperation with the Washington state department of fish and wildlife fish screening program authorized under RCW 77.57.070.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3222. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 CREP PIP Loan Program (40000010)

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3223. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match 2017-19 (91000009)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,969,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$631,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3224. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Contract Funding 2017-19 (91000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,044,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,256,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3225. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Commission Ranch & Farmland Preservation Projects (92000004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3188, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., with the exception of the following: The commission is authorized to reallocate the project funds of $4,913,000 from the Imrie ranches Rock creek agricultural easement to the purchase of the Simcoe unit.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,974,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,548,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,522,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3226. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Natural Resource Investment for the Economy & Environment 2017-19 (92000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3090, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3227. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas 2017-19 (92000012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3052, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3228. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program 2017-19 (92000013)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3053, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,377,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$623,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3205, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,798,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,388,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,288,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3231. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$863,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,680,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$13,943,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$72,421,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$58,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$158,364,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3232. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Spring Hatchery Renovation (30000214)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,375,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,749,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$118,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,642,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3233. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Samish Hatchery Intakes (30000276)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$410,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,682,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$640,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,732,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3234. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,148,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,306,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$457,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3235. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$60,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,540,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3236. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wallace River Hatchery - Replace Intakes and Ponds (30000660)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,804,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$401,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3237. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,555,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,144,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,031,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3238. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Cooperative Elk Damage Fencing (30000662)

The reappropriation and appropriation in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation and appropriation are to be spent in concert with, where applicable, the co-management agreements between the department of fish and wildlife and treaty tribes.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$850,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3239. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Spokane Hatchery Renovation (30000663)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$13,788,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,931,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3240. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Edmonds Pier Renovation (30000664)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$154,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$646,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3241. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hazard Fuel Reductions, Forest Health and Ecosystem Improvement (30000665)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3242. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Naselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$691,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$28,220,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3243. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Beaver Creek Hatchery - Renovation (30000680)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,899,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,042,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3244. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Springs Production Shift (30000723)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,670,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3245. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000727)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,589,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3246. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Puget Sound and Adjacent Waters Nearshore Restoration - Match (30000753)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$281,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$219,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$70,616,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$71,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3247. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000756)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,545,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,955,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3248. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Programmatic (30000782)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$625,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3249. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Snow Creek Reconstruct Facility (30000826)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3108, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$75,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,794,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,037,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3250. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Forks Creek Hatchery - Renovate Intake and Diversion (30000827)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,423,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,086,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,511,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3251. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,813,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,613,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3252. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$315,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3253. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

PSNERP Match (30000846)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$489,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,489,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,754,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,024,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,778,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$424,426,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$433,704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3254. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Falls Hatchery Replace Raceways and PA System (30000848)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$94,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3255. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Scatter Creek Wildlife Area Fire Damage (40000005)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$81,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3256. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation 2019-2021 (40000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts appropriated, the department must take actions necessary for the purpose of entering into a public/private partnership for the purpose of managing the Naches hatchery as a self-sustaining enterprise. The department must submit a report to the legislative fiscal committees describing its progress in achieving such a partnership by December 1, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3257. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Programmatic 2019-21 (40000008)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,427,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,427,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3258. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Toutle River Fish Collection Facility - Match (40000021)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,775,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$18,312,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,087,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3259. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Elochoman Hatchery Demolition and Restoration (40000024)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$250,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3260. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Infrastructure Master Plan for SRKW Recovery (40000085)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$713,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$713,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3261. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Region 1 Office - Construct Secure Storage (40000087)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,329,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,479,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3262. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Access Sites (91000044)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,006,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3263. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Rufus Woods Fishing Access (91000151)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3264. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$460,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3265. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clarks Creek Hatchery Rebuild (92000038)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3114, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,920,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3266. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (30000261)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,346,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$956,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,302,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3267. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (30000263)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$366,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,134,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3268. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000266)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$745,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,255,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3269. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Puget SoundCorps (30000267)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$811,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,189,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3270. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer Program (30000269)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,939,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$61,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3271. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forestry Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (30000279)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3272. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway Working Forest (30000289)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$881,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3273. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (30000290)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3129, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,889,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3274. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

NE Region Storm Damage Road Repair (40000002)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$391,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$38,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$429,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3275. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Administrative Site/Minor Works Pool (92000034)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,435,000

Forest Development Account—State
. . . .
$3,527,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State
. . . .
$4,338,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$9,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3276. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Pasco Local Improvement District (40000019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3277. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State Forest Land Replacement (40000032)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriation is provided solely to the department to transfer from state forestland status to natural resources conservation area status certain state forestlands in counties with:

(i) A population of twenty-five thousand or fewer; and

(ii) Risks of timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered species act.

(b) This appropriation must be used equally for the transfer of qualifying state forestlands in the qualifying counties.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy replacement state forestland, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.

(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.

(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section. The department will identify eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsections (1) and (2) of this section, in consultation with the applicable counties, and will not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3278. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer Program (40000034)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department of natural resources to transfer from trust status certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for state parks, fish and wildlife habitats, natural area preserves, natural resources conservation areas, department of natural resources community forest open spaces, or recreation purposes. The approved property for transfer is identified in the LEAP capital document No. 2019-304S, developed March 27, 2019.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value. By September 30, 2019, the department must deposit in the common school construction account the portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the estimated value of the timber on the transferred properties. This transfer must be made in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the value of the land transferred must be deposited in the natural resources real property replacement account.

(3) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations. Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs, and may not exceed one and nine-tenths percent of the appropriation.

(4) By June 30, 2020, land within the common school trust shall be exchanged for land of equal value held for other trust beneficiaries of the property identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. Fee transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that perpetually restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose. Transfer agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are compatible with the originally intended public purpose and the department and legislature approves such uses.

(6) The department shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section.

(7) By June 30, 2021, the state treasurer shall transfer to the common school construction account any unexpended balance of the appropriation in this section.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3279. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (40000037)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,766,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3280. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway (40000038)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,856,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3281. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Acquisition Grants (40000039)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$58,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3282. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Puget Sound Corps (40000041)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3283. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sunshine Mine (40000042)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3284. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Replacement (40000043)

Resource Management Cost Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement

Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Community and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$61,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$61,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3285. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (40000044)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3286. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy 2019-21 (40000045)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3287. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities 2019-21 (40000046)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3288. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

School Seismic Safety Assessments (40000047)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3289. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (40000049)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $13,200,000 is provided solely for: Mitigating risk of uncharacteristic wildfire and other disturbances to protect lives, communities, property, ecosystems, and working forests; implementing forest health treatments, prioritized pursuant to chapter 76.06 RCW, on state lands and state forestlands, private lands, and federal lands, including implementation of the "good neighbor" agreement signed with the United States forest service and the bureau of land management, and "good neighbor" cross boundary competitive grants to forest collaboratives; and increasing the use of prescribed fire through improved trainings, prescribed burn certification programs, and shared stewardship strategies with federal land managers.

(2) $1,000,000 is provided solely for administering the forest health treatments pursuant to subsection (1) of this section with the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department must contract with the Washington conservation corps, including veterans, to provide forest health treatments that may include thinning, pruning, and brush disposal, and other wildfire preparedness and fuel modification practices; and

(b) The department must work in conjunction with communities, counties, fire districts, and conservation districts in implementing wildfire preparedness and fuel modification practices.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$74,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3290. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Large Vessel Removals (40000051)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3291. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (40000052)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3292. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (RHOSP) (40000053)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3293. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Cultural Resources Conservation Easement Program (CRCEP) (40000054)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3294. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Federal ESA Mitigation Grants (91000087)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3295. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Port of Willapa Harbor Energy Innovation District Grant (91000099)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3296. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Assessing and Improving Economic Performance of Trust Lands (91000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely to conduct the asset valuation of state lands and state forestlands held in trust and managed by the department as required in section 7024 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$430,000

Forest Development Account—State
. . . .
$550,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State
. . . .
$550,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$125,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3297. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy 2017-19 (92000032)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$7,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3298. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Craft Brewing and Distilling Center (91000006)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3299. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Grants to Improve Safety and Access at Fairs (92000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$48,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,052,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3300. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

2019-21 Grants to Improve Safety and Access at Fairs (92000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Stormwater Remediation (30000030)

Fire Service Training Account—State
. . . .
$2,832,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,132,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Burn Building - Structural Repairs (30000256)

Fire Service Training Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Kennewick Laboratory Renovations and Security Improvements (30000266)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

High Throughput DNA Laboratory (40000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $277,000 is provided solely for renovations to the crime lab.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$277,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Aviation Revitalization Loans (92000003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6011 of this act and moneys attributable to appropriations of state bond proceeds may not be expended for loans to nongovernmental entities.

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$472,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,072,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,544,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2011-2013 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$529,395,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$530,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-2015 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,594,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$382,788,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$387,382,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skills Center East Growth (30000159)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5013, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$44,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$509,931,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$554,631,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Emergency Repairs and Equal Access Grants for K-12 Public Schools (30000182)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5001, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,795,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,205,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids / Healthy Schools (30000184)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5002, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,049,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$201,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skill Centers – Minor Works (30000187)

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account (Bonds)—State
. . . .
$2,691,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$309,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skill Center - Core Growth (30000197)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,807,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Classrooms and Labs (30000203)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,344,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,656,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2017-19 School Construction Assistance Program (40000003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$475,282,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$255,948,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$731,230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$217,520,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$948,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance Level (40000013)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$884,021,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$133,433,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,020,454,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,870,192,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,890,646,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

West Sound Technical Skills Center Modernization (40000015)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center - Evergreen Building Modernization (40000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$146,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Administration (40000018)

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,124,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,124,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School District Health and Safety 2019-21 (40000019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Study and Survey Funding Enhancement - Natural Hazards Assessment (40000020)

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,529,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,529,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids / Healthy Schools 2019-21 (40000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts and the department of health, shall develop or use its previously developed criteria for providing funding for specific projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Districts or schools may apply for grants but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation;

(b) Any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and

(c) Applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program must be prioritized.

(2) The appropriation may be used:

(a) For water bottle filling stations, which may include replacement of lead-contaminated drinking water fixtures.

(b) To purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's physical health which may include, but is not limited to: Fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation.

(c) To purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's nutrition which may include, but is not limited to: Garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$27,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skills Centers Minor Works (40000023)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Career Preparation and Launch Equipment Grants (40000032)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This appropriation is provided solely for the superintendent to provide competitive grants to districts to purchase and install equipment that expands career connected learning opportunities.

(2) The superintendent shall develop common criteria for providing competitive grant funding and outcomes for specific projects.

(3) Each grant award may not exceed $300,000 and a district may receive only one grant from the appropriation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Pilot Program (91000402)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5026, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,046,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,454,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$67,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,866,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-3 Class-size Reduction Grants (92000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5028, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. Funding shall lapse for grant awards for projects that are not verified by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to be either in the design or construction phase by June 30, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$109,454,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$125,046,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$234,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Small Rural District Modernization Grants (92000040)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$41,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000041)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,901,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Everett Pathways to Medical Education (92000123)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Agricultural Science in Schools Grant to FFA Foundation (92000122)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,620,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,370,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Financial Assistance Percentage Enhancement (92000138)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5853 (school construction). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Small District Modernization Grants (92000139)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for planning grants as specified in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5572 (school modernization grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $22,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for construction projects in small rural districts, with total enrollments of less than one thousand students, where the school facility does not need to be replaced and does not require an extensive modernization but does have significant building system deficiencies. No individual school district may receive a grant that exceeds $5,000,000. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall use an expedited grant application process in selecting the grant recipients funded by this subsection.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 STEM Grants (92000140)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Laser Interferometer Gravitational-Wave Observatory (LIGO) STEM Observatory in Richland, Washington.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

2017-2019 Campus Preservation (30000100)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$420,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$570,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Independent Living Skills Center (30000107)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

2019-2021 Campus Preservation (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,380,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Academic and Physical Education Building (30000036)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5009, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$786,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$214,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Minor Works: Preservation 2019-21 (30000045)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell (30000378)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The University of Washington and Cascadia College shall be tenants in common of the building constructed with this appropriation and shall have joint, equal, and undivided authority in the governance of the design, construction, and operation of the building.

(2) Half of the assignable space constructed with this appropriation shall be designed for and used exclusively by Cascadia College. Cascadia shall pay no rent or operations and maintenance expenses to the University of Washington for the space constructed with this appropriation.

(3) $2,343,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for Cascadia College for equipment and project management.

(4) Criteria for selecting the design-build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business.

(5) The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,118,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,938,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$382,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$79,438,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Education - T-Wing Renovation/Addition (30000486)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$55,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,223,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

2017-2019 Minor Works - Preservation (30000736)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$10,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,975,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Major Infrastructure (30000808)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$14,500,000

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$22,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$54,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Evans School - Parrington Hall Renovation (30000810)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

2019-2021 Minor Works - Preservation (40000004)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$47,466,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,466,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Behavioral Health Teaching Hospital (40000038)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for planning and reporting pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1593 (UW behavioral health campus). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

(2) If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5537 (behavioral health facilities) is not enacted by June 30, 2019, and ratified by the people by December 5, 2019, then the community behavioral health account appropriation provided in this section shall lapse.

Community Behavioral Health Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$180,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$181,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Ctr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000024)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,825,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$103,300,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$154,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma (20102002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: At least ten percent of the total cost of this project must be paid from private funds.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$36,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

College of Engineering Interdisciplinary Ed./Research Center I (30000492)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$45,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$49,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman - Plant Sciences Building (30000519)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,213,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$32,887,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$59,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Vancouver - Life Sciences Building (30000840)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$52,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$57,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Tri-Cities - Academic Building (30001190)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,267,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,133,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Global Animal Health Building (30001322)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$36,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$59,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

2017-19 Minor Works - Preservation (MCR) (30001342)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,795,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Program (MCI&Omn Eqp): 2019-21 (40000010)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$5,328,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$93,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$98,328,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Preservation (MCR): 2019-21 (40000011)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$21,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$177,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$198,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Spokane-Biomedical and Health Sc Building Ph II (40000012)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$83,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$84,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000041)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,115,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,460,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,690,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Everett Real Estate Acquisition (40000006)

Washington State University Building Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Interdisciplinary Science Center (30000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$55,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$72,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Science Renovation (30000549)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,937,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$103,838,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$111,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Engineering Building (30000556)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$245,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$56,695,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$57,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Preservation 2019-21 (40000011)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Program 2019-21 (40000015)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal II (40000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventative Maintenance/Backlog Reduction (40000017)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,868,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Albers Court Improvements (40000036)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,953,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,953,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (91000019)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program (91000021)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Nutrition Science (30000456)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,550,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,030,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$59,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation (30000783)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program: 2019-21 (40000007)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$19,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation: 2019-21 (40000041)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$36,452,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$43,452,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000018)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Health Education (40000009)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works—Preservation: 2019-21 (91000031)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,691,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,175,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,866,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,348,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$48,115,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$64,329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Program: 2019-21 (91000033)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,164,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,264,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lab I Seismic and HVAC Renovation (30000586)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000034)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,613,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,923,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,416,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Critical Power, Safety, and Security Systems (30000613)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Health and Counseling Center (30000614)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Facilities Preservation (91000010)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Historic Lord Mansion (91000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5016, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$404,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$504,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Access Control Security Upgrades (30000604)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$750,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,900,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Sciences Building Addition & Renovation (30000768)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2017-2019 Classroom & Lab Upgrades (30000769)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$450,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Elevator Preservation Safety and ADA Upgrades (30000772)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$388,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,188,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000781)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,100,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,079,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,179,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2019-2021 Classroom & Lab Upgrades (30000869)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical Engineering/Computer Science Building (30000872)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The legislature intends to provide funding for both design and construction of this project in the 2021-2023 biennium. At least ten percent of the total cost of this project must be paid from private funds.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$46,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$46,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (30000873)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$6,846,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$55,768,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program: 2019-21 (30000885)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,136,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,136,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000013)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,614,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,616,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,784,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$643,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,054,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,697,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000288)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000297)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,101,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,986,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Strategic Facility Master Plan (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$42,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$33,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grant Projects: 2019-21 (40000014)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Metro Parks Tacoma - W.W. Seymour Botanical

Conservatory Rehab. . . .$773,000

Discover Your Northwest - Chittenden Locks Fish

Ladder Viewing. . . .$382,000

Foss Waterway Seaport - Balfour Dock Building:

Phase IIIE. . . .$307,000

City of Tumwater, WA - Old Brewhouse Tower Rehab. . . .$513,000

Gig Harbor - Harbor History Museum - Fishing

Vessel Shenandoah. . . .$100,000

City of Vancouver, Washington - Re-roof 3 Bldgs

Officer's Row. . . .$150,000

NW School of Wooden Boatbuilding - Expanding Public

Access. . . .$240,000

Kalispel Tribe - Restoration of Our Lady of

Sorrows Church. . . .$33,000

KC Dept. of Natural Resources - Mukai Farmstead & Garden

Preserv. . . .$600,000

City of Edmonds - Edmonds Museum (Carnegie Library

Restoration). . . .$74,000

Vancouver National Historic Reserve Trust - Renovate

Providence. . . .$490,000

Washington Trust for Historic Preservation - Stimson-Green

Mansion. . . .$100,000

Phinney Neighborhood Association - John B.

Allen School. . . .$30,000

PNW Railroad Archive - Mounting rails. . . .$47,000

City of Roslyn - Historic Community Center, Library,

& City Hall. . . .$233,000

Quincy Valley Historical Society & Museum - Comm

Heritage Barn. . . .$41,000

The NW Railway Museum - Puget Sound Electric Railway

Interurban. . . .$229,000

The Cutter Theatre - 1912 Metaline Falls School

Re-Roofing. . . .$26,000

Delridge Neighborhoods Dev Assoc - Structural

improvements. . . .$299,000

Seattle City Light - Continue Georgetown Steam

Plan. . . .$773,000

Skagit County Historical Society - Skagit City

School Rehab. . . .$22,000

Mount Baker Theatre - Mount Baker Theatre

Preservation. . . .$1,000,000

North Bay Historical Society - Sargent Oyster House

Restoration. . . .$160,000

City of Lynnwood - Heritage Park Water Tower Phase II

Renovation. . . .$367,000

Town of Waverly - Restoration of Prairie View

Schoolhouse. . . .$55,000

City of Lacey - Renovating Lacey warehouse for

new museum. . . .$979,000

Northwest Schooner Society - Restoration 1906 Keepers

Quarters. . . .$82,000

Sammamish Heritage Society - Reard House Phase III:

Reconstruct. . . .$123,000

Cheney Depot Society - Cheney Depot Relocation &

Rehabilitation. . . .$367,000

The 5th Ave Theatre Assoc - Theatre Upgrade:

Auditorium. . . .$560,000

Highline Historical Society - Phase 3: Highline Heritage

Museum. . . .$71,000

University Place Historical Society - Curran House

History Museum. . . .$41,000

Coupeville Maritime Heritage Foundation - Preserv of

vessel Suva. . . .$71,000

Fort Worden Public Development Authority - Sage Arts &

Ed Ctr. . . .$560,000

South Pierce County Historical Society - Eatonville

Tofu House. . . .$15,000

City of Everett - Van Valley Home lead Abatement &

Pres. . . .$67,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,980,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (40000086)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,545,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,543,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,088,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works Program: 2019-21 (40000097)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$955,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (40000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$332,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$438,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Campbell and Carriage House Repairs and Restoration (40000017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (40000026)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,447,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$953,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,287,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,737,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$48,403,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,330,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,606,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College: Allied Health and Early Childhood Dev Center (30000126)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$433,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,167,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Student Services and Instructional Building (30000127)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$671,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,151,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community College: Cascade Court (30000128)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,877,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,318,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal (30000129)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$24,847,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,416,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: North County Satellite (30000135)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,688,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett Community College: Learning Resource Center (30000136)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,835,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$180,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,015,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Science, Engineering, Technology Bldg (30000137)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$34,809,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,268,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,244,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,530,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,774,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend: Professional-Technical Education Center (30000981)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$24,056,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,330,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,386,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5025, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,119,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,387,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,506,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,663,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley: Wells Hall Replacement (30000985)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,208,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$29,531,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$632,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,371,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic: Shop Building Renovation (30000986)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$948,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,605,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Building Renovation - Phase 3 (30000987)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,278,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$31,592,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$230,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle: Automotive Technology Renovation and Expansion (30000988)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,782,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$719,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Medical Mile Health Science Center (30000989)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,933,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,828,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$305,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,066,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,902,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$36,642,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,234,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Library Building Renovation (30001451)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,448,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Walla Walla Science and Technology Building Replacement (30001452)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,093,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$63,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,156,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Center for Science and Technology (30001453)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$131,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$296,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls: Fine and Applied Arts Replacement (30001458)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,616,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$35,663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$211,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,490,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (40000043)

Community and Technical College Capital

Projects Account—State
. . . .
$22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$91,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$114,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake Washington: Center for Design (40000102)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,308,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,468,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5129. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic Innovation and Technology Learning Center (40000103)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,552,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$21,703,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,255,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5130. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program (40000112)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$39,841,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5131. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Fire Service Training Center (40000130)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5132. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue: Center for Transdisciplinary Learning and Innovation (40000168)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,839,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$38,476,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$41,315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5133. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (40000169)

Community and Technical College Capital

Projects Account—State
. . . .
$6,209,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,318,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$38,527,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5134. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (40000171)

Community and Technical College Capital

Projects Account—State
. . . .
$15,252,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,252,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5135. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs (40000173)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5136. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Preservation (40000258)

Community and Technical College Capital

Projects Account—State
. . . .
$23,739,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,739,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5137. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Puyallup: STEM building (40000293)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$37,230,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,599,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5138. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett: Baker Hall Replacement (40000190)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$28,014,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,864,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5139. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

2019-21 Career Preparation and Launch Equipment Grants (40000306)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to provide competitive grants to community and technical colleges to purchase and install equipment that expands career connected learning opportunities.

(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop common criteria for providing competitive grant funding and outcomes for specific projects.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

(End of part)

PART 6

2019 SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET

Sec. 6001. 2018 c 2 s 1010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Construction Loans (30000878)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of public works projects:

180th St SE SR 527 Brook Blvd (Snohomish). . . .$3,000,000

35th Ave SE Phase II SR 524 to 180th St SE

(Snohomish). . . .$3,000,000

61st/190th Culvert Replacement & Embankment Repair

(Kenmore). . . .$1,500,000

Automated Meter Reading System (Birch Bay). . . .$1,500,000

Cedar Hills Regional Landfill North Flare Statn

Repair (King). . . .$1,583,000

Cedar Hills Regional Landfill Pump Station Repairs

(King). . . .$3,000,000

City Street Light Conversion to Light Emitting Diode

(Vancouver). . . .$4,816,000

Fairview Ave N Bridge Replacement (Seattle). . . .$10,000,000

Georgetown Wet Weather Treatment Station (King). . . .$3,500,000

((Isaacs Avenue Improvements - Phase 2 (Walla Walla). . . .$3,962,000))

Kennewick Automated Meter Reading Project

(Kennewick). . . .$6,000,000

((Landslide Repairs (Aberdeen). . . .$373,000))

McKinnon Creek Wellfield Infrastructure Improvements

(Lake Forest). . . .$200,000

Miller Street Re-Alignment and Storm Repairs

(Wenatchee). . . .$4,826,000

((NE 10th Avenue (Clark). . . .$10,000,000))

Ostrich Creek Culvert Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$4,688,000

Pine Basin Watershed Storm Sewer Improvements

(Bremerton). . . .$3,881,000

((Slater Road/Jordan Creek Fish Passage Project

(Whatcom). . . .$5,000,000))

South Fork McCorkle Creek Stormwater Detention

Facility (Lexington). . . .$4,700,000

Sudbury Landfill Area 7 Cell 3 Construction

(Walla Walla). . . .$2,978,000

Sunset Reservoir Rehabilitation (Spokane). . . .$1,412,000

Thurston Co. PUD No. 1 Replacement and Upgrades

(Thurston). . . .(($1,028,000))$480,000

Tipping Floor Restoration & Safety Upgrades

(Lincoln). . . .$156,000

US 395/Ridgeline Interchange (Kennewick). . . .$6,000,000

Wastewater Reuse Project (Quincy). . . .$10,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($97,103,000))

$77,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($97,103,000))

$77,220,000

Sec. 6002. 2018 c 2 s 1019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

PWAA Preconstruction and Emergency Loan Programs (40000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $5,000,000 is ((provided solely)) for the public works board's emergency loan program.

(2) Up to $14,000,000 is ((provided solely)) for the public works board's preconstruction loan program.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

Sec. 6003. 2018 c 298 s 1004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Aberdeen Gateway Center (Aberdeen). . . .$1,750,000

Adams County Industrial Wastewater and Treatment

Center (Othello). . . .$1,250,000

Adna Elementary Playshed (Chehalis). . . .$104,000

Airway Heights Recreation Complex (Airway Heights). . . .$515,000

Alder Creek Pioneer Museum Expansion (Bickelton). . . .$500,000

Anderson Island Historical Society (Anderson Island). . . .$26,000

Appleway Trail Amenities (Spokane Valley). . . .$556,000

ARC Community Center Renovation (Bremerton). . . .$81,000

Arlington Pocket Park Downtown Business District

(Arlington). . . .$46,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center Design and

Preconstruction (Tacoma). . . .$250,000

Belfair Sewer Extension to Puget Sound Industrial

Ctr (Belfair). . . .$515,000

Billy Frank Jr. Heritage Center (Olympia). . . .$206,000

Bloodworks NW Bloodmobiles. . . .$425,000

Bothell Parks Projects (Bothell). . . .$309,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center

(Vancouver). . . .$500,000

Brier ADA Ramp Updates Phase (Brier). . . .$115,000

Camp Schechter New Infrastructure and Dining Hall

(Tumwater). . . .$200,000

Capitol Campus E. WA Butte (Olympia). . . .$52,000

Captain Joseph House (Port Angeles). . . .$225,000

Carnation Central Business District Revitalization

(Carnation). . . .$1,545,000

Castle Rock Fair LED Lighting (Castle Rock). . . .$10,000

Centennial Connect Project (Marysville). . . .$642,000

Centennial Trail - Southern Extension #1 (Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Centerville Grange Renovation (Centerville). . . .$134,000

Centralia Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia). . . .$299,000

Chamber Economic Development Project (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Chelan County Emergency Operations Center (Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000

Chelatchie Prairie Railroad Maintenance Bldg.

Phase 2 (Yacolt). . . .$250,000

Cherry St. Fellowship (Seattle). . . .$360,000

Children's Playgarden (Seattle). . . .$315,000

Chimacum Ridge Forest Pilot (Port Townsend). . . .$3,400,000

City of Brewster Manganese Abatement (Brewster). . . .$752,000

Cityview Conversion to Residential Treatment

(Moses Lake). . . .$250,000

Clark County Historical Museum (Vancouver). . . .$300,000

Clymer Museum and Gallery Remodel (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Coastal Harvest Roof Replacement (Hoquiam). . . .$206,000

Cocoon House (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

College Place Well Consolidation and Replacement

(College Place). . . .$900,000

Columbia River Trail (Washougal). . . .$1,000,000

Confluence Park Improvements (P2&3) (Issaquah). . . .$206,000

Country Doctor Community Health Centers (Seattle). . . .$280,000

Covington Town Center Civic Plaza Development

(Covington). . . .$820,000

Cross Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,500,000

Daffodil Heritage Float Barn (Puyallup). . . .$103,000

Darrington Rodeo Grounds (Darrington). . . .$250,000

Des Moines Marina Bulkhead & Fishing Pier Renovation

(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Disaster Response Communications Project (Colville). . . .$1,000,000

District 5 Public Safety Center (Sultan). . . .$1,500,000

Downtown Pocket Park at Rockwell (Port Orchard). . . .$309,000

DuPont Historical Museum Renovation HVAC (DuPont). . . .$53,000

East Grays Harbor Fiber Project (Elma). . . .$463,000

East Hill YMCA/Park Renovation (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Eastside Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,550,000

Ebey Waterfront Trail and Shoreline Access

(Marysville). . . .$1,000,000

Emmanuel Life Center Kitchen (Spokane). . . .$155,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Senior Housing (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Evergreen Pool Resurfacing (White Center). . . .$247,000

Fall City Wastewater Infrastructure Planning & Design

(Fall City). . . .$1,000,000

Family Medicine Remodel (Goldendale). . . .$195,000

Federal Way Camera Replacement (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Federal Way Senior Center (Federal Way). . . .$175,000

Flood Protection Wall & Storage Building (Sultan). . . .$286,000

Food Lifeline Food Bank. . . .$1,250,000

Forestry Museum Building (Tenino). . . .$16,000

Fox Island Catastrophic Emergency Preparation

(Fox Island). . . .$17,000

Francis Anderson Center Roofing Project (Edmonds). . . .$391,000

Freeland Water and Sewer District Sewer Project

(Freeland). . . .$1,500,000

FUSION Transitional Hse Pgm/FUSION Decor Boutique

(Federal Way). . . .$500,000

Gig Harbor Sports Complex (Gig Harbor). . . .$206,000

Granger Historical Society Museum Acquisition

(Granger). . . .$255,000

Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial Foundation

(Maple Valley). . . .$258,000

GreenBridge/4th Ave Streetscaping (White Center). . . .$1,195,000

Harmony Sports Complex Infrastructure & Safety Imprve

(Vancouver). . . .$1,177,000

Harrington School District #204, Pool Renovation

(Harrington). . . .$97,000

Historic Mukai Farm and Garden Restoration (Vashon). . . .$250,000

Holly Ridge Center Building (Bremerton). . . .$475,000

Honor Point Military and Aerospace Museum (Spokane). . . .$100,000

HopeWorks TOD Center (Everett). . . .$2,760,000

Hoquiam Library (Hoquiam). . . .$250,000

HUB Sports Center (Liberty Lake). . . .$516,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Road Improvements (George). . . .$412,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Water System Improvements

(George). . . .$700,000

Inland Northwest Rail Museum (Reardan). . . .$170,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center (Yakima). . . .$1,000,000

Interbay PDAC (Seattle). . . .$900,000

Intrepid Spirit Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Islandwood Comm Dining Hall and Kitchen

(Bainbridge Island). . . .$200,000

Kenmore Public Boathouse (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Key Peninsula Civic Center Generator (Vaughn). . . .$60,000

Key Peninsula Elder Community (Lakebay). . . .$515,000

Kitchen Upgrade Belfair Senior Center Meals on Wheels

(Belfair). . . .$12,000

Kitsap Reg. Library Foundation, Silverdale Library

(Silverdale). . . .$250,000

Kona Kai Coffee Training Center (Tukwila). . . .$407,000

La Conner New Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$500,000

Lacey Boys and Girls Club (Lacey). . . .$30,000

Lake Chelan Community Hospital & Clinic Replacement

(Chelan). . . .$300,000

Lake City Comm Center, Renovate Magnuson Comm Center

(Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens). . . .$3,100,000

Lake Stevens Food Bank (Lake Stevens). . . .$300,000

Lake Sylvia State Park Legacy Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$696,000

Lake Tye All-Weather Fields (Monroe). . . .$800,000

Lakewood Playhouse Lighting System Upgrade (Lakewood). . . .$60,000

Lambert House Purchase (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Larson Playfield Lighting Renovation (Moses Lake). . . .$146,000

Lewis Co Fire Dist #1 Emergency Svcs Bldg & Resrce Ctr

(Onalaska). . . .$80,000

LIGO STEM Exploration Center (Richland). . . .$411,000

Longbranch Marina (Longbranch). . . .$248,000

Longview Police Department Range and Training

(Castle Rock). . . .$271,000

Lyon Creek, SR 104 Fish Barrier Removal

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,200,000

Maury Island Open Space Remediation (Maury Island). . . .$2,000,000

McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$2,000,000

Mill Creek Flood Control Project (Kent). . . .$2,000,000

Millionair Club Charity Kitchen (Seattle). . . .$167,000

Moorlands Park Improvements (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Morrow Manor (Poulsbo). . . .$773,000

Mount Baker Properties Cleanup Site (Seattle). . . .$1,100,000

Mount Rainier Early Warning System (Pierce County). . . .$1,751,000

Mukilteo Tank Farm Remediation (Mukilteo). . . .$257,000

Multicultural Community Center (Seattle). . . .$1,300,000

NE Snohomish County Community Services Campus

(Granite Falls). . . .$375,000

NeighborCare Health (Vashon). . . .$3,000,000

New Fire Station at Lake Lawrence (Yelm). . . .$252,000

North Cove Erosion Control (South Bend). . . .$650,000

Northshore Athletic Fields (Woodinville). . . .$400,000

Northwest Improvement Company Building (Roslyn). . . .$1,000,000

Olmstead-Smith Historical Gardens Replacement Well

(Ellensburg). . . .$17,000

Orting's Pedestrian Evacuation Crossing SR162 (Orting). . . .$500,000

Othello Regional Water Project (Othello). . . .$1,000,000

Paradise Point Water Supply System Phase IV

(Ridgefield). . . .$500,000

Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden). . . .$3,035,000

Performing Arts & Events Center (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Pioneer Village ADA Accessible Pathways (Ferndale). . . .$154,000

Port Ilwaco/Port Chinook Marina Mtce Drdg & Matl Disps

(Chinook). . . .$77,000

Port Orchard Marina Breakwater Refurbishment

(Port Orchard). . . .$1,019,000

Poulsbo Outdoor Salmon Observation Area (Poulsbo). . . .$475,000

Puyallup Meeker Mansion Public Plaza (Puyallup). . . .$500,000

Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$250,000

R.A. Long Park (Longview). . . .$296,000

Redondo Beach Rocky Reef (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

Ridgefield Outdoor Recreation Complex (Ridgefield). . . .$750,000

Rochester Boys & Girls Club upgrades (Rochester). . . .$26,000

Save the Old Tower (Pasco). . . .$300,000

Schilling Road Fire Station (Lyle). . . .$448,000

Scott Hill Park (Woodland). . . .$750,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Seattle Opera (Seattle). . . .$465,000

Shelton Basin 3 Sewer Rehabilitation Project (Shelton). . . .$1,500,000

Skagit Co Public Safety Emgcy Commun Ctr Exp/Remodel

(Mt. Vernon). . . .$525,000

Skagit County Veterans Community Park (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$500,000

Skagit Valley YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$400,000

Snohomish JROTC Program (Snohomish). . . .$189,000

South Gorge Trail (Spokane). . . .$250,000

South Snohomish County Community Resource Center

(Lynnwood). . . .$2,210,000

South Thurston County Meals on Wheels Kitchen

Upgrade (Yelm). . . .$30,000

Southwest WA Agricultural Business Park (Tenino). . . .$618,000

Southwest Washington Fair Grange Building Re-Roof

(Chehalis). . . .$54,000

Spanaway Lake Management Plan (Spanaway). . . .$26,000

Squalicum Waterway Maintenance Dredging (Bellingham). . . .$750,000

Steilacoom Historical Museum Storage Building

(Steilacoom). . . .$31,000

Sunnyside Community Hospital (Sunnyside). . . .$2,000,000

Sunset Career Center (Renton). . . .$412,000

Sunset Neighborhood Park (Renton). . . .$3,050,000

Tacoma's Historic Theater District (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Tam O'Shanter Athletic Arena (Kelso). . . .$1,000,000

Toledo Beautification (Toledo). . . .$52,000

Trout Lake School/Community Soccer & Track Facility

(Trout Lake). . . .$77,000

Tumwater Boys and Girls Club (Olympia). . . .$36,000

Turning Pointe Domestic Violence Svc: Shelter Imprv/Rep

(Shelton). . . .$27,000

Twisp Civic Building (Twisp). . . .$750,000

University YMCA (Seattle). . . .$600,000

Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$354,000

Washington Agricultural Education Center (Lynden). . . .$1,800,000

Washington Care Services (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Washington State Horse Park Covered Arena (Cle Elum). . . .$2,000,000

Waste Treatment and Sewer Collection System

(Toppenish). . . .$1,405,000

Wastewater Collection & Water Distribution Replacemnt

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Water Treatment for Kidney Dialysis. . . .$499,000

Wayne Golf Course Region Park (Bothell). . . .$1,000,000

Wesley Homes Bradley Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,380,000

Westport Marina (Westport). . . .$2,500,000

Weyerhaeuser Land Preservation

(Federal Way). . . .$750,000

Whidbey Island Youth Project (Oak Harbor

and Coupeville). . . .$300,000

White Pass Country Historical Museum (Packwood). . . .$283,000

Whitehouse Additional Capital Campaign (Pasco). . . .$1,500,000

Willows Road Regional Trail Connection (Kirkland). . . .$1,442,000

Winlock HS Track (Winlock). . . .$103,000

Winlock Industrial Infrastructure Development

(Winlock). . . .$1,500,000

Wishram School CTE Facility (Wishram). . . .$150,000

Yakima Valley SunDome Repairs (Yakima). . . .$206,000

Yelm City Park Playground Modernization (Yelm). . . .$247,000

Youth Eastside Services (Bellevue). . . .$26,000

YWCA Family Justice Center (Spokane). . . .$103,000

(8) $26,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of the Spanaway lake management plan.

(9) $750,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the planning, development, acquisition, and other activities pursing open space conservation strategies for the historic Federal Way Weyerhaeuser campus. The grant recipient must be a regional nonprofit nature conservancy that works to conserve keystone properties selected by the city of Federal Way.

(10)(a) $900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for an Interbay public development advisory committee. It is the intent of the legislature to examine current and future needs of a state entity that performs an essential public function on state-owned property located in one of the state's designated manufacturing industrial centers. The legislature further intends to explore the potential future uses of this state-owned property in the event that the state entity determines that it must relocate in order to protect its ability to perform its essential public function.

(b) The Interbay public development advisory committee is created to make recommendations regarding the highest public benefit and future economic development uses for the Washington army national guard armory facility in the city of Seattle, pier 91 property, located at the descriptions referred to in the quit claim deeds for two parcels of land, 24.75 acres total, dated January 8, 1971, and December 22, 2009.

(c) The Interbay advisory committee consists of seven persons appointed as follows:

(i) One person appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(ii) One person appointed by the president of the senate; and

(iii) Five persons appointed by the governor, who must collectively have experience in forming public-private partnerships to develop workforce housing or affordable housing; knowledge of project financing options for public-private partnerships related to housing; architectural design and development experience related to industrial lands and mixed-use zoning to include housing; and experience leading public processes to engage communities and other stakeholders in public discussions regarding economic development decisions.

(d) The Interbay public development advisory committee must:

(i) Work in collaboration with the military department to determine the needs of the military department if it is relocated from the land described in subsection (1) of this section, including identifying:

(A) Current uses;

(B) Future needs of the units currently at this location;

(C) Potential suitable publicly owned sites in Washington for relocation of current units; and

(D) The costs associated with acquisition, construction, and relocation to another site or sites for these units;

(ii) Explore the future economic development opportunities if the land described in subsection (1) of this section is vacated by the military department, and make recommendations, including identifying:

(A) Suitable and unsuitable future uses for the land;

(B) Environmental issues and associated costs;

(C) Current public infrastructure availability, future public infrastructure plans by local or regional entities, and potential public infrastructure needs;

(D) Transportation corridors in the immediate area and any potential right-of-way needs; and

(E) Existing zoning regulations for the land and potential future zoning needs to evaluate workforce housing, affordable housing, and other commercial and industrial development compatible with the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center designation;

(iii) Explore the potential funding sources and partners as well as any needed transactions, and make recommendations, including:

(A) Any potential private partners or investors;

(B) Necessary real estate transactions;

(C) Federal funding opportunities; and

(D) State and local funding sources, including any tax-related programs; and

(iv) Conduct at least three public meetings at a location within the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center, where a quorum of the Interbay public development advisory committee members are present, at which members of the public are invited to present to the Interbay advisory committee regarding the future uses of the site and potential issues such as industrial land use, commercial development, residential zoning, and public infrastructure needs((; and

(v) Provide a report to the legislature and office of the governor with recommendations for each area described in this subsection (10)(d) by June 29, 2019. The Interbay advisory committee's recommendations must include recommendations regarding the structure, composition, and scope of authority of any subsequent state public development authority that may be established to implement the recommendations of the Interbay advisory committee created in this section)).

(e) ((The Interbay advisory committee created in this section terminates June 30, 2019.

(f))) Nothing in this section authorizes the solicitation of interest or bids for work related to the purposes of this section.

(((g)))(f) The department of commerce shall provide staff support to the Interbay advisory committee. The department may contract with outside consultants to provide any needed expertise.

(((h)))(g) Legislative members of the Interbay advisory committee are reimbursed for travel in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(11) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Lakewood for the purchase of property within the federally designated north clear zone at joint base Lewis-McChord. Once acquired, the property must be zoned for use compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. The city may lease or resell the acquired property for fair market value, but any such lease or sale must include restrictions or covenants ensuring that the use of the property is safely compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. If the city subsequently resells, rezones, develops, or leases the property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the north clear zone, the city must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of the property in its entirety within ten years.

(12) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Federal Way chamber of commerce for two economic development projects focused in the south Puget Sound area. The amounts in this section must be used for a business retention and expansion program to conduct economic research in collaboration with stakeholders, develop data-driven economic strategies, and produce a written evaluation; and a tourism enhancement program to develop and inventory the Federal Way area tourism sector, analyze data regarding visitation, and produce a written evaluation.

(13) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Northshore athletic field which shall be named "Andy Hill Sports Complex."

(14) $1,177,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Harmony sports complex infrastructure and safety improvements in Vancouver and is contingent upon the facility being open to the public.

(15) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma. It is the intent of the legislature that beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium no state funding is provided to the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($129,799,000))

$130,441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($129,799,000))

$130,441,000

Sec. 6004. 2018 c 298 s 2004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen - Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($9,806,000))

$206,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,806,000))

$206,000

Sec. 6005. 2018 c 298 s 2005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide - RA Community Facilities: Safety & Security Improvements (30002737)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,800,000))

$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$1,700,000

Sec. 6006. 2018 c 298 s 2008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School - Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,200,000))

$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,200,000))

$600,000

Sec. 6007. 2018 c 2 s 2019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School - Campus: Security & Surveillance Upgrades (30003580)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$1,500,000

Sec. 6008. 2018 c 298 s 2018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Pine Lodge Behavioral Rehabilitation Services (91000061)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,400,000))

$120,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,400,000))

$120,000

Sec. 6009. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 1052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

West Campus Historic Buildings Exterior Preservation (30000727)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($500,000))

$380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$1,880,000

Sec. 6010. 2018 c 2 s 5014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Independent Living Skills Center (30000107)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($50,000))

$170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($50,000))

$170,000

Sec. 6011. 2018 c 2 s 4002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Aviation Revitalization Loans (92000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This appropriation is provided solely for deposit into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account created in section 7028 of this act for direct loans to political subdivisions of the state and privately owned airports for the purpose of improvements at public use airports that primarily support general aviation activities.

(2) The department must convene a community aviation revitalization board to develop criteria for selecting loan recipients, to develop a process for evaluating applications, and to make decisions. The board must consist of the capital budget chair and ranking minority member of the capital budget committee of the house of representatives and the senate ways and means committee, and a representative from both the department of transportation's aviation division and the department of commerce. The board must also consist of the following members appointed by the secretary of transportation: One port district official, one county official, one city official, one representative of airport managers, and one representative of pilots. The chair of the board must be selected by the secretary of transportation. The members of the board must elect one of their members to serve as vice chair. The director of commerce and the secretary of transportation must serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.

(3) The board may provide loans to privately owned airports for the purpose of airport improvements only if the state is receiving commensurate public benefit, such as guaranteed long-term public access to the airport as a condition of the loan. For purposes of this subsection, "public use airports that primarily support general aviation activities" means all public use airports not listed as having more than fifty thousand annual commercial air service passenger enplanements as published by the federal aviation administration.

(4) An application for loan funds under this section must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. When evaluating loan applications, the board must prioritize applications that provide conclusive justification that completion of the loan application project will create revenue-generating opportunities. The board is not limited to, but must also use, the following expected outcome conditions when evaluating loan applications:

(a) A specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the aviation facility improvement is made;

(b) The loan application project results in the creation of jobs or private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(c) The loan application project improves opportunities for the successful maintenance, operation, or expansion of an airport or adjacent airport business park;

(d) The loan application project results in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities; and

(e) The loan application project results in leveraging additional federal funding for an airport.

(5) The repayment of any loan made from the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account under the contracts for aviation loans must be paid into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account.

((State Taxable Building Construction))Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

Sec. 6012. 2018 c 2 s 3024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control State Match (40000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($10,000,000))$10,194,000 of the appropriation is provided solely as state match for federal clean water funds. (($10,000,000))$10,194,000 of the appropriation must be transferred into the water pollution control revolving account.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$10,194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($50,000,000))

$50,194,000

Sec. 6013. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,600,000))

$507,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,342,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,942,000))

$2,849,000

Sec. 6014. 2018 c 2 s 3093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program 2017-19 (92000014)

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
(($50,000))

$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($250,000))

$600,000

Sec. 6015. 2018 c 2 s 1014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000882)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $3,675,000 for fiscal year 2018 and $3,675,000 for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies for operational cost savings improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(b) At least twenty percent of each competitive grant round must be awarded to small cities or towns with a population of five thousand or fewer residents.

(c) In each competitive round, the higher the leverage ratio of nonstate funding sources to state grant and the higher the energy savings, the higher the project ranking.

(d) For school district applicants, priority consideration must be given to school districts that demonstrate improved health and safety through: (i) Reduced exposure to polychlorinated biphenyl; or (ii) replacing outdated heating systems that use oil or propane as fuel sources as identified by the Washington State University extension energy program. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(2) $1,750,000 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for products manufactured in Washington.

(3) $1,400,000 is provided solely for energy efficiency improvements to minor works and stand-alone projects at state-owned facilities that repair or replace existing building systems including, but not limited to HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the ((cost))department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request ((will be added to the project appropriation after construction bids are received)). Prior to awarding funds, the department of commerce shall ((coordinate with))submit to the office of financial management ((to develop a process for project submittal, review, approval criteria, tracking project budget adjustments, and performance measures))a list of all proposed awards for review and approval.

(4) $500,000 is provided solely for resource conservation managers in the department of enterprise services to coordinate with state agencies and school districts to assess and adjust existing building systems and operations to optimize the efficiency in use of energy and other resources in state-owned facilities. The department of commerce will oversee an interagency agreement with the department of enterprise services to fund the resource conservation managers.

(5) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed, and cost of energy saved. ((The report must include these metrics from other states.))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,500,000

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$71,000,000

Sec. 6016. 2018 c 298 s 5040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Center for Science and Technology (30001453)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,421,000))

$296,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($37,726,000))

$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($41,147,000))

$296,000

Sec. 6017. 2018 c 298 s 1007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the health care authority, to issue grants to community hospitals or other community entities to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities, and consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services. The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more behavioral health organizations, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, or entities that assume the responsibilities of behavioral health organizations in regions in which the health care authority is purchasing medical and behavioral health services through fully integrated contracts pursuant to RCW 71.24.380;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds; and

(g) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(2) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (3), the department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and behavioral health organizations, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(3) $49,600,000 is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1) and (2) of this section:

(a) $4,600,000 is provided solely for at least two enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of patients discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $4,000,000 is provided solely for at least two facilities with secure detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $2,000,000 is provided solely for at least one facility with acute detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) $12,700,000 is provided solely for crisis diversion or stabilization facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. At least two of the facilities must be located in King county and one must be located in Pierce county. The facility in Pierce county shall receive no less than $3,200,000;

(e) $12,700,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment providers to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on ninety or one hundred eighty day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health, and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the department of social and health services;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the department of social and health services that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The department of social and health services has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes;

(f) $6,600,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community providers to develop psychiatric residential treatment beds to serve individuals being diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, the department of health, and the local behavioral health organization jurisdiction for which a proposal has been submitted and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the behavioral health organization in the region or the entity that assumes the responsibilities of the behavioral health organization pursuant to RCW 71.24.380;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the department of social and health services that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The behavioral health organization or the entity that assumes the responsibilities of the behavioral health organization pursuant to RCW 71.24.380 has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes;

(g) $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth, including but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors. In awarding funds for projects in this subsection, the department, in consultation with the department of social and health services and the health care authority must review projects based on the following criteria:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving children and minor youth with behavioral health needs;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and

(iii) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health, department of social and health services, and health care authority that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(h) $2,000,000 is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants.

(4) $35,276,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

North Sound Behavioral Health Organization Denny

Youth Center. . . .$5,000,000

North Sound Behavioral Health Organization Substance

Use Disorder Intensive Treatment. . . .$5,000,000

North Sound Stabilization Campus (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$1,550,000

Bellingham Mental Health Triage . . . .$5,000,000

Bellingham Acute Detox. . . .$2,000,000

SWWA Diversion Crisis and Involuntary Treatment. . . .$3,000,000

Daybreak Center for Adolescent Recovery. . . .$3,000,000

Nexus Youth and Families. . . .$500,000

Valley City Recovery Place. . . .$2,000,000

Geriatric Diversion. . . .$500,000

Skagit Triage Expansion (Mount Vernon). . . .$326,000

Spokane Jail Diversion. . . .$2,400,000

Tri-county Detox and Crisis Center. . . .$4,000,000

Toppenish Hospital. . . .(($1,000,000))$500,000

(5) $3,000,000 is provided solely for the Evergreen treatment services building purchase, contingent on matching funds.

(6)(a) $3,000,000 is provided solely for a grant to a joint venture between MultiCare-Franciscan to provide community based behavioral health services. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section. The department of commerce may not release funding for this project unless MultiCare-Franciscan enters into a memorandum of understanding with the department of social and health services by October 31, 2018, to collaborate on development and implementation of strategies to expand the behavioral health workforce in the region. At a minimum, the agreement must include strategies for increasing recruitment of health professionals required to staff psychiatric inpatient facilities, including psychiatrists, psychologists, nurses and other health care professionals. The agreement must also identify opportunities for coordination between the parties to expand access to clinical skill development and training opportunities in the region and strategies for collaborative service delivery between the parties when possible. To objectively evaluate the efficacy of the strategies implemented to achieve the desired outcomes of the agreement, performance measures and targets must be established to include:

(b) MultiCare-Franciscan and the department of social and health services must work collaboratively to decrease vacancy rates for hard-to-recruit health care professionals employed by each facility. The parties must develop strategies to attract more qualified health care professionals to the area and ensure comparable exposure to the benefits of working for each organization. The parties must measure the success of these strategies by the decrease in vacancy rate for health care professionals necessary to provide safe, quality inpatient psychiatric care in MultiCare-Franciscan and department facilities following the first year as the baseline of the partnership/consortium and with updated goals for each subsequent year. MultiCare-Franciscan and the department of social and health services must work to increase the competency and skills of health care professionals across both facilities by establishing organized joint- and cross-training programs. The parties must measure the success of this strategy by the number of health care professionals in total and by discipline complete cross-training activities and by the number and hours of cross-training opportunities offered under the agreement.

(7) The department of commerce shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(8) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, shall establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, detox, or secure detox.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($90,876,000))

$90,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($90,876,000))

$90,376,000

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001. RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are forty-nine million, six hundred thirteen thousand dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium, three hundred six million, nine hundred ninety four thousand dollars for the 2021-2023 biennium, and four hundred twenty-eight million, eight hundred ninety thousand dollars for the 2023-2025 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $9,950,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a consolidated academic support services facility. The university must not increase administrative support rates to pay debt service for this financing contract.

(4) Department of fish and wildlife: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,099,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase automated salmon marking trailers.

(5) Department of natural resources: Enter into a financing contract for up to $1,800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to remodel spaces within agency-owned commercial buildings that will benefit the common school trust.

(6) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the King county secure community transition center.

(7) Office of the secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $103,143,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the library-archives building. The financial contract is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2015 (library-archives building). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,450,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a replacement for the fire training academy burn building.

(9) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin Community College for up to $27,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student recreation center.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College Puyallup for up to $2,831,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and construct parking.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student activity center on the Clarkston campus.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $6,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student recreation center.

(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College for up to $4,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Wells Hall replacement project.

(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Yakima Valley Community College for up to $22,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build additional instructional and lab classroom space.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase one or more properties adjacent to the campus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003. (1) To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, agencies must complete a predesign for state construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of $5,000,000, or $10,000,000 for higher education institutions. "Total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project.

(2) Appropriations for design may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign.

(3) The predesign must explore at least three project alternatives. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative should be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management.

(4) The office of financial management may make an exception to the predesign requirements in this section after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comment by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. Agencies administering construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of $5,000,000, or $10,000,000 for higher education institutions, must submit progress reports to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. "Total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st of each year in a format determined by the office of financial management. After the project is completed, agencies must also submit a closeout report that identifies the total project cost and any unspent appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.

(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.

(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. (1) Any building project that receives over $10,000,000 in funding from the capital budget must be built to sustainable standards. "Sustainable building" means a building that integrates and optimizes all major high-performance building attributes, including energy efficiency, durability, life-cycle performance, and occupant productivity. The following design and construction attributes must be integrated into the building project:

(a) Employ integrated design principles: Use a collaborative, integrated planning and design process that initiates and maintains an integrated project team in all stages of a project's planning and delivery. Establish performance goals for siting, energy, water, materials, and indoor environmental quality along with other comprehensive design goals and ensures incorporation of these goals throughout the design and life-cycle of the building. Consider all stages of the building's life-cycle, including deconstruction.

(b) Commissioning: Employ commissioning practices tailored to the size and complexity of the building and its system components in order to verify performance of building components and systems and help ensure that design requirements are met. This should include an experienced commissioning provider, inclusion of commissioning requirements in construction documents, a commissioning plan, verification of the installation and performance of systems to be commissioned, and a commissioning report.

(c) Optimize energy performance: Establish a whole building performance target that takes into account the intended use, occupancy, operations, plug loads, other energy demands, and design to earn the ENERGY STAR targets for new construction and major renovation where applicable. For new construction target low energy use index. For major renovations, target reducing energy use by fifty percent below prerenovations baseline.

(d) On-site renewable energy: Meet at least thirty percent of the hot water demand through the installation of solar hot water heaters, when life-cycle cost effective. Implement renewable energy generation projects on agency property for agency use, when life-cycle cost effective.

(e) Measurement and verification: Where appropriate, install building level electricity meters in new major construction and renovation projects to track and continuously optimize performance. Include equivalent meters for natural gas and steam, where natural gas and steam are used. Where appropriate, install dashboards inside buildings to display and incentivize occupants on energy use.

(f) Benchmarking: Compare performance data from the first year of operation with the energy design target. Verify that the building performance meets or exceeds the design target. For other building and space types, use an equivalent benchmarking tool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010. Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE.(1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.200 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least eighty percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2019-2021 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia shall lapse. The commission may use up to $200,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7013. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7014. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.

(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7015. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter 3, Laws of 2018, (House Bill No. 1080, the general obligation bond bill) for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account to the state building construction account may be made.

Sec. 7016. RCW 28B.20.725 and 2018 c 2 s 7019 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7017. RCW 28B.30.750 and 2018 c 2 s 7020 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7018. (1) Minor works project lists are single line appropriations that include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000. Funds appropriated in this act for minor works may not be initially allotted until agencies submit project lists to the office of financial management for review and approval.

(2) Revisions to the project lists, including the addition of projects and the transfer of funds between projects, are allowed but must be submitted to the office of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee for review and comment, and must include an explanation of variances from prior lists. Any project list revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from the minor works appropriation.

(3)(a) All minor works projects should be completed within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided.

(b) Agencies are prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works projects.

(c) Minor works appropriations may not be used for the following: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works list; movable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; rolling stock; computers; or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized. The office of financial management may make an exception to the limitations described in this subsection (3)(c) for exigent circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

(d) Minor works preservation projects may include program improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual minor works preservation project cost.

(e) Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the minor works categories.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7019. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

(1) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer

to the water pollution control revolving account, up to

$6,000,000 for fiscal year 2020 and up to $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$12,000,000

(2) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer

to the drinking water assistance account, up to

$5,500,000 for fiscal year 2020 and up to $5,500,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7020. To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7021. The department of enterprise services, in consultation with the office of financial management, is granted the authority to sell the property known as the Tacoma Rhodes complex for no less than fair market value. The price must cover appraisal costs, all debt service, all closing costs, and the cost of outstanding liabilities necessary to keep the department whole. The property consists of the broadway building, market building, and parking garage. The terms and conditions of the sale must meet the business needs of the state tenants.

Sec. 7022. RCW 43.88D.010 and 2018 c 298 s 7013 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By October 1st of each even-numbered year, the office of financial management shall complete an objective analysis and scoring of all capital budget projects proposed by the public four-year institutions of higher education and submit the results of the scoring process to the legislative fiscal committees and the four-year institutions. Each project must be reviewed and scored within one of the following categories, according to the project's principal purpose. Each project may be scored in only one category. The categories are:

(a) Access-related projects to accommodate enrollment growth at all campuses, at existing or new university centers, or through distance learning. Growth projects should provide significant additional student capacity. Proposed projects must demonstrate that they are based on solid enrollment demand projections, more cost-effectively provide enrollment access than alternatives such as university centers and distance learning, and make cost-effective use of existing and proposed new space;

(b) Projects that replace failing permanent buildings. Facilities that cannot be economically renovated are considered replacement projects. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being replaced and may include additions to improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support space;

(c) Projects that renovate facilities to restore building life and upgrade space to meet current program requirements. Renovation projects should represent a complete renovation of a total facility or an isolated wing of a facility. A reasonable renovation project should cost between sixty to eighty percent of current replacement value and restore the renovated area to at least twenty-five years of useful life. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being renovated and may include additions to improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support space;

(d) Major stand-alone campus infrastructure projects;

(e) Projects that promote economic growth and innovation through expanded research activity. The acquisition and installation of specialized equipment is authorized under this category; and

(f) Other project categories as determined by the office of financial management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.

(2) The office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall establish a scoring system and process for each four-year project category that is based on the framework used in the community and technical college system of prioritization. Staff from the state board for community and technical colleges and the four-year institutions shall provide technical assistance on the development of a scoring system and process.

(3) The office of financial management shall consult with the legislative fiscal committees in the scoring of four-year institution project proposals, and may also solicit participation by independent experts.

(a) For each four-year project category, the scoring system must, at a minimum, include an evaluation of enrollment trends, reasonableness of cost, the ability of the project to enhance specific strategic master plan goals, age and condition of the facility if applicable, and impact on space utilization.

(b) Each four-year project category may include projects at the predesign, design, or construction funding phase.

(c) To the extent possible, the objective analysis and scoring system of all capital budget projects shall occur within the context of any and all performance agreements between the office of financial management and the governing board of a public, four-year institution of higher education that aligns goals, priorities, desired outcomes, flexibility, institutional mission, accountability, and levels of resources.

(4) In evaluating and scoring four-year institution projects, the office of financial management shall take into consideration project schedules that result in realistic, balanced, and predictable expenditure patterns over the ensuing three biennia.

(5) The office of financial management shall distribute common definitions, the scoring system, and other information required for the project proposal and scoring process as part of its biennial budget instructions. The office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall develop common definitions that four-year institutions must use in developing their project proposals and lists under this section.

(6) In developing any scoring system for capital projects proposed by the four-year institutions, the office of financial management:

(a) Shall be provided with all required information by the four-year institutions as deemed necessary by the office of financial management;

(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate information provided to the office of financial management by the four-year institutions; and

(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the joint legislative audit and review committee concerning the condition of higher education facilities.

(7) By August 1st of each even-numbered year each public four-year higher education institution shall prepare and submit prioritized lists of the individual projects proposed by the institution for the ensuing six-year period in each category. The lists must be submitted to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees. The four-year institutions may aggregate minor works project proposals by primary purpose for ranking purposes. Proposed minor works projects must be prioritized within the aggregated proposal, and supporting documentation, including project descriptions and cost estimates, must be provided to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.

(8) For the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, by November 1, ((2018))2020, the office of financial management must score higher education capital project criteria with a rating scale that assesses how well a particular project satisfies those criteria. The office of financial management may not use a rating scale that weighs the importance of those criteria.

(9) For the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section and in lieu of the requirements of subsection (7) of this section, by August 15, ((2018))2020, the institutions of higher education shall prepare and submit or resubmit to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees:

(a) Individual project proposals developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Individual project proposals scored in prior biennia pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and

(c) A prioritized list of up to five project proposals submitted pursuant to (a) and (b) of this subsection.

Sec. 7023. RCW 28B.77.070 and 2018 c 298 s 7014 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The council shall identify budget priorities and levels of funding for higher education, including the two and four-year institutions of higher education and state financial aid programs. It is the intent of the legislature for the council to make budget recommendations for allocations for major policy changes in accordance with priorities set forth in the ten-year plan, but the legislature does not intend for the council to review and make recommendations on individual institutional budgets. It is the intent of the legislature that recommendations from the council prioritize funding needs for the overall system of higher education in accordance with priorities set forth in the ten-year plan. It is also the intent of the legislature that the council's recommendations take into consideration the total per-student funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.

(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the council shall outline the council's fiscal priorities under the ten-year plan that it must distribute to the institutions, the state board for community and technical colleges, the office of financial management, and the joint higher education committee.

(a) Capital budget outlines for the two-year institutions shall be submitted to the office of financial management by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and shall include the prioritized ranking of the capital projects being requested, a description of each capital project, and the amount and fund source being requested.

(b) Capital budget outlines for the four-year institutions must be submitted to the office of financial management by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and must include: The institutions' priority ranking of the project; the capital budget category within which the project will be submitted to the office of financial management in accordance with RCW 43.88D.010; a description of each capital project; and the amount and fund source being requested.

(c) The office of financial management shall reference these reporting requirements in its budget instructions.

(3) The council shall submit recommendations on the operating budget priorities to support the ten-year plan to the office of financial management by October 1st each year, and to the legislature by January 1st each year.

(4)(a) The office of financial management shall develop one prioritized list of capital projects for the legislature to consider that includes all of the projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education that were scored by the office of financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW, including projects that were previously scored but not funded. The prioritized list of capital projects shall be based on the following priorities in the following order:

(i) Office of financial management scores pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW;

(ii) Preserving assets;

(iii) Degree production; and

(iv) Maximizing efficient use of instructional space.

(b) The office of financial management shall include all of the capital projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education, except for the minor works projects, in the prioritized list of capital projects provided to the legislature.

(c) The form of the prioritized list for capital projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education shall be provided as one list, ranked in priority order with the highest priority project ranked number "1" through the lowest priority project numbered last. The ranking for the prioritized list of capital projects may not:

(i) Include subpriorities;

(ii) Be organized by category;

(iii) Assume any state bond or building account biennial funding level to prioritize the list; or

(iv) Assume any specific share of projects by institution in the priority list.

(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges shall submit any supplemental capital budget requests and revisions to the office of financial management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st.

(6) For the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the office of financial management may, but is not obligated to, develop one prioritized list of capital projects for the legislature to consider that includes all of the projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education that were scored by the office of financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW, including projects that were previously scored but not funded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7024. (1) The department of natural resources must conduct an asset valuation of state lands and state forestlands held in trust and managed by the department. The analysis required in subsections (3) and (4) of this section may be provided through contracted services.

(2) The department must describe all trust lands, by trust, including timber lands, agricultural lands, commercial lands, and other lands, and identify revenues from leases or other sources for those lands. The department must briefly describe the income from these trust lands, and potential enhancements to income, including intergenerational income, from the asset bases of these trusts.

(3) The analysis must estimate the current fair market value of these lands for each trust beneficiary, including the separate beneficiaries of state lands as defined in RCW 79.02.010, and the beneficiaries of state forestlands as specified in chapter 79.22 RCW. The estimation of current fair market values must specify the values by the various asset classes including, but not limited to, the following asset classes: Timber lands; irrigated agriculture; dryland agriculture, including grazing lands; commercial real estate; mining; and other income production. The analysis must also estimate the value of ecosystem services and recreation benefits for asset classes that produce these benefits. The legislature encourages the department and its contractors to develop methods and tools to allow tracking of the estimated fair market values over time.

(4) For each of the different asset classes and for each of the various trusts, the analysis must calculate the average annual gross and net income as a percentage of estimated current asset value.

(5) The department must provide a progress report to the legislature by December 1, 2019, which may include any initial recommendations. The final report must be submitted by June 30, 2020, and must include options to:

(a) Improve the net rates of return on different classes of assets;

(b) Increase the reliability of, and enhance if possible, revenue for trust beneficiaries; and

(c) Present and explain factors that either (i) define, (ii) constrict, or (iii) define and constrict the department's management practices and revenue production. The factors to be considered include, but are not limited to, statutory, constitutional, operational, and social factors.

Sec. 7025. RCW 43.155.050 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 5 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 974 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving account [fund] and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Not more than twenty percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. During the ((2015-2017))2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account [fund], and the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the ((2015-2017 and)) 2017-2019 fiscal ((biennia))biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, the department of health drinking water system repairs and consolidation program, and the voluntary stewardship program. ((During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the state general fund such amounts as specified by the legislature.)) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

Sec. 7026. 2018 c 298 s 1016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) $2,209,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project, including the purchase of twenty acres of land by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights for development of affordable housing and the purchase of mobile home parks by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights in order to reduce the use of the accident potential zone for residential purposes. There shall be no limitations on the sequence of the purchase of mobile home parks. If Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights subsequently rezones, develops, and leases the mobile home park property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the accident potential zone, Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of mobile home parks in its entirety within ten years. Mobile home parks purchased under the provisions of this subsection may be sold by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights, provided that the uses of the mobile home park property are not contrary to the allowed uses in the accident potential zone. Any moneys from this sale must be used to purchase other mobile home parks in the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project. The twenty acres of land purchased under this subsection for development as affordable housing may be sold, in whole or in part, by the recipient, provided the property sold is used for affordable housing as required in the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project. Recipients of funds provided under this subsection are not required to demonstrate that the project site is under their control for a minimum of ten years but they must demonstrate that the project site is under their control through ownership or long-term lease. Projects funded under this subsection are not required to meet the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125(6) and subsection (5) of this section.

(8) $850,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the White River restoration project. Design solutions for flooding reductions in the lower White River must include a floodplain habitat design that both reduces flood risks and restores salmon habitat by reconnecting the river with its floodplain and a sustainable riparian corridor. Project designs and plans must also identify lands for acquisition needed for floodplain reconnection where pending or existing development eliminates the potential for riparian and aquatic habitat restoration. The city shall work cooperatively with the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe and the Puyallup Tribe of Indians, and develop a plan collaboratively to achieve both flood reduction and habitat restoration.

(9) Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section for the veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter project may be spent on preconstruction or preacquisition activities, including, but not limited to, building inspections, design of necessary renovations, cost estimation, and other activities necessary to identify and select a facility appropriate for the program. The remainder of the appropriation must be used for eventual acquisition and renovations of a facility.

(10) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the mercy housing and health care center at Sand Point. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the center may not house any community health care training organization that has been investigated by and has paid settlement fees to the attorney general's office for alleged medicaid fraud.

(11) The Lake Chelan land use plan must be developed without adverse impacts on agricultural operations.

(12) $1,300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for phase one of the main street revitalization project in the city of Mountlake Terrace.

(13) $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the city of Stanwood to acquire property for a new city hall/public safety facility.

(14) Up to 30 percent of the funding for the Kennewick boys and girls club may be used for land acquisition.

(15) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects

Amounts

Algona senior center

$500,000

All-accessible destination playground

$750,000

Appleway trail

$1,000,000

Basin 3 sewer rehabilitation

$1,500,000

Bellevue downtown park inspiration playground and sensory garden

$1,000,000

Bender fields parking lot and restrooms

$1,000,000

Blackhills community soccer complex safety projects

$750,000

Bremerton children's dental clinic

$396,000

Brewster reservoir replacement

$1,250,000

Brookville gardens

$1,200,000

Camas-Washougal Babe Ruth youth baseball improve Louis Bloch park

$10,000

Cancer immunotherapy facility-Seattle children's research inst.

$7,000,000

Caribou trail apartments

$100,000

Carnegie library imprv for the rapid recidivism reduction program

$1,000,000

Cavelero park - regional park facility/skateboard park

$500,000

CDM caregiving services: Clark county aging resource center

$1,200,000

Centerville school heating upgrades

$46,000

Chambers Creek regional park pier extension and moorage

$1,750,000

City of LaCenter parks & rec community center

$1,500,000

City of Lynden pipeline

$2,000,000

City of Lynden-Riverview road construction

$850,000

City of Lynden-safe routes to school and Kaemingk trail gap elim.

$300,000

City of Mt. Vernon downtown flood protect project & riverfront trail

$1,500,000

City of Olympia - Percival Landing renovation

$950,000

City of Pateros water system

$1,838,000

City of Stanwood City hall/public safety facility property acquisition

$300,000

Classroom door barricade - nightlock

$45,000

Confluence area parks upgrade and restoration

$1,000,000

Corbin senior center elevator

$300,000

Covington community park

$5,000,000

Cross Kirkland corridor trail connection 52nd St.

$1,069,000

Dawson place child advocacy center building completion project

$161,000

Dekalb street pier

$500,000

DNR/City of Castle Rock exchange

$80,000

Dr. Sun Yat Sen memorial statue

$10,000

Drug abuse and prevention center - Castle Rock

$96,000

DuPont historical museum renovation

$46,000

East Tacoma community center

$1,000,000

Edmonds center for the arts: Gym climate control & roof repairs

$250,000

Edmonds senior & community center

$1,250,000

Emergency generator for kidney resource center

$226,000

Enumclaw expo center

$350,000

Fairchild air force base protection & comm empowerment project

$2,209,000

Federal Way PAC center

$2,000,000

Filipino community of Seattle village (innovative learning center)

$1,200,000

Franklin Pierce early learning center

$2,000,000

Gateway center project

$1,000,000

Gilda club repairs

$800,000

Granite Falls boys & girls club

$1,000,000

Gratzer park ball fields

$200,000

Grays Harbor navigation improvement project

$2,500,000

Green river gorge open space buffer, Kummer connection

$750,000

Guy Cole center revitalization

$450,000

Historic renovation Maryhill museum

$1,000,000

Hopelink at Ronald commons

$750,000

Irvine slough storm water separation

$500,000

Kahlotus highway sewer force main

$2,625,000

Kennewick boys and girls club

$500,000

Kent east hill YMCA

$500,000

Key Pen civics center

$50,000

KiBe high school parking

$125,000

Kitsap humane society - shelter renovation

$90,000

Lacey boys & girls club

$29,000

Lake Chelan land use plan

$75,000

LeMay car museum ADA access improvements

$500,000

Lyman city park renovation

$167,000

Lyon creek flood reduction project

$400,000

Marine terminal rail investments

$1,000,000

Martin Luther King Jr. family outreach center expansion project

$85,000

Mason county Belfair wastewater system rate relief

$1,500,000

McAllister museum

$660,000

Mercer arena energy savings & sustainability funding

$450,000

Mercy housing and health center at Sand Point

$2,500,000

Meridian center for health

$2,500,000

Minor Road water reservoir replacement

$1,500,000

Mountains to Sound Greenway Tiger Mountain access improvements

$300,000

Mountlake Terrace Main street revitalization project

$1,300,000

Mt. Spokane guest services building & preservation/maintenance of existing facilities

$520,000

Boys & girls club of Snohomish county (Brewster, Sultan, Granite Falls, Arlington, and Mukilteo)

$1,000,000

Mukilteo tank farm clean-up

$250,000

New Shoreline medical-dental clinic

$1,500,000

Nordic heritage museum

$2,000,000

North Kitsap fishline foodbank

$625,000

Northwest native canoe center project

$250,000

Oak Harbor clean water facility

$2,500,000

Okanogan emergency communications

$400,000

Onalaska community tennis and sports courts

$80,000

Opera house ADA elevator

$357,000

Orcas Island library expansion

$1,400,000

Pacific community center

$250,000

PCAF's building for the future

$350,000

Pe Ell second street

$197,000

Perry technical school

$1,000,000

Pike Place Market front project

$800,000

Police station security/hardening

$38,000

Port of Centralia - Centralia station

$500,000

Port of Sunnyside demolish the carnation building

$450,000

PROVAIL TBI residential facility

$450,000

Quincy water reuse

$1,500,000

Redmond downtown park

$3,000,000

Redondo boardwalk repairs

$1,500,000

Renovate senior center

$400,000

Rochester boys & girls club

$38,000

Rockford wastewater treatment

$1,200,000

Roslyn renaissance-NW improve company bldg renovation project

$900,000

Sammamish rowing association boathouse

$500,000

SE 240th St. watermain system improvement project

$700,000

SE Seattle financial & economic opportunity center

$1,500,000

((SeaTac international marketplace & transit-oriented community

$1,250,000))

Seattle theatre group

$131,000

Snohomish veterans memorial rebuild

$10,000

Snoqualmie riverfront project

$1,520,000

South 228th street inter-urban trail connector

$500,000

Splash pad/foundation: Centralia outdoor pool restoration project

$200,000

Spokane women's club

$300,000

Springbrook park neighborhood connection project

$300,000

SR 532 flood berm and bike/ped path

$85,000

St. Vincent food bank & community services construction project

$400,000

Stan & Joan cross park

$750,000

Steilacoom Sentinel Way repairs

$450,000

Stilly Valley youth project Arlington B&G club

$2,242,000

Sunset neighborhood park

$1,750,000

Support, advocacy & resource center for victims of violence

$750,000

The gathering house job training café

$14,000

The Salvation Army Clark County: Corps community center

$1,200,000

Thurston county food bank

$500,000

Tulalip water pipeline, (final of 8 segments)

$2,000,000

Twin Bridges museum rehab Lyle Wa

$64,000

Twisp civic building

$500,000

Vancouver, Columbia waterfront project

$2,500,000

Vantage point senior apartments

$2,000,000

Veterans center

$500,000

Veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter

$600,000

Waitsburg Main Street bridge replacement

$1,700,000

Washington green schools

$105,000

Washougal roof repair

$350,000

Water meter and system improvement program

$500,000

Water reservoir and transmission main

$500,000

Wayne golf course land preservation

$500,000

White River restoration project

$850,000

Willapa behavioral health safety improvement project

$75,000

WSU LID frontage - local and economic benefits

$500,000

Yakima children's museum center

$50,000

Yakima SunDome

$2,000,000

Yelm community center

$500,000

Yelm senior center

$80,000

Youth wellness campus gymnasium renovation

$1,000,000

Total

$130,169,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$130,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7027. PROPERTY TRANSFER SEATTLE CENTRAL.If House Bill No. 1918 (community preservation auth.) is enacted by June 30, 2019, the Seattle Central College must transfer the deed of the property located at 2120 South Jackson Street, Seattle, Washington 98144, to the community preservation and development authority established in the bill. The transfer must be made by no later than June 30, 2021, once the community preservation and development authority has selected board members. The transfer must be at no cost to the community preservation and development authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7028. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7029. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---