BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of hunter safety, the commission must adopt rules determining the times and manner when a person hunting must wear either fluorescent orange or fluorescent pink clothing or both. The rules must allow a person hunting to wear either fluorescent orange or fluorescent pink clothing, or both, in order to meet a visible clothing requirement when hunting.

(2) A violation of this section is an infraction punishable under RCW 77.15.160.

--- END ---