BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101.

FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$39,221,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$41,064,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,266,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$84,551,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102.

FOR THE SENATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$26,543,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$28,889,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,932,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$58,364,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103.

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$185,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$149,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,557,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104.

FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,270,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105.

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$11,927,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$11,830,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$822,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$24,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106.

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$295,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$295,000

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$412,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,318,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,348,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107.

FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$4,904,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$5,258,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$566,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,728,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108.

FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$4,131,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$4,463,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$436,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$9,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109.

LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES

In order to achieve operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, joint transportation committee, office of the state actuary, joint legislative systems committee, statute law committee, and office of legislative support services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110.

FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$8,767,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$8,832,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$674,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$18,273,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111.

FOR THE LAW LIBRARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,746,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,736,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$128,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112.

FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,404,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,423,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$130,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,957,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113.

FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$19,222,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$19,338,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,492,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$40,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114.

FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$65,475,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$67,604,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,185,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$681,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,692,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,572,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$55,995,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$203,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115.

FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$54,740,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$54,668,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,781,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$278,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$113,467,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116.

FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$21,840,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$25,423,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,464,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$44,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$48,771,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

(2)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a statewide kinship care assistance support and training coordinator. The coordinator may be hosted at the office of civil legal aid or through a contract with an appropriate nonprofit legal aid provider.

(b) The office of civil legal aid must create a kinship care legal assistance advisory committee to define the scope of activities to be carried out by the coordinator, including, but not limited to, developing training and technical, support and assisting volunteer attorneys and attorneys providing below-market rate legal services to kinship care providers.

(3) $2,275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,461,200 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office to continue implementation of the civil justice reinvestment plan.

(4) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to begin closing compensation differentials between volunteer legal aid programs and the northwest justice project.

(5) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $67,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to extend the children's representation study authorized in section 28, chapter 20, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess., and the report of initial findings to the legislature required by section 28(2)(c), chapter 20, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. shall be submitted by December 31, 2020.

(6) $37,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to pay for the final report from the children's representation study authorized in section 28, chapter 20, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117.

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$9,782,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$9,936,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$674,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$24,392,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118.

FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,096,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,119,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$90,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,359,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119.

FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$5,389,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$5,503,000

Public Disclosure Transparency Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$260,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$11,212,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120.

FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$33,943,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$18,357,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,100,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,357,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$900,000

Washington State Heritage Center Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,507,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,931,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$960,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,887,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$97,942,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,801,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $3,682,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,011,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of statewide significance during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) $13,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of presidential primary election costs.

(5) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations to expand programming in underserved areas of the state.

(6) $2,296,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to reimburse counties for the cost of return postage on mail and absentee ballots for all elections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121.

FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$355,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$353,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$736,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122.

FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$329,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$341,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$696,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,086,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$20,086,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124.

FOR THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125.

FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$28,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$32,000

State Auditing Services Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,678,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,681,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$14,419,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,585,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state-funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126.

FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$235,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$243,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127.

FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$16,200,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$16,369,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,153,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,650,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,696,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,636,000

Child Rescue Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$286,635,000

Local Government Archives Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$372,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,602,000

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$273,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$349,086,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128.

FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,951,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,138,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$168,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,257,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (Washington college promise).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$131,759,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$130,071,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$327,857,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,936,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,210,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$251,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,291,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$47,353,000

Energy Freedom Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,096,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation

and Prosecution Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,975,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural Rehabilitation

Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,398,000

Statewide Tourism Marketing Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,023,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,198,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,616,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,918,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,935,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$902,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$698,836,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.

(2) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(3) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(4) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(5) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(6) $2,801,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,801,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2019-2021 biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086.

(7) $5,907,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(8) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(9) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(10) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.

(11) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the regulatory roadmap program for the construction industry and to identify and coordinate with businesses in key industry sectors to develop additional regulatory roadmap tools.

(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.

(13) $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.

(14) $1,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation, $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation, and $1,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.

(15) $2,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely to administer the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.

(16) $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for community beds for individuals with a history of mental illness. Currently, there is little to no housing specific to populations with these co-occurring disorders; therefore, the department must consider how best to develop new bed capacity in combination with individualized support services, such as intensive case management and care coordination, clinical supervision, mental health, substance abuse treatment, and vocational and employment services. Case-management and care coordination services must be provided. Increased case-managed housing will help to reduce the use of jails and emergency services and will help to reduce admissions to the state psychiatric hospitals. The department must coordinate with the health care authority and the department of social and health services in establishing conditions for the awarding of these funds. The department must contract with local entities to provide a mix of (a) shared permanent supportive housing; (b) independent permanent supportive housing; and (c) low and no-barrier housing beds for people with a criminal history, substance abuse disorder, and/or mental illness.

Priority for permanent supportive housing must be given to individuals on the discharge list at the state psychiatric hospitals or in community psychiatric inpatient beds whose conditions present significant barriers to timely discharge.

(17) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.

(18) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.

(19) $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the small business export assistance program. The department must ensure that at least one employee is located outside the city of Seattle for purposes of assisting rural businesses with export strategies.

(20) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.

(21) $1,350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide either legal representation or referral services for legal representation, or both, to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(22) $42,910,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $42,910,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $24,734,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $19,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $19,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for assistance to unsheltered homeless families with children.

(b) $17,160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $17,160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for rent assistance to chronically homeless individuals who are eligible for enrollment in the medicaid foundational community supports program. The department must coordinate with the health care authority and the department of social and health services in establishing the conditions for the awarding of funds. The department must contract with local entities that provide permanent supportive housing. Priority for permanent supportive housing must be given to individuals on the discharge list from state psychiatric hospitals or in community psychiatric inpatient beds whose conditions present significant barriers to timely discharge.

(23)(a) $4,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $4,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $2,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:

(i) Expand outreach, services, and housing for homeless youth and young adults, so that resources are equitably distributed across the state;

(ii) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and

(iii) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and enable providers to have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to build infrastructure and services to support a continuum of interventions including but not limited to prevention, crisis response, and long-term housing in reducing youth homelessness in four identified communities as part of the anchor community initiative.

(24) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington State University energy program for work that supports the state efficiency and environmental performance program. Currently, major greenhouse gas-emitting state cabinet agencies are required, under executive order 18-01, to reduce energy use in state-owned facilities and to develop a portfolio of cost-effective investments in greenhouse gas reductions. The Washington State University energy program will work under the guidance of the state efficiency and environmental performance program director to provide assistance to state cabinet agencies in compiling information from various data and information sources. Data will be used to assist cabinet agencies in developing a portfolio of cost-effective projects that increase energy efficiency, contribute to greenhouse gas reductions, and result in supporting agency facility preservation or improvement goals. Resulting data may be housed in the facilities portfolio management tool system and be used to generate reports on project-level opportunities to achieve energy and greenhouse gas savings, synthesize cross-agency data, generate capital project priorities, provide data analysis and reporting capabilities, and track implementation of the executive order across agencies.

(25) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the state energy office to develop and present to the state building code council a model energy code that enhances energy efficiency and on-site renewable production in buildings and achieves the seventy percent reduction in annual net energy consumption from the baseline specified in RCW 19.27A.160. In developing a model energy code, the department must research schematic development of model building designs, detailed energy analysis, cost studies, and life cycle cost assessments for both residential and commercial buildings. The department may contract with a consultant or consultants to complete this work. The department must publish by September 30, 2021, a model 2031 energy code and supporting documentation.

(26)(a) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to maintain local government drug and gang task forces. The task forces shall be multi-jurisdictional law enforcement collaborations utilizing resources from the cooperating agencies. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the purpose of appointing law enforcement officers in the drug and gang task forces whose primary function is to focus on the violent street gang operations. One of the duties of this position is to enter data into the state criminal street gang database, as defined under RCW 43.43.762, after verifying the criteria for entry into the database.

(b) The task forces will focus law enforcement efforts on disruption of major drug trafficking operations, violent crime including gang activity, and other related criminal activities. The task force investigations of illegal drug enforcement operations shall focus on major criminal trafficking operations, including organized crime, rather than small scale or low level drug offenses.

(27) $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Aerospace; (b) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy; (c) wood products and other natural resource industries; (d) information and communication technology; (e) life sciences and global health; (f) maritime; and (g) military and defense. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.

(28) $1,237,000 of the liquor excise tax account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide fiscal note assistance to local governments, including increasing staff expertise in multiple subject matter areas, including but not limited to criminal justice, taxes, election impacts, transportation and land use, and providing training and staff preparation prior to legislative session.

(29) The department must develop a model ordinance for cities and counties to utilize for siting community based behavioral health facilities.

(30) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to retain a behavioral health facilities siting administrator within the department to coordinate development of effective behavioral health housing options and provide technical assistance in siting of behavioral health treatment facilities statewide to aide in the governor's plan to discharge individuals from the state psychiatric hospitals into community settings. This position must work closely with the local government legislative authorities, planning departments, behavioral health providers, health care authority, department of social and health services, and other entities to facilitate linkages among disparate behavioral health community bed capacity-building efforts. This position must work to integrate building behavioral health treatment and infrastructure capacity in addition to ongoing supportive housing benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130.

FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$858,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$888,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,898,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$23,866,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$19,598,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,514,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$526,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$330,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,900,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Statewide Information Technology System Development

Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$32,703,000

Office of Financial Management Central Service Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$21,550,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,446,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$678,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$146,608,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education eligible to participate in the state need grant shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of the state need grant program are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of state need grant recipients;

(ii) The number of students on the unserved waiting list of the state need grant;

(iii) Persistence and completion rates of state need grant recipients and students on the state need grant unserved waiting list, disaggregated by institutions of higher education;

(iv) State need grant recipients and students on state need grant unserved waiting list grade point averages; and

(v) State need grant program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for the state need grant program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

(2) $29,344,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for readiness activities related to the one Washington replacement project to modernize and improve administrative systems and related business processes across state government. This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act. The funding provided in this subsection is to contract for continued readiness, planning, and procurement activities related to this project. The office of financial management will provide the needed management support for this effort and will ensure that state agencies fully participate in these readiness efforts, including the office of chief information officer. The office of financial management will provide quarterly reports to the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

(3) $3,136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of financial management for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning). Within this amount, $1,584,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $1,569,500 in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the education research and data center for data collection, process improvements, and creation of a secure data enclave.

(4) Within existing resources, the labor relations section shall produce a report annually on workforce data and trends for the previous fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include a workforce profile; information on employee compensation, including salaries and cost of overtime; and information on retention, including average length of service and workforce turnover.

(5) $4,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided to the office of financial management for staffing and support to prepare for the 2020 census.

(6) $911,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $906,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to support the operations of the statewide all-payer health care claims database established in chapter 43.371 RCW. If the responsibility to establish and maintain the statewide all-payer health care claims database is transferred from the office of financial management to the health care authority or other state agency, then the funding in this subsection shall lapse and this funding shall be included in the responsible agency's budget.

(7) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the office of financial management to contract with a consultant to evaluate the Washington state patrol crime and toxicology labs. The purpose of the study is to review the systems for testing toxicology cases and DNA cases, including tandem repeat, sexual assault kits—2 and sexual assault kits—3 cases. The study of the crime lab and toxicology lab must include, but is not limited to, analyses and recommendations regarding the following:

(a) Processes, procedures and systems for receiving, processing, prioritizing, testing, and reviewing DNA cases with a focus on reducing the overall wait time and backlogs for all sexual assault kit testing. This analysis should include a review of other state processes and procedures for testing of sexual assault kits. The analysis should also include recommendations on how to maximize efficiency and effectiveness of the high throughput lab if implemented in the crime lab;

(b) Resources, equipment, and facilities to improve receiving, processing and testing procedures on all sexual kits. This review should include an analysis of the current locations of the facilities and hiring and retention issues if feasible within the scope of the study;

(c) Training procedures and policies for new employees to reduce wait times and backlog of cases; and

(d) Processes, procedures, and systems for receiving, processing, prioritizing, testing, and reviewing toxicology cases with a focus on reducing the overall wait time.

The study must be provided to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by September 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132.

FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$45,212,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$45,212,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133.

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$29,879,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$29,879,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of gaming system capabilities that violate state law.

(2) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040, the commission shall take such action necessary to reduce retail commissions to an average of 5.1 percent of sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134.

FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$411,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$422,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$859,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135.

FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$348,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$330,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—OPERATIONS

Department of Retirement Systems Expense

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$68,906,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$68,906,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$149,786,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$149,857,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,349,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$18,322,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$168,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,486,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$344,087,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138.

FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,487,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,515,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$162,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,164,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139.

FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$440,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$440,000

Minority and Women's Business Enterprises

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,388,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,268,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140.

FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,661,000

Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$69,057,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$73,718,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $599,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the enterprise content management project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141.

FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board Expense Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$63,852,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$63,852,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142.

FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$356,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$391,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,039,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$24,245,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$83,480,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$111,666,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The liquor and cannabis board may require electronic payment of the marijuana excise tax levied by RCW 69.50.535. The liquor and cannabis board may allow a waiver to the electronic payment requirement for good cause as provided by rule.

(2) The traceability system is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(3) $5,568,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,109,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the modernization of regulatory systems and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143.

FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$16,650,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$40,638,000

Pipeline Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,529,000

Pipeline Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,204,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$64,021,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to $800,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation in this section is for the utilities and transportation commission to supplement funds committed by a telecommunications company to expand rural broadband service on behalf of an eligible governmental entity. The amount in this subsection represents payments collected by the utilities and transportation commission pursuant to the Qwest performance assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144.

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$12,632,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$12,977,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$118,210,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$53,625,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,514,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$29,630,000

Military Department Rent and Lease Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$615,000

Military Department Active State Service Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,851,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,244,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$247,698,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees on February 1st and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2019-2021 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $40,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.

(3) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.

(4) $11,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.

(5) $2,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for one-time grants to Skagit, Cowlitz, Island, and Whatcom counties for replacing and upgrading the equipment necessary to maintain 911 service after the state's transition to a next generation 911 system. Grants may also be used to reimburse costs incurred in prior biennia for replacing and upgrading equipment for 911 services.

(6) $784,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.

(7) $9,975,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely to the enhanced 911/next generation project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(8) $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to support a new system of compensation based on a schedule approved by the director of the military department for national guard service members with firefighter certifications working on wildfires and set the minimum wage paid that can be paid to a national guard service member for state active duty to equal state minimum wage.

(9) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to collaborate with schools and school districts in the development, planning, and exercise of emergency management and catastrophic preparedness plans in schools. Initial work shall be prioritized based on the risk level of known natural and other hazards.

(10) $464,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $464,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the procurement and installation of tsunami sirens for coastal cities at risk.

(11) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the procurement and installation of seismic monitoring stations and global navigation satellite system stations that integrate with the early earthquake warning system known as ShakeAlert. The military department shall collaborate with the University of Washington for placement and location of such equipment.

(12) All staff, office equipment, technological assets, and associated funding dedicated for OneNet shall transfer from the consolidated technology services agency to the military department effective July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145.

FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,157,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,211,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,287,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,408,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$228,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,291,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146.

FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,313,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147.

FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified Public Accountants' Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,527,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,527,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,372,000 of the certified public accountants' account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $370,000 of the certified public accountants' account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the certified public accountant licensing system modernization and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148.

FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$692,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$692,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.

(2) $210,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$4,579,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$4,481,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,519,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,681,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,028,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,048,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges to include campus rent, utilities, parking, and contracts, public and historic facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, legislative support services, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.

(2) In accordance with RCW 46.08.172 and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase parking fees in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 as necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business.

(3) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written approval from the director of the department of enterprise services. Agencies that are exempted from the requirement are the Washington state patrol, Washington state department of transportation, and the department of natural resources.

(4) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2021.

(5) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the agency to procure cyber incident insurance on behalf of forty-three small to medium sized agencies that are currently without this coverage.

(6) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department of enterprise services, in collaboration with the office of financial management, to conduct a study defining the cost of relocating the department headquarters at its current size to a new office space lease in Thurston county. The study shall define all one-time and ongoing cost, propose backfill options for available vacancies at the 1500 Jefferson building and enumerate any potential cost saving to the state. The study shall be provided to the office of financial management by December 31, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,002,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,044,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,152,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$136,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,348,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151.

FOR THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$10,363,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$5,634,000

Consolidated Technology Services Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$24,461,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$40,458,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,978,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is for the office of the chief information officer.

(2) $12,733,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is for the office of cyber security.

(3) The consolidated technology services agency shall work with customer agencies using the Washington state electronic records vault (WASERV) to identify opportunities to:

(a) Reduce storage volumes and costs associated with vault records stored beyond the agencies' record retention schedules; and

(b) Assess a customized service charge as defined in chapter 304, Laws of 2017 for costs of using WASERV to prepare data compilations in response to public records requests.

(4) In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures shall include the following: The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request; the estimated cost for the current biennium; the estimated total cost of the request over all biennia; and the expected timeline to complete the request. The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

(5) The consolidated technology services agency must not increase fees charged for existing services without prior approval by the office of financial management. The agency may develop fees to recover the actual cost of new infrastructure to support increased use of cloud technologies.

(6) Within existing resources, the agency must provide oversight of state procurement and contracting for information technology goods and services by the department of enterprise services.

(7) Within existing resources, the agency must host, administer, and support the state employee directory in an online format to provide public employee contact information.

(8) All staff, office equipment, technological assets, and associated funding dedicated for OneNet shall transfer from the consolidated technology services agency to the military department effective July 1, 2019.

(9) $750,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided to the office of the state chief information officer to develop an assessment of current statewide cloud readiness and develop a cloud migration strategy. At a minimum, the assessment will identify the common shared infrastructure needed to support widespread use of cloud environments, recommend standard cloud readiness criteria for use by state agencies, provide an inventory of skills and resources needed for migration to and operation within cloud environments, and identify common cloud migration and operation risks and mitigations. At a minimum, the cloud migration strategy will support the identification of migration priorities and targets. The assessment results and statewide migration strategy will be provided to the office of financial management and legislative technology committees by no later than October 31, 2019.

(10) $1,214,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely to the SecureAccess Washington project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(11) $1,224,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account-non-appropriated is provided solely to the logging and monitoring project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(12) $790,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account-non-appropriated is provided solely to the SecureAccess Washington project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(13) $3,054,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,054,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to pay a portion of office building rents for all state tenants located at the property which is located on the same grounds as the state data center.

(End of part)

PART II

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.

(7)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2020, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2020 among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2020 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care, developmental disabilities, and public assistance programs, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose.

(c) Within the mental health program, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose within and between subprograms as needed to fund actual expenditures through the end of fiscal year 2020.

(d) Within the developmental disabilities program, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose within and between subprograms as needed to fund actual expenditures through the end of fiscal year 2020.

(e) The department may not transfer appropriations, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(8) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to comprise the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction, cross-organizational project support, and federal funding guidance across the coalition organizations. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature to share the plan, status, funding needs, and next steps for the health and human services coalition projects. The coalition shall collaborate with the office of the chief information officer and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act unless otherwise agreed upon by the office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM—INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

(1) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$435,623,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$477,348,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$30,750,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$33,300,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$79,670,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,056,691,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b) $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b) are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community service officer at the city of Lakewood. The department must collect data from the city of Lakewood on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.

(c) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(d) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas. The city must submit a proposal to the department for a community policing program for eastern state hospital and adjacent areas by September 30, 2019. Beginning September 30, 2019, and annually thereafter, the city must provide current and historical data for police services to eastern state hospital and adjacent areas which justify funding for a community policing program and continued funding for base police services.

(e) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to track compliance with RCW 71.05.365 requirements for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within fourteen days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must use these funds to track the following elements related to this requirement: (i) The date on which an individual is determined to no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (ii) the date on which the behavioral health organizations and other organizations responsible for resource management services for the person is notified of this determination; and (iii) the date on which either the individual is transitioned to the community or has been re-evaluated and determined to again require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must provide this information in regular intervals to behavioral health organizations and other organizations responsible for resource management services. The department must summarize the information and provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress toward meeting the fourteen day standard by December 1, 2019 and December 1, 2020.

(f) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.

(i) The predictive modeling tool must be developed to leverage data from a variety of sources and identify factors that are strongly associated with future criminal justice involvement. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which describes the following: (A) The proposed data sources to be used in the predictive model and how privacy issues will be addressed; (B) modeling results including a description of measurable factors most strongly predictive of risk of future criminal justice involvement; (C) an assessment of the accuracy, timeliness, and potential effectiveness of the tool; (D) identification of interventions and strategies that can be effective in reducing future criminal justice involvement of high risk patients; and (E) the timeline for implementing processes to provide monthly lists of high-risk client to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health organizations.

(ii) The model for civil and forensic state hospital bed need must be developed in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for predicting the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. The department must continue to update the model on a calendar quarterly basis and provide updates to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature accordingly.

(g) $8,298,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $8,196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement which impact competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(2) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$324,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$6,563,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$6,291,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$13,178,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,364,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$4,024,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,619,406,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$743,421,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$828,133,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,201,348,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes shall be $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021. A processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities shall be $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities shall be $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(c) $7,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $16,092,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $29,989,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(d) $3,914,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $8,528,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $15,831,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(e) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(f) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.

(g) $3,626,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $4,757,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $10,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$122,675,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$124,399,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$242,212,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$27,041,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,396,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$527,723,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(c) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,574,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,662,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,089,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$270,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,595,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,092,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$62,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$62,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,345,223,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,496,641,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,533,484,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$37,687,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,540,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,392,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$133,360,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,563,327,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $217.88 for fiscal year 2020 and shall not exceed $246.81 for fiscal year 2021.

(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(2) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes shall be $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021. A processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities shall be $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities shall be $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(3) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(4) $15,748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $33,024,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $62,298,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(5) $2,879,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $5,995,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $11,297,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(6) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(7) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $900 for each facility.

(8) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department shall assist the legislature to continue the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues.

(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is continued, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, and four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;

(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;

(v) A member from disability rights Washington and a member from the office of long-term care ombuds;

(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and

(vii) Other agency directors or designees as necessary.

(b) The committee must make recommendations and continue to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington, including state budget and policy options, by conducting at least, but not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities to promote healthy living and palliative care planning;

(ii) Identify strategies and policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term service and supports that allow individuals and families to meet their needs for service;

(iii) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans;

(iv) Identify ways to promote advance planning and advance care directives and implementation strategies for the Bree collaborative palliative care and related guidelines;

(v) Identify ways to meet the needs of the aging demographic impacted by reduced federal support;

(vi) Identify ways to protect the rights of vulnerable adults through assisted decision-making and guardianship and other relevant vulnerable adult protections;

(vii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation;

(viii) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation; and

(ix) Identify ways to support individuals with developmental disabilities with long-term care needs who are enrolled members of a federally recognized Indian tribe, or residing in the household of an enrolled members of a federally recognized Indian tribe, and are receiving care from a family member.

(d) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.

(e) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(10)(a) No more than $41,388,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care described in initiative 2 of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures on this initiative.

(b) No more than $2,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the department and the health care authority shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its providers third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes.

(11) $10,017,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $13,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $29,104,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$365,563,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$372,776,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,462,602,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,416,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,754,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,004,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,235,115,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $78,414,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $75,951,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $814,144,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $5,662,000 of the pension funding stabilization account—state appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.

(b) The department shall submit quarterly expenditure reports to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force under RCW 74.08A.341. In addition to these requirements, the department must detail any new program expenditures and any funds shifted across budget units identified in subsection (a) of this section.

(c) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal temporary assistance for needy families. A portion of this grant must be used to fund child care subsidies expenditures at the department of children, youth, and families.

(d) $421,898,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020 and child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families. In order to not exceed the appropriated amount, the department shall manage the program so that the average monthly caseload does not exceed 33,000 households. The department shall work in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type including the child care development fund, general fund—state, and the temporary assistance for needy families grant for the purpose of estimating the monthly temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement.

(e) Beginning July 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, the department shall assist the department of children, youth, and families to report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(i) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;

(ii) The reason for each overpayment;

(iii) The total cost of overpayments;

(iv) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and

(v) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.

(f) Each calendar quarter, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:

(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;

(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;

(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;

(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;

(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort;

(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements; and

(vii) Proposed and enacted federal law changes affecting maintenance of effort or the participation rate, what impact these changes have on Washington's temporary assistance for needy families program, and the department's plan to comply with these changes.

(2) $2,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On January 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be one hundred percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(7) $4,468,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $4,862,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $19,391,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the continuation of the ESAR project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(8) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

(9) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.

(10) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to conduct a comprehensive study of the WorkFirst transportation pilot. The department must submit a report by November 1, 2020, to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees that includes a cost benefit analysis of the transportation pilot. At a minimum, the report must include the total annual cost of the pilot since implementation, total annual number of clients accessing transportation services through the pilot, impacts to sanction and the participation rate, employment outcomes, caseload impacts, department recommendations, and lessons learned.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$17,489,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$18,243,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$109,571,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,024,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$147,327,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department of social and health services vocational rehabilitation program shall participate in the development of an implementation plan to build statewide capacity among school districts to improve transition planning for students in special education who meet criteria for services from the developmental disabilities administration, pursuant to section 501(50) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$54,633,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$54,992,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,580,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$114,205,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$41,730,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$37,972,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$49,116,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,044,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$134,862,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2020, and February 1, 2021. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(2) $4,482,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $402,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,418,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the leave attendance scheduling project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(3) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $142,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$39,811,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$41,480,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$30,390,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$111,681,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210.

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.

Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

The appropriations to the health care authority in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. To the extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions, the authority, after May 1, 2020, may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2020 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The authority may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications and transfers.

The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to comprise the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction, cross-organizational project support, and federal funding guidance across the coalition organizations. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature to share the plan, status, funding needs, and next steps for the health and human services coalition projects. The coalition shall collaborate with the office of the chief information officer and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act unless otherwise agreed upon by the office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management.

(1) MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,337,665,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,485,780,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,202,331,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$282,536,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,086,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$721,718,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,130,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,400,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,544,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$538,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$18,106,728,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The authority shall not accept or expend any federal funds received under a medicaid transformation waiver under healthier Washington except as described in (b) and (c) of this subsection until specifically approved and appropriated by the legislature. To ensure compliance with legislative directive budget requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the innovation waiver requires better analytic capability, transparency, consistency, timeliness, accuracy, and lack of redundancy with other established measures and that the patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. In order to effectuate these goals, the authority shall: (i) Require the Dr. Robert Bree collaborative and the health technology assessment program to reduce the administrative burden upon providers by only requiring performance measures that are nonduplicative of other nationally established measures. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen by the collaborative and the health technology assessment program for effectiveness and appropriateness; (ii) develop a patient satisfaction survey with the goal to gather information about whether it was beneficial for the patient to use the center of excellence location in exchange for additional out-of-pocket savings; (iii) ensure patients and health care providers have significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver, in order to ensure improved patient health outcomes; and (iv) in cooperation with the department of social and health services, consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget, to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting waivers for federal approval. By federal standard, the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver shall not exceed the duration originally granted by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement.

(b) No more than $305,659,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than $157,284,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for transformation through accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the medicaid transformation demonstration wavier under healthier Washington, including preventing youth drug use, opioid prevention and treatment, and physical and behavioral health integration. Under this initiative, the authority shall take into account local input regarding community needs. In order to ensure transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. If by the third year of the demonstration waiver there are not measurable, improved patient outcomes and financial returns, the Washington state institute for public policy will conduct an audit of the accountable communities of health, in addition to the process set in place through the independent evaluation required by the agreement with centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(c) No more than $79,829,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third party administrator. The authority and the department in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative.

(d) Annually, no later than November 1st, the authority shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature: (i) Savings attributed to behavioral and physical integration in areas that are scheduled to integrate in the following calendar year, and (ii) savings attributed to behavioral and physical health integration and the level of savings achieved in areas that have integrated behavioral and physical health.

(e) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).

(f) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(g) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(h) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(i) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(j) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(k) $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $8,522,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(l) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(m) $6,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(n) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2020, and by November 1, 2021, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2020 and fiscal year 2021, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (i) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2017-2019 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (ii) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (iii) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. $2,558,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $46,008,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.

(o) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(p) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(q) The authority shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2020, and no later than September 15, 2021, that delineate the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The reports should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.

(r) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(s) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.

(t) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(u) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.

(v) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.

(w) The appropriations in this section reflect savings and efficiencies by transferring children receiving medical care provided through fee-for-service to medical care provided through managed care.

(x) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(y) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(z) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.

(aa) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated marijuana fund for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fund—state payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(bb) Beginning no later than January 1, 2018, for any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority.

(cc) Sufficient funds are provided for the authority to remove payment and billing limitations identified during the review process required for implementation of chapter 226, Laws of 2017 (behavioral health care – primary care integration) for health and behavior codes, psychotherapy codes, and to continue to offer face-to-face tobacco cessation counseling only for pregnant individuals.

(dd) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the consulting and contract management activities required to contract with an insurance carrier to offer at least one plan on the health benefit exchange in all counties in Washington state. By October 15, 2019, the authority shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature on the progress of the procurement, implementation plan, and options to address affordability.

(ee) $1,842,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,851,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $3,693,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the elimination of hepatitis C virus effort. The authority shall work with the department of health and other state agencies and hepatitis C virus medication purchasers to establish a comprehensive procurement strategy for the purchase of hepatitis C virus medications. The authority shall work with the department to identify the necessary financing for public health interventions to eliminate the hepatitis C virus. Any savings from decreased medication costs must first be spent to expand treatment to individuals currently in groups covered by state purchasers. Additional savings may be spent to further the elimination effort. By October 31, 2019, the authority and department shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature on the progress of the procurement, status of treatment, and plan to implement the elimination effort.

(ff) Sufficient funds are provided for chiropractic care for adults with spinal pain diagnoses effective January 1, 2020. By September 15, 2021, the authority shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature the cost of chiropractic care for adults with spinal pain diagnoses and avoided costs of other spinal pain treatments. The report must also include recommendations for other treatments for spinal pain, including cost and potential avoided cost associated with recommended treatments.

(gg) By October 15, 2019, the authority shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature the status of rural health clinic reconciliations for calendar years 2011-2013, including any use of available unliquidated prior period accrual balances to refund the federal government for those calendar years. Additionally, the report shall include the status of rural health clinic reconciliations for calendar years 2014-2017, including anticipated amounts owed to or from rural health clinics from the reconciliation process for those calendar years.

(hh) $269,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $797,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(2) PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS PROGRAM

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$37,085,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$37,085,000

The appropriation in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $150,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation is provided to the health care authority solely to contract for an independent assessment and evaluation of options for replacement of the pay 1 information technology system.

(i) The assessment must include, for each alternative, a cost analysis and an evaluation of the degree to which each option would fulfill the essential functions of replacement for the existing system for both the public employees' and school employees' benefits programs.

(ii) The assessment must include an outline for a modular approach to implement the recommended option.

(iii) The contract and assessment are subject to the oversight and approval of the office of the chief information officer.

(iv) The office of the chief information officer may charge a fee, not to exceed $50,000, for assistance provided to the health care authority for this purpose.

(v) The health care authority must report to the governor as soon as practical, but no later than September 1, 2019, the results of the assessment and the option or options recommended by the office of the chief information officer and the health care authority, including initial project cost estimates and timeline.

(b) Any savings resulting from reduced claims costs or other factors must be reserved for funding employee benefits. The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan resulting from rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys received as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits.

(c) Any changes to benefits must be approved by the public employees' benefits board. The board shall not make any changes to benefits without considering a comprehensive analysis of the cost of those changes, and shall not increase benefits unless savings achieved under (d) of this subsection (2) or offsetting cost reductions from other benefit revisions are sufficient to fund the changes. However, the funding provided anticipates that the public employees' benefits board may increase the availability of nutritional counseling in the uniform medical plan by allowing a lifetime limit of up to twelve nutritional counseling visits. The board may also, within the amounts provided, use cost savings to enhance the basic long-term disability benefit.

(d) Except as may be provided in a health care bargaining agreement, to provide benefits within the level of funding provided in part IX of this bill, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases increase in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.

(e) The board shall collect a surcharge payment of not less than twenty-five dollars per month from members who use tobacco products, and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(3) SCHOOL EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD

School Employees' Insurance Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$25,624,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$25,624,000

The appropriation in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $150,000 of the school employees' insurance administrative account—state appropriation is provided to the health care authority to contract for an independent assessment and evaluation of options for replacement of the pay 1 information technology system.

(b) Within the amounts appropriated, the health care authority shall continue to fund one full-time equivalent project manager for the school employees' insurance program at the office of financial management.

(4) HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$5,184,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$5,184,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$52,128,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$56,672,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$119,168,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.

(b)(i) By July 15th and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of one-half the general fund—state appropriation and one-half the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation to the exchange.

(ii) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.

(iii) Payments made from general fund—state appropriation and health benefit exchange account—state appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.

(5) COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$610,947,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$636,113,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,188,207,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$36,513,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,986,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,461,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$51,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$28,490,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
$28,493,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,714,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,544,975,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) For the purposes of this subsection, amounts provided for behavioral health organizations shall also be available for the health care authority to contract with entities that assume the responsibilities of behavioral health organizations in regions in which the health care authority is purchasing medical and behavioral health services through fully integrated contracts pursuant to RCW 71.24.380.

(b) $9,919,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $13,701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $18,061,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health organizations to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health organizations with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health organizations in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health organizations which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under (f) of this subsection. The authority and behavioral health organizations shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(c) From the general fund—state appropriations in this subsection, the authority shall assure that behavioral health organizations reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long term support administration for the general fund—state cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled behavioral health organization consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(d) $1,760,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain a pilot project to put peer bridging staff into each behavioral health organization as part of the state psychiatric liaison teams to promote continuity of service as individuals return to their communities.

(e) $81,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $81,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health organization spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health organizations proportionate to the fiscal year 2017 allocation of flexible nonmedicaid funds. The authority must include the following language in medicaid contracts with behavioral health organizations unless they are provided formal notification from the center for medicaid and medicare services that the language will result in the loss of federal medicaid participation: "The contractor may voluntarily provide services that are in addition to those covered under the state plan, although the cost of these services cannot be included when determining payment rates unless including these costs are specifically allowed under federal law or an approved waiver."

(f) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health organizations for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(g) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting one hundred eighty-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(h) Behavioral health organizations may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health organizations may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with (f) of this subsection to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(i) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health organizations on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(j) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(k) The authority must establish minimum and maximum funding levels for all reserves allowed under behavioral health organization contracts and insert contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The authority must monitor and ensure that behavioral health organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The authority must monitor behavioral health organization revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the behavioral health organization in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the behavioral health organization has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan.

(l) $3,079,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $3,079,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $2,892,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase rates for community hospitals that provide a minimum of two hundred medicaid psychiatric inpatient days. The authority must increase both medicaid and nonmedicaid psychiatric per-diem reimbursement rates for these providers within these amounts. The amounts in this subsection include funding for additional hold harmless payments resulting from the rate increase. The authority shall prioritize increases for hospitals not currently paid based on provider specific costs using a similar methodology used to set rates for existing inpatient facilities and the latest available cost report information. Rate increases for providers must be set so as not to exceed the amounts provided within this subsection. The rate increase related to nonmedicaid clients must be done to maintain the provider at the same percentage as currently required under WAC 182-550-4800.

(m) The number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health organizations at eastern state hospital shall be one hundred ninety two per day. The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by behavioral health organizations at western state hospital shall be five hundred fifty-seven per day. In fiscal year 2019, the authority reduced the number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health organizations at western state hospital by thirty beds to allow for the repurposing of a civil ward at western state hospital to provide forensic services. The authority was directed to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. These contracted beds shall be allocated to the behavioral health organizations in lieu of beds at the state hospitals and be incorporated in their allocation of state hospital patient days of care for the purposes of calculating reimbursements pursuant to RCW 71.24.310. It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of expanding community based alternatives for long term civil commitment services that allow for state hospital beds to be prioritized for forensic patients.

(n) $11,405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $11,405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $8,840,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain enhancements of community mental health services. The authority must contract these funds for the operation of community programs in which the authority determines there is a need for capacity that allows individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals including but not limited to: (i) Community hospital or free standing evaluation and treatment services providing short-term detention and commitment services under the involuntary treatment act to be located in the geographic areas of the King behavioral health organization, the Spokane behavioral health organization outside of Spokane county, and the Thurston Mason behavioral health organization; (ii) one new full program of an assertive community treatment team in the King behavioral health organization and two new half programs of assertive community treatment teams in the Spokane behavioral health organization and the Pierce behavioral health organization; and (iii) three new recovery support services programs in the Great Rivers behavioral health organization, the greater Columbia behavioral health organization, and the north sound behavioral health organization. In contracting for community evaluation and treatment services, the authority may not use these resources in facilities that meet the criteria to be classified under federal law as institutions for mental diseases. If the authority is unable to come to a contract agreement with a designated behavioral health organization for any of the services identified above, it may consider contracting for that service in another region that has the need for such service.

(o) $3,278,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,278,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a memorandum of understanding with the department of children, youth, and families juvenile rehabilitation administration to provide substance abuse treatment programs for juvenile offenders. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $1,130,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,130,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these funds as described in section 220(2)(d)(i) of this act.

(ii) $282,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $282,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the expansion of evidence-based treatments and therapies as described in section 220(2) of this act.

(p) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, any amounts provided in this section that are used for case management services for pregnant and parenting women must be contracted directly between the authority and providers rather than through contracts with behavioral health organizations.

(q) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (i) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the authority by request; and (ii) indirect charges for administering the program must not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.

(r) $3,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.

(s) $200,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct cost-benefit evaluations of the implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502).

(t) $500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey.

(u) $396,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $396,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program.

(v) $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide life skills training to children and youth in schools that are in high needs communities.

(w) $386,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $386,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to maintain increased prevention and treatment services provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organizations to children and youth.

(x) $2,684,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,684,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,900,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain increased residential treatment services for children and youth.

(y) $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence-based, research-based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorders.

(z) $2,434,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,434,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account.

(aa) $2,500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth, including programs for school-based resource officers. These funds must be utilized in accordance with RCW 69.50.540.

(bb) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health organizations must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health organizations must require that behavioral health organizations include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.

(cc) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for parenting education services focused on pregnant and parenting women.

(dd) Within existing appropriations, the authority shall prioritize the prevention and treatment of intravenous opiate-based drug use.

(ee) The criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with a behavioral health organization or administrative services organization to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b). The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which identifies the distribution of criminal justice treatment account funds by September 30, 2018.

(ff) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The authority must collect information from the institute on the use of these funds and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(gg) No more than $13,098,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the department and the health care authority shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(hh) $13,121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $12,875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $3,702,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement which impact competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211.

FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,567,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,446,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,620,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$190,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,823,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the case management database system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212.

FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$24,375,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$24,377,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$48,762,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $196,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $196,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the board of appeals information system replatforming project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213.

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$25,614,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$25,555,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$6,662,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$148,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,167,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$67,086,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130. The association may use no more than $50,000 per fiscal year of the amounts provided on program management activities.

(2) $2,248,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,269,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for seventy-five percent of the costs of providing nine additional statewide basic law enforcement trainings in each fiscal year. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements.

(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(4) $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for expenditure into the nonappropriated Washington internet crimes against children account for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.

(5) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the mental health field response team program administered by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The association must distribute $3,000,000 in grants to the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The association must submit an annual report to the Governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year of the biennium. The report shall include best practice recommendations on law enforcement and behavioral health field response and include outcome measures on all grants awarded.

(6) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $449,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$13,116,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$11,684,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,876,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$590,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$58,146,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,037,000

Construction Registration Inspection Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$25,347,000

Public Works Administration Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,354,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$412,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,434,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$394,861,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$15,674,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$399,949,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,515,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,011,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,674,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$953,708,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $410,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $72,000 of the medical aid—state appropriation are provided solely for the apprenticeship registration and tracking system replacement project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(2) $1,436,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $1,436,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation and maintenance of the provider credentialing system project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(3) $1,362,000 of the construction registration inspection account, $73,000 of the accident account—state appropriation, and $15,000 of the medical aid—state appropriation account are provided solely for the conveyance management system replacement project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(4) $40,988,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $40,986,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the labor and industries workers' compensation information replacement system project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(5) $250,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $250,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must issue an initial report to the legislature, by June 30, 2020, assessing the physical capacity of workers in the context of the industry's economic environment and ascertain usable support tools for employers and workers to decrease risk of injury. After the initial report, the department must produce annual progress reports, beginning in 2021 through the year 2022 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress reports must be submitted to the legislature by December 1st of each year such reports are due.

(6) $1,700,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $300,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided for fiscal year 2020 solely for a contract with a permanently registered Washington sector intermediary to provide supplemental instruction for information technology apprentices. Funds spent for this purpose must be matched by an equal amount of funding from the information technology industry members, except small and mid-sized employers. Up to $1,000,000 may be spent to provide supplemental instruction for apprentices at small and mid-sized businesses. "Small and mid-sized businesses" means those that have fewer than one hundred employees or have less than five percent annual net profitability. The sector intermediary will collaborate with the state board for community and technical colleges to integrate and offer related supplemental instruction through one or more Washington state community or technical colleges by the 2020-21 academic year.

(7) $1,360,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $240,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries to establish a health care apprenticeship.

(8) $1,021,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $181,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning).

(9) $52,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the complaint activity tracking system adjustment project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(10) $328,000 of the public works administration account is provided solely for the prevailing wage intent and affidavit computer system adjustments project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(11) $273,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $273,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment research for prevention program to conduct research to prevent the types of work-related injuries that require immediate hospitalization. The department will develop and maintain a tracking system to identify and respond to all immediate in-patient hospitalizations and will examine incidents in defined high-priority areas, as determined from historical data and public priorities. The research must identify and characterize hazardous situations and contributing factors using epidemiological, safety-engineering, and human factors/ergonomics methods. The research must also identify common factors in certain types of workplace injuries that lead to hospitalization. The department must submit an initial report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by August 30, 2020, and annually thereafter, summarizing work-related immediate hospitalizations and prevention opportunities, actions that employers and workers can take to make workplaces safer, and ways to avoid severe injuries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. In response to any request by the department for general fund—state appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.

(2) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,640,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$3,625,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$185,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,460,000

(3) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$6,090,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$6,172,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,539,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,108,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$708,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$444,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$23,061,000

(4) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$9,940,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$10,081,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$95,749,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$31,618,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,464,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$148,852,000

(5) CEMETERY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$100,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$100,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$688,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$888,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$81,569,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$82,897,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$579,366,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$183,884,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$362,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$152,936,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$633,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,091,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,063,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,979,000

Waterworks Operator Certification Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,990,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,228,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$183,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,693,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,472,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$969,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,703,000

Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,373,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$21,215,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,670,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,816,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$362,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,160,510,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(2) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(3) In accordance with RCW 43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(4) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than five hundred twenty-five dollars annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.

(5) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.20B.110 and 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.

(6) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090, 71.24.035, 43.20B.110, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(7) The department shall work with the health care authority and other state agencies and purchasers to establish a comprehensive procurement strategy for the purchase of hepatitis C virus medications. The department shall work with the authority to identify the necessary financing for public health interventions to eliminate the hepatitis C virus. By October 31, 2019, the department and authority shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature on the progress of the procurement, status of treatment, and plan to implement the elimination effort.

(8) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the improve prescription drug system project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(9) $7,943,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to upgrade the health care enforcement and licensing modernization solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(10) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the improve prescription drug system project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(11) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth and families shall work together within existing resources to comprise the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction, cross-organizational project support, and federal funding guidance across the coalition organizations. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature to share the plan, status, funding needs, and next steps for the health and human services coalition projects. The coalition shall collaborate with the office of the chief information officer and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act unless otherwise agreed upon by the office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2020, after approval by the director of financial management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2020 between programs. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$73,132,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$75,526,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,616,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$156,674,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department, in collaboration with the health care authority, shall work to ensure that a single platform provider credentialing system is implemented. The authority and department shall ensure that appropriate cost offsets and cost avoidance are assumed for reduced staff time required for provider credentialing activity and reductions in improper billing activity when implementing provider credentialing systems.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$577,111,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$585,292,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$818,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,421,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$62,920,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,230,562,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may contract for beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender excluding the costs of department of corrections provided services, including evidence-based substance abuse programming, dedicated department of corrections classification staff on-site for individualized case management, transportation of offenders to and from department of corrections facilities, and gender responsive training for Yakima jail staff assigned to the unit. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as close medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for offenders held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meet standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.

(b) $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester.

(c) $1,861,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,861,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department for associated costs of contracting for the use of offender bed capacity in lieu of prison beds operated by the state to meet prison capacity needs.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$224,558,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$243,473,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,632,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,800,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$484,463,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess of $85 per day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year increase in excess of three percent per year. The contracts may include rates for the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily cost of incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increases, provided that medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff.

(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$6,522,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$6,714,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$510,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$13,746,000

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$47,934,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$46,558,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$94,492,000

(6) OFFENDER CHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$59,693,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$61,292,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,430,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$125,415,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for offender programming. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(7) HEALTH CARE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$165,595,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$166,757,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$332,352,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$4,642,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$4,912,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$25,450,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$172,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$35,245,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219.

FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$16,572,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$16,572,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$224,837,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$36,419,000

Unemployment Compensation Administration Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$299,474,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,252,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$55,818,000

Family and Medical Leave Insurance Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$78,273,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$754,217,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.

(2) $5,081,000 of the employment service administrative account are provided solely for the IT continuity of operations project subject to the outcome of the agency readiness assessment performed by independent project quality assurance and are also subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(3) $16,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $16,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning). Within the amounts provided in this subsection (3):

(a) $13,000,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $13,000,000 in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the career connected learning competitive grant program. The department shall work with the office of the governor, or the governor's career connected cross-agency workgroup, to establish grant criteria and to comply with the grant selection process.

(b) $3,379,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $3,379,000 in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for regional leads and career navigators to support regional career connected learning networks, establish regional level connection between business and education, and provide technical support to start and expand programs.

(c) $158,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $158,000 in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for staff to support the cross-agency workgroup and the development of a statewide system of career connected learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

The appropriations to the department of children, youth, and families services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. To the extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions, the department, after May 1, 2020, may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2020 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and the house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications and transfers.

(1) CHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$435,044,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$451,295,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$549,512,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,824,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$27,892,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,466,567,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(b) $689,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $689,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the costs of hub home foster families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a licensed hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.

(c) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $110,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(d) $990,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $990,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.

(e) $1,351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020.

(f) Beginning October 1, 2019, and each calendar quarter thereafter, the department shall provide a tracking report for social service specialists and corresponding social services support staff to the office of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. The report shall include the following information identified separately for social service specialists doing case management work, supervisory work, and administrative support staff, and identified separately by job duty or program, including but not limited to intake, child protective services investigations, child protective services family assessment response, and child and family welfare services:

(i) Total full time equivalent employee authority, allotments and expenditures by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program;

(ii) Vacancy rates by region, office, and classification and band; and

(iii) Average length of employment with the department, and when applicable, the date of exit for staff exiting employment with the department by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program.

(g) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.

(h) $6,437,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $9,246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $9,672,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to reduce the caseload ratios of social workers serving children in foster care, to promote decreased lengths of stay and to make progress towards achievement of the Braam settlement caseload outcomes.

(i)(A) $539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $656,000 of the general fund private/local appropriation, and $252,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, or regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(B) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.

(j) $530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to contract with a community organization with expertise in the yvlifeset case management model to serve youth and young adults leaving the foster care, juvenile justice, and mental health systems to successfully transition into self-reliant adults.

(k) The department shall continue to implement policies to reduce the percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation, including clarification of the threshold for transition from supervised to unsupervised visitation prior to reunification.

(l) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a contract with a national nonprofit organization to, in partnership with private matching funds, subcontract with a community organization for specialized, enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody. The contract must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children.

(m) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $112,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, implement, and expand strategies to improve the capacity, reliability, and effectiveness of contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care and their parents and siblings. Strategies may include, but are not limited to, increasing mileage reimbursement for providers, offering transportation-only contract options, and mechanisms to reduce the level of parent-child supervision when doing so is in the best interest of the child.

(n) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.

(o) $1,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $156,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the travel reimbursement for in-home service providers.

(p) The department is encouraged to control exceptional reimbursement decisions so that the child's needs are met without excessive costs.

(q) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.

(r) $848,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $848,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement contracts. The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments.

(s) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for continued implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6453 (kinship caregiver legal support).

(t) $692,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $692,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $974,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to implement an enhanced rate add-on for providers who increase bed capacity for behavioral rehabilitation services as measured against the provider's average bed capacity as of the first six months of the previous fiscal year. The department must report to the legislature no later than January 1, 2019, and bi-annually thereafter, on the effect of this enhanced rate add-on on increasing behavioral rehabilitation services bed capacity and rates of placement.

(u) $533,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $533,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to expand performance-based contracts for family support and related services through network administrators.

(v) $288,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $244,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington office of public defense for the statewide expansion of the parents representation program.

(w) $2,064,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,494,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity or entities for the statewide implementation of the parent mentoring program which provides parents whose children are in an out-of-home placement with a skilled foster parent mentor.

(x) $1,164,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,397,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to procure an online portal for foster parent applications and renewals.

(y) $1,141,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,076,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $700,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement the foster parent and parent liaison pilot project in three offices and must include one office in western Washington and one office in eastern Washington. Of the amount provided in this subsection (1)(y), $856,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $807,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $525,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for skilled foster parents and parent allies who have successfully navigated the child welfare system to work in tangent with the department in efforts to recruit foster parents and facilitate positive relationships between foster parents and parents whose children are in an out-of-home placement. The purpose of the three-year pilot is to study the effects of wrap-around support by multiple experts on reunification and recruitment of new foster parents.

(2) JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$100,840,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$101,963,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,464,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,985,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,362,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$216,614,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(b) $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for the following juvenile justice programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation administration for funding for program-specific participation and the administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.

(c) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for expansion of the following juvenile justice treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." The administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(d)(i) $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority.

(ii) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service (CJS) funds, community juvenile accountability act (CJAA) grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative (CDDA), and suspended disposition alternative (SDA). The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (A) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (B) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (C) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (D) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (E) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (F) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(iii) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (d)(ii) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(iv) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(e) $98,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $98,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to the juvenile block grant funding formula oversight committee described in subsection (d)(iii) of this section to contract with research entities to: (i) Assist juvenile justice programs identified as promising practices or research-based in undergoing the research necessary to demonstrate that the program is evidence-based; and (ii) establish an annual, county-level evaluation of existing evidence-based juvenile justice programs.

(f) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(g) $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the juvenile detention alternatives initiative.

(h) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The juvenile rehabilitation administration may award grants under this subsection. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the juvenile rehabilitation administration on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(i) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(3) EARLY LEARNING PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$276,319,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$324,738,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$422,635,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,507,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,336,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,019,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$24,700,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,900,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,174,154,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $84,085,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $103,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $24,250,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 14,528 slots in fiscal year 2020 and 15,876 slots in fiscal year 2021.

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to develop and provide culturally relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.

(c) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies.

(d)(i) $80,685,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $73,032,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $270,178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $2,496,000 of the pension funding stabilization account—state appropriation are provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020. $103,576,000 of the general fund—state appropriation provided in this subsection (3)(d)(i), shall be claimed toward the state's temporary assistance for needy families federal maintenance of effort requirement. $72,263,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation provided in this subsection (3)(d)(i) is solely for the purpose of a seven percent tiered reimbursement rate increase for level three and a four percent tiered reimbursement rate increase for level four to child care center providers. In order to not exceed the appropriated amount, the department shall manage the program so that the average monthly caseload does not exceed 33,000 households. The department shall work in collaboration with the department of social and health services to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the monthly temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement. The department shall give prioritized access into the program according to the following order:

(A) Families applying for or receiving temporary assistance for needy families (TANF);

(B) TANF families curing sanction;

(C) Foster children;

(D) Families that include a child with special needs;

(E) Families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center;

(F) Families with a child residing with a biological parent or guardian who have received child protective services, child welfare services, or a family assessment response from the department in the past six months, and has received a referral for child care as part of the family's case management;

(G) Families that received subsidies within the last thirty days and:

(I) Have reapplied for subsidies; and

(II) Have household income of two hundred percent federal poverty level or below; and

(H) All other eligible families.

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(A) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;

(B) The reason for each overpayment;

(C) The total cost of overpayments;

(D) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and

(E) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.

(e) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(f) $1,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $13,424,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program. If federal sequestration cuts are realized, cuts to the seasonal child care program must be proportional to other federal reductions made within the department.

(g) $4,674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall ensure that contracted providers pursue receipt of federal funding associated with the early support for infants and toddlers program. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.

(h) $47,579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $52,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $27,908,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain the requirements set forth in chapter 7, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess. The department shall place a ten percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. In a bi-annual report to the governor and the legislature, the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements.

(i) $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.

(j) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(k) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.

(l) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(m)(i)(A) The department is required to provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.

(B) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry starting in the 2015-16 school year, and every school year thereafter. By October 2017, and every October thereafter, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.

(C) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.

(D) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data every March for the previous school year.

(ii) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

(n) The department shall work with state and local law enforcement, federally recognized tribal governments, and tribal law enforcement to develop a process for expediting fingerprinting and data collection necessary to conduct background checks for tribal early learning and child care providers.

(o) $22,519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $32,389,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as set forth in section 941 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $1,302,000 is for the family child care provider 501(c)(3) organization for board-approved training;

(ii) $230,000 is for increasing training reimbursement up to $250 per person;

(iii) $21,108,000 is for rate increases including tiered reimbursement;

(iv) $654,000 is to remove the cap on nonstandard bonus hours;

(v) $1,650,000 is to provide a $500 increase for quality insurance awards for select providers rated level three-five;

(vi) $115,000 is for training on the electronic child care time and attendance system;

(vii) $3,000,000 is to maintain the carrier development fund;

(viii) $21,056,000 is for paying seventy-five percent of the full day rate when a child receives morning and afternoon child care;

(ix) $225,000 is to provide a three percent increase to monthly health care premiums.

(p) $25,719,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $47,566,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $3,213,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $8,000 of the home visiting services account—federal appropriation, and $2,507,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Z- . . . . (early learning service continuum).

(q) $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 236, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1445) (dual language in early learning & K-12).

(r) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(s) $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to continue a four year pilot for implementation of chapter 162, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5357) (outdoor early learning programs).

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$59,629,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$59,431,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$36,578,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$155,652,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the purpose of further refining the "as-is" administrative architecture of the department and the department of social and health services-headquarters shared systems as referred to in the December 2017 report to the legislature titled "establishing the department of children, youth, and families." A report outlining a five year information technology system integration plan between the early learning program, children and family services program, juvenile rehabilitation program, and the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by July 31, 2019. The health and human services enterprise coalition and office of the chief information officer must approve the proposed technology architecture plan.

(b) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth and families shall work together within existing resources to comprise the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction, cross-organizational project support, and federal funding guidance across the coalition organizations. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature to share the plan, status, funding needs, and next steps for the health and human services coalition projects. The coalition shall collaborate with the office of the chief information officer and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act unless otherwise agreed upon by the office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management.

(c) $1,667,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Z- . . . . (early learning service continuum).

(d)(i) All agreements and contracts with vendors must include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(A) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(B) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(I) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(II) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(III) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(ii) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the department or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(iii) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(e) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships providing technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

(f) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to fund a pilot in King county that utilizes social network data to identify youth and young adults most at risk for gun related violence and to provide intervention services. The department of children, youth, and families must complete an evaluation of the program and provide a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by September 15, 2020.

(g) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided to expand youth service engagement in Burien utilizing the office juvenile justice and delinquency prevention comprehensive gang model.

(h) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for two locations within the state to develop recommendations for a process to access services for youth and families in crisis or conflict.

(i) In each of the two locations, the department of children, youth, and families shall convene a stakeholder group to include local leaders, providers, and others in the community to develop recommendations for a process for youth, or families with youth, who are in crisis to access services outside of the court system.

(ii) The department may contract with organizations that have expertise in pre-court processes including, but not limited to, intake, assessments, services referrals, and provider capacity. Support may also include communications with potential locations to encourage participation, assistance with forming stakeholder groups, facilitation of meetings, research, and other support.

(iii) The department shall work with the health care authority to develop recommendations to maximize federal funding for pre-court youth and family crisis services.

(iv) The department shall provide recommendations for a pre-court process and funding sources for family crisis services to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than January 1, 2020.

(i) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $16,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(End of part)

PART III

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301.

FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$668,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$660,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,352,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$46,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,758,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $213,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the access database replacement project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations and review provided in section 950 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$40,435,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$41,814,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$110,181,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$23,414,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,010,000

Flood Control Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,234,000

State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,231,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$204,000

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account—Water

Supply Facilities—State Appropriation
. . . .
$183,000

Aquatic Algae Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$528,000

Water Rights Tracking System Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$48,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$582,000

Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$769,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,054,000

Water Rights Processing Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$164,587,000

State Toxics Control Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$499,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,328,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$49,695,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,125,000

Biosolids Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,795,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$46,263,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,424,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,319,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,698,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,563,000

Air Operating Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,815,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Oil Spill Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,076,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,920,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,994,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$596,364,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(2) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $88,000 of the waste reduction, recycling and litter control account—state appropriation, $1,440,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation, $34,000 of the local toxics control account—state appropriation, $440,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation, $46,000 of the underground storage tank account—state appropriation, $264,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account—state appropriation, $78,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account—state appropriation, $172,000 of the radioactive mixed waste account—state appropriation, $36,000 of the air pollution control account—state appropriation, $82,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation, and $46,000 of the air operating permit account—state appropriation are provided solely for modernizing and migrating the department of ecology's business applications from an agency-based data center to the state data center or a cloud environment and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(3) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Executive Order No. 12-07, Washington's response to ocean acidification.

(4) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $11,000 of the reclamation account—state appropriation, $7,000 of the flood control assistance account—state appropriation, $36,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation, $7,000 of the worker and community right-to-know account—state appropriation, $654,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation, $15,000 of the local toxics control account—state appropriation, $227,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation, $18,000 of the underground storage tank account—state appropriation, $10,000 of the biosolids permit account—state appropriation, $114,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account—state appropriation, $32,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account—state appropriation, $76,000 of the radioactive mixed waste account—state appropriation, $16,000 of the air pollution control account—state appropriation, $37,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation, $15,000 of the air operating permit account—state appropriation, and $15,000 of the water pollution control revolving administration account—state appropriation are provided solely for the integrated revenue system that replaces the agency's federal grant receivable and toxics cleanup cost recovery systems, and is subject to the conditions, limitations and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(5) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $38,000 of the reclamation account—state appropriation, $23,000 of the flood control assistance account—state appropriation, $122,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation, $23,000 of the worker and community right-to-know account—state appropriation, $2,230,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation, $52,000 of the local toxics control account—state appropriation, $774,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation, $62,000 of the underground storage tank account—state appropriation, $34,000 of the biosolids permit account—state appropriation, $389,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account—state appropriation, $108,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account—state appropriation, $258,000 of the radioactive mixed waste account—state appropriation, $56,000 of the air pollution control account—state appropriation, $127,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation, $51,000 of the air operating permit account—state appropriation, and $51,000 of the water pollution control revolving administration account—state appropriation are provided solely for the enterprise records management system project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(6) $558,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $37,000 of the reclamation account—state appropriation, $23,000 of the flood control assistance account—state appropriation, $121,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation, $23,000 of the worker and community right-to-know account—state appropriation, $2,078,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation, $51,000 of the local toxics control account—state appropriation, $632,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation, $60,000 of the underground storage tank account—state appropriation, $33,000 of the biosolids permit account—state appropriation, $386,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account—state appropriation, $107,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account—state appropriation, $256,000 of the radioactive mixed waste account—state appropriation, $56,000 of the air pollution control account—state appropriation, $125,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation, $51,000 of the air operating permit account—state appropriation, and $51,000 of the water pollution control revolving administration account—state appropriation are provided solely for relocation of the department of ecology's northwest regional office to a department of transportation-owned facility in Shoreline.

(7) $592,000 of the reclamation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology to assess the need, costs, and barriers to initiating the adjudication process in selected watersheds to reduce and resolve uncertainty about water rights. The department shall evaluate multiple watersheds to identify stakeholder and local government interest and concerns about the process, and to determine the cost of conducting an adjudication in each watershed identified in the evaluation. The department shall submit an evaluation report and recommendations to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303.

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$20,755,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$20,123,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,081,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,310,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$403,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,657,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$367,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$122,906,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$420,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,496,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$182,518,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(2) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to pay assessments charged by local improvement districts.

(3) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for development of customer databases and geographic information system improvements and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(4) $379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $382,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to modernize park technology and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304.

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,235,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,210,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,781,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$333,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,150,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,107,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$13,957,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $109,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the aquatics lands enhancement account grant program as described in RCW 79.105.150.

(2) $37,000 of the firearms range account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the firearms range grant program as described in RCW 79A.25.210.

(3) $4,150,000 of the recreation resources account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administrative and coordinating costs of the recreation and conservation office and the board as described in RCW 79A.25.080(1).

(4) $1,107,000 of the NOVA program account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program as described in chapter 46.09 RCW.

(5) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the recreation and conservation office to contract with a consultant to provide a quinquennial update of the economic analysis of outdoor recreation in Washington state study completed in 2015. The updated study shall quantify the economic contribution to the state economy from the state's public lands and related ecosystem services from public lands, and quantify the economic contribution from statewide outdoor recreation to the state's economy. A report is due to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305.

FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,457,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,527,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$254,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,238,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306.

FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$9,589,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$9,632,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,301,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,456,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$254,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$31,232,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,456,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $2,000,000 of general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000,000 of general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided to conservation districts to increase the number of landowners participating in voluntary actions that protect habitat to benefit salmon and southern resident orcas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$70,449,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$67,300,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$141,876,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$69,676,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$701,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,879,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,315,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,831,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$675,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$126,854,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,904,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$517,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,660,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$361,000

Ballast Water and Biofouling Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,953,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,199,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,906,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,186,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$524,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$519,777,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $1,997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for payments in lieu of real property taxes to counties that elect to receive the payments for department-owned game lands within the county.

(3) $415,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $415,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $440,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for county assessments.

(4) Prior to submitting its 2021-2023 biennial operating and capital budget requests related to state fish hatcheries to the office of financial management, the department shall contract with the hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review the proposed requests. This review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost-effective manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the office of financial management with its agency budget proposal.

(5) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers.

(6) $537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to increase enforcement of vessel traffic near orca whales, especially commercial and recreational whale watchers and shipping, and to reduce underwater noise levels that interfere with feeding and communication. While the patrol focus is to be on orca whale protection when the animals are present, nothing prohibits responses to emergent public safety or in-progress poaching incidents. In the event that orca whales are not present in marine waters of Puget Sound, emphasis will be placed on patrols that protect living marine resources in northern Puget Sound.

(7) $3,795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are appropriated for the department to increase hatchery production of salmon throughout the Puget Sound, coast, and Columbia river. Increases in hatchery production must be prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas. The department shall work with federal partners, tribal co-managers, and other interested parties when developing annual hatchery production plans. These increases shall be done consistent with best available science, most recent hatchery standards, and endangered species act requirements, and include adaptive management provisions to ensure the conservation and enhancement of wild stocks.

(8) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for an interagency agreement with the office of financial management for facilitation services and support for the governor's efforts to develop a long-term action plan for orca whale recovery.

(9) $888,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement the enforcement records management database project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(10) $710,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to migrate to the state data center and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(11) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for an interagency agreement with the office of financial management, in collaboration with the northwest power and planning council, to convene and facilitate a neutral process to consider the social, economic, and community impacts, costs, and benefits of potential breaching or removal of the four lower Snake river dams. Results of the process will help inform comments on behalf of Washington state into the federal environmental impact statement process for the Columbia river system. A report shall be submitted to the governor's southern resident killer whale task force by September 30, 2019, and transmitted to the governor's office by November 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$73,511,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$63,199,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$35,004,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,534,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$46,702,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,098,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,606,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$18,587,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$128,776,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,140,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,068,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,358,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$404,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$14,542,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,021,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$901,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$783,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,240,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,003,000

Community Forest Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$52,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,190,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$443,758,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,583,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,515,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(2) $23,290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $23,290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.

(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $1,107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board. The forest practices board shall submit a report to the legislature following review, approval, and solicitation of public comment on the cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research master project schedule, to include: Cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science and related adaptive management expenditure details, accomplishments, the use of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science in decision-making, and funding needs for the coming biennium. The report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2020.

(5) $150,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for continued facilitation and support services for the marine resources advisory council.

(6) $217,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the state marine management plan and ongoing costs of the Washington coastal marine advisory council to serve as a forum and provide recommendations on coastal management issues.

(7) Consistent with the recommendations of the Wildfire Suppression Funding and Costs (18-02) report of the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2019, and December 1, 2020, describing the previous fire season. At a minimum, the report shall provide information for each wildfire in the state, including its location, impact by type of land ownership, the extent it involved timber or range lands, cause, size, costs, and cost-share with federal agencies and nonstate partners. The report must also be posted on the agency's web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$18,765,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$18,761,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,134,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$193,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,533,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,831,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$73,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,036,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,270,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$80,596,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $6,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing the food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(2) $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $52,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to migrate to the state data center and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310.

FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground Storage

Tank Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$170,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,454,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,624,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $820,000 of the pollution liability insurance program trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the extend technology modernization project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311.

FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$5,574,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$5,517,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,720,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,441,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$753,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$276,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$26,281,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By October 15, 2020, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor and appropriate legislative fiscal committees a single, prioritized list of state agency 2021-2023 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound restoration.

(End of part)

PART IV

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$5,478,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$3,805,000

Architects' License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,220,000

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,288,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,003,000

Real Estate Education Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$276,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,638,000

Business and Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$22,987,000

Real Estate Research Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$415,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$74,000

Landscape Architects' License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$69,000

Concealed Pistol License Renewal Notification

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$140,000

Geologists' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$53,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$96,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$55,575,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Appropriations provided for the data stewardship and privacy project in this section are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(2) Appropriations provided for the cloud-continuity of operations project in this section are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402.

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$55,418,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$56,924,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,694,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,091,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,084,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,551,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,650,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,000,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,463,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$586,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,381,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,546,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$190,992,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(2) $2,878,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for the completion of the state patrol's plan to upgrade the criminal history system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(3) $5,546,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state patrol's drug enforcement task force. The amount in this subsection is provided solely for the following:

(a) $4,846,000 of the dedicated marijuana account is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to partner with multi-jurisdictional drug and gang task forces to detect, deter, and dismantle criminal organizations involved in criminal activity including diversion of marijuana from the legalized market and the illicit production and distribution of marijuana and marijuana-related products in Washington state.

(b) $300,000 of the dedicated marijuana account is for one intelligence analyst to focus on gang activity. The primary responsibilities of this position are to assist multi-jurisdictional drug and gang task forces by: (i) Identifying national, regional, and local patterns, trends, and links related to gang activity that impact Washington state; (ii) developing actionable analytic products that support strategic, operational, and tactical objectives of multi-jurisdictional drug and gang task forces; (iii) assisting law enforcement agencies with analytic case support; and (iv) coordinating information sharing among federal, state, local, and tribal partners including fusion centers and private sector stakeholders.

(c) $400,000 of the dedicated marijuana account for a case management system to serve as a repository for all information regarding criminal cases. This system must allow state patrol investigators to enter information and to search to provide patterns, trends, and links which will allow the state patrol to identify connections on criminal investigations including efforts to dismantle marijuana and other drug trafficking organizations by identifying their established networks.

(End of part)

PART V

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$65,415,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$89,156,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$99,415,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,060,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$587,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,052,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,126,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$213,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$266,024,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $12,441,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $12,406,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(a) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(b) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school, using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the superintendent.

(c) By September of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in sections 501 and 513 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(d) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the secretary of state, shall update the program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.

(e) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (i) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (ii) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(f) Within amounts provided in this subsection (1), $710,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $710,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z-.... (expand career connected learning). Funding is provided for administrative support and staffing to develop statewide articulation and transfer agreements, to develop and implement a career and technical education equivalency framework, and to support expansion of the core plus aerospace program.

(2) $857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for maintenance of the apportionment system, including technical staff and the data governance working group.

(3) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for activities associated with the implementation of chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education) within the amounts provided in this subsection (3), up to $1,000,000 is for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to review the use of local revenues for compliance with enrichment requirements, including the preballot approval of enrichment levy spending plans approved by the superintendent of public instruction, and any supplemental contracts entered into under RCW 28A.400.200.

(4) $1,168,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,057,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic assistance activities. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4), $124,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z-0145.6/19 (flexibility in high school graduation requirements).

(5) $4,532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to the professional educator standards board for the following:

(a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5), $1,115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board including implementation of chapter 172, Laws of 2017 (educator prep. data/PESB);

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5), $1,948,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,948,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to improve preservice teacher training, funding of alternate routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board, and reporting on the grants provided.

(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5)(b), up to $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and up to $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs.

(ii) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5)(b), by October 1, 2019, and October 1, 2020, the professional educational standards board shall report on the grants provided, participant demographics, and grant outcomes. This report must include the list of institutions awarded block grants and the number of candidates in each educator pathway. In the report the professional educator standards board shall provide the following: (A) Clear definitions of each educator pathway to delineate the level of education of the candidate when entering the program; (B) participant demographic information that includes race and ethnicity, multilingual skills, family income bracket, and employment within the school district; (C) student persistence and completion data; (D) where applicable, the number of endorsements pursued and the type of endorsement; (E) the number of candidates in each program who receive an alternative route conditional block grant and obligation status; and (F) best practices employed by the colleges of education related to program delivery models that are culturally competent, meet the needs of working students, or that improve the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs.

(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5), $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program for scholarships for paraeducators to complete their associate of arts degrees in subject matter shortage areas;

(d) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5), $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the educator retooling conditional loan scholarship program;

(e) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5), $875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the recruiting Washington teachers program with priority given to programs that support bilingual teachers, teachers from populations that are underrepresented, and English language learners. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (5)(e), $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation and expansion of the bilingual educator initiative pilot project established under RCW 28A.180.120.

(f) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5), $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for development educator interpreter standards and identification of interpreter assessments that are available to school districts. Interpreter assessments should meet the following criteria: (A) Include both written assessment and performance assessment; (B) be offered by a national organization of professional sign language interpreters and transliterators; and (C) be designed to assess performance in more than one sign system or sign language. The board shall establish a performance standard, defining what constitutes a minimum assessment result, for each educational interpreter assessment identified. The board shall publicize the standards and assessments for school district use.

(g) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5), $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to continue and expand the grow your own educator program. Funding is provided to support regional coordination at a selected educational service district to provide navigation and support for grow your own educator candidates. By October 1, 2019, and October 1, 2020, the professional educator standards board shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the grow your own educators program including the number of participants served, the types of services provided, participant demographics, outcomes related to recruiting candidates into education preparation programs, and other results.

(6) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(7) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(8) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(9) $262,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(10) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(11) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for project citizen, a program sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle school students.

(12) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(13) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178, Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).

(14) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for school bullying and harassment prevention activities.

(15) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 242, Laws of 2013 (state-tribal education compacts).

(16) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(a) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(b) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(17) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to convene a committee for the selection and recognition of Washington innovative schools. The committee shall select and recognize Washington innovative schools based on the selection criteria established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in accordance with chapter 202, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools—recognition) and chapter 260, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools and zones).

(18) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(19) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $211,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform on-going program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(20) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for youth suicide prevention activities.

(21) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation of career and technical education course equivalency frameworks authorized under RCW 28A.700.070 for math and science. This may include development of additional equivalency course frameworks, course performance assessments, and professional development for districts implementing the new frameworks.

(22) $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(23) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a nonviolence and ethical leadership training and professional development program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(24) $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(25) $3,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship and Washington higher education readiness program. The funds shall be used to: Support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars; and to identify and reduce barriers to college for low-income and underserved middle and high school students.

(26) $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.

(27) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,028,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. Students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, $513,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, and $515,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the building bridges statewide program.

(28) $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080.

(29) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090.

(30) $5,798,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants for implementation of dual credit programs and subsidized advanced placement exam fees, international baccalaureate class fees, and exam and course fees for low-income students.

(a) For expenditures related to subsidized exam fees, the superintendent of public instruction shall report: The number of students served; the demographics of the students served; and how the students perform on the exams.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (30), $905,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Z-.... (expand career connected learning). Funds are provided for college in the high school and career and technical education dual credit fees for low-income students. Funds may only be expended for courses that have articulation agreements with more than one institution of higher education.

(31) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (computer science).

(32) $2,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for statewide and district level support of bilingualism and biliteracy.

(a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (32), $1,900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for two-year start-up grants to grow capacity for high quality dual language learning in the common schools and in state-tribal compact schools. In selecting recipients of these K-12 dual language grants, the superintendent of public instruction must prioritize districts that received grants under section 501(33), chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (32), $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants for seal of biliteracy exam fees for low-income students.

(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (32), $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the development and adoption of K-12 Spanish language arts learning standards.

(33) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The superintendent of public instruction shall award grants consistent with RCW 28A.300.410.

(34) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the computer science and education grant program to support the following three purposes: Train and credential teachers in computer sciences; provide and upgrade technology needed to learn computer science; and, for computer science frontiers grants to introduce students to and engage them in computer science. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use the computer science learning standards adopted pursuant to chapter 3, Laws of 2015 (computer science) in implementing the grant, to the extent possible. Additionally, grants provided for the purpose of introducing students to computer science are intended to support innovative ways to introduce and engage students from historically underrepresented groups, including girls, low-income students, and minority students, to computer science and to inspire them to enter computer science careers.

(a) Within amounts provided in this subsection (34), $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 may be expended as grant funding only to the extent that they are equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.

(b) Within amounts provided in this subsection (34), $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely as grant funding for districts with greater than sixty percent of students eligible for free and reduced price meals.

(35) $2,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for demonstration sites to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to chapter 71, Laws of 2016 (foster youth edu. outcomes).

(a) Of the amount provided in this subsection (35), $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, section 202(10), chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection (35), $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act, section 501(43)(b), chapter 4, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(36) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (homeless students).

(37) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (educational opportunity gap).

(38) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2016 (school safety).

(39) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2017 (truancy reduction efforts).

(40) $912,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $25,470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators). Of the amount in this subsection (40), $24,485,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to districts to provide the required four days of training in the fundamental course of study to all paraeducators.

(41) $2,482,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the nine educational service districts to provide a network of support for school districts to develop comprehensive suicide prevention and behavioral health supports for students. Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (41), $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to schools or school districts for planning and integrating tiered suicide prevention and behavioral health supports. Grants must be awarded first to districts demonstrating the greatest need and readiness. Grants may be used for intensive technical assistance and training, professional development, and evidence-based suicide prevention training.

(42) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.

(43) $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 180, Laws of 2017 (Washington Aim program).

(44) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 64, Laws of 2018 (sexual abuse of students).

(45) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 175, Laws of 2018 (children's mental health services).

(46) $374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $363,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 127, Laws of 2018 (civics education).

(47) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education shall adopt a rule that the minimum number of students to be used for public reporting and federal accountability purposes is ten.

(48) $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 206, Laws of 2018 (career and college readiness).

(49) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act).

(50) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration and division of vocational rehabilitation, shall explore the development of an implementation plan to build statewide capacity among school districts to improve transition planning for students in special education who meet criteria for services from the developmental disabilities administration, and shall provide all school districts with an opportunity to participate. The plan shall be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 by November 1, 2018, and the final report must be submitted by November 1, 2020, to the governor and appropriate legislative committees.

(51) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the legislative youth advisory council. The council of statewide members advises legislators on issues of importance to youth.

(52) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 75, Laws of 2018 (dyslexia).

(53) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure career and technical education courses are aligned with high-demand, high-wage jobs. The superintendent shall verify that the current list of career and technical education courses meets the criteria established in RCW 28A.700.020(2). The superintendent shall remove from the list any career and technical education course that no longer meets such criteria.

(54) $235,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $235,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government.

(55) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the expansion of education in the next generation science standards.

(a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (55), $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide grants to school districts and educational service districts for science teacher training in the next generation science standards, including training in the climate science standards. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may retain up to $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in this subsection (55)(a) in each fiscal year for grant administration, facilitation of climate science instructional coordination, and development of a statewide climate science strategic plan.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (55), $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for climate science community-based organizations to partner with public schools and educational service districts for next generation science standards.

(56) $651,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,726,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the redesign of school financial systems. The amounts provided in this subsection (56) are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (56), $318,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the completion of the school district accounting and reporting system that will collect school district and school level expenditure information by revenue source.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (56), $333,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,726,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of superintendent of public instruction in collaboration with school districts and educational service districts to design, develop, and implement a district budgeting system with four-year budgeting and reporting functionality in line with the requirements of chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education).

(57) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (57), $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a school safety program to provide school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (57), $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for administration of the school safety center. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training, and maintain a school safety information web site.

(58) $1,471,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,471,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide assistance to school districts with comprehensive safe schools planning, conducting needs assessments, school safety and security trainings, coordinating appropriate crisis and emergency response and recovery, and developing threat assessment and crisis intervention teams.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$8,107,728,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$8,506,491,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,145,730,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$19,759,949,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 502 and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.

(c) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 502 and 503, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(e)(i) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the agency rules defining a full-time equivalent student with the increase in the minimum instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220, as amended by the legislature in 2014.

(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.

(g) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, school districts must report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the monthly actual average district-wide class size across each grade level of kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade classes. The superintendent of public instruction shall report this information to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30th of each year.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, except:

(i) The allocations in this subsection (2)(a)(i) for elementary and middle schools shall be phased in for school districts with the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced price meals in the prior school year with the goal of implementing the increased allocations in all school districts effective September 1, 2023. Funding in this section is sufficient to provide districts with greater than fifty percent of students eligible for free and reduced price meals in school year 2019-20 and school year 2020-21 with the following allocations:

Elementary School

Middle School

School Nurses

0.585

0.888

Social Workers

0.311

0.088

Psychologists

0.104

0.024

Guidance Counselors

0.500

2.000

The increased allocations within this subsection (2)(a)(i) shall be allocated to the extent of and in proportion to the sum of the school district's demonstrated actual increased staffing or existing staffing above the levels allocated in RCW 28A.150.260, for school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors. For the purpose of compliance, calculations may consider school district certificated and classified staff employed in the positions of guidance counselor, parent involvement coordinator, and health services staff.

(ii) The enhancements within this subsection (2)(a) are within the program of basic education.

(iii) The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Grade K

17.00

17.00

Grade 1

17.00

17.00

Grade 2

17.00

17.00

Grade 3

17.00

17.00

Grade 4

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 20.0.

(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher:

General education class size in high poverty schools:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Grade K

17.00

17.00

Grade 1

17.00

17.00

Grade 2

17.00

17.00

Grade 3

17.00

17.00

Grade 4

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

28.74

28.74

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(iv) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Career and Technical Education

3.07

3.07

Skill Center

3.41

3.41

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistance principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

1.253

Middle School

1.353

High School

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors: Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 12.42 percent in the 2019-20 school year and 12.44 percent in the 2020-21 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.75 percent in the 2019-20 school year and 17.78 percent in the 2020-21 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 24.12 percent in the 2019-20 school year and 24.12 percent in the 2020-21 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 24.64 percent in the 2017-18 school year and 24.64 percent in the 2018-19 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

(a) Beginning September 1, 2019, through December 31, 2019, insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(i) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and

(ii) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated on the basis of 1,440 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2020, and for the 2020-21 school year, insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the number of calculated benefit units determined below. Calculated benefit units are staff units multiplied by the benefit allocation factors established in the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 937 of this act. These factors are intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent employees may be calculated on the basis of 630 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent. The number of benefit units is determined as follows:

(i) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.02; and

(ii) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.43.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a)(i) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Technology

$136.04

$138.78

Utilities and Insurance

$369.65

$377.04

Curriculum and Textbooks

$146.06

$148.98

Other Supplies and Library Materials

$310.09

$316.29

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$22.59

$23.04

Facilities Maintenance

$183.12

$186.78

Security and Central Office

$126.87

$129.40

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$1,294.42

$1,320.31

(ii) For the 2019-20 school year and 2020-21 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (A) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii) exceeds (B) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,531.48 for the 2019-20 school year and $1,562.11 for the 2020-21 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,531.48 for the 2019-20 school year and $1,562.11 for the 2020-21 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at the following rate:

MSOC Component

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Technology

$39.12

$39.90

Curriculum and Textbooks

$42.68

$43.53

Other Supplies and Library Materials

$88.91

$90.69

Instructional Professional Development for Certified

and Classified Staff

$7.11

$7.26

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$177.82

$181.38

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, are adjusted to reflect provisions of (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

Funding in this section is sufficient to fund all day kindergarten programs in all schools in the 2019-20 school year and 2020-21 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315.

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (13) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2020 and 2021 as follows:

(a) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) $229,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $229,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for school district emergencies as certified by the superintendent of public instruction. Funding provided must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable. At the close of the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts and the nature of the emergency.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(18) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.2 FTE enrollment for career and technical education students as provided in Z-...(expand career connected learning). Staff units and resources provided for career and technical education FTE above 1.0 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(19) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.

(20) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (13) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(21)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(22) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. For the 2019-2021 biennium, general apportionment payments are not reduced for school districts receiving federal forest revenues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 502 of this act: For the 2019-20 school year and the 2020-21 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.

Statewide Minimum Salary Allocation

Staff Type

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Certificated Instructional

$66,598

$67,996

Certificated Administrative

$98,838

$100,913

Classified

$47,767

$48,770

(2) For the purposes of this section, "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on December 10, 2018, at 8:24 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 23.48 percent for school year 2019-20 and 23.48 percent for school year 2020-21 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 21.14 percent for school year 2019-20 and 21.14 percent for the 2020-21 school year for classified staff.

(4) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$578,697,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$583,414,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,162,111,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The salary increases provided in this section are inclusive of and above the annual cost-of-living adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.

(2) In addition to salary allocations specified in this subsection (1) funding in this subsection includes two days of professional learning for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in school year 2019-20, and three days of professional learning for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in school year 2020-21. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 23.48 percent for the 2019-20 school year and 23.48 percent for the 2020-21 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 21.14 percent for the 2019-20 school year and 21.14 percent for the 2020-21 school year for classified staff.

(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 502 and 503 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 502, 503, and 504 of this act.

(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(4) The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is $843.97 per month for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years. The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 937 of this act and reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates as follows:

(a) For the 2019-20 school year, $971.00 per month from September 1, 2019, to December 31, 2019, $1,170 per month from January 1, 2020, to June 30, 2020, and $1,195 per month from July 1, 2020, to August 31, 2020; and

(b) For the 2020-21 school year, $1,195 per month.

(5) When bargaining for funding for school employees health benefits for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, any proposal agreed upon must assume the imposition of a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(6) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

(7) $2,081,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in Z-. . . . . (special education funding) as proposed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$614,065,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$614,890,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,228,955,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 505, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.

(4) A maximum of $939,000 of this fiscal year 2020 appropriation and a maximum of $939,000 of the fiscal year 2021 appropriation may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(5) Subject to available funds under this section, school districts may provide student transportation for summer skills center programs.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(8) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW 28A.305.141.

(9) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$7,230,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$7,230,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$537,178,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$551,638,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids program through the following allowable uses:

(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades kindergarten through third grade who are eligible for reduced-price lunch;

(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income areas;

(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served to students eligible for free and reduced-price lunch, pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and

(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding school breakfast programs.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual expenditures in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the department of health with the following data, where available, for all nutrition assistance programs that are funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2020, and February 1, 2021. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(4) $119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $119,000 of the general fund-state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 271, Laws of 2018 (school meal payment) to increase the number of schools participating in the federal community eligibility program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,377,879,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,541,748,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$499,428,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,694,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,473,769,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and 504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390 as amended by chapter 266, Laws of 2018 (basic education), except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 502 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 507, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 13.5 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) $56,220,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $66,743,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $29,574,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (education).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $931,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for two additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(12) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(13) $33,770,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $55,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in Z-. . . . . (special education funding) as proposed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$12,901,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$13,465,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$26,366,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$444,496,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$506,320,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$950,816,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student is 5.63 percent from the 2018-19 school year to the 2019-20 school year and 5.63 percent from the 2019-20 school year to the 2020-21 school year.

(2) $72,671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $140,897,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for changes to the levy and levy equalization system as specified in Z-. . . . . (local levy authority).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$17,831,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$19,288,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$37,119,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) $2,036,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to increase the capacity of institutional education programs to differentiate instruction to meet students' unique educational needs. Those needs may include but are not limited to one-on-one instruction, enhanced access to counseling for social emotional needs of the student, and services to identify the proper level of instruction at the time of student entry into the facility.

(7) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$30,774,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$32,799,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$63,573,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 511, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(3) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR MISCELLANEOUS—EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,802,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$144,896,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$150,554,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$96,594,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,450,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,636,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$765,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$395,895,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.

(2) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events.

(3) $3,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(4) $72,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $77,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,510 per teacher in the 2019-20 school year and a bonus of $5,620 per teacher in the 2020-21 school year;

(b) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;

(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(d) During the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(5) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(6) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(7) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(8) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a statewide information technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as IT certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.

(9) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008, including parts of programs receiving grants that serve students in grades four through six. If equally matched by private donations, $825,000 of the 2020 appropriation and $825,000 of the 2021 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs in grades four through twelve. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $100,000 of the fiscal year 2020 appropriation and $100,000 of the fiscal year 2021 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(10) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(11) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(12) $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program. The program shall prioritize first year teachers in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

(13) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2020, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2018-19 school year. The 2020 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2019-20 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2021, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2019-20 school year. The 2020 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2020-21 school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data.

(14) $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013 (K-12 education - failing schools).

(15) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual start-up, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs. To be eligible for funding, the skills center and high schools must agree to engage in developing local business and industry partnerships for oversight and input regarding program components. Program instructors must also agree to participate in professional development leading to student employment, or certification in aerospace or advanced manufacturing industries as determined by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center shall report annually student participation and long-term outcome data.

(16) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.

(17) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.

(18) $909,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $909,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement chapter 18, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. (strengthening student educational outcomes).

(19) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for chapter 212, Laws of 2014 (homeless student educational outcomes).

(20) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (biliteracy seal).

(21) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization to integrate the state learning standards in English language arts, mathematics, and science with FieldSTEM outdoor field studies and project-based and work-based learning opportunities aligned with the environmental, natural resource, and agricultural sectors.

(22) Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall obtain an existing student assessment inventory tool that is free and openly licensed and distribute the tool to every school district. Each school district shall use the student assessment inventory tool to identify all state-level and district-level assessments that are required of students. The state-required assessments should include: Reading proficiency assessments used for compliance with RCW 28A.320.202; the required statewide assessments under chapter 28A.655 RCW in grades three through eight and at the high school level in English language arts, mathematics, and science, as well as the practice and training tests used to prepare for them; and the high school end-of-course exams in mathematics under RCW 28A.655.066. District-required assessments should include: The second grade reading assessment used to comply with RCW 28A.300.320; interim smarter balanced assessments, if required; the measures of academic progress assessment, if required; and other required interim, benchmark, or summative standardized assessments, including assessments used in social studies, the arts, health, and physical education in accordance with RCW 28A.230.095, and for educational technology in accordance with RCW 28A.655.075. The assessments identified should not include assessments used to determine eligibility for any categorical program including the transitional bilingual instruction program, learning assistance program, highly capable program, special education program, or any formative or diagnostic assessments used solely to inform teacher instructional practices, other than those already identified. By October 15th of each year, each district shall report to the superintendent the amount of student time in the previous school year that is spent taking each assessment identified. By December 15th of each even numbered calendar year, the superintendent shall summarize the information reported by the school districts and report to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

(23) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a process and provide assistance to school districts in planning for future implementation of the summer knowledge improvement program grants.

(24) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to fund single sign-on technology for students and staff at public schools across Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$202,260,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$218,034,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$102,242,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$522,540,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2019-20 and 2020-21; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2019-20 and 2020-21 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 1.97 percent for school year 2019-20 and 1.86 percent for school year 2020-21.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

(6) $1,128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $1,409,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$444,689,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$471,239,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$533,481,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,449,409,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 515, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the prior school year. The prior school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(5) Within existing resources, during the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—PER PUPIL ALLOCATIONS

Statewide Average Allocations

Per Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent Student

Basic Education Program

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

General Apportionment

$9,457

$9,689

Pupil Transportation

$515

$511

Special Education Programs

$9,848

$10,235

Institutional Education Programs

$20,346

$20,795

Programs for Highly Capable Students

$614

$628

Transitional Bilingual Programs

$1,376

$1,412

Learning Assistance Program

$993

$1,016

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517.

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocations purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.

(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative approval through the budget request process.

(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(5) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518.

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR CHARTER SCHOOLS

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$106,878,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$106,878,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519.

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$194,000

Charter Schools Oversight Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,486,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,680,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation in this section is provided to the superintendent of public instruction solely for the operations of the Washington state charter school commission under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(End of part)

PART VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. The appropriations in sections 605 through 611 of this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 605 through 611 of this act.

(2) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes. Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the office of financial management for inclusion in the agency's data warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the office of financial management's office of the state human resources director for use by the reporting institutions, including provisions for common job classifications and common definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts, number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently reported for employees under contract.

(3) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.

(4)(a) For institutions receiving appropriations in section 605 of this act, the only allowable salary increases provided are those with normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and staff retention, except as provided in Part IX of this act. In fiscal year 2018 and fiscal year 2019, the state board for community and technical colleges may use salary and benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide salary increments and associated benefits for faculty who qualify through professional development and training.

(b) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW, salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.

(c) For each institution of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 606 through 611 of this act:

(i) The only allowable salary increases are those associated with normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and staff retention and as provided in Part IX of this act; and

(ii) Institutions may provide salary increases from other sources to instructional and research faculty at the universities and The Evergreen State College, exempt professional staff, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under chapter 41.80 RCW. Any salary increases granted under the authority of this subsection (4)(c) may be excluded from the calculation of funding for ensuing general wage or other salary increases that are provided by the legislature. It is the intent of the legislature that salary increases provided under this subsection (4)(c) not increase state general fund support for an institution unless the legislature so determines.

(5) Beginning in the 2017-18 academic year, RCW 28B.15.067 has resulted in the tuition operating fees for resident undergraduates being capped at approximately two percent annually. In recognition that institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue, within funds appropriated to institutions in sections 605 through 611 of this act, additional funding has been provided.

(6) Within funds appropriated to institutions in sections 605 through 611 of this act, teacher preparation programs shall meet the requirements of RCW 28B.10.710 to incorporate information on the culture, history, and government of American Indian people in this state by integrating the curriculum developed and made available free of charge by the office of the superintendent of public instruction into existing programs or courses and may modify that curriculum in order to incorporate elements that have a regionally specific focus.

(7)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education eligible to participate in the state need grant program shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of the state need grant program are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible.

The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of state need grant recipients;

(ii) The number of students on the unserved waiting list of the state need grant;

(iii) Persistence and completion rates of state need grant recipients and students on the state need grant unserved waiting list, disaggregated by institutions of higher education;

(iv) Grade point averages for state need grant recipients and students on the state need grant unserved waiting list; and

(v) State need grant program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state need grant program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. (1) Within the amounts appropriated in this act, each institution of higher education shall seek to:

(a) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment opportunities at campuses;

(b) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment opportunities at university centers and other partnership programs that enable students to earn baccalaureate degrees on community college campuses; and

(c) Eliminate and consolidate programs of study for which there is limited student or employer demand, or that are not areas of core academic strength for the institution, particularly when such programs duplicate offerings by other in-state institutions.

(2) For purposes of monitoring and reporting statewide enrollment, the University of Washington and Washington State University shall notify the office of financial management of the number of full-time student equivalent enrollments for each of their campuses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603.

PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS

(1) The state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College must accept the transfer of college-level courses taken by students under RCW 28A.600.290 or 28A.600.300 if a student seeking a transfer of the college-level courses has been admitted to the state university, the regional university, or The Evergreen State College, and if the college-level courses are recognized as transferrable by the admitting institution of higher education.

(2) Appropriations in sections 606 through 611 of this act are sufficient to implement 2019-21 collective bargaining agreements at institutions of higher education negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW. The institutions may also use these funds for any other purpose including increasing compensation and implementing other collective bargaining agreements.

(3) Within amounts appropriated to institutions in sections 606 through 611 of this act, institutions shall employ at least one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience working with active members of the military or military veterans, to work with student, faculty, and staff veterans, as well as their spouses and dependents, through the institution's veteran resource center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604.

STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

Appropriations in section 605 of this act are sufficient to implement 2019-21 collective bargaining agreements at institutions of higher education negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW and as set forth in part 9 of this act. The institutions may also use these funds for any other purpose including increasing compensation, and implementing other collective bargaining agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605.

FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$727,082,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$751,341,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,505,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$158,572,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$67,784,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,728,284,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2020 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2021.

(2) $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.

(3) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Seattle central college's expansion of allied health programs.

(4) $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.

(5) $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, and $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.

(6) $5,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of guided pathways or similar programs designed to improve student success, including, but not limited to, academic program redesign, student advising, and other student supports.

(7) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.

(8) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:

(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;

(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and

(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.

(9) $19,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $20,056,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(10) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.

(11) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(12) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Wenatchee Valley college wildfire prevention program.

(13) $9,573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $13,083,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z-. . . . (expand career connected learning). Within the amounts provided in this subsection (13):

(a) $8,809,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $10,260,000 in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to backfill the fifty percent tuition waiver for registered apprenticeship and for new career launch programs and courses, as defined in Z-. . . . (expand career connected learning).

(b) $1,271,000 in fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for new student enrollments in career preparation and career launch programs, as defined in Z-. . . . (expand career connected learning).

(c) $329,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $1,117,000 in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for career launch coordinators to oversee the expansion of career launch enrollments and ensure alignment between training plans and courses of study.

(d) $290,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $290,000 in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to facilitate collaboration between high schools, community colleges, and institutions of higher education to align programs for meaningful credit transfer and articulation agreements.

(e) $145,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $145,000 in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for staff to support the cross-agency workgroup and the development of a statewide system of career connected learning.

(14) The state board for community and technical colleges shall collaborate with a permanently registered Washington sector intermediary to integrate and offer related supplemental instruction for information technology apprentices by the 2020-21 academic year.

(15) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Puget Sound welcome back center at Highline College to create a grant program for internationally trained individuals seeking employment in the behavioral health field in Washington state.

(16) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for increased enrollments in the integrated basic education and skills training program. Funding will support approximately 120 additional full-time equivalent enrollments annually.

(17)(a) The state board must provide quality assurance reports on the ctcLink project at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(b) The state board must develop a technology budget using a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, funding sources, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project initiation to implementation. The budget must be updated at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(c) The office of the chief information officer may suspend the ctcLink project at any time if the office of the chief information officer determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated performance measures, implementation timelines, or budget estimates. Once suspension or termination occurs, the state board shall not make additional expenditures on the ctcLink project without approval of the chief information officer. The ctcLink project funded through the community and technical college innovation account created in RCW 28B.50.515 is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 950 of this act.

(18) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education at North Seattle College.

(19) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Highline College to implement the Federal Way higher education initiative in partnership with the city of Federal Way and the University of Washington Tacoma campus.

(20) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Peninsula College to maintain the annual cohorts of the specified programs as follows:

(a) Medical assisting, 40 students;

(b) Nursing assistant, 60 students; and

(c) Registered nursing, 32 students.

(21) $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state labor education and research center at South Seattle College.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606.

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$363,129,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$373,876,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,607,000

University of Washington Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,546,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$36,569,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,079,000

Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$614,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$527,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$50,906,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,910,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,520,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$847,683,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the center for international trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.

(2) $40,692,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $41,628,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(3) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for labor archives of Washington. The university shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(4) $8,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to maintain the number of residency slots available in Washington.

(5) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(6) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,550,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state are provided solely for ocean acidification monitoring, forecasting, and research and for operation of the Washington ocean acidification center. The center must continue to make quarterly progress reports to the Washington marine resources advisory council created under RCW 43.06.338.

(7) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.

(8) $3,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.

(9) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(10) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Latino health center.

(11) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.

(12) $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the continued operations and expansion of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.

(13) $2,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the institute for stem cell and regenerative medicine. Funds appropriated in this subsection must be dedicated to research utilizing pluripotent stem cells and related research methods.

(14) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided to the University of Washington to support youth and young adults experiencing homelessness in the university district of Seattle. Funding is provided for the university to work with community service providers and university colleges and departments to plan for and implement a comprehensive one-stop center with navigation services for homeless youth; the university may contract with the department of commerce to expand services that serve homeless youth in the university district.

(15) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning).

(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the psychiatry residency program at the University of Washington to offer additional residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education.

(17) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Center for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Technologies.

(18)(a) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a University of Washington study in the south Cascades to determine current wolf use and density, and to gather baseline data to understand the effects of wolf recolonization on predator-prey dynamics of species that currently have established populations in the area. The study objectives shall include:

(i) Determination of whether wolves have started to recolonize a 5,000 square kilometer study area in the south Cascades of Washington, and if so, an assessment of their distribution over the landscape as well as their health and pregnancy rates;

(ii) Baseline data collection, if wolves have not yet established pack territories in this portion of the state, that will allow for the assessment of how the functional densities and diets of wolves across the landscape will affect the densities and diets in the following predators and prey: Coyote, cougar, black bear, bobcat, red fox, wolverine, elk, white tailed deer, mule deer, moose, caribou, and snowshoe hare;

(iii) Examination of whether the microbiome of each species changes as wolves start to occupy suitable habitat; and

(iv) An assessment of the use of alternative wildlife monitoring tools to cost-effectively monitor size of the wolf population over the long-term.

(b) A report on the findings of the study shall be shared with the Washington department of fish and wildlife.

(19) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to support the operations and teaching mission of the Harborview Medical Center and the University of Washington Medical Center.

(20) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the University of Washington's psychiatry integrated care training program.

(21) $400,000 of the geoduck aquaculture research account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington sea grant program at the University of Washington to complete a three-year study to identify best management practices related to shellfish production. The University of Washington must submit an annual report detailing any findings and outline the progress of the study, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, to the office of the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by December 1st of each year.

(22) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the University of Washington School of Dentistry to support its role as a major oral health provider to individuals covered by medicaid and the uninsured.

(23) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the pre-law pipeline and social justice program at the University of Washington Tacoma.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607.

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$247,983,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$258,827,000

Washington State University Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$792,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,995,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$276,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$30,954,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$527,827,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,781,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,028,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for new research and extension activities related to soil health.

(2) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a rural economic development and outreach coordinator.

(3) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(4) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(5) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

(6) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning).

(7) $10,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $14,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the continued development and operations of a medical school program in Spokane.

(8) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.

(9) $28,925,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $29,591,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(10) $230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(11) $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the development of an organic agriculture systems degree program located at the university center in Everett.

(12) Within the funds appropriated in this section, Washington State University shall:

(a) Review the scholarly literature on the short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use to assess if other states or private entities are conducting marijuana research in areas that may be useful to the state.

(b) Provide as part of its budget request for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium:

(i) A list of intended state, federal, and privately funded marijuana research, including cost, duration, and scope;

(ii) Plans for partnerships with other universities, state agencies, or private entities, including entities outside the state, for purposes related to researching short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use.

(13) $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2017 (2SSB 5474) (elk hoof disease).

(14) $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the creation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(15) $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the creation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(16) General fund—state appropriations in this section are reduced to reflect a reduction in state-supported tuition waivers for graduate students. When reducing tuition waivers, the university will not change its practices and procedures for providing eligible veterans with tuition waivers.

(17) $1,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 36, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (renewable energy, tax incentives).

(18) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials.

(19) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the office of clean technology at Washington State University to convene a sustainable aviation biofuels work group to further the development of sustainable aviation fuel as a productive industry in Washington. The work group must include members from the legislature and sectors involved in sustainable aviation biofuels research, development, production, and utilization. The work group must provide recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature before December 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608.

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$58,022,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$59,947,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,794,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$134,763,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and at least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(4) $10,390,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,629,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(5) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning).

(6) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(7) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for gathering and archiving time-sensitive histories and materials and planning for a Lucy Covington center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609.

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$56,898,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$59,068,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,076,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,924,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$139,042,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $11,711,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $11,981,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning).

(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610.

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$31,614,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$32,527,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,450,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$69,673,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,562,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,644,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.

(3) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning).

(4) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the college is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(5) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, The Evergreen State College must provide the funding necessary to enable employees of the Washington state institute for public policy to receive the salary increases provided in part 9 of this act.

(6) $2,059,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,031,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to initiate, sponsor, conduct, and publish research that is directly useful to policymakers and manage reviews and evaluations of technical and scientific topics as they relate to major long-term issues facing the state. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (6):

(a) $629,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2020 and $629,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided for administration and core operations.

(b) $1,030,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2020 and $1,002,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for ongoing and continuing studies on the Washington state institute for public policy's work plan.

(c) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to study special education services in public K-12 education systems. The institute will review the available research literature with a focus on evidence from rigorous research regarding impacts of specific special education services on student outcomes. Where available, the study will focus on student success outcomes including successful transitions to life post-high school, student engagement, disciplinary action, and academic outcomes. To the extent possible, the institute will study the cost-effectiveness of various successful approaches to service delivery, including both broad strategies and specific services. The institute shall submit a preliminary report summarizing findings on special education strategies to the legislature and the office of the governor by September 1, 2020, and a final report to the legislature and the office of the governor by June 30, 2021.

(d) Notwithstanding other provisions in this subsection, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2019-21 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611.

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$81,637,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$84,820,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,424,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,831,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$181,712,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $16,164,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $16,536,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning).

(5) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the creation and implementation of an early childhood education degree program at the western on the peninsulas campus. The university must collaborate with Olympic college. At full implementation, the university is expected to grant approximately 75 bachelor's degrees in early childhood education per year at the western on the peninsulas campus.

(6) $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Western Washington University to develop a new program in marine, coastal, and watershed sciences.

(7) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612.

FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$7,892,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$7,340,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,928,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$534,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$20,694,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $955,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning).

(a) $810,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $254,000 in fiscal year 2021 of the amounts provided in this subsection (1) are provided solely to create a career launch program and resource inventory.

(b) $145,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $145,000 in fiscal year 2021 of the amounts provided in this subsection (1) are provided solely for staff to support the cross-agency workgroup and the development of a statewide system of career connected learning.

(2) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the consumer protection unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613.

FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$313,262,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$348,280,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,041,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$93,488,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$116,262,000

Aerospace Training Student Loan Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$216,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$18,000

Health Professionals Loan Repayment and Scholarship

Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$885,587,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $287,627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $320,328,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $69,639,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $88,000,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state need grant and state work study programs, including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.

(2)(a) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, state need grant awards given to private for-profit institutions shall be the same amount as the prior year.

(b) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, grant awards given to private four-year not-for-profit institutions shall be set at the same level as the average grant award for public research universities. Increases in awards given to private four-year not-for-profit institutions shall align with annual tuition increases for public research institutions.

(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.

(4) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for the state need grant includes students with family incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits. Awards for students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent for students with family incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65 percent for students with family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI; 60 percent for students with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent MFI; and 50 percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI.

(5) Of the amounts provided in subsection (1) of this section, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the council to process an alternative financial aid application system pursuant to RCW 28B.92.010.

(6) Students who are eligible for the college bound scholarship shall be given priority for the state need grant program. These eligible college bound students whose family incomes are in the 0-65 percent median family income ranges must be awarded the maximum state need grant for which they are eligible under state policies and may not be denied maximum state need grant funding due to institutional policies or delayed awarding of college bound scholarship students. The council shall provide directions to institutions to maximize the number of college bound scholarship students receiving the maximum state need grant for which they are eligible with a goal of 100 percent coordination. Institutions shall identify all college bound scholarship students to receive state need grant priority. If an institution is unable to identify all college bound scholarship students at the time of initial state aid packaging, the institution should reserve state need grant funding sufficient to cover the projected enrollments of college bound scholarship students.

(7) $3,849,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $4,870,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $23,849,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $28,262,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education shall not consider awards made by the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award amount under RCW 28B.118.010.

(8) $2,759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The council shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 for this purpose.

(9) $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to meet state match requirements associated with the opportunity scholarship program. The legislature will evaluate subsequent appropriations to the opportunity scholarship program based on the extent that additional private contributions are made, program spending patterns, and fund balance.

(10) $3,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for expenditure into the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account. These amounts must be used to increase the number of licensed primary care health professionals to serve in licensed primary care health professional critical shortage areas. Contracts between the office and program recipients must guarantee at least three years of conditional loan repayments. The office of student financial assistance and the department of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the health professional loan repayment and scholarship fund for conditional loan repayment contracts with psychiatrists and with advanced registered nurse practitioners for work at one of the state-operated psychiatric hospitals. The office and department shall designate the state hospitals as health professional shortage areas if necessary for this purpose. The office shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to effectively incorporate three conditional loan repayments into the department's advanced psychiatric professional recruitment and retention strategies. The office may use these targeted amounts for other program participants should there be any remaining amounts after eligible psychiatrists and advanced registered nurse practitioners have been served. The office shall also work to prioritize loan repayments to professionals working at health care delivery sites that demonstrate a commitment to serving uninsured clients.

(11) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of student financial assistance to create a new behavioral health professional conditional scholarship, in consultation with the office of the governor and the planning committee under RCW 28B.115.050. Priority shall be given to students who commit to a course of study leading to a behavioral health profession in a shortage area and to working three years in a state hospital or with a licensed community behavioral health provider that serves publicly funded clients, as defined by the office of the governor and the planning committee. Repayment terms and conditions must be developed in accordance with federal financial loan repayment terms and conditions.

(12) $533,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,819,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning).

(13) $1,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the teacher shortage conditional grant program under RCW 28B.102.090.

(14) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (national guard grant program).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614.

FOR THE WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,393,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,147,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$55,534,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$211,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$176,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$60,461,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium the board shall not designate recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence or recognize them at award ceremonies as provided in RCW 28C.04.535.

(2) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the health workforce council of the state workforce training and education coordinating board. In partnership with the office of the governor, the health workforce council shall continue to assess workforce shortages across behavioral health disciplines. The board shall create a recommended action plan to address behavioral health workforce shortages and to meet the increased demand for services now, and with the integration of behavioral health and primary care in 2020. The analysis and recommended action plan shall align with the recommendations of the adult behavioral health system task force and related work of the healthier Washington initiative. The board shall consider workforce data, gaps, distribution, pipeline, development, and infrastructure, including innovative high school, postsecondary, and postgraduate programs to evolve, align, and respond accordingly to our state's behavioral health and related and integrated primary care workforce needs.

(3) $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 294, Laws of 2018 (future of work task force).

(4) $145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Z- . . . . (expand career connected learning).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615.

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$8,067,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$8,232,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$590,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$16,923,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616.

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$15,432,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$15,586,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$728,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$31,746,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

(2) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operations, expenses, and direct service to students at the state school for the deaf referenced in RCW 72.40.015(2)(a).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617.

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,982,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,028,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,160,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$122,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,342,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618.

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,758,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$3,757,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$230,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,745,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619.

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,059,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,902,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$214,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,175,000

(End of part)

PART VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,192,213,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,276,818,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,273,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$46,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$213,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$566,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,476,159,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$153,170,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$153,174,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,052,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$36,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,904,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EMERGENCY FUND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$850,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$850,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$9,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$9,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$18,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the education technology revolving account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES' INSURANCE ADMINISTRATIVE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$10,000,000

The appropriation in this section IS subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is provided solely for expenditure into the school employees' administrative account for start-up costs for the school employees' benefits program pursuant to RCW 41.05.740. It is the intent of the legislature that this amount, plus interest as determined by the treasurer, be repaid to the general fund—state during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—O'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,794,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,793,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,587,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the enterprise services account for payment of principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for the O'Brien building improvement, project number 20081007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CHERBERG BUILDING REHABILITATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$556,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$556,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,112,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the enterprise services account for payment for the principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for the Cherberg building improvements, project number 2002-1-005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$36,386,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$36,386,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$72,772,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the amounts designated to support public health services, including public health nursing:

Health District

FY 2020

FY 2021

2019-2021

Biennium

Adams County Integrated Health Care Services

$121,213

$121,213

$242,426

Asotin County Health District

$159,890

$159,890

$319,780

Benton-Franklin Health District

$1,614,337

$1,614,337

$3,228,674

Chelan-Douglas Health District

$399,634

$399,634

$799,268

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department

$291,401

$291,401

$582,802

Clark County Public Health

$1,767,341

$1,767,341

$3,534,682

Skamania County Community Health

$111,327

$111,327

$222,654

Columbia County Health District

$119,991

$119,991

$239,982

Cowlitz County Health and Human Services

$477,981

$477,981

$955,962

Garfield County Health District

$93,154

$93,154

$186,308

Grant County Health District

$297,761

$297,761

$595,522

Grays Harbor Public Health and Social Services

$335,666

$335,666

$671,332

Island County Health Department

$255,224

$255,224

$510,448

Jefferson County Public Health

$184,080

$184,080

$368,160

Public Health - Seattle & King County

$12,685,521

$12,685,521

$25,371,042

Kitsap Public Health District

$997,476

$997,476

$1,994,952

Kittitas County Public Health

$198,979

$198,979

$397,958

Klickitat County Public Health

$153,784

$153,784

$307,568

Lewis County Public Health and Social Services

$263,134

$263,134

$526,268

Lincoln County Health Department

$113,917

$113,917

$227,834

Mason County Public Health and Human Services

$227,448

$227,448

$454,896

Okanogan County Public Health

$169,882

$169,882

$339,764

Pacific County Health and Human Services

$169,075

$169,075

$338,150

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department

$4,143,169

$4,143,169

$8,286,338

San Juan County Health and Community Services

$126,569

$126,569

$253,138

Skagit County Health Department

$449,745

$449,745

$899,490

Snohomish Health District

$3,433,291

$3,433,291

$6,866,582

Spokane Regional Health District

$2,877,318

$2,877,318

$5,754,636

Northeast Tri-County Health District

$249,303

$249,303

$498,606

Thurston County Public Health and Social Services

$1,046,897

$1,046,897

$2,093,794

Wahkiakum County Health and Human Services

$93,181

$93,181

$186,362

Walla Walla County Department of Community Health

$302,173

$302,173

$604,346

Whatcom County Health Department

$1,214,301

$1,214,301

$2,428,602

Whitman County Health Department

$189,355

$189,355

$378,710

Yakima Health District

$1,052,482

$1,052,482

$2,104,964

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS

$36,386,000

$36,386,000

$72,772,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—COUNTY CLERK LEGAL FINANCIAL OBLIGATION GRANTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$541,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$441,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$982,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By October 1st of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following county clerk offices in the amounts designated as grants for the collection of legal financial obligations pursuant to RCW 2.56.190:

County Clerk

FY 2020

FY 2021

Adams County Clerk

$2,103

$1,714

Asotin County Clerk

$2,935

$2,392

Benton County Clerk

$18,231

$14,858

Chelan County Clerk

$7,399

$6,030

Clallam County Clerk

$5,832

$4,753

Clark County Clerk

$32,635

$26,597

Columbia County Clerk

$384

$313

Cowlitz County Clerk

$16,923

$13,792

Douglas County Clerk

$3,032

$2,471

Ferry County Clerk

$422

$344

Franklin County Clerk

$5,486

$4,471

Garfield County Clerk

$243

$198

Grant County Clerk

$10,107

$8,237

Grays Harbor County Clerk

$8,659

$7,057

Island County Clerk

$3,059

$2,493

Jefferson County Clerk

$1,859

$1,515

King County Court Clerk

$119,290

$97,266

Kitsap County Clerk

$22,242

$18,127

Kittitas County Clerk

$3,551

$2,894

Klickitat County Clerk

$2,151

$1,753

Lewis County Clerk

$10,340

$8,427

Lincoln County Clerk

$724

$590

Mason County Clerk

$5,146

$4,194

Okanogan County Clerk

$3,978

$3,242

Pacific County Clerk

$2,411

$1,965

Pend Oreille County Clerk

$611

$498

Pierce County Clerk

$77,102

$62,837

San Juan County Clerk

$605

$493

Skagit County Clerk

$11,059

$9,013

Skamania County Clerk

$1,151

$938

Snohomish County Clerk

$38,143

$31,086

Spokane County Clerk

$44,825

$36,578

Stevens County Clerk

$2,984

$2,432

Thurston County Clerk

$22,204

$18,096

Wahkiakum County Clerk

$400

$326

Walla Walla County Clerk

$4,935

$4,022

Whatcom County Clerk

$20,728

$16,893

Whitman County Clerk

$2,048

$1,669

Yakima County Clerk

$25,063

$20,426

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS

$541,000

$441,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711.

BELATED CLAIMS

The agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ANDY HILL CANCER RESEARCH ENDOWMENT FUND MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,500,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account per RCW 43.348.080 to fund the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE EFFICIENCY AND RESTRUCTURING REPAYMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$14,078

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$14,078

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the cleanup settlement account on July 1, 2019, as repayment of moneys that were transferred to the state efficiency and restructuring account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COMMON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$600,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,200,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the common school construction account—state on July 1, 2019, and July 1, 2020, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—NATURAL RESOURCES REAL PROPERTY REPLACEMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the natural resources real property replacement account—state on July 1, 2019, and July 1, 2020, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$227,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$227,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$454,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are provided solely for expenditure into the county criminal justice assistance account—state. The treasurer shall make quarterly distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account of the amounts provided in this section in accordance with RCW 82.14.310 for the purposes of reimbursing local jurisdictions for increased costs incurred as a result of the mandatory arrest of repeat offenders pursuant to chapter 35, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. The appropriations and distributions made under this section constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of services for the purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$133,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$133,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$266,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for expenditure into the municipal criminal justice assistance account. The treasurer shall make quarterly distributions from the municipal criminal justice assistance account of the amounts provided in this section in accordance with RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330, for the purposes of reimbursing local jurisdictions for increased costs incurred as a result of the mandatory arrest of repeat offenders pursuant to chapter 35, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. The appropriations and distributions made under this section constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of services for the purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COMMUNICATION SERVICES REFORM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$4,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the universal communications services fund to fund the temporary universal communications services program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—HOME VISITING SERVICES ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,043,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$3,043,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,086,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account for the home visiting program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OUTDOOR EDUCATION AND RECREATION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$750,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$750,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the outdoor education and recreation account for the state parks and recreation commission's outdoor education and recreation program purposes identified in RCW 79A.05.351. Of the amounts appropriated, $500,000 is provided solely to partner with organizations that employ at least one veteran.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721.

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW. However, $50,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is solely for expenditure into the local public safety enhancement account. Of that $50,000,000, fifty percent of the money in the local public safety enhancement account must be transferred to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system benefits improvement account established in RCW 41.26.805.

(b) The balance of the local public safety enhancement account must be distributed by the state treasurer to all jurisdictions with law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 members, as provided under, and subject to the conditions imposed by, RCW 41.26.800.

(2) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$122,600,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$75,040,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$198,000,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,545,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,855,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$15,400,000

(4) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is provided solely for expenditure into the municipal criminal justice assistance account to ensure the account is not in deficit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MULTIMODAL ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$4,092,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$4,092,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

ORV & Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$22,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$22,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000

State Investment Board Expense Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$36,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Employment Services Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$110,000

Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

Washington State Heritage Center Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$74,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Construction Registration Inspection Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Access Road Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$10,000

Agriculture Local Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$14,000

Antitrust Revolving Fund—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$14,000

Contract Harvesting Revolving Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$2,000

Enterprise Services Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$2,000

Financial Services Regulatory Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$34,000

Foreclosure Fairness Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$2,000

Forest Assessment Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$6,000

Gambling Revolving Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$14,000

Grain Inspection Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$24,000

Horse Racing Commission Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$42,000

Manufactured/Mobile Home Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$4,000

Municipal Revolving Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$56,000

State Historical Museum Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$4,000

Unclaimed Personal Property Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$2,000

Public Works Administration Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$72,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$264,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Local Government Archives Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Administrative Hearings Revolving Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$52,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$158,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$112,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$9,708,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the state multimodal account to fund transit passes for state employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' AND RETIREES' INSURANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,486,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$3,462,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$42,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Business and Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$188,000

Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$18,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$45,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Access Road Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$6,000

Agriculture Local Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$26,000

Columbia River Salmon Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$12,000

Contract Harvesting Revolving Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$2,000

CTS Revolving Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$4,000

Enterprise Services Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$118,000

Forest Assessment Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$12,000

Fruit and Vegetable Inspection Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$46,000

Grain Inspection Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$56,000

Higher Education Dedicated Local Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$502,000

Higher Education Grants/Contract Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$697,000

Higher Education Operating Fees Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$775,000

Imaging Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$2,000

Park Land Trust Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$2,000

School for the Blind Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$4,000

State Forest Nursery Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$14,000

State Parks Educational Enhancement Account—

Non-appropriated
. . . .
$2,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$2,000

University of Washington Hospital Account—

Non-appropriated
. . . .
$770,000

Unclaimed Personal Property Account—Non-appropriated
. . . .
$8,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Construction Registration Inspection Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000

Family and Medical Leave Insurance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Public Works Administration Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$120,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,000

Local Government Archives Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$36,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$166,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$206,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$11,221,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, to provide health flexible spending accounts for certain state employee as specified in sections 908 through 934 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725.

COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$4,734,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$8,790,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$18,000

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,588,000

Performance Audits of State Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$445,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$209,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$15,789,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for wage increases, insurance benefits, and retirement contributions for legislative and judicial branch employees, as shown in OFM document 2019-#1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$12,200,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$12,200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$24,400,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the information technology investment revolving account created in RCW 43.41.433.

(a) Amounts in the account are provided solely for agency organizational change management costs to support the implementation of one Washington.

(b) The state treasurer must transfer moneys from other funds and accounts to the information technology investment revolving account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

(2) One Washington will define the scope of agency readiness activities and establish allocation criteria for an equitable methodology to support agency readiness tasks in 2019-2021. This must be accomplished in consultation with the office of the chief information officer.

(3) Agencies must apply to the one Washington program office for funding from the organizational change management funding pool.

(4) Agencies shall submit their plans to the one Washington program office for approval prior to expenditure.

(5) One Washington will work with agencies to agree upon deliverables and fund organizational change management activities.

(6) Agencies will complete the organizational change management activities and submit a reimbursement request to the one Washington program office.

(7) The office of financial management may suspend or terminate funding provided at any time.

(End of part)

PART VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premium distributions
. . . .
$10,528,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorney

distributions
. . . .
$7,014,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and

education distributions
. . . .
$4,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for public utility

district excise tax distributions
. . . .
$65,022,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution to counties for publicly funded

autopsies
. . . .
$3,464,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for

harbor improvement revenue distributions
. . . .
$140,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for

distribution to "timber" counties
. . . .
$84,202,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$100,948,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$39,774,000

City-County Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$32,706,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise tax distribution
. . . .
$64,079,000

Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account

Appropriation for distribution to local taxing

jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue

redistributions effect of sourcing law changes
. . . .
$2,380,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville

Reservation
. . . .
$8,400,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians
. . . .
$5,717,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor

profits distribution
. . . .
$98,876,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax

distributions
. . . .
$80,000

General Fund Appropriation for Marijuana Excise

Tax distributions
. . . .
$15,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for Habitat Conservation

Program distributions
. . . .
$5,754,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$548,084,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
$1,933,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
$1,289,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control

funds distribution
. . . .
$66,000

General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing

fees distribution
. . . .
$45,000

General Fund Appropriation for federal military

fees distribution
. . . .
$487,000

Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal

forest reserve fund distribution
. . . .
$4,980,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805.

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to

the basic health plan trust account, the lesser

of the amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540

or this amount for fiscal year 2020, $188,000,000

and this amount for fiscal year 2021,

$192,000,000
. . . .
$380,000,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, the lesser of the amount

determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or this amount

for fiscal year 2020, $131,000,000 and this amount

for fiscal year 2021, $135,000,000
. . . .
$266,000,000

Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

cleanup settlement account as repayment of the

loan provided in section 7038, chapter 3, Laws of

2015 3rd sp. sess. (capital budget), $5,470,000 for

fiscal year 2020 and $5,470,000 for fiscal year

2021
. . . .
$10,940,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to

the clean up settlement account as repayment of

the loan provided in section 3022(2), chapter 2,

Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess. (ESB 6074, 2012

supplemental capital budget), $620,000 for fiscal

year 2020 and $620,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$1,240,000

School Employees Insurance Administration Account:

For transfer to the state general fund, $38,730,000

for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$38,730,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed the

actual amount of the annual base payment to the

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$90,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed the

actual amount of the annual base payment to the

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$90,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the statewide tourism

marketing account, $1,500,000 for fiscal year

2020 and $1,500,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$3,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined

sales and use tax account, $2,380,000 for

fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$2,380,000

State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

clean up settlement account as repayment of the

loan provided in section 3022(2), chapter 2,

Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess. (ESB 6074, 2012

supplemental capital budget), $620,000 for

fiscal year 2020 and $620,000 for fiscal year

2021
. . . .
$1,240,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, $4,200,000 for fiscal

year 2020 and $4,200,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$8,400,000

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, $10,000,000 for fiscal

year 2020 and $10,000,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$20,000,000

Disaster Response Account: For transfer to the

state general fund for fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$45,950,000

Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the

education legacy trust account, $70,000,000 for

fiscal year 2020 and $70,000,000 for fiscal

year 2021
. . . .
$140,000,000

Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account: For

transfer to the aquatic lands enhancement

account, $160,000 for fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$160,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account: For transfer to the water pollution

control revolving account, $4,500,000 for

fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806.

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of financial management may allocate as much of this appropriation as necessary to fund changes in agency retirement contributions as a result of passage of chapter 241, Laws of 2018.

(End of part)

PART IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901.

EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS

The appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed from the treasury during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902.

EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS

Whenever allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance in the fund or funds which finance the agency. An appropriation is not necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903.

STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS

In addition to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 and bond retirement and interest, including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94, 39.96, and 39.98 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904.

BOND EXPENSES

In addition to such other appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905.

VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT AND SEPARATION

(1) As a management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies may implement either a voluntary retirement or separation program, or both, that is cost neutral or results in cost savings, including costs to the state pension systems, over a two-year period following the commencement of the program, provided that such a program is approved by the director of financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization may offer voluntary retirement and/or separation incentives and options according to procedures and guidelines established by the office of financial management in consultation with the department of retirement systems. The options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for voluntary separation or retirement. An employee does not have a contractual right to a financial incentive offered under this section. The office of financial management and the department of retirement systems may review and monitor incentive offers. Agencies are required to submit a report by the date established by the office of financial management in the guidelines required in this section to the legislature and the office of financial management on the outcome of their approved incentive program. The report should include information on the details of the program, including the incentive payment amount for each participant, the total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings over the two-year period.

(2) The department of retirement systems may collect from employers the actuarial cost of any incentive provided under this program, or any other incentive to retire provided by employers to members of the state's pension systems, for deposit in the appropriate pension account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED

Nothing in this act prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS

The following sections represent the results of the 2019-2021 collective bargaining process required under the provisions of chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 74.39A RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 908 through 942 of this act are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements. The collective bargaining agreements contained in Part IX of this act may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, premium pay for employees who work in King county, and establishment of a new information technology professional compensation structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WFSE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS UNIQUE CLASSIFICATIONS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees general government for department of corrections unique classifications through an interest arbitration award as provided in a memorandum of understanding between the parties and under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. In addition to the economic provisions applicable to all employees covered by the agreement in section 908 of this act, funding is provided for the awarded increases for targeted job classifications ranging from five to ten percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WPEA

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington public employees association general government under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, premium pay for employees who work in King county, and establishment of a new information technology professional compensation structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WAFWP

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington association of fish and wildlife professionals under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, premium pay for employees who work in King county, and establishment of a new information technology professional compensation structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—PTE LOCAL 17

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the professional and technical employees local 17 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications and premium pay for employees who work in King county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—SEIU HEALTHCARE 1199NW

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 1199nw under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications and additional nurses' premium pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—TEAMSTERS LOCAL 117 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the international brotherhood of teamsters local 117 for the department of corrections through an interest arbitration award as provided in a memorandum of understanding between the parties and chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded four percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, four percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020, and salary adjustments for targeted job classifications. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for other targeted job classifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—TEAMSTERS LOCAL 117 DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the international brotherhood of teamsters local 117 for the department of enterprise services under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—COALITION OF UNIONS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the coalition of unions under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, premium pay for employees who work in King county, loan repayments for eligible physicians and psychiatrists, and recruitment incentives for psychiatrists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WFSE HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITY COLLEGE COALITION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees community college coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, premium pay for employees who work in King county, and establishment of a new information technology professional compensation structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WPEA HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITY COLLEGE COALITION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington public employees association community college coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, premium pay for employees who work in King county, and establishment of a new information technology professional compensation structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol troopers association under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a two and one-half of one percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 920.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WSP LIEUTENANTS AND CAPTAINS ASSOCIATION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol lieutenants and captains association under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a two and one-half of one percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 921.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—SEIU 925

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the service employees international union local 925 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted recruitment and retention for certain job classifications, market adjustments for multiple job classifications, a fully subsidized U-PASS, an increase in the hourly premium rate for standby pay for eligible job classification, a one-time lump sum payment for those in active permanent appointments as of July 1, 2019 and premium pay for working in King county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 922.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—SEIU 1199 RESEARCH/HALL HEALTH

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the service employees international union local 1199 research/hall health under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted recruitment and retention for certain job classifications, a fully subsidized U-PASS, a one-time lump sum payment for those in active permanent appointments as of July 1, 2019 and premium day for working in King county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 923.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—TEAMSTERS LOCAL 117 POLICE

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and teamster local 117 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for increases in longevity premium pay, annual incentive payments for certain educational credentials, and premium pay for working in King county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 924.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—WFSE POLICE MANAGEMENT

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the Washington federation of state employees police management under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for protective footwear allowance and premium pay for working in King county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 925.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the Washington State University and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. For bargaining units 2, 12, 13, 15, and 20, the agreement includes and funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for increases in shift differential and hazard pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 926.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY—WSU POLICE GUILD BARGAINING UNIT 4

An agreement has been reached between the Washington State University and the WSU police guild bargaining unit 4 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. The agreement includes and funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for increases in shift differential, salary for instructor pay, and the field training officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 927.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between Central Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for additional leave for life saving procedures, a one-time signing bonus of two hundred dollars on July 1, 2019, and an across-the-board increase to fifteen dollars per hour for minimum wage. In addition, for campus police, the agreement includes and funding is provided for additional equipment and an increase to range 62.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 928.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—PSE

An agreement has been reached between Central Washington University and the public school employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for a one-time signing bonus of two hundred dollars on July 1, 2019, additional leave for life saving procedures, and an across-the-board increase to fifteen dollars per hour for minimum wage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 929.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between The Evergreen State College and the Washington federation of state employees supervisory and nonsupervisory units under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, a shift differential increase, a one-time lump sum payment of one hundred dollars, and increase to fourteen dollars per hour for minimum wage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 930.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between Western Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining units A, B, and E under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for general government salary range adjustments for targeted job classifications, footwear reimbursement for specific job classification, increase in vacation leave accruals, and a signing incentive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 931.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—PSE

An agreement has been reached between Western Washington University and the public school employees bargaining units D and PT under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for general government salary range adjustments for targeted job classifications, establishment of a new information technology professional compensation structure, footwear reimbursement for specific job classification, increase in vacation leave accruals, and a signing incentive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 932.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between Eastern Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary range adjustments for targeted classifications and a one-time payment of one hundred dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 933.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—YAKIMA VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE—WPEA

An agreement has been reached between Yakima Valley Community College and the Washington public employees association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, establishment of a new information technology professional compensation structure, and in an increase in the hourly minimum wage rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 934.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—HIGHLINE COMMUNITY COLLEGE—WPEA

An agreement has been reached between Highline Community College and the Washington public employees association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for a one-time ratification incentive of four hundred dollars to be paid in fiscal year 2020, salary adjustments for targeted job classifications, an increase in shift premium, additional leave accruals, establishment of a new information technology professional compensation structure, and premium pay for employees working in King county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 935.

COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—HEALTH CARE COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2019-2021 biennium between the governor and the health care coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement, including health flexible spending accounts for eligible employees under the agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $977 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2020. For fiscal year 2021, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $978 per eligible employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 936.

COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE HEALTH CARE COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the coalition for health benefits, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, may not exceed $977 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2020. For fiscal year 2021, the monthly employer funding rate may not exceed $978 per eligible employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 937.

COMPENSATION—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2019-2021 biennium between the governor and the school employee coalition under the provisions of chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW. Appropriations in this act for allocations to school districts are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, school employees' benefits board administration, retiree remittance, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $1,170 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2020. For fiscal year 2021, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1,195 per eligible employee. Employers will contribute one hundred percent of the retiree remittance defined in section 938 of this act.

(2) For the purposes of distributing insurance benefits, certificated staff units as determined in section 502 of this act will be multiplied by 1.02 and classified staff units as determined in section 502 of this act will be multiplied by 1.43.

(3) Except as provided by the parties' health care agreement, in order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the school employees' benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.740. The board shall collect a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(4) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the school employees' medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the school employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts may not be used for administrative expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 938.

COMPENSATION—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The employer monthly funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $977 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2020. For fiscal year 2021, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $978 per eligible employee. These rates assume the use of plan reserves in amounts equivalent to an additional $18 per eligible employee in fiscal year 2020 (for an effective funding rate of $995 per eligible employee) and an additional $76 per eligible employee in fiscal year 2021 (for an effective funding rate of $1,054 per eligible employee). These rates include up to $63 per eligible employee in fiscal year 2020 and $62 per eligible employee in fiscal year 2021 to support the retiree insurance subsidies.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2020 and 2021, the subsidy shall be up to $168 per month. Funds from reserves accumulated for future adverse claims experience, from past favorable claims experience, or otherwise, may not be used to increase this retiree subsidy beyond what is authorized by the legislature in this subsection.

(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a) For each full-time employee, $71.74 per month beginning September 1, 2019, and $72.79 beginning September 1, 2020;

(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $71.74 each month beginning September 1, 2019, and $72.79 beginning September 1, 2020, prorated by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in this subsection do not apply to employees of a technical college, school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 939.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—WFSE LANGUAGE ACCESS PROVIDERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a rate increase of one dollar and twenty four cents per hour for fiscal year 2020 and a rate increase of one dollar and twenty cents per hour for fiscal year 2021. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for a two dollar per hour social service premium for appointments from the department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families, and a travel incentive pilot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 940.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—SEIU LOCAL 775 HOME CARE WORKERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union local 775 under the provisions of chapter 74.39A RCW and 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for wage increases at six month intervals through the term of the agreement and additional adjustments throughout the wage scale. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for increased contributions to the training, health care and retirement trusts, and advanced training incentives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 941.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—SEIU LOCAL 925 CHILDCARE WORKERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union local 925 through an interest arbitration award under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for raising licensed provider rates in all regions to the fifty-fifth market percentile in fiscal year 2020, a six percent increase in fiscal year 2021 for licensed providers, a five cent an hour per child increase in fiscal year 2020 for licensed-exempt providers, and a four percent increase in fiscal year 2021 for licensed-exempt providers. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for seventy five percent payment for half day units when morning and afternoon care is provided, expanded funding, capacity and hours for use of the substitute pools, the career development fund, and an increase to the early achievers tiered reimbursement incentive for levels three and four.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 942.

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—ADULT FAMILY HOME COUNCIL

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for increases to the base daily rates with additional support for training and health care costs. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for increases to the expanded community service daily rate, the specialized behavioral support add-on rate, respite rates, the community integration rate, the meaningful day add-on rate, and a new medical escort fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 943.

GENERAL WAGE INCREASES

(1) Appropriations for state agency employee compensation in this act are sufficient to provide general wage increases to state agency employees who are not represented or who bargain under statutory authority other than chapter 41.80 or 47.64 RCW or RCW 41.56.473 or 41.56.475.

(2) Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, for all classified employees as specified in subsection (1) of this section, employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the office of financial management. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a three percent salary increase effective July 1, 2019, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.

(3) Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2020, for all classified employees as specified in subsection (1) of this section, employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the office of financial management. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a three percent salary increase effective July 1, 2020, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 944.

INITIATIVE 732 COST-OF-LIVING INCREASES

Part IX of this act authorizes general wage increases for state employees covered by Initiative Measure No. 732. The general wage increases on July 1, 2019, and July 1, 2020, provide the annual cost-of-living adjustments required under Initiative Measure No. 732.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 945.

TARGETED COMPENSATION INCREASES

Funding is provided for salary adjustments for targeted job classifications as specified by the office of financial management for classified state employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80 and 47.64 RCW and RCW 41.56.473 and 41.56.475.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 946.

MINIMUM STARTING WAGE

Funding is also provided for a minimum starting wage of fourteen dollars an hour, effective July 1, 2019, and for increases in wages of job classes that are aligned with affected job classes, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80 and 47.64 RCW and RCW 41.56.473 and 41.56.475. This funding is sufficient for general government agencies and higher education institutions to comply with the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 1433 with respect to state employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 947.

PREMIUM PAY

Funding is also provided for a five percent premium pay for employees working in King county, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80 and 47.64 RCW and RCW 41.56.473 and 41.56.475.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 948.

COMPENSATION—REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION RATES

The appropriations in this act for school districts and state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect changes to agency appropriations to reflect pension contribution rates adopted by the pension funding council and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 949.

COMPENSATION—PENSION CONTRIBUTIONS

Appropriations to state agencies include funding for an increase in pension contribution rates for several state pension systems. An increase of fourteen one-hundredths of one percent is funded for state employer contributions to the public employees' and public safety employees' retirement systems. An increase of thirty-two one-hundredths of one percent for school employer contributions to the teachers' retirement system and an increase of fourteen one-hundredths of one percent for employer contributions to the school employees' retirement system are funded. These increases are provided for the purpose of a one-time, ongoing pension increase for retirees in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and teachers' retirement system plan 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 950.

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY OVERSIGHT

(1) Agencies must apply to the office of the state chief information officer for approval before beginning a project or proceeding with each discreet phase of a project subject to this section. At each stage, except for project onset, the office of the state chief information officer must certify that the project has an approved technology budget and investment plan, complies with state information technology and security requirements, and other policies defined by the office of the state chief information officer.

(2) Agencies may apply to the office of financial management to receive funding for the next stage of their project. Allocations and allotments must be made for discrete stages of projects as determined by the technology budget approved by the office of the state chief information officer and office of financial management.

(3) Each agency shall provide the office of the state chief information officer unique financial coding to include at least expenditure authority index, program index, and subobject detail. Each agency shall ensure the project financial budget and expenditures can be tracked by subprojects, gates, deliverables, and other necessary financial data as approved and required by the office of financial management. The technology budget must use a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, each fund source, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the entire project investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project onset through implementation and close out.

(4) The office of the state chief information officer shall report on the dashboard each fiscal month the financial status of information technology projects under oversight.

(5) For certification purposes, each agency shall submit to the office of the state chief information officer and office of financial management:

(a) A technology budget that reflects project budget and costs by fiscal month to include all funding sources used, anticipated deliverables for each stage of the project and subproject, if applicable, and across fiscal periods from project initiation through implementation. Projects with estimated costs greater than one hundred million dollars from initiation to implementation and close out shall be split into subprojects as determined by the office of the state chief information officer with individual technology budgets made available for each subproject. The dashboard will retain a roll up of the entire project, and will also have the subproject detail available. If the project affects more than one agency, a separate technology budget must be prepared for each agency. If the project impacts more than one agency, a statewide project technology budget roll up with each impacted agency will be compiled and added to the dashboard.

(b) An investment plan that includes:

(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities;

(ii) The office of the state chief information officer staff assigned to the project;

(iii) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project;

(iv) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product;

(v) Ongoing maintenance and operations cost of the project post implementation and close out; and

(vi) Financial budget coding to include at least discreet program index and subobject codes.

(6) For any project that exceeds two million dollars in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:

(a) Quality assurance for the project must report independently to the office of the chief information officer;

(b) The office of the chief information officer must review, and, if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;

(c) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;

(d) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed; and

(e) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements.

(7) The office of the state chief information officer must evaluate the project at each stage and certify whether the project is planned, managed, and meeting deliverable targets as defined in the project's approved technology budget and investment plan.

(8) The office of the state chief information officer may suspend or terminate a project at any time if it determines that the project is not meeting or not expected to meet anticipated performance and technology outcomes. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall unallot any unused funding and shall not make any expenditure for the project without the approval of the office of financial management.

(9) The office of the state chief information officer, in consultation with the office of financial management, may identify additional projects to be subject to this section, including projects that are not separately identified within an agency budget.

Sec. 951. RCW 41.26.450 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 963 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Port districts established under Title 53 RCW and institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall contribute both the employer and state shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are law enforcement officers.

(2) Institutions of higher education shall contribute both the employer and the state shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are firefighters.

(3) During fiscal years 2018 and 2019 and during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium:

When an employer charges a fee or recovers costs for work performed by a plan member where:

(a) The member receives compensation that is includable as basic salary under RCW 41.26.030(4)(b); and

(b) The service is provided, whether directly or indirectly, to an entity that is not an "employer" under RCW 41.26.030(14)(b);

the employer shall contribute both the employer and state shares of the cost of the retirement system contributions for that compensation. Nothing in this subsection prevents an employer from recovering the cost of the contribution from the entity receiving services from the member.

Sec. 952. RCW 28B.15.210 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 952 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as follows:

One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account." The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(5). ((During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2017-2019 ((biennium))and 2019-2021 biennia, sums credited to the University of Washington building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

Sec. 953. RCW 28B.15.310 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 953 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the Washington State University building account.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University building account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings, equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. ((During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2017-2019 ((biennium))and 2019-2021 biennia, sums credited to the Washington State University building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the legislature.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university, except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as authorized by law.

Sec. 954. RCW 28B.35.370 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 954 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If in any twelve-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law. ((However, during the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) However, during the 2017-2019 ((biennium))and 2019-2021 biennia, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 955. RCW 28B.50.360 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 955 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all collected building fees of each such community and technical college shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board, if issuing bonds payable out of building fees, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the community and technical college capital projects account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall be devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and architectural services provided by the department of enterprise services, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. ((However, during the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.)) However, during the 2017-2019 ((biennium))and 2019-2021 biennia, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.

(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital projects account may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 956. RCW 28B.115.070 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 958 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After June 1, 1992, the department, in consultation with the office and the department of social and health services, shall:

(a) Determine eligible credentialed health care professions for the purposes of the loan repayment and scholarship program authorized by this chapter. Eligibility shall be based upon an assessment that determines that there is a shortage or insufficient availability of a credentialed profession so as to jeopardize patient care and pose a threat to the public health and safety. The department shall consider the relative degree of shortages among professions when determining eligibility. The department may add or remove professions from eligibility based upon the determination that a profession is no longer in shortage. Should a profession no longer be eligible, participants or eligible students who have received scholarships shall be eligible to continue to receive scholarships or loan repayments until they are no longer eligible or until their service obligation has been completed;

(b) Determine health professional shortage areas for each of the eligible credentialed health care professions.

(2) For the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, consideration for eligibility shall also be given to registered nursing students who have been accepted into an eligible nursing education program and have declared an intention to teach nursing upon completion of the nursing education program.

Sec. 957. RCW 28C.04.535 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 960 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for the ((2017-18 and)) 2018-19, 2019-20, and 2020-21 school years, the Washington award for vocational excellence shall be granted annually. It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of not granting the Washington award for vocational excellence in the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years. The workforce training and education coordinating board shall notify the students receiving the award, their vocational instructors, local chambers of commerce, the legislators of their respective districts, and the governor, after final selections have been made. The workforce training and education coordinating board, in conjunction with the governor's office, shall prepare appropriate certificates to be presented to the selected students. Awards shall be presented in public ceremonies at times and places determined by the workforce training and education coordinating board in cooperation with the office of the governor.

Sec. 958. RCW 43.08.190 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 966 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be known as the "state treasurer's service fund." Such fund shall be used solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation and administration of the state treasurer's office.

Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and accounts specified in RCW 43.79A.040(4)(c). The allocation shall precede the distribution of the remaining earnings as prescribed under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer shall establish a uniform allocation rate for all funds and accounts; except that the state treasurer may negotiate a different allocation rate with any state agency that has independent authority over funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury or in the custody of the state treasurer. In no event shall the rate be less than the actual costs incurred by the state treasurer's office. If no rate is separately negotiated, the default rate for any funds held shall be the rate set for funds held pursuant to statute.

((During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.)) During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent biennia.

Sec. 959. RCW 43.101.200 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 973 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All law enforcement personnel, except volunteers, and reserve officers whether paid or unpaid, initially employed on or after January 1, 1978, shall engage in basic law enforcement training which complies with standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080. For personnel initially employed before January 1, 1990, such training shall be successfully completed during the first fifteen months of employment of such personnel unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission and shall be requisite to the continuation of such employment. Personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990, shall commence basic training during the first six months of employment unless the basic training requirement is otherwise waived or extended by the commission. Successful completion of basic training is requisite to the continuation of employment of such personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission shall provide the aforementioned training together with necessary facilities, supplies, materials, and the board and room of noncommuting attendees for seven days per week, except during the ((2015-2017 and)) 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia when the employing, county, city, or state law enforcement agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel. Additionally, to the extent funds are provided for this purpose, the commission shall reimburse to participating law enforcement agencies with ten or less full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training: PROVIDED, That such reimbursement shall include only the actual cost of temporary replacement not to exceed the total amount of salary and benefits received by the replaced officer during his or her training period.

Sec. 960. RCW 43.155.050 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 5 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 974 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving ((account [fund]))fund and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Not more than twenty percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. ((During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account [fund], and the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.)) During the ((2015-2017 and)) 2017-2019 fiscal ((biennia))biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, and the voluntary stewardship program. ((During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the state general fund such amounts as specified by the legislature.)) During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

Sec. 961. RCW 43.320.110 and 2018 c 185 s 2 and 2018 c 62 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created in the custody of the state treasurer a local fund known as the "financial services regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the divisions of the department of financial institutions, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The division of securities shall deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115 and subsection (3) of this section, and which shall be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.

(3) The division of securities shall deposit one hundred percent of all moneys received that are attributable to increases in fees implemented by rule pursuant to RCW 21.20.340(15).

(4) Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

(5) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund. During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, moneys from the financial services regulation fund may be appropriated for the family prosperity account program at the department of commerce and for the operations of the department of revenue.

(6)(a) Beginning in the 2020-2021 fiscal year, the state treasurer shall annually transfer from the fund to the student loan advocate account created in RCW 28B.77.008, the greater of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars or twenty percent of the annual assessment derived from student education loan servicing.

(b) The department must provide information to the state treasurer regarding the amount of the annual assessment derived from student education loan servicing.

(7) The director's obligations or duties under chapter 62, Laws of 2018 are subject to section 21, chapter 62, Laws of 2018.

(8) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, moneys from the financial services regulation fund may be appropriated for the operations of the department of revenue.

Sec. 962. RCW 43.372.070 and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 938 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The marine resources stewardship trust account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from income derived from the investment of amounts credited to the account, any grants, gifts, or donations to the state for the purposes of marine management planning, marine spatial planning, data compilation, research, or monitoring, and any appropriations made to the account must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) Expenditures from the account may only be used for the purposes of marine management planning, marine spatial planning, research, monitoring, and implementation of the marine management plan.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, until July 1, 2016, expenditures from the account may only be used for the purposes of:

(a) Conducting ecosystem assessment and mapping activities in marine waters consistent with RCW 43.372.040(6) (a) and (c), with a focus on assessment and mapping activities related to marine resource uses and developing potential economic opportunities;

(b) Developing a marine management plan for the state's coastal waters as that term is defined in RCW 43.143.020; and

(c) Coordination under the west coast governors' agreement on ocean health, entered into on September 18, 2006, and other regional planning efforts consistent with RCW 43.372.030.

(4) Expenditures from the account on projects and activities relating to the state's coastal waters, as defined in RCW 43.143.020, must be made, to the maximum extent possible, consistent with the recommendations of the Washington coastal marine advisory council as provided in RCW 43.143.060. If expenditures relating to coastal waters are made in a manner that differs substantially from the Washington coastal marine advisory council's recommendations, the responsible agency receiving the appropriation shall provide the council and appropriate committees of the legislature with a written explanation.

(5) During the ((2015-2017))2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may ((transfer from))direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the marine resources stewardship trust account to the aquatic lands enhancement account ((such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account)).

Sec. 963. RCW 69.50.530 and 2018 c 299 s 909 are each amended to read as follows:

The dedicated marijuana account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received by the state liquor and cannabis board, or any employee thereof, from marijuana-related activities must be deposited in the account. Unless otherwise provided in chapter 4, Laws of 2015 2nd sp. sess., all marijuana excise taxes collected from sales of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products under RCW 69.50.535, and the license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under this chapter from marijuana producer, marijuana processor, marijuana researcher, and marijuana retailer licenses, must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation. During the ((2015-2017 and)) 2017-2019 fiscal ((biennia))biennium, the legislature may transfer from the dedicated marijuana account to the basic health plan trust account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate money from the dedicated marijuana account to the Washington state department of agriculture for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in marijuana.

Sec. 964. RCW 69.50.540 and 2018 c 299 s 910 and 2018 c 201 s 8014 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The legislature must annually appropriate moneys in the dedicated marijuana account created in RCW 69.50.530 as follows:

(1) For the purposes listed in this subsection (1), the legislature must appropriate to the respective agencies amounts sufficient to make the following expenditures on a quarterly basis:

(a) ((Beginning July 1, 2017,))One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the health care authority to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and state liquor and cannabis board. The survey must be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(b) ((Beginning July 1, 2017,))Fifty thousand dollars to the health care authority for the purpose of contracting with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluation and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This appropriation ends after production of the final report required by RCW 69.50.550;

(c) ((Beginning July 1, 2017,))Five thousand dollars to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use; and

(d)(i) An amount not less than one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state liquor and cannabis board for administration of this chapter as appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act;

(ii) Two million six hundred fifty-one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 2018 and three hundred fifty-one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 2019 to the health professions account established under RCW 43.70.320 for the development and administration of the marijuana authorization database by the department of health;

(iii) Two million eight hundred three thousand dollars for fiscal year 2019 to the Washington state patrol for a drug enforcement task force. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium; and

(iv) Ninety-eight thousand dollars for fiscal year 2019 to the department of ecology for research on accreditation of marijuana product testing laboratories.

(((e) Twenty-three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars to the department of enterprise services provided solely for the state building code council established under RCW 19.27.070, to develop and adopt fire and building code provisions related to marijuana processing and extraction facilities. The distribution under this subsection (1)(e) is for fiscal year 2016 only;))

(2) From the amounts in the dedicated marijuana account after appropriation of the amounts identified in subsection (1) of this section and during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium the amounts appropriated to the Washington state department of agriculture for the purpose specified, the legislature must appropriate for the purposes listed in this subsection (2) as follows:

(a)(i) Up to fifteen percent to the health care authority for the development, implementation, maintenance, and evaluation of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle school and high school-age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation, mental health services for children and youth, and services for pregnant and parenting women; PROVIDED, That:

(A) Of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services, at least eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based or research-based programs and practices that produce objectively measurable results and, by September 1, 2020, are cost-beneficial; and

(B) Up to fifteen percent of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services may be directed to proven and tested practices, emerging best practices, or promising practices.

(ii) In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the director of the health care authority must consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute.

(iii) ((For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-seven million seven hundred eighty-six thousand dollars, and))For each ((subsequent)) fiscal year ((thereafter)), the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-five million five hundred thirty-six thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(a);

(b)(i) Up to ten percent to the department of health for the following, subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection (2):

(A) Creation, implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana education and public health program that contains the following:

(I) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(II) A grants program for local health departments or other local community agencies that supports development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of marijuana use by youth; and

(III) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use; and

(B) The Washington poison control center((; and

(C) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the funds appropriated under this subsection (2)(b) may be used for prevention activities that target youth and populations with a high incidence of tobacco use)).

(ii) ((For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of seven million five hundred thousand dollars and))For each ((subsequent)) fiscal year ((thereafter)), the legislature must appropriate a minimum of nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(b);

(c)(i) Up to six-tenths of one percent to the University of Washington and four-tenths of one percent to Washington State University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use, to include but not be limited to formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairment, and for the dissemination of such research.

(ii) ((For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of two hundred seven thousand dollars and))For each ((subsequent)) fiscal year, except for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one million twenty-one thousand dollars to the University of Washington. ((For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one hundred thirty-eight thousand dollars and))For each ((subsequent)) fiscal year ((thereafter)), except for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of six hundred eighty-one thousand dollars to Washington State University under this subsection (2)(c). It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium;

(d) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(e) Five percent to the Washington state health care authority to be expended exclusively through contracts with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(f)(i) Up to three-tenths of one percent to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW.

(ii) For ((the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, and)) each ((subsequent)) fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of five hundred eleven thousand dollars to the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection (2)(f); and

(g) At the end of each fiscal year, the treasurer must transfer any amounts in the dedicated marijuana account that are not appropriated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and this subsection (2) into the general fund, except as provided in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(i) Beginning in fiscal year 2018, if marijuana excise tax collections deposited into the general fund in the prior fiscal year exceed twenty-five million dollars, then each fiscal year the legislature must appropriate an amount equal to thirty percent of all marijuana excise taxes deposited into the general fund the prior fiscal year to the treasurer for distribution to counties, cities, and towns as follows:

(A) Thirty percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns where licensed marijuana retailers are physically located. Each jurisdiction must receive a share of the revenue distribution under this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A) based on the proportional share of the total revenues generated in the individual jurisdiction from the taxes collected under RCW 69.50.535, from licensed marijuana retailers physically located in each jurisdiction. For purposes of this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A), one hundred percent of the proportional amount attributed to a retailer physically located in a city or town must be distributed to the city or town.

(B) Seventy percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns ratably on a per capita basis. Counties must receive sixty percent of the distribution, which must be disbursed based on each county's total proportional population. Funds may only be distributed to jurisdictions that do not prohibit the siting of any state licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer.

(ii) Distribution amounts allocated to each county, city, and town must be distributed in four installments by the last day of each fiscal quarter.

(iii) By September 15th of each year, the state liquor and cannabis board must provide the state treasurer the annual distribution amount, if any, for each county and city as determined in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(iv) The total share of marijuana excise tax revenues distributed to counties and cities in (g)(i) of this subsection (2) may not exceed fifteen million dollars in fiscal years 2018 and 2019 and twenty million dollars per fiscal year thereafter. It is the intent of the legislature that the policy for the maximum distributions in the subsequent fiscal biennia will be no more than fifteen million dollars per fiscal year.

For the purposes of this section, "marijuana products" means "useable marijuana," "marijuana concentrates," and "marijuana-infused products" as those terms are defined in RCW 69.50.101.

Sec. 965. RCW 79.64.040 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 985 and 2017 c 248 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases, sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way issued by the department and affecting state lands and aquatic lands, except as provided in RCW 79.64.130, provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds from agricultural college lands.

(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150 prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, the deductions authorized under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in connection with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and aquatic lands other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the department pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable waters.

(4) In the event that the department sells logs using the contract harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.

(5) During the 2015-2017 ((and)), 2017-2019, and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the board may increase the twenty-five percent limitation up to thirty-two percent.

Sec. 966. RCW 79.64.110 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 315, 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 986, and 2017 c 248 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any moneys derived from the lease of state forestlands or from the sale of valuable materials, oils, gases, coal, minerals, or fossils from those lands, except as provided in RCW 79.64.130, or the appraised value of these resources when transferred to a public agency under RCW 79.22.060, except as provided in RCW 79.22.060(4), must be distributed as follows:

(a) For state forestlands acquired through RCW 79.22.040 or by exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040:

(i) The expense incurred by the state for administration, reforestation, and protection, not to exceed twenty-five percent, which rate of percentage shall be determined by the board, must be returned to the forest development account created in RCW 79.64.100. During the ((2015-2017 and)) 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the board may increase the twenty-five percent limitation up to twenty-seven percent.

(ii) Any balance remaining must be paid to the county in which the land is located or, for counties participating in a land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as determined by the board. Payments made under this subsection are to be paid, distributed, and prorated, except as otherwise provided in this section, to the various funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment.

(iii) Any balance remaining, paid to a county with a population of less than sixteen thousand, must first be applied to the reduction of any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of the county during the year of payment.

(iv) With regard to moneys remaining under this subsection (1)(a), within seven working days of receipt of these moneys, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed to the counties. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment date.

(b) For state forestlands acquired through RCW 79.22.010 or by exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010, except as provided in RCW 79.64.120:

(i) Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development account.

(ii) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools, to the county in which the land is located or, for counties participating in a land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as determined by the board, and according to the relative proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in the county. The portion to be distributed to the state general fund shall be based on the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 (1) and (2) and the levy rate for any maintenance and operation special school levies. With regard to the portion to be distributed to the counties, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed within seven working days of receipt of the money. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment date. The money distributed to the county must be paid, distributed, and prorated to the various other funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment.

(2) A school district may transfer amounts deposited in its debt service fund pursuant to this section into its capital projects fund as authorized in RCW 28A.320.330.

Sec. 967. RCW 79.105.150 and 2018 c 299 s 914 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. During the ((2013-2015, 2015-2017, and)) 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the aquatic lands enhancement account may be used to support the shellfish program, the ballast water program, hatcheries, the Puget Sound toxic sampling program and steelhead mortality research at the department of fish and wildlife, the knotweed program at the department of agriculture, actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification, which may include the creation of a center on ocean acidification, the Puget SoundCorps program, and support of the marine resource advisory council and the Washington coastal marine advisory council. During the ((2013-2015 and)) 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the geoduck aquaculture research account for research related to shellfish aquaculture. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the marine resources stewardship trust account.

(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the recreation and conservation funding board shall:

(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications;

(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration, except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the development and statewide availability of model evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030 in its prioritization and selection process; and

(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.

(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies as defined in RCW 43.41.270.

(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in implementing this section.

(5) Any project designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 968. RCW 70.105D.070 and 2018 c 299 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control account are hereby created in the state treasury.

(2)(a) Moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be deposited as follows: Fifty-six percent to the state toxics control account under subsection (3) of this section and forty-four percent to the local toxics control account under subsection (4) of this section. When the cumulative amount of deposits made to the state and local toxics control accounts under this section reaches the limit during a fiscal year as established in (b) of this subsection, the remainder of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 during that fiscal year must be deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170.

(b) The limit on distributions of moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 to the state and local toxics control accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2013, is one hundred forty million dollars.

(c) In addition to the funds required under (a) of this subsection, the following moneys must be deposited into the state toxics control account: (i) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (ii) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter; and (iii) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature.

(3) Moneys in the state toxics control account must be used only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following activities:

(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;

(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this chapter;

(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;

(e) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness, training, and response activities;

(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;

(j) A public participation program;

(k) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will achieve both: (i) A substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur; and (ii) the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship;

(l) Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70.105.150;

(m) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use, reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;

(n) Stormwater pollution control projects and activities that protect or preserve existing remedial actions or prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(o) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);

(p) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;

(q) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) if:

(i) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone designated under RCW 70.105D.150;

(ii) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(5); and

(iii) The director has found the funding meets any additional criteria established in rule by the department, will achieve a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and will provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup commensurate with the scope of the public funding;

(r) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters;

(s) Appropriations to the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts;

(t) During the ((2015-2017 and)) 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the department of ecology's water quality, shorelands, environmental assessment, administration, and air quality programs;

(u) During the ((2013-2015))2019-2021 fiscal biennium, actions at the state conservation commission to improve water quality for shellfish;

(v) ((During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification;

(w))) During the ((2015-2017 and)) 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, for the University of Washington Tacoma soil remediation project; and

(((x) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be spent on projects in section 3160, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and for transfer to the local toxics control account;

(y) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be transferred to the radioactive mixed waste account; and

(z)))(w) For the ((2015-2017 and)) 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, forest practices regulation at the department of natural resources.

(4)(a) The department shall use moneys deposited in the local toxics control account for grants or loans to local governments for the following purposes in descending order of priority:

(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under (c)(i) of this subsection;

(ii) Remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of properties as provided for under (c)(iv) of this subsection. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions at:

(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;

(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent document under the federal cleanup law;

(iii) Stormwater pollution source projects that: (A) Work in conjunction with a remedial action; (B) protect completed remedial actions against recontamination; or (C) prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(iv) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(v) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(vi) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; and

(vii) Appropriations to the state toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts.

(b) Funds for plans and programs must be allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.

(c) ((During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control account may also be used for local government stormwater planning and implementation activities.

(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general fund, such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

(e))) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments under this subsection:

(i) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions exceeds twenty million dollars. The agreement is subject to the following limitations:

(A) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed ten years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at the facility;

(B) Extended grant agreements may not exceed fifty percent of the total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and

(C) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been entered into to substantially expend the funds;

(ii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the agreement;

(iii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance with a schedule specified in the agreement;

(iv) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments; feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter 43.21C RCW;

(v) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions related to area-wide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding, the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially liable person;

(vi) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the following conditions exists:

(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship imposed by the clean-up liability;

(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development, public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities that would not otherwise occur; or

(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;

(vii) When pending grant applications under (((e)))(c)(iv) and (v) of this subsection (4) exceed the amount of funds available, designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for distribution of available funds.

(((f)))(d) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, the department may purchase remedial action cost-cap insurance. ((For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the local toxics control account may be spent on projects in sections 3024, 3035, 3036, and 3059, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.))

(5) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be spent only after appropriation by statute.

(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics control account may be used for: Natural disasters where there is no hazardous substance contamination; high performance buildings; solid waste incinerator facility feasibility studies, construction, maintenance, or operation; or projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound, funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310. However, this subsection does not prevent an appropriation from the state toxics control account to the department of revenue to enforce compliance with the hazardous substance tax imposed in chapter 82.21 RCW.

(7) ((Except during the 2011-2013 and the 2015-2017 fiscal biennia,))One percent of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 shall be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation that are not expended at the close of any biennium revert to the state toxics control account.

(8) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance. To accelerate both remedial action and economic recovery, the department may expedite the adoption of rules necessary to implement chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. using the expedited procedures in RCW 34.05.353. The department shall initiate the award of financial assistance by August 1, 2013. To ensure the adoption of rules will not delay financial assistance, the department may administer the award of financial assistance through interpretive guidance pending the adoption of rules through July 1, 2014.

(9) Except as provided under subsection (3)(k) and (q) of this section, nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. affects the ability of a potentially liable person to receive public funding.

(10) ((During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium the local toxics control account may also be used for the centennial clean water program and for the stormwater financial assistance program administered by the department of ecology.

(11))) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium:

(a) The state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account may be used for interchangeable purposes and funds may be transferred between accounts to accomplish those purposes.

(b) The legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the state toxics control account to the water pollution control revolving account.

Sec. 969. RCW 90.50A.090 and 2013 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The water pollution control revolving administration account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from charges authorized in this section must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only in a manner consistent with this section.

(2) The department is authorized to assess administration charges as a portion of the debt service for loans issued under the water pollution control revolving fund created in RCW 90.50A.020. The sole purpose of assessing administration charges is to predictably and adequately fund the department's costs of administering the water pollution control revolving fund loan program, as identified in subsection (5) of this section. The department must assess administration charges on each water pollution control revolving fund loan at the point the loan enters repayment status, after July 28, 2013, and rule changes are adopted to implement the administration charge. Loans that are at an interest rate below the established administration charge rate are exempt from the administration charge.

(3) The water pollution control revolving administration account consists of:

(a) Any administration charge levied by the department in conjunction with administration of the water pollution control revolving fund; and

(b) Any other revenues derived from gifts, grants, or bequests pledged to the state for the purpose of administering the water pollution control revolving fund.

(4) The state treasurer may invest and reinvest moneys in the water pollution control revolving administration account in the manner provided by law. All earnings from such investment and reinvestment must be credited to the water pollution control revolving administration account.

(5) Moneys in the water pollution control revolving administration account are to be used for the following water pollution (([control]))control revolving fund loan program costs:

(a) Administration costs associated with conducting application processes, managing contracts, collecting loan repayments, managing the revolving fund, providing technical assistance, and meeting state and federal reporting requirements; and

(b) Information and data system costs associated with loan tracking and fund management.

(6) Each biennium, the department may spend from the water pollution control revolving administration account an amount no greater than four percent of the water pollution control revolving fund new capital appropriation.

(7) For its 2017-2019 biennial operating budget submittal, and every biennium thereafter, the department must compare the projected water pollution control revolving administration account balance and the projected administration charge income with projected program costs, including an adequate working capital reserve as defined by the office of financial management. In its submittal to the office of financial management, the department may:

(a) Find that the projected administration charge income is inadequate to fund the cost of administering the program, and that the rate of the charge must be increased. However, the administration charge may never exceed one percent on the declining principal loan balance;

(b) Find that the projected administration charge income exceeds what is needed to fund the cost of administering the program, and that the rate of the charge must be decreased;

(c) Find that there is an excess balance in the revolving administration account, and that the excess must be transferred to the water pollution control revolving fund to be used for loans; or

(d) Find that there is no need for any rate adjustments or balance transfers.

(8) At the point where the water pollution control revolving administration account adequately covers the program administration costs, the department may no longer use the federal administration allowance. If a federal capitalization grant is awarded after that point, all federal capitalization dollars must be used for making loans.

(9) By December 1, 2018, the department must submit to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees a report on implementation of the administration charge, including information on: The amount of income the administration charge has produced since its inception; the uses and adequacy of the income for administrative costs; any excess balances that have been transferred to the water pollution control revolving fund; and any additional sources that the department is using for program administration.

(10) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the water pollution control revolving administration account to the water pollution control revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 970. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 971. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---