BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 101. 2018 c 299 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$7,712,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($8,025,000))

$8,043,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$671,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($16,408,000))

$16,426,000

Sec. 102. 2018 c 299 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$17,342,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($18,066,000))

$18,212,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,477,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($36,885,000))

$37,031,000

Sec. 103. 2018 c 299 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$55,112,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($58,597,000))

$59,843,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,174,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$676,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$61,089,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,691,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,580,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($188,919,000))

$190,165,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(2) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. The administrator for the courts shall develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.

(3)(a) $7,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $7,313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(b) Each fiscal year during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(4) $12,000,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for the continued implementation of the superior courts case management system. Of the amount appropriated, $8,300,000 is provided solely for expenditures in fiscal year 2018. The remaining appropriation of $3,700,000 is provided solely for expenditures in fiscal year 2019 and shall lapse and remain unexpended if the superior court case management system is not live and fully functional in Cowlitz, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Mason, Pacific, and Skamania counties by July 1, 2017, and Clallum, Jefferson, Kitsap, Skagit, and Whatcom counties by January 1, 2018.

(5) $4,339,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for the information network hub project.

(6)(a) $10,390,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for other judicial branch information technology projects, including:

(i) The superior court case management system;

(ii) The courts of limited jurisdiction case management system;

(iii) The appellate court case management system; and

(iv) Support staff for information technology projects.

(b) Expenditures from the judicial information systems account shall not exceed available resources. The office must coordinate with the steering committee for the superior court case management system and the steering committee for the courts of limited jurisdiction case management system to prioritize expenditures for judicial branch information technology projects. For any competitive procurement using amounts appropriated, the office of the chief information officer must review the qualifications and proposed work plan of the apparently successful bidder prior to final selection and review the proposed vendor contract prior to its execution. The office shall not enter into any contract using appropriated amounts that would cause total information technology expenditures to exceed projected resources in the judicial information systems account in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(7) $811,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for the statewide fiscal impact on Thurston county courts. The administrative office of the courts must collaborate with Thurston county to create a new fee formula that accurately represents the state's impact on Thurston county courts.

(8) $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 272, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1163) (domestic violence).

(9) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 268, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1402) (incapacitated persons/rights).

(10) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for staff to support the superior court judges association as provided in the agreement between the association and the office.

(11) $2,265,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of computer equipment, including servers, routers, and storage system upgrades.

(12) $602,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for state costs for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1783 (legal financial obligations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $1,900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for grants to counties and cities for the impacts from Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1783 (legal financial obligations). Funding must be divided equally between counties and cities and distributed as grants to mitigate demonstrated costs and revenue losses from the legislation. It is the legislature's intent that grants will continue only through the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium as follows: (a) Funding in fiscal year 2020 must be distributed in the same proportion and basis as fiscal year 2019; and (b) funding for fiscal year 2021 must be divided eighty-five percent to counties and fifteen percent to cities and distributed based on demonstrated revenue losses from the legislation. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 104. 2018 c 299 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$14,833,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($17,230,000))

$17,405,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,463,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$44,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($33,570,000))

$33,745,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

(2) $1,075,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $2,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the office to partially implement the civil legal aid reinvestment plan.

(3) $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the addition of five contract attorneys beginning January 1, 2019, to further implement the civil legal aid reinvestment plan.

(4) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the office to automate, deploy, and host a plain language family law forms document assembly system.

(5) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a contract with the international families justice coalition to expand private capacity to provide legal services for indigent foreign nationals in contested domestic relations and family law cases. Moneys may not be expended from this appropriation for private legal representation of clients in domestic relations and family law cases.

Sec. 105. 2018 c 299 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
(($2,697,000))

$2,822,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($3,965,000))

$4,998,000

Public Disclosure Transparency Account
. . . .
$22,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$260,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($6,922,000))

$8,102,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for modernizing and migrating the public disclosure commission's business applications from an agency-based data center to the state data center or a cloud environment.

(2) $875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2938 (campaign finance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 106. 2018 c 299 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$15,708,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($13,742,000))

$14,640,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,793,000))

$7,794,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,219,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$673,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,942,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,387,000

Washington State Heritage Center Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,626,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($959,000))

$960,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($74,049,000))

$74,949,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,301,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $2,932,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $3,011,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of statewide significance during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, $4,000 of the public records efficiency, preservation and access account, and $2,253,000 of the local government archives account appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 303, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1594) (public records administration).

(5) The office of the secretary of state will enter into an agreement with the office of the attorney general to reimburse costs associated with the requirements of chapter 303, Laws of 2017.

(6) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations to expand programming in underserved areas of the state.

(7) $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2406 (election security practices). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to reimburse King county for the cost of prepaid postage on return envelopes for 2018 primary and general election ballots.

Sec. 107. 2018 c 299 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$243,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($252,000))

$270,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($521,000))

$539,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided to the commission on Asian Pacific American affairs to support the Ruth Woo fellow. Funding will provide financial support for the Ruth Woo fellow participating in the governor's leadership academy, a ten-week summer internship program administered by the office of the governor. Funding is provided for, but not limited to, living expenses and travel costs.

Sec. 108. 2018 c 299 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$28,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$32,000

State Auditing Services Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,906,000))

$10,907,000

Performance Audit of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,017,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($13,983,000))

$13,984,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $774,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state auditor's office to conduct a performance audit of the department of health focused on the fee setting for each health profession licensed by the department. The performance audit must include, but is not limited to:

(a) A review of each health profession's process for setting application, licensure, renewal, examination, and indirect fees;

(b) A review of the costs of running each health profession program or board;

(c) An analysis of how any moneys collected as indirect charges levied on a health profession are used by the department; and

(d) A review of any department policies or procedures that have been adopted in an attempt to reduce the fee levels of any of the health professions.

(e) A final report of the performance audit must be submitted to the appropriate legislative policy and fiscal committees by December 1, 2018.

(2) $1,585,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state-funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.

(3) $667,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state auditor's office to conduct a performance audit of Washington charter public schools to satisfy the requirement to contract for an independent performance audit pursuant to RCW 28A.710.030(2). The final report of the performance audit must be submitted to the appropriate legislative policy committees by December 31, 2018. The audit must include ten schools currently in operation and, subject to the availability of data, must include, but is not limited to evaluating, the following operational and academic outcomes:

(a) Whether the charter school has a charter contract that includes performance provisions based on a performance framework that sets forth academic and operational performance indicators, measures, and metrics;

(b) Whether the charter school performance framework includes indicators, measures, and metrics for student academic proficiency, student academic growth, achievement gaps in both proficiency and growth between major student subgroups, attendance, recurrent enrollment from year to year, financial performance and sustainability, and charter school board compliance with applicable laws, rules and terms of the charter contract; and

(c) Whether the charter school performance framework includes a disaggregation of student performance data by major student subgroups, including gender, race and ethnicity, poverty status, special education status, English language learner status, and highly capable status.

(4) $700,000 of the auditing services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state auditor's office to conduct ten additional program or agency audits.

Sec. 109. 2018 c 299 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$7,868,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$8,300,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,945,000))

$13,247,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,143,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($251,030,000))

$252,517,000

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$273,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,511,000))

$3,945,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,723,000

Child Rescue Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Local Government Archives Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$660,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,606,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($289,559,000))

$292,782,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

(4) $353,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $353,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a grant to the Washington coalition of crime victim advocates to provide training, certification, and technical assistance for crime victim service center advocates.

(5) $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1055) (military members/pro bono).

(6) $49,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 268, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1402) (incapacitated persons/rights).

(7) $276,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $259,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 294, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5835) (health outcomes/pregnancy).

(8) $22,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1258) (first responders/disability).

(9) $35,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 249, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1714) (nursing staffing/hospitals).

(10) $361,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation and $660,000 of the local government archives account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 303, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1594) (public records administration).

(11) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 243, Laws of 2017 (HB 1352) (small business owners).

(12) $67,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 320, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5322) (dentists and third parties).

(13) $11,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 53, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1120) (regulatory fairness act).

(14) $26,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2578 (housing options). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $119,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 1, Laws of 2018 (ESSB 6091).

(16) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6029 (student loan bill of rights). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $48,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2938 (campaign finance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $116,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1439 (higher education student protection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $72,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1889 (corrections ombuds, creating). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1298 (job applicants/arrests). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $350,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional expert witness assistance for the public counsel unit.

Sec. 110. 2018 c 299 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$64,290,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($77,359,000))

$77,366,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($295,840,000))

$300,941,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,922,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,086,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$507,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$237,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,268,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,866,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,974,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,398,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,628,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,615,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$841,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$44,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,613,000

Energy Freedom Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$663,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,648,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$468,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,618,000

Statewide Tourism Marketing Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

Life Sciences Discovery Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($557,481,000))

$562,589,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.

(2) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(3) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(4) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(5) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(6) $2,642,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account—state appropriation and $2,960,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086.

(7) $5,607,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(8)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, $24,734,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation, and $8,860,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant. Of the amounts appropriated, $5,000,000 is provided solely for emergency assistance to homeless families in the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(b) The department must distribute appropriated amounts from the home security account through performance-based contracts. The contracts must require that auditable documentation for the performance and financial metrics be provided to the joint legislative audit and review committee as requested for performance audits.

(9) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Tourism; (b) agriculture, wood products, and other natural resource industries; and (c) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.

(10) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(11) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(12) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the expansion of the current long-term care ombuds program to meet the immediate needs of individuals by advocating on behalf of and protecting residents of long-term care facilities from abuse, neglect, and exploitation.

(13) Within existing resources, the department of commerce shall consult with key crime victim services stakeholders to inform decisions about the funding distribution for federal fiscal years 2017-2019 victims of crime act victim assistance funding. These stakeholders must include, at a minimum, children's advocacy centers of Washington, Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, Washington coalition against domestic violence, Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, Washington coalition of crime victim advocates, at least one representative from a child health coalition, and other organizations as determined by the department. Funding distribution considerations shall include, but are not limited to, geographic distribution of services, underserved populations, age of victims, best practices, and the unique needs of individuals, families, youth, and children who are victims of crime.

(14) $643,000 of the liquor excise tax account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce to provide fiscal note assistance to local governments.

(15) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.

(16) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the regulatory roadmap program for the construction industry and to identify and coordinate with businesses in key industry sectors to develop additional regulatory roadmap tools.

(17) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.

(18) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 268, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1402) (incapacitated persons/rights).

(19) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely as a grant to the Hoh Indian tribe for critical infrastructure, including a backup electrical power generator to address recurrent power outages in the community.

(20) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for capacity-building grants through the Latino community fund to promote and improve education, economic empowerment, arts and culture, civic engagement, health, and environmental justice for Latino communities in Washington state.

(21) $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.

(22) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 290, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1109) (victims of sexual assault).

(23) $1,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation, $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation, and $1,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.

(24)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $2,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:

(i) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and

(ii) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and ensure providers have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,750,000 is provided solely for the department to decrease homelessness of youth under 18 years of age though increasing shelter capacity statewide with preference given to increasing the number of contracted HOPE beds and crisis residential center beds.

(c) The department must distribute appropriated amounts from the home security account through performance-based contracts. The contracts must require that auditable documentation for the performance and financial metrics be provided to the joint legislative audit and review committee as requested for performance audits.

(25) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to create a behavioral health supportive housing administrator within the department to coordinate development of effective behavioral health housing options and services statewide to aide in the discharge of individuals from the state psychiatric hospitals. This position must work closely with the health care authority, department of social and health services, and other entities to facilitate linkages among disparate behavioral health community bed capacity-building efforts. This position must work to integrate building infrastructure capacity with ongoing supportive housing benefits, and must also develop and maintain a statewide inventory of mental health community beds by bed type.

(26)(a) $1,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to administer the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.

(b) The department must distribute appropriated amounts from the home security account through performance-based contracts that require, at a minimum, monthly reporting of performance and financial metrics. The contracts must require that auditable documentation for the performance and financial metrics be provided to the joint legislative audit and review committee as requested for performance audits.

(27) $990,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for 150 community beds for individuals with a history of mental illness. Currently, there is little to no housing specific to populations with these co-occurring disorders; therefore, the department must consider how best to develop new bed capacity in combination with individualized support services, such as intensive case management and care coordination, clinical supervision, mental health, substance abuse treatment, and vocational and employment services. Case-management and care coordination services must be provided. Increased case-managed housing will help to reduce the use of jails and emergency services and will help to reduce admissions to the state psychiatric hospitals. The department must coordinate with the health care authority and the department of social and health services in establishing conditions for the awarding of these funds. The department must contract with local entities to provide a mix of (a) shared permanent supportive housing; (b) independent permanent supportive housing; and (c) low and no-barrier housing beds for people with a criminal history, substance abuse disorder, and/or mental illness.

Priority for permanent supportive housing must be given to individuals on the discharge list at the state psychiatric hospitals or in community psychiatric inpatient beds whose conditions present significant barriers to timely discharge.

(28) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.

(29) $512,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely to complete the requirements of the agricultural labor skills and safety grant program in chapter 43.330 RCW. This program expires July 1, 2018.

(30) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 225, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5713) (skilled worker program).

(31) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the wildfire project in the Wenatchee valley to provide public education on wildfire and forest health issues.

(32) $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for community mobilization grants to safe Yakima and safe streets of Tacoma to foster community engagement through neighborhood organizing, law enforcement-community partnerships, neighborhood watch programs, youth mobilization, and business engagement.

(33)(a) $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to create el nuevo camino pilot project for the purpose of addressing serious youth gang problems in midsize counties in eastern Washington. El nuevo camino pilot project must include one grant to an eligible applicant for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. The department shall adopt policies and procedures as necessary to administer the pilot project, including the application process, disbursement of the grant award to the selected applicant, and tracking compliance and measuring outcomes. Partners, grant recipients, prosecutors, mental health practitioners, schools, and other members of the el nuevo camino pilot project, shall ensure that programs, trainings, recruiting, and other operations for el nuevo camino pilot project prohibit discriminatory practices, including biased treatment and profiling of youth or their communities. For the purposes of this subsection, antidiscriminatory practices prohibit grant recipients or their partners from using factors such as race, ethnicity, national origin, immigration or citizenship status, age, religion, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, and disability in guiding or identifying affected populations.

(b) An eligible applicant:

(i) Is a county located in Washington or its designee;

(ii) Is located east of the Cascade mountain range with an estimated county population between ninety thousand and one hundred thousand as of January 1, 2017;

(iii) Has an identified gang problem;

(iv) Pledges and provides a minimum of sixty percent of matching funds over the same time period of the grant;

(v) Has established a coordinated effort with committed partners, including law enforcement, prosecutors, mental health practitioners, and schools;

(vi) Has established goals, priorities, and policies in compliance with the requirements of (c) of this subsection; and

(vii) Demonstrates a clear plan to engage in long-term antigang efforts after the conclusion of the pilot project.

(c) The grant recipient must:

(i) Work to reduce youth gang crime and violence by implementing the comprehensive gang model of the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974;

(ii) Increase mental health services to unserved and underserved youth by implementing the best practice youth mental health model of the national center for mental health and juvenile justice;

(iii) Work to keep high-risk youth in school, reenroll dropouts, and improve academic performance and behavior by engaging in a grass roots team approach in schools with the most serious youth violence and mental health problems, which must include a unique and identified team in each district participating in the project;

(iv) Hire a project manager and quality assurance coordinator;

(v) Adhere to recommended quality control standards for Washington state research-based juvenile offender programs as set forth by the Washington state institute for public policy; and

(vi) Report to the department by September 1, 2019, with the following:

(A) The number of youth and adults served through the project and the types of services accessed and received;

(B) The number of youth satisfactorily completing chemical dependency treatment in the county;

(C) The estimated change in domestic violence rates;

(D) The estimated change in gang participation and gang violence;

(E) The estimated change in dropout and graduation rates;

(F) The estimated change in overall crime rates and crimes typical of gang activity;

(G) The estimated change in recidivism for youth offenders in the county; and

(H) Other information required by the department or otherwise pertinent to the pilot project.

(d) The department shall report the information from (c)(vi) of this subsection and other relevant data to the legislature and the governor by October 1, 2019.

(34)(a) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the department must revise its agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(i) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(ii) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(A) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(B) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(C) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(b) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the department or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(c) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(35) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 315, Laws of 2017 (ESB 5128) (incremental energy).

(36) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 279, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1988) (vulnerable youth guardians).

(37) $468,000 of the financial services regulation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family prosperity account program.

(38) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.

(39) The entire home security account appropriation in this section is provided solely for administration through performance-based contracts that require, at a minimum, monthly reporting of performance and financial metrics. The contracts must require that auditable documentation for the performance and financial metrics be provided to the joint legislative audit and review committee as requested for performance audits.

(40)(a) $250,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a consultant to study strategies for increasing the competitiveness of rural businesses in securing local government contracts within their same rural county, and for providing outreach services to employers in rural communities. The consultant must:

(i) Be a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization;

(ii) Be located in a county with a population of less than two million; and

(iii) Provide statewide business representation and expertise with relevant experience in the evaluation of rural economies.

(b) The study must include the following:

(i) An analysis of the net economic and employment impacts to rural communities of awarding local government contracts to businesses outside the rural county in comparison to awarding local government contracts to businesses based in the same rural county;

(ii) A survey of local government entities to collect relevant data to include but not be limited to: The total number and amount of contracts awarded in 2015 and 2016 by local governments in rural counties; the number and amount of contracts awarded to businesses based in rural counties in comparison to the number and amounts awarded to businesses based in nonrural counties; the number of contracts where a rural business responded to a request for proposal but was not the minimum bidder; the percentage spread between the rural business and the lowest bidder; and the number of times the local government moved to the next most qualified bidder in a request for qualification out of the total professional service contracts awarded;

(iii) A review of current regulations and best practices in other jurisdictions. The study must identify existing policy barriers, if present, and potential policy changes to increase the competitiveness of rural businesses in securing local government contracts within their same geographic region, including but not be limited to the risks and benefits of establishing a preference for local businesses for rural government contracts; and

(iv) Discussion on the implications for projects that receive federal funding.

The study must be provided to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2017.

(c) The department's external relations division must expand existing outreach services offered to rural employers to include training on processes to compete effectively for public works contracts within their communities. The external relations division must receive training on contract law to better support their outreach services. The cost of the training may not exceed $10,000.

(41) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the Federal Way day center to provide housing and other assistance to persons over 18 experiencing homelessness.

(42) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5254 (buildable lands and zoning). If this bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(43) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for staff and upgrades to the homeless management information system.

(44) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the current state of data center industry in Washington and whether changes to existing state policies would result in additional investment and job creation in Washington as well as advance the development of the state's technology ecosystems. The study is due to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017.

(45) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for 2018 is provided solely for the department to formulate a statewide tourism marketing plan in collaboration with a nonprofit statewide tourism organization as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5251.

(46) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely as a grant to Klickitat county for a land use planner to process a backlog of permits that have not been processed by the Columbia river gorge commission due to lack of funds.

(47)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a contract to study and report on independent contractor employment in Washington state. The contractor shall provide to the department an interim report to include a substantive update by November 1, 2018. The contractor report shall be provided to the department by June 1, 2019. The report must include information on the needs of workers earning income as independent contractors including sources of income, the amount of their income derived from independent work, and a discussion of the benefits provided to such workers.

(b) The department must convene an advisory committee to provide assistance with the development of the study. The advisory committee must comprise:

(i) Individuals from the public and private sector with expertise in labor laws;

(ii) Representatives of labor unions;

(iii) Representatives from nonprofit organizations promoting economic security and educational opportunity; and

(iv) Individuals from business and industry.

(48) $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to expand the small business export assistance program and ensure that at least one new employee is located outside the city of Seattle for purposes of assisting rural businesses with export strategies; and for continuing the economic gardening program.

(49) $1,500,000 of the statewide tourism marketing account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Fourth Substitute Senate Bill No. 5251 (tourism marketing). Of the amount appropriated, $198,000 is provided solely for expenditures of the department that are related to implementation of the statewide tourism marketing program and operation of the authority. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(50) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6175 (common interest ownership). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(51) $1,576,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for administration and pass-through funding to assist Whatcom, Snohomish, King, Pierce, Kitsap, Thurston, and Clark counties with the implementation of chapter 16, Laws of 2017 3rd sp.s. (E2SSB 5254).

(52) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the city of Issaquah to host a regional or national sports medicine conference.

(53) $149,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to fund a pilot project in Clark county to increase access to local workforce training. Funding must be used to contract with Partners in Careers to complete an assessment of basic literacy skills in connection to classes at Clark college or other programs to support the reading and math skills needed to complete workforce training; for case management to connect job seekers to community resources; and to support first time users or returners navigating the WorkSource system and engagement in on-the-job training and industry specific training in high demand fields.

(54) $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Port Angeles for the cost of analyzing bio char samples for evidence of dioxins, PAHs, and flame retardants and any other chemical compounds through a certified laboratory. Analysis results must be shared with local interest groups.

(55) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to conduct a survey of homeless youth service and informational gaps, especially in nonurban areas, with an emphasis on providing nonurban school districts with adequate informational resources related to homeless youth and youth in crisis services available in their community.

(((57)))(56) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Yakima to establish a gang prevention pilot program. The pilot program shall have the goal of creating a sustainable organized response to gang activity utilizing evidence-based resources.

(((58)))(57) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a grant to the Seattle science foundation to develop a comprehensive 3D spinal cord atlas with the goal of providing clinicians and researchers with a digital map of the spinal cord.

(((59)))(58) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington state microenterprise association to assist people with limited incomes in nonmetro areas of the state to start and sustain small businesses and embrace the effects of globalization.

(((60)))(59) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2367 (child care collaboration task force). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((61)))(60) $174,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute House Bill No. 2382 (surplus public property). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((62)))(61) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2667 (essential needs/ABD programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((63)))(62)(a) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $300,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with a consultant to study the current and ongoing impacts of the SeaTac international airport. The general fund—state funding provided in this subsection serves as a state match and may not be spent unless $300,000 of local matching funds is transferred to the department. The department must seek feedback on project scoping and consultant selection from the cities listed in (b) of this subsection.

(b) The study must include, but not be limited to:

(i) The impacts that the current and ongoing airport operations have on quality of life associated with air traffic noise, public health, traffic, congestion, and parking in residential areas, pedestrian access to and around the airport, public safety and crime within the cities, effects on residential and nonresidential property values, and economic development opportunities, in the cities of SeaTac, Burien, Des Moines, Tukwila, Federal Way, Normandy Park, and other impacted neighborhoods; and

(ii) Options and recommendations for mitigating any negative impacts identified through the analysis.

(c) The department must collect data and relevant information from various sources including the port of Seattle, listed cities and communities, and other studies.

(d) The study must be delivered to the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(((64)))(63)(a) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department of commerce to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization to assist fathers transitioning from incarceration to family reunification. The grant recipient must have experience contracting with:

(i) The department of corrections to support offender betterment projects; and

(ii) The department of social and health services to provide access and visitation services.

(b) The grant recipient must provide data on program outcomes to the Washington statewide reentry council. This data must be included in the Washington statewide reentry council's report of activities and recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature as required by RCW 43.380.050.

(((65)))(64) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department of contract with organizations and attorneys to provide legal representation and/or referral services for legal representation to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under this contract must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(((66)))(65) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a small business innovation exchange project to increase economic development opportunities for women, minority, and veteran owned small businesses in the south King county region.

(((67)))(66) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Federal Way for an emergency shelter to serve homeless families with children.

(((68)))(67) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for capacity-building grants through the united Indians of all tribes foundation to promote and improve educational, cultural, and social services for Native American communities in Washington state.

(((69)))(68) $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2101 (sexual assault nurse examiners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((70)))(69) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a grant to the Douglas county associate development organization that serves on the core leadership team of the Wenatchee valley's our valley our future community and economic development program to support communities adversely impacted by wildfire damage and the reduction of aluminum smelter facilities.

(((71)))(70) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for providing grants for a criminal justice diversion center pilot program in Snohomish county. Snohomish county must collect and report data from the pilot program to the department of commerce. The department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2019. The report must contain, at a minimum:

(a) An analysis of arrests and bookings for individuals served in the pilot program;

(b) An analysis of connections to behavioral health services made for individuals who were served by the pilot program;

(c) An analysis of impacts on housing stability for individuals served by the pilot program; and

(d) The number of individuals served by the pilot program who were connected to a detoxification program, completed a detoxification program, completed a chemical dependency assessment, completed chemical dependency treatment, or were connected to housing.

(((72)))(71) $5,869,000 of the home security fund account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1570 (homeless housing and assistance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((73)))(72) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a museum to assist with armistice day activities in schools and other community settings to celebrate the 100th anniversary of World War I and armistice day. Funding must be used for a World War I America museum exhibit, new curriculum, teacher training, student and classroom visits, and visits from veterans and active duty military.

(((74)))(73) $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to expand the state's capacity to enforce the lead-based paint program.

(((75)))(74) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.

(((76)))(75) $50,000 of the life sciences discovery fund—state appropriation is provided solely for grants as generally described in chapter 43.350 RCW.

(((77)))(76) $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1022 (crime victim participation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((78)))(77) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $116,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2580 (renewable natural gas). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((79)))(78) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department of commerce to (a) develop a state economic growth strategy related to accelerating technology innovation; and (b) establish the feasibility and devise a plan for establishing a manufacturing innovation institute.

Sec. 111. 2018 c 299 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$11,775,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$12,440,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$39,714,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($843,000))

$844,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$314,000

Recreation Access Pass Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Personnel Service Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,891,000))

$8,991,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$620,000

Statewide Information Technology System Development

Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,022,000

OFM Central Services—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,280,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,448,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($107,919,000))

$108,020,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section represent a transfer of expenditure authority of $4,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation from the health care authority to the office of financial management to implement chapter 246, Laws of 2015 (all-payer health care claims database).

(2)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education eligible to participate in the state need grant shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of the state need grant program are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of state need grant recipients;

(ii) The number of students on the unserved waiting list of the state need grant;

(iii) Persistence and completion rates of state need grant recipients and students on the state need grant unserved waiting list, disaggregated by institutions of higher education;

(iv) State need grant recipients and students on state need grant unserved waiting list grade point averages; and

(v) State need grant program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for the state need grant program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

(3) $149,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to implement chapter 172, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1741) (educator preparation data/PESB).

(4) $84,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to implement chapter 53, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1120) (regulatory fairness act).

(5) The office of financial management must perform a legal and policy review of whether the lead organization of the statewide health claims database established in chapter 43.371 RCW may collect certain data from drug manufacturers and use this data to bring greater public transparency to prescription drug prices. Specifically, the review must analyze whether the organization may collect and use manufacturer's pricing data on high-cost new and existing prescription drugs, including itemized production and sales data and Canadian pricing. The office of financial management must report by December 15, 2017, to the health care committees of the legislature the results of the study and any necessary legislation to authorize the collection of pricing data and to produce public analysis and reports that help promote prescription drug transparency.

(6) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $139,000 of the personnel service account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1661 (children, youth, families department). The cost allocation contract must include a determination of the amount of administrative funding to be transferred between appropriations in sections 223(1) and 223(2) of this act to section 222(3) of this act for the new department of children, youth, and families. If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $8,022,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for readiness activities related to the One Washington replacement project to modernize and improve administrative systems and related business processes across state government over a multi-biennia time period and this project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act. The funding provided in this subsection is for conducting business warehouse planning and system integrations and contracting with a strategic partner for the design of the long-term program blueprint detailing the readiness, planning, and implementation activities related to this project. Legislative expectation is that the strategic partner selected for this design of this long-term blueprint will have proven experience in successfully managing similar efforts in other states or jurisdictions and that the ultimate project scope will integrate performance information and provide information on discrete units of costs for state governmental activities with the goal of improved management and efficiency. The office of financial management will provide the needed management support for this design effort and will ensure that state agencies fully participate in this initial design effort, including the office of chief information officer. The office of financial management will provide quarterly reports to the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee. Before submitting additional funding requests for this project, the office of financial management will submit a comprehensive detailed feasibility study and financial plan for the project to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

(8) $4,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the procurement and implementation of the Washington state all payer claims database project and this project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(9) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $140,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to incorporate long-term inpatient care as defined in RCW 71.24.025 into the psychiatric managed care capitation risk model. The model shall be submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017. The model must integrate civil inpatient psychiatric hospital services including ninety and one hundred eighty day commitments provided in state hospitals or community settings into medicaid managed care capitation rates and nonmedicaid contracts. The model should phase-in the financial risk such that managed care organizations bear full financial risk for long-term civil inpatient psychiatric hospital commitments beginning January 2020. The model must address strategies to ensure that the state is able to maximize the state's allotment of federal disproportionate share funding.

(10) The office of financial management will convene a work group consisting of the department of social and health services and appropriate fiscal and policy staff from the house of representatives office of program research and senate committee services for the purpose of reviewing language traditionally added to section 201 in supplemental operating omnibus appropriations acts to allow the department to transfer moneys between sections of the act and to allow for moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose. The work group will review the department's use of the language, develop options to reduce or eliminate the need for this language, and explore revisions to the language. The work group must also discuss alternatives to the language to achieve the shared goal of balancing expenditures to appropriation while preserving the legislature's ability to direct policy through appropriation. Alternatives should include increased use of supplemental budget decision packages, the creation of a reserve fund for unanticipated expenditures, and other measures the work group develops.

(11) Within existing resources, the labor relations section shall produce a report annually on workforce data and trends for the previous fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include a workforce profile; information on employee compensation, including salaries and cost of overtime; and information on retention, including average length of service and workforce turnover.

(12) $75,000 of the recreation access pass account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management, in consultation with the parks and recreation commission, department of natural resources, and department of fish and wildlife, to further analyze the cost and revenue potential of the options and recommendations in Recreation Fees in Washington: Options and Recommendations (The William D. Ruckelshaus Center, December 2017). The office must collaborate with other relevant agencies and appropriate stakeholders. The office must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2018. For each of the options, the report must:

(a) Identify the types of recreational access pass products, exemption and discount types, and levels;

(b) Specify price points and projected demand for each type of recreational access pass product that would result in revenue increases of five percent, ten percent, and fifteen percent;

(c) Describe implementation and logistical considerations of selling each of the options through a single place on the internet or through the department of fish and wildlife's licensing system;

(d) Identify fiscal impacts of changing the state access pass to each of the options identified including any combination state and federal recreational access pass options; and

(e) Provide any additional recommendations for implementation, transition, or changes in state law needed to implement each of the options.

(13) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely to support the implementation of the department of children, youth, and families. The department must submit an expenditure plan to the office of financial management and may expend implementation funds after the approval of the director of the office of financial management.

(14) The office of financial management must purchase a workiva software product that will produce the comprehensive annual financial report and other fiscal reports within existing resources.

(15) The office of financial management must procure GovDelivery, a software as a service, that enables government organizations to connect with citizens within existing resources.

(16) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 192, Laws of 2017 (SB 5849).

(17) $192,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $288,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the office of financial management to contract with an entity or entities with expertise in public finance, commercial, and public banking to:

(a) Evaluate the benefits and risks of establishing and operating a state-chartered, public cooperative bank in the state of Washington, specifically including the business and operational issues raised by the 2017 infrastructure and public depository task force; and

(b) Develop a business plan for a public cooperative bank based on the federal home loan bank model whose members may only be the state and/or political subdivisions. The purpose of this bank is to assist the potential members of the bank to manage cash and investments more efficiently to increase yield while maintaining liquidity, and to establish a sustainable funding source of ready capital for infrastructure and economic development in the state of Washington. The business plan shall include, but is not limited to:

(i) Identification of potential members of the bank;

(ii) The capital structure that would be necessary;

(iii) Potential products the bank might offer;

(iv) Projections of earnings;

(v) Recommendations on corporate governance, accountability, and assurances;

(vi) Legal, constitutional, and regulatory issues;

(vii) If needed, how to obtain a federal master account and join the federal reserve;

(viii) Information technology security and cybersecurity;

(ix) Opportunities for collaborating with other financial institutions;

(x) Impacts on the state's debt limit;

(xi) In the event of failure, the risk to taxpayers, including any impact on Washington's bond rating and reputation;

(xii) Potential effects on the budgets and existing state agencies programs; and

(xiii) Other items necessary to establish a state-chartered, public cooperative bank modeled after the federal home loan bank or other similar institution.

The office of financial management shall facilitate the timely transmission of information and documents from all appropriate state departments and state agencies to the entity hired to carry out its contract. A status report must be provided to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018, and final report and business plan provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2019. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(18) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided to the education research and data center within the office of financial management for the sole purpose of providing a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2019, on postsecondary enrollment and completion of Washington students with demographic information included on race, ethnicity, gender, students with disabilities, English language proficiency, income level, region, and types of credentials, including but not limited to in- and out-of-state public and private traditional two- and four-year degree granting institutions, private vocational schools, state apprenticeship programs, and professional licenses. The appropriation must also be used to respond to data requests from researchers outside of state agencies and to develop a plan for improving data governance for more accurate and timely responses.

(19) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $412,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided to the office of financial management for staffing and support to prepare for the 2020 census.

(20)(a) $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the sentencing guidelines commission to conduct a comprehensive review of the sentencing reform act under chapter 9.94A RCW and make recommendations to accomplish the following goals:

(i) Assess the degree to which the sentencing reform act as applied has achieved each of its stated purposes;

(ii) Ensure Washington's sentencing policies and practices are evidence-based, aligned with best practices, and consistent with federal and state case law;

(iii) Ensure Washington's sentencing laws and practices promote public safety by holding offenders accountable for their actions while also facilitating their successful reintegration into the community;

(iv) Simplify Washington's sentencing laws to make them easier to understand and apply; and

(v) Eliminate inconsistencies, which may have developed through various amendatory changes.

(b) In conducting the review under (a) of this subsection, the sentencing guidelines commission shall:

(i) Review the current sentencing grid and recommend changes to simplify the grid and increase judicial discretion, including, but not limited to: Reviewing and simplifying RCW 9.94A.501, 9.94A.505, 9.94A.525, and 9.94A.533; reviewing and simplifying the sentencing grid under RCW 9.94A.510 by reducing the number of cells in the grid and creating broader sentencing ranges for lower level offenses; reviewing and revising seriousness levels under RCW 9.94A.515 to ensure offenses have appropriately designated seriousness levels; reviewing the drug sentencing grid under RCW 9.94A.517 and 9.94A.518 to determine if drug offenses can be incorporated into a new or revised sentencing grid; and reviewing minimum term requirements under RCW 9.94A.540 to avoid inconsistencies with proposed changes to the grid and other sentencing policies;

(ii) Review mitigating and aggravating factors under RCW 9.94A.535 and sentencing enhancements under RCW 9.94A.533, including mandatory consecutive requirements, and recommend changes to reflect current sentencing purposes and policies and case law;

(iii) Review fines, fees, and other legal financial obligations associated with criminal convictions, including, but not limited to, a review of: Fines under RCW 9.94A.550; restitution under RCW 9.94A.750; and legal financial obligations under RCW 9.94A.760;

(iv) Review community supervision and community custody programs under RCW 9.94A.701 through 9.94A.723 and other related provisions, including, but not limited to: Reviewing and revising eligibility criteria for community custody under RCW 9.94A.701 and 9.94A.702; reviewing the length and manner of supervision for various offenses; reviewing earned time toward termination of supervision; and reviewing the consequences for violations of conditions; and

(v) Review available alternatives to full confinement, including, but not limited to: Work crew under RCW 9.94A.725 and home detention and electronic home monitoring under RCW 9.94A.734 through 9.94A.736.

(c) The sentencing guidelines commission shall report its findings and recommendations based on the review under (a) of this subsection to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by May 1, 2019.

Sec. 112. 2018 c 299 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$525,000

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$41,152,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$41,677,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the agency, in collaboration with the office of financial management, to conduct a review of the agency's fee structure, billing methodology, and assumptions about employee productivity which impact the fee structure and billing methodology.

(2) $525,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims related to and meeting the terms of the settlement agreement in Turner v. Washington State Office of Administrative Hearings, King county superior court, cause no. 14-2-06169-2. The expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on the release of all claims in the case, and the total settlement costs shall not exceed the appropriation in this section. If settlement is not fully executed and accepted by the court through the issuance of a court order dismissing this case by June 30, 2019, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

Sec. 113. 2018 c 299 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$255,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($255,000))

$260,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($536,000))

$541,000

Sec. 114. 2018 c 299 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
(($129,925,000))

$129,895,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($135,392,000))

$136,327,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,765,000

Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$156,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$111,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,640,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,640,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,488,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriations
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($312,117,000))

$313,022,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,628,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $5,628,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $11,257,000 of the business license account—state appropriation are provided solely for the taxpayer legacy system replacement project.

(2) Prior to the suspension of the streamlined sales tax mitigation program established under chapter 82.14 RCW, the department must analyze if and when expected revenue gains from the provisions of sections 201 through 213 of House Bill No. 2163 will be equal to or exceed revenue losses to local taxing districts, as measured under the streamlined sales tax mitigation system from the switch to destination sourcing of sales tax. The analysis must include a comprehensive review of tax, wage, census, and economic data. The review must consider online sales tax and streamlined sales tax mitigation trends for areas with rich concentrations of warehousing distribution and manufacturing centers. The department must provide a report and recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2018. If House Bill No. 2163 (revenue) is not enacted by July 31, 2017, this subsection is void.

(3) $8,028,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $6,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2163 (revenue). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((5)))(4) $1,745,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $2,019,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 209, Laws of 2017 (EHB 2005).

(((7)))(5) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Fourth Substitute Senate Bill No. 5251 (tourism marketing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 115. 2018 c 299 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$1,565,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($2,254,000))

$2,326,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$162,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,981,000))

$4,053,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $789,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2777 (board of tax appeals admin.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 116. 2018 c 299 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,613,000

Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$60,310,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$64,923,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $48,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 103, Laws of 2017 (EHB 1450) (title insurance rating orgs.).

(2) $12,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 49, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1027) (surplus line broker licenses).

(3) $29,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6059 (insurer annual disclosures). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $40,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6219 (reproductive health coverage). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $39,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5912 (tomosynthesis/mammography). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $29,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute ((Senate))House Bill No. ((6241 (school employees' benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))2408 (individual market health care coverage - availability).

(7) $212,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2322 (insurers/risk mitigation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 117. 2018 c 299 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$7,040,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$8,992,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$117,160,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$53,466,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($42,007,000))

$42,637,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($118,587,000))

$126,803,000

Military Department Rent and Lease Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$615,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,337,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,027,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,243,000

Military Department Active State Service

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($352,674,000))

$361,520,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees on February 1st, July 31st, and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2017-2019 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $40,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.

(3) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.

(4) $5,389,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for transitioning to an internet protocol based next generation 911 network and increased network costs during the transition and hardware required for the new system. The department's activities and procurement is a major information technology project subject to oversight and review by the office of the chief information officer.

(5) $11,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.

(6) $2,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for one-time grants to Skagit, Cowlitz, Island, and Whatcom counties for replacing and upgrading the equipment necessary to maintain 911 service after the state's transition to a next generation 911 system. Grants may also be used to reimburse costs incurred in prior biennia for replacing and upgrading equipment for 911 services.

(7) $784,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.

(8) $38,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1258) (first responders/disability).

(9) $372,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 312, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5046) (language of public notices).

(10) Appropriations provided to the department are sufficient to fund the administrative costs associated with implementation of chapter 173, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1802) (veterans/shared leave access).

(11) $190,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely to Okanogan and Ferry counties to continue to address deficiencies within their communications infrastructure for 911 dispatch. Funding will be used to replace failing radio dispatching hardware within 911 dispatch centers; build interoperable communications between each county's dispatch center such that each can serve as a back-up to the other; and build upon the existing wireless microwave network for 911 calls, dispatch centers, and first responder radio operations.

(12) $1,582,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $2,618,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to complete the internet protocol based next generation 911 network project while maintaining financial assistance to counties.

(13) $200,000 of the military department active state service account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency response training and planning of national guard members with funding provided from Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6269 (oil transportation safety). If the bill in not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the emergency management division of the military department to conduct an update to the October 2006 report to the state emergency response commission regarding statewide response to chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, and explosive materials.

Sec. 118. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($633,000))

$660,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.

(2) $210,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.

(3) $130,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for the council to establish a statewide case management system for coroners and medical examiners. The council must confer with the state association of coroners and medical examiners in the implementation of the system.

Sec. 119. 2018 c 299 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$1,571,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($1,646,000))

$1,662,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,226,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$264,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$136,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,843,000))

$5,859,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for archaeological determinations and excavations of inadvertently discovered skeletal human remains, and removal and reinterment of such remains when necessary.

(2) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department of archaeology and historic preservation to collaborate with the department of commerce to facilitate a capital needs assessment study of public libraries in distressed counties as defined by RCW 43.168.020(3). The study must assess library facility backlogs and the local funding capacity for both nonhistoric libraries and libraries on local, state, or national historic registries.

(End of part)

PART II

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 201. 2018 c 299 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.

(7) In accordance with RCW 71.24.380, the health care authority and the department are authorized to purchase medical and behavioral health services through integrated contracts upon request of all of the county authorities in a regional service area to become an early adopter of fully integrated purchasing of medical and behavioral health services. The department may combine and transfer such amounts appropriated under sections 204, 208, and 213 of this act as may be necessary to fund early adopter contracts. The amount of medicaid funding transferred from each program may not exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for individuals covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the health condition of persons enrolled, times the number of clients enrolled. The amount of non-medicaid funding transferred from sections 204 and 208 may not exceed the amount that would have been contracted with a behavioral health organization if the county authorities had not requested to become an early adopter of fully integrated purchasing. These limits do not apply to the amounts provided in section 204(1)(s) of this act. If any funding that this act provides solely for a specific purpose is transferred under this subsection, that funding must be used consistently with the provisions and conditions for which it was provided.

(8) In accordance with RCW 71.24.380, the department is authorized to purchase mental health and substance use disorder services through integrated contracts with behavioral health organizations. The department may combine and transfer such amounts appropriated under sections 204 and 208 of this act as may be necessary to finance these behavioral health organization contracts. If any funding that this act provides solely for a specific purpose is transferred under this subsection, that funding must be used consistently with the provisions and conditions for which it was provided.

(9)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2018))2019, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2018))2019 among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year ((2018))2019 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care, developmental disabilities, foster care, adoption support, and public assistance programs, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose.

(c) Within the mental health program, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose within and between subprograms as needed to fund actual expenditures through the end of fiscal year ((2018))2019.

(d) Within the developmental disabilities program, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose within and between subprograms as needed to fund actual expenditures through the end of fiscal year ((2018))2019.

(e) The department may not transfer appropriations, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

Sec. 202. 2018 c 299 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$91,247,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($93,660,000))

$93,858,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,464,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,985,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$196,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,721,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($199,273,000))

$199,471,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(2) $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for the following juvenile justice programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy (institute) in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation administration for funding for program-specific participation and the administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.

(3) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for expansion of the following juvenile justice treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." The administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(4)(a) $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority.

(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service (CJS) funds, community juvenile accountability act (CJAA) grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative (CDDA), and suspended disposition alternative (SDA). The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(c) If Second Substitute House Bill No. 1280 (referred and diverted youth) is enacted, then the administration must implement a stop-loss policy when allocating funding under (b) of this subsection in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. Under the stop-loss policy, funding formula changes may not result in a funding loss for any juvenile court of more than two percent from one year to the next. The committee in (d) of this subsection must establish a minimum base level of funding for juvenile courts with lower numbers of at-risk youth age 10 – 17. The administration must report to the legislature by December 1, 2018, about how funding is used for referred youth and the impact of that use on overall use of funding. If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, this subsection is null and void.

(d) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (b) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(e) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(5) $98,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $98,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to the juvenile block grant funding formula oversight committee described in subsection (4)(d) of this section to contract with research entities to: (a) Assist juvenile justice programs identified as promising practices or research-based in undergoing the research necessary to demonstrate that the program is evidence-based; and (b) establish an annual, county-level evaluation of existing evidence-based juvenile justice programs.

(6) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(7) $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the juvenile detention alternatives initiative.

(8) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The juvenile rehabilitation administration may award grants under this subsection. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the juvenile rehabilitation administration on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(9) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(10) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for the department to coordinate the examination of data associated with juvenile gang and firearm offenses. The review of data must include information from the administrative office of the courts, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial management—education research data center, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the caseload forecast council, and the department of corrections. For the purpose of carrying out the data review, named organizations are authorized to share data to include details of criminal arrest and conviction data. The department shall report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by February 1, 2018, with any recommendations for public policy that increases public safety.

(11) $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to provide housing services to clients releasing from incarceration into the community.

(12) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6160 (exclusive adult jurisdiction). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 203. 2018 c 299 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ORGANIZATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$381,760,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$481,439,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,932,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2018)
. . . .
$3,684,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$875,854,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) For the purposes of this subsection, amounts provided for behavioral health organizations shall also be available for the health care authority to contract with entities that assume the responsibilities of behavioral health organizations in regions in which the health care authority is purchasing medical and behavioral health services through fully integrated contracts pursuant to RCW 71.24.380.

(b) $6,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $3,810,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department and behavioral health organizations to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health organizations with PACT teams, the department shall consider the differences between behavioral health organizations in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The department may allow behavioral health organizations which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under (f) of this subsection. The department and behavioral health organizations shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(c) From the general fund—state appropriations in this subsection, the department shall assure that behavioral health organizations reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long term support administration for the general fund—state cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled behavioral health organization consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(d) $1,760,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to maintain a pilot project to put peer bridging staff into each behavioral health organization as part of the state psychiatric liaison teams to promote continuity of service as individuals return to their communities. The department must collect data and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the impact of peer staff on state hospital discharges and community placements by December 1, 2017.

(e) $11,405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely to assist behavioral health organizations with the costs of providing services to medicaid clients receiving services in psychiatric facilities classified as institutions of mental diseases. The department must distribute these amounts proportionate to the number of bed days for medicaid clients in institutions for mental diseases that were excluded from behavioral health organization fiscal year 2018 capitation rates because they exceeded the amounts allowed under federal regulations. The department must also use these amounts to directly pay for costs that are ineligible for medicaid reimbursement in institutions of mental disease facilities for American Indian and Alaska Natives who opt to receive behavioral health services on a fee for service basis. The amounts used for these individuals must be reduced from the allocation of the behavioral health organization where the individual resides. If a behavioral health organization receives more funding through this subsection than is needed to pay for the cost of their medicaid clients in institutions for mental diseases, they must use the remainder of the amounts to provide other services not covered under the medicaid program. The department must apply for a waiver from the center for medicaid and medicare services to allow for the full cost of stays in institutions of mental diseases to be included in fiscal year 2019 behavioral health organization capitation rates. The department may tailor the fiscal year 2019 waiver to specific populations for which the center for medicaid and medicare services has indicated they are likely to approve and work to further expand the waiver to other populations in fiscal year 2020. The department must submit a report on the status of the waiver to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017.

(f) $81,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health organization spending shall be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health organizations proportionate to the fiscal year 2017 allocation of flexible nonmedicaid funds. The department must include the following language in medicaid contracts with behavioral health organizations unless they are provided formal notification from the center for medicaid and medicare services that the language will result in the loss of federal medicaid participation: "The contractor may voluntarily provide services that are in addition to those covered under the state plan, although the cost of these services cannot be included when determining payment rates unless including these costs are specifically allowed under federal law or an approved waiver."

(g) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health organizations for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(h) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for the Spokane county behavioral health organization to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:

(A) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(B) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(C) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(D) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health organization shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(i) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(j) Behavioral health organizations may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health organizations may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with (f) of this subsection to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(k) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The department must collect information from the behavioral health organizations on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(l) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the department to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(m) The department must establish minimum and maximum funding levels for all reserves allowed under behavioral health organization contracts and insert contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The department must monitor and ensure that behavioral health organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The department must monitor behavioral health organization revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The department must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the department determines that a behavioral health organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the department must reduce payments to the behavioral health organization in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the department determines that the behavioral health organization has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan.

(n) $2,309,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $2,169,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to increase rates for community hospitals that provide a minimum of 200 medicaid psychiatric inpatient days. The department must increase both medicaid and nonmedicaid psychiatric per-diem reimbursement rates for these providers within these amounts. The amounts in this subsection include funding for additional hold harmless payments resulting from the rate increase. The department shall prioritize increases for hospitals not currently paid based on provider specific costs using a similar methodology used to set rate for existing inpatient facilities and the latest available cost report information. Rate increases for providers must be set so as not to exceed the amounts provided within this subsection. The rate increase related to nonmedicaid clients must be done to maintain the provider at the same percentage as currently required under WAC 182-550-4800.

(o) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for the department to collaborate with tribal governments and develop a plan for establishing an evaluation and treatment facility that will specialize in providing care specifically to the American Indian and Alaska Native population. The plan must include options for maximizing federal participation and, ensure that utilization will be based on medical necessity, and identify a specific geographic location where a tribal evaluation and treatment facility will be built.

(p) $1,466,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,663,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide up to forty-eight long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The department must seek proposals and contract directly for these services rather than contracting through behavioral health organizations. The department must coordinate with the department of social and health services in developing the contract requirements, selecting contractors, and establishing processes for identifying patients that will be admitted to these facilities. The department must not use any of the amounts provided under this subsection for contracts with facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities.

(q) $4,983,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $10,849,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to increase medicaid capitation payments for behavioral health organizations. The department must work with the actuaries responsible for certifying behavioral health capitation rates to adjust average salary assumptions in order to implement this increase. In developing further updates for medicaid managed care rates for behavioral health services, the department must include and make available all applicable documents and analysis to legislative staff from the fiscal committees throughout the process. The department must require the actuaries to develop and submit rate ranges for each behavioral health organization prior to certification of specific rates.

(r) The number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health organizations at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by behavioral health organizations at western state hospital shall be 557 per day. In fiscal year 2019, the department must reduce the number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health organizations at western state hospital by 30 beds to allow for the repurposing of a civil ward at western state hospital to provide forensic services. The contracted beds provided under (p) of this subsection shall be allocated to the behavioral health organizations in lieu of beds at the state hospitals and be incorporated in their allocation of state hospital patient days of care for the purposes of calculating reimbursements pursuant to RCW 71.24.310. It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of expanding community based alternatives for long term civil commitment services that allow for state hospital beds to be prioritized for forensic patients.

(s) $11,405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $8,840,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain enhancements of community mental health services. The department must contract these funds for the operation of community programs in which the department determines there is a need for capacity that allows individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals including but not limited to: (i) Community hospital or free standing evaluation and treatment services providing short-term detention and commitment services under the involuntary treatment act to be located in the geographic areas of the King behavioral health organization, the Spokane behavioral health organization outside of Spokane county, and the Thurston Mason behavioral health organization; (ii) one new full program of an assertive community treatment team in the King behavioral health organization and two new half programs of assertive community treatment teams in the Spokane behavioral health organization and the Pierce behavioral health organization; and (iii) three new recovery support services programs in the Great Rivers behavioral health organization, the greater Columbia behavioral health organization, and the north sound behavioral health organization. In contracting for community evaluation and treatment services, the department may not use these resources in facilities that meet the criteria to be classified under federal law as institutions for mental diseases. If the department is unable to come to a contract agreement with a designated behavioral health organization for any of the services identified above, it may consider contracting for that service in another region that has the need for such service.

(t) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for clubhouse programs. The department must develop options and cost estimates for implementation of clubhouse programs statewide through a medicaid state plan amendment or a medicaid waiver and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018.

(u) $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely to fund one pilot project in Pierce county and one in Yakima county to promote increased utilization of assisted outpatient treatment programs. The department shall require two behavioral health organizations to contract with local government to establish the necessary infrastructure for the programs. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority, shall provide a report by October 15, 2018, to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature to include the number of individuals served, outcomes to include reduced use of inpatient treatment and state hospital stays, and recommendations for further implementation based on lessons learned and best practices identified by the pilot projects.

(v) The department, in collaboration with the health care authority, shall work to ensure that a single platform provider credentialing system is implemented. The authority and department shall ensure that appropriate cost offsets and cost avoidance are assumed for reduced staff time required for provider credentialing activity and reductions in improper billing activity when implementing provider credentialing systems.

(w) No more than $6,464,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the department and the health care authority shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$330,214,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($259,313,000))

$388,461,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($181,793,000))

$140,803,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($61,282,000))

$46,228,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$34,746,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($867,348,000))

$940,452,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b) are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community service officer at the city of Lakewood. The department must collect data from the city of Lakewood on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.

(c) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(d) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas. The city must develop a proposal and estimated costs for developing a community policing program in the area surrounding eastern state hospital and submit the proposal to the department by September 30, 2018. The city must provide current and historical data for police services to eastern state hospital and adjacent areas which justify funding for a community policing program and continued funding for base police services and a community policing program.

(e) $20,883,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $33,558,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5889) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). These amounts must be used to maintain and further increase the number of forensic beds at western state hospital and eastern state hospital. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (2E2SSB 5177) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need.

(f) $3,928,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $4,249,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to maintain and further increase implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5889) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to maintain increases in the number of staff providing competency evaluation services.

(g) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to hire an on-site safety compliance officer, stationed at Western State Hospital, to provide oversight and accountability of the hospital's response to safety concerns regarding the hospital's work environment.

(h) $20,234,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $20,234,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to meet the requirements of the systems improvement agreement with the centers for medicare and medicaid services as outlined in seven conditions of participation and to maintain federal funding. The department shall specifically account for all spending related to the agreement and reconcile it back to the original funding plan. Changes of more than ten percent in any area of the spending plan must be submitted to the office of financial management for approval. The department must submit a financial analysis to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which compares current staffing levels at eastern and western state hospitals, at the ward level, with the specific staffing levels recommended in the state hospitals' clinical model analysis project report submitted by OTB Solutions in 2016. To the extent that the financial analysis includes any differential in staffing from what was recommended in the report, the department must clearly identify these differences and the associated costs. The department must submit the financial analysis by September 1, 2017.

(i) Within these amounts, the department must hire chemical dependency professionals to provide integrated substance use disorder and mental health treatment at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(j) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5118 (personal needs allowance). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(k) $34,584,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for increased staffing and other costs at the state hospitals that are required to maintain federal certification and compliance with federal agreements. Throughout the biennium, the department must track state hospital staffing expenditures, including the use of overtime and contracted locums, to allotments and submit monthly reports to the office of financial management. The office of financial management must review these reports and make a determination as to whether the overspending in these areas is required to maintain federal certification and compliance with federal agreements. The office of financial management must notify the department each month whether and to what level the overspending on staffing is approved and may be maintained and whether and to what level the department must reduce such expenditures. By December 2, 2018, the office of financial management must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on spending beyond appropriations for staffing at the state hospitals and identify the level of overspending that has been approved and any direction provided by the office of financial management to reduce overspending on staffing that was not required to maintain federal certification and compliance with federal agreements.

(l) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to track compliance with RCW 71.05.365 requirements for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within fourteen days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must use these funds to track the following elements related to this requirement: (i) The date on which an individual is determined to no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (ii) the date on which the behavioral health organizations and other organizations responsible for resource management services for the person is notified of this determination; and (iii) the date on which either the individual is transitioned to the community or has been re-evaluated and determined to again require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must provide this information in regular intervals to behavioral health organizations and other organizations responsible for resource management services. The department must summarize the information and provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress toward meeting the fourteen day standard by December 1, 2018.

(m) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department and the University of Washington to begin implementation the first phase of a collaborative plan for a high-quality forensic teaching service. Indirect charges for amounts contracted to the University of Washington must not exceed ten percent. The department and the University of Washington must research and pursue behavioral health workforce education grants from federal or private foundations that could be used in support of this project. By November 1, 2018, the department, in collaboration with the University of Washington, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with a progress update, readiness to proceed to the second phase of the project, a detailed cost analysis of the second phase, and identification of any federal or private grants identified and the status of those applications.

(n) $12,190,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to develop and implement an acuity based staffing tool at western state hospital and eastern state hospital in collaboration with the hospital staffing committees. The staffing tool must be designed and implemented to identify, on a daily basis, the clinical acuity on each patient ward and determine the minimum level of direct care staff by profession to be deployed to meet the needs of the patients on each ward. The department must also continue to develop, in collaboration with the office of financial management's labor relations office, the staffing committees, and state labor unions, an overall state hospital staffing plan which looks at all positions and functions of the facilities and is informed by a review of the Oregon state hospital staffing model. $300,000 of the amounts in this subsection are provided solely for and must be used for staff costs required to establish, monitor, track, and report monthly staffing and expenditures at the state hospitals, including overtime and use of locums, to the functional categories identified in the recommended staffing plan. The remainder of the funds must be used for direct care staffing needed in order to implement the acuity based staffing tool. The allotments and tracking of staffing and expenditures must include all areas of the state hospitals, must be done at the ward level, and must include contracted facilities providing forensic restoration services as well as the office of forensic mental health services. By September 1, 2018, the department and hospital staffing committees must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes the following: (a) Progress in implementing the acuity based staffing tool; (b) a comparison of average daily staffing expenditures to budgeted staffing levels and the recommended state hospital staffing plan by function; and (c) metrics and facility performance for the use of overtime and extra duty pay, patient length of stay, discharge management, active treatment planning, medication administration, patient and staff aggression, and staff recruitment and retention. The department must use information gathered from implementation of the clinical staffing tool and the hospital-wide staffing model to inform and prioritize future budget requests for staffing at the state hospitals. Beginning on January 1, 2019, the department must submit calendar quarterly reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which includes monitoring of monthly spending and staffing levels compared to allotments and to the recommended state hospital staffing model. These reports must include an update from the hospital staffing committees.

(o) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.

(i) The predictive modeling tool must be developed to leverage data from a variety of sources and identify factors that are strongly associated with future criminal justice involvement. By December 1, 2018, the department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which describes the following: (A) The proposed data sources to be used in the predictive model and how privacy issues will be addressed; (B) modeling results including a description of measurable factors most strongly predictive of risk of future criminal justice involvement; (C) an assessment of the accuracy, timeliness, and potential effectiveness of the tool; (D) identification of interventions and strategies that can be effective in reducing future criminal justice involvement of high risk patients; and (E) the timeline for implementing processes to provide monthly lists of high-risk client to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health organizations.

(ii) The model for civil and forensic state hospital bed need must be developed in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for predicting the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2018, with a description of the model and the estimated civil and forensic state hospital bed need through the end of fiscal year 2021. The department must continue to update the model on a calendar quarterly basis and provide updates to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature accordingly.

(p) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $8,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6237 (personal needs allowance) or Substitute House Bill No. 2651 (personal needs allowance). ((If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(q) (($46,601,000))$19,017,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year ((2018))2019 is provided solely for the department to pay fines, plaintiff's attorney fees, and increased court monitor costs for failing to meet court ordered timelines for competency restoration and evaluations under Trueblood v. Department of Social and Health Services.

(r) $1,148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for purposes of maintaining basic life-and-safety equipment and structures in a manner that supports a safe and compliant environment of care at the state hospitals. The department must develop a budget structure that allows for transparency in the management and monitoring of these expenditures as well as related performance and outcomes. The department must report to the office of financial management on expenditure levels and outcomes achieved at the close of each fiscal year.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$486,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,148,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,662,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $89,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the department to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The department must collect information from the institute on the use of these funds and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$9,265,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($2,979,000))

$6,942,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,310,000))

$6,278,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$251,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$526,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($21,331,000))

$23,262,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((a))) The department must complete an update of the state quality strategy required under federal managed care regulations and submit to the center for medicaid and medicare services by October 1, 2017. The department must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017, which includes the following: (((i)))(a) A copy of the quality strategy submitted to the center for medicaid and medicare services; (((ii)))(b) identification of all performance measures that are currently being measured for behavioral health organizations, and managed care organizations and the variations in performance among these entities; (((iii)))(c) identification of any performance measures that are included in behavioral health organization and managed care organization 2018 contracts and whether these measures are connected to payment; and (((iv)))(d) identification of any performance measures planned for incorporation of behavioral health organization and managed care organization 2019 contracts and whether these measures will be connected to payment during that contract period.

(((b) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $41,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 207, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1819) (children's mental health).

(c) In accordance with RCW 43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal year2018 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.))

Sec. 204. 2018 c 299 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$601,589,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($663,644,000))

$659,332,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,302,369,000))

$1,298,671,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,407,000))

$534,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,872,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,576,881,000))

$2,566,998,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes shall be $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2018 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2019. A processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities shall be $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2018 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2019.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities shall be $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2018 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2019.

(c) $7,142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $18,249,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $27,336,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. ((Funding is contingent upon the enactment of Senate Bill No. 5969 (transparency in public employee collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the appropriation in this subsection shall lapse.))

(d) $787,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $2,183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $3,714,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw. ((Funding is contingent upon the enactment of Senate Bill No. 5969 (transparency in public employee collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the appropriation in this subsection shall lapse.))

(e) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(f) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.

(g) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $800,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and implementation of eight enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her family home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report in January of each year that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(h) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the development and implementation of eight community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January of each year that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(i) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $195,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(j) $1,239,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $2,055,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $3,218,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to create new community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(i) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.

(ii) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (j)(i) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(iii) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (j)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(iv) During fiscal year 2018, in a presentation to the select committee on quality improvement in state hospitals, the department must describe the process of fielding and subsequently investigating complaints of abuse, neglect, and exploitation within the community alternative placement options described in (j)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the presentation must include data about the number of complaints, and the nature of complaints, over the preceding five fiscal years.

(v) During fiscal year 2019, in a presentation to the select committee on quality improvement in state hospitals, the department must provide an update about clients placed out of the state psychiatric hospitals into the community alternative placement options described in (j)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, for each setting, the presentation must include data about the number of placements, average daily rate, complaints fielded, and complaints investigated. The presentation must also include information about modifications, including the placement of clients into alternate settings, that occurred due to the evaluations required under (j)(iii) of this subsection.

In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(k) $738,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $1,963,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $2,701,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for expanding the number of clients receiving services under the basic plus medicaid waiver. Approximately six hundred additional clients are anticipated to graduate from high school during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and will receive employment services under this expansion.

(l) $14,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $25,428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $39,554,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the benchmark rate for community residential service providers offering supported living, group home, and licensed staff residential services to individuals with development disabilities. The amounts in this subsection (1)(l) include funding to increase the benchmark rate by the following amounts:

(i) $1.25 per hour effective July 1, 2017, and;

(ii) An additional $1.00 per hour effective July 1, 2018.

The amounts provided in this subsection must be used to improve the recruitment and retention of quality direct care staff to better protect the health and safety of clients with developmental disabilities.

(m) Respite personal care provided by individual providers to developmental disabilities administration clients, as authorized by the department and accessed by clients through a medicaid waiver, must be funded in maintenance level of the operating budget on the basis of actual and forecasted client utilization.

(n) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $13,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 270, Laws of 2017 (SB 5118) (personal needs allowance).

(o) $1,716,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $3,493,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $4,267,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a targeted vendor rate increase to contracted client service providers.

(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $3,424,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $4,126,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a vendor rate increase of two percent in fiscal year 2018 and an additional two percent in fiscal year 2019 for all contracted vendors with the exception of nursing home providers, the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly, nurse delegators, community residential service providers, individual providers, agency providers, and adult family homes.

(ii) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $141,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase vendor rates for adult residential care and enhanced adult residential care in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium up to the statewide minimum wage established in Initiative Measure No. 1433.

(p) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $102,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the daily rate for private duty nursing in adult family homes by $63.77.

(q) $371,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $445,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $1,069,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for increasing the hourly rate for nurse delegators from $32.96 to $45.32 effective September 1, 2017.

(r) $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $269,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. . . . (S-2907.2). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(s) $2,199,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $2,878,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $6,388,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. ((Funding is contingent upon the enactment of Senate Bill No. 5969 (transparency in public employee collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(t) $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $751,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development of an information technology solution that is flexible enough to accommodate all service providers impacted by the requirements for electronic visit verification outlined in the 21st century cures act.

(u) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for job training at the support education empowerment disability solutions program.

(v) $623,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $623,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to hold community residential service provider rates harmless for instruction and support services and administration, to the extent possible within amounts appropriated in this subsection, if the tiered rate methodology is implemented effective January 1, 2019.

(((x)))(w) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $26,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2651 (personal needs allowance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(y)))(x) $34,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $480,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6199 (consumer directed employer organizations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(z)))(y) The department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration shall participate in the development of an implementation plan to build statewide capacity among school districts to improve transition planning for students in special education who meet criteria for services from the developmental disabilities administration, pursuant to section 501(57) of this act.

(((aa)))(z) $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the enhancement of existing parent-to-parent programs that serve parents of children with a developmental disability and the establishment of new programs in Okanogan county and Whitman county.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$99,622,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($105,704,000))

$113,604,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($202,562,000))

$210,504,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$27,041,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,441,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($447,370,000))

$463,212,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(c) $2,978,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $2,978,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $5,956,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are for additional staff to ensure compliance with centers for medicare and medicaid services requirements for habilitation, nursing care, staff safety, and client safety at the residential habilitation centers.

(d) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(e) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $5,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 270, Laws of 2017 (SB 5118) (personal needs allowance).

(f) $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $325,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for purposes of maintaining basic life-and-safety equipment and structures in a manner that supports a safe and compliant environment of care at the residential habilitation centers. The department is to develop a budget structure that allows for transparency in the management and monitoring of these expenditures as well as related performance and outcomes. The department is to report to the office of financial management on expenditure levels and outcomes achieved at the close of each fiscal year.

(g) $2,288,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $5,496,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $7,784,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for additional staffing resources to provide direct care to clients living in the intermediate care facilities at Rainier school, Fircrest school, and Lakeland village to address deficiencies identified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, and to gather information for the 2019 legislative session that will support appropriate levels of care for residential habilitation center clients.

(i) The department of social and health services must contract with the William D. Ruckelshaus center or other neutral party to facilitate meetings and discussions about how to support appropriate levels of care for residential habilitation clients based on the clients' needs and ages. The options explored in the meetings and discussions must include, but are not limited to, conversion of cottages from certification as an intermediate care facility to certification and licensure as a skilled nursing facility, developing a state operated nursing facility for eligible clients, and placement of additional clients from the residential habilitation centers into state operated living alternatives. An agreed-upon preferred vision must be included within a report to the office of financial management and appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature before December 1, 2018. The report must describe the policy rationale, implementation plan, timeline, and recommended statutory changes for the preferred vision.

The parties invited to participate in the meetings and discussion must include:

(A) One member from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate, who shall be appointed by the majority leader and minority leader of the senate;

(B) One member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives, who shall be appointed by the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives;

(C) One member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(D) One member from the developmental disabilities council;

(E) One member from the ARC of Washington;

(F) One member from the Washington federation of state employees;

(G) One member from the service employee international union 1199;

(H) One member from the developmental disabilities administration within the department of social and health services;

(I) One member from the aging and long term support administration within the department of social and health services; and

(J) Two members who are family members or guardians of current residential habilitation center residents.

(ii) Before November 1, 2018, the department of social and health services must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that includes the following information: All information provided for subsections A through D below must be provided so as to clearly identify data that represents the intermediate care facility versus the skilled nursing facility components of the residential habilitation centers.

(A) The current number of clients living in the residential habilitation centers from the most recent month of available data. The information must be provided by month for each cottage on each campus, and must distinguish between long-term and short-term admissions.

(B) The average age of clients living in the residential habilitation centers from fiscal year 2013 through fiscal year 2018. The information must be provided by month for each cottage on each campus.

(C) The number of staff, segmented by the type of position, at the residential habilitation centers from fiscal year 2013 through fiscal year 2018. The information must be provided by month for each cottage on each campus. Any staff that are not directly associated with a cottage must be provided separately for each campus.

(D) Ratios of staff to clients at the residential habilitation centers from fiscal year 2013 through fiscal year 2018. The ratios must include, but are not limited to, the number of direct care staff per client and the number of indirect care staff per client. The ratio of direct care staff per client must be provided by month for each cottage on each campus. The ratio of indirect care staff per client must be provided by month for each campus.

(E) The number of individuals with a developmental disability residing long term at the state psychiatric hospitals from fiscal year 2013 through fiscal year 2018. The information must be provided by month for each of the state psychiatric hospitals.

(F) The average age of individuals with a developmental disability residing long term at the state psychiatric hospitals from fiscal year 2013 through fiscal year 2018. The information must be provided by month for each of the state psychiatric hospitals.

(G) The following information pertinent to the goal of transitioning from the use of intermediate care facilities on residential habilitation center campuses to skilled nursing facilities, when appropriate to individual client needs and preferences, no later than January 1, 2021:

(I) An analysis of existing facilities that might serve as skilled nursing facilities, including options on residential habilitation center campuses and options off campus that might be purchased, rented, or leased by the state. The report must display location, closure date if applicable, and total bed capacity for each facility.

(II) The number of clients living in intermediate care facility cottages at the residential habilitation centers who meet the functional criteria for nursing facility level of care as determined by assessments conducted by the department.

(III) The number of clients living in intermediate care facility cottages at the residential habilitation centers whom, directly or through their legal guardian, express interest in or willingness to live in a skilled nursing facility in interviews and assessments conducted by the department.

(IV) A description of the process and a feasibility analysis for the transition of a cottage or multiple cottages at a residential habilitation center from certification as an intermediate care facility to certification and licensure as a skilled nursing facility no later than January 1, 2021. This section of the report must include, but is not limited to, a description of the role for the department of health, department of social and health services, and the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(V) The estimated capital investment needed to transition a cottage, or multiple cottages, at a residential habilitation center from certification as an intermediate care facility to certification and licensure as a skilled nursing facility no later than January 1, 2021.

(H) Options for the alternate use of buildings, vacant or occupied, at Fircrest, Rainier, Yakima valley, or Lakeland village. The suggestions must include but are not limited to expanding capacity for nursing care, dental care, and other specialty services for individuals with developmental or intellectual disabilities.

(I) Options for transferring the ownership of charitable, educational, penal, and reform institutions land on the Fircrest campus from the department of natural resources to the department of social and health services.

(I) Purchase of the charitable, educational, penal, and reform institutions land on the Fircrest campus by the department of social and health services. This option must include but is not limited to the most recent appraisal of the value of charitable, educational, penal, and reform institutions land on the Fircrest campus.

(II) A land swap of equal value between the charitable, educational, penal, and reform institutions land on the Fircrest campus and other state-owned property.

(III) A combination of the options outlined within (I) and (II) of this subsection (g)(ii)(I).

(J) Options for the additional use of state operated living alternative placements to assist clients with the transition from an institutional setting to a community setting. The report must identify the number of clients who could transition into state operated living alternative placements, and the length of time necessary to transition clients into the additional placements.

(K) Options for establishing additional crisis stabilization services at the residential habilitation centers. The report must identify the operating costs, capital costs, timeline, and desired location associated with the additional capacity.

(L) Options for transferring individuals who have been residing long term at the state psychiatric hospitals into an alternative location, or multiple locations. One of the options must explore the possibility of transferring these individuals to the residential habilitation centers. For any option that is explored, the report must identify the operating costs, capital costs, timeline, and desired location associated with the additional capacity.

(M) The expenditures for overtime, prescription drugs, controlled substances, medical supplies, janitorial supplies, household supplies, maintenance supplies, and office supplies at the residential habilitation centers from fiscal year 2013 through fiscal year 2018. The information must be provided by month for each campus. The department must also provide the strategy, or strategies, that are being implemented to decrease expenditures for overtime, prescription drugs, controlled substances, medical supplies, janitorial supplies, household supplies, maintenance supplies, and office supplies at the residential habilitation centers.

(h) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $23,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2651 (personal needs allowance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(i) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $161,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the replacement of items destroyed by fire at the laundry facility at Fircrest, and for the transportation of laundry from Fircrest to Rainier.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$2,351,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($2,400,000))

$2,594,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,982,000))

$3,121,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$270,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,003,000))

$8,336,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$55,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$62,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,092,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,220,000

Sec. 205. 2018 c 299 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$1,077,208,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($1,208,320,000))

$1,187,135,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,844,955,000))

$2,831,813,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($35,766,000))

$33,953,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,540,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$133,360,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,165,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,317,314,000))

$5,281,174,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $200.47 for fiscal year 2018 and shall not exceed $216.64 for fiscal year 2019.

(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(2) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes shall be $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2018 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2019. A processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities shall be $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2018 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2019.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities shall be $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2018 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2019.

(3) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(4) $1,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.

(5) $14,674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $37,239,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $55,716,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. ((Funding is contingent upon the enactment of Senate Bill No. 5969 (transparency in public employee collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the appropriation in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $4,833,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $13,413,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $22,812,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw. ((Funding is contingent upon the enactment of Senate Bill No. 5969 (transparency in public employee collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the appropriation in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.

(8) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(9) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $1,889 for each facility.

(10) $234,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the kinship navigator program in the Colville Indian reservation, Yakama Nation, and other tribal areas.

(11) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $169,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 270, Laws of 2017 (SB 5118) (personal needs allowance).

(12) Within available funds, the aging and long term support administration must maintain a unit within adult protective services that specializes in the investigation of financial abuse allegations and self-neglect allegations.

(13) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department shall assist the legislature to continue the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues.

(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is continued, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, and four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;

(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;

(v) A member from disability rights Washington and a member from the office of long-term care ombuds;

(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and

(vii) Other agency directors or designees as necessary.

(b) The committee must make recommendations and continue to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington, including state budget and policy options, by conducting at least, but not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities to promote healthy living and palliative care planning;

(ii) Identify strategies and policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term service and supports that allow individuals and families to meet their needs for service;

(iii) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans;

(iv) Identify ways to promote advance planning and advance care directives and implementation strategies for the Bree collaborative palliative care and related guidelines;

(v) Identify ways to meet the needs of the aging demographic impacted by reduced federal support;

(vi) Identify ways to protect the rights of vulnerable adults through assisted decision-making and guardianship and other relevant vulnerable adult protections;

(vii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation;

(viii) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation; and

(ix) Identify ways to support individuals with developmental disabilities with long-term care needs who are enrolled members of a federally recognized Indian tribe, or residing in the household of an enrolled members of a federally recognized Indian tribe, and are receiving care from a family member.

(c) At least one committee meeting must be devoted to the exploration of legislation that would allow family members to provide personal care services to persons with developmental disabilities or long-term care needs under a voluntary consumer-directed medicaid service program. During the meeting, the committee should hear testimony from as many impacted parties as possible, including clients, providers, advocacy groups, and staff from state agencies. Testimony should explore program design, program oversight, necessary statutory changes, barriers to implementation, fiscal estimates, and timeline for implementation.

(d) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.

(e) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(14)(a) The department of social and health services must facilitate a stakeholder work group consisting of assisted living provider associations and the state long-term care ombuds in a collaborative effort to redesign the medicaid payment methodology for contracted assisted living, adult residential care, and enhanced adult residential care. The department must submit a report with the final work group recommendations to the appropriate legislative committees by November 30, 2017. A proposed timeline for implementation of the new methodology must be included in the report. The new methodology must:

(i) Adhere to the standards of an acuity-based payment system as originally intended by the legislature, and the department will rely on the time study conducted in 2003 in establishing the acuity scale;

(ii) Create a standardized methodology that supports a reasonable medicaid payment that promotes access, choice, and quality;

(iii) Incorporate metrics such as medians, lids, floors, and other options that provide flexibility to adjust to economic conditions while maintaining the integrity of the methodology;

(iv) Be supported by relevant, reliable, verifiable, and independent data to the extent possible; and

(v) To the extent possible, repurpose and streamline data sources and modeling that the aging and long-term support administration uses for other rate-setting processes.

(b) In developing payment metrics for medicaid-covered services, staff and service requirements must be reviewed for assisted living, adult residential care, and enhanced adult residential care as described in chapters 74.39A and 18.20 RCW. At a minimum, the proposed rate methodology must include a component that recognizes staffing for intermittent nursing and personal care services. Service area adjustments based on population density must be reviewed and compared with other options to recognize high-cost areas. The most recent and complete wage data available through the bureau of labor statistics must also be included for review and consideration. The methodology work group must consider operational requirements and indirect services in developing the model. The work group must include a rate component that recognizes statutory and regulatory physical plant requirements. The work group must review and consider physical plant requirements for assisted living as described in chapter 51.50 RCW. A fair rental valuation must be reviewed and considered as an option for the capital component. The recognition of food for medicaid residents must also be included in the work group considerations. The department's current methodology to address room and board requirements, and the appropriateness of the continued use of the 2003 time study and whether it can be reasonably adjusted or whether a new time study should be conducted, must be reviewed and considered by the work group.

(15) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department must pay medicaid nursing facility payment rates for public hospital district providers in rural communities as defined under chapter 70.44 RCW that are no less than June 30, 2016, reimbursement levels. This action is intended to assure continued access to essential services in rural communities.

(16) $5,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $10,199,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $18,346,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a targeted vendor rate increase to contracted client service providers.

(a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,763,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $5,741,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $9,775,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a vendor rate increase of two percent in fiscal year 2018 and an additional two percent in fiscal year 2019 for all contracted vendors with the exception of nursing home providers, the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly, nurse delegators, community residential service providers, individual providers, agency providers, and adult family homes.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $4,458,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $8,571,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase vendor rates for nursing homes, assisted living facilities including adult residential care and enhanced adult residential care, adult day health and adult day care providers, and home care agency administration in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium up to the statewide minimum wage established in Initiative Measure No. 1433.

(17) $4,815,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $8,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $12,277,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to create new community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(a) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.

(b) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(c) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(d) During fiscal year 2018, in a presentation to the select committee on quality improvement in state hospitals, the department must describe the process of fielding and subsequently investigating complaints of abuse, neglect, and exploitation within the community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the presentation must include data about the number of complaints, and the nature of complaints, over the preceding five fiscal years.

(e) During fiscal year 2019, in a presentation to the select committee on quality improvement in state hospitals, the department must provide an update about clients placed out of the state psychiatric hospitals into the community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, for each setting, the presentation must include data about the number of placements, average daily rate, complaints fielded, and complaints investigated. The presentation must also include information about modifications, including the placement of clients into alternate settings, that occurred due to the evaluations required under (c) of this subsection.

In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(18) $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $630,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(19) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $270,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for financial service specialists stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Financial service specialists will help to transition clients ready for hospital discharge into alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state hospitals.

(20) $5,007,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $5,143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $10,154,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 286, Laws of 2017 (SB 5715) (nursing home payments).

(21) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to implement chapter 287, Laws of 2017 (SB 5736) (nutrition programs).

(22) $183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $2,479,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to finish the programming necessary to give the department the ability to pay individual provider overtime when hours over 40 hours per week are authorized for payment and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(23) $229,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $229,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $458,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the daily rate for private duty nursing in adult family homes by $63.77.

(24) $246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $313,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. . . . (S-2907.2). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(25)(a) No more than $41,388,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care described in initiative 2 of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures on this initiative. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the health care authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) No more than $2,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the department and the health care authority shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its providers third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(26) $351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $421,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $1,012,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for increasing the hourly rate for nurse delegators from $32.96 to $45.32 effective September 1, 2017.

(27) $10,017,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $13,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $29,104,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. Funding is contingent upon the enactment of Senate Bill No. 5969 (transparency in public employee collective bargaining). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(28) $217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $1,949,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development of an information technology solution that is flexible enough to accommodate all service providers impacted by the requirements for electronic visit verification outlined in the 21st century cures act.

(29) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $40,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department, in partnership with the department of health and the health care authority, to assist a collaborative public-private entity with implementation of recommendations in the state plan to address alzheimer's disease and other dementias.

(((31)))(30) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $1,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain client access to medicaid contracted assisted living, enhanced adult residential care, and adult residential care services under chapter 74.39A RCW. Licensed assisted living facilities that contract with the department to serve medicaid clients under these specified contract types must have an average medicaid occupancy of at least sixty percent, determined using the medicaid days from the immediately preceeding calendar year during the months of July 1st through December 31st to qualify for additional funding under this subsection.

(((32)))(31) $615,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $698,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2651 (personal needs allowance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(33)))(32) $166,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $1,510,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6199 (consumer directed employer organizations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(34)))(33) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department of social and health services aging and long-term support administration to contract for an updated actuarial model of the 2016 independent feasibility study and actuarial modeling of public and private options for leveraging private resources to help individuals prepare for long-term services and supports needs. The follow-up study must model alternative variations of the previously studied public long-term care benefit for workers, funded through a payroll deduction that would provide a time-limited long-term care insurance benefit, including but not limited to alternative minimum hours worked per year for vesting.

(b) The feasibility study and actuarial analysis must include input from the joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability and other interested stakeholders, and must include an analysis of each variation based on:

(i) The expected costs and benefits for participants;

(ii) The total anticipated number of participants;

(iii) The projected savings to the state medicaid program, if any; and

(iv) Legal and financial risks to the state.

(c) The department must provide status updates to the joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability. The feasibility study and actuarial analysis shall be completed and submitted to the department by September 1, 2018. The department shall submit a report, including the director's findings and recommendations based on the feasibility study and actuarial analysis, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2018.

(((35)))(34) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $50,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department of social and health services aging and long-term support administration to contract with the area agencies on aging to convene a work group to include long-term care industry members, family members who provide long-term services and supports, and other groups with interest in long-term services and supports to develop a proposal on how family members could be included as providers of long-term services and supports under the previously studied public long-term care benefit. The work group shall review options and propose:

(a) Minimum qualifications that would allow a family caregiver to serve as a long-term services and supports provider, which may:

(i) Be distinct from the qualifications on the effective date of this act for individual providers;

(ii) Require training based primarily on the individual needs and preferences of the beneficiary;

(iii) Take into account the existing relationship between the family caregiver and the beneficiary, the duration of the caregiving experience, and the type of care being provided.

(b) Administrative program options for providing compensation, benefits, and protections for family caregivers, considering cost-effectiveness and administrative simplification. The program options shall consider how to preserve the quality of the long-term care workforce and must include worker protections and benefits.

(c) The work group shall develop recommendations and provide the recommendations to the joint legislative and executive committee on aging and disability by November 15, 2018.

Sec. 206. 2018 c 299 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$362,611,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($373,055,000))

$398,426,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,443,711,000))

$1,441,215,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,144,000))

$5,330,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,400,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$29,264,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,002,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,219,185,000))

$2,243,248,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $125,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, (($124,458,000))$130,098,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, (($836,761,000))$836,761,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $5,400,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation, and $8,155,000 of the pension funding stabilization account—state appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.

(b) (($260,135,000))$265,432,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance. Within amounts provided in (b) of this subsection, $1,622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5890 (foster care and adoption). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b), $8,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to increase the grant standard.

(c) $158,444,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures. Amounts provided in (c) of this subsection include funding for implementation of chapter 156, Laws of 2017 (2SSB 5347) (WorkFirst "work activity"). Within amounts provided in (c) of this subsection, the department shall implement the working family support program. The department shall adopt rules to take effect July 31, 2017, to limit the working family support program at 10,000 households.

(($1,700,000))$2,700,000 of the funds appropriated in (((c) of)) this subsection (1)(c) are provided solely for enhanced transportation assistance provided that the department prioritize the use of these funds for the recipients most in need of financial assistance to facilitate their return to work. The department must not utilize these funds to supplant repayment arrangements that are currently in place to facilitate the reinstatement of drivers' licenses.

(d)(i) $477,054,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW ((43.215.135))43.216.020. In order to not exceed the appropriated amount, the department shall manage the program so that the average monthly caseload does not exceed 33,000 households and the department shall give prioritized access into the program according to the following order:

(A) Families applying for or receiving temporary assistance for needy families (TANF);

(B) TANF families curing sanction;

(C) Foster children;

(D) Families that include a child with special needs;

(E) Families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center;

(F) Families with a child residing with a biological parent or guardian who have received child protective services, child welfare services, or a family assessment response from the department in the past six months, and has received a referral for child care as part of the family's case management.

(G) Families that received subsidies within the last thirty days and:

(I) Have reapplied for subsidies; and

(II) Have household income of two hundred percent federal poverty level or below; and

(H) All other eligible families.

(ii) The department, within existing appropriations, must ensure quality control measures for the working connections child care program by maximizing the use of information technology systems and the development or modification of the application and standard operating procedures to ensure that cases are:

(A) Appropriately and accurately processed; and

(B) Routinely monitored for eligibility in a manner that is similar to processes and systems currently in place for regular monitoring in other public assistance programs. Eligibility criteria routinely monitored must include, at a minimum:

(I) Participation in work or other approved activities;

(II) Household composition; and

(III) Maximum number of subsidized child care hours authorized.

The department must submit a preliminary report by December 1, 2017, and a final report by December 1, 2018, to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature detailing the specific actions taken to implement this subsection.

(iii) Of the amounts provided in (d) of this subsection, $4,620,000 of the appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $4,792,000 of the appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided for a base rate increase, a rate increase for Family Friend and Neighbor providers, covering an increase for health insurance premiums, and increasing paid professional development days from three days to five days. This funding is for the 2017-2019 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as set forth in section 940 of this act.

(iv) Of the amounts provided in (d) of this subsection, $8,547,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $10,438,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for subsidy base rate increases for child care center providers.

(e) $34,248,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families.

(f) (($170,292,000))$170,634,000 of the amounts in (1)(a) of this section are provided solely for WorkFirst and working connections child care administration and overhead. $127,000 of the funds appropriated in this subsection for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 9, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (working connections child care).

(g) The amounts in subsections (1)(b) through (e) of this section shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified. However, the department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between subsections (1)(b) through (f) of this section. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.

(h) Each calendar quarter, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:

(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;

(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;

(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;

(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;

(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort; and

(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements.

(i) In the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to provide appropriations from the state general fund for the purposes of (b) through (f) of this subsection if the department does not receive additional federal temporary assistance for needy families contingency funds in each fiscal year as assumed in the budget outlook.

(j) The department must submit a report by December 1, 2018, to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that estimates the caseload and fiscal impact of returning to pre-2011 temporary assistance for needy families policies. At a minimum, the report must include an analysis of the caseload and fiscal impact of:

(i) Removing the sixty-month lifetime limit;

(ii) Lessening sanction policies; and

(iii) No longer requiring the WorkFirst orientation.

(2) $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On January 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be one hundred percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(7) $856,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, (($1,848,000))$2,913,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and (($16,267,000))$12,034,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for ESAR Architectural Development and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(8) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

(9) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.

(10) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $8,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $36,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 270, Laws of 2017 (SB 5118) (personal needs allowance).

(11) $438,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1831 (public assistance/resources). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $43,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Bill No. 2667 (essential needs/ABD programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(13) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2651 (personal needs allowance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(14) $5,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the resources to initiate successful employment program. The department shall submit a preliminary report of its findings of the impact of this program on increasing employment to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than January 1, 2019, with a final report submitted no later than June 30, 2019.

(15) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5683 (Pacific Islander health care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(16) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $21,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1513 (youth voter registration information). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(17) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $43,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6037 (uniform parentage act). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 207. 2018 c 299 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$13,890,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($14,443,000))

$14,564,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$109,730,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,024,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($140,087,000))

$140,208,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department of social and health services vocational rehabilitation program shall participate in the development of an implementation plan to build statewide capacity among school districts to improve transition planning for students in special education who meet criteria for services from the developmental disabilities administration, pursuant to section 501(57) of this act.

Sec. 208. 2018 c 299 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$46,202,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($47,157,000))

$49,229,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,858,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($98,217,000))

$100,289,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

Sec. 209. 2018 c 299 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$33,712,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($29,364,000))

$31,760,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($43,831,000))

$44,580,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,247,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($113,154,000))

$116,299,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships to provide technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

(2) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2018, and February 1, 2019. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(3) $1,216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $515,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1661 (child, youth, families department). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $81,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $86,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $167,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. Funding is contingent upon the enactment of Senate Bill No. 5969 (transparency in public employee collective bargaining). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided is this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 210. 2018 c 299 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$82,245,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($42,783,000))

$45,148,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($57,081,000))

$52,189,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($182,109,000))

$179,582,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $11,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1661 (child, youth, families department). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $24,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 268, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1402) (incapacitated persons/rights).

(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must extend master property insurance to all buildings owned by the department valued over $250,000 and to all locations leased by the department with contents valued over $250,000.

(4) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $134,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for legal support, including formal proceedings and informal client advice, associated with adult protective service investigations.

Sec. 211. 2018 c 299 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.

Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

The appropriations to the health care authority in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. To the extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions, the authority, after May 1, ((2018))2019, may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2018))2019 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The authority may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications and transfers.

(1) MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$2,024,969,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($2,084,494,000))

$2,172,492,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,823,330,000))

$11,932,315,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($204,427,000))

$240,835,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,086,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($693,099,000))

$713,117,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($28,154,000))

$18,764,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$528,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2018)
. . . .
$17,616,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2019)
. . . .
$18,405,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,538,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($16,914,646,000))

$17,158,665,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $268,117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $264,704,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the authority to implement a single, standard medicaid preferred drug list to be used by all contracted medicaid managed health care systems, on or before January 1, 2018. The preferred drug list shall be developed in consultation with all contracted managed health care systems and the state pharmacy and therapeutics committee or drug utilization review board and shall further the goals and objectives of the medicaid program. The list shall be designed to maximize federal rebates and supplemental rebates and ensure access to clinically effective and appropriate drug therapies under each class. Entities eligible for 340B drug pricing shall continue to operate under their current pricing agreement, unless otherwise required by federal laws or regulations. The authority may utilize external consultants with expertise in evidence-based drug class reviews, pharmacy benefit management, and purchasing to assist with the completion of this development and implementation. The authority shall require each managed care organization that has contracted with the authority to provide care to medicaid beneficiaries to use the established preferred drug list; and shall prohibit each managed care organization and any of its agents from negotiating or collecting rebates for any medications listed in the state's medicaid single preferred drug list whether preferred or nonpreferred. To assist in the implementation of the single preferred drug list, contracted medicaid managed health care systems shall provide the authority drug-specific financial information in a format and frequency determined by the authority to include the actual amounts paid to pharmacies for prescription drugs dispensed to covered individuals compared to the cost invoiced to the health plan and individual rebates collected for prescription drugs dispensed to medicaid members. Information disclosed to the authority by the manufacturer pursuant to this provision shall only be used for the purposes of developing and implementing a single, standard state preferred drug list in accordance with this provision. The authority, medicaid managed care organizations, and all other parties shall maintain the confidentiality of drug-specific financial and other proprietary information and such information shall not be subject to the Washington public records act. The authority shall provide a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2018, and by November 15, 2019, including a comparison of the amount spent in the previous two fiscal years to expenditures under the new system by, at a minimum, fund source, total expenditure, drug class, and top twenty-five drugs. The data provided to the authority shall be aggregated in any report by the authority, the legislature, or the office of financial management so as not to disclose the proprietary or confidential drug-specific information, or the proprietary or confidential information that directly or indirectly identifies financial information linked to a single manufacturer. It is the intent of the legislature to revisit this policy in subsequent biennia to determine whether it is in the best interest of the state.

(b) $113,356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $140,578,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for managed care capitation payments.

(c) $122,244,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $116,038,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the authority through the competitive procurement process, to contract with licensed dental health plans or managed health care plans on a prepaid or fixed-sum risk basis to provide carved-out managed dental care services on a statewide basis that will result in greater efficiency and will facilitate better access and oral health outcomes for medicaid enrollees. Except in areas where only a single plan is available, the authority must contract with at least two plans. The authority shall include in the contracts: (i) Quarterly reporting requirements to include medicaid utilization and encounter data by current dental technology (CDT) code; (ii) a direction to increase the dental provider network; (iii) a commitment to retain innovative programs that improve access and care such as the access to baby and child dentistry program; (iv) a program to reduce emergency room use for dental purposes; (v) a requirement to ensure that dental care is being coordinated with the primary care provider of the patient to ensure integrated care; (vi) a provision that no less than eighty-five percent of the contracting fee be used to directly offset the cost of providing direct patient care as opposed to administrative costs; and (vii) a provision to ensure the contracting fee shall be sufficient to compensate county health departments and federally qualified health centers for dental patient care. The plan(s) awarded this contract must absorb all start-up costs associated with moving the program from fee-for-service to managed care and shall commit to achieving an overall savings to the program based on 2016 fee-for-service experience. In order to comply with state insurance underwriting standards, the authority shall ensure that savings offered by dental plans are actuarially sound. Starting January 31, 2019, and every year thereafter through December 2024, the authority shall submit an annual report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature detailing how the contracted entities have met the requirements of the contract. The report shall include specific information to include utilization, how the contracted entities have increased their dental provider networks, how the emergency room use for dental purposes has been reduced, and how dental care has been integrated with patients' primary care providers. If after the end of five years the data reported does not demonstrate sufficient progress to address the stated contracted goals, the legislature will reevaluate whether carved-out dental managed care needs to be replaced with a different delivery model. The authority is authorized to seek any necessary state plan amendments or federal waivers to implement this subsection. Additional dental program savings achieved by the plans beyond those assumed in the 2017-2019 omnibus appropriations act will be used to increase dental provider reimbursement rates. By October 30, 2018, the authority shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature anticipated savings related to reduction in dental emergency department visits and utilization once managed care dental coverage begins.

(d) $1,505,087,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,538,030,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for medicaid services and the medicaid program. However, the authority shall not accept or expend any federal funds received under a medicaid transformation waiver under healthier Washington except as described in (e) and (f) of this subsection until specifically approved and appropriated by the legislature. To ensure compliance with legislative directive budget requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the innovation waiver requires better analytic capability, transparency, consistency, timeliness, accuracy, and lack of redundancy with other established measures and that the patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. In order to effectuate these goals, the authority shall: (i) Require the Dr. Robert Bree collaborative and the health technology assessment program to reduce the administrative burden upon providers by only requiring performance measures that are nonduplicative of other nationally established measures. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen by the collaborative and the health technology assessment program for effectiveness and appropriateness; (ii) develop a patient satisfaction survey with the goal to gather information about whether it was beneficial for the patient to use the center of excellence location in exchange for additional out-of-pocket savings; (iii) ensure patients and health care providers have significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver, in order to ensure improved patient health outcomes; and (iv) in cooperation with the department of social and health services, consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget, to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting waivers for federal approval. By federal standard, the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver shall not exceed the duration originally granted by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement.

(e) No more than $486,683,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than $129,103,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for transformation through accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the medicaid transformation demonstration wavier under healthier Washington, including preventing youth drug use, opioid prevention and treatment, and physical and behavioral health integration. Under this initiative, the authority shall take into account local input regarding community needs. In order to ensure transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly, and include details for each accountable community of health, on the financial status and measurable health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees. By December 15, 2019, the authority in collaboration with each accountable community of health shall demonstrate how it will be self-sustaining by the end of the demonstration waiver period, including sources of outside funding, and provide this reporting to the joint select committee on health care oversight. If by the third year of the demonstration waiver there are not measurable, improved patient outcomes and financial returns, the Washington state institute for public policy will conduct an audit of the accountable communities of health, in addition to the process set in place through the independent evaluation required by the agreement with centers for medicare and medicaid services. Prior to the 2018 legislative session, the human services, health care, and judiciary committees of the legislature will convene a joint work session to review models in the delivery system and the impacts on medical liability. The work sessions should include integrated delivery models with multiple health care providers and medical malpractice insurance carriers.

(f) No more than $38,425,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third party administrator. The authority and the department in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(g) No later than November 1, 2018, and each year thereafter, the authority shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature: (i) Savings attributed to behavioral and physical integration in areas that are scheduled to integrate in the following calendar year, and (ii) savings attributed to behavioral and physical health integration and the level of savings achieved in areas that have integrated behavioral and physical health.

(h) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).

(i) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(j) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(k) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(l) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(m) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(n) $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $8,522,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(o) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(p) $6,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(q) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2017, and by November 1, 2018, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2018 and fiscal year 2019, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (i) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2017-2019 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (ii) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (iii) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. $359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and (($361,000))$555,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.

(r) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(s) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(t) The authority shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2018, and no later than September 15, 2019, that delineate the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The reports should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.

(u) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(v) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.

(w) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(x) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.

(y) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.

(z) The appropriations in this section reflect savings and efficiencies by transferring children receiving medical care provided through fee-for-service to medical care provided through managed care.

(aa) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(bb) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(cc) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.

(dd) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated marijuana fund for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fund—state payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(ee) $127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,144,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to the ProviderOne provider overtime project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(ff) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $825,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to the ProviderOne CORE operating rules project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(gg) $1,483,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $1,594,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $1,509,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided for a rate increase effective July 1, 2018, and for performance payments to reward successful beneficiary engagement in the health homes program for fee-for-service enrollees and these are the maximum amounts in each fiscal year the authority may expend for this purpose.

(hh) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $1,058,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to hire ten nurse case managers to coordinate medically assisted treatment and movements to medical homes for those being treated for opioid use disorder. Nurses shall be located in areas and provider settings with the highest concentration of opioid use disorder patients.

(ii) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide a collaborative care benefit beginning July 1, 2017.

(jj) The authority and the department of social and health services shall convene a work group consisting of representatives of skilled nursing facilities, adult family homes, assisted living facilities, managers of in-home long-term care, hospitals, and managed health care systems. The work group shall identify barriers that may prevent skilled nursing facilities from accepting and admitting clients from acute care hospitals in a timely and appropriate manner. The work group shall consider what additional resources are needed to allow for faster transfers of enrollees, including those with complex needs. By December 1, 2017, the authority shall report the work group's findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(kk) Within the amounts appropriated within this section, the authority shall implement the plan to show how improved access to home health nursing reduces potentially preventable readmissions, increases access to care, reduces hospital length of stay, and prevents overall hospital admissions for clients receiving private duty nursing, medically intensive care, or home health benefits as described in their report to the legislature dated December 15, 2016, entitled home health nursing. The authority shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2017, information regarding the effect of the ten dollar rate increases for skilled nursing care delivered via private duty nursing or home health nursing, and how the rate changes impacted the utilization and cost of emergency room visits, reduced the length of stay for initial hospital admissions, and reduced utilization and costs of preventable hospital readmissions. The report will quantify potential cost saving opportunities that may exist through improved access to private duty and home health nursing statewide.

(ll) Within the amounts appropriated within this section, beginning July 1, 2017, the authority must increase facility fees to birth centers to the amount listed on page two of their report to the legislature dated October 15, 2016, entitled reimbursement for births performed at birth centers. This increased rate is applicable in both a fee for service setting and is the minimum allowable rate in a managed care setting. The authority shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 15, 2018, updated information regarding access to care, improvements to the Cesarean section rate, and savings outcomes for utilizing birth centers as an alternative to hospitals.

(mm) Beginning no later than January 1, 2018, for any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority. By September 31, 2017, the authority shall report to the legislature on its progress implementing this subsection.

(nn) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in consultation with appropriate parties, including the rural health clinic association of Washington and the centers for medicare and medicaid services, by December 1, 2017, the authority shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature evaluating legislative and administrative options to reduce or eliminate any amounts owed by rural health clinics under the payment reconciliation process established in the medicaid state plan.

(oo) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement the oral health connections pilot project in Spokane, Thurston, and Cowlitz counties. The authority shall work in collaboration with Washington dental service foundation to jointly develop and implement the program. The purpose of the three-year pilot is to test the effect that enhanced dental benefits for adult medicaid clients with diabetes and pregnant women have on access to dental care, health outcomes, and medical care costs. The authority must model the pilot on the access to baby and child dentistry program. The pilot program must include enhanced reimbursement rates for participating dental providers, including denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW, and an increase in the allowable number of periodontal treatments to up to four per calendar year. Diabetic or pregnant adult medicaid clients who are receiving dental care within the pilot region(s), regardless of location of the service within the pilot region(s), are eligible for the increased number of periodontal treatments. The Washington dental service foundation shall partner with the authority and provide wraparound services to link patients to care. The authority and Washington dental service foundation shall jointly develop the program. The authority and foundation shall provide a joint progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on December 1, 2017, and December 1, 2018.

(pp) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to increase the daily rate by $155.20 for skilled nursing performed by licensed practical nurses and registered nurses who serve medically intensive children's program clients who reside in a group home setting.

(qq) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the authority must revise its agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(i) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(ii) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(A) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(B) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(C) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(iii) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the authority or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(iv) The authority must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(rr) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a pilot program for treatment of inmates at the Snohomish county jail who are undergoing detoxification from heroin and other opioids and for connecting those individuals with treatment providers in the community upon their release.

(ss) $6,487,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and (($1,340,000))$28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the physical health care costs of medicaid clients receiving services in facilities classified as institutions for mental diseases for longer than 15 days in a calendar month. The authority must apply for a waiver from the center for medicare and medicaid services to allow for the full cost of stays in institutions for mental diseases to be included in managed care rates beginning on July 1, 2018. The authority must submit a report on the status of the waiver to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017.

(tt) The authority shall evaluate adding a tele-pyschiatry consultation benefit for medicaid covered individuals. The authority shall submit a report with the cost associated with adding such a benefit to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2017.

(uu) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, and $42,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the bleeding disorder collaborative for care.

(vv) $304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $608,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington tele-pain pain management program and pain management call center to advance primary care provider knowledge of complex pain management issues, including opioid addiction.

(ww) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $329,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $604,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1713) (children's mental health).

(xx) $1,813,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $3,764,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $12,930,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 110, Laws of 2017 (Second Substitute House Bill No. 1338) (state health insurance pool).

(yy) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $1,118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $943,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 198, Laws of 2017 (Substitute House Bill No. 1520) (hospital payment methodology).

(zz) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the implementation of chapter 273, Laws of 2017 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1358) (community asst. referral programs).

(aaa) $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $308,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement, operate, and maintain a provider credentialing system and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act. The authority, in collaboration with the department of health, department of corrections, department of social and health services, the public employees' benefits board, and the department of labor and industries, shall work to ensure that a single platform provider credentialing system is implemented. The authority, departments, and board shall ensure that appropriate cost offsets and cost avoidance are assumed for reduced staff time required for provider credentialing activity and reductions in improper billing activity when implementing provider credentialing systems. The authority must enter into agreements with the department of labor and industries and the public employees' benefits board to pay their share of the costs of implementing and operating a new provider credentialing system. The authority shall submit a report to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature outlining projected cost savings and cost avoidance no later than December 1, 2018.

(bbb) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department and the health care authority to enter into an interagency agreement to contract with Washington autism alliance and advocacy (WAAA) to educate and assist persons seeking the authority's services to address a suspected or diagnosed autism spectrum disorder or developmental disability related to autism spectrum disorder. The department or the authority may refer such individuals to WAAA to support them in navigating the health care system. The authority, in collaboration with the department and the WAAA, shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2018, and December 15, 2019, detailing how many persons were referred to, how many persons received services from, and what services were provided by the WAAA. The reports shall also include what health care services the WAAA was able to connect the referred persons to, the length of time these connections took, the type of health coverage the person referred had at the time of referral and whether alternate coverage was obtained.

(ccc) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $20,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in partnership with the department of social and health services and the department of health, to assist a collaborative public-private entity with implementation of recommendations in the state plan to address alzheimer's disease and other dementias.

(ddd) $5,825,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $8,019,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for an increase in primary care provider rates for pediatric care services that are currently reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates that are applicable for the child's medical assistance eligibility group. These amounts are the maximum that the authority may spend for this purpose. The authority must pursue a state plan amendment to increase pediatric primary care provider and pediatric vaccine rates through state directed payments through a permissible payment model. The codes considered for these increases should follow those that were used under the temporary increase provided in calendar years 2013 and 2014 as outlined in section 1202 of the affordable care act. Both physician and nonphysician practitioners are eligible for these increases and are not required to attest. Increases are based upon eligible codes. The authority must provide a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2019, detailing how the amounts provided in this subsection were used, what percentage increase was provided for pediatric primary care provider evaluation and management rates, what percentage increase was provided for pediatric vaccine rates, how utilization has changed within each category, and how these rate increases have impacted access to care.

(eee) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the authority to conduct a study to identify strategies for enhancing access to primary care for medical assistance clients. The authority may collaborate with other stakeholders as appropriate. The authority shall provide a report with recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018. The study shall, to the extent possible:

(i) Review the effect of the temporary rate increase provided as part of the patient protection and affordable care act on:

(A) The number of providers serving medical assistance clients;

(B) The number of medical assistance clients receiving services; and

(C) Utilization of primary care services.

(ii) Identify client barriers to accessing primary care services;

(iii) Identify provider barriers to accepting medical assistance clients;

(iv) Identify strategies for incentivizing providers to accept more medical assistance clients;

(v) Prioritize areas for investment that are likely to have the most impact on increasing access to care; and

(vi) Strategically review the current medicaid rates and identify specific areas and amounts that may promote access to care.

(fff) $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $3,900,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid to rural hospitals that meet the criteria in (hhh)(i) through (iv) of this subsection. Payments for state and federal medical assistance programs for services provided by such a hospital, regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, must be increased to one hundred fifty percent of the hospital's fee-for-service rates. The authority must discontinue this rate increase after June 30, 2019, and return to the payment levels and methodology for these hospitals that were in place as of January 1, 2018. Hospitals participating in the certified public expenditures program may not receive increased reimbursement for inpatient services. Hospitals qualifying for this rate increase must:

(i) Be certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013;

(ii) Have had less than one hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011;

(iii) Have a level III adult trauma service designation from the department of health as of January 1, 2014; and

(iv) Be owned and operated by the state or a political subdivision.

(ggg) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to create a work group at the Robert Bree collaborative to identify best practices for mental health services regarding patient mental health treatment and patient management. The work group shall identify best practices on patient confidentiality, discharging patients, treating patients with homicide ideation and suicide ideation, recordkeeping to decrease variation in practice patterns in these areas, and other areas as defined by the work group. The work group shall be composed of clinical and administrative experts including psychologists, psychiatrists, advanced practice psychiatric nurses, social workers, marriage and family therapists, certified counselors, and mental health counselors.

(hhh) $1,006,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5683 (Pacific Islander health care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(iii) $50,000 of the generalfund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $50,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2779 (children's mental health services). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(jjj) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $44,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 303, Laws of 2017 (public records administration).

(kkk) $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $1,123,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation ((for fiscal year 2019)) are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (hearing instrument coverage). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(lll) $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $50,000 general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6452 (child mental health consult). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(mmm)(i) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the authority to assist the governor by convening and providing administrative, analytical, and communication support to the governor's Indian health council, including procuring technical assistance from the American Indian health commission for Washington state, to:

(A) Address current or proposed policies or actions that have tribal implications and are not able to be resolved or addressed at the agency level;

(B) Facilitate training for state agency leadership, staff, and legislators on the Indian health system and tribal sovereignty; and

(C) Provide oversight of contracting and performance of service coordination organizations or service contracting entities as defined in RCW 70.320.010 in order to address their impacts on services to American Indians and Alaska Natives and relationships with Indian health care providers.

(ii) The council shall include:

(A) One tribal liaison from each of the authorities; the department of children, youth, and families; the department of commerce; the department of corrections; the department of health; the department of social and health services; the office of the insurance commissioner; the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and the Washington health benefit exchange;

(B) One individual from each tribe in Washington state, designated by the tribal legislative body, who is either the tribe's American Indian health commission for Washington state delegate or an individual specifically designated for this role, or his or her designee;

(C) The chief executive officer of the Indian health service Portland area office and each service unit in Washington state or his or her designee;

(D) The chief executive officer of each urban Indian health program in Washington state or his or her designee who may be the urban Indian health program's American Indian health commission for Washington state delegate;

(E) The executive director of the American Indian health commission for Washington state or his or her designee;

(F) The executive director of the northwest Portland area Indian health board or his or her designee;

(G) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, or his or her designee;

(H) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, or his or her designee; and

(I) Two individuals representing the governor's office.

(iii) The council will meet at least three times per year when the legislature is not in session, with one meeting to be hosted by the authority and the other two meetings to be hosted by tribes or, if no tribe is able to host, then by a member state agency. The members representing the tribes, the Indian health service Portland area office and service units, the urban Indian health programs, the American Indian health commission for Washington state, and the northwest Portland area Indian health board shall be paid per diem and travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(iv) By December 1, 2018, the council, with assistance from the authority, will submit a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees with recommendations to raise the health status of American Indians and Alaska Natives throughout Washington state to at least the levels set forth in the goals contained within the federal health people 2020 initiative or successor objectives, including draft legislation and fiscal budgets for:

(A) Increasing savings to the state general fund resulting from the one hundred percent federal medical assistance percentage applicable to services received through an Indian health service facility, whether operated by the Indian health service or by an Indian tribe or tribal organization pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d; realized by the state for services which are received through an Indian health service facility whether operated by the Indian health service or by an Indian tribe or tribal organization pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396(b);

(B) Appropriating such increased savings for an Indian health improvement reinvestment account to be expended solely for improving health outcomes and access to quality and culturally appropriate health care for American Indians and Alaska Natives;

(C) Developing model performance measures and risk adjustment methodologies for medicaid managed care value-based purchasing that account for the Indian health delivery system;

(D) Improving population health through tribally determined practices and resources such as the American Indian health commission for Washington state's "pulling together for wellness" framework;

(E) Developing written and technical assistance to support the incorporation of cultural awareness and of strategies to address historical trauma and intergenerational trauma in treatment planning for services covered by medicaid and other services provided by the state;

(F) Expanding tribal representation on state agency boards, committees (including the emergency management council), and nongovernmental entities to whom the state delegates activities or tasks that directly impact the Indian health delivery system; and

(G) Other strategies to improve population health and increase access to quality health care for American Indians and Alaska Natives.

(nnn) $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $139,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation ((for fiscal year 2019)) are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6549 (ABCD dental). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(ooo) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a community hospital located in Toppenish to convert fifteen existing acute care beds to long-term psychiatric beds.

(2) PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS PROGRAMS

State Health Care Authority Administration Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$34,481,000

The appropriation in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The authority and the public employees' benefits board shall consult with the Washington state institute for public policy on the cost-effectiveness of the wellness plan and any changes to the plan that can be made to increase the health care efficiency of the wellness plan. The authority shall report its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 15, 2018.

(b) The authority and the public employees' benefits board shall ensure that procurement for employee health benefits during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium is consistent with the funding limitations provided in part 9 of this act.

(c) $236,000 of the state health care authority administration account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $236,000 of the state health care authority administration account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to the affordable care act employer shared responsibility project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(d) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors identified after December 31, 2016, must be reserved for funding employee health benefits in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. Any changes to benefits, including covered prescription drugs, must be approved by the public employees' benefits board. Upon procuring benefits for calendar years 2018 and 2019, the public employees' benefits board shall: (1) Not consider any changes to benefits, including prescription drugs, without considering comprehensive analysis of the cost of those changes; and (2) not adopt a package of benefits and premiums that results in a projected unrestricted reserve funding level lower than was projected under the assumptions made prior to procurement. For this purpose, assumptions means projections about the levels of future claims, costs, enrollment and other factors, prior to any changes in benefits. The certificates of coverage agreed to by the health care authority for calendar years 2018 and 2019 must ensure that no increases in coverage of prescription drugs, services, or other benefits may occur prior to approval by the public employees' benefits board at the time of procurement of benefits for the ensuing calendar year. The public employees' benefits board may, within the funds provided, adopt a virtual diabetes prevention program and adjust the waiting period for dental crown replacement in the Uniform dental program to align with the dental managed care plans.

(e) Within the amounts appropriated within this section, the authority, in consultation with one Washington within the office of financial management, the office of the chief information officer, and other state agencies with statewide payroll or benefit systems, shall prepare a report describing options for the replacement of the Pay 1 information technology system. The report shall evaluate the potential costs, benefits, and feasibility of integrating the functions currently performed by Pay 1 into an existing or new statewide system, as well for a stand-alone system. The report shall also update the business and system requirements documents previously developed for a Pay 1 replacement system. This report shall be provided to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2018.

(f) The public employees' benefits board, in collaboration with the authority, shall work to ensure that a single platform provider credentialing system is implemented. The authority and the board shall ensure that appropriate cost offsets and cost avoidance are assumed for reduced staff time required for provider credentialing activity and reductions in improper billing activity when implementing provider credentialing systems. The board must enter into an agreement with the authority to pay its share of the costs of implementing and operating a new provider credentialing system.

(3) SCHOOL EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD

School Employees' Insurance Administrative

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,730,000

The appropriation in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $28,730,000 of the school employees' insurance administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the school employees' benefits board until the new board commences provision of benefits on January 1, 2020. It is the intent of the legislature that the state health care authority administration account be reimbursed for the appropriation to this account made in part VII of this act, with interest.

(4) HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$5,184,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$5,651,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($53,892,000))

$52,070,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($59,385,000))

$61,207,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$124,112,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.

(b)(i) By July 15th and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of one-half the general fund—state appropriation and one-half the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation to the exchange.

(ii) For the 2017-2019 biennium, for the purpose of annually calculating issuer assessments, exchange operational costs may include up to three months of additional operating costs.

(iii) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.

(iv) Payments made from general fund—state appropriation and health benefit exchange account—state appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.

(c) $271,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2595 (automatic voter registration). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(d) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5683 (Pacific Islander health care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($542,049,000))

$550,044,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($919,359,000))

$941,704,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$18,261,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,490,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$728,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$28,486,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$857,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,516,230,000))

$1,546,570,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) For the purposes of this subsection, amounts provided for behavioral health organizations shall also be available for the health care authority to contract with entities that assume the responsibilities of behavioral health organizations in regions in which the health care authority is purchasing medical and behavioral health services through fully integrated contracts pursuant to RCW 71.24.380.

(b) $6,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $3,810,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health organizations to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health organizations with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health organizations in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health organizations which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under (f) of this subsection. The authority and behavioral health organizations shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(c) From the general fund—state appropriations in this subsection, the authority shall assure that behavioral health organizations reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long term support administration for the general fund—state cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled behavioral health organization consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(d) $1,760,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain a pilot project to put peer bridging staff into each behavioral health organization as part of the state psychiatric liaison teams to promote continuity of service as individuals return to their communities.

(e) $6,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $4,023,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for new crisis triage or stabilization centers. The authority must seek proposals from behavioral health organizations for the use of these funds based on regional priorities. Services in these facilities may include crisis stabilization and intervention, individual counseling, peer support, medication management, education, and referral assistance. The authority shall monitor each center's effectiveness at lowering the rate of state psychiatric hospital admissions.

(f) $81,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health organization spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health organizations proportionate to the fiscal year 2017 allocation of flexible nonmedicaid funds. The authority must include the following language in medicaid contracts with behavioral health organizations unless they are provided formal notification from the center for medicaid and medicare services that the language will result in the loss of federal medicaid participation: "The contractor may voluntarily provide services that are in addition to those covered under the state plan, although the cost of these services cannot be included when determining payment rates unless including these costs are specifically allowed under federal law or an approved waiver."

(g) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health organizations for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(h) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the Spokane county behavioral health organization to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:

(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health organization shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(i) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting one hundred eighty-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(j) Behavioral health organizations may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health organizations may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with (f) of this subsection to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(k) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health organizations on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(l) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(m) The authority must establish minimum and maximum funding levels for all reserves allowed under behavioral health organization contracts and insert contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The authority must monitor and ensure that behavioral health organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The authority must monitor behavioral health organization revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the behavioral health organization in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the behavioral health organization has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan.

(n) $3,079,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $2,892,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase rates for community hospitals that provide a minimum of two hundred medicaid psychiatric inpatient days. The authority must increase both medicaid and nonmedicaid psychiatric per-diem reimbursement rates for these providers within these amounts. The amounts in this subsection include funding for additional hold harmless payments resulting from the rate increase. The authority shall prioritize increases for hospitals not currently paid based on provider specific costs using a similar methodology used to set rates for existing inpatient facilities and the latest available cost report information. Rate increases for providers must be set so as not to exceed the amounts provided within this subsection. The rate increase related to nonmedicaid clients must be done to maintain the provider at the same percentage as currently required under WAC 182-550-4800.

(o) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the authority to collaborate with tribal governments and develop a plan for establishing an evaluation and treatment facility that will specialize in providing care specifically to the American Indian and Alaska Native population. The plan must include options for maximizing federal participation and ensure that utilization will be based on medical necessity and identify a specific geographic location where a tribal evaluation and treatment facility will be built.

(p) $7,103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $8,052,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide up to forty-eight long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The authority must seek proposals and contract directly for these services rather than contracting through behavioral health organizations. The authority must not use any of the amounts provided under this subsection for contracts with facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities.

(q) $1,133,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $1,297,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the number of psychiatric residential treatment beds for individuals transitioning from psychiatric inpatient settings. The authority must seek proposals from behavioral health organizations for the use of these amounts and coordinate with the department of social and health services in awarding these funds. The authority must not allow for any of the amounts provided under this subsection to be used for services in facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities.

(r) $6,744,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $14,516,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase medicaid capitation payments for behavioral health organizations. The authority must work with the actuaries responsible for certifying behavioral health capitation rates to adjust average salary assumptions in order to implement this increase. In developing further updates for medicaid managed care rates for behavioral health services, the authority must require the contracted actuaries to: (i) Review and consider comparison of salaries paid by government agencies and hospitals that compete with community providers for behavioral health workers in developing salary assumptions; and (ii) review data to see whether a specific travel assumption for high congestion areas is warranted. The authority must include and make available all applicable documents and analysis to legislative staff from the fiscal committees throughout the process. The authority must require the actuaries to develop and submit rate ranges for each behavioral health organization prior to certification of specific rates.

(s) The number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health organizations at eastern state hospital shall be one hundred ninety two per day. The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by behavioral health organizations at western state hospital shall be five hundred fifty-seven per day. In fiscal year 2019, the authority must reduce the number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health organizations at western state hospital by thirty beds to allow for the repurposing of a civil ward at western state hospital to provide forensic services. The contracted beds provided under (p) of this subsection shall be allocated to the behavioral health organizations in lieu of beds at the state hospitals and be incorporated in their allocation of state hospital patient days of care for the purposes of calculating reimbursements pursuant to RCW 71.24.310. It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of expanding community based alternatives for long term civil commitment services that allow for state hospital beds to be prioritized for forensic patients.

(t) $11,405,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $8,840,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain enhancements of community mental health services. The authority must contract these funds for the operation of community programs in which the authority determines there is a need for capacity that allows individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals including but not limited to: (i) Community hospital or free standing evaluation and treatment services providing short-term detention and commitment services under the involuntary treatment act to be located in the geographic areas of the King behavioral health organization, the Spokane behavioral health organization outside of Spokane county, and the Thurston Mason behavioral health organization; (ii) one new full program of an assertive community treatment team in the King behavioral health organization and two new half programs of assertive community treatment teams in the Spokane behavioral health organization and the Pierce behavioral health organization; and (iii) three new recovery support services programs in the Great Rivers behavioral health organization, the greater Columbia behavioral health organization, and the north sound behavioral health organization. In contracting for community evaluation and treatment services, the authority may not use these resources in facilities that meet the criteria to be classified under federal law as institutions for mental diseases. If the authority is unable to come to a contract agreement with a designated behavioral health organization for any of the services identified above, it may consider contracting for that service in another region that has the need for such service.

(u) $1,296,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for clubhouse programs. The authority shall ensure that $400,000 is used for the biennium for support of the Spokane clubhouse program and the remaining funds must be used for support of new clubhouse programs. The authority must develop options and cost estimates for implementation of clubhouse programs statewide through a medicaid state plan amendment or a medicaid waiver and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018.

(v) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to fund one pilot project in Pierce county and one in Yakima county to promote increased utilization of assisted outpatient treatment programs. The authority shall require two behavioral health organizations to contract with local government to establish the necessary infrastructure for the programs. The authority shall provide a report by October 15, 2018, to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature to include the number of individuals served, outcomes to include reduced use of inpatient treatment and state hospital stays, and recommendations for further implementation based on lessons learned and best practices identified by the pilot projects.

(w) $3,278,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a memorandum of understanding with the department of social and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration to provide substance abuse treatment programs for juvenile offenders. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (5)(w):

(i) $1,130,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these funds as described in section 203(4) of this act.

(ii) $282,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the expansion of evidence-based treatments and therapies as described in section 203(2) of this act.

(x) During fiscal year 2019, any amounts provided in this section that are used for case management services for pregnant and parenting women must be contracted directly between the authority and providers rather than through contracts with behavioral health organizations.

(y) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (i) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the authority by request; and (ii) indirect charges for administering the program must not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.

(z) $1,750,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.

(aa) $200,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct cost-benefit evaluations of the implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502).

(bb) $500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey.

(cc) $396,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program.

(dd) $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a grant to the office of superintendent of public instruction to provide life skills training to children and youth in schools that are in high needs communities.

(ee) $386,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to maintain increased prevention and treatment services provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organizations to children and youth.

(ff) $2,684,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $950,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain increased residential treatment services for children and youth.

(gg) $250,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorders.

(hh) $2,434,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account.

(ii) $2,500,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth, including programs for school-based resource officers. These funds must be utilized in accordance with RCW 69.50.540.

(jj) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health organizations must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health organizations must require that behavioral health organizations include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.

(kk) $562,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to develop a memorandum of understanding with the department of health for implementation of chapter 297, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1427) (opioid treatment programs). The authority must use these amounts to reimburse the department of health for costs incurred through the implementation of the bill.

(ll) $2,580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $2,320,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and operation of two secure detoxification facilities. The authority must not use any of these amounts for services in facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions for mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities.

(mm) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for parenting education services focused on pregnant and parenting women.

(nn) Within existing appropriations, the authority shall prioritize the prevention and treatment of intravenous opiate-based drug use.

(oo) The criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with a behavioral health organization or administrative services organization to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b). The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which identifies the distribution of criminal justice treatment account funds by September 30, 2018.

(pp) $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $46,222,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the enhancement of community-based behavioral health services. This funding must be allocated to behavioral health organizations proportionate to their regional population. In order to receive these funds, each region must submit a plan to address the following issues: (i) Reduction in their use of long-term commitment beds through community alternatives; (ii) compliance with RCW 71.05.365 requirements for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within fourteen days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (iii) improvement of staff recruitment and retention in community behavioral health facilities; (iv) diversion of individuals with behavioral health issues from the criminal justice system; and (v) efforts to improve recovery oriented services, including, but not limited to, expansion of clubhouse models. The plans are not limited to the amounts in this subsection and may factor in all resources available for behavioral health. The authority must identify metrics for tracking progress in each of the areas identified. The authority must collect information on the metrics and outcomes and submit a report summarizing the findings to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2020. Twenty percent of the general fund—state appropriation amounts for each behavioral health organization must be used to increase their nonmedicaid funding and the remainder must be used to increase medicaid rates up to but not exceeding the top of each behavioral health organizations medicaid rate range.

(qq) $11,023,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to assist behavioral health organizations with the costs of providing services to medicaid clients receiving services in psychiatric facilities classified as institutions of mental diseases. The authority must distribute these amounts proportionate to the number of bed days for medicaid clients in institutions for mental diseases that were excluded from behavioral health organization fiscal year 2019 capitation rates because they exceeded the amounts allowed under federal regulations. The authority must also use these amounts to directly pay for costs that are ineligible for medicaid reimbursement in institutions of mental disease facilities for American Indian and Alaska Natives who opt to receive behavioral health services on a fee-for-service basis. The amounts used for these individuals must be reduced from the allocation of the behavioral health organization where the individual resides. If a behavioral health organization receives more funding through this subsection than is needed to pay for the cost of their medicaid clients in institutions for mental diseases, they must use the remainder of the amounts to provide other services not covered under the medicaid program. The authority must explore options for continuing to expand waivers which allow for federal matching funds to be used in these facilities. The authority must submit a report on the status of the waiver to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018.

(rr) $14,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to ensure a smooth transition to integrated managed care for behavioral health regions and to maintain the existing level of regional behavioral health crisis and diversion programs, and other required behavioral health administrative service organization services. These amounts must be used to support the regions transitioning to become mid-adopters for full integration of physical and behavioral health care. These amounts must be distributed proportionate to the population of each regional area covered. The maximum amount allowed per region is $3,175 per 1,000 residents. These amounts must be used to provide a reserve for nonmedicaid services in the region and to stabilize the new crisis services system. The authority must require all behavioral health organizations transitioning to full integration to either spend down or return all reserves in accordance with contract requirements and federal and state law. Behavioral health organization reserves may not be used to pay for services to be provided beyond the end of a behavioral health organization's contract or for start-up costs in full integration regions. The authority must ensure that any increases in expenditures in behavioral health reserve spend-down plans are required for the operation of services during the contract period and do not result in overpayment to providers.

(ss) $806,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to develop a peer support program for individuals with substance use disorders. These amounts must be used for development of training and certification of peers specialists. The authority must submit a state plan amendment which provides for these services to be included in behavioral health capitation rates beginning in fiscal year 2020 and allows for federal matching funds to be leveraged for these services.

(tt) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, to further develop efforts to shift funding and risk for most civil long-term inpatient commitments into fully integrated care contracts beginning in January 2020. The funding and risk for patients at the state hospitals who have been committed pursuant to dismissal of felony charges after being determined incompetent to stand trial shall not be incorporated into integrated care contracts.

(i) By December 1, 2018, the authority, in coordination with the department of social and health services, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the following: (A) Actuarial estimates on the impact to per member per month payments and estimated annual state and federal costs for medicaid managed care organizations with fully integrated contracts; (B) actuarial estimates on the estimated annual costs for administrative services organizations; (C) estimates of the per-diem cost at the state hospitals that will be charged to entities with responsibility for paying for long-term civil inpatient commitments once these are incorporated into fully integrated care contracts; and (D) estimates of the amount of funding that can be reduced from direct appropriations for the state hospitals to reflect the shift in financial responsibility.

(ii) The authority must also explore and report on options for fully leveraging the state's share of federal medicaid disproportionate share funding allowed for institutions of mental diseases, including but not limited to: (A) Prioritizing the use of this funding for forensic patients and those civilly committed pursuant to dismissal of a felony charge; (B) obtaining an institution for mental diseases—disproportionate share hospital waiver to allow for regular medicaid federal financial participation to be used at the state hospitals; and (C) shifting some of the state's current disproportionate share funding used at the state hospitals to community-based institutions for mental diseases to reduce the state cost of patients for whom regular federal medicaid match is not allowed.

(uu) $2,732,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $9,026,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement strategies to improve access to prevention and treatment of opioid use disorders. The authority may use these funds for the following activities: (i) Expansion of hub and spoke treatment networks; (ii) expansion of pregnant and parenting case management programs; (iii) grants to tribes to prevent opioid use and expand treatment for opioid use disorders; (iv) development and implementation of a tool to track medication assisted treatment provider capacity; (v) support of drug take-back programs which allow individuals to return unused opioids and other drugs for safe disposal; (vi) purchase and distribution of opioid reversal medication; and (vii) maintaining support for youth prevention services. The authority must coordinate these activities with the department of health to avoid duplication of effort and must work to identify additional federal resources that can be used to maintain and expand these efforts. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of these efforts by December 1, 2018. The report must include identification of any increase in behavioral health federal block grants or other federal funding awards received by the authority and the plan for the use of these funds.

(vv) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the authority to contract with actuaries to develop estimates for the cost of implementing new behavioral health service types in the medicaid state plan. The authority must coordinate with behavioral health organizations to identify: (i) Eligible behavioral health service types that are currently provided to medicaid enrollees without federal funding and are dependent on state, local, or other funds; and (ii) eligible behavioral health service types that are not currently available to medicaid enrollees due to the lack of federal funding. The authority must contract with the actuaries responsible for certifying state behavioral health capitation rates to develop estimates for the cost of implementing each of these services. The estimates must identify the cost of implementing each service statewide, the estimated state and federal medicaid cost, and any estimated offset in state non-medicaid spending. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature identifying the services and costs estimates by November 1, 2018.

(ww) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $89,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The authority must collect information from the institute on the use of these funds and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(xx) No more than $13,098,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the department and the health care authority shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(yy) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the health care authority to implement a process that increases access to children's long-term inpatient program (CLIP) by increasing bed capacity through current and new providers of services.

(zz) $727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $1,005,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6491 (outpatient behavioral health). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 212. 2018 c 299 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($22,565,000))

$22,772,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($22,566,000))

$22,774,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($45,141,000))

$45,556,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $145,000 of the accident account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $145,000 of the medical aid account—state for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1723 (Hanford occupational disease). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 213. 2018 c 299 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$21,668,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$23,139,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$6,673,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$148,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,167,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,000))

$18,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($60,735,000))

$60,733,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130. The association may use no more than $50,000 per fiscal year of the amounts provided on program management activities.

(2) $1,284,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for seventy-five percent of the costs of providing six additional statewide basic law enforcement trainings in fiscal year 2018, and seven additional statewide basic law enforcement trainings in fiscal year 2019. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements.

(3) $792,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely to purchase ammunition for the basic law enforcement academy. Jurisdictions shall reimburse to the criminal justice training commission the costs of ammunition, based on the average cost of ammunition per cadet, for cadets that they enroll in the basic law enforcement academy.

(4) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(5) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a school safety program. The commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel hired after the effective date of this section.

(6) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the school safety center within the commission. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, and review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training. Through an interagency agreement, the commission shall provide funding for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to continue to develop and maintain a school safety information web site. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all school safety personnel. The commission shall provide research-related programs in school safety and security issues beneficial to both law enforcement and schools.

(7) $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the costs of providing statewide advanced driving training with the use of a driving simulator.

(8) $679,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 261, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1501) (attempts to obtain firearms).

(9) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1258) (first responders/disability).

(10) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $414,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 290, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1109) (victims of sexual assault).

(11) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $1,000,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention account—state appropriation are provided solely for the first responder building mapping information system.

(12) $595,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $595,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to continue crisis intervention training required in chapter 87, Laws of 2015.

(13) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to deliver research-based programs to instruct, guide, and support local law enforcement agencies in fostering the "guardian philosophy" of policing, which emphasizes de-escalating conflicts and reducing the use of force.

(14) $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for expenditure into the nonappropriated Washington internet crimes against children account for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.

(15) $842,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the purpose of creating and funding on an ongoing basis the: (a) Updating and providing of basic and in-service training for peace officers and corrections officers that emphasizes de-escalation and use of less lethal force; and (b) creation and provision of an evidence-based leadership development program, in partnership with Microsoft, that trains, equips, and supports law enforcement leaders using research-based strategies to reduce crime and improve public trust. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, $907,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the training in (a) of this subsection.

(16) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to fund pilot projects in Benton county to support local law enforcement education for law enforcement, medical professionals, first responders, courts, educators, and others to raise awareness and identifying warning signs of human trafficking. Any educational opportunities created through the pilot projects in Benton county may provide access for adjacent counties if resources and availability permits.

(17) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to administer statewide training in the use of the Washington state gang database, established in compliance with RCW 43.43.762, and provide grant funding to ensure agencies enter appropriate and reliable data into the database. The training shall develop professionals with regional responsibilities for database administration throughout the state.

(18) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for providing grants for the mental health field response team grant program established in House Bill No. 2892 (mental health field response). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1022 (crime victim participation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to convene a work group to develop strategies for identification and intervention against potential perpetrators of mass shootings, with an emphasis on school safety, and report on recommendations for their prevention.

(a) The work group includes, but is not limited to, representatives of the superintendent of public instruction, the school safety center advisory committee, state colleges and universities, local law enforcement, the Washington state patrol, the attorney general, mental health experts, victims of mass shootings, and the American civil liberties union of Washington.

(b) The work group shall assess and make recommendations regarding:

(i) Strategies to identify persons who may commit mass shootings associated with K-12 schools and colleges and universities;

(ii) A survey of services around the state available for those experiencing a mental health crisis;

(iii) A survey of state and federal laws related to intervening against potential perpetrators or confiscating their firearms; and

(iv) Strategies used by other states or recommended nationally to address the problem of mass shootings.

(c) The work group shall submit a report, which may include findings, recommendations, and proposed legislation, to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018. The report shall consider the following strategies:

(i) Promoting to the public the availability of extreme risk protection orders as a means of avoiding mass shootings;

(ii) A rapid response interdisciplinary team composed of law enforcement, mental health experts, and other appropriate parties who could be mobilized to intervene and prevent a potential crisis at a school or institution of higher learning; and

(iii) Whether reasonable restrictions should be imposed on the access to firearms by those suffering from a mental illness that are consistent with the individual right to bear arms.

Sec. 214. 2018 c 299 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$6,513,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$9,285,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,876,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$526,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$53,776,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$991,000

Public Works Administration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,849,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$377,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($320,925,000))

$321,936,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,765,000))

$19,839,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($334,083,000))

$334,453,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,739,000))

$4,182,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,880,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,433,000

Construction Registration Inspection Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,945,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,435,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($797,426,000))

$802,324,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $123,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $22,000 of the medical aid—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 150, Laws of 2017 (House Bill No. 1906) (farm internship).

(2) The department, in collaboration with the health care authority, shall work to ensure that a single platform provider credentialing system is implemented. The authority and department shall ensure that appropriate cost offsets and cost avoidance are assumed for reduced staff time required for provider credentialing activity and reductions in improper billing activity when implementing provider credentialing systems. The department must enter into an agreement with the health care authority to pay its share of the costs of implementing and operating a new provider credentialing system.

(3) $5,802,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $5,676,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for business transformation projects and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(4) $19,128,000 of the construction registration inspection account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1716 (construction inspection account). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $2,000,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $2,000,000 of the medical account—state appropriation are provided solely for a contract with a workforce institute to provide supplemental instruction for information technology apprentices. Funds spent for this purpose must be matched by an equal amount of funding from the information technology industry members, except small and mid-sized employers. Up to $2,000,000 may be spent to provide supplemental instruction for apprentices at small and mid-sized businesses. "Small and mid-sized employers" means those that have fewer than one hundred employees or have less than five percent net profitability.

(6) $250,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $250,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must issue an initial report to the legislature, by June 30, 2020, assessing the physical capacity of workers in the context of the industry's economic environment and ascertain usable support tools for employers and workers to decrease risk of injury. After the initial report, the department must produce annual progress reports, beginning in 2021 through the year 2022 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress reports must be submitted to the legislature by December 1st of each year such reports are due.

(7) $1,272,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1673 (responsible bidder criteria). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $185,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $185,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1723 (Hanford/occupational disease). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $422,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6245 (spoken language interpreters). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(10) $51,000 of the medial aid account—state appropriation and $50,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1022 (crime victim participation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 215. 2018 c 299 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. In response to any request by the department for general fund—state appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.

(2) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$1,913,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$1,907,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$185,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,015,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $84,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 173, Laws of 2017 (ESSB 1802) (veterans' shared leave pool).

(3) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$6,077,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($6,126,000))

$6,329,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,747,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$4,794,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$664,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$443,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($21,851,000))

$22,054,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to provide crisis and emergency relief and education, training, and employment assistance to veterans and their families in their communities through the veterans innovation program.

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 192, Laws of 2017 (SB 5849) (veterans' services).

(c) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the expansion of the veterans conservation corps by fifteen paid internships.

(4) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$11,925,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($5,831,000))

$16,381,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$84,027,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$27,983,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,462,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($131,228,000))

$141,778,000

Sec. 216. 2018 c 299 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$70,667,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($78,618,000))

$79,179,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($550,114,000))

$550,153,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($186,257,000))

$186,530,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($347,000))

$366,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($132,578,000))

$134,580,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$623,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,872,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,667,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,990,000

Waterworks Operator Certification—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,836,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$371,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$168,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,968,000))

$1,768,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,249,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,098,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,591,000

Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,363,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2018)
. . . .
$9,761,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2019)
. . . .
$9,764,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,248,000))

$4,248,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,821,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$343,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$53,000

Suicide-Safer Homes Project Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,093,417,000))

$1,097,111,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(2) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(3) In accordance with RCW 43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2018 and 2019 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(4)(a) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to support the local health jurisdictions to improve their ability to address (i) communicable disease monitoring and prevention and (ii) chronic disease and injury prevention. The department and representatives of local health jurisdictions must work together to arrive at a mutually acceptable allocation and distribution of funds and to determine the best accountability measures to ensure efficient and effective use of funds, emphasizing the use of shared services.

(b) By December 31, 2017, the department shall provide a preliminary report, and by November 30, 2018, a final report, to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding:

(i) The allocation of funding, as provided in this subsection, to the local health jurisdictions;

(ii) Steps taken by the local health jurisdictions that received funding to improve communicable disease monitoring and prevention and chronic disease and injury prevention;

(iii) An assessment of the effectiveness of the steps taken by local health jurisdictions and the criteria measured; and

(iv) Any recommendations for future models for service delivery to address communicable and chronic diseases.

(5)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department, as part of foundational public health services, to implement strategies to control the spread of communicable diseases and other health threats. These strategies may include updating or replacing equipment in the state public health laboratory; addressing health inequities among state residents; reporting on the root cause analyses of adverse events at medical facilities; performing critical activities to prevent adverse health consequences of hepatitis C; or assessing information technology system consolidation and modernization opportunities for statewide public health data systems.

(b) By November 30, 2018, the department shall develop a statewide governmental public health improvement plan and provide it to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(6) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1258) (first responders/disability).

(7) Within amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided to implement chapter 312, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5046) (language of public notices).

(8) $39,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 249, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1714) (nurse staffing plans).

(9) $27,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation and $50,000 of the Suicide-Safer Homes Project account are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 262, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1612) (reducing access to lethal means).

(10) $269,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 297, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1427) (opioid treatment program).

(11) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided to the department solely to cover costs of providing increased capacity under existing contracts with suicide prevention lines to respond to calls to the national suicide prevention lifeline.

(12) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than five hundred twenty-five dollars annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.

(13)(a) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department, in consultation with advocacy groups and experts that focus on hunger and poverty issues, shall produce a report regarding ongoing nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered in Washington state. The report must be a compilation, by program, of data already collected by the department of social and health services, the department of health, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the Washington state department of agriculture, and it must include, where available, but is not limited to:

(i) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(ii) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(iii) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(iv) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(v) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(b) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the governor. An initial report is due by April 30, 2018, and a second report is due by April 30, 2019.

(14) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of health are subject to technical oversight by the office of the state chief information officer.

(15) $2,604,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the medical quality assurance commission to address increased workload.

(16) $896,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the pharmacy commission to improve research and communication to pharmacies regarding the development and implementation of new and changing rules.

(17) $9,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement projects and activities during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium that are designed to improve the health and well-being of individuals living with human immunodeficiency virus, including:

(a) A health disparity project to increase access to dental, mental health, and housing services for populations that have historically experienced limited access to needed services, including Latino individuals in central Washington;

(b) A project to establish a peer-to-peer network for individuals living with human immunodeficiency virus. Trained navigators will work to link individuals living with human immunodeficiency virus to medical care, housing support, training, and other needed services;

(c) A project to expand the MAX clinic within Harborview hospital to serve an increased number of high-need clients and establishing a MAX clinic to serve high-need clients in Pierce county. This project shall also provide statewide training for staff of the department, of local health jurisdictions, and of providers of services for persons with human immunodeficiency virus;

(d) The development of a single eligibility portal to allow statewide usage and streamlined case management for individuals who are living with human immunodeficiency virus and receiving public health services; and

(e) An assessment and evaluation of the effectiveness of each of the projects outlined in subsections (a) through (d) of this subsection.

(18) $6,096,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for the department to target its efforts in the HIV early intervention program toward populations with health disparities.

(19) $1,118,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for equipment, testing supplies, and materials necessary to add x-linked adrenoleukodystrophy to the mandatory newborn screening panel. The department is authorized to increase the newborn screening fee by $8.10.

(20) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for:

(a) Increased screening, case management, and an electronic data reporting system to identify children who are at the highest risk of having elevated levels of lead in their blood, prioritizing children who live in areas where the risk is highest; and

(b) Sampling and testing of drinking water and water fixtures in public schools. The department, in collaboration with the educational service districts, must prioritize testing within elementary schools where drinking water and water fixtures have not been tested for contaminants at any time, and elementary schools where drinking water and water fixtures have not been tested within the past three years. Consistent with the United States environmental protection agency's manual, "3Ts for Reducing Lead in Drinking Water in Schools—Revised Technical Guidance," the department must develop guidance and testing protocols for the lead action level for drinking water and for testing drinking water and drinking water fixtures in public and private schools. The guidance must include:

(i) Actions to take if test results exceed the federal action level or public drinking water standard;

(ii) Recommendations to schools on prioritizing fixture replacement, and options for further reducing lead, including replacement of fixtures or use of certified filters when results are below the federal action level for schools, but exceed the maximum level recommended by the American Academy of Pediatrics; and

(iii) Recommendations for communicating test results and risk to parents and the community, including that there is no safe level of lead in water and that action may be warranted even if levels are below the action level.

(21) $277,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 207, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1819) (children's mental health).

(22) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to increase the funding for the breast, cervical, and colon health program administered by the department.

(23) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.20B.110 and 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.

(24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.12.470, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 71.12.485.

(25) $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 273, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1358) (community assistance referral programs).

(26) $224,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 320, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5322) (dentists and third parties).

(27) $93,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 101, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1431) (osteopathic medicine and surgery).

(28) $82,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 263, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5152) (pediatric transitional care).

(29) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for the department to prepare and submit a report about the certificate of need program to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by October 1, 2017. By health care setting, for each of the preceding ten fiscal years, the report must show the total number of applications, the total number of accepted applications, the total number of beds requested, the total number of beds approved, and a summary of the most common reasons for declining an application. The report must include suggestions for modifying the program to increase the number of successful applications. At least one suggestion must address the goal of adding psychiatric beds within hospitals.

(30) The department, in collaboration with the health care authority, shall work to ensure that a single platform provider credentialing system is implemented. The authority and department shall ensure that appropriate cost offsets and cost avoidance are assumed for reduced staff time required for provider credentialing activity and reductions in improper billing activity when implementing provider credentialing systems.

(31) $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for staffing capacity at the department to support a performance audit of the fee-setting process for each health profession licensed by the department.

(32) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of chapter 294, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5835) (health outcomes/pregnancy).

(33) $670,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a collaboration between local public health, accountable communities of health, and health care providers to reduce preventable hospitalizations. This one-year initiative will take place in the Tacoma/Pierce county local health jurisdiction.

(34) $556,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to replace the comprehensive hospital abstract reporting system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724, chapter 1, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

(35) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department, in partnership with the department of social and health services and the health care authority, to assist a collaborative public-private entity with implementation of recommendations in the state plan to address alzheimer's disease and other dementias.

(36) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090, 71.24.035, 43.20B.110, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2018 and 2019 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(37) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the nursing care quality assurance commission to convene and facilitate a work group to assess the need for nurses in long-term care settings and to make recommendations regarding worker recruitment, training, and retention challenges for long-term care providers in the sectors of skilled nursing facilities, assisted-living facilities, and adult family homes.

(a) The work group must:

(i) Determine the current and projected worker vacancy rates in the long-term care sectors compared to the workload projections for these sectors;

(ii) Develop recommendations for a standardized training curriculum for certified nursing assistants that ensures that workers are qualified to provide care in each sector, including integration into the curriculum of specific training for the care of clients with dementia, developmental disabilities, and mental health issues;

(iii) Review academic and other prerequisites for training for licensed practical nurses to identify any barriers to career advancement for certified nursing assistants;

(iv) Identify barriers to career advancement for long-term care workers; and

(v) Evaluate the oversight roles of the department of health and the department of social and health services for nurse training programs and make recommendations for streamlining those roles.

(b) The members of the work group must include the following:

(i) The chair of the house health care and wellness committee or his or her designee;

(ii) The chair of the senate health and long-term care committee or his or her designee;

(iii) The assistant secretary of the aging and disability support administration of the department of social and health services, or his or her designee;

(iv) A member of the Washington apprenticeship and training council, chosen by the director of the department of labor and industries;

(v) A representative from the health services quality assurance division of the department of health, chosen by the secretary;

(vi) The executive director of the Washington state board for community and technical colleges or his or her designee;

(vii) A representative of the largest statewide association representing nurses;

(viii) A representative of the largest statewide union representing home care workers;

(ix) A representative of the largest statewide association representing assisted living and skilled nursing facilities;

(x) A representative of the adult family home council of Washington; and

(xi) The Washington state long-term care ombuds or his or her designee.

(d) The work group must meet at least three times, and the first meeting must occur no later than July 15, 2018. The commission must report no later than December 15, 2018, to the governor and the legislature regarding the work group's assessments and recommendations.

(38) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to implement training and education recommendations described in the 2016 report of the community health worker task force. The department shall report to the legislature on the progress of implementation no later than June 30, 2019. These moneys shall only be used to cover the cost of the department's staff time, meeting expenses, and community outreach.

(39) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to Seattle and King county public health for core public health services that prevent and stop the spread of communicable disease, including but not limited to zoonotic and emerging diseases and chronic hepatitis B and hepatitis C.

(40) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with local health jurisdictions to establish and maintain comprehensive Group B programs to ensure safe and reliable drinking water. These amounts shall be used to support the costs of the development and adoption of rules, policies and procedures, and for technical assistance, training, and other program-related costs.

(41) $485,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2671 (behavioral health/agricultural industry). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(42) $113,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6037 (uniform parentage act). ((If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(43) $19,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6273 (state charity care). ((If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(44) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a grant to the Benton-Franklin local health jurisdiction to expand its youth suicide prevention activities and to serve as a case study to identify best practice materials, training, intervention practices, and promotional strategies that can be replicated in other local health jurisdictions. The amounts appropriated must be used for the following activities:

(a) Prior to September 1, 2018, the Benton-Franklin local health jurisdiction must document the materials, training, intervention practices, and promotional strategies for youth suicide prevention that are available within Benton county and Franklin county.

(b) Prior to October 1, 2018, the Benton-Franklin local health jurisdiction must host a summit about the issue of youth suicide prevention. The summit must include attendees from schools, health care organizations, nonprofit organizations, and other relevant organizations from Benton county and Franklin county. The summit may also include attendees from other areas of the state who have unique knowledge and expertise with the issue of youth suicide prevention. Prior to the summit, the Benton-Franklin local health jurisdiction must share the result of the work described in (a) of this subsection with all attendees. During the summit, the Benton-Franklin local health jurisdiction must survey the attendees to determine best practices for educational materials, training, intervention practices, and promotional strategies.

(c) Prior to November 1, 2018, the Benton-Franklin local health jurisdiction must complete a plan for expanding youth suicide prevention that is based primarily on the survey of attendees described in (b) of this subsection. For each investment, the plan must describe the amount of funding utilized, as well as the expected results. The plan must be shared with the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature, by November 10, 2018.

(d) Prior to June 15, 2019, the Benton-Franklin local health jurisdiction must complete a final report summarizing the work completed to satisfy (a) through (c) of this subsection. The final report must include a description of outcomes that can be measured and linked to the expansion of youth suicide prevention activities funded by this subsection. The final report will serve as a guide for further expansion of youth suicide prevention in Benton-Franklin, or within other local health jurisdictions. The final report must be shared with the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature, by June 30, 2019.

(45) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, $626,000 of the emergency medical services account appropriation, and $70,000 of the health profession account appropriation are provided solely for the department to establish a statewide electronic emergency medical services data system for licensed ambulances and aid services to report and furnish patient encounter data, for the distribution of health care supplies through the hub and spoke community-based public health programs, and for knowledge-based identity verification for the prescription monitoring program. The secretary shall be responsible for coordinating the statewide response to the opioid epidemic.

(46) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to contract with a private or nonprofit business or organization with experience using evidence-based practices and promising practices for global strategies to reduce health disparities and address root social determinants of health for underserved communities in rural Washington state; with experience in working with underserved populations who face barriers to basic health and economic resources, including lack of access to preventative care, contributing to mismanagement of chronic disease and shortened lifespan; and with expertise regarding Washington state's global health institutions to bring strategies that have proven effective in developing countries to underserved communities in the United States. The program should engage marginalized communities in order to identify barriers and social determinants that most impact health, including access to housing and food and economic stability and be able to identify, train, and provide tools to community leaders. The department must report to the legislature by December 1, 2019, regarding identified barriers and any recommendations for interventions.

(47) $160,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional staffing to coordinate the integration of the prescription monitoring program data into electronic health systems pursuant to chapter 297, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1427) (opioid treatment programs).

(48) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6529 (pesticide application safety). ((If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(49) $791,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2313 (chiropractic quality assurance commission). ((If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 217. 2018 c 299 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2018,))2019 after approval by the director of financial management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2018))2019 between programs. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$60,866,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($61,152,000))

$64,655,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,602,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($130,020,000))

$133,523,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the support of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its members representatives of community-based mental health treatment programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The council will investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing, employment, and job training needs.

(b)(i) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the department must revise its agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(A) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(B) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(I) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(II) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(III) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(ii) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the department or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(iii) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(c) $488,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $964,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for information technology business solutions and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(d) The department, in collaboration with the health care authority, shall work to ensure that a single platform provider credentialing system is implemented. The authority and department shall ensure that appropriate cost offsets and cost avoidance are assumed for reduced staff time required for provider credentialing activity and reductions in improper billing activity when implementing provider credentialing systems.

(e) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2638 (graduated reentry program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$499,134,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($515,165,000))

$531,636,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$818,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,588,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$62,831,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,082,536,000))

$1,099,007,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may contract for beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The duration of the contracts may be for up to four years. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender for all costs associated with the offender while in the local correctional facility to include programming and health care costs, or the equivalent of $85 per day per bed including programming and health care costs for full units. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for inmates held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meet standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.

(b) $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester.

(c) $1,379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, and $1,379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to contract for the use of inmate bed capacity in lieu of prison beds operated by the state to meet prison capacity needs.

(((d) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to enter into an agreement to purchase electricity for the Monroe correctional complex from a source located in Snohomish county that is fueled using commercial or industrial waste from an on-site lumber mill that employs at least 150 people.

(e)))(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided to implement chapter 335, Laws of 2017 (SB 5037) (DUI 4th offense/felony).

(((f)))(e) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of chapter 226, Laws of 2017 (HB 1153) (vulnerable persons/crimes).

(((g)))(f) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department of corrections must review the use of full body scanners at state correctional facilities for women to reduce the frequency of strip and body cavity searches and report with recommendations to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by November 15, 2017. The report must address the cost of technology, installation, and maintenance; the benefits to personnel and inmates; information regarding accumulated exposure to radiation; and general guidelines for implementation at a pilot facility.

(((h)))(g) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to contract with an independent third party to: (i) Provide a comprehensive review of the prison staffing model; and (ii) develop an updated prison staffing model for use by the department.

(((i)))(h) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to install a body scanner at the Washington corrections center for women as a pilot project to reduce strip searches. The department must collect data on its change in practices, the benefits or issues with utilizing body scanners in the prison, and provide a report to the legislature and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by October 15, 2019.

(((j)))(i) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1889 (corrections ombuds). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$179,455,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($189,378,000))

$203,061,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,898,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,791,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($384,522,000))

$398,205,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess of $85 per day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year increase in excess of three percent per year. The contracts may include rates for the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily cost of incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increases, provided that medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff.

(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.

(c) By January 1, 2018, the department of corrections shall provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature to include a review of the department's policies and procedures related to swift and certain sanctioning, and identification of legal decisions that impact caseload and operations. The report shall include recommendations for improving public and staff safety while decreasing recidivism through improved alignment of the department's policies and procedures with current best practices concerning swift and certain sanctioning. The report shall include a review of department practices, legal decisions that impact caseload and operations, an analysis of current best practices in other jurisdictions that have adopted swift and certain sanctioning, and recommendations to improve the department's practices and procedures.

(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided to implement chapter 335, Laws of 2017 (SB 5037) (DUI 4th offense/felony).

(e) $1,742,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2638 (graduated reentry program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$6,278,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($5,959,000))

$6,680,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$510,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($12,747,000))

$13,468,000

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$45,002,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($42,889,000))

$42,612,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($87,891,000))

$87,614,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2638 (graduated reentry program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.))

(b) $72,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1889 (corrections ombuds). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) OFFENDER CHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$52,685,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($56,724,000))

$55,243,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,434,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($113,843,000))

$112,362,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for offender programming. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(b) The department shall submit a report by December 1, 2018, to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the department's compliance with this subsection. The report must: (i) Include a summary of the comprehensive plan; (ii) analyze state funds allocated to cognitive behavioral change programs and reentry specific programs, including percentages and amounts of funds used in evidence-based practices and the number of people being served; (iii) identify discontinued and newly implemented cognitive behavioral change programs and reentry specific programs, including information used by the department in evaluating the effectiveness of discontinued and implemented programs; and (iv) provide recommendations to improve program outcomes, including recommended strategies, deadlines, and funding.

(c) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided to implement chapter 335, Laws of 2017 (SB 5037) (DUI 4th offense/felony).

(d) $334,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2638 (graduated reentry program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) HEALTH CARE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$144,271,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($146,621,000))

$153,471,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($290,892,000))

$297,742,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

Sec. 218. 2018 c 299 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

The appropriations to the department of children, youth, and families in this act shall be expanded for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. To the extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions, the department, after May 1, 2019, may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2019 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and the house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications and transfers.

(1) CHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($361,756,000))

$365,327,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($246,625,000))

$247,882,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,477,000))

$1,412,000

((Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,002,000))

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,976,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($624,836,000))

$628,597,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(b) $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the costs of hub home foster families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a licensed hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.

(c) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $55,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(d) $990,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.

(e) $1,351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020.

(f) $7,173,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $6,022,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for family assessment response. Amounts appropriated in this subsection are sufficient to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6309 (family assessment response).

(g) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.

(h) $2,933,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $876,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to reduce the caseload ratios of social workers serving children in foster care to promote decreased lengths of stay and to make progress towards achievement of the Braam settlement caseload outcome.

(i)(A) $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, $328,000 of the general fund private/local appropriation, and $126,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, or regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(B) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.

(j) The department shall continue to implement policies to reduce the percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation, including clarification of the threshold for transition from supervised to unsupervised visitation prior to reunification.

(k) $111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $26,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a base rate increase for licensed family child care providers. In addition, $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $11,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for increasing paid professional days from three days to five days for licensed family child care providers. Amounts in this subsection are provided solely for the 2017-2019 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as set forth in section 940 of this act. Amounts provided in this subsection are contingent on the enactment of Senate Bill No. 5969 (transparency in public employee collective bargaining). ((If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection (k) shall lapse.))

(l) $321,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $133,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 265, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1867) (ext. foster care transitions).

(m) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a contract with a national nonprofit organization to, in partnership with private matching funds, subcontract with a community organization for specialized, enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody. The contract must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children.

(n) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $56,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, implement, and expand strategies to improve the capacity, reliability, and effectiveness of contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care and their parents and siblings. Strategies may include, but are not limited to, increasing mileage reimbursement for providers, offering transportation-only contract options, and mechanisms to reduce the level of parent-child supervision when doing so is in the best interest of the child. The department must submit an analysis of the strategies and associated outcomes no later than October 1, 2018.

(o) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.

(p) $1,018,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $195,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a six percent base rate increase for child care center providers, effective September 1, 2017.

(q) $1,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $78,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the travel reimbursement for in-home service providers.

(r) The department is encouraged to control exceptional reimbursement decisions so that the child's needs are met without excessive costs.

(s) $1,342,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $959,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5890 (foster care and adoption). Within the amounts provided in this section, $366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $174,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for short-term care for licensed foster families. If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(t) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.

(u) $848,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement contracts. The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments.

(v) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6453 (kinship caregiver legal support).

(w) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to contract with a county-wide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a pilot project that convenes stakeholders to develop and plan an intervention using the help me grow model to prevent child abuse and neglect.

(x) $692,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $487,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to implement an enhanced rate add-on for providers who increase bed capacity for behavioral rehabilitation services as measured against the provider's average bed capacity as of the first six months of fiscal year 2018. The department must report to the legislature no later than January 1, 2019, on the effect of this enhanced rate add-on on increasing behavioral rehabilitation services bed capacity and rates of placement.

(y) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2008 (state services for children). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(z) $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $38,000 of the general fund—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6222 (extended foster care eligibility). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(aa) $533,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to expand performance-based contracts for family support and related services through network administrators, pursuant to Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6407 (H-5083.2).

(bb)(i) The department of children, youth, and families in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of commerce office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs, and the student achievement council must convene a work group with aligned nongovernmental agencies, including a statewide nonprofit coalition that is representative of communities of color and low-income communities focused on educational equity, to create a plan for children and youth in foster care and children and youth experiencing homelessness to facilitate educational equity with their general student population peers and to close the disparities between racial and ethnic groups by 2027. The work group must:

(A) Review the educational outcomes of children and youth in foster care and children and youth experiencing homelessness, including:

(I) Kindergarten readiness, early grade reading, school stability, high school completion, postsecondary enrollment, and postsecondary completion; and

(II) Disaggregated data by race and ethnicity;

(B) Consider the outcomes, needs, and services for children and youth in foster care and children and youth experiencing homelessness, and the specific needs of children and youth of color and those with special education needs;

(C) Map current education support services, including eligibility, service levels, service providers, outcomes, service coordination, data sharing, and overall successes and challenges;

(D) Engage stakeholders in participating in the analysis and development of recommendations, including foster youth and children and youth experiencing homelessness, foster parents and relative caregivers, birth parents, caseworkers, school districts and educators, early learning providers, postsecondary education advocates, and federally recognized tribes;

(E) Make recommendations for an optimal continuum of education support services to foster and homeless children and youth from preschool to postsecondary education that would provide for shared and sustainable accountability to reach the goal of educational parity, including recommendations to:

(I) Align indicators and outcomes across organizations and programs;

(II) Improve racial and ethnic equity in educational outcomes;

(III) Ensure access to consistent and accurate annual educational outcomes data;

(IV) Address system barriers such as data sharing;

(V) Detail options for governance and oversight to ensure educational services are continually available to foster and homeless children and youth regardless of status;

(VI) Detail a support structure that will ensure that educational records, educational needs, individualized education programs, credits, and other records will follow children and youth when they transition from district to district or another educational program or facility;

(VII) Explore the option of creating a specific statewide school district that supports the needs of and tracks the educational progress of children and youth in foster care and children and youth experiencing homelessness;

(VIII) Identify where opportunities exist to align policy, practices, and supports for students experiencing homelessness and foster students; and

(IX) Outline which recommendations can be implemented using existing resources and regulations and which require policy, administrative, and resource adjustments.

(ii) The work group should seek to develop an optimal continuum of services using research-based program strategies and to provide for prevention, early intervention, and seamless transitions.

(iii) Nothing in this subsection (1)(bb) permits disclosure of confidential information protected from disclosure under federal or state law, including but not limited to information protected under chapter 13.50 RCW. Confidential information received by the work group retains its confidentiality and may not be further disseminated except as allowed under federal and state law.

(iv) By December 17, 2018, the work group must provide a report to the legislature on its analysis as described under this subsection (1)(bb), the recommended plan, and any legislative and administrative changes needed to facilitate educational equity for children and youth in foster care and children and youth experiencing homelessness with their general student population peers by 2027.

(2) EARLY LEARNING PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($126,846,000))

$114,238,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($149,289,000))

$186,389,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$14,190,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,489,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,706,000

WA Opportunity Pathways Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$468,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($347,988,000))

$372,480,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $67,938,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, $12,125,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $40,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 13,491 slots in fiscal year 2019.

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to develop and provide culturally relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.

(c)(((i))) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to the department of social and health services to fund the child care subsidies paid by the department of social and health services on behalf of the department.

(((ii)(A) If the department receives additional federal child care and development funding while the legislature is not in session, the department shall request a federal allotment adjustment through the unanticipated receipts process defined in RCW 43.79.270 and shall prioritize its request based on the following priorities:

(I) Increasing child care rates comparable to market rates based on the most recent market survey;

(II) Increasing access to infant and toddler child care;

(III) Increasing access to child care in geographic areas where supply for subsidized child care does not meet the demand;

(IV) Providing nurse consultation services to licensed providers;

(V) Allowing working connections child care consumers who are full-time community or technical college students to attend college full-time and not have to meet work requirements; and

(VI) Meeting new or expanded federal mandates.

(B) The secretary of the department shall consult with the chairs and ranking members of the appropriate policy committees of the legislature prior to submitting the unanticipated receipt.))

(d)(i) (($78,090,000))$108,798,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.215.135. In order to not exceed the appropriated amount, the department shall manage the program so that the average monthly caseload does not exceed 33,000 households. The department shall give prioritized access into the program according to the following order:

(A) Families applying for or receiving temporary assistance for needy families (TANF);

(B) TANF families curing sanction;

(C) Foster children;

(D) Families that include a child with special needs;

(E) Families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center;

(F) Families with a child residing with a biological parent or guardian who have received child protective services, child welfare services, or a family assessment response from the department in the past six months, and has received a referral for child care as part of the family's case management;

(G) Families that received subsidies within the last thirty days and:

(I) Have reapplied for subsidies; and

(II) Have household income of two hundred percent federal poverty level or below; and

(H) All other eligible families.

(ii) The department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must submit a final report by December 1, 2018, to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on quality control measures for the working connections child care program. The report must include:

(A) A detailed narrative of the procurement and implementation of an improved time and attendance system, including a detailed accounting of the costs of procurement and implementation;

(B) A comprehensive description of all processes, including computer algorithms and additional rule development, that the department and the department of social and health services plan to establish prior to and after full implementation of the time and attendance system. At a minimum, processes must be designed to:

(I) Ensure the department's auditing efforts are informed by regular and continuous alerts of the potential for overpayments;

(II) Avoid overpayments to the maximum extent possible and expediently recover overpayments that have occurred;

(III) Withhold payment from providers when necessary to incentivize receipt of the necessary documentation to complete an audit;

(IV) Establish methods for reducing future payments or establishing repayment plans in order to recover any overpayments;

(V) Sanction providers, including termination of eligibility, who commit intentional program violations or fail to comply with program requirements, including compliance with any established repayment plans; and

(VI) Consider pursuit of prosecution in cases with fraudulent activity; and

(C) A description of the process by which fraud is identified and how fraud investigations are prioritized and expedited.

(iii) Beginning July 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(A) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;

(B) The reason for each overpayment;

(C) The total cost of overpayments;

(D) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and

(E) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.

(e) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management and the department of social and health services shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(f) $1,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $6,712,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program. If federal sequestration cuts are realized, cuts to the seasonal child care program must be proportional to other federal reductions made within the department.

(g) $4,674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall ensure that contracted providers pursue receipt of federal funding associated with the early support for infants and toddlers program. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.

(h) $42,706,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 and $13,954,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain the requirements set forth in chapter 7, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess. The department shall place a ten percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. In its annual report to the governor and the legislature, the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (h), $577,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a six percent base rate increase for child care center providers.

(i) $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.

(j) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(k) $2,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.

(l) $3,445,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to procure a time and attendance system and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(m) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer. The department must collaborate with the office of the chief information officer to develop a strategic business and technology architecture plan for a child care attendance and billing system that supports a statewide architecture.

(n)(i)(A) The department is required to provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.

(B) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry starting in the 2015-16 school year, and every school year thereafter. By October 2017, and every October thereafter, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.

(C) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.

(D) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data by March 2018 for the school year ending in 2017.

(ii) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

(o) The department shall work with state and local law enforcement, federally recognized tribal governments, and tribal law enforcement to develop a process for expediting fingerprinting and data collection necessary to conduct background checks for tribal early learning and child care providers.

(p) $2,651,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the 2017-2019 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as set forth in section 940 of this act. Amounts provided in this subsection (p) are contingent upon the enactment of Senate Bill No. 5969 (transparency in public employee collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $273,000 is for a base rate increase;

(ii) $55,000 is for increasing paid professional development days from three days to five days;

(iii) $1,708,000 is for the family child care providers 501(c)(3) organization for the substitute pool, training and quality improvement support services, and administration;

(iv) $114,000 is for increasing licensing incentive payments; and

(v) $500,000 is for needs based grants.

(q) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity that provides quality improvement services to participants in the early achievers program to implement a community-based training module that supports licensed child care providers who have been rated in early achievers and who are specifically interested in serving children in the early childhood education and assistance program. The module must be functionally translated into Spanish and Somali. The module must prepare trainees to administer all aspects of the early childhood education and assistance program for eligible children in their licensed program and must be offered to 105 child care providers to serve children eligible for the early childhood education and assistance program by June 30, 2019.

(r) $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 236, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1445) (dual language in early learning & K-12).

(s) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(t) $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 162, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5357) (outdoor early learning programs).

(u) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the department of health, to submit a report on child care nurse consultation to the governor and appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018. The report must address the following:

(i) Provide background on what nurse consultation services are currently available to licensed child care providers; and

(ii) Provide options and recommendations, including fiscal estimates, for a plan to provide nurse consultation services to licensed child care providers who request assistance in addressing the health and behavioral needs of children in their care.

(v) $163,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to develop a community-based training module in managing and sustaining a child care business for child care providers and entrepreneurs. To develop the training, the department must consult with the statewide child care resource and referral network, the community and technical college system, and one or more community-based organizations with experience in preparing child care providers for entry into the workforce. By November 1, 2018, the department must offer the training as a pilot in rural Jefferson county and urban Pierce county. The department must report on the results of the pilot to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(w) $74,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2861 (trauma-informed child care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(x) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of the expanded learning opportunity quality initiative pursuant to RCW 43.215.100(3)(d).

(y) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2779 (children mental health services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($51,709,000))

$53,662,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($15,928,000))

$17,230,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($67,637,000))

$70,892,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations provided in this subsection are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1661 (child, youth, families department). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b)(i) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the department must revise its agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(A) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(B) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(I) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(II) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(III) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(ii) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the department or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(iii) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(c)(i) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to conduct a study, jointly with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs within the department of commerce, on the public system response to families and youth in crisis who are seeking services to address family conflict in the absence of child abuse and neglect.

(ii) In conducting the study required under this section, the department and the office shall involve stakeholders involved in advocating and providing services to truants and at-risk youth, and shall consult with local jurisdictions, the Washington administrative office of the courts, and other entities as appropriate. The study shall review the utilization of existing resources such as secure crisis residential centers, crisis residential centers, and HOPE beds and make recommendations to assure effective use or redeployment of these resources.

(iii) The department and office shall develop recommendations to improve the delivery of services to youth and families in conflict which shall include a plan to provide community-based early intervention services as well as intensive interventions for families and youth facing crisis so severe that a youth cannot continue to reside in the home or is at risk of experiencing homelessness. Recommendations may include changes to family reconciliation services, and revisions to the at-risk youth and child in need of services petition processes, including consideration of a combined family in need of services petition process or a civil citation process.

(iv) The department and the office shall jointly submit recommendations required by this section to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees no later than December 15, 2018.

(d) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to support the implementation of the department of children, youth, and families. The department must submit an expenditure plan to the office of financial management and may expend implementation funds after the approval of the director of the office of financial management.

(e) $111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2008 (state services for children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART III

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 301. 2018 c 299 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$19,735,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($22,505,000))

$23,992,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$106,467,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$23,008,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,101,000

Flood Control Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,173,000

State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000

Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,787,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$204,000

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water

Supply Facilities)—State Appropriation
. . . .
$164,000

Aquatic Algae Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$522,000

Water Rights Tracking System Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$47,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$582,000

Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$560,000

Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,869,000

Water Rights Processing Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($149,327,000))

$149,387,000

State Toxics Control Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$499,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,864,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($44,403,000))

$44,418,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,661,000

Biosolids Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,203,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$41,421,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,593,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$18,425,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,477,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,744,000

Air Operating Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,816,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,459,000

Oil Spill Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,076,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2019)
. . . .
$98,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,924,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,595,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($502,388,000))

$503,950,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(2) $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for activities within the water resources program.

(3) $228,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to grant to the northwest straits commission to distribute equally among the seven Puget Sound marine resource committees.

(4) Within existing resources, the department of ecology must engage stakeholders in a revision of WSR 13-22-073, rule amendments to chapter 173-350 WAC, to revise the proposed rule and submit a report to the senate local government and energy, environment, and telecommunications committees and the house of representatives local government and environment committees by September 1, 2017. The report must include a summary of areas of consensus and dispute, proposed resolution of disputes, a list of engaged stakeholders, a proposed timeline for potential rule adoption, and the most recent draft of proposed amendment language, if any.

(5) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, $44,000 of the waste reduction, recycling and litter control account—state appropriation, $720,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation, $17,000 of the local toxics control account—state appropriation, $220,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation, $23,000 of the underground storage tank account—state appropriation, $132,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account—state appropriation, $39,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account—state appropriation, $86,000 of the radioactive mixed waste account—state appropriation, $18,000 of the air pollution control account—state appropriation, $41,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation, and $23,000 of the air operating permit account—state appropriation are provided solely for modernizing and migrating the department of ecology's business applications from an agency-based data center to the state data center or a cloud environment and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724, chapter 1, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

(6) $80,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2634 (antifouling paints). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $97,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2658 (perfluorinated chemicals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of Executive Order No. 12-07, Washington's response to ocean acidification.

(9) $81,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for rule-making and other implementation costs of chapter 239, Laws of 2017 (short line railroad).

(10) $73,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementing the provisions of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6413 (firefighting/toxic chemicals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $1,143,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementing the provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6269 (strengthening oil transportation safety). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $190,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $1,707,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $2,000,000 of the flood control assistance account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 1, Laws of 2018 (ESSB 6091) (water availability).

(13) $11,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation and $17,000 of the air pollution control account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6055 (apple maggot/outdoor burning). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $14,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation and $13,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2957 (nonnative finfish escape). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15)(a) $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to address water use in violation of chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW in priority watersheds. The legislature recognizes that water use in violation of chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW in priority watersheds can impair existing instream flows and senior water rights and supports actions taken by the department to reduce water use in violation of chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW. The department shall engage in compliance and enforcement work to ensure compliance with requirements under chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW. Funding is authorized to be used for technical assistance, informal enforcement, and formal enforcement actions.

(b) The department shall use funds appropriated under this section to work in water resource inventory areas where: (a) Rules have been adopted under chapters 90.22 or 90.54 RCW; (b) those rules do not specify mitigation requirements for groundwater withdrawals exempt from permitting under RCW 90.44.050; and (c) the department believes water use in violation of chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW is negatively impacting streamflows.

(c) The department shall submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2019, that summarizes the compliance and enforcement work completed in each basin, including the estimated benefit to streamflows occurring from actions taken.

(d) Appropriations under this section should not replace or otherwise impact funds appropriated to the department to carry out duties under RCW 90.03.605 and chapter 90.08 RCW.

(16) $187,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely to the department to begin a multiyear study to distinguish the sources of emissions of the toxic air pollutant that poses the greatest cancer risk at the air monitoring station that is located closest to a port in the state with the highest volume of container traffic in domestic and foreign waterborne trade, as measured by the United States bureau of transportation statistics for the most recent year such statistics were available, as of January 1, 2017. The local air pollution control authority may financially contribute to the completion of this study, and the department is encouraged to consult with the local air pollution control authority in designing and implementing this study.

(17) $98,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to begin conducting research into appropriate protocols and accreditation standards for marijuana testing laboratories. By January 15, 2019, the department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with preliminary recommendations regarding laboratory accreditation standards that should be applied to marijuana testing laboratories.

Sec. 302. 2018 c 299 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$8,993,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($10,328,000))

$10,578,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,977,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,292,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$392,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,632,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$367,000

Recreation Access Pass Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($124,299,000))

$124,833,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($420,000))

$615,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,498,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($162,248,000))

$163,227,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(2) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the commission to pay assessments charged by local improvement districts.

(3) $700,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to replace 32 existing automated pay stations and to install 38 additional automated pay stations within state parks.

(4) $50,000 of the recreation access pass account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission, using its authority under RCW 79A.05.055(3) and in partnership with the department of fish and wildlife and the department of natural resources, to coordinate a process to develop options and recommendations to improve consistency, equity, and simplicity in recreational access fee systems while accounting for the fiscal health and stability of public land management. The process must be collaborative and include other relevant agencies and appropriate stakeholders. The commission must contract with the William D. Ruckelshaus Center or another neutral third party to facilitate meetings and discussions with parties involved in the process and provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017. The process must analyze and make recommendations on:

(a) Opportunities for federal and state recreational permit fee coordination, including the potential for developing a system that allows a single pass to provide access to federal and state lands;

(b) Opportunities to enhance consistency in the way state and federal recreational access fees apply to various types of recreational users, including those that travel to public lands by motor vehicle, boat, bicycle, foot, or another method; and

(c) Opportunities to develop a comprehensive and consistent statewide approach to recreational fee discounts and exemptions to social and other groups including, but not limited to, disabled persons, seniors, disabled veterans, foster families, low-income residents, and volunteers. This analysis must examine the cost of such a program, and should consider how recreational fee discounts fit into the broader set of benefits provided by the state to these social groups. This includes a review of the efficacy, purpose, and cost of existing recreational fee discounts and exemptions, as well as opportunities for new or modified social group discounts and exemptions. The department of veterans affairs and the department of social and health services must be included in this portion of the process.

(5) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the commission to carry out forest health related activities at the Squilchuck state park.

Sec. 303. 2018 c 299 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$7,074,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($7,329,000))

$7,629,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,301,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,619,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$254,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($25,577,000))

$25,877,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,602,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2)(a) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the commission to convene and facilitate a food policy forum. The director of the commission is responsible for appointing participating members of the food policy forum in consultation with the director of the department of agriculture. In making appointments, the director of the commission must attempt to ensure a diversity of knowledge, experience, and perspectives by building on the representation established by the food system roundtable initiated by executive order No. 10-02.

(b) In addition to members appointed by the director of the state conservation commission, four legislators may serve on the food policy forum in an ex officio capacity. Legislative participants must be appointed as follows:

(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and

(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(c) The commission shall coordinate with the office of farmland preservation and the department of agriculture to avoid duplication of effort. The commission must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, with the forum's recommendations by June 30, 2019.

(3) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $475,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for grants and technical assistance. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $25,000 in fiscal year 2018 and $225,000 in fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for activities related to water quality improvements and fecal coliform DNA speciation statewide.

Sec. 304. 2018 c 299 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$46,860,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$47,569,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$130,365,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$63,918,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$699,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,423,000))

$10,424,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,118,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,660,000))

$2,661,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$675,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$117,751,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,234,000))

$3,235,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$505,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,573,000))

$3,574,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$361,000

Ballast Water and Biofouling Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Hydraulic Project Approval Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,000))

$137,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,763,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery Account—

Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,120,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,178,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$527,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$325,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,656,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($446,581,000))

$448,432,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $67,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $1,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for payments in lieu of real property taxes to counties that elect to receive the payments for department-owned game lands within the county.

(3) $415,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $415,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $440,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for county assessments.

(4) Prior to submitting its 2019-2021 biennial operating and capital budget requests related to state fish hatcheries to the office of financial management, the department shall contract with the hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review the proposed requests. This review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost-effective manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the office of financial management with its agency budget proposal.

(5) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers. Prior to implementation of any Puget Sound nearshore ecosystem restoration projects in Whatcom county, the department must consult with and seek, to the maximum extent practicable, consensus on those projects among appropriate landowners, federally recognized Indian tribes, agencies, and community and interest groups.

(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in order to keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim to maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on state operating funds.

(7) $525,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $525,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for training for a work unit to engage and empower diverse stakeholders in decisions about fish and wildlife, the continued conflict transformation with the wolf advisory group, and for cost share partnerships with livestock owners and the use of range riders to reduce the potential for depredation of livestock from wolves. The department shall cooperate with the department of agriculture to shift the responsibility of implementing cost-sharing contracts with livestock producers to use nonlethal actions to minimize livestock loss from wolves and other carnivores to the department of agriculture.

(8) $1,259,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation is provided solely for the fish program, including implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1597 (commercial fishing). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $1,630,000 of the aquatic invasive species management account, $600,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $62,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation, and $10,000 of the ballast water and biofouling management account—state appropriation are provided solely for activities related to aquatic invasive species, including implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1429 or Substitute Senate Bill No. 5303 (aquatic invasive species). If neither bill is enacted by July 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) Within amounts provided in this section, the department must consult with affected tribes and landowners in Skagit county to develop and implement a plan designed to address elk-related agricultural damage and vehicular collisions by using all available and appropriate methods including, but not limited to, cooperative fencing projects and harvest in order to minimize elk numbers on private lands and maximize the number of elk located on state and federal lands. The plan must be implemented by September 1, 2018.

(11) Within the appropriations of this section, the department shall initiate outreach with recreational fishing stakeholders so that recreational fishing guide and non-guided angler data can be collected and analyzed to evaluate changes in the structure of guide licensing, with the objectives of: (a) Improving the fishing experience and ensuring equitable opportunity for both guided and non-guided river anglers, (b) managing fishing pressure to protect wild steelhead and other species; and (c) ensuring that recreational fish guiding remains a sustainable economic contributor to rural economies. The department shall convene public meetings in the North Olympic Peninsula and Klickitat River areas, and may include other areas of the state, and shall provide the appropriate standing committees of the legislature a summary of its findings, by December 31, 2017.

(12)(a) $5,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $5,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $325,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation are provided solely as one-time funding to support the department in response to its budget shortfall. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to grant to the regional fisheries enhancement groups. In order to address this shortfall on a long-term basis, the department must develop a plan for balancing projected revenue and expenditures and improving the efficiency and effectiveness of agency operations, including:

(i) Expenditure reduction options that maximize administrative and organizational efficiencies and savings, while avoiding hatchery closures and minimizing impacts to fisheries and hunting opportunities; and

(ii) Additional revenue options and an associated outreach plan designed to ensure that the public, stakeholders, the commission, and legislators have the opportunity to understand and impact the design of the revenue options.

(iii) The range of options created under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection must be prioritized by impact on achieving financial stability, impact on the public and fisheries and hunting opportunities, and on timeliness and ability to achieve intended outcomes.

(b) In consultation with the office of financial management, the department must consult with an outside management consultant to evaluate and implement efficiencies to the agency's operations and management practices. Specific areas of evaluation must include:

(i) Potential inconsistencies and increased costs associated with the decentralized nature of organizational authority and operations;

(ii) The department's budgeting and accounting processes, including work done at the central, program, and region levels, with specific focus on efficiencies to be gained by centralized budget control;

(iii) Executive management, program management, and regional management structures, specifically addressing accountability.

(c) In carrying out these planning requirements, the department must provide quarterly updates to the commission, office of financial management, and appropriate legislative committees. The department must provide a final summary of its process and plan by September 1, 2018.

(d) The department, in cooperation with the office of financial management shall conduct a zero-based budget review of its operating budget and activities to be submitted with the department's 2019-2021 biennial budget submittal. Information and analysis submitted by the department for the zero-based review under this subsection shall include:

(i) A statement of the statutory basis or other basis for the creation of each program and the history of each program that is being reviewed;

(ii) A description of how each program fits within the strategic plan and goals of the agency and an analysis of the quantified objectives of each program within the agency;

(iii) Any available performance measures indicating the effectiveness and efficiency of each program;

(iv) A description with supporting cost and staffing data of each program and the populations served by each program, and the level of funding and staff required to accomplish the goals of the program if different than the actual maintenance level;

(v) An analysis of the major costs and benefits of operating each program and the rationale for specific expenditure and staffing levels;

(vi) An analysis estimating each program's administrative and other overhead costs;

(vii) An analysis of the levels of services provided; and

(viii) An analysis estimating the amount of funds or benefits that actually reach the intended recipients.

(13) $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 1, Laws of 2018 (ESSB 6091) (water availability).

(14) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $472,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to increase enforcement of vessel traffic near orca whales, especially commercial and recreational whale watchers and shipping, and to reduce underwater noise levels that interfere with feeding and communication. While the patrol focus is to be on orca whale protection when the animals are present, nothing prohibits responses to emergent public safety or in-progress poaching incidents. In the event that orca whales are not present in marine waters of Puget Sound, emphasis will be placed on patrols that protect living marine resources in northern Puget Sound.

(15) $837,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is appropriated for the department to increase hatchery production of key prey species fish throughout the Puget Sound, coast, and Columbia river. The department shall work with the governor, federal partners, tribal co-managers, the hatchery scientific review group, and other interested parties to develop a biennial hatchery production plan by December 31, 2018, that will: (a) Identify, within hatchery standards and endangered species act constraints, hatchery programs and specific facilities to contribute to the dietary needs of orca whales; (b) consider prey species preferences and migratory patterns of orca whales; and (c) include adaptive management provisions to ensure the conservation and enhancement of wild stocks. The final plan will be reviewed by the hatchery scientific review group and submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2018.

(16) $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for an interagency agreement with the office of financial management for facilitation services and support the governor's efforts to develop a long-term action plan for orca whale recovery.

(17) $55,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementing the provisions of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6127 (halibut fishery). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2957 (nonnative finfish escape). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to evaluate translocation as a management tool to advance the recovery of wolves using the state environmental policy act (SEPA) process. The department shall provide a report to the legislature outlining the results of the SEPA process no later than December 31, 2019.

(20) $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $417,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to complete the third and final phase of the Puget Sound steelhead research project.

(21) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to add a veterinarian, microbiologist, and make laboratory upgrades to ensure the hatchery program complies with recent changes in water quality and health laws.

(22) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for restoration costs that are a result of wildfire damage.

(23) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to implement and enforce chapter 2, Laws of 2016 (Initiative Measure No. 1401).

(24) The department must ensure the following actions occur prior to initiating construction of the Buckmire slough project:

(a) The department shall engage with hunters and other stakeholders to consider alternative project designs that balance the multiple recreational uses and species habitat needs at the wildlife area;

(b) The department shall quantify potential habitat and recreational hunting loss associated with the project, and will work with stakeholders and interested members of the public to develop strategies for mitigating those losses; and

(c) Where necessary, the department shall make payments to all public and private entities that contributed to the purchase of the unit's 540 acres of waterfowl habitat, in amounts that are required by the funding entity.

Sec. 305. 2018 c 299 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$74,728,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($49,316,000))

$62,855,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,496,000))

$54,365,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,230,000))

$4,430,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,122,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,843,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,479,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$16,188,000

Resources Management Cost Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$121,520,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,122,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,076,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,789,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$232,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,709,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,896,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$870,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$733,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,239,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,945,000

Community Forest Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$52,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,055,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($425,040,000))

$457,648,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,420,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(2) $44,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018((, $16,546,000))and $30,602,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $16,050,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression. The general fund—state appropriations provided in this subsection may not be used to fund the department's indirect and administrative expenses. The department's indirect and administrative costs shall be allocated among its remaining accounts and appropriations.

(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $1,640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board. The forest practices board shall submit a report to the legislature following review, approval, and solicitation of public comment on the cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research master project schedule, to include: Cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science and related adaptive management expenditure details, accomplishments, the use of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science in decision-making, and funding needs for the coming biennium. For new or amended forest practices rules adopted or new or amended board manual provisions approved under chapter 76.09 RCW, the forest practices board shall also report on its evaluation of the scientific basis for the rule or board manual provisions including a technical assessment of the value-added benefits for aquatic resources and the corresponding economic impact to the regulated community from the rule or board manual. The report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2018.

(5) $147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for chapter 280, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 2010) (homelessness/wildfire areas), including local capacity for wildfire suppression in any county located east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range that shares a common border with Canada and has a population of one hundred thousand or fewer. The funding provided in this subsection must be provided to these counties for radio communication equipment, or to fire protection service providers within these counties for residential wildfire risk reduction activities, including education and outreach, technical assistance, fuel mitigation, and other residential risk reduction measures. For the purposes of this subsection, fire protection service providers include fire departments, fire districts, emergency management services, and regional fire protection service authorities. The department must prioritize funding to counties authorized in this subsection, and fire protection service providers within those counties that serve a disproportionately higher percentage of low-income residents as defined in RCW 84.36.042, that are located in areas of higher wildfire risk, and whose fire protection service providers have a shortage of reliable equipment and resources. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $7,000 per fiscal year is provided for department administration costs.

(6) Sufficient funding is provided in this section and the capital appropriations act to implement chapter 248, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1711) (forest health treatments).

(7) $211,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 319, Laws of 2017 (ESSB 5198) (fire retardant use). The department shall study and report on the types and efficacy of fire retardants used in fire suppression activities, their potential impact on human health and natural resources, and make recommendations to the legislature by December 31, 2017.

(8) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $486,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 95, Laws of 2017 (2SSB 5546) (forest health treatment assessment). The department shall establish a forest health assessment and treatment framework that consists of biennial forest health assessments, treatments, and progress review and reporting.

(9) $150,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for continued facilitation and support services for the marine resources advisory council.

(10) $250,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the state marine management plan and ongoing costs of the Washington coastal marine advisory council to serve as a forum and provide recommendations on coastal management issues.

(11) $406,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for Teanaway community forest operations management costs, such as management plan oversight and forest health.

(12) $150,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to meet its obligations as a potentially liable party under the Washington model toxics control act at Whitmarsh landfill and the east waterway site.

(13) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for conducting an aerial survey of the Washington coast forests to monitor the occurrence and spread of Swiss needle cast disease.

(14) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for the department to grant to the University of Washington, Olympic natural resources center to develop a plan to mitigate the effects of Swiss needle cast disease on douglas fir tree species.

(15) Within existing resources, the department, in collaboration with the emergency management division of the military department, must develop agreements with other state agencies to recruit state employees to voluntarily participate in the wildfire suppression program. Other agency staff are eligible to receive training, fire gear, and any other necessary items to be ready for deployment to fight wildfires when called. The department shall cover agency staff costs directly or through reimbursement and must submit a request for an appropriation in the next legislative session to fulfill this requirement. The department must provide a report detailing the opportunities, challenges, and recommendations for increasing state employee voluntary participation in the wildfire suppression program to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017.

(16) $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementing the provisions of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (wildland urban interface). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $42,000 of the forest development account—state appropriation, $56,000 of the resources management cost account—state appropriation, and $2,000 of the agricultural college trust management account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2285 (marbled murrelet reports). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $6,000 of the forest development account—state appropriation, $36,000 of the resources management cost account—state appropriation, and $1,000 of the agricultural college trust management account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute House Bill No. 2382 (surplus public property). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2561 (wildland fire advisory committee). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $403,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2733 (prescribed burn certificate program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((22)))(21) $380,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for one full-time natural resource scientist, one full-time information technology specialist, and related support costs dedicated to earthquake and tsunami hazards. Duties for these positions include, but are not limited to, developing inventories, maps, evacuation routes, educational materials, databases, and other activities that increase preparedness for earthquakes and tsunamis.

(((23)))(22) $37,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation and $37,000 of the resources management cost account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2957 (nonnative finfish escape). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((24)))(23) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to enhance the department's efforts to develop and submit a proposed amendment to the 1997 Washington state trust lands habitat conservation plan for a marbled murrelet long-term conservation strategy. In meeting the department's legal and fiduciary obligations to beneficiaries of state lands and state forestlands, the proposed amendment shall be consistent with the requirements of the 1997 state lands habitat conservation plan, the associated implementation agreement and incidental take permit, and the federal endangered species act.

(((25)))(24) $198,000 of the natural resources conservation areas stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for weed control and maintenance of public access at natural areas.

Sec. 306. 2018 c 299 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$16,888,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($17,465,000))

$18,163,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($32,134,000))

$32,599,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$193,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,563,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,066,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$73,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,041,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($76,423,000))

$77,586,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,108,445 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $6,102,905 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementing the food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(2) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs that are funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2018, and February 1, 2019. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(3) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to fund an aquaculture coordinator. The aquaculture coordinator will work with shellfish growers and federal, state, and local governments to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of shellfish farm permitting. Many of those improvements will come directly from the shellfish interagency permitting team recommendations.

(4) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementing Substitute Senate Bill No. 6055 (apple maggot/outdoor burning). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 1, Laws of 2018 (ESSB 6091) (water availability).

(6) $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1508 (student meals and nutrition). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2957 (nonnative finfish escape). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the industrial hemp research pilot program. Expenditures shall be prioritized for processing licenses and expanding the industrial hemp market.

(9) $534,000 of the state toxics control account—state appropriation is provided solely for a monitoring program to study the impacts of the use of imidacloprid as a means to control burrowing shrimp and related costs. Department costs include, but are not limited to, oversight and participation on a technical advisory committee, technical assistance, planning, and reporting activities. The department may also use the funding provided in this subsection, as needed, for payments to Washington State University, the United States department of agriculture, and outside consultants for their participation in the monitoring program and technical advisory committee. The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 1, 2019, on the progress of the monitoring program.

(10) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the department to provide to the sheriff's departments of Ferry county and Stevens county to cooperate with the department and the department of fish and wildlife on wolf management activities. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $40,000 is for the Ferry county sheriff's department and $40,000 is for the Stevens county sheriff's department.

Sec. 307. 2018 c 299 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$90,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,340,000))

$1,512,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,430,000))

$1,602,000

Sec. 308. 2018 c 299 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$2,783,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$2,526,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,334,000))

$11,605,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,419,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$721,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$277,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($18,060,000))

$19,331,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By October 15, 2018, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor a single, prioritized list of state agency 2019-2021 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound restoration.

(End of part)

PART IV

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 401. 2018 c 299 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$1,688,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($2,145,000))

$3,038,000

Architects' License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,203,000))

$1,212,000

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,926,000))

$4,102,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,547,000))

$11,568,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,469,000))

$1,700,000

Real Estate Education Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$276,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,870,000))

$1,600,000

Business and Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,985,000))

$20,800,000

Real Estate Research Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$415,000

Landscape Architects' License Account—State
. . . .
$4,000

Geologists' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$53,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,000))

$34,000

CPL Renewal Notification Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$183,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$95,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($48,967,000))

$46,843,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $105,000 of the business and professions account appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 46, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1420) (theatrical wrestling).

(2) $183,000 of the concealed pistol license renewal notification account appropriation and $75,000 of the firearms range account appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1100) (concealed pistol license) and chapter 282, Laws of 2017 (SB 5268) (concealed pistol license notices).

(3) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for costs related to sending notices to persons to encourage the renewal of vessel registrations.

(4) $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the department of licensing to issue identicards to youths released from juvenile rehabilitation facilities.

(5) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Third Substitute House Bill No. 1169 (student loan assistance).

(6) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6298 (domestic violence harassment/firearms). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1439 (higher education student protection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 402. 2018 c 299 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$43,800,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($46,662,000))

$47,751,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,255,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,085,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,207,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,752,000))

$4,262,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,520,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$110,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,400,000))

$17,375,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,121,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,295,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$548,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($15,745,000))

$15,370,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2019)
. . . .
$2,803,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($169,488,000))

$175,687,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $270,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that are located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(2) (($12,400,000))$17,375,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(3) $700,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(4) $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 272, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1163) (domestic violence).

(5) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $116,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 261, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1501) (attempts to obtain firearms).

(6) $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 308, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1863) (fire incident reporting system).

(7) $3,421,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for the completion of the state patrol's plan to upgrade the criminal history system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(8) $1,039,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of a sexual assault kit tracking database project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(9) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the costs related to the 1995 king air maintenance. By June 30, 2019, the state patrol is directed to sell the 1983 king air and proceeds generated from the sale of the 1983 king air must be deposited into the state patrol highway account.

(10) $2,803,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to create a new drug enforcement task force for the purposes of controlling the potential diversion and illicit production or distribution of marijuana and marijuana-related products in Washington.

(11) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to coordinate with the governor's office of Indian affairs, federally recognized tribal governments, and the U.S. justice department to conduct a study to determine how to increase state criminal justice protective and investigative resources for reporting and identifying missing Native American women in the state.

(12) The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for implementing the recommendations of the joint legislative task force on sexual assault forensic examination, and for monitoring and testing untested sexual assault examination kits.

(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the state patrol to:

(i) Work in conjunction with state or nonstate entities to test sexual assault kits pursuant to RCW 43.43.545;

(ii) Conduct forensic analysis of sexual assault examination kits in the custody of the state patrol pursuant to chapter 247, Laws of 2015; and

(ii) Continue the task force.

(b) $1,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 247, Laws of 2015 to address the state's backlog in sexual assault examination kits. The seven full-time employees funded under this subsection must work exclusively on processing sexual assault exam kits through the crime laboratory division.

(c) Within amounts provided in this section, the Washington state patrol shall adopt rules necessary to implement RCW 43.43.545.

(End of part)

PART V

EDUCATION

Sec. 501. 2018 c 299 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$46,525,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($58,392,000))

$59,475,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($83,422,000))

$86,422,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,049,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$584,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2018)
. . . .
$513,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2019)
. . . .
$515,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$211,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,126,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($200,337,000))

$204,420,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $9,612,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $10,236,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(a) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(b) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school, using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the superintendent.

(c) By September of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in sections 501 and 513 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(d) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the secretary of state, shall update the program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.

(e) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (i) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (ii) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(2) $1,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 ((and $5,598,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are))is provided solely for activities associated with the implementation of ((House Bill No. 2242))chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education). Of these amounts:

(a) $857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 ((and $857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are))is provided solely for maintenance of the apportionment system; and

(b) $566,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 ((and $3,741,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are))is provided solely for activities associated with the implementation of ((House Bill No. 2242))chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education)((; and

(c) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to review the use of local revenues for compliance with enrichment requirements, including the preballot approval of enrichment levy spending plans approved by the superintendent of public instruction, and any supplemental contracts entered into under RCW 28A.400.200)).

(3) $857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for maintenance of the apportionment system, including technical staff and the data governance working group.

(4) $4,741,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for activities associated with the implementation of chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education) of the amount provided in this subsection (4), up to $1,000,000 is provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to review the use of local revenues for compliance with enrichment requirements, including the preballot approval of enrichment levy spending plans approved by the superintendent of public instruction, and any supplemental contracts entered into under RCW 28A.400.200.

(5)(a) $911,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and (($911,000))$961,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic education assistance activities.

(b) $322,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state board of education to provide assistance to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(((4)))(6) $3,512,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $3,762,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to the professional educator standards board for the following:

(a) $1,115,000 in fiscal year 2018 and $1,115,000 in fiscal year 2019 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board;

(b) $2,372,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $2,372,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are for grants to improve preservice teacher training and for funding of alternate routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board. Alternate routes programs include the pipeline for paraeducators program, the retooling to teach conditional loan programs, and the recruiting Washington teachers program. Priority shall be given to programs that support bilingual teachers and English language learners. Within this subsection (((4)))(6)(b), up to $500,000 per fiscal year is available for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs and $250,000 is provided solely for the pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program for scholarships for paraeducators to complete their associate of arts degrees in subject matter shortage areas;

(c) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the professional educator standards board to develop educator interpreter standards and identify interpreter assessments that are available to school districts. Interpreter assessments should meet the following criteria: (A) Include both written assessment and performance assessment; (B) be offered by a national organization of professional sign language interpreters and transliterators; and (C) be designed to assess performance in more than one sign system or sign language. The board shall establish a performance standard, defining what constitutes a minimum assessment result, for each educational interpreter assessment identified. The board shall publicize the standards and assessments for school district use;

(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, sufficient funding is provided for implementation of chapter 172, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1741) (educator prep. data/PESB).

(e) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to procure or develop professional development for paraeducator subject matter certificates, in English language learner and special education, and must align courses with general paraeducator certificate professional development, including any necessary changes or edits to general paraeducator certificate online modules.

(((5)))(7) $266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $502,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(((6)))(8)(a) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(b) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection (((6)))(8), the committee shall review the rules and procedures adopted by the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education related to the minimum number of students to be used for public reporting and federal accountability purposes. By October 30, 2018, the committee shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the appropriations committees of the legislature with its recommendations for the state to meet the following goals: Increase the visibility of the opportunity gap in schools with small subgroups of students; hold schools and school districts accountable to individual student-level support; and comply with federal student privacy laws.

(((7)))(9) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(((8)))(10) $262,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(((9)))(11) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(((10)))(12) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for project citizen, a program sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle school students.

(((11)))(13) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for collaborative schools for innovation and success authorized under chapter 53, Laws of 2012. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award $500,000 for each collaborative school for innovation and success selected for participation in the pilot program during 2012.

(((12)))(14) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(((13)))(15) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 ((is))and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178, Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).

(((14)))(16) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for school bullying and harassment prevention activities.

(((15)))(17) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 242, Laws of 2013 (state-tribal education compacts).

(((16)))(18) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(a) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(b) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(((17)))(19) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to convene a committee for the selection and recognition of Washington innovative schools. The committee shall select and recognize Washington innovative schools based on the selection criteria established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in accordance with chapter 202, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools—recognition) and chapter 260, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools and zones).

(((18)))(20) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(((19)))(21) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $211,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform on-going program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(((20)))(22) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $202,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for youth suicide prevention activities.

(((21)))(23) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation of career and technical education course equivalency frameworks authorized under RCW 28A.700.070 for math and science. This may include development of additional equivalency course frameworks, course performance assessments, and professional development for districts implementing the new frameworks.

(((22)))(24) $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(((23)))(25) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a nonviolence and ethical leadership training and professional development program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(((24)))(26) $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(((25)))(27) $3,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $3,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship and Washington higher education readiness program. The funds shall be used to: Support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars; and to identify and reduce barriers to college for low-income and underserved middle and high school students.

(((26)))(28) $1,354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.

(((27)))(29) $410,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $1,028,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. Students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, $513,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, and $515,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the building bridges statewide program.

(((28)))(30) $2,984,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080.

(((29)))(31) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090.

(((30)))(32) $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for grants for implementation of dual credit programs and subsidized advance placement exam fees and international baccalaureate class fees and exam fees for low-income students. For expenditures related to subsidized exam fees, the superintendent shall report: The number of students served; the demographics of the students served; and how the students perform on the exams.

(((31)))(33) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to convene a work group to build upon the work of the social emotional learning work group established under section 501(34), chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. The members of the work group must include representatives from the same organizations that were represented on the 2015 work group, as well as five representatives of diverse communities and a statewide expanded learning opportunities intermediary. The work group must identify and articulate developmental indicators for each grade level for each of the social emotional learning benchmarks, solicit feedback from stakeholders, and develop a model of best practices or guidance for schools on implementing the benchmarks and indicators. The work group shall submit recommendations to the education committees of the legislature and the office of the governor by June 30, 2019.

(((32)))(34) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 3 (SHB No. 1813), Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (computer science).

(((33)))(35) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 236, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1445) (dual language/early learning & K-12). In selecting recipients of the K-12 dual language grant, the superintendent of public instruction must prioritize districts that received grants under section 501(36), chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. Of the amounts in this subsection, up to $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is for implementation of the K-12 dual language grant program established in RCW 28A.630.095 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of the bilingual educator initiative pilot project established under RCW 28A.180.120.

(((34)))(36) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The superintendent of public instruction shall award grants consistent with RCW 28A.300.410.

(((35)))(37) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the computer science and education grant program to support the following three purposes: Train and credential teachers in computer sciences; provide and upgrade technology needed to learn computer science; and, for computer science frontiers grants to introduce students to and engage them in computer science. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use the computer science learning standards adopted pursuant to chapter 3, Laws of 2015 (computer science) in implementing the grant, to the extent possible. Additionally, grants provided for the purpose of introducing students to computer science are intended to support innovative ways to introduce and engage students from historically underrepresented groups, including girls, low-income students, and minority students, to computer science and to inspire them to enter computer science careers. Grant funds for the computer science and education grant program may be expended only to the extent that they are equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.

(((36)))(38) $2,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $2,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for demonstration sites to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to chapter 71, Laws of 2016 (Fourth Substitute House Bill No. 1999, foster youth edu. outcomes).

(a) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, section 202(10), chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act, section 501(43)(b), chapter 4, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(((37)))(39) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (Third Substitute House Bill No. 1682, homeless students).

(((38)))(40) $753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (Fourth Substitute House Bill No. 1541, educational opportunity gap).

(((39)))(41) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2016 (Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6620, school safety).

(((40)))(42) $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1170) (truancy reduction efforts).

(((41)))(43) $984,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $912,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (ESHB 1115) (paraeducators).

(((42)))(44) $204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $408,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(((43)))(45) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for grants to middle and high schools to support international baccalaureate programs in high poverty schools. Of these amounts:

(a) $200,000 of the appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $200,000 of the appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for grants to high schools that have an existing international baccalaureate program and enrollments of seventy percent or more students eligible for free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year to implement and sustain an international baccalaureate program; and

(b) $100,000 of the appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $100,000 of the appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for grants to middle schools with students that will attend a qualifying high poverty high school that has received a grant under (a) of this subsection to support implementation of a middle school international baccalaureate program.

(((44)))(46) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for a grant to the Pacific science center to continue providing science on wheels activities in schools and other community settings. Funding is provided to assist with upgrading three planetarium computers and software and to assist with purchasing and outfitting three vans with new traveling planetarium exhibits.

(((45)))(47) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract for consulting services for a study of the current state pupil transportation funding formula. The study must evaluate the extent to which the formula corresponds to the actual costs of providing pupil transportation to and from school for the state's statutory program of basic education, including local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints, and transportation for students who are identified as homeless under the McKinney-Vento act. Based on the results of this evaluation, the superintendent must make recommendations for any necessary revisions to the state's pupil transportation formula, taking into account the statutory program of basic education, promotion of the efficient use of state and local resources, and continued local district control over the management of pupil transportation systems. The superintendent must make recommendations to clarify the sources of funding that districts can use to transport homeless students to and from school.

(((46)))(48) $440,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the procurement and implementation of a reporting and data aggregation system that will connect state- and district-level information to secure and protect district, school and student information in order to close student performance gaps by assisting school districts in data-driven implementation of strategies and supports that are responsive of student needs.

(((47)))(49) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.

(((48)))(50) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 180, Laws of 2017 (2SSB 5258) (Washington Aim program).

(((49)))(51) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1539 (sexual abuse of students). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((50)))(52) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2779 (children's mental health services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((52) $230,000))(53) $380,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1896 (civics education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((53)))(54) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education shall adopt a rule that the minimum number of students to be used for public reporting and federal accountability purposes is ten.

(((54)))(55) $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1600 (career and college readiness). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((55)))(56) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for programs to combat bias. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must contract with a nonprofit organization that supports Washington teachers in implementing lessons of the Holocaust for the creation of a comprehensive online encyclopedia of local Holocaust education resources. The online encyclopedia must include teaching trunk materials, Anne Frank materials, genocide resources, and video testimonies.

(((56)))(57) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act). The office of the superintendent of public instruction must submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2019, outlining accomplishments and deliverables achieved in fiscal year 2019.

(((57)))(58) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration and division of vocational rehabilitation, shall explore the development of an implementation plan to build statewide capacity among school districts to improve transition planning for students in special education who meet criteria for services from the developmental disabilities administration, and shall provide all school districts with an opportunity to participate. The plan shall be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 by November 1, 2018, and the final report must be submitted by November 1, 2020, to the governor and appropriate legislative committees.

(((58)))(59) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the legislative youth advisory council. The council of statewide members advises legislators on issues of importance to youth.

(((59)))(60) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely to contract with a nonprofit, civil rights and human relations organization with expertise in tracking and responding to hate incidents in schools, and with experience implementing programs designed to empower students to improve upon and sustain school climates that combat bias and bullying. The contract must expand the organization's current anti-bias programs to eight public schools across Washington, with at least half of the public schools located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used to support preprogram planning, trainings, guidance, surveys, materials, and the hiring of a part-time contractor to support data tracking.

(((60)))(61) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6162 (dyslexia). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((61)))(62) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure career and technical education courses are aligned with high-demand, high-wage jobs. The superintendent shall verify that the current list of career and technical education courses meets the criteria established in RCW 28A.700.020(2). The superintendent shall remove from the list any career and technical education course that no longer meets such criteria.

(((62)))(63) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government.

(((63)))(64) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the civic education travel grant program pursuant to RCW 28A.300.480.

(((64)))(65) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may develop recommendations to amend long-standing provisos within Part V of the omnibus operating budget. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit recommendations, to include rationale why each proposed change should be made, to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 1, 2018.

(((65)))(66) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate with school districts and educational service districts that contract for transportation bus services and report the following information to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018:

(a) The number of transportation contract employees by job category;

(b) The total cost of the transportation contract, including the amount held by the school district or educational service district for administration of the contract;

(c) Information about the retirement benefit for transportation contract employees, including the name of the provider, the aggregate amount provided, and the amounts provided by employees;

(d) Information about the total health care benefit provided to transportation contract employees, including the name of the provider and the summary of benefits; and

(e) A copy of the transportation contract.

(((66)))(67) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(a) Make recommendations on the best methods to provide and fund vocational funding enhancement for career and technical education and career-connected learning through alternative learning experience courses;

(b) Solicit and incorporate input received from the online learning advisory committee in making its report recommendations; and

(c) Submit a report of recommendations to the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 15, 2018.

(((67)))(68) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to leverage federal funding from the e-rate program operated by the universal service administrative company, under the federal communications commission. Funding is provided to enable more student access to digital learning.

(((68)))(69) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide grants to school districts and educational service districts for science teacher training in the next generation science standards including training in the climate science standards. At a minimum, school districts shall ensure that teachers in one grade level in each elementary, middle, and high school participate in this science training. Of the amount appropriated $1,000,000 is provided solely for community based nonprofits to partner with public schools for next generation science standards.

(((69)))(70) $722,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide grants to educational service districts and school districts to develop or expand regional safety programs to address student safety. At a minimum, programs must implement a multitier threat assessment system; develop a process for notifying schools, including private schools, of safety emergencies; and make recommendations or implement appropriate safety technology consistent with regional need.

(((70)))(71) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2685 (high school preapprenticeships). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(72) $1,309,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the continued development and implementation of a school district accounting and reporting system that will collect school district and school level expenditure information by revenue source and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 713, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

Sec. 502. 2018 c 299 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$7,239,334,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($7,142,294,000))

$7,132,490,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$595,730,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($14,977,358,000))

$14,967,554,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 502 and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection, and in House Bill No. 2242 (fully funding the program of basic education).

(c) From July 1, 2017, to August 31, 2017, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 502 and 503, chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(e)(i) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the agency rules defining a full-time equivalent student with the increase in the minimum instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220, as amended by the legislature in 2014.

(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.

(g) For the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, school districts must report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the monthly actual average district-wide class size across each grade level of kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade classes. The superintendent of public instruction shall report this information to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30th of each year.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2017-18

School Year

2018-19

School Year

Grade K

17.00

17.00

Grade 1

17.00

17.00

Grade 2

17.00

17.00

Grade 3

17.00

17.00

Grade 4

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 20.0.

(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher:

General education class size in high poverty schools:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2017-18

School Year

2018-19

School Year

Grade K

17.00

17.00

Grade 1

17.00

17.00

Grade 2

17.00

17.00

Grade 3

17.00

17.00

Grade 4

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

28.74

28.74

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(iv) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2017-18

School Year

2018-19

School Year

Career and Technical Education

3.07

3.07

Skill Center

3.41

3.41

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistance principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

1.253

Middle School

1.353

High School

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors: Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 12.29 percent in the 2017-18 school year and 12.29 percent in the 2018-19 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.61 percent in the 2017-18 school year and 17.61 percent in the 2018-19 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 23.49 percent in the 2017-18 school year and ((23.65))23.70 percent in the 2018-19 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 24.60 percent in the 2017-18 school year and ((24.67))24.70 percent in the 2018-19 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and

(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated on the basis of 1,440 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a)(i) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2017-18

School Year

2018-19

School Year

Technology

$130.76

$133.24

Utilities and Insurance

$355.30

$362.05

Curriculum and Textbooks

$140.39

$143.06

Other Supplies and Library Materials

$298.05

$303.71

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$21.71

$22.12

Facilities Maintenance

$176.01

$179.36

Security and Central Office

$121.94

$124.26

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$1,244.16

$1,267.80

(ii) For the 2017-18 school year and 2018-19 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (A) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii) exceeds (B) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,472.01 for the 2017-18 school year and $1,499.98 for the 2018-19 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,472.01 for the 2017-18 school year and $1,499.98 for the 2018-19 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at the following rate:

MSOC Component

2017-18

School Year

2018-19

School Year

Technology

$37.60

$38.31

Curriculum and Textbooks

$41.02

$41.80

Other Supplies and Library Materials

$85.46

$87.08

Instructional Professional Development for Certified

and Classified Staff

$6.83

$6.97

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$170.91

$174.16

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2017, to August 31, 2017, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., as amended (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

Funding in this section is sufficient to fund all day kindergarten programs in all schools in the 2017-18 school year and 2018-19 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315.

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (13) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2018 and 2019 as follows:

(a) $638,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $229,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for school district emergencies as certified by the superintendent of public instruction. Funding provided must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable. At the close of the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts and the nature of the emergency.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(18) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.

(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (13) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(21) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. For the 2017-2019 biennium, general apportionment payments are not reduced for school districts receiving federal forest revenues.

Sec. 503. 2018 c 299 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in House Bill No. 2242 (fully funding the program of basic education), RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 502 of this act:

(a) For the 2017-18 school year, salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units are determined for each district by multiplying the district's certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2 by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP document 1.

(b) For the 2017-18 school year, salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units and classified staff units for each district are determined based on the district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.

(c) For the 2018-19 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.

Statewide Minimum Salary Allocation

For School Year 2018-19

Certificated Instructional Staff

$65,216.05

Certificated Administrative Staff

$96,805.00

Classified Staff

$46,784.33

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on June 22, 2017, at 1:14 hours; and

(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on June 22, 2017, at 1:14 hours.

(c) "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March 6, 2018, at 8:24 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 22.85 percent for school year 2017-18 and ((23.01))23.06 percent for school year 2018-19 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 21.10 percent for school year 2017-18 and ((21.17))21.20 percent for the 2018-19 school year for classified staff.

(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary allocation schedule for certificated instructional staff are established for basic education salary allocations for the 2017-18 school year:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff

For School Year 2017-18

*** Education Experience ***

Years

MA+90

of

OR

Service

BA

BA+15

BA+30

BA+45

BA+90

BA+135

MA

MA+45

Ph.D.

0

36,521

37,507

38,529

39,554

42,840

44,957

43,785

47,072

49,191

1

37,013

38,013

39,048

40,117

43,438

45,543

44,272

47,593

49,697

2

37,481

38,491

39,537

40,688

44,000

46,127

44,762

48,073

50,201

3

37,964

38,983

40,040

41,229

44,534

46,712

45,227

48,529

50,709

4

38,437

39,501

40,565

41,794

45,119

47,313

45,714

49,038

51,234

5

38,926

39,995

41,069

42,367

45,679

47,918

46,209

49,522

51,760

6

39,428

40,474

41,585

42,948

46,244

48,494

46,716

50,013

52,262

7

40,312

41,373

42,498

43,935

47,280

49,593

47,666

51,010

53,324

8

41,604

42,724

43,876

45,431

48,822

51,219

49,161

52,552

54,949

9

44,122

45,332

46,943

50,413

52,892

50,672

54,143

56,623

10

46,805

48,533

52,049

54,611

52,263

55,780

58,340

11

50,169

53,761

56,375

53,899

57,492

60,104

12

51,753

55,520

58,211

55,600

59,250

61,942

13

57,322

60,093

57,360

61,052

63,823

14

59,132

62,046

59,172

62,981

65,776

15

60,671

63,660

60,710

64,618

67,486

16 or more

61,884

64,932

61,924

65,910

68,836

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:

(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.

(b) "MA" means a masters degree.

(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.

(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.

(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in this part V, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a masters degree; or

(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(7) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by House Bill No. 2242 (fully funding the program of basic education).

(8) For school year 2018-19, the salary allocations for each district shall be the greater of:

(a) The derived school year 2018-19 salary allocations in subsection (1) of this section; or

(b) The derived salary allocations for school year 2017-18 increased by 2.3 percent.

Sec. 504. 2018 c 299 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$206,149,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($2,029,841,000))

$2,059,869,000

Dedicated McCleary Penalty Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$84,020,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,320,010,000))

$2,350,038,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The salary increases provided in this section are inclusive of and above the annual cost-of-living adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.

(2) In addition to salary allocations specified in this subsection (1) funding in this subsection includes one day of professional learning for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in school year 2018-19. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 22.85 percent for the 2017-18 school year and ((23.01))23.06 percent for the 2018-19 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 21.10 percent for the 2017-18 school year and ((21.17))21.20 percent for the 2018-19 school year for classified staff.

(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 502 and 503 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 502, 503, and 504 of this act.

(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(((3)))(4) The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is $780.00 per month for the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years. The appropriations in this section reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates of $820.00 per month for the 2017-18 school year and $843.97 per month for the 2018-19 school year. When bargaining for health benefits funding for the school employees' benefits board during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, any proposal agreed upon must assume the imposition of a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(((4)))(5) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

(((5)))(6) $699,437,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2019 and $84,020,000 of the dedicated McCleary penalty account—state appropriation are provided solely for allocation to school districts to increase compensation related to increasing school employee salary allocations, changing the special education excess cost multiplier as provided in RCW 28A.150.390(2)(b), regionalization factors as provided in RCW 28A.150.412(2)(b), and professional learning day delay, each as amended by Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6362 (basic education).

Sec. 505. 2018 c 299 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$518,512,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($519,533,000))

$533,796,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,038,045,000))

$1,052,308,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) From July 1, 2017, to August 31, 2017, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 505, chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.

(4) A maximum of $913,000 of this fiscal year 2018 appropriation and a maximum of (($939,000))$940,000 of the fiscal year 2019 appropriation may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(7) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW 28A.305.141.

(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

Sec. 506. 2018 c 299 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$965,613,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($1,001,806,000))

$1,025,589,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($485,054,000))

$494,755,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,694,000

Dedicated McCleary Penalty Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$21,180,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,528,367,000))

$2,561,851,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and 504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390 as amended by Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6362 (basic education), except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 502 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2017, to August 31, 2017, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 507, chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 13.5 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) $31,087,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, (($35,952,000))$40,571,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and (($29,574,000))$39,274,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $931,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for two additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(12) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(13) $21,180,000 of the dedicated McCleary penalty account—state appropriation is provided solely for allocation to school districts to increase the special education excess cost multiplier as provided in RCW 28A.150.390(2)(b), as amended by Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6362 (basic education).

Sec. 507. 2018 c 299 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$8,549,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($9,468,000))

$9,471,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($18,017,000))

$18,020,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 508. 2018 c 299 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$451,423,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($425,973,000))

$422,355,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
((877,396,000))

$873,778,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student is 5.85 percent from the 2016-17 school year to the 2017-18 school year.

Sec. 509. 2018 c 299 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$13,895,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($14,096,000))

$13,714,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($27,991,000))

$27,609,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 510. 2018 c 299 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$21,447,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($24,226,000))

$24,117,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($45,673,000))

$45,564,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) For the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2017, to August 31, 2017, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 511, chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(3) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

Sec. 511. 2018 c 299 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR MISCELLANEOUS—EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,802,000))

$6,302,000

Sec. 512. 2018 c 299 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$134,384,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($154,111,000))

$132,886,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($94,811,000))

$94,812,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,450,000))

$1,451,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,618,000))

$1,619,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($765,000))

$766,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($387,139,000))

$365,918,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $30,421,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018, $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.

(b)(i) The office of the superintendent of public instruction issued a final fiscal note on July 13, 2017, detailing an estimated savings of $12.7 million in the 2017-2019 biennium and $15.2 million in the 2019-2021 biennium from the passage of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2224.

(ii) By November 1, 2018, the superintendent must review the fiscal note and report to the legislature on which actions detailed in the fiscal note were taken by the superintendent to achieve the savings estimated and the actual savings achieved. For those actions provided in the fiscal note that were not taken and for which no savings were achieved, the superintendent must explain why those actions were not taken.

(iii) By November 1, 2018, the superintendent must submit a detailed plan on how the superintendent will achieve all of the savings estimated in the fiscal note for the 2019-2021 biennium.

(2) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events.

(3) $3,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $3,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(4) $62,674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and (($82,778,000))$61,553,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,296 per teacher in the 2017-18 school year and a bonus of $5,397 per teacher in the 2018-19 school year;

(b) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;

(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(d) During the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(5) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(6) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(7) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(8) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a statewide information technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as IT certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.

(9) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008, including parts of programs receiving grants that serve students in grades four through six. If equally matched by private donations, $825,000 of the 2018 appropriation and $825,000 of the 2019 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs in grades four through twelve. Of the amounts in this subsection, $100,000 of the fiscal year 2018 appropriation and $100,000 of the fiscal year 2019 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(10) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(11) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(12) $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program. The program shall prioritize first year teachers in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

(13) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2018, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2016-17 school year. The 2018 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2017-18 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2019, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2017-18 school year. The 2018 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2018-19 school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data.

(14) $9,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013. By January 15, 2018, the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a plan to the fiscal committees of the legislature outlining the additional school accountability supports that will be implemented as a result of the increased appropriation provided in fiscal year 2019. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for expenditure contingent upon legislative approval of the superintendent's plan for additional school accountability supports, and the superintendent may not spend that amount until approval is received.

(15) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for annual start-up, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs. To be eligible for funding, the skills center and high schools must agree to engage in developing local business and industry partnerships for oversight and input regarding program components. Program instructors must also agree to participate in professional development leading to student employment, or certification in aerospace or advanced manufacturing industries as determined by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center shall report annually student participation and long-term outcome data.

(16) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.

(17) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.

(18) $2,194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $909,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to implement chapter 18, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5946) (strengthening student educational outcomes).

(19) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for chapter 212, Laws of 2014 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6074) (homeless student educational outcomes).

(20) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for chapter 219, Laws of 2014 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6163) (expanded learning).

(21) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (Senate Bill No. 6424) (biliteracy seal).

(22) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization to integrate the state learning standards in English language arts, mathematics, and science with FieldSTEM outdoor field studies and project-based and work-based learning opportunities aligned with the environmental, natural resource, and agricultural sectors.

(23) Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall obtain an existing student assessment inventory tool that is free and openly licensed and distribute the tool to every school district. Each school district shall use the student assessment inventory tool to identify all state-level and district-level assessments that are required of students. The state-required assessments should include: Reading proficiency assessments used for compliance with RCW 28A.320.202; the required statewide assessments under chapter 28A.655 RCW in grades three through eight and at the high school level in English language arts, mathematics, and science, as well as the practice and training tests used to prepare for them; and the high school end-of-course exams in mathematics under RCW 28A.655.066. District-required assessments should include: The second grade reading assessment used to comply with RCW 28A.300.320; interim smarter balanced assessments, if required; the measures of academic progress assessment, if required; and other required interim, benchmark, or summative standardized assessments, including assessments used in social studies, the arts, health, and physical education in accordance with RCW 28A.230.095, and for educational technology in accordance with RCW 28A.655.075. The assessments identified should not include assessments used to determine eligibility for any categorical program including the transitional bilingual instruction program, learning assistance program, highly capable program, special education program, or any formative or diagnostic assessments used solely to inform teacher instructional practices, other than those already identified. By October 15th of each year, each district shall report to the superintendent the amount of student time in the previous school year that is spent taking each assessment identified. By December 15th of each even numbered calendar year, the superintendent shall summarize the information reported by the school districts and report to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

(24) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for contracts with nonprofit organizations that provide direct services to children exclusively through one-to-one volunteer mentoring. The mentor, student, and parent must each receive monthly coaching from professional staff in the first year and coaching every two months in subsequent years.

(25) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for grants to implement a program that provides hands-on education in financial literacy, work readiness, and entrepreneurship.

(26) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a process and provide assistance to school districts in planning for future implementation of the summer knowledge improvement program grants.

Sec. 513. 2018 c 299 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$151,517,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($158,812,000))

$157,356,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$97,244,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($407,577,000))

$406,121,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2017-18 and 2018-19; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2017-18 and 2018-19 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2017, to August 31, 2017, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 4, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 2.50 percent for school year 2017-18 and ((2.57))2.62 percent for school year 2018-19.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

(6) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2018 and (($198,000))$1,276,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 514. 2018 c 299 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$323,386,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($348,202,000))

$348,300,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$519,487,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,191,075,000))

$1,191,173,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2017, to August 31, 2017, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 515, chapter 4, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the prior school year. The prior school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(5) Within existing resources, during the 2017-18 and 2018-19 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.

Sec. 515. 2018 c 299 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—PER PUPIL ALLOCATIONS

Statewide Average Allocations

Per Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent Student

Basic Education Program

2017-18

School Year

2018-19

School Year

General Apportionment

$7,063

(($8,736))$8,781

Pupil Transportation

$429

(($531))$557

Special Education Programs

$6,897

(($8,749))$8,789

Institutional Education Programs

$14,401

(($17,811))$17,831

Programs for Highly Capable Students

$457

(($569))$572

Transitional Bilingual Programs

$1,031

(($1,250))$1258

Learning Assistance Program

$738

(($920))$925

Sec. 516. 2018 c 299 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocations purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.

(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative approval through the budget request process.

(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2018))2019, unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year ((2018))2019 among the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment, employee compensation adjustments, pupil transportation, special education programs, institutional education programs, transitional bilingual programs, highly capable, and learning assistance programs.

(5) The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(6) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.

Sec. 517. 2018 c 299 s 518 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR CHARTER SCHOOLS

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($55,569,000))

$53,733,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(2) $2,378,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for allocation to school districts to increase compensation related to increasing school employee salary allocations, changing the special education excess cost multiplier as provided in RCW 28A.150.390(2)(b), regionalization factors as provided in RCW 28A.150.412(2)(b), and the professional learning day delay, each as amended by Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6362 (basic education).

Sec. 518. 2018 c 299 s 519 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($862,000))

$863,000

Charter Schools Oversight Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,572,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,434,000))

$2,435,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation in this section is provided to the superintendent of public instruction solely for the operations of the Washington state charter school commission under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(End of part)

PART VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

Sec. 601. 2018 c 299 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$200,567,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($212,381,000))

$212,977,000

WSU Building Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$792,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,995,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2018)
. . . .
$138,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2019)
. . . .
$138,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$30,983,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($478,994,000))

$479,590,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a rural economic development and outreach coordinator.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(4) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

(5) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of chapter 154, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5022) (education loan information).

(6) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of chapter 177, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5100) (financial literacy seminars).

(7) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the continued development and operations of a medical school program in Spokane.

(8) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.

(9) $27,586,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $28,275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(10) $230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(11) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to collaborate with groups and organizations, including associations of local governments, associations of the business, real estate and building industries, state agencies, environmental organizations, state universities, public health and planning organizations, and tribal governments, to create a "Road Map to Washington's Future." The road map shall identify areas of agreement on ways to adapt Washington's growth management framework of statutes, institutions, and policies to meet future challenges in view of robust forecasted growth and the unique circumstances and urgent priorities in the diverse regions of the state. The center shall, in conjunction with state universities and other sponsors, conduct regional workshops to:

(a) Engage Washington residents in identifying a desired statewide vision for Washington's future;

(b) Partner with state universities on targeted research to inform future alternatives;

(c) Facilitate deep and candid interviews with representatives of the above named groups and organizations; and

(d) Convene parties for collaborative conversations and potential agreement seeking.

The center must submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2019.

(12) $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the development of an organic agriculture systems degree program located at the university center in Everett.

(13) Within the funds appropriated in this section, Washington State University shall:

(a) Review the scholarly literature on the short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use to assess if other states or private entities are conducting marijuana research in areas that may be useful to the state.

(b) Provide as part of its budget request for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium:

(i) A list of intended state, federal, and privately funded marijuana research, including cost, duration, and scope;

(ii) Plans for partnerships with other universities, state agencies, or private entities, including entities outside the state, for purposes related to researching short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use.

(14) $760,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $760,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2017 (2SSB 5474) (elk hoof disease).

(15) $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal 2018 and $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the creation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(16) $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the creation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(17) General fund—state appropriations in this section are reduced to reflect a reduction in state-supported tuition waivers for graduate students. When reducing tuition waivers, the university will not change its practices and procedures for providing eligible veterans with tuition waivers.

(18) $768,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and (($504,000))$1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 36, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (renewable energy, tax incentives).

(19) $89,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2009 (gold star families/higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2580 (renewable natural gas). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials.

(22) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the Washington State University tree fruit research and extension center in Wenatchee to create a plan for expansion of graduate research in the greater Wenatchee Valley. This plan may include proposals for new research programs, new or expanded facilities, and other elements necessary to facilitate expansion of graduate research in the greater Wenatchee Valley.

(23) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5028 (Native American curriculum). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the office of clean technology at Washington State University to convene a sustainable aviation biofuels work group to further the development of sustainable aviation fuel as a productive industry in Washington. The work group must include members from the legislature and sectors involved in sustainable aviation biofuels research, development, production, and utilization. The work group must provide recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature before December 1, 2019.

(25) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to provide meeting facilitation and related services for the legislative task force on legislative records as specified in section 925(4) of this act.

Sec. 602. 2018 c 299 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$48,136,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($50,646,000))

$51,325,000

CWU Capital Projects Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,076,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,921,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($121,855,000))

$122,534,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $11,169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $11,448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of chapter 154, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5022) (education loan information).

(5) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of chapter 177, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5100) (financial literacy seminars).

(6) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(7) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2009 (gold star families/higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the game on! program, which provides underserved middle and high school students with training in leadership, science, technology, engineering, and math. The program is expected to serve approximately 500 students per year.

(9) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for Central Washington University to partner with the office of the lieutenant governor, and employers and labor representatives from the building and construction trades to create a bachelor's degree program for individuals who have completed or are completing certain registered apprenticeship programs. The program shall be inclusive of prior learning, specifically tailored to experience gained through apprenticeships and work in the building and construction trades, and use an affordable online delivery model. The program's financial model must be designed to make this degree program self-sustaining without state support.

(10) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5028 (Native American curriculum). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 603. 2018 c 299 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$6,977,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($7,569,000))

$8,285,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$591,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($15,171,000))

$15,887,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

Sec. 604. 2018 c 299 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$10,293,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($11,564,000))

$14,912,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$727,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($22,584,000))

$25,932,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

(End of part)

PART VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 701. 2018 c 299 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$1,115,140,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($1,164,747,000))

$1,143,919,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,456,000))

$3,912,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($79,000))

$12,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($376,000))

$433,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$570,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,287,368,000))

$2,263,990,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 702. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$9,592,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$1,517,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($184,549,000))

$183,571,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($195,658,000))

$194,686,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 703. 2018 c 299 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$1,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,191,000))

$691,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($58,000))

$4,000

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water

Supply—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,000))

$. . .

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($150,000))

$106,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,213,000))

$4,245,000

Sec. 704. 2018 c 299 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS

The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2018 or fiscal year 2019, unless otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.

(1) These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:

(a) John Weiler, claim number 99970144. . . .$7,975

(b) Samson Asfaw, claim number 99970145. . . .$18,873

(c) Kevon Turner, claim number 99970147. . . .$9,750

(d) Arthur Eshe, claim number 99970148. . . .$12,900

(e) Woody J. Pierson, claim number 99970235. . . .$19,789

(f) Steve Sainsbury, claim number 99970236. . . .$10,000

(g) Alee Meneses, claim number 99970245. . . .$27,043

(h) Lisa Stanley, claim number 99970247. . . .$6,522

(i) Daniel Bandy, claim number 99970248. . . .$19,381

(j) Florentino Crisostomo, claim number 99970250. . . .$11,558

(k) Vicki Toft, claim number 99970251. . . .$4,494

(l) Shane Mitts, claim number 99970252. . . .$14,050

(m) Robert Larson, claim number 99970074. . . .$1,300

(2) These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for payment of compensation for wrongful convictions pursuant to RCW 4.100.060, as follows:

(a) Robert Larson, Tyler Gassman, and Paul Statler, claim numbers 99970072-99970074. . . .$79,000

(b) Ted Bradford. . . .$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705. A new section is added to 2018 c 299 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
$19,280,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is provided solely for expenditure into the disaster response account to ensure the account is not in deficit.

(End of part)

PART VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 801. 2018 c 299 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premium distributions
. . . .
(($9,730,000))

$9,818,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorney

distributions
. . . .
$6,643,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and

education distributions
. . . .
$4,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for public

utility district excise tax distributions
. . . .
(($30,230,000))

$31,355,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution to counties for publicly funded

autopsies
. . . .
(($3,135,000))

$3,556,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for

harbor improvement revenue distribution
. . . .
$140,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for

distribution to "timber" counties
. . . .
(($68,009,000))

$76,185,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$93,628,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$36,908,000

City-County Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,160,000))

$36,142,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise tax distribution
. . . .
$56,058,000

Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account

Appropriation for distribution to local taxing

jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue

redistributions effect of sourcing law changes
. . . .
(($20,549,000))

$22,847,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville

Reservation
. . . .
$8,074,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians
. . . .
$5,402,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor

profits distribution
. . . .
$98,876,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax

distributions
. . . .
$80,000

General Fund Appropriation for Marijuana Excise

Tax distributions
. . . .
$30,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for Habitat Conservation

Program distributions
. . . .
(($5,347,000))

$5,150,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($503,969,000))

$524,862,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802. 2018 c 299 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Criminal Justice Treatment Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, $4,450,000 for fiscal

year 2018 and $4,450,000 for fiscal year 2019
. . . .
$8,900,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to

the basic health plan trust account, the lesser

of the amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540

or this amount plus $40,494,000 for fiscal year

2018, $226,654,000 and this amount for fiscal year

2019, (($194,000,000))$186,748,000
. . . .
(($420,654,000))

$413,402,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, the lesser of the amount

determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or this

amount for fiscal year 2018, $130,000,000

and this amount for fiscal year 2019,

(($137,000,000))$130,000,000
. . . .
(($267,000,000))

$260,000,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to

the clean up settlement account as repayment of

the loan provided in section 3022(2) chapter 2,

Laws of 2012, 2nd sp. sess. (ESB 6074 2012

supplemental capital budget), $620,000 for fiscal

year 2018 and $620,000 for fiscal year 2019
. . . .
$1,240,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed the

actual amount of the annual base payment to the

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year 2018
. . . .
$101,639,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed the

actual amount of the annual base payment to the

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year 2019
. . . .
$101,639,000

State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

cleanup settlement account as repayment of the

loan provided in section 3022(2) chapter 2,

Laws of 2012, 2nd sp. sess. (ESB 6074, 2012

supplemental capital budget), $620,000 for

fiscal year 2018 and $620,000 for fiscal

year 2019
. . . .
$1,240,000

General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales

and use tax account, $12,877,000 for fiscal

year 2018 and (($7,672,000))$9,970,000 for

fiscal year 2019
. . . .
(($20,549,000))

$22,847,000

Aerospace Training and Student Loan Account: For

transfer to the state general fund, $750,000

for fiscal year 2018 and $750,000 for fiscal

year 2019
. . . .
$1,500,000

Disaster Response Account: For transfer to the state

general fund, $42,000,000 for fiscal year 2018
. . . .
$42,000,000

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to the state

general fund, $6,000,000 for fiscal year 2018 and

$6,000,000 for fiscal year 2019. . . .$12,000,000

Statewide Information Tech System Maintenance and

Operations Revolving Account: For transfer to the

consolidated technology services revolving account,

$5,500,000 for fiscal year 2018
. . . .
$5,500,000

General Fund: For transfer to the family and medical

leave insurance account as start-up costs for

the family and medical leave insurance program

pursuant to enactment of Substitute House Bill

No. 1116 (family and medical leave insurance),

Senate Bill No. 5975 (paid family and medical

leave insurance), or Senate Bill No. 5032

(family and medical leave insurance),

$82,000,000 for fiscal year 2018
. . . .
$82,000,000

Family and Medical Leave Insurance Account: For

transfer to the General Fund as repayment for

start-up costs for the family and medical leave

insurance program pursuant to implementation of

Substitute House Bill No. 1116 (family and

medical leave insurance), Senate Bill No. 5975

(paid family and medical leave insurance),

or Senate Bill No. 5032 (family and medical

leave insurance), the lesser of the amount

determined by the treasurer for full repayment

of the $82,000,000 transferred from the general

fund in fiscal year 2018 for start-up costs

with any related interest or this amount for

fiscal year 2019, $90,000,000
. . . .
$90,000,000

Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the

education legacy trust account, $136,998,000 for

fiscal year 2018 and $117,017,000 for fiscal

year 2019
. . . .
$254,015,000

General Fund: For transfer to the firearms range

account for fiscal year 2018
. . . .
$75,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account: For transfer

to the state general fund, $2,000,000 for fiscal

year 2018
. . . .
$2,000,000

Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

state toxics control account, $9,000,000 for

fiscal year 2018 and $12,000,000 for fiscal

year 2019
. . . .
$21,000,000

State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to water

pollution control revolving account, $3,000 for

fiscal year 2018
. . . .
$3,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to

the geoduck aquaculture research account for

fiscal year 2019
. . . .
$200,000

General Fund: For transfer to the dedicated McCleary

penalty account for fiscal year 2018
. . . .
$105,200,000

The amount transferred represents the monetary

sanctions accrued from August 13, 2015, through

June 30, 2018, under the order of the state supreme

court of August 13, 2015, in McCleary v. State.

General Fund: For transfer to the disaster response

account for fiscal year 2018
. . . .
$58,535,000

Oil Spill Response Account: For transfer to the oil

spill prevention account: $1,748,000 for fiscal

year 2018 and $2,973,000 for fiscal year 2019
. . . .
$4,721,000

General Fund: For transfer to the Washington

internet crimes against children account for fiscal

year 2018
. . . .
$1,500,000

Funeral and Cemetery Account: For transfer to the

skeletal human remains assistance account for fiscal

year 2018
. . . .
$15,000

General Fund: For transfer to the statewide tourism

marketing account for fiscal year 2019
. . . .
$1,500,000

Public Works Administration Account: For transfer to

the state general fund for fiscal year 2018
. . . .
$1,500,000

(End of part)

PART IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---