BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.36.010 and 2015 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise(([,])), the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) A jury is a body of persons temporarily selected from the qualified inhabitants of a particular district, and invested with power—

(a) To present or indict a person for a public offense.

(b) To try a question of fact.

(2) "Court" when used without further qualification means any superior court or court of limited jurisdiction in the state of Washington.

(3) "Judge" means every judicial officer authorized to hold or preside over a court. For purposes of this chapter "judge" does not include court commissioners or referees.

(4) "Juror" means any person summoned for service on a petit jury, grand jury, or jury of inquest as defined in this chapter.

(5) "Grand jury" means those twelve persons impaneled by a superior court to hear, examine, and investigate evidence concerning criminal activity and corruption.

(6) "Petit jury" means a body of persons twelve or less in number in the superior court and six in number in courts of limited jurisdiction, drawn by lot from the jurors in attendance upon the court at a particular session, and sworn to try and determine a question of fact.

(7) "Jury of inquest" means a body of persons six or fewer in number, but not fewer than four persons, summoned before the coroner or other ministerial officer, to inquire of particular facts.

(8) "Jury source list" means the list of all registered voters for any county, merged with a list of licensed drivers and identicard holders who reside in the county. The list shall specify each person's name and residence address and conform to the methodology and standards set pursuant to the provisions of RCW 2.36.054 or by supreme court rule. The list shall be filed with the superior court by the county auditor.

(9) "Master jury list" means the list of prospective jurors from which jurors summoned to serve will be randomly selected. The master jury list shall be either randomly selected from the jury source list or may be an exact duplicate of the jury source list.

(10) "Jury term" means a period of time of one or more days, not exceeding two weeks for counties with a jury source list that has at least seventy thousand names and one month for counties with a jury source list of less than seventy thousand names, during which summoned jurors must be available to report for juror service.

(11) "Juror service" means the period of time a juror is required to be present at the court facility. This period of time may not extend beyond the end of the jury term, and may not exceed one week for counties with a jury source list that has at least seventy thousand names, and two weeks for counties with a jury source list of less than seventy thousand names, except to complete a trial to which the juror was assigned during the service period.

(12) "Jury panel" means those persons randomly selected for jury service for a particular jury term.

(13) "Civil rights restored" means a person's right to vote has been provisionally or permanently restored prior to reporting for jury service.

--- END ---