BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.60.010 and 2007 c 187 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall be known as the "law against discrimination." It is an exercise of the police power of the state for the protection of the public welfare, health, and peace of the people of this state, and in fulfillment of the provisions of the Constitution of this state concerning civil rights. The legislature hereby finds and declares that practices of discrimination against any of its inhabitants because of race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, families with children, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability are a matter of state concern, that such discrimination threatens not only the rights and proper privileges of its inhabitants but menaces the institutions and foundation of a free democratic state. A state agency is herein created with powers with respect to elimination and prevention of discrimination in employment, in credit and insurance transactions, in places of public resort, accommodation, or amusement, and in real property transactions because of race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, families with children, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability; and the commission established hereunder is hereby given general jurisdiction and power for such purposes.

Sec. 2. RCW 49.60.020 and 2007 c 187 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter shall be construed liberally for the accomplishment of the purposes thereof. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of any other law of this state relating to discrimination because of race, color, creed, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, other than a law which purports to require or permit doing any act which is an unfair practice under this chapter. However, to the extent that distinction or differential treatment on the basis of citizenship or immigration status is authorized by federal or state law, regulation, or government contract, it is not an unfair practice. Nor shall anything herein contained be construed to deny the right to any person to institute any action or pursue any civil or criminal remedy based upon an alleged violation of his or her civil rights. This chapter shall not be construed to endorse any specific belief, practice, behavior, or orientation. Inclusion of sexual orientation in this chapter shall not be construed to modify or supersede state law relating to marriage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

It is not an unfair practice when a distinction or differential treatment on the basis of citizenship or immigration status is authorized by federal or state law, regulation, rule, or government contract.

Sec. 4. RCW 49.60.030 and 2009 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to be free from discrimination because of race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, sex, honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability is recognized as and declared to be a civil right. This right shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;

(b) The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement;

(c) The right to engage in real estate transactions without discrimination, including discrimination against families with children;

(d) The right to engage in credit transactions without discrimination;

(e) The right to engage in insurance transactions or transactions with health maintenance organizations without discrimination: PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice for the purposes of this subparagraph;

(f) The right to engage in commerce free from any discriminatory boycotts or blacklists. Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for purposes of this section shall be defined as the formation or execution of any express or implied agreement, understanding, policy or contractual arrangement for economic benefit between any persons which is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United States and which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to restrict, condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude any person or persons from any business relationship on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex, honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, or national origin, citizenship or immigration status, or lawful business relationship: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein contained shall prohibit the use of boycotts as authorized by law pertaining to labor disputes and unfair labor practices; and

(g) The right of a mother to breastfeed her child in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement.

(2) Any person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in violation of this chapter shall have a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations, or to recover the actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together with the cost of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other appropriate remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights Act of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).

(3) Except for any unfair practice committed by an employer against an employee or a prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real estate transaction which is the basis for relief specified in the amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which is committed in the course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that chapter, a matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce.

Sec. 5. RCW 49.60.120 and 2007 c 187 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have the functions, powers, and duties:

(1) To appoint an executive director and chief examiner, and such investigators, examiners, clerks, and other employees and agents as it may deem necessary, fix their compensation within the limitations provided by law, and prescribe their duties.

(2) To obtain upon request and utilize the services of all governmental departments and agencies.

(3) To adopt, amend, and rescind suitable rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and the policies and practices of the commission in connection therewith.

(4) To receive, impartially investigate, and pass upon complaints alleging unfair practices as defined in this chapter.

(5) To issue such publications and results of investigations and research as in its judgment will tend to promote good will and minimize or eliminate discrimination because of sex, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, marital status, age, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability.

(6) To make such technical studies as are appropriate to effectuate the purposes and policies of this chapter and to publish and distribute the reports of such studies.

(7) To cooperate and act jointly or by division of labor with the United States or other states, with other Washington state agencies, commissions, and other government entities, and with political subdivisions of the state of Washington and their respective human rights agencies to carry out the purposes of this chapter. However, the powers which may be exercised by the commission under this subsection permit investigations and complaint dispositions only if the investigations are designed to reveal, or the complaint deals only with, allegations which, if proven, would constitute unfair practices under this chapter. The commission may perform such services for these agencies and be reimbursed therefor.

(8) To foster good relations between minority and majority population groups of the state through seminars, conferences, educational programs, and other intergroup relations activities.

Sec. 6. RCW 49.60.130 and 2007 c 187 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission has power to create such advisory agencies and conciliation councils, local, regional, or statewide, as in its judgment will aid in effectuating the purposes of this chapter. The commission may empower them to study the problems of discrimination in all or specific fields of human relationships or in specific instances of discrimination because of sex, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability; to foster through community effort or otherwise good will, cooperation, and conciliation among the groups and elements of the population of the state, and to make recommendations to the commission for the development of policies and procedures in general and in specific instances, and for programs of formal and informal education which the commission may recommend to the appropriate state agency.

Such advisory agencies and conciliation councils shall be composed of representative citizens, serving without pay, but with reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended, and the commission may make provision for technical and clerical assistance to such agencies and councils and for the expenses of such assistance. The commission may use organizations specifically experienced in dealing with questions of discrimination.

Sec. 7. RCW 49.60.175 and 2007 c 187 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be an unfair practice to use the sex, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, marital status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability of any person, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, concerning an application for credit in any credit transaction to determine the creditworthiness of an applicant.

Sec. 8. RCW 49.60.176 and 2007 c 187 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair practice for any person whether acting for himself, herself, or another in connection with any credit transaction because of race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, sex, marital status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability:

(a) To deny credit to any person;

(b) To increase the charges or fees for or collateral required to secure any credit extended to any person;

(c) To restrict the amount or use of credit extended or to impose different terms or conditions with respect to the credit extended to any person or any item or service related thereto;

(d) To attempt to do any of the unfair practices defined in this section.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any party to a credit transaction from considering the credit history of any individual applicant.

(3) Further, nothing in this section shall prohibit any party to a credit transaction from considering the application of the community property law to the individual case or from taking reasonable action thereon.

Sec. 9. RCW 49.60.178 and 2006 c 4 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair practice for any person whether acting for himself, herself, or another in connection with an insurance transaction or transaction with a health maintenance organization to cancel or fail or refuse to issue or renew insurance or a health maintenance agreement to any person because of sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a ((disabled)) person with disabilities: PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice for the purposes of this section. For the purposes of this section, "insurance transaction" is defined in RCW 48.01.060, health maintenance agreement is defined in RCW 48.46.020, and "health maintenance organization" is defined in RCW 48.46.020.

The fact that such unfair practice may also be a violation of chapter 48.30, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW does not constitute a defense to an action brought under this section.

The insurance commissioner, under RCW 48.30.300, and the human rights commission, under chapter 49.60 RCW, shall have concurrent jurisdiction under this section and shall enter into a working agreement as to procedure to be followed in complaints under this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 49.60.180 and 2007 c 187 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair practice for any employer:

(1) To refuse to hire any person because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, That the prohibition against discrimination because of such disability shall not apply if the particular disability prevents the proper performance of the particular worker involved: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be construed to require an employer to establish employment goals or quotas based on sexual orientation.

(2) To discharge or bar any person from employment because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability.

(3) To discriminate against any person in compensation or in other terms or conditions of employment because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability: PROVIDED, That it shall not be an unfair practice for an employer to segregate washrooms or locker facilities on the basis of sex, or to base other terms and conditions of employment on the sex of employees where the commission by regulation or ruling in a particular instance has found the employment practice to be appropriate for the practical realization of equality of opportunity between the sexes.

(4) To print, or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of application for employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective employment, which expresses any limitation, specification, or discrimination as to age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, or any intent to make any such limitation, specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein shall prohibit advertising in a foreign language.

Sec. 11. RCW 49.60.190 and 2007 c 187 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair practice for any labor union or labor organization:

(1) To deny membership and full membership rights and privileges to any person because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability.

(2) To expel from membership any person because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability.

(3) To discriminate against any member, employer, employee, or other person to whom a duty of representation is owed because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability.

Sec. 12. RCW 49.60.200 and 2007 c 187 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair practice for any employment agency to fail or refuse to classify properly or refer for employment, or otherwise to discriminate against, an individual because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, or to print or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of application for employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective employment, which expresses any limitation, specification or discrimination as to age, sex, race, sexual orientation, creed, color, or national origin, citizenship or immigration status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, or any intent to make any such limitation, specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein shall prohibit advertising in a foreign language.

Sec. 13. RCW 49.60.215 and 2018 c 176 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be an unfair practice for any person or the person's agent or employee to commit an act which directly or indirectly results in any distinction, restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of any person to pay a larger sum than the uniform rates charged other persons, or the refusing or withholding from any person the admission, patronage, custom, presence, frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, except for conditions and limitations established by law and applicable to all persons, regardless of race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, sexual orientation, sex, honorably discharged veteran or military status, status as a mother breastfeeding her child, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be construed to require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make any place accessible to a person with a disability except as otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That behavior or actions constituting a risk to property or other persons can be grounds for refusal and shall not constitute an unfair practice.

Sec. 14. RCW 49.60.222 and 2007 c 187 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair practice for any person, whether acting for himself, herself, or another, because of sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability:

(a) To refuse to engage in a real estate transaction with a person;

(b) To discriminate against a person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith;

(c) To refuse to receive or to fail to transmit a bona fide offer to engage in a real estate transaction from a person;

(d) To refuse to negotiate for a real estate transaction with a person;

(e) To represent to a person that real property is not available for inspection, sale, rental, or lease when in fact it is so available, or to fail to bring a property listing to his or her attention, or to refuse to permit the person to inspect real property;

(f) To discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny a dwelling, to any person; or to a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available; or to any person associated with the person buying or renting;

(g) To make, print, circulate, post, or mail, or cause to be so made or published a statement, advertisement, or sign, or to use a form of application for a real estate transaction, or to make a record or inquiry in connection with a prospective real estate transaction, which indicates, directly or indirectly, an intent to make a limitation, specification, or discrimination with respect thereto;

(h) To offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a listing of real property with the understanding that a person may be discriminated against in a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith;

(i) To expel a person from occupancy of real property;

(j) To discriminate in the course of negotiating, executing, or financing a real estate transaction whether by mortgage, deed of trust, contract, or other instrument imposing a lien or other security in real property, or in negotiating or executing any item or service related thereto including issuance of title insurance, mortgage insurance, loan guarantee, or other aspect of the transaction. Nothing in this section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.176 relating to unfair practices in credit transactions; or

(k) To attempt to do any of the unfair practices defined in this section.

(2) For the purposes of this chapter discrimination based on the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled includes:

(a) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person with a disability, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the dwelling, except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on the renter agreeing to restore the interior of the dwelling to the condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;

(b) To refuse to make reasonable accommodation in rules, policies, practices, or services when such accommodations may be necessary to afford a person with the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability and/or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or

(c) To fail to design and construct covered multifamily dwellings and premises in conformance with the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.) and all other applicable laws or regulations pertaining to access by persons with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or use of a trained dog guide or service animal. Whenever the requirements of applicable laws or regulations differ, the requirements which require greater accessibility for persons with any sensory, mental, or physical disability shall govern.

Nothing in (a) or (b) of this subsection shall apply to: (i) A single-family house rented or leased by the owner if the owner does not own or have an interest in the proceeds of the rental or lease of more than three such single-family houses at one time, the rental or lease occurred without the use of a ((real estate))salesperson, or a broker ((or salesperson,)) as defined in RCW ((18.85.010))18.85.011, and the rental or lease occurred without the publication, posting, or mailing of any advertisement, sign, or statement in violation of subsection (1)(g) of this section; or (ii) rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or intended to be occupied by no more than four families living independently of each other if the owner maintains and occupies one of the rooms or units as his or her residence.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair practice or a denial of civil rights for any public or private educational institution to separate the sexes or give preference to or limit use of dormitories, residence halls, or other student housing to persons of one sex or to make distinctions on the basis of marital or families with children status.

(4) Except pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, this section shall not be construed to require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make facilities accessible to a person with a disability except as otherwise required by law. Nothing in this section affects the rights, responsibilities, and remedies of landlords and tenants pursuant to chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, including the right to post and enforce reasonable rules of conduct and safety for all tenants and their guests, provided that chapters 59.18 and 59.20 RCW are only affected to the extent they are inconsistent with the nondiscrimination requirements of this chapter. Nothing in this section limits the applicability of any reasonable federal, state, or local restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair practice for any public establishment providing for accommodations offered for the full enjoyment of transient guests as defined by RCW 9.91.010(1)(c) to make distinctions on the basis of families with children status. Nothing in this section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.215 relating to unfair practices in places of public accommodation.

(6) Nothing in this chapter prohibiting discrimination based on families with children status applies to housing for older persons as defined by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995. Nothing in this chapter authorizes requirements for housing for older persons different than the requirements in the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995.

(7) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to real estate transactions involving the sharing of a dwelling unit, or rental or sublease of a portion of a dwelling unit, when the dwelling unit is to be occupied by the owner or subleasor. For purposes of this section, "dwelling unit" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.18.030.

Sec. 15. RCW 49.60.223 and 2007 c 187 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair practice for any person, for profit, to induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any real property by representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race, creed, color, sex, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, sexual orientation, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or with any sensory, mental, or physical disability and/or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled.

Sec. 16. RCW 49.60.224 and 2007 c 187 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every provision in a written instrument relating to real property which purports to forbid or restrict the conveyance, encumbrance, occupancy, or lease thereof to individuals of a specified race, creed, color, sex, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, sexual orientation, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled, and every condition, restriction, or prohibition, including a right of entry or possibility of reverter, which directly or indirectly limits the use or occupancy of real property on the basis of race, creed, color, sex, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, sexual orientation, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled is void.

(2) It is an unfair practice to insert in a written instrument relating to real property a provision that is void under this section or to honor or attempt to honor such a provision in the chain of title.

Sec. 17. RCW 49.60.225 and 2007 c 187 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a reasonable cause determination has been made under RCW 49.60.240 that an unfair practice in a real estate transaction has been committed and a finding has been made that the respondent has engaged in any unfair practice under RCW 49.60.250, the administrative law judge shall promptly issue an order for such relief suffered by the aggrieved person as may be appropriate, which may include actual damages as provided by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.), and injunctive or other equitable relief. Such order may, to further the public interest, assess a civil penalty against the respondent:

(a) In an amount up to ten thousand dollars if the respondent has not been determined to have committed any prior unfair practice in a real estate transaction;

(b) In an amount up to twenty-five thousand dollars if the respondent has been determined to have committed one other unfair practice in a real estate transaction during the five-year period ending on the date of the filing of this charge; or

(c) In an amount up to fifty thousand dollars if the respondent has been determined to have committed two or more unfair practices in a real estate transaction during the seven-year period ending on the date of the filing of this charge, for loss of the right secured by RCW 49.60.010, 49.60.030, 49.60.040, and 49.60.222 through 49.60.224, as now or hereafter amended, to be free from discrimination in real property transactions because of sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, sexual orientation, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled. Enforcement of the order and appeal therefrom by the complainant or respondent may be made as provided in RCW 49.60.260 and 49.60.270. If acts constituting the unfair practice in a real estate transaction that is the object of the charge are determined to have been committed by the same natural person who has been previously determined to have committed acts constituting an unfair practice in a real estate transaction, then the civil penalty of up to fifty thousand dollars may be imposed without regard to the period of time within which any subsequent unfair practice in a real estate transaction occurred. All civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund.

(2) Such order shall not affect any contract, sale, conveyance, encumbrance, or lease consummated before the issuance of an order that involves a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or tenant who does not have actual notice of the charge filed under this chapter.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, persons awarded damages under this section may not receive additional damages pursuant to RCW 49.60.250.

--- END ---