BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

Any legislator who wishes to introduce a bill pertaining to a firearm must be able to produce proof, upon request, that he or she has completed the following training requirements:

(1) The criminal justice training commission firearm certificate program commensurate with that required for private detectives and security guards pursuant to RCW 43.101.250 and 43.101.260 for each firearm they wish to regulate;

(2) Range safety officer training; and

(3) A basic knowledge test of calibers and gauges of firearms.

--- END ---