BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of tampons, sanitary napkins, or other similar items used for feminine hygiene. For the purposes of this section, "other similar items used for feminine hygiene" does not include soaps, cleaning solutions, or shampoo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of tampons, sanitary napkins, or other similar items used for feminine hygiene. For the purposes of this section, "other similar items used for feminine hygiene" does not include soaps, cleaning solutions, or shampoo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---