BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall notify an inmate, in writing, of the process for provisional and permanent restoration of voting rights, as described in RCW 29A.08.520, prior to the termination of authority of the department over the inmate. The department shall also provide the inmate with:

(1) A voter registration form and written instructions for returning the form by mail; and

(2) Written information regarding registering to vote in person and electronically.

--- END ---