BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A threat assessment is a multistage structured team process that is used to evaluate the risk posed by a student or another person, typically as a response to an actual or perceived threat or concerning behavior. If the threat assessment indicates that there is a risk of violence in a specific situation, the team conducting the threat assessment must collaborate with others including the appropriate law enforcement agencies to develop and implement a plan to manage or reduce the threat posed by the student or another person.

(2) By December 31, 2019, school districts shall develop and implement a multistage threat assessment process that meets local safety needs and aligns with an evidence-based model.

(3) At a minimum, the multistage threat assessment process must include the following essential components:

(a) Based on behaviors, not characteristics of individuals;

(b) Incorporated into the school district's broader system of student supports;

(c) Include engagement with families whenever possible; and

(d) Address the needs of students with individual education programs, disabilities, or other special needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.310 RCW to read as follows:

Each educational service district shall develop and maintain the capacity to offer training, coordination, and evaluation on the multistage threat assessment process developed under section 1 of this act. An educational service district may demonstrate capacity by employing staff with sufficient expertise to offer the training or by contracting with individuals or organizations to offer the training. Training may be offered on a fee-for-service basis, or at no cost to school districts or educators if funds are appropriated specifically for this purpose or made available through grants or other sources.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.600.022 and 2016 c 72 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts should make efforts to have suspended or expelled students return to an educational setting as soon as possible. School districts must convene a meeting with the student and the student's parents or guardians within twenty days of the student's long-term suspension or expulsion, but no later than five days before the student's enrollment, to discuss a plan to reengage the student in a school program. Families must have access to, provide meaningful input on, and have the opportunity to participate in a culturally sensitive and culturally responsive reengagement plan.

(2) In developing a reengagement plan, school districts should consider shortening the length of time that the student is suspended or expelled, other forms of corrective action, and supportive interventions that aid in the student's academic success and keep the student engaged and on track to graduate. School districts must create a reengagement plan tailored to the student's individual circumstances, including consideration of the incident that led to the student's long-term suspension or expulsion. The plan should aid the student in taking the necessary steps to remedy the situation that led to the student's suspension or expulsion. The plan should be communicated with law enforcement and service providers as appropriate.

(3) Any reengagement meetings conducted by the school district involving the suspended or expelled student and his or her parents or guardians are not intended to replace a petition for readmission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A threat assessment is a multistage structured team process that is used to evaluate the risk posed by individuals or groups, typically as a response to an actual or perceived threat or concerning behavior. If the threat assessment indicates that there is a risk of violence in a specific situation, the team conducting the threat assessment must collaborate with others including the appropriate law enforcement agencies to develop and implement a plan to manage or reduce the threat posed by the student or another person.

(2) By December 31, 2019, institutions of higher education shall develop and implement a multistage threat assessment process that meets local safety needs and aligns with an evidence-based model.

(3) At a minimum, the multistage threat assessment process must include the following essential components:

(a) Based on behaviors, not characteristics of individuals;

(b) Incorporated into the institution of higher education's broader system of student supports;

(c) Include engagement with families or emergency contact within the limits of state and federal law and consistent with violence risk reduction principles;

(d) Address the needs of students taking into consideration disabilities and psychological or medical conditions; and

(e) Involve coordination with school districts for students enrolled in the running start program established in chapter 28A.600 RCW.

(4) Any plan for return to enrollment status should be communicated with law enforcement and service providers as appropriate.

--- END ---