BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 1.20.051 and 2018 c 22 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((At two o'clock antemeridian Pacific Standard Time of the second Sunday in March each year the time of the state of Washington shall be advanced one hour, and at two o'clock antemeridian Pacific Standard Time of the first Sunday in November in each year the time of the state of Washington shall, by the retarding of one hour, be returned to Pacific Standard Time.))(1) The standard time for the state is permanent daylight saving time year-round.

(2) Permanent daylight saving time within the state is that of the fifth zone designated by federal law as Pacific Standard Time, 15 U.S.C. Secs. 261 and 263, advanced by one hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) Section 1 of this act takes effect on the second Sunday of March in the year following the effective date of legislation passed by United States Congress to amend 15 U.S.C. Sec. 260a to authorize states to observe daylight saving time year-round.

(2) The department of commerce must provide notice of the effective date of section 1 of this act to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

--- END ---