BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW to read as follows:

The state of Washington is prohibited from imposing or collecting any new road usage charge, vehicle miles traveled fee, or other similar type of comparable charge, tax, or fee, in rural counties as defined in RCW 43.160.020. This prohibition shall be liberally construed.

--- END ---