BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.135.045 and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 934 are each amended to read as follows:

The education construction fund is hereby created in the state treasury.

(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund exclusively for common school construction or higher education construction.

(2) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An appropriation approved by the people under this subsection must result in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal period for which the appropriation is made and does not affect any subsequent fiscal period.

(3) ((Nothwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the fund may be used for maintenance and operations at community and technical colleges.))By June 30, 2020, and by June 30th of each year thereafter, the state treasurer must transfer the amount specified under subsection (4) of this section from the general fund to the education construction fund.

(4) The amount of the transfer under subsection (3) of this section is equal to 6.5 percent multiplied by the total amount of statewide school district capital expenditures for sites, buildings, equipment, and instructional technology, in the prior school year as reflected by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in its school district financial report.

--- END ---