BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to:

(1) Authorize and establish a new licensing and regulatory program for hemp production in this state in accordance with the agriculture improvement act of 2018;

(2) Replace the industrial hemp research program in chapter 15.120 RCW, with the new licensing and regulatory program established in this chapter, and enable hemp growers licensed under the industrial hemp research program on the effective date of rules implementing this chapter and regulating hemp production, to transfer into the program created in this chapter; and

(3) Authorize the growing of hemp as a legal, agricultural activity in this state. Hemp is an agricultural product that may be legally grown, produced, processed, possessed, transferred, commercially sold, and traded. Hemp and processed hemp produced in accordance with this chapter or produced lawfully under the laws of another state, tribe, or country may be transferred and sold within the state, outside of this state, and internationally. Nothing in this chapter is intended to prevent or restrain commerce in this state involving hemp or hemp products produced lawfully under the laws of another state, tribe, or country.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agriculture improvement act of 2018" means sections 7605, 10113, 10114, and 12619 of the agriculture improvement act of 2018, P.L. 115-334.

(2) "Crop" means hemp grown as an agricultural commodity.

(3) "Cultivar" means a variation of the plant Cannabis sativa L. that has been developed through cultivation by selective breeding.

(4) "Department" means the Washington state department of agriculture.

(5) "Hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis.

(6)(a) "Industrial hemp" means all parts and varieties of the genera Cannabis, cultivated or possessed by a grower, whether growing or not, that contain a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of 0.3 percent or less by dry weight that was grown under the industrial hemp research program as it existed on December 31, 2019.

(b) "Industrial hemp" does not include plants of the genera Cannabis that meet the definition of "marijuana" as defined in RCW 69.50.101.

(7) "Postharvest test" means a test of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration levels of hemp after being harvested based on ground whole plant samples or other approved testing method.

(8) "Process" means the processing, compounding, or conversion of hemp into hemp commodities or products.

(9) "Produce" or "production" means the planting, cultivation, growing, or harvesting of hemp including hemp seed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The department must develop an agricultural commodity program to replace the industrial hemp research pilot program in chapter 15.120 RCW, in accordance with the agriculture improvement act of 2018.

(2) The department has sole regulatory authority over the production of hemp and may adopt rules to implement this chapter. All rules relating to hemp, including any testing of hemp, are outside of the control and authority of the liquor and cannabis board.

(3) If the department adopts rules implementing this chapter that are effective by June 1, 2019, persons licensed to grow hemp under chapter 15.120 RCW may transfer into the regulatory program established in this chapter, and continue hemp production under this chapter. If the department adopts rules implementing this chapter that are effective after June 1, 2019, people licensed to grow hemp under chapter 15.120 RCW may continue hemp production under this chapter as of the effective date of the rules.

(4) Immediately upon the effective date of this section, and before the adoption of rules implementing this chapter, persons licensed to grow hemp under chapter 15.120 RCW may produce hemp in a manner otherwise consistent with the provisions of this chapter and the agriculture improvement act of 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) The department must develop the state's hemp plan to conform to the agriculture improvement act of 2018, to include consultation with the governor and the attorney general and the plan elements required in the agriculture improvement act of 2018.

(2) Consistent with subsection (1) of this section, the state's hemp plan must include the following elements:

(a) A practice for hemp producers to maintain relevant information regarding land on which hemp is produced, including a legal description of the land, for a period of not less than three calendar years;

(b) A procedure for testing, using postdecarboxylation or other similarly reliable methods, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration levels of hemp, without the application of heat;

(c) A procedure for the effective disposal of plants, whether growing or not, that are produced in violation of this chapter, and products derived from such plants;

(d) A procedure for enforcement of violations of the plan and for corrective action plans for licensees as required under the agriculture improvement act of 2018;

(e) A procedure for conducting annual inspections of, at a minimum, a random sample of hemp producers to verify hemp is not produced in violation of this chapter; and

(f) A certification that the state has the resources and personnel to carry out the practices and procedures described in this section.

(3) The proposal for the state's plan may include any other practice or procedure established to the extent the practice or procedure is consistent with the agriculture improvement act of 2018.

(4) Hemp and processed hemp produced in accordance with this chapter or produced lawfully under the laws of another state, tribe, or country may be transferred and sold within this state, outside of this state, and internationally.

(5) The whole hemp plant may be used as food. The department shall regulate the processing of hemp for food products, that are allowable under federal law, in the same manner as other food processing under chapters 15.130 and 69.07 RCW and may adopt rules as necessary to properly regulate the processing of hemp for food products including, but not limited to, establishing standards for creating hemp extracts used for food.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The department must develop a postharvest test protocol for testing hemp under this chapter that includes testing of whole plant samples or other testing protocol identified in regulations established by the United States department of agriculture, including the testing procedures for delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration levels of hemp produced by producers under the state plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) The department must issue hemp producer licenses to applicants qualified under this chapter and the agriculture improvement act of 2018. The department may adopt rules pursuant to this chapter and chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to license persons to grow hemp under a commercial hemp program.

(2) The plan must identify qualifications for license applicants, to include adults and corporate persons and to exclude persons with felony convictions as required under the agriculture improvement act of 2018.

(3) The department must establish license fees in an amount that will fund the implementation of this chapter and sustain the hemp program. The department may adopt rules establishing fees for tetrahydrocannabinol testing, inspections, and additional services required by the United States department of agriculture. License fees and any money received by the department under this chapter must be deposited in the hemp regulatory account created in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A person producing hemp pursuant to this chapter must notify the department of the source of the hemp seed or clones solely for the purpose of maintaining a record of the sources of seeds and clones being used or having been used for hemp production in this state. Hemp seed is an agricultural seed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The hemp regulatory account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from licensing fees established under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for implementing this chapter. Only the director of the state department of agriculture or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Washington State University may, within existing resources, develop and make accessible an internet-based application designed to assist hemp producers by providing regional communications concerning recommended planting times for hemp crops in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) There is no distance requirement, limitation, or buffer zone between any licensed hemp producer or hemp processing facility licensed or authorized under this chapter and any marijuana producer or marijuana processor licensed under chapter 69.50 RCW. No rule may establish such a distance requirement, limitation, or buffer zone without the evaluation of sufficient data showing impacts to either crop as a result of cross-pollination.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, in an effort to prevent cross-pollination between hemp plants produced under this chapter and marijuana plants produced under chapter 69.50 RCW, the department, in consultation with the liquor and cannabis board, must review the state's policy regarding cross-pollination and pollen capture to ensure an appropriate policy is in place, and must modify policies or establish new policies as appropriate. Under any such policy, when a documented conflict involving cross-pollination exists between two farms or production facilities growing or producing hemp or marijuana, the farm or production facility operating first in time shall have the right to continue operating and the farm or production facility operating second in time must cease growing or producing hemp or marijuana, as applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. (1) The department must use expedited rule making to adopt the state hemp plan submitted to the United States department of agriculture upon receipt of approval of the plan by the United States department of agriculture. As allowed under this section, rule making by the department to adopt the approved hemp plan qualifies as expedited rule making under RCW 34.05.353. Upon the approval of the plan by the United States department of agriculture, the department may conduct initial expedited rule making under RCW 34.05.353 to establish rules to allow hemp licenses to be issued without delay.

(2) On the effective date of rules adopted by the department regulating hemp production under chapter 15.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 16 of this act), a licensed hemp producer under this chapter may immediately produce hemp pursuant to chapter 15.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 16 of this act) with all the privileges of a hemp producer licensed under chapter 15.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 16 of this act).

Sec. 12. RCW 69.50.101 and 2018 c 132 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or

(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.

(c) "CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(d) "CBD product" means any product containing or consisting of cannabidiol.

(e) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(f) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules, but does not include hemp or industrial hemp as defined in ((RCW 15.120.010))section 2 of this act.

(g)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.

(2) The term does not include:

(i) a controlled substance;

(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, or chapter 69.77 RCW to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(h) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(i) "Department" means the department of health.

(j) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(k) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(l) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(m) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

(n) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(o) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(p) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

(q) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(r) "Immature plant or clone" means a plant or clone that has no flowers, is less than twelve inches in height, and is less than twelve inches in diameter.

(s) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.

(t) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (ff)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(u) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.

(v) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.

(w) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or

(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(x) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not include:

(1) The mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination; or

(2) ((Industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.120.010))Hemp or industrial hemp as defined in section 2 of this act, seeds used for licensed hemp production under chapter 15.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 16 of this act).

(y) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ten percent.

(z) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to process marijuana into marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, package and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana retailers.

(aa) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.

(bb) "Marijuana products" means useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products as defined in this section.

(cc) "Marijuana researcher" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to produce, process, and possess marijuana for the purposes of conducting research on marijuana and marijuana-derived drug products.

(dd) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.

(ee) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that contain marijuana or marijuana extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from marijuana as defined in subsection (x) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ten percent. The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include either useable marijuana or marijuana concentrates.

(ff) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6) Cocaine base.

(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).

(gg) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(hh) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

(ii) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(jj) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(kk) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

(ll) "Practitioner" means:

(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical quality assurance commission or equivalent and his or her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.

(mm) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(nn) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(oo) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(pp) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(qq) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board for the retail sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(rr) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(ss) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(tt) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.

(uu) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(vv) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term "useable marijuana" does not include either marijuana-infused products or marijuana concentrates.

Sec. 13. RCW 69.50.204 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1203 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless specifically excepted by state or federal law or regulation or more specifically included in another schedule, the following controlled substances are listed in Schedule I:

(a) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:

(1) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);

(2) Acetylmethadol;

(3) Allylprodine;

(4) Alphacetylmethadol, except levo-alphacetylmethadol, also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;

(5) Alphameprodine;

(6) Alphamethadol;

(7) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide); (1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) piperidine);

(8) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(9) Benzethidine;

(10) Betacetylmethadol;

(11) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(12) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl, some trade or other names: N-[1-(2-hydrox-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide;

(13) Betameprodine;

(14) Betamethadol;

(15) Betaprodine;

(16) Clonitazene;

(17) Dextromoramide;

(18) Diampromide;

(19) Diethylthiambutene;

(20) Difenoxin;

(21) Dimenoxadol;

(22) Dimepheptanol;

(23) Dimethylthiambutene;

(24) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;

(25) Dipipanone;

(26) Ethylmethylthiambutene;

(27) Etonitazene;

(28) Etoxeridine;

(29) Furethidine;

(30) Hydroxypethidine;

(31) Ketobemidone;

(32) Levomoramide;

(33) Levophenacylmorphan;

(34) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylprop anamide);

(35) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(36) Morpheridine;

(37) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);

(38) Noracymethadol;

(39) Norlevorphanol;

(40) Normethadone;

(41) Norpipanone;

(42) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide);

(43) PEPAP(1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);

(44) Phenadoxone;

(45) Phenampromide;

(46) Phenomorphan;

(47) Phenoperidine;

(48) Piritramide;

(49) Proheptazine;

(50) Properidine;

(51) Propiram;

(52) Racemoramide;

(53) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-((propanaminde))propanamide);

(54) Tilidine;

(55) Trimeperidine.

(b) Opium derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

(1) Acetorphine;

(2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;

(3) Benzylmorphine;

(4) Codeine methylbromide;

(5) Codeine-N-Oxide;

(6) Cyprenorphine;

(7) Desomorphine;

(8) Dihydromorphine;

(9) Drotebanol;

(10) Etorphine, except hydrochloride salt;

(11) Heroin;

(12) Hydromorphinol;

(13) Methyldesorphine;

(14) Methyldihydromorphine;

(15) Morphine methylbromide;

(16) Morphine methylsulfonate;

(17) Morphine-N-Oxide;

(18) Myrophine;

(19) Nicocodeine;

(20) Nicomorphine;

(21) Normorphine;

(22) Pholcodine;

(23) Thebacon.

(c) Hallucinogenic substances. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. For the purposes of this subsection only, the term "isomer" includes the optical, position, and geometric isomers:

(1) Alpha-ethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: Etryptamine; monase; a-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl) indole; a-ET; and AET;

(2) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine: Some trade or other names: 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo-2,5-DMA;

(3) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine: Some trade or other names: 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha-desmethyl DOB; 2C-B, nexus;

(4) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine: Some trade or other names: 2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA;

(5) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (DOET);

(6) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine: Other name: 2C-T-7;

(7) 4-methoxyamphetamine: Some trade or other names: 4-methoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine, PMA;

(8) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;

(9) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine: Some trade and other names: 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; "DOM"; and "STP";

(10) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;

(11) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);

(12) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine, also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA;

(13) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine,N-hydroxy MDA;

(14) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;

(15) Alpha-methyltryptamine: Other name: AMT;

(16) Bufotenine: Some trade or other names: 3-(beta-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxindole; 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol; N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine;

(17) Diethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: N,N-Diethyltryptamine; DET;

(18) Dimethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: DMT;

(19) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine: Other name: 5-MeO-DIPT;

(20) Ibogaine: Some trade or other names: 7-Ethyl-6,6 beta,7,8,9,10,12,13,-octahydro-2-methoxy-6,9-methano-5H-pyndo (1',2' 1,2) azepino (5,4-b) indole; Tabernanthe iboga;

(21) Lysergic acid diethylamide;

(22) Marihuana or marijuana;

(23) Mescaline;

(24) Parahexyl-7374: Some trade or other names: 3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7, 8, 9, 10-tetrahydro-6, 6, 9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran; synhexyl;

(25) Peyote, meaning all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as Lophophora Williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and every compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds, or extracts; (interprets 21 U.S.C. Sec. 812 (c), Schedule I (c)(12));

(26) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

(27) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

(28) Psilocybin;

(29) Psilocyn;

(30)(i) Tetrahydrocannabinols, meaning tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a plant of the ((genus))genera Cannabis (((cannabis plant))), as well as synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of the genera Cannabis, ((species,)) and/or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity such as the following:

(((i)))(A) 1 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers, excluding tetrahydrocannabinol in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a drug product approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration;

(((ii)))(B) 6 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;

(((iii)))(C) 3,4 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers; or

(((iv)))(D) That is chemically synthesized and either:

(((a)))(I) Has been demonstrated to have binding activity at one or more cannabinoid receptors; or

(((b)))(II) Is a chemical analog or isomer of a compound that has been demonstrated to have binding activity at one or more cannabinoid receptors;

(Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions covered.)

(ii) Hemp and industrial hemp, as defined in section 2 of this act, are excepted from the categories of controlled substances identified under this section;

(31) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or other names: N-ethyl-1phenylcyclohexalymine, (1-phenylcyclohexl) ethylamine; N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine; cyclohexamine; PCE;

(32) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or other names: 1-(1-phencyclohexyl)pyrrolidine; PCPy; PHP;

(33) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or other names: 1-(1-[2-thenyl]-cyclohexly)-pipendine; 2-thienylanalog of phencyclidine; TPCP; TCP;

(34) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine: A trade or other name is TCPy.

(d) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(1) Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid: Some other names include GHB; gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid; sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate;

(2) Mecloqualone;

(3) Methaqualone.

(e) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:

(1) Aminorex: Some other names: aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; or 4, 5-dihydro-5-phenly-2-oxazolamine;

(2) N-Benzylpiperazine: Some other names: BZP,1-benzylpiperazine;

(3) Cathinone, also known as 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone, alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone and norephedrone;

(4) Fenethylline;

(5) Methcathinone: Some other names: 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; alpha-(methylamino)propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one; alpha-N-methylaminopropiophenone; monomethylpropion; ephedrone; N-methylcathinone; methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463 and UR1432, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;

(6) (+-)cis-4-methylaminorex ((+-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);

(7) N-ethylamphetamine;

(8) N,N-dimethylamphetamine: Some trade or other names: N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenoethylene.

The controlled substances in this section may be added, rescheduled, or deleted as provided for in RCW 69.50.201.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective January 1, 2020:

(1) RCW 15.120.005 (Intent) and 2016 sp.s. c 11 s 1;

(2) RCW 15.120.010 (Definitions) and 2016 sp.s. c 11 s 2;

(3) RCW 15.120.020 (Industrial hemp—Agricultural product—Exclusively as part of industrial hemp research program) and 2016 sp.s. c 11 s 3;

(4) RCW 15.120.030 (Rule-making authority) and 2016 sp.s. c 11 s 4;

(5) RCW 15.120.035 (Rule-making authority—Monetary penalties, license suspension or forfeiture, other sanctions—Rules to be consistent with section 7606 of federal agricultural act of 2014) and 2017 c 317 s 10;

(6) RCW 15.120.040 (Industrial hemp research program—Established—Licensure—Seed certification program—Permission/waiver from appropriate federal entity) and 2016 sp.s. c 11 s 5;

(7) RCW 15.120.050 (Application form—Fee—Licensure—Renewal—Record of license forwarded to county sheriff—Public disclosure exemption) and 2016 sp.s. c 11 s 6; and

(8) RCW 15.120.060 (Sales and transfers of industrial hemp produced for processing—Department and state liquor and cannabis board to study feasibility and practicality of implementing legislatively authorized regulatory framework) and 2017 c 317 s 9.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Beginning on the effective date of this section:

(1) No law or rule related to certified or interstate hemp seeds applies to or may be enforced against a person with a license to produce or process hemp issued under this chapter or chapter 15.120 RCW; and

(2) No department or other state agency rule may establish or enforce a buffer zone or distance requirement between a person with a license or authorization to produce or process hemp under this chapter or chapter 15.120 RCW and a person with a license to produce or process marijuana issued under chapter 69.50 RCW. The department may not adopt rules without the evaluation of sufficient data showing impacts to either crop as a result of cross-pollination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. Sections 1 through 11 and 15 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---