BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.0315 and 2012 c 131 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations organized primarily for purposes other than the conduct of raffles, are hereby authorized to conduct raffles without obtaining a license to do so from the commission when such raffles are held in accordance with all other requirements of this chapter, other applicable laws, and rules of the commission; when gross revenues from all such raffles held by the organization during the calendar year do not exceed five thousand dollars; and when tickets to such raffles are sold only to, and winners are determined only from among, the regular members of the organization conducting the raffle. The organization may provide unopened containers of beverages containing alcohol as raffle prizes if the appropriate permit has been obtained from the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board((: PROVIDED, That)). However, raffles that exceed five thousand dollars may also be conducted pursuant to the provisions of this section if the organization obtains a license from the commission((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the term)).

(2) For the purposes of this section, "members"((for this purpose shall)) means only those persons who have become members prior to the commencement of the raffle and whose qualification for membership was not dependent upon, or in any way related to, the purchase of a ticket, or tickets, for such raffles.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.46.0331 and 2009 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby authorizes any person to conduct or operate amusement games when licensed and operated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted by the commission at such locations as the commission may authorize. The rules shall provide for at least the following:

(1) Persons other than bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations shall conduct amusement games only after obtaining a special amusement game license from the commission.

(2) Amusement games may be conducted under such a license only as a part of, and upon the site of:

(a) Any agricultural fair as authorized under chapter 15.76 or 36.37 RCW; or

(b) A civic center of a county, city, or town; or

(c) A world's fair or similar exposition that is approved by the bureau of international expositions at Paris, France; or

(d) A community-wide civic festival held not more than once annually and sponsored or approved by the city, town, or county in which it is held; or

(e) A commercial exposition organized and sponsored by an organization or association representing the retail sales and service operators conducting business in a shopping center or other commercial area developed and operated for retail sales and service, but only upon a parking lot or similar area located in said shopping center or commercial area for a period of no more than seventeen consecutive days by any licensee during any calendar year; or

(f) An amusement park. An amusement park is a group of activities, at a permanent location, to which people go to be entertained through a combination of various mechanical or aquatic rides, theatrical productions, motion picture, and/or slide show presentations with food and drink service. The amusement park must include at least five different mechanical, or aquatic rides, three additional activities, and the gross receipts must be primarily from these amusement activities; or

(g) Within a regional shopping center. A regional shopping center is a shopping center developed and operated for retail sales and service by retail sales and service operators and consisting of more than six hundred thousand gross square feet not including parking areas. Amusement games conducted as a part of, and upon the site of, a regional shopping center shall not be subject to the prohibition on revenue sharing set forth in RCW 9.46.120(2); or

(h) A location that possesses a valid license from the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board and prohibits minors on their premises; or

(i) Movie theaters, bowling alleys, miniature golf course facilities, and amusement centers. For the purposes of this section an amusement center shall be defined as a permanent location whose primary source of income is from the operation of ten or more amusement devices; or

(j) Any business whose primary activity is to provide food service for on premises consumption and who offers family entertainment which includes at least three of the following activities: Amusement devices; theatrical productions; mechanical rides; motion pictures; and slide show presentations; or

(k) Other locations as the commission may authorize.

(3) No amusement games may be conducted in any location except in conformance with local zoning, fire, health, and similar regulations. In no event may the licensee conduct any amusement games at any of the locations set out in subsection (2) of this section without first having obtained the written permission to do so from the person or organization owning the premises or an authorized agent thereof, and from the persons sponsoring the fair, exhibition, commercial exhibition, or festival, or from the city or town operating the civic center, in connection with which the games are to be operated.

(4) In no event may a licensee conduct any amusement games at the location described in subsection (2)(g) of this section, without, at the location of such games, providing adult supervision during all hours the licensee is open for business at such location, prohibiting school-age minors from entry during school hours, maintaining full-time personnel whose responsibilities include maintaining security and daily machine maintenance, and providing for hours for the close of business at such location that are no later than 10:00 p.m. on Fridays and Saturdays and on all other days that are the same as those of the regional shopping center in which the licensee is located.

(5) In no event may a licensee conduct any amusement game at a location described in subsection (2)(i) or (j) of this section, without, at the location of such games, providing adult supervision during all hours the licensee is open for business at such location, prohibiting school-age minors from playing licensed amusement games during school hours, maintaining full-time personnel whose responsibilities include maintaining security and daily machine maintenance, and prohibiting minors from playing the amusement games after 10:00 p.m. on any day.

Sec. 3. RCW 10.93.020 and 2006 c 284 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "General authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, as distinguished from a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency, and any other unit of government expressly designated by statute as a general authority Washington law enforcement agency. The Washington state patrol and the department of fish and wildlife are general authority Washington law enforcement agencies.

(2) "Limited authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation commission, the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and the state department of corrections.

(3) "General authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated and elected, appointed, or employed officer of a general authority Washington law enforcement agency who is commissioned to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally.

(4) "Limited authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated officer of a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency empowered by that agency to detect or apprehend violators of the laws in some or all of the limited subject areas for which that agency is responsible. A limited authority Washington peace officer may be a specially commissioned Washington peace officer if otherwise qualified for such status under this chapter.

(5) "Specially commissioned Washington peace officer", for the purposes of this chapter, means any officer, whether part-time or full-time, compensated or not, commissioned by a general authority Washington law enforcement agency to enforce some or all of the criminal laws of the state of Washington, who does not qualify under this chapter as a general authority Washington peace officer for that commissioning agency, specifically including reserve peace officers, and specially commissioned full-time, fully compensated peace officers duly commissioned by the states of Oregon or Idaho or any such peace officer commissioned by a unit of local government of Oregon or Idaho. A reserve peace officer is an individual who is an officer of a Washington law enforcement agency who does not serve such agency on a full-time basis but who, when called by the agency into active service, is fully commissioned on the same basis as full-time peace officers to enforce the criminal laws of the state.

(6) "Federal peace officer" means any employee or agent of the United States government who has the authority to carry firearms and make warrantless arrests and whose duties involve the enforcement of criminal laws of the United States.

(7) "Agency with primary territorial jurisdiction" means a city or town police agency which has responsibility for police activity within its boundaries; or a county police or sheriff's department which has responsibility with regard to police activity in the unincorporated areas within the county boundaries; or a statutorily authorized port district police agency or four-year state college or university police agency which has responsibility for police activity within the statutorily authorized enforcement boundaries of the port district, state college, or university.

(8) "Primary commissioning agency" means (a) the employing agency in the case of a general authority Washington peace officer, a limited authority Washington peace officer, an Indian tribal peace officer, or a federal peace officer, and (b) the commissioning agency in the case of a specially commissioned Washington peace officer (i) who is performing functions within the course and scope of the special commission and (ii) who is not also a general authority Washington peace officer, a limited authority Washington peace officer, an Indian tribal peace officer, or a federal peace officer.

(9) "Primary function of an agency" means that function to which greater than fifty percent of the agency's resources are allocated.

(10) "Mutual law enforcement assistance" includes, but is not limited to, one or more law enforcement agencies aiding or assisting one or more other such agencies through loans or exchanges of personnel or of material resources, for law enforcement purposes.

Sec. 4. RCW 15.89.070 and 2015 c 225 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall:

(1) Elect a chair and officers. The officers must include a treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission. The commission must adopt rules for its own governance that provide for the holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and the transaction of other business and for other meetings the commission may direct;

(2) Do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter. However, the commission has no rule-making power except as provided in this chapter;

(3) Employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys, and employees and engage the services of independent contractors;

(4) Retain, as necessary, the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney general;

(5) Receive donations of beer from producers for promotional purposes under subsections (6) and (7) of this section and for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Donations of beer for promotional purposes may only be disseminated without charge;

(6) Engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington beer, including, without limitation, the acquisition in any lawful manner and the dissemination without charge of beer. This dissemination is not deemed a sale for any purpose and the commission is not deemed a producer, supplier, or manufacturer, or the clerk, servant, or agent of a producer, supplier, distributor, or manufacturer. This dissemination without charge shall be for agricultural development or trade promotion, and not for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Dissemination for promotional purposes may include promotional hosting and must in the good faith judgment of the commission be in the aid of the marketing, advertising, sale of beer, or of research related to such marketing, advertising, or sale;

(7) Promote Washington beer by conducting unique beer tastings without charge;

(8) Beginning July 1, 2007, fund the Washington beer commission through sponsorship of up to twelve beer festivals annually at which beer may be sold to festival participants. For this purpose, the commission would qualify for issue of a special occasion license as an exception to WAC 314-05-020 but must comply with laws under Title 66 RCW and rules adopted by the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board under which such events may be conducted;

(9) Participate in international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production, regulation, distribution, sale, or use of beer including activities authorized under RCW 42.17A.635, including the reporting of those activities to the public disclosure commission;

(10) Acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish offices, incur expenses, and enter into contracts, including contracts for the creation and printing of promotional literature. The contracts are not subject to chapter 43.19 RCW, and are cancelable by the commission unless performed under conditions of employment that substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the department of labor and industries. The commission may create debt and other liabilities that are reasonable for proper discharge of its duties under this chapter;

(11) Maintain accounts with one or more qualified public depositories as the commission may direct, for the deposit of money, and expend money for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;

(12) Cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available for audit by the state auditor;

(13) Create and maintain a list of producers and disseminate information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;

(14) Employ, designate as an agent, act in concert with, and enter into contracts with any person, council, commission, or other entity to promote the general welfare of the beer industry and particularly to assist in the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic and foreign commerce. The commission shall expend money necessary or advisable for this purpose and to pay its proportionate share of the cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic or foreign commerce, employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds;

(15) Sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter;

(16) Serve as liaison with the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board on behalf of the commission and not for any individual producer;

(17) Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the commission and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec. 5. RCW 15.89.100 and 2011 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall prepare a list of all producers from information available from the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board, the department, or the producers' association. This list must contain the names and addresses of producers within this state and the amount, by barrelage, of beer produced during the period designated by the commission. A qualified person may, at any time, have his or her name placed upon the list by delivering or mailing the information to the commission. This list shall be corrected and brought up-to-date in accordance with evidence and information available to the commission by December 31st of each year. For the purposes of giving notice and holding referendums, the list updated before the date for issuing notices or ballots is the list of all producers entitled to notice, to assent or dissent, or to vote. Inadvertent failure to notify a producer does not invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter.

(2) It is the responsibility of producers to ensure that their correct address is filed with the commission. It is also the responsibility of producers to submit production data to the commission as prescribed by this chapter.

(3) The commission shall develop a reporting system to document that the producers in this state are reporting quantities of beer produced and are paying the assessment as provided in RCW 15.89.110.

Sec. 6. RCW 15.89.160 and 2006 c 330 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

County and state law enforcement officers, the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board and its enforcement agents, and employees of the department shall enforce this chapter.

Sec. 7. RCW 19.126.030 and 2009 c 155 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Suppliers are entitled to the following protections which are deemed to be incorporated into every agreement of distributorship:

(1) Agreements between suppliers and wholesale distributors shall be in writing;

(2) A wholesale distributor shall maintain the financial and competitive capability necessary to achieve efficient and effective distribution of the supplier's products;

(3) A wholesale distributor shall maintain the quality and integrity of the supplier's product in the manner set forth by the supplier;

(4) A wholesale distributor shall exert its best efforts to sell the product of the supplier and shall merchandise such products in the stores of its retail customers as agreed between the wholesale distributor and supplier;

(5) The supplier may cancel or otherwise terminate any agreement with a wholesale distributor immediately and without notice if the reason for such termination is fraudulent conduct in any of the wholesale distributor's dealings with the supplier or its products, insolvency, the occurrence of an assignment for the benefit of creditors, bankruptcy, or suspension in excess of fourteen days or revocation of a license issued by the Washington state liquor and cannabis board;

(6) A wholesale distributor shall give the supplier prior written notice, of not less than ninety days, of any material change in its ownership or management and the supplier has the right to reasonable prior approval of any such change; and

(7) A wholesale distributor shall give the supplier prior written notice, of not less than ninety days, of the wholesale distributor's intent to cancel or otherwise terminate the distributorship agreement.

Sec. 8. RCW 19.126.070 and 1985 c 440 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Continued violation of this chapter constitutes grounds, in the discretion of the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board, for suspension or cancellation under RCW 66.24.010 of any license or certificate held by a supplier or its agent.

Sec. 9. RCW 19.192.010 and 1998 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person or entity, other than those listed in subsection (2) of this section, issuing an identification card that purports to identify the holder as a resident of this or any other state and that contains at least a name, photograph, and date of birth, must label the card "not official proof of identification" in fluorescent yellow ink, on the face of the card, and in not less than fourteen-point font. The background color of the card must be a color other than the color used for official Washington state driver's licenses and identicards.

(2) This section does not apply to the following persons and entities:

(a) Department of licensing;

(b) Any federal, state, or local government agency;

(c) The Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board;

(d) Private employers issuing cards identifying employees;

(e) Banks and credit card companies issuing credit, debit, or bank cards containing a person's photograph; and

(f) Retail or wholesale stores issuing membership cards containing a person's photograph.

(3) Failure to comply with this section is a class 1 civil infraction.

Sec. 10. RCW 34.05.422 and 2012 c 39 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless otherwise provided by law: (a) Applications for rate changes and uncontested applications for licenses may, in the agency's discretion, be conducted as adjudicative proceedings; (b) applications for licenses that are contested by a person having standing to contest under the law and review of denials of applications for licenses or rate changes must be conducted as adjudicative proceedings; and (c) an agency may not revoke, suspend, or modify a license unless the agency gives notice of an opportunity for an appropriate adjudicative proceeding in accordance with this chapter or other statute.

(2) An agency with authority to grant or deny a professional or occupational license must notify an applicant for a new or renewal license not later than twenty days prior to the date of the examination required for that license of any grounds for denial of the license which are based on specific information disclosed in the application submitted to the agency. The agency must notify the applicant either that the license is denied or that the decision to grant or deny the license will be made at a future date. If the agency fails to give the notification prior to the examination and the applicant is denied licensure, the examination fee must be refunded to the applicant. If the applicant takes the examination, the agency must notify the applicant of the result.

(3) When a licensee has made timely and sufficient application for the renewal of a license or a new license with reference to any activity of a continuing nature, an existing full, temporary, or provisional license does not expire until the application has been finally determined by the agency, and, in case the application is denied or the terms of the new license limited, until the last day for seeking review of the agency order or a later date fixed by order of the reviewing court.

(4) If the agency finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, summary suspension of a license may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other action. These proceedings must be promptly instituted and determined.

(5) This section does not apply to requests made by the department of revenue, under the authority of RCW 82.08.155, to the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board to suspend a person's spirits license and to refuse to renew any spirits license held by the person and to issue any new spirits license to the person.

Sec. 11. RCW 35A.66.020 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.66.020 are each amended to read as follows:

The qualified electors of any code city may petition for an election upon the question of whether the sale of liquor shall be permitted within the boundaries of such city as provided by chapter 66.40 RCW, and shall be governed by the procedure therein, and may regulate music, dancing and entertainment as authorized by RCW 66.28.080((: PROVIDED, That)). However, every code city shall enforce state laws relating to the investigation and prosecution of all violations of Title 66 RCW relating to control of alcoholic beverages and shall be entitled to retain the fines collected therefrom as therein provided. Every code city shall also share in the allocation and distribution of liquor profits and excise as provided in RCW 82.08.170, 66.08.190, and 66.08.210, and make reports of seizure as required by RCW 66.32.090, and otherwise regulate by ordinances not in conflict with state law or Washington state liquor and cannabis board ((regulations))rules.

Sec. 12. RCW 41.37.015 and 2004 c 242 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A retirement system is hereby created for public safety employees of the Washington state department of corrections, the Washington state parks and recreation commission, the Washington state gambling commission, the Washington state patrol, the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board, county corrections departments, and city corrections departments not covered under chapter 41.28 RCW. The administration and management of the retirement system, the responsibility for making effective the provisions of this chapter, and the authority to make all rules necessary therefor are hereby vested in the department. All rules shall be governed by chapter 34.05 RCW. This retirement system shall be known as the Washington public safety employees' retirement system.

Sec. 13. RCW 41.40.023 and 2010 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Membership in the retirement system shall consist of all regularly compensated employees and appointive and elective officials of employers, as defined in this chapter, with the following exceptions:

(1) Persons in ineligible positions;

(2) Employees of the legislature except the officers thereof elected by the members of the senate and the house and legislative committees, unless membership of such employees be authorized by the said committee;

(3)(a) Persons holding elective offices or persons appointed directly by the governor((: PROVIDED, That)). However, such persons shall have the option of applying for membership during such periods of employment((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Any persons holding or who have held elective offices or persons appointed by the governor who are members in the retirement system and who have, prior to becoming such members, previously held an elective office, and did not at the start of such initial or successive terms of office exercise their option to become members, may apply for membership to be effective during such term or terms of office, and shall be allowed to establish the service credit applicable to such term or terms of office upon payment of the employee contributions therefor by the employee with interest as determined by the director and employer contributions therefor by the employer or employee with interest as determined by the director((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). All contributions with interest submitted by the employee under this subsection shall be placed in the employee's individual account in the employee's savings fund and be treated as any other contribution made by the employee, with the exception that any contributions submitted by the employee in payment of the employer's obligation, together with the interest the director may apply to the employer's contribution, shall not be considered part of the member's annuity for any purpose except withdrawal of contributions;

(b) A member holding elective office who has elected to apply for membership pursuant to (a) of this subsection and who later wishes to be eligible for a retirement allowance shall have the option of ending his or her membership in the retirement system. A member wishing to end his or her membership under this subsection must file, on a form supplied by the department, a statement indicating that the member agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service for future periods served as an elected official. A member who receives more than fifteen thousand dollars per year in compensation for his or her elective service, adjusted annually for inflation by the director, is not eligible for the option provided by this subsection (3)(b);

(4) Employees holding membership in, or receiving pension benefits under, any retirement plan operated wholly or in part by an agency of the state or political subdivision thereof, or who are by reason of their current employment contributing to or otherwise establishing the right to receive benefits from any such retirement plan except as follows:

(a) In any case where the retirement system has in existence an agreement with another retirement system in connection with exchange of service credit or an agreement whereby members can retain service credit in more than one system, such an employee shall be allowed membership rights should the agreement so provide;

(b) An employee shall be allowed membership if otherwise eligible while receiving survivor's benefits;

(c) An employee shall not either before or after June 7, 1984, be excluded from membership or denied service credit pursuant to this subsection solely on account of: (i) Membership in the plan created under chapter 2.14 RCW; or (ii) enrollment under the relief and compensation provisions or the pension provisions of the volunteer firefighters' (([and reserve officers']))and reserve officers' relief and pension (([principal]))principal fund under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(d) Except as provided in RCW 41.40.109, on or after July 25, 1999, an employee shall not be excluded from membership or denied service credit pursuant to this subsection solely on account of participation in a defined contribution pension plan qualified under section 401 of the internal revenue code;

(e) Employees who have been reported in the retirement system prior to July 25, 1999, and who participated during the same period of time in a defined contribution pension plan qualified under section 401 of the internal revenue code and operated wholly or in part by the employer, shall not be excluded from previous retirement system membership and service credit on account of such participation;

(5) Patient and inmate help in state charitable, penal, and correctional institutions;

(6) "Members" of a state veterans' home or state soldiers' home;

(7) Persons employed by an institution of higher learning or community college, primarily as an incident to and in furtherance of their education or training, or the education or training of a spouse;

(8) Employees of an institution of higher learning or community college during the period of service necessary to establish eligibility for membership in the retirement plans operated by such institutions;

(9) Persons rendering professional services to an employer on a fee, retainer, or contract basis or when the income from these services is less than fifty percent of the gross income received from the person's practice of a profession;

(10) Persons appointed after April 1, 1963, by the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board as contract liquor store managers;

(11) Employees of a labor guild, association, or organization((: PROVIDED, That)). Elective officials and employees of a labor guild, association, or organization which qualifies as an employer within this chapter shall have the option of applying for membership;

(12) Retirement system retirees((: PROVIDED, That)). Following reemployment in an eligible position, a retiree may elect to prospectively become a member of the retirement system if otherwise eligible;

(13) Persons employed by or appointed or elected as an official of a first-class city that has its own retirement system((: PROVIDED, That)). Any member elected or appointed to an elective office on or after April 1, 1971, shall have the option of continuing as a member of this system in lieu of becoming a member of the city system. A member who elects to continue as a member of this system shall pay the appropriate member contributions and the city shall pay the employer contributions at the rates prescribed by this chapter. The city shall also transfer to this system all of such member's accumulated contributions together with such further amounts as necessary to equal all employee and employer contributions which would have been paid into this system on account of such service with the city and thereupon the member shall be granted credit for all such service. Any city that becomes an employer as defined in RCW 41.40.010(13) as the result of an individual's election under this subsection shall not be required to have all employees covered for retirement under the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a city of the first class with its own retirement system from: (a) Transferring all of its current employees to the retirement system established under this chapter, or (b) allowing newly hired employees the option of continuing coverage under the retirement system established by this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, persons transferring from employment with a first-class city of over four hundred thousand population that has its own retirement system to employment with the state department of agriculture may elect to remain within the retirement system of such city and the state shall pay the employer contributions for such persons at like rates as prescribed for employers of other members of such system;

(14) Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b) do not reside in the United States, and (c) perform duties outside of the United States;

(15) Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b) are not covered by chapter 41.48 RCW, (c) are not excluded from membership under this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, (d) are residents of this state, and (e) make an irrevocable election to be excluded from membership, in writing, which is submitted to the director within thirty days after employment in an eligible position;

(16) Employees who are citizens of the United States and who reside and perform duties for an employer outside of the United States((: PROVIDED, That)). Unless otherwise excluded under this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, the employee may apply for membership (a) within thirty days after employment in an eligible position and membership service credit shall be granted from the first day of membership service, and (b) after this thirty-day period, but membership service credit shall be granted only if payment is made for the noncredited membership service under RCW 41.50.165(2), otherwise service shall be from the date of application;

(17) The city manager or chief administrative officer of a city or town, other than a retiree, who serves at the pleasure of an appointing authority((: PROVIDED, That)). Such persons shall have the option of applying for membership within thirty days from date of their appointment to such positions. Persons serving in such positions as of April 4, 1986, shall continue to be members in the retirement system unless they notify the director in writing prior to December 31, 1986, of their desire to withdraw from membership in the retirement system. A member who withdraws from membership in the system under this section shall receive a refund of the member's accumulated contributions.

Persons serving in such positions who have not opted for membership within the specified thirty days, may do so by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) for the period from the date of their appointment to the date of acceptance into membership;

(18) Persons serving as: (a) The chief administrative officer of a public utility district as defined in RCW 54.16.100; (b) the chief administrative officer of a port district formed under chapter 53.04 RCW; or (c) the chief administrative officer of a county who serves at the pleasure of an appointing authority((: PROVIDED, That)). Such persons shall have the option of applying for membership within thirty days from the date of their appointment to such positions. Persons serving in such positions as of July 25, 1999, shall continue to be members in the retirement system unless they notify the director in writing prior to December 31, 1999, of their desire to withdraw from membership in the retirement system. A member who withdraws from membership in the system under this section shall receive a refund of the member's accumulated contributions upon termination of employment or as otherwise consistent with the plan's tax qualification status as defined in internal revenue code section 401.

Persons serving in such positions who have not opted for membership within the specified thirty days, may do so at a later date by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) for the period from the date of their appointment to the date of acceptance into membership;

(19) Persons enrolled in state-approved apprenticeship programs, authorized under chapter 49.04 RCW, and who are employed by local governments to earn hours to complete such apprenticeship programs, if the employee is a member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and is making contributions to such a retirement plan or if the employee is a member of a Taft-Hartley retirement plan;

(20) Beginning on July 22, 2001, persons employed exclusively as trainers or trainees in resident apprentice training programs operated by housing authorities authorized under chapter 35.82 RCW, (a) if the trainer or trainee is a member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and is making contributions to such a retirement plan or (b) if the employee is a member of a Taft-Hartley retirement plan;

(21) Employees who are removed from membership under RCW 41.40.823 or 41.40.633; and

(22) Persons employed as the state director of fire protection under RCW 43.43.938 who were previously members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 under chapter 41.26 RCW may continue as a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system in lieu of becoming a member of this system.

Sec. 14. RCW 42.16.010 and 2014 c 162 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, all state officers and employees shall be paid for services rendered from the first day of the month through the fifteenth day of the month and for services rendered from the sixteenth day of the month through the last calendar day of the month. Paydates for these two pay periods shall be established by the director of financial management through the administrative hearing process and the official paydates shall be established six months prior to the beginning of each subsequent calendar year. Under no circumstance shall the paydate be established more than ten days after the pay period in which the wages are earned except when the designated paydate falls on Sunday, in which case the paydate shall not be later than the following Monday. Payment shall be deemed to have been made by the established paydates if: (a) The salary warrant is available at the geographic work location at which the warrant is normally available to the employee; or (b) the salary has been electronically transferred into the employee's account at the employee's designated financial institution; or (c) the salary warrants are mailed at least two days before the established paydate for those employees engaged in work in remote or varying locations from the geographic location at which the payroll is prepared, provided that the employee has requested payment by mail.

The office of financial management shall develop the necessary policies and operating procedures to assure that all remuneration for services rendered including basic salary, shift differential, standby pay, overtime, penalty pay, salary due based on contractual agreements, and special pay provisions, as provided for by law, agency policy or rule, or contract, shall be available to the employee on the designated paydate. Overtime, penalty pay, and special pay provisions may be paid by the next following paydate if the postponement of payment is attributable to: The employee's not making a timely or accurate report of the facts which are the basis for the payment, or the employer's lack of reasonable opportunity to verify the claim.

Compensable benefits payable because of separation from state service shall be paid with the earnings for the final period worked unless the employee separating has not provided the agency with the proper notification of intent to terminate.

One-half of the employee's basic monthly salary shall be paid in each pay period. Employees paid on an hourly basis or employees who work less than a full pay period shall be paid for actual salary earned.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply in instances where it would conflict with contractual rights or, with the approval of the office of financial management, to short-term, intermittent, noncareer state employees, to student employees of institutions of higher education, and to national or state guard members participating in state active duty((, and to liquor control agency managers who are paid a percentage of monthly liquor sales)).

(3) When a national or state guard member is called to participate in state active duty, the paydate shall be no more than seven days following completion of duty or the end of the pay period, whichever is first. When the seventh day falls on Sunday, the paydate shall not be later than the following Monday. This subsection shall apply only to the pay a national or state guard member receives from the military department for state active duty.

(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a bargained contract at an institution of higher education may include a provision for paying part-time academic employees on a pay schedule that coincides with all the paydays used for full-time academic employees.

(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section, an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 may pay its employees for services rendered biweekly, in pay periods consisting of two consecutive seven calendar-day weeks. The paydate for each pay period shall be seven calendar days after the end of the pay period. Under no circumstance may the paydate be established more than seven days after the pay period in which the wages are earned except that when the designated paydate falls on a holiday, the paydate shall not be later than the following Monday.

(b) Employees on a biweekly payroll cycle under this subsection (5) who are paid a salary may receive a prorated amount of their annualized salary each pay period. The prorated amount must be proportional to the number of pay periods worked in the calendar year. Employees on a biweekly payroll cycle under this subsection (5) who are paid hourly, or who work less than a full pay period may be paid the actual salary amount earned during the pay period.

(c) Each institution that adopts a biweekly pay schedule under this subsection (5) must establish, publish, and notify the director of the office of financial management of the official paydates six months before the beginning of each subsequent calendar year.

(6) Notwithstanding subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section, academic employees at institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 whose employment appointments are less than twelve months may have their salaries prorated in such a way that coincides with the paydays used for full-time employees.

Sec. 15. RCW 43.06.455 and 2001 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor may enter into cigarette tax contracts concerning the sale of cigarettes. All cigarette tax contracts shall meet the requirements for cigarette tax contracts under this section. Except for cigarette tax contracts under RCW 43.06.460, the rates, revenue sharing, and exemption terms of a cigarette tax contract are not effective unless authorized in a bill enacted by the legislature.

(2) Cigarette tax contracts shall be in regard to retail sales in which Indian retailers make delivery and physical transfer of possession of the cigarettes from the seller to the buyer within Indian country, and are not in regard to transactions by non-Indian retailers. In addition, contracts shall provide that retailers shall not sell or give, or permit to be sold or given, cigarettes to any person under the age of eighteen years.

(3) A cigarette tax contract with a tribe shall provide for a tribal cigarette tax in lieu of all state cigarette taxes and state and local sales and use taxes on sales of cigarettes in Indian country by Indian retailers. The tribe may allow an exemption for sales to tribal members.

(4) Cigarette tax contracts shall provide that all cigarettes possessed or sold by a retailer shall bear a cigarette stamp obtained by wholesalers from a bank or other suitable stamp vendor and applied to the cigarettes. The procedures to be used by the tribe in obtaining tax stamps must include a means to assure that the tribal tax will be paid by the wholesaler obtaining such cigarettes. Tribal stamps must have serial numbers or some other discrete identification so that each stamp can be traced to its source.

(5) Cigarette tax contracts shall provide that retailers shall purchase cigarettes only from:

(a) Wholesalers or manufacturers licensed to do business in the state of Washington;

(b) Out-of-state wholesalers or manufacturers who, although not licensed to do business in the state of Washington, agree to comply with the terms of the cigarette tax contract, are certified to the state as having so agreed, and who do in fact so comply. However, the state may in its sole discretion exercise its administrative and enforcement powers over such wholesalers or manufacturers to the extent permitted by law;

(c) A tribal wholesaler that purchases only from a wholesaler or manufacturer described in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection; and

(d) A tribal manufacturer.

(6) Cigarette tax contracts shall be for renewable periods of no more than eight years. A renewal may not include a renewal of the phase-in period.

(7) Cigarette tax contracts shall include provisions for compliance, such as transport and notice requirements, inspection procedures, stamping requirements, recordkeeping, and audit requirements.

(8) Tax revenue retained by a tribe must be used for essential government services. Use of tax revenue for subsidization of cigarette and food retailers is prohibited.

(9) The cigarette tax contract may include provisions to resolve disputes using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation.

(10) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate cigarette tax contracts to the department of revenue. The department of revenue shall consult with the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board during the negotiations.

(11) Information received by the state or open to state review under the terms of a contract is subject to the provisions of RCW 82.32.330.

(12) It is the intent of the legislature that the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board and the department of revenue continue the division of duties and shared authority under chapter 82.24 RCW and therefore the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board is responsible for enforcement activities that come under the terms of chapter 82.24 RCW.

(13) Each cigarette tax contract shall include a procedure for notifying the other party that a violation has occurred, a procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact occurred, an opportunity to correct such violation, and a provision providing for termination of the contract should the violation fail to be resolved through this process, such termination subject to mediation should the terms of the contract so allow. A contract shall provide for termination of the contract if resolution of a dispute does not occur within twenty-four months from the time notification of a violation has occurred. Intervening violations do not extend this time period. In addition, the contract shall include provisions delineating the respective roles and responsibilities of the tribe, the department of revenue, and the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

(14) For purposes of this section and RCW 43.06.460, 82.08.0316, 82.12.0316, and 82.24.295:

(a) "Essential government services" means services such as tribal administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health, education, job services, sewer, water, environmental and land use, transportation, utility services, and economic development;

(b) "Indian retailer" or "retailer" means (i) a retailer wholly owned and operated by an Indian tribe, (ii) a business wholly owned and operated by a tribal member and licensed by the tribe, or (iii) a business owned and operated by the Indian person or persons in whose name the land is held in trust; and

(c) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

Sec. 16. RCW 43.06.465 and 2005 c 11 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor may enter into a cigarette tax agreement with the Puyallup Tribe of Indians concerning the sale of cigarettes, subject to the limitations in this section. The legislature intends to address the uniqueness of the Puyallup Indian reservation and its selling environment through pricing and compliance strategies, rather than through the imposition of equivalent taxes. It is the legislature's intent (a) that an increase in prices through a flat tax will reduce much of the competitive advantage that has historically existed due to the discrepancy in the difference between state and tribal taxes, and (b) that the tribal retailers can remain in business under the changed circumstances. The governor may delegate the authority to negotiate a cigarette tax agreement with the Puyallup Tribe to the department of revenue. The department of revenue shall consult with the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board during the negotiations.

(2) Any agreement must require the tribe to impose a tax of eleven dollars and seventy-five cents on each carton of cigarettes, with ten packs a carton and twenty cigarettes per pack being the industry standard. This tax shall be prorated for cartons and packs that are nonstandard. This tribal tax is in lieu of the combined state and local sales and use taxes, and state cigarette taxes, and as such these state taxes are not imposed during the term of the agreement on any transaction governed by the agreement. The tribal tax shall increase or decrease by the same dollar amount as any increase or decrease in the state cigarette tax.

(3) The agreement must include a provision requiring the tribe to transmit thirty percent of the tribal tax revenue on all cigarette sales to the state. The funds shall be transmitted to the state treasurer on a quarterly basis for deposit by the state treasurer into the general fund. The remaining tribal tax revenue must be used for essential government services, as that term is defined in RCW 43.06.455.

(4) The agreement is limited to retail sales in which Indian retailers make delivery and physical transfer of possession of the cigarettes from the seller to the buyer within Indian country, and are not in regard to transactions by non-Indian retailers. In addition, agreements shall provide that retailers shall not sell or give, or permit to be sold or given, cigarettes to any person under the age of eighteen years.

(5)(a) The agreement must include a provision to price and sell the cigarettes so that the retail selling price is not less than the price paid by the retailer for the cigarettes.

(b) The tribal tax is in addition to the retail selling price.

(c) The agreement must include a provision to assure the price paid to the retailer includes the tribal tax, as evidenced by the tribe's cigarette stamp.

(d) If the tribe is acting as a wholesaler to tribal retailers, the retail selling price must not be less than the price the tribe paid for such cigarettes plus the tribal tax, as evidenced by the tribe's cigarette stamp.

(6)(a) The agreement must include provisions regarding enforcement and compliance by the tribe in regard to enrolled tribal members who sell cigarettes and shall describe the individual and joint responsibilities of the tribe, the department of revenue, and the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

(b) The agreement must include provisions for tax administration and compliance, such as transport and notice requirements, inspection procedures, stamping requirements, recordkeeping, and audit requirements.

(c) The agreement must include provisions for sharing of information among the tribe, the department of revenue, and the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

(7) The agreement must provide that all cigarettes possessed or sold by a tribal retailer shall bear a tribal cigarette stamp obtained by wholesalers from a bank or other suitable stamp vendor and applied to the cigarettes. Tribal stamps must have serial numbers or some other discrete identification so that each stamp can be traced to its source.

(8) The agreement must provide that retailers shall purchase cigarettes only from wholesalers or manufacturers licensed to do business in the state of Washington.

(9) The agreement must be for a renewable period of no more than eight years.

(10) The agreement must include provisions to resolve disputes using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation, and shall include a dispute resolution protocol. The protocol shall include a procedure for notifying the other party that a violation has occurred, a procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact occurred, an opportunity to correct such violation, and a provision providing for termination of the agreement should the violation fail to be resolved through this process, such termination subject to mediation should the terms of the agreement so allow. An agreement must provide for termination of the agreement if resolution of a dispute does not occur within twenty-four months from the time notification of a violation has occurred. Intervening violations do not extend this time period.

(11) The agreement may not include any provisions that impact the state's share of the master settlement agreement, and as such this agreement does not authorize negotiation regarding a redistribution of the state's proceeds under the master settlement agreement.

(12) Information received by the state or open to state review under the terms of an agreement is subject to RCW 82.32.330.

(13) It is the intent of the legislature that the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board and the department of revenue continue the division of duties and shared authority under chapter 82.24 RCW.

(14) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Indian country" has the same meaning as in chapter 82.24 RCW.

(b) "Indian retailer" or "retailer" means (i) a retailer wholly owned and operated by an Indian tribe or (ii) a business wholly owned and operated by an enrolled tribal member and licensed by the tribe.

(c) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means the Puyallup Tribe of Indians, which is a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

Sec. 17. RCW 43.06.466 and 2008 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that entering into a cigarette tax agreement with the Yakama Nation is a positive step and that such an agreement will support a stable and orderly environment on the Yakima Reservation for regulation of cigarette sales. The legislature further finds that the very special circumstances of the Yakama Nation pursuant to the Treaty with the Yakamas of 1855 (12 Stat. 951) support a cigarette tax agreement that reflects those circumstances. The legislature also finds that the provisions of the agreement with the Yakama Nation authorized by chapter 228, Laws of 2008 are reasonably necessary to prevent fraudulent transactions and place a minimal burden on the Yakama Nation, pursuant to the United States supreme court's decision in Washington v. Confederated Tribes of the Colville Indian Reservation, 447 U.S. 134 (1980).

It is the intent of the legislature that the cigarette tax agreement with the Yakama Nation reflects the uniqueness of the Yakama Nation's Treaty through specific terms that govern pricing of cigarettes, tribal cigarette tax revenue, information sharing, and administration of the agreement.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in chapter 82.24 RCW; and

(b) "Tribal retailer" means a cigarette retailer as that term is defined in RCW 82.24.010 that is licensed by and located within the jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation and is wholly owned by the Yakama Nation or any of its enrolled members.

(3) The governor may enter into a cigarette tax agreement with the Yakama Nation, a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, concerning the sale of cigarettes, subject to the provisions of this section. The governor may delegate the authority to negotiate the agreement to the department of revenue.

(4) The agreement must be for a renewable period of no more than eight years.

(5) All cigarettes possessed or sold by tribal retailers must be subject to the agreement, except cigarettes manufactured within the jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation by the Yakama Nation or its enrolled members.

(6) The agreement must allow the Yakama Nation to exempt its enrolled members from the tribal cigarette tax imposed under subsection (7) of this section.

(a) Sales of cigarettes exempt under this subsection must be subject to the requirements of subsection (9) of this section.

(b) The exemption must be provided only at the point of sale and reimbursement provided to the tribal retailer by the Yakama Nation.

(7) The agreement must require the Yakama Nation to impose and maintain in effect on the sale of cigarettes by tribal retailers a tax as provided in this subsection.

(a) The rate of tax will be expressed in dollars and cents and must be the percentage of tax imposed by the state under chapter 82.24 RCW for the period of the agreement as stated ((here))in this subsection:

(i) Eighty percent during the first six years;

(ii) Eighty-four percent during the seventh year; and

(iii) Eighty-seven and six-tenths percent during the eighth year.

(b) The tax must be imposed on each carton, or portion of a carton, of cigarettes, with ten packs per carton and twenty cigarettes per pack being the industry standard, and prorated for cartons and packs that are not standard.

(c) The tax must be in lieu of the combined state and local sales and use taxes, and state cigarette taxes, and, as provided in RCW 82.24.302, 82.08.0316, and 82.12.0316, the taxes imposed by chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.24 RCW do not apply during the term of the agreement on any transaction governed by the agreement.

(d) Throughout the term of the agreement and any renewal of the agreement, the tax must increase or decrease in correspondence with the state cigarette tax by applying the percentages in (a) of this subsection.

(8) The revenue generated by the tax imposed under subsection (7) of this section must be used by the Yakama Nation for essential government services, as that term is defined in RCW 43.06.455.

(9) All cigarettes possessed or sold by a tribal retailer must bear a tribal cigarette tax stamp as provided in this subsection.

(a) The Yakama Nation may act as its own stamp vendor, subject to meeting reasonable requirements for internal controls.

(b) The stamps must have serial numbers or other discrete identification that allow stamps to be traced to their source.

(10) The price paid by the tribal retailer to the wholesaler must not be less than the total of the price paid by the Yakama Nation or other wholesaler and the tax imposed under subsection (7) of this section.

(11) The retail selling price of cigarettes sold by tribal retailers must not be less than the price paid by them under subsection (10) of this section.

(12) Tribal retailers must not sell or give, or permit to be sold or given, cigarettes to any person under the age of eighteen years.

(13) The authority and the individual and joint responsibility of the Yakama Nation, the department of revenue, and the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board for administration and enforcement must be specified in the agreement including, but not limited to, requirements regarding transport of cigarettes, keeping of records, reporting, notice, inspection, audit, and mutual exchange of information.

(a) Requirements must provide for sharing of information regarding transport of cigarettes in the state of Washington by the Yakama Nation or its enrolled members, reporting of information on sales to customers located outside the jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation, and authority for unannounced inspection by the state of tribal retailers to verify compliance with stamping and pricing provisions.

(b) Information received by the state or open to state review under the terms of the agreement is subject to RCW 82.32.330.

(14) The agreement must provide for resolution of disputes using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation, and establish a dispute resolution protocol that includes the following elements:

(a) A procedure for notifying the other party that a violation has occurred;

(b) A procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact occurred;

(c) An opportunity to correct the violation;

(d) A procedure for terminating the agreement in the event of a failure to correct the violation, such termination subject to mediation should the terms of the agreement so allow; and

(e) Termination of the agreement for cause.

(15) The agreement may not include any provisions that impact the state's share of the master settlement agreement or concern redistribution of the state's proceeds under the master settlement agreement.

(16) The department of revenue may share with the Yakama Nation tax information under RCW 82.32.330 that is necessary for the Yakama Nation's compliance with the agreement.

Sec. 18. RCW 43.06.490 and 2015 c 207 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor may enter into agreements with federally recognized Indian tribes concerning marijuana. Marijuana agreements may address any marijuana-related issue that involves both state and tribal interests or otherwise has an impact on tribal-state relations. Such agreements may include, but are not limited to, the following provisions and subject matter:

(a) Criminal and civil law enforcement;

(b) Regulatory issues related to the commercial production, processing, sale, and possession of marijuana, and processed marijuana products, for both recreational and medical purposes;

(c) Medical and pharmaceutical research involving marijuana;

(d) Taxation in accordance with subsection (2) of this section;

(e) Any tribal immunities or preemption of state law regarding the production, processing, or marketing of marijuana; and

(f) Dispute resolution, including the use of mediation or other nonjudicial process.

(2)(a) Each marijuana agreement adopted under this section must provide for a tribal marijuana tax that is at least one hundred percent of the state marijuana excise tax imposed under RCW 69.50.535 and state and local sales and use taxes on sales of marijuana. Marijuana agreements apply to sales in which tribes, tribal enterprises, or tribal member-owned businesses (i) deliver or cause delivery to be made to or receive delivery from a marijuana producer, processor, or retailer licensed under chapter 69.50 RCW or (ii) physically transfer possession of the marijuana from the seller to the buyer within Indian country.

(b) The tribe may allow an exemption from tax for sales to the tribe, tribal enterprises, tribal member-owned businesses, or tribal members(([,])), on marijuana grown, produced, or processed within its Indian country, or for activities to the extent they are exempt under state or federal law from the state marijuana excise tax imposed under RCW 69.50.535 or state and local sales or use taxes on sales of marijuana. Medical marijuana products used in the course of medical treatments by a clinic, hospital, or similar facility owned and operated by a federally recognized Indian tribe within its Indian country may be exempted from tax under the terms of an agreement entered into under this section.

(3) Any marijuana agreement relating to the production, processing, and sale of marijuana in Indian country, whether for recreational or medical purposes, must address the following issues:

(a) Preservation of public health and safety;

(b) Ensuring the security of production, processing, retail, and research facilities; and

(c) Cross-border commerce in marijuana.

(4) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate marijuana agreements to the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board. In conducting such negotiations, the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board must, when necessary, consult with the governor and/or the department of revenue.

(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Indian country" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.

(b) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

(c) "Marijuana" means "marijuana," "marijuana concentrates," "marijuana-infused products," and "useable marijuana," as those terms are defined in RCW 69.50.101.

Sec. 19. RCW 43.42A.010 and 2014 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency" means the following executive branch agencies and offices of statewide elected officials:

(a) Department of agriculture;

(b) Department of archaeology and historic preservation;

(c) Department of ecology;

(d) Department of fish and wildlife;

(e) Gambling commission;

(f) Department of health;

(g) Department of labor and industries;

(h) Department of licensing;

(i) Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board;

(j) Department of natural resources;

(k) Parks and recreation commission;

(l) Department of revenue;

(m) Department of transportation; and

(n) Utilities and transportation commission.

(2) "Office" means the office of regulatory assistance.

Sec. 20. RCW 66.04.010 and 2015 c 193 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of husbandry.

(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:

(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;

(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the state of Washington;

(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced by a brewery or winery in the United States outside of the state of Washington; and

(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this subsection as its authorized representative for marketing and selling its products within the United States in accordance with a written agreement between the authorized representative and such brewery or winery pursuant to this title.

(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.

(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.

(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

(6) "Board" means the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board, constituted under this title.

(7) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.

(8) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational, athletic, or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.

(9) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars, drops, or pieces.

(10) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether by drinking or otherwise.

(11) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells liquor on behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor store manager.

(12) "Craft distillery" means a distillery that pays the reduced licensing fee under RCW 66.24.140.

(13) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his or her profession within the state pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.

(14) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of distilling spirits.

(15) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt liquor are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.

(16) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.

(17) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business is, the sale of drugs, medicines, and pharmaceutical preparations and maintains a regular prescription department and employs a registered pharmacist during all hours the drug store is open.

(18) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid certificate and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly engaged in carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.

(19) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.

(20) "Flavored malt beverage" means:

(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or

(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.

(21) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'

(22) "Hotel" means buildings, structures, and grounds, having facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food, that are kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the sleeping accommodation of such transient guests. The buildings, structures, and grounds must be located on adjacent property either owned or leased by the same person or persons.

(23) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits from a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such spirituous liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.

(24) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.

(25) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein defined (alcohol, spirits, wine, and beer), and all fermented, spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed liquor, a part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol, spirits, wine, or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid, semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be intoxicating. Liquor does not include confections or food products that contain one percent or less of alcohol by weight.

(26) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or pure extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or cereal in pure water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as "strong beer."

(27) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.

(28) "Nightclub" means an establishment that provides entertainment and has as its primary source of revenue (a) the sale of alcohol for consumption on the premises, (b) cover charges, or (c) both.

(29) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for holding liquor.

(30) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for compensation.

(31) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor under this title.

(32) "Person" means an individual, copartnership, association, or corporation.

(33) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his or her profession within the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.

(34) "Powdered alcohol" means any powder or crystalline substance containing alcohol that is produced for direct use or reconstitution.

(35) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a physician and given by him or her to a patient for the obtaining of liquor pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.

(36) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or roads; buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which the public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of like or similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted right of access, and which are generally used by the public.

(37) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board under the powers conferred by this title.

(38) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not including drug stores and soda fountains.

(39) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his or her agent in the state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge, of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale" and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW 9.46.0315((: PROVIDED, That))if the nonprofit organization conducting the raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.

(40) "Service bar" means a fixed or portable table, counter, cart, or similar workstation primarily used to prepare, mix, serve, and sell alcohol that is picked up by employees or customers. Customers may not be seated or allowed to consume food or alcohol at a service bar.

(41) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed or otherwise.

(42) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol obtained by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.

(43) "Store" means a state liquor store established under this title.

(44) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the premises, of beer, as herein defined.

(45) "VIP airport lounge" means an establishment within an international airport located beyond security checkpoints that provides a special space to sit, relax, read, work, and enjoy beverages where access is controlled by the VIP airport lounge operator and is generally limited to the following classifications of persons:

(a) Airline passengers of any age whose admission is based on a first-class, executive, or business class ticket;

(b) Airline passengers of any age who are qualified members or allowed guests of certain frequent flyer or other loyalty incentive programs maintained by airlines that have agreements describing the conditions for access to the VIP airport lounge;

(c) Airline passengers of any age who are qualified members or allowed guests of certain enhanced amenities programs maintained by companies that have agreements describing the conditions for access to the VIP airport lounge;

(d) Airport and airline employees, government officials, foreign dignitaries, and other attendees of functions held by the airport authority or airlines related to the promotion of business objectives such as increasing international air traffic and enhancing foreign trade where access to the VIP airport lounge will be controlled by the VIP airport lounge operator; and

(e) Airline passengers of any age or airline employees whose admission is based on a pass issued or permission given by the airline for access to the VIP airport lounge.

(46) "VIP airport lounge operator" means an airline, port district, or other entity operating a VIP airport lounge that: Is accountable for compliance with the alcohol beverage control act under this title; holds the license under chapter 66.24 RCW issued to the VIP airport lounge; and provides a point of contact for addressing any licensing and enforcement by the board.

(47)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation, and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume, including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port, sherry, muscatel, and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as "fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i) Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy, or alcohol.

(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."

(48) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from a domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine importer, or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in violation of this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as agent.

(49) "Wine importer" means a person or business within Washington who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval holder or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

(50) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.

Sec. 21. RCW 66.08.020 and 2012 c 2 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

The administration of this title is vested in the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board, constituted under this title.

Sec. 22. RCW 66.08.022 and 2012 c 117 s 267 are each amended to read as follows:

The attorney general shall be the general counsel of the ((liquor control)) board and he or she shall institute and prosecute all actions and proceedings which may be necessary in the enforcement and carrying out of the provisions of this chapter and this title.

He or she shall assign such assistants as may be necessary to the exclusive duty of assisting the ((liquor control)) board in the enforcement of this title.

Sec. 23. RCW 66.08.026 and 2012 c 2 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

Administrative expenses of the board must be appropriated and paid from the liquor revolving fund. These administrative expenses include, but ((not be [are not]))are not limited to: The salaries and expenses of the board and its employees, legal services, pilot projects, annual or other audits, and other general costs of conducting the business of the board. The administrative expenses do not include those amounts distributed pursuant to RCW 66.08.180, 66.08.190, 66.08.200, or 66.08.210. Agency commissions for contract liquor stores must be established by the ((liquor control)) board after consultation with and approval by the director of the office of financial management. All expenditures and payment of obligations authorized by this section are subject to the allotment requirements of chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 24. RCW 66.08.030 and 2014 c 63 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The power of the board to make regulations under chapter 34.05 RCW extends to:

(1) Prescribing the duties of the employees of the board, and regulating their conduct in the discharge of their duties;

(2) Prescribing an official seal and official labels and stamps and determining the manner in which they must be attached to every package of liquor sold or sealed under this title, including the prescribing of different official seals or different official labels for different classes of liquor;

(3) Prescribing forms to be used for purposes of this title or the regulations, and the terms and conditions to be contained in permits and licenses issued under this title, and the qualifications for receiving a permit or license issued under this title, including a criminal history record information check. The board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation;

(4) Prescribing the fees payable in respect of permits and licenses issued under this title for which no fees are prescribed in this title, and prescribing the fees for anything done or permitted to be done under the regulations;

(5) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor which may be kept on hand by the holder of a special permit for the purposes named in the permit, regulating the manner in which the same is kept and disposed of, and providing for the inspection of the same at any time at the instance of the board;

(6) Regulating the sale of liquor kept by the holders of licenses which entitle the holder to purchase and keep liquor for sale;

(7) Prescribing the records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by the holders of licenses, and the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing for inspection of the records so kept;

(8) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor for which a prescription may be given, and the number of prescriptions which may be given to the same patient within a stated period;

(9) Prescribing the manner of giving and serving notices required by this title or the regulations, where not otherwise provided for in this title;

(10) Regulating premises in which liquor is kept for export from the state, or from which liquor is exported, prescribing the books and records to be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing for the inspection of the premises and the books, records and the liquor so kept;

(11) Prescribing the conditions and qualifications requisite for the obtaining of club licenses and the books and records to be kept and the returns to be made by clubs, prescribing the manner of licensing clubs in any municipality or other locality, and providing for the inspection of clubs;

(12) Prescribing the conditions, accommodations, and qualifications requisite for the obtaining of licenses to sell beer, wines, and spirits, and regulating the sale of beer, wines, and spirits thereunder;

(13) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods and means by which manufacturers must deliver liquor within the state; and the time and periods when, and the manner, methods and means by which liquor may lawfully be conveyed or carried within the state;

(14) Providing for the making of returns by brewers of their sales of beer shipped within the state, or from the state, showing the gross amount of such sales and providing for the inspection of brewers' books and records, and for the checking of the accuracy of any such returns;

(15) Providing for the making of returns by the wholesalers of beer whose breweries are located beyond the boundaries of the state;

(16) Providing for the making of returns by any other liquor manufacturers, showing the gross amount of liquor produced or purchased, the amount sold within and exported from the state, and to whom so sold or exported, and providing for the inspection of the premises of any such liquor manufacturers, their books and records, and for the checking of any such return;

(17) Providing for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of the employees of the board. However, the premiums therefor must be paid by the board;

(18) Providing for the shipment of liquor to any person holding a permit and residing in any unit which has, by election pursuant to this title, prohibited the sale of liquor therein;

(19) Prescribing methods of manufacture, conditions of sanitation, standards of ingredients, quality and identity of alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold, bottled, or handled by licensees and the board; and conducting from time to time, in the interest of the public health and general welfare, scientific studies and research relating to alcoholic beverages and the use and effect thereof;

(20) Seizing, confiscating and destroying all alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold or offered for sale within this state which do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this title or the regulations of the board. However, nothing herein contained may be construed as authorizing the ((liquor)) board to prescribe, alter, limit or in any way change the present law as to the quantity or percentage of alcohol used in the manufacturing of wine or other alcoholic beverages;

(21) Monitoring and regulating the practices of license holders as necessary in order to prevent the theft and illegal trafficking of liquor pursuant to RCW 66.28.350.

Sec. 25. RCW 66.08.0501 and 1997 c 321 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((liquor control)) board may adopt appropriate rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of chapter 321, Laws of 1997.

Sec. 26. RCW 66.08.095 and 1993 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((liquor control)) board may provide liquor at no charge, including liquor forfeited under chapter 66.32 RCW, to recognized law enforcement agencies within the state when the law enforcement agency will be using the liquor for bona fide law enforcement training or investigation purposes.

Sec. 27. RCW 66.08.145 and 2016 sp.s. c 38 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((liquor and cannabis)) board may issue subpoenas in connection with any investigation, hearing, or proceeding for the production of books, records, and documents held under this chapter or chapters 70.155, 70.158, 70.345, 82.24, and 82.26 RCW, and books and records of common carriers as defined in RCW 81.80.010, or vehicle rental agencies relating to the transportation or possession of cigarettes or other tobacco products.

(2) The ((liquor and cannabis)) board may designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas.

(3) If any person is served a subpoena from the board for the production of records, documents, and books, and fails or refuses to obey the subpoena for the production of records, documents, and books when required to do so, the person is subject to proceedings for contempt, and the board may institute contempt of court proceedings in the superior court of Thurston county or in the county in which the person resides.

Sec. 28. RCW 66.08.170 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 978 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a fund, known as the "liquor revolving fund," which shall consist of all license fees, permit fees, penalties, forfeitures, and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the board. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys received by the board or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by the board within the authority of law shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the liquor revolving fund. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer funds from the liquor revolving account [fund] to the state general fund and may direct an additional amount of liquor profits to be distributed to local governments. Neither the transfer of funds nor the additional distribution of liquor profits to local governments during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium may reduce the excess fund distributions that otherwise would occur under RCW 66.08.190. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall transfer from the liquor revolving fund to the state general fund forty-two million five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2012 and forty-two million five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2013. The transfer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium may not reduce the excess fund distributions that otherwise would occur under RCW 66.08.190. Sales to licensees are exempt from any liquor price increases that may result from the transfer of funds from the liquor revolving fund to the state general fund during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.)) Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on authorization of the board or a duly authorized representative thereof. During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may also appropriate from the account for local government studies. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control the liquor revolving fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund. ((During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the liquor revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.))

Sec. 29. RCW 66.12.130 and 1981 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this title shall apply to or prevent the sale, importation, purchase, production, or blending of alcohol used solely for fuel to be used in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of husbandry or in combination with gasoline or other petroleum products for use as such fuel. Manufacturers and distillers of such alcohol fuel are not required to obtain a license under this title. Alcohol which is produced for use as fuel shall be denatured in accordance with a formula approved by the federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco and firearms prior to the removal of the alcohol from the premises as described in the approved federal permit application((: PROVIDED, That)). However, alcohol which is being transferred between plants involved in the distillation or manufacture of alcohol fuel need not be denatured if it is transferred in accordance with federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco and firearms regulation 27 C.F.R. 19.996 as existing on July 26, 1981. The exemptions ((from the state liquor control laws)) provided by this section only apply to distillers and manufacturers of alcohol to be used solely for fuel as long as the manufacturers and distillers are the holders of an appropriate permit issued under federal law.

Sec. 30. RCW 66.20.300 and 2014 c 78 s 2 and 2014 c 29 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 66.20.310 through 66.20.350.

(1) "Alcohol" has the same meaning as "liquor" in RCW 66.04.010.

(2) "Alcohol server" means any person who as part of his or her employment participates in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages for ((on-premise [on-premises]))on-premises consumption at a retail licensed premise as a regular requirement of his or her employment, and includes those persons eighteen years of age or older permitted by the liquor laws of this state to serve alcoholic beverages with meals.

(3) (("Board" means the Washington state liquor control board.

)) "Training entity" means any liquor licensee associations, independent contractors, private persons, and private or public schools, that have been certified by the board.

(((5)))(4) "Retail licensed premises" means any:

(a) Premises licensed to sell alcohol by the glass or by the drink, or in original containers primarily for consumption on the premises as authorized by RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.450, 66.24.570, 66.24.610, ((and)) 66.24.680, and 66.24.690;

(b) Distillery licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.140 that is authorized to serve samples of its own production;

(c) Facility established by a domestic winery for serving and selling wine pursuant to RCW 66.24.170(4); and

(d) Grocery store licensed under RCW 66.24.360, but only with respect to employees whose duties include serving during tasting activities under RCW 66.24.363.

Sec. 31. RCW 66.20.370 and 2006 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An applicant for a wine shipper's permit under RCW 66.20.365 must:

(a) Operate a winery located in the United States;

(b) Provide the board a copy of its valid license to manufacture wine issued by another state;

(c) Certify that it holds all state and federal licenses and permits necessary to operate a winery; and

(d) Register with the department of revenue under RCW 82.32.030.

(2) Holders of a winery certificate of approval under RCW 66.24.206(1)(a) are deemed to hold a wine shipper's permit without further application or fee, if the holder meets all requirements for a wine shipper's permit. A winery certificate of approval holder who wants to ship wine under its wine shipper's permit privilege must notify the ((liquor control)) board in a manner determined by the board before shipping any wine to a Washington consumer.

(3) Holders of a wine shipper's permit must:

(a) Pay the tax under RCW 66.24.210 for sales of wine to Washington state residents; and

(b) Collect and remit to the department of revenue all applicable state and local sales and use taxes imposed by or under the authority of chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on all sales of wine delivered to buyers in this state, regardless of whether the permit holder has a physical presence in this state.

Sec. 32. RCW 66.24.010 and 2012 c 39 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every license must be issued in the name of the applicant, and the holder thereof may not allow any other person to use the license.

(2) For the purpose of considering any application for a license, or the renewal of a license, the board may cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, or renewal or denial thereof, of any license, the ((liquor control)) board may consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant including an administrative violation history record with the board and a criminal history record information check. The board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW do not apply to such cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the board may, in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (8)(d) and (12) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting such authority must be adopted by rule. No retail license of any kind may be issued to:

(a) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not resided in the state for at least one month prior to receiving a license, except in cases of licenses issued to dining places on railroads, boats, or aircraft;

(b) A copartnership, unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license, as provided in this section;

(c) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless such manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee;

(d) A corporation or a limited liability company, unless it was created under the laws of the state of Washington or holds a certificate of authority to transact business in the state of Washington.

(3)(a) The board may, in its discretion, subject to the provisions of RCW 66.08.150, suspend or cancel any license; and all rights of the licensee to keep or sell liquor thereunder must be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The board must immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate is automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) Upon written notification by the department of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.08.155 that a person is more than thirty days delinquent in reporting or remitting spirits taxes to the department, the board must suspend all spirits licenses held by that person. The board must also refuse to renew any existing spirits license of, or issue any new spirits license to, the person or any other applicant controlled directly or indirectly by that person. The board may not reinstate a person's spirits license or renew or issue a new spirits license to that person, or an applicant controlled directly or indirectly by that person, until such time as the department of revenue notifies the board that the person is current in reporting and remitting spirits taxes or that the department consents to the reinstatement or renewal of the person's spirits license or the issuance of a new spirits license to the person. For purposes of this section: (i) "Spirits license" means any license issued by the board under the authority of this chapter that authorizes the licensee to sell spirits; and (ii) "spirits taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.155.

(d) The board may request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who must have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under such rules and regulations as the board may adopt.

(e) Witnesses are allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any such inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(f) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the board or a subpoena issued by the board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative law judge, must compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to testify therein.

(4) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee must forthwith deliver up the license to the board. Where the license has been suspended only, the board must return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The board must notify all vendors in the city or place where the licensee has its premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and no employee may allow or cause any liquor to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of that licensee.

(5)(a) At the time of the original issuance of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, the board must prorate the license fee charged to the new licensee according to the number of calendar quarters, or portion thereof, remaining until the first renewal of that license is required.

(b) Unless sooner canceled, every license issued by the board must expire at midnight of the thirtieth day of June of the fiscal year for which it was issued. However, if the board deems it feasible and desirable to do so, it may establish, by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, a system for staggering the annual renewal dates for any and all licenses authorized by this chapter. If such a system of staggered annual renewal dates is established by the board, the license fees provided by this chapter must be appropriately prorated during the first year that the system is in effect.

(6) Every license issued under this section is subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by rules adopted by the board. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in the issuance of an individual license may be listed on the face of the individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date. Conditions and restrictions imposed by the board may also be included in official correspondence separate from the license. All spirits licenses are subject to the condition that the spirits license holder must report and remit to the department of revenue all spirits taxes by the date due.

(7) Every licensee must post and keep posted its license, or licenses, and any additional correspondence containing conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in a conspicuous place on the premises.

(8)(a) Unless (b) of this subsection applies, before the board issues a new or renewal license to an applicant it must give notice of such application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(b) If the application for a special occasion license is for an event held during a county, district, or area fair as defined by RCW 15.76.120, and the county, district, or area fair is located on property owned by the county but located within an incorporated city or town, the county legislative authority must be the entity notified by the board under (a) of this subsection. The board must send a duplicate notice to the incorporated city or town within which the fair is located.

(c) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, has the right to file with the board within twenty days after the date of transmittal of such notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the new or renewal license is asked. The board may extend the time period for submitting written objections.

(d) The written objections must include a statement of all facts upon which such objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request and the ((liquor control)) board may in its discretion hold a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If such a hearing is held at the request of the applicant, ((liquor control)) board representatives must present and defend the board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.

(e) Upon the granting of a license under this title the board must send written notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns. When the license is for a special occasion license for an event held during a county, district, or area fair as defined by RCW 15.76.120, and the county, district, or area fair is located on county-owned property but located within an incorporated city or town, the written notification must be sent to both the incorporated city or town and the county legislative authority.

(9)(a) Before the board issues any license to any applicant, it shall give (i) due consideration to the location of the business to be conducted under such license with respect to the proximity of churches, schools, and public institutions and (ii) written notice, with receipt verification, of the application to public institutions identified by the board as appropriate to receive such notice, churches, and schools within five hundred feet of the premises to be licensed. The board may not issue a liquor license for either on-premises or off-premises consumption covering any premises not now licensed, if such premises are within five hundred feet of the premises of any tax-supported public elementary or secondary school measured along the most direct route over or across established public walks, streets, or other public passageway from the main entrance of the school to the nearest public entrance of the premises proposed for license, and if, after receipt by the school of the notice as provided in this subsection, the board receives written objection, within twenty days after receiving such notice, from an official representative or representatives of the school within five hundred feet of said proposed licensed premises, indicating to the board that there is an objection to the issuance of such license because of proximity to a school. The board may extend the time period for submitting objections. For the purpose of this section, "church" means a building erected for and used exclusively for religious worship and schooling or other activity in connection therewith. For the purpose of this section, "public institution" means institutions of higher education, parks, community centers, libraries, and transit centers.

(b) No liquor license may be issued or reissued by the board to any motor sports facility or licensee operating within the motor sports facility unless the motor sports facility enforces a program reasonably calculated to prevent alcohol or alcoholic beverages not purchased within the facility from entering the facility and such program is approved by local law enforcement agencies.

(c) It is the intent under this subsection (9) that a retail license may not be issued by the board where doing so would, in the judgment of the board, adversely affect a private school meeting the requirements for private schools under Title 28A RCW, which school is within five hundred feet of the proposed licensee. The board must fully consider and give substantial weight to objections filed by private schools. If a license is issued despite the proximity of a private school, the board must state in a letter addressed to the private school the board's reasons for issuing the license.

(10) The restrictions set forth in subsection (9) of this section do not prohibit the board from authorizing the assumption of existing licenses now located within the restricted area by other persons or licenses or relocations of existing licensed premises within the restricted area. In no case may the licensed premises be moved closer to a church or school than it was before the assumption or relocation.

(11)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the board, in its discretion, from issuing a temporary retail or distributor license to an applicant to operate the retail or distributor premises during the period the application for the license is pending. The board may establish a fee for a temporary license by rule.

(b) A temporary license issued by the board under this section must be for a period not to exceed sixty days. A temporary license may be extended at the discretion of the board for additional periods of sixty days upon payment of an additional fee and upon compliance with all conditions required in this section.

(c) Refusal by the board to issue or extend a temporary license shall not entitle the applicant to request a hearing. A temporary license may be canceled or suspended summarily at any time if the board determines that good cause for cancellation or suspension exists. RCW 66.08.130 applies to temporary licenses.

(d) Application for a temporary license must be on such form as the board shall prescribe. If an application for a temporary license is withdrawn before issuance or is refused by the board, the fee which accompanied such application must be refunded in full.

(12) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of any license, the board must give substantial weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises. "Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law enforcement upon arrest.

Sec. 33. RCW 66.24.025 and 2002 c 119 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the board approves, a license may be transferred, without charge, to the surviving spouse only of a deceased licensee if the parties were maintaining a marital community and the license was issued in the names of one or both of the parties. For the purpose of considering the qualifications of the surviving party or parties to receive a liquor license, the ((liquor control)) board may require a criminal history record information check. The board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation.

(2) The proposed sale of more than ten percent of the outstanding and/or issued stock of a licensed corporation or any proposed change in the officers of a licensed corporation must be reported to the board, and board approval must be obtained before such changes are made. A fee of seventy-five dollars will be charged for the processing of such change of stock ownership and/or corporate officers.

Sec. 34. RCW 66.24.055 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is a license for spirits distributors to (a) sell spirits purchased from manufacturers, distillers, or suppliers including, without limitation, licensed Washington distilleries, licensed spirits importers, other Washington spirits distributors, or suppliers of foreign spirits located outside of the United States, to spirits retailers including, without limitation, spirits retail licensees, special occasion license holders, interstate common carrier license holders, restaurant spirits retailer license holders, spirits, beer, and wine private club license holders, hotel license holders, sports entertainment facility license holders, and spirits, beer, and wine nightclub license holders, and to other spirits distributors; and (b) export the same from the state.

(2) ((By January 1, 2012, the board must issue spirits distributor licenses to all applicants who, upon December 8, 2011, have the right to purchase spirits from a spirits manufacturer, spirits distiller, or other spirits supplier for resale in the state, or are agents of such supplier authorized to sell to licensees in the state, unless the board determines that issuance of a license to such applicant is not in the public interest.

))(a) As limited by (b) of this subsection ((and subject to (c) of this subsection)), each spirits distributor licensee must pay to the board, for deposit into the liquor revolving fund, a license issuance fee calculated as ((follows:

(i) In each of the first twenty-seven months of licensure, ten percent of the total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits made during the month for which the fee is due, respectively; and

)) five percent of the total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits made during the month for which the fee is due, respectively.

(b) The fee required under this subsection (((3)))(2) is calculated only on sales of items which the licensee was the first spirits distributor in the state to have received:

(i) In the case of spirits manufactured in the state, from the distiller; or

(ii) In the case of spirits manufactured outside the state, from an authorized out-of-state supplier.

(c) ((By March 31, 2013, all persons holding spirits distributor licenses on or before March 31, 2013, must have paid collectively one hundred fifty million dollars or more in spirits distributor license fees. If the collective payment through March 31, 2013, totals less than one hundred fifty million dollars, the board must, according to rules adopted by the board for the purpose, collect by May 31, 2013, as additional spirits distributor license fees the difference between one hundred fifty million dollars and the actual receipts, allocated among persons holding spirits distributor licenses at any time on or before March 31, 2013, ratably according to their spirits sales made during calendar year 2012. Any amount by which such payments exceed one hundred fifty million dollars by March 31, 2013, must be credited to future license issuance fee obligations of spirits distributor licensees according to rules adopted by the board.

)) A retail licensee selling for resale must pay a distributor license fee under the terms and conditions in this section on resales of spirits the licensee has purchased on which no other distributor license fee has been paid. The board must establish rules setting forth the frequency and timing of such payments and reporting of sales dollar volume by the licensee, with payments due quarterly in arrears.

(((e)))(d) No spirits inventory may be subject to calculation of more than a single spirits distributor license issuance fee.

(((4)))(3) In addition to the payment set forth in subsection (((3)))(2) of this section, each spirits distributor licensee renewing its annual license must pay an annual license renewal fee of one thousand three hundred twenty dollars for each licensed location.

(((5)))(4) There is no minimum facility size or capacity for spirits distributor licenses, and no limit on the number of such licenses issued to qualified applicants. License applicants must provide physical security of the product that is substantially as effective as the physical security of the distribution facilities currently operated by the board with respect to preventing pilferage. License issuances and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and the regulations promulgated thereunder, including without limitation rights of cities, towns, county legislative authorities, the public, churches, schools, and public institutions to object to or prevent issuance of local liquor licenses. ((However, existing distributor premises licensed to sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now licensed" under RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing applications for spirits distributor licenses.))

Sec. 35. RCW 66.24.155 and 2018 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must, by rule, adopt a schedule of penalties for a licensed alcohol manufacturer who has committed a violation as part of the licensee's ancillary activities.

(2)(a) The schedule of penalties adopted under subsection (1) of this section may include:

(i) The issuance of a monetary penalty;

(ii) The suspension, revocation, or cancellation of the licensee's ability to conduct ancillary activities; or

(iii) A monetary option in lieu of suspension or revocation.

(b) The schedule of penalties may not include the issuance of a suspension, revocation, or cancellation of an alcohol manufacturer's license and may not exceed the schedule of penalties for a similar violation committed by a retail licensee.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "ancillary activities" means the licensee's activities involving the public, as authorized by statute or by ((state liquor and cannabis)) board rule, relating to serving samples, operating a tasting room, conducting retail sales, serving alcohol under a restaurant license issued under this chapter, or serving alcohol with a special occasion license.

Sec. 36. RCW 66.24.175 and 2014 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A qualifying farmers market authorized to allow wineries to sell bottled wine at retail under RCW 66.24.170 or microbreweries to sell bottled beer at retail under RCW 66.24.244, or both, may apply to the ((liquor control)) board for an endorsement to allow sampling of wine or beer or both. A winery or microbrewery offering samples under this section must have an endorsement from the board to sell wine or beer, as the case may be, of its own production at a qualifying farmers market under RCW 66.24.170 or 66.24.244, respectively.

(2) Samples may be offered only under the following conditions:

(a) No more than three wineries or microbreweries combined may offer samples at a qualifying farmers market per day.

(b) Samples must be two ounces or less. A winery or microbrewery may provide a maximum of two ounces of wine or beer to a customer per day.

(c) A winery or microbrewery may advertise that it offers samples only at its designated booth, stall, or other designated location at the farmers market.

(d) Customers must remain at the designated booth, stall, or other designated location while sampling beer or wine.

(e) Winery and microbrewery licensees and employees who are involved in sampling activities under this section must hold a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit.

(f) A winery or microbrewery must have food available for customers to consume while sampling beer or wine, or must be adjacent to a vendor offering prepared food.

(3) The board may establish additional requirements to ensure that persons under twenty-one years of age and apparently intoxicated persons may not possess or consume alcohol under the authority granted in this section.

(4) The board may prohibit sampling at a farmers market that is within the boundaries of an alcohol impact area recognized by resolution of the board if the board finds that the sampling activities at the farmers market have an adverse effect on the reduction of chronic public inebriation in the area.

(5) If a winery or microbrewery is found to have committed a public safety violation in conjunction with tasting activities, the board may suspend the licensee's farmers market endorsement and not reissue the endorsement for up to two years from the date of the violation. If mitigating circumstances exist, the board may offer a monetary penalty in lieu of suspension during a settlement conference.

(6) For the purposes of this section, a "qualifying farmers market" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.24.170.

Sec. 37. RCW 66.24.185 and 2008 c 41 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a license for bonded wine warehouses which shall authorize the storage and handling of bottled wine. Under this license a licensee may maintain a warehouse for the storage of wine off the premises of a winery.

(2) The board shall adopt similar qualifications for a bonded wine warehouse license as required for obtaining a domestic winery license as specified in RCW 66.24.010 and 66.24.170. A licensee must be a sole proprietor, a partnership, a limited liability company, or a corporation. One or more domestic wineries may operate as a partnership, corporation, business co-op, or agricultural co-op for the purposes of obtaining a bonded wine warehouse license.

(3) All bottled wine shipped to a bonded wine warehouse from a winery or another bonded wine warehouse shall remain under bond and no tax imposed under RCW 66.24.210 shall be due, unless the wine is removed from bond and shipped to a licensed Washington wine distributor. Wine may be removed from a bonded wine warehouse only for the purpose of being (a) exported from the state, (b) shipped to a licensed Washington wine distributor, (c) returned to a winery or bonded wine warehouse, or (([(d)]))(d) shipped to a consumer pursuant to RCW 66.20.360 through 66.20.390.

(4) Warehousing of wine by any person other than (a) a licensed domestic winery or a bonded wine warehouse licensed under the provisions of this section, (b) a licensed Washington wine distributor, (c) a licensed Washington wine importer, (d) a wine certificate of approval holder (W7), or (e) the ((liquor control)) board, is prohibited.

(5) A license applicant shall hold a federal permit for a bonded wine cellar and may be required to post a continuing wine tax bond of such an amount and in such a form as may be required by the board prior to the issuance of a bonded wine warehouse license. The fee for this license shall be one hundred dollars per annum.

(6) The board shall adopt rules requiring a bonded wine warehouse to be physically secure, zoned for the intended use and physically separated from any other use.

(7) Every licensee shall submit to the board a monthly report of movement of bottled wines to and from a bonded wine warehouse in a form prescribed by the board. The board may adopt other necessary procedures by which bonded wine warehouses are licensed and regulated.

(8) Handling of bottled wine, as provided for in this section, includes packaging and repackaging services; bottle labeling services; creating baskets or variety packs that may or may not include nonwine products; and picking, packing, and shipping wine orders direct to consumer. A winery contracting with a bonded wine warehouse for handling bottled wine must comply with all applicable state and federal laws and shall be responsible for financial transactions in direct to consumer shipping activities.

Sec. 38. RCW 66.24.206 and 2007 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A United States winery located outside the state of Washington must hold a certificate of approval to allow sales and shipment of the certificate of approval holder's wine to licensed Washington wine distributors, importers, or retailers. A certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement may act as a distributor of its own production. Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred cases of its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington retailers. A certificate of approval holder may not arrange for any such common carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own production.

(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval to allow sales and shipment of United States produced wine to licensed Washington wine distributors or importers.

(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced wine to licensed Washington wine distributors or importers.

(2) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and until such winery or authorized representative shall have made a written agreement with the board to furnish to the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a report under oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the quantity of wine sold or delivered to each licensed wine distributor, importer, or retailer, during the preceding month, and shall further have agreed with the board, that such wineries, manufacturers, or authorized representatives, and all general sales corporations or agencies maintained by them, and all of their trade representatives, shall and will faithfully comply with all laws of the state of Washington pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors and all rules ((and regulations)) of the ((Washington state liquor control)) board. A violation of the terms of this agreement will cause the board to take action to suspend or revoke such certificate.

(3) The fee for the certificate of approval and related endorsements, issued pursuant to the provisions of this title, shall be from time to time established by the board at a level that is sufficient to defray the costs of administering the certificate of approval program. The fee shall be fixed by rule by the board in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4) Certificate of approval holders are deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of Washington concerning enforcement of this chapter and all laws and rules related to the sale and shipment of wine.

Sec. 39. RCW 66.24.210 and 2016 c 235 s 12 and 2016 c 225 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to wine distributors and the ((Washington state liquor and cannabis)) board, within the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter. Any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder acting as a distributor of its own production must pay taxes imposed by this section. There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine distributors and the ((Washington state liquor and cannabis)) board within the state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents per liter. However, wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery to another winery is not subject to such tax.

(a) The tax provided for in this section shall be collected by direct payments based on wine purchased by wine distributors.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, every person purchasing wine under the provisions of this section must on or before the twentieth day of each month report to the board all purchases during the preceding calendar month in such manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such report must pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such report unless the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of wine whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require that every such person shall execute to and file with the board a bond to be approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the tax when due, the board may suspend or cancel the license until all taxes are paid.

(c) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase wine from a certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a domestic winery must make monthly reports to the ((liquor and cannabis)) board on wine purchased during the preceding calendar month in the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.

(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax must be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June 30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.

(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine as defined in RCW 66.04.010 when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider, and eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.

(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection (5) must be deposited in the state general fund.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and not more than eight and one-half percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling, or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.

(7) For the purposes of this section, out-of-state wineries must pay taxes under this section on wine sold and shipped directly to Washington state residents in a manner consistent with the requirements of a wine distributor under subsections (1) through (4) of this section, except wineries shall be responsible for the tax and not the resident purchaser.

(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any domestic winery or wine certificate of approval holder acting as a distributor of its own production that had total taxable sales of wine in Washington state of six thousand gallons or less during the calendar year preceding the date on which the tax would otherwise be due is not required to pay taxes under this section more often than annually.

Sec. 40. RCW 66.24.270 and 2006 c 302 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person, firm or corporation, holding a license to manufacture malt liquors or strong beer within the state of Washington, shall, on or before the twentieth day of each month, furnish to the ((Washington state liquor control)) board, on a form to be prescribed by the board, a statement showing the quantity of malt liquors and strong beer sold for resale during the preceding calendar month to each beer distributor within the state of Washington.

(2)(a) A United States brewery or manufacturer of beer or strong beer, located outside the state of Washington, must hold a certificate of approval to allow sales and shipment of the certificate of approval holder's beer or strong beer to licensed Washington beer distributors, importers, or retailers. A certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement may act as a distributor for beer of its own production.

(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval to allow sales and shipment of United States produced beer or strong beer to licensed Washington beer distributors or importers.

(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced beer or strong beer to licensed Washington beer distributors or importers.

(3) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and until such brewer or manufacturer of beer or strong beer or authorized representative shall have made a written agreement with the board to furnish to the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a report under oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the quantity of beer and strong beer sold or delivered to each licensed beer distributor, importer, or retailer during the preceding month, and shall further have agreed with the board, that such brewer or manufacturer of beer or strong beer or authorized representative and all general sales corporations or agencies maintained by them, and all of their trade representatives, corporations, and agencies, shall and will faithfully comply with all laws of the state of Washington pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors and all rules ((and regulations)) of the ((Washington state liquor control)) board. A violation of the terms of this agreement will cause the board to take action to suspend or revoke such certificate.

(4) The fee for the certificate of approval and related endorsements, issued pursuant to the provisions of this title, shall be from time to time established by the board at a level that is sufficient to defray the costs of administering the certificate of approval program. The fee shall be fixed by rule by the board in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(5) Certificate of approval holders are deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of Washington concerning enforcement of this chapter and all laws and rules related to the sale and shipment of beer.

Sec. 41. RCW 66.24.290 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor licensed under this title may sell and deliver beer and strong beer to holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other than the board. Any certificate of approval holder authorized to act as a distributor under RCW 66.24.270 shall pay the taxes imposed by this section.

(a) Every such brewery or beer distributor shall report all sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and shall pay to the board as an added tax for the privilege of manufacturing and selling the beer and strong beer within the state a tax of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees within the state and on sales to licensees within the state of bottled and canned beer, including strong beer, shall pay a tax computed in gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.

(b) Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction thereof. Beer and strong beer shall be sold by breweries and distributors in sealed barrels or packages.

(c) The moneys collected under this subsection shall be distributed as follows: (i) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and (ii) of the remaining moneys: (A) Twenty percent shall be distributed to counties in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200; and (B) eighty percent shall be distributed to incorporated cities and towns in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.210.

(d) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase beer from a certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a brewery or microbrewery shall make monthly reports to the ((liquor control)) board on beer purchased during the preceding calendar month in the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.

(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons. All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to ((ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and)) four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons ((thereafter)).

(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this exemption.

(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection (3) shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(4) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption under subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to one dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three percent of the revenues collected from this additional tax shall be distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be transferred to the state general fund.

(5)(((a) From June 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013, an additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to fifteen dollars and fifty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.

(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051 of the federal internal revenue code, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this exemption.

(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection shall be deposited in the state general fund.

)) The board may make refunds for all taxes paid on beer and strong beer exported from the state for use outside the state.

(((7)))(6) The board may require filing with the board of a bond to be approved by it, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to pay the tax when due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her license until all taxes are paid.

Sec. 42. RCW 66.24.480 and 2012 c 117 s 281 are each amended to read as follows:

"Bottle club" means a club or association operating for profit or otherwise and conducting or maintaining premises in which the members or other persons may resort for the primary or incidental purpose of keeping or consuming liquor on the premises.

Except as permitted under a license issued by the ((Washington state liquor control)) board, it is unlawful for any person to conduct or maintain by himself or herself or by associating with others, or to in any manner aid, assist, or abet in conducting or maintaining a bottle club.

Sec. 43. RCW 66.24.481 and 2008 c 94 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No public place or club, or agent, servant or employee thereof, shall keep or allow to be kept, either by itself, its agent, servant or employee, or any other person, any liquor in any place maintained or conducted by such public place or club, nor shall it permit the drinking of any liquor in any such place, unless the sale of liquor in said place is authorized by virtue of a valid and subsisting license issued by the ((Washington state liquor control)) board, or the consumption of liquor in said place is authorized by a special banquet permit issued by said board. Every person who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

"Public place," for purposes of this section only, shall mean in addition to the definition set forth in RCW 66.04.010, any place to which admission is charged or in which any pecuniary gain is realized by the owner or operator of such place in selling or vending food or soft drinks.

Sec. 44. RCW 66.24.495 and 1997 c 321 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a license to be designated as a nonprofit arts organization license. This shall be a special license to be issued to any nonprofit arts organization which sponsors and presents productions or performances of an artistic or cultural nature in a specific theater or other appropriate designated indoor premises approved by the board. The license shall permit the licensee to sell liquor to patrons of productions or performances for consumption on the premises at these events. The fee for the license shall be two hundred fifty dollars per annum.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the term "nonprofit arts organization" means an organization which is organized and operated for the purpose of providing artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances or cultural or art education programs, as defined in subsection (3) of this section, for viewing or attendance by the general public. The organization must be a not-for-profit corporation under chapter 24.03 RCW and managed by a governing board of not less than eight individuals none of whom is a paid employee of the organization or by a corporation sole under chapter 24.12 RCW. In addition, the corporation must satisfy the following conditions:

(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its purposes and bylaws;

(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the salary or compensation of like positions within the state;

(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the activities for which the license is granted and, on the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation;

(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified when licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;

(e) The proceeds derived from sales of liquor, except for reasonable operating costs, must be used in furtherance of the purposes of the organization;

(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national origin, or ancestry; and

(g) The ((liquor control)) board shall have access to its books in order to determine whether the corporation is entitled to a license.

(3) The term "artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances or cultural or art education programs" includes and is limited to:

(a) An exhibition or presentation of works of art or objects of cultural or historical significance, such as those commonly displayed in art or history museums;

(b) A musical or dramatic performance or series of performances; or

(c) An educational seminar or program, or series of such programs, offered by the organization to the general public on an artistic, cultural, or historical subject.

Sec. 45. RCW 66.28.035 and 2016 c 235 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By the 20th day of each month, all spirits certificate of approval holders must file with the board, in a form and manner required by the board, a report of all spirits delivered to purchasers in this state during the preceding month. Copies of the invoices for all such purchases or other information required by the board that would disclose the identity of the purchasers must be made available upon request.

(2) A spirits certificate of approval holder may not ship or cause to be transported into this state any spirits unless the purchaser to whom the spirits are to be delivered is:

(a) Licensed by the board to sell spirits in this state, and the license is in good standing; or

(b) Otherwise legally authorized to sell spirits in this state.

(3) The ((liquor and cannabis)) board must maintain on its web site a list of all purchasers that meet the conditions of subsection (2) of this section.

(4) A violation of this section is grounds for suspension of a spirits certificate of approval license in accordance with RCW 66.08.150, in addition to any punishment as may be authorized by RCW 66.28.030.

Sec. 46. RCW 66.28.040 and 2016 c 235 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery, importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other manufacturer of liquor may, within the state of Washington, give to any person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.305 prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with ((regulations))rules adopted by the ((liquor and cannabis)) board, provided that the samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210; nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval holder, or distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section prevents a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery, or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distiller licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor licensed under RCW 66.24.310, from furnishing spirits without charge, to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (6) of the internal revenue code of 1986 for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such exemption; nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery or microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the brewery premises; nothing in this section prevents donations of wine for the purposes of RCW 66.12.180; nothing in this section prevents a domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on the winery premises; and nothing in this section prevents a craft distillery from serving spirits, on the distillery premises subject to RCW 66.24.145.

Sec. 47. RCW 66.40.030 and 2015 c 153 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within any election unit referred to in RCW 66.40.010, subject to the exception specified in subsection (2) of this section, a separate election may be held upon the question of whether the sale of liquor under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightclub; and sports entertainment facility licenses, must be permitted within the election unit. The conditions and procedure for holding the election are prescribed by RCW 66.40.020, 66.40.040, 66.40.100, 66.40.110, and 66.40.120. Whenever a majority of qualified voters voting upon the question in the election unit vote "against the sale of liquor under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightclub; and sports entertainment facility licenses," the county auditor must file with the ((liquor control)) board a certificate showing the result of the canvass at the election. Ninety days after the date of that canvass, it is unlawful for licensees to maintain and operate premises within the election unit licensed under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightclub; and sports entertainment facility licenses.

(2) The addition after an election under subsection (1) of this section of new territory to the election unit by annexation, disincorporation, or otherwise does not extend the prohibition against the sale of liquor under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightclub; and sports entertainment facility licenses to the new territory. Furthermore, the new territory is not: (a) Within the election unit in any subsequent election under subsection (1) of this section; or (b) subject to any prohibition adopted pursuant to any subsequent election under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Elections held under RCW 66.40.010, 66.40.020, 66.40.040, 66.40.100, 66.40.110, 66.40.120, and 66.40.140 are limited to the question of whether the sale of liquor by means other than under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightclub; and sports entertainment facility licenses is permitted within the election unit.

Sec. 48. RCW 66.40.140 and 2012 c 117 s 288 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever a majority of qualified voters voting upon said question in any such unit shall have voted "Against sale of liquor," the county auditor shall file with the ((liquor control)) board a certificate showing the result of the canvass at such election; and thereafter, except as hereinafter provided, it shall not be lawful for a liquor store to be operated therein nor for licensees to maintain and operate licensed premises therein except as hereinafter provided:

(1) As to any stores maintained by the board within any such unit at the time of such licensing, the board shall have a period of thirty days from and after the date of the canvass of the vote upon such election to continue operation of its store or stores therein.

(2) As to any premises licensed hereunder within any such unit at the time of such election, such licensee shall have a period of sixty days from and after the date of the canvass of the vote upon such election in which to discontinue operation of its store or stores therein.

(3) Nothing herein contained shall prevent any distillery, brewery, rectifying plant or winery or the licensed operators thereof from selling its manufactured product, manufactured within such unit, outside the boundaries thereof.

(4) Nothing herein contained shall prevent any person residing in any unit in which the sale of liquor shall have been forbidden by popular vote as herein provided, who is otherwise qualified to receive and hold a permit under this title, from lawfully purchasing without the unit and transporting into or receiving within the unit, liquor lawfully purchased by him or her outside the boundaries of such unit.

Sec. 49. RCW 66.44.290 and 2003 c 53 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person under the age of twenty-one years who purchases or attempts to purchase liquor shall be guilty of a violation of this title. This section does not apply to persons between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years who are participating in a controlled purchase program authorized by the ((liquor control)) board under rules adopted by the board. Violations occurring under a private, controlled purchase program authorized by the ((liquor control)) board may not be used for criminal or administrative prosecution.

(2) An employer who conducts an in-house controlled purchase program authorized under this section shall provide his or her employees a written description of the employer's in-house controlled purchase program. The written description must include notice of actions an employer may take as a consequence of an employee's failure to comply with company policies regarding the sale of alcohol during an in-house controlled purchase.

(3) An in-house controlled purchase program authorized under this section shall be for the purposes of employee training and employer self-compliance checks. An employer may not terminate an employee solely for a first-time failure to comply with company policies regarding the sale of alcohol during an in-house controlled purchase program authorized under this section.

(4) Every person between the ages of eighteen and twenty, inclusive, who is convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring community restitution shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of community restitution.

Sec. 50. RCW 66.44.292 and 2012 c 117 s 292 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((Washington state liquor control)) board shall furnish notification of any hearing or hearings held, wherein any licensee or his or her employee is found to have sold liquor to a minor, to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the sale took place, upon which the prosecuting attorney may formulate charges against said minor or minors for such violation of RCW 66.44.290 as may appear.

Sec. 51. RCW 66.44.310 and 2007 c 370 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided by RCW 66.44.316, 66.44.350, and 66.24.590, it shall be a misdemeanor:

(a) To serve or allow to remain in any area classified by the board as off-limits to any person under the age of twenty-one years;

(b) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to enter or remain in any area classified as off-limits to such a person, but persons under twenty-one years of age may pass through a restricted area in a facility holding a spirits, beer, and wine private club license;

(c) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to represent his or her age as being twenty-one or more years for the purpose of purchasing liquor or securing admission to, or remaining in any area classified by the board as off-limits to such a person.

(2) The ((Washington state liquor control)) board shall have the power and it shall be its duty to classify licensed premises or portions of licensed premises as off-limits to persons under the age of twenty-one years of age.

Sec. 52. RCW 66.44.350 and 2016 c 235 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding provisions of RCW 66.44.310, employees of businesses holding beer and/or wine restaurant; beer and/or wine private club; snack bar; spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; catering; and sports entertainment facility licenses who are between eighteen and twenty-one years of age may take orders for, serve, and sell liquor in any part of the licensed premises except cocktail lounges, bars, or other areas classified by the ((Washington state liquor and cannabis)) board as off-limits to persons under twenty-one years of age((: PROVIDED, That)). Such employees may enter such restricted areas to perform work assignments including picking up liquor for service in other parts of the licensed premises, performing clean up work, setting up and arranging tables, delivering supplies, delivering messages, serving food, and seating patrons((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Such employees must remain in the areas off-limits to minors no longer than is necessary to carry out their aforementioned duties((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such employees))and are not ((be)) permitted (([are not permitted])) to perform activities or functions of a bartender.

Sec. 53. RCW 67.70.070 and 2012 c 117 s 308 are each amended to read as follows:

No license as an agent to sell lottery tickets or shares may be issued to any person to engage in business exclusively as a lottery sales agent. Before issuing a license, the director shall consider such factors as: (1) The financial responsibility and security of the person and his or her business or activity, (2) the accessibility of his or her place of business or activity to the public, (3) the sufficiency of existing licenses to serve the public convenience, and (4) the volume of expected sales.

For purposes of this section, the term "person" means an individual, association, corporation, club, trust, estate, society, company, joint stock company, receiver, trustee, assignee, referee, or any other person acting in a fiduciary or representative capacity, whether appointed by a court or otherwise, and any combination of individuals. "Person" does not mean any department, commission, agency, or instrumentality of the state, or any county or municipality or any agency or instrumentality thereof, except for retail outlets of the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

Sec. 54. RCW 69.07.210 and 2017 c 138 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of agriculture, ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, and department of revenue shall take the necessary steps to ensure that RCW 69.07.200 is implemented on its effective date.

Sec. 55. RCW 69.50.101 and 2018 c 132 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or

(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.

(c) "CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(d) "CBD product" means any product containing or consisting of cannabidiol.

(e) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(f) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules, but does not include industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.120.010.

(g)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.

(2) The term does not include:

(i) a controlled substance;

(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, or chapter 69.77 RCW to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(h) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(i) "Department" means the department of health.

(j) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(k) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(l) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(m) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

(n) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(o) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(p) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

(q) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(r) "Immature plant or clone" means a plant or clone that has no flowers, is less than twelve inches in height, and is less than twelve inches in diameter.

(s) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.

(t) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (ff)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(u) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.

(v) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.

(w) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or

(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(x) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not include:

(1) The mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination; or

(2) Industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.120.010.

(y) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ten percent.

(z) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to process marijuana into marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, package and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana retailers.

(aa) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.

(bb) "Marijuana products" means useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products as defined in this section.

(cc) "Marijuana researcher" means a person licensed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to produce, process, and possess marijuana for the purposes of conducting research on marijuana and marijuana-derived drug products.

(dd) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.

(ee) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that contain marijuana or marijuana extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from marijuana as defined in subsection (x) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ten percent. The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include either useable marijuana or marijuana concentrates.

(ff) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6) Cocaine base.

(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).

(gg) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(hh) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

(ii) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(jj) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(kk) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

(ll) "Practitioner" means:

(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical quality assurance commission or equivalent and his or her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.

(mm) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(nn) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(oo) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(pp) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(qq) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board for the retail sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(rr) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(ss) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(tt) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.

(uu) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(vv) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term "useable marijuana" does not include either marijuana-infused products or marijuana concentrates.

(ww) "Board" means the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.

Sec. 56. RCW 69.50.325 and 2018 c 132 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a marijuana producer's license regulated by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board and subject to annual renewal. The licensee is authorized to produce: (a) Marijuana for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers; (b) immature plants or clones and seeds for sale to cooperatives as described under RCW 69.51A.250; and (c) immature plants or clones and seeds for sale to qualifying patients and designated providers as provided under RCW 69.51A.310. The production, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana producer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at which the marijuana producer intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana producer's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana producer's license shall be one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana producer intends to produce marijuana.

(2) There shall be a marijuana processor's license to process, package, and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and marijuana retailers, regulated by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board and subject to annual renewal. The processing, packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, and marijuana concentrates in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW and the rules adopted to implement and enforce these chapters, by a validly licensed marijuana processor, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana processor's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at which the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana processor's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana processor's license shall be one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana processor intends to process marijuana.

(3)(a) There shall be a marijuana retailer's license to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at retail in retail outlets, regulated by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board and subject to annual renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana retailer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana retailer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location of the retail outlet the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana retailer's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana retailer's license shall be one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana retailer intends to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(b) An individual retail licensee and all other persons or entities with a financial or other ownership interest in the business operating under the license are limited, in the aggregate, to holding a collective total of not more than five retail marijuana licenses.

(c)(i) A marijuana retailer's license is subject to forfeiture in accordance with rules adopted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board pursuant to this section.

(ii) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board shall adopt rules to establish a license forfeiture process for a licensed marijuana retailer that is not fully operational and open to the public within a specified period from the date of license issuance, as established by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, subject to the following restrictions:

(A) No marijuana retailer's license may be subject to forfeiture within the first nine months of license issuance; and

(B) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must require license forfeiture on or before twenty-four calendar months of license issuance if a marijuana retailer is not fully operational and open to the public, unless the board determines that circumstances out of the licensee's control are preventing the licensee from becoming fully operational and that, in the board's discretion, the circumstances warrant extending the forfeiture period beyond twenty-four calendar months.

(iii) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board has discretion in adopting rules under this subsection (3)(c).

(iv) This subsection (3)(c) applies to marijuana retailer's licenses issued before and after July 23, 2017. However, no license of a marijuana retailer that otherwise meets the conditions for license forfeiture established pursuant to this subsection (3)(c) may be subject to forfeiture within the first nine calendar months of July 23, 2017.

(v) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may not require license forfeiture if the licensee has been incapable of opening a fully operational retail marijuana business due to actions by the city, town, or county with jurisdiction over the licensee that include any of the following:

(A) The adoption of a ban or moratorium that prohibits the opening of a retail marijuana business; or

(B) The adoption of an ordinance or regulation related to zoning, business licensing, land use, or other regulatory measure that has the effect of preventing a licensee from receiving an occupancy permit from the jurisdiction or which otherwise prevents a licensed marijuana retailer from becoming operational.

Sec. 57. RCW 69.50.326 and 2018 c 132 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Licensed marijuana producers and licensed marijuana processors may use a CBD product as an additive for the purpose of enhancing the cannabidiol concentration of any product authorized for production, processing, and sale under this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, such CBD product additives must be lawfully produced by, or purchased from, a producer or processor licensed under this chapter.

(2) Subject to the requirements set forth in (a) and (b) of this subsection, and for the purpose of enhancing the cannabidiol concentration of any product authorized for production, processing, or sale under this chapter, licensed marijuana producers and licensed marijuana processors may use a CBD product obtained from a source not licensed under this chapter, provided the CBD product:

(a) Has a THC level of 0.3 percent or less on a dry weight basis; and

(b) Has been tested for contaminants and toxins by a testing laboratory accredited under this chapter and in accordance with testing standards established under this chapter and the applicable administrative rules.

(3) Subject to the requirements of this subsection (3), the ((liquor and cannabis)) board may enact rules necessary to implement the requirements of this section. Such rule making is limited to regulations pertaining to laboratory testing and product safety standards for those cannabidiol products used by licensed producers and processors in the manufacture of marijuana products marketed by licensed retailers under this chapter (( 69.50 RCW)). The purpose of such rule making must be to ensure the safety and purity of cannabidiol products used by marijuana producers and processors licensed under this chapter (( 69.50 RCW)) and incorporated into products sold by licensed recreational marijuana retailers. This rule-making authority does not include the authority to enact rules regarding either the production or processing practices of the industrial hemp industry or any cannabidiol products that are sold or marketed outside of the regulatory framework established under this chapter (( 69.50 RCW)).

Sec. 58. RCW 69.50.331 and 2017 c 317 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of considering any application for a license to produce, process, research, transport, or deliver marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products subject to the ((regulations established))rules adopted under RCW 69.50.385, or sell marijuana, or for the renewal of a license to produce, process, research, transport, or deliver marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products subject to the ((regulations established))rules adopted under RCW 69.50.385, or sell marijuana, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must conduct a comprehensive, fair, and impartial evaluation of the applications timely received.

(a) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, or renewal or denial thereof, of any license, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant including an administrative violation history record with the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board and a criminal history record information check. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW do not apply to these cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may, in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (7)(c) and (10) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to any staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting this authority must be adopted by rule.

(b) No license of any kind may be issued to:

(i) A person under the age of twenty-one years;

(ii) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not lawfully resided in the state for at least six months prior to applying to receive a license;

(iii) A partnership, employee cooperative, association, nonprofit corporation, or corporation unless formed under the laws of this state, and unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license as provided in this section; or

(iv) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee.

(2)(a) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may, in its discretion, subject to the provisions of RCW 69.50.334, suspend or cancel any license; and all protections of the licensee from criminal or civil sanctions under state law for producing, processing, researching, or selling marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products thereunder must be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license is automatic upon the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under rules ((and regulations the state liquor and cannabis))adopted by the board ((may adopt)).

(d) Witnesses must be allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board or a subpoena issued by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative law judge, compels obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to testify therein.

(3) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee must forthwith deliver up the license to the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board. Where the license has been suspended only, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must notify all other licensees in the county where the subject licensee has its premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and no other licensee or employee of another licensee may allow or cause any marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of the subject licensee.

(4) Every license issued under this chapter is subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this chapter or by rules adopted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to implement and enforce this chapter. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board in the issuance of an individual license must be listed on the face of the individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date.

(5) Every licensee must post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.

(6) No licensee may employ any person under the age of twenty-one years.

(7)(a) Before the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board issues a new or renewed license to an applicant it must give notice of the application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns, or to the tribal government if the application is for a license within Indian country, or to the port authority if the application for a license is located on property owned by a port authority.

(b) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee selected by it, the county legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, the tribal government, or port authority has the right to file with the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board within twenty days after the date of transmittal of the notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the new or renewed license is asked. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may extend the time period for submitting written objections upon request from the authority notified by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

(c) The written objections must include a statement of all facts upon which the objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request, and the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may in its discretion hold, a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If a hearing is held at the request of the applicant, ((state liquor and cannabis)) board representatives must present and defend the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.

(d) Upon the granting of a license under this title the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must send written notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may not issue a license for any premises within one thousand feet of the perimeter of the grounds of any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, public transit center, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older.

(b) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of premises within one thousand feet but not less than one hundred feet of the facilities described in (a) of this subsection, except elementary schools, secondary schools, and playgrounds, by enacting an ordinance authorizing such distance reduction, provided that such distance reduction will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's civil regulatory enforcement, criminal law enforcement interests, public safety, or public health.

(c) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of research premises allowed under RCW 69.50.372 within one thousand feet but not less than one hundred feet of the facilities described in (a) of this subsection by enacting an ordinance authorizing such distance reduction, provided that the ordinance will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's civil regulatory enforcement, criminal law enforcement, public safety, or public health.

(d) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may license premises located in compliance with the distance requirements set in an ordinance adopted under (b) or (c) of this subsection. Before issuing or renewing a research license for premises within one thousand feet but not less than one hundred feet of an elementary school, secondary school, or playground in compliance with an ordinance passed pursuant to (c) of this subsection, the board must ensure that the facility:

(i) Meets a security standard exceeding that which applies to marijuana producer, processor, or retailer licensees;

(ii) Is inaccessible to the public and no part of the operation of the facility is in view of the general public; and

(iii) Bears no advertising or signage indicating that it is a marijuana research facility.

(e) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may not issue a license for any premises within Indian country, as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151, including any fee patent lands within the exterior boundaries of a reservation, without the consent of the federally recognized tribe associated with the reservation or Indian country.

(9) A city, town, or county may adopt an ordinance prohibiting a marijuana producer or marijuana processor from operating or locating a business within areas zoned primarily for residential use or rural use with a minimum lot size of five acres or smaller.

(10) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of any license, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must give substantial weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises. "Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law enforcement upon arrest.

Sec. 59. RCW 69.50.334 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The action, order, or decision of the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board as to any denial of an application for the reissuance of a license to produce, process, or sell marijuana, or as to any revocation, suspension, or modification of any license to produce, process, or sell marijuana, or as to the administrative review of a notice of unpaid trust fund taxes under RCW 69.50.565, must be an adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) An opportunity for a hearing may be provided to an applicant for the reissuance of a license prior to the disposition of the application, and if no opportunity for a prior hearing is provided then an opportunity for a hearing to reconsider the application must be provided the applicant.

(3) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided to a licensee prior to a revocation or modification of any license and, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, prior to the suspension of any license.

(4) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided to any person issued a notice of unpaid trust fund taxes under RCW 69.50.565.

(5) No hearing may be required under this section until demanded by the applicant, licensee, or person issued a notice of unpaid trust fund taxes under RCW 69.50.565.

(6) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may summarily suspend a license for a period of up to one hundred eighty days without a prior hearing if it finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively require emergency action, and it incorporates a finding to that effect in its order. Proceedings for revocation or other action must be promptly instituted and determined. An administrative law judge may extend the summary suspension period for up to one calendar year from the first day of the initial summary suspension in the event the proceedings for revocation or other action cannot be completed during the initial one hundred eighty-day period due to actions by the licensee. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board's enforcement division shall complete a preliminary staff investigation of the violation before requesting an emergency suspension by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

Sec. 60. RCW 69.50.339 and 2013 c 3 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the ((state liquor control)) board approves, a license to produce, process, or sell marijuana may be transferred, without charge, to the surviving spouse or domestic partner of a deceased licensee if the license was issued in the names of one or both of the parties. For the purpose of considering the qualifications of the surviving party to receive a marijuana producer's, marijuana processor's, or marijuana retailer's license, the ((state liquor control)) board may require a criminal history record information check. The ((state liquor control)) board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The ((state liquor control)) board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation.

(2) The proposed sale of more than ten percent of the outstanding or issued stock of a corporation licensed under chapter 3, Laws of 2013, or any proposed change in the officers of such a corporation, must be reported to the ((state liquor control)) board, and ((state liquor control)) board approval must be obtained before the changes are made. A fee of seventy-five dollars will be charged for the processing of the change of stock ownership or corporate officers.

Sec. 61. RCW 69.50.342 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 according to their true intent or of supplying any deficiency therein, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may adopt rules not inconsistent with the spirit of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 as are deemed necessary or advisable. Without limiting the generality of the preceding sentence, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board ((is empowered to))may adopt rules regarding the following:

(a) The equipment and management of retail outlets and premises where marijuana is produced or processed, and inspection of the retail outlets and premises where marijuana is produced or processed;

(b) The books and records to be created and maintained by licensees, the reports to be made thereon to the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, and inspection of the books and records;

(c) Methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of sanitation; safe handling requirements; approved pesticides and pesticide testing requirements; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;

(d) Security requirements for retail outlets and premises where marijuana is produced or processed, and safety protocols for licensees and their employees;

(e) Screening, hiring, training, and supervising employees of licensees;

(f) Retail outlet locations and hours of operation;

(g) Labeling requirements and restrictions on advertisement of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, cannabis health and beauty aids, and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets;

(h) Forms to be used for purposes of this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW or the rules adopted to implement and enforce these chapters, the terms and conditions to be contained in licenses issued under this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW, and the qualifications for receiving a license issued under this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW, including a criminal history record information check. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may submit any criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation;

(i) Application, reinstatement, and renewal fees for licenses issued under this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW, and fees for anything done or permitted to be done under the rules adopted to implement and enforce this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW;

(j) The manner of giving and serving notices required by this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW or rules adopted to implement or enforce these chapters;

(k) Times and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees transport and deliver marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products within the state;

(l) Identification, seizure, confiscation, destruction, or donation to law enforcement for training purposes of all marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, sold, or offered for sale within this state which do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this chapter or chapter 69.51A RCW or the rules adopted to implement and enforce these chapters.

(2) Rules adopted on retail outlets holding medical marijuana endorsements must be adopted in coordination and consultation with the department.

Sec. 62. RCW 69.50.345 and 2018 c 43 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, subject to the provisions of this chapter, must adopt rules that establish the procedures and criteria necessary to implement the following:

(1) Licensing of marijuana producers, marijuana processors, and marijuana retailers, including prescribing forms and establishing application, reinstatement, and renewal fees.

(a) Application forms for marijuana producers must request the applicant to state whether the applicant intends to produce marijuana for sale by marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements and the amount of or percentage of canopy the applicant intends to commit to growing plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products sold to qualifying patients.

(b) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must reconsider and increase limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production on July 24, 2015, and increase the percentage of production space for those marijuana producers who intend to grow plants for marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements if the marijuana producer designates the increased production space to plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be sold to qualifying patients. If current marijuana producers do not use all the increased production space, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may reopen the license period for new marijuana producer license applicants but only to those marijuana producers who agree to grow plants for marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements. Priority in licensing must be given to marijuana producer license applicants who have an application pending on July 24, 2015, but who are not yet licensed and then to new marijuana producer license applicants. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(2) Determining, in consultation with the office of financial management, the maximum number of retail outlets that may be licensed in each county, taking into consideration:

(a) Population distribution;

(b) Security and safety issues;

(c) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(d) The number of retail outlets holding medical marijuana endorsements necessary to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must reconsider and increase the maximum number of retail outlets it established before July 24, 2015, and allow for a new license application period and a greater number of retail outlets to be permitted in order to accommodate the medical needs of qualifying patients and designated providers. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the maximum number of retail outlets needed to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(3) Determining the maximum quantity of marijuana a marijuana producer may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(4) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana processor may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(5) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana retailer may have on the premises of a retail outlet at any time without violating Washington state law;

(6) In making the determinations required by this section, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board shall take into consideration:

(a) Security and safety issues;

(b) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(c) Economies of scale, and their impact on licensees' ability to both comply with regulatory requirements and undercut illegal market prices;

(7) Determining the nature, form, and capacity of all containers to be used by licensees to contain marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, and their labeling requirements, to include but not be limited to:

(a) The business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number of the licensees that produced and processed the marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product;

(b) Lot numbers of the marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product;

(c) THC concentration and CBD concentration of the marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product;

(d) Medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use; and

(e) Language required by RCW 69.04.480;

(8) In consultation with the department of agriculture and the department, establishing classes of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products according to grade, condition, cannabinoid profile, THC concentration, CBD concentration, or other qualitative measurements deemed appropriate by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board;

(9) Establishing reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions and requirements regarding advertising of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, taking into consideration:

(a) Federal laws relating to marijuana that are applicable within Washington state;

(b) Minimizing exposure of people under twenty-one years of age to the advertising;

(c) The inclusion of medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use in the advertising; and

(d) Ensuring that retail outlets with medical marijuana endorsements may advertise themselves as medical retail outlets;

(10) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees shall transport and deliver marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products within the state;

(11) In consultation with the department and the department of agriculture, establishing accreditation requirements for testing laboratories used by licensees to demonstrate compliance with standards adopted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, and prescribing methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of sanitation; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;

(12) Specifying procedures for identifying, seizing, confiscating, destroying, and donating to law enforcement for training purposes all marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, labeled, or offered for sale in this state that do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this chapter or the rules of the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

Sec. 63. RCW 69.50.348 and 2013 c 3 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On a schedule determined by the ((state liquor control)) board, every licensed marijuana producer and processor must submit representative samples of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products produced or processed by the licensee to an independent, third-party testing laboratory meeting the accreditation requirements established by the ((state liquor control)) board, for inspection and testing to certify compliance with standards adopted by the ((state liquor control)) board. Any sample remaining after testing shall be destroyed by the laboratory or returned to the licensee.

(2) Licensees must submit the results of this inspection and testing to the ((state liquor control)) board on a form developed by the ((state liquor control)) board.

(3) If a representative sample inspected and tested under this section does not meet the applicable standards adopted by the ((state liquor control)) board, the entire lot from which the sample was taken must be destroyed.

Sec. 64. RCW 69.50.351 and 2013 c 3 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided by chapter 42.52 RCW, no member of the ((state liquor control)) board and no employee of the ((state liquor control)) board shall have any interest, directly or indirectly, in the producing, processing, or sale of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products, or derive any profit or remuneration from the sale of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products other than the salary or wages payable to him or her in respect of his or her office or position, and shall receive no gratuity from any person in connection with the business.

Sec. 65. RCW 69.50.354 and 2015 c 70 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

There may be licensed, in no greater number in each of the counties of the state than as the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board shall deem advisable, retail outlets established for the purpose of making marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products available for sale to adults aged twenty-one and over. Retail sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana retailer or retail outlet employee, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.

Sec. 66. RCW 69.50.357 and 2017 c 317 s 13 and 2017 c 131 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Retail outlets may not sell products or services other than marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or paraphernalia intended for the storage or use of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(b)(i) Retail outlets may receive lockable boxes, intended for the secure storage of marijuana products and paraphernalia, and related literature as a donation from another person or entity, that is not a marijuana producer, processor, or retailer, for donation to their customers.

(ii) Retail outlets may donate the lockable boxes and provide the related literature to any person eligible to purchase marijuana products under subsection (2) of this section. Retail outlets may not use the donation of lockable boxes or literature as an incentive or as a condition of a recipient's purchase of a marijuana product or paraphernalia.

(iii) Retail outlets may also purchase and sell lockable boxes, provided that the sales price is not less than the cost of acquisition.

(2) Licensed marijuana retailers may not employ persons under twenty-one years of age or allow persons under twenty-one years of age to enter or remain on the premises of a retail outlet. However, qualifying patients between eighteen and twenty-one years of age with a recognition card may enter and remain on the premises of a retail outlet holding a medical marijuana endorsement and may purchase products for their personal medical use. Qualifying patients who are under the age of eighteen with a recognition card and who accompany their designated providers may enter and remain on the premises of a retail outlet holding a medical marijuana endorsement, but may not purchase products for their personal medical use.

(3)(a) Licensed marijuana retailers must ensure that all employees are trained on the rules adopted to implement this chapter, identification of persons under the age of twenty-one, and other requirements adopted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to ensure that persons under the age of twenty-one are not permitted to enter or remain on the premises of a retail outlet.

(b) Licensed marijuana retailers with a medical marijuana endorsement must ensure that all employees are trained on the subjects required by (a) of this subsection as well as identification of authorizations and recognition cards. Employees must also be trained to permit qualifying patients who hold recognition cards and are between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one to enter the premises and purchase marijuana for their personal medical use and to permit qualifying patients who are under the age of eighteen with a recognition card to enter the premises if accompanied by their designated providers.

(4) Except for the purposes of disposal as authorized by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, no licensed marijuana retailer or employee of a retail outlet may open or consume, or allow to be opened or consumed, any marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product on the outlet premises.

(5) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must fine a licensee one thousand dollars for each violation of any subsection of this section. Fines collected under this section must be deposited into the dedicated marijuana account created under RCW 69.50.530.

Sec. 67. RCW 69.50.360 and 2015 c 207 s 6 and 2015 c 70 s 13 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The following acts, when performed by a validly licensed marijuana retailer or employee of a validly licensed retail outlet in compliance with rules adopted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to implement and enforce chapter 3, Laws of 2013, do not constitute criminal or civil offenses under Washington state law:

(1) Purchase and receipt of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products that have been properly packaged and labeled from a marijuana processor validly licensed under this chapter;

(2) Possession of quantities of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products that do not exceed the maximum amounts established by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board under RCW 69.50.345(5);

(3) Delivery, distribution, and sale, on the premises of the retail outlet, of any combination of the following amounts of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product to any person twenty-one years of age or older:

(a) One ounce of useable marijuana;

(b) Sixteen ounces of marijuana-infused product in solid form;

(c) Seventy-two ounces of marijuana-infused product in liquid form; or

(d) Seven grams of marijuana concentrate; and

(4) Purchase and receipt of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products that have been properly packaged and labeled from a federally recognized Indian tribe as permitted under an agreement between the state and the tribe entered into under RCW 43.06.490.

Sec. 68. RCW 69.50.363 and 2015 c 207 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The following acts, when performed by a validly licensed marijuana processor or employee of a validly licensed marijuana processor in compliance with rules adopted by the ((state liquor control)) board to implement and enforce chapter 3, Laws of 2013, do not constitute criminal or civil offenses under Washington state law:

(1) Purchase and receipt of marijuana that has been properly packaged and labeled from a marijuana producer validly licensed under chapter 3, Laws of 2013;

(2) Possession, processing, packaging, and labeling of quantities of marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products that do not exceed the maximum amounts established by the ((state liquor control)) board under RCW 69.50.345(4);

(3) Delivery, distribution, and sale of useable marijuana or marijuana-infused products to a marijuana retailer validly licensed under chapter 3, Laws of 2013; and

(4) Delivery, distribution, and sale of useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products to a federally recognized Indian tribe as permitted under an agreement between the state and the tribe entered into under RCW 43.06.490.

Sec. 69. RCW 69.50.366 and 2017 c 317 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The following acts, when performed by a validly licensed marijuana producer or employee of a validly licensed marijuana producer in compliance with rules adopted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to implement and enforce this chapter, do not constitute criminal or civil offenses under Washington state law:

(1) Production or possession of quantities of marijuana that do not exceed the maximum amounts established by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board under RCW 69.50.345(3);

(2) Delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana to a marijuana processor or another marijuana producer validly licensed under this chapter;

(3) Delivery, distribution, and sale of immature plants or clones and marijuana seeds to a licensed marijuana researcher, and to receive or purchase immature plants or clones and seeds from a licensed marijuana researcher; and

(4) Delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana or useable marijuana to a federally recognized Indian tribe as permitted under an agreement between the state and the tribe entered into under RCW 43.06.490.

Sec. 70. RCW 69.50.369 and 2017 c 317 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No licensed marijuana producer, processor, researcher, or retailer may place or maintain, or cause to be placed or maintained, any sign or other advertisement for a marijuana business or marijuana product, including useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused product, in any form or through any medium whatsoever within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a school grounds, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older.

(2) Except for the use of billboards as authorized under this section, licensed marijuana retailers may not display any signage outside of the licensed premises, other than two signs identifying the retail outlet by the licensee's business or trade name, stating the location of the business, and identifying the nature of the business. Each sign must be no larger than one thousand six hundred square inches and be permanently affixed to a building or other structure. The location and content of the retail marijuana signs authorized under this subsection are subject to all other requirements and restrictions established in this section for indoor signs, outdoor signs, and other marijuana-related advertising methods.

(3) A marijuana licensee may not utilize transit advertisements for the purpose of advertising its business or product line. "Transit advertisements" means advertising on or within private or public vehicles and all advertisements placed at, on, or within any bus stop, taxi stand, transportation waiting area, train station, airport, or any similar transit-related location.

(4) A marijuana licensee may not engage in advertising or other marketing practice that specifically targets persons residing outside of the state of Washington.

(5) All signs, billboards, or other print advertising for marijuana businesses or marijuana products must contain text stating that marijuana products may be purchased or possessed only by persons twenty-one years of age or older.

(6) A marijuana licensee may not:

(a) Take any action, directly or indirectly, to target youth in the advertising, promotion, or marketing of marijuana and marijuana products, or take any action the primary purpose of which is to initiate, maintain, or increase the incidence of youth use of marijuana or marijuana products;

(b) Use objects such as toys or inflatables, movie or cartoon characters, or any other depiction or image likely to be appealing to youth, where such objects, images, or depictions indicate an intent to cause youth to become interested in the purchase or consumption of marijuana products; or

(c) Use or employ a commercial mascot outside of, and in proximity to, a licensed marijuana business. A "commercial mascot" means live human being, animal, or mechanical device used for attracting the attention of motorists and passersby so as to make them aware of marijuana products or the presence of a marijuana business. Commercial mascots include, but are not limited to, inflatable tube displays, persons in costume, or wearing, holding, or spinning a sign with a marijuana-related commercial message or image, where the intent is to draw attention to a marijuana business or its products.

(7) A marijuana licensee that engages in outdoor advertising is subject to the advertising requirements and restrictions set forth in this subsection (7) and elsewhere in this chapter.

(a) All outdoor advertising signs, including billboards, are limited to text that identifies the retail outlet by the licensee's business or trade name, states the location of the business, and identifies the type or nature of the business. Such signs may not contain any depictions of marijuana plants, marijuana products, or images that might be appealing to children. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board is granted rule-making authority to regulate the text and images that are permissible on outdoor advertising. Such rule making must be consistent with other administrative rules generally applicable to the advertising of marijuana businesses and products.

(b) Outdoor advertising is prohibited:

(i) On signs and placards in arenas, stadiums, shopping malls, fairs that receive state allocations, farmers markets, and video game arcades, whether any of the foregoing are open air or enclosed, but not including any such sign or placard located in an adult only facility; and

(ii) Billboards that are visible from any street, road, highway, right-of-way, or public parking area are prohibited, except as provided in (c) of this subsection.

(c) Licensed retail outlets may use a billboard or outdoor sign solely for the purpose of identifying the name of the business, the nature of the business, and providing the public with directional information to the licensed retail outlet. Billboard advertising is subject to the same requirements and restrictions as set forth in (a) of this subsection.

(d) Advertising signs within the premises of a retail marijuana business outlet that are visible to the public from outside the premises must meet the signage regulations and requirements applicable to outdoor signs as set forth in this section.

(e) The restrictions and regulations applicable to outdoor advertising under this section are not applicable to:

(i) An advertisement inside a licensed retail establishment that sells marijuana products that is not placed on the inside surface of a window facing outward; or

(ii) An outdoor advertisement at the site of an event to be held at an adult only facility that is placed at such site during the period the facility or enclosed area constitutes an adult only facility, but in no event more than fourteen days before the event, and that does not advertise any marijuana product other than by using a brand name to identify the event.

(8) Merchandising within a retail outlet is not advertising for the purposes of this section.

(9) This section does not apply to a noncommercial message.

(10)(a) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must:

(i) Adopt rules implementing this section and specifically including provisions regulating the billboards and outdoor signs authorized under this section; and

(ii) Fine a licensee one thousand dollars for each violation of this section until the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board adopts rules prescribing penalties for violations of this section. The rules must establish escalating penalties including fines and up to suspension or revocation of a marijuana license for subsequent violations.

(b) Fines collected under this subsection must be deposited into the dedicated marijuana account created under RCW 69.50.530.

(11) A city, town, or county may adopt rules of outdoor advertising by licensed marijuana retailers that are more restrictive than the advertising restrictions imposed under this chapter. Enforcement of restrictions to advertising by a city, town, or county is the responsibility of the city, town, or county.

Sec. 71. RCW 69.50.372 and 2017 c 317 s 3 and 2017 c 316 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A marijuana research license is established that permits a licensee to produce, process, and possess marijuana for the following limited research purposes:

(a) To test chemical potency and composition levels;

(b) To conduct clinical investigations of marijuana-derived drug products;

(c) To conduct research on the efficacy and safety of administering marijuana as part of medical treatment; and

(d) To conduct genomic or agricultural research.

(2) As part of the application process for a marijuana research license, an applicant must submit to the ((liquor and cannabis)) board's designated scientific reviewer a description of the research that is intended to be conducted. The ((liquor and cannabis)) board must select a scientific reviewer to review an applicant's research project and determine that it meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, as well as assess the following:

(a) Project quality, study design, value, or impact;

(b) Whether applicants have the appropriate personnel, expertise, facilities/infrastructure, funding, and human/animal/other federal approvals in place to successfully conduct the project; and

(c) Whether the amount of marijuana to be grown by the applicant is consistent with the project's scope and goals.

If the scientific reviewer determines that the research project does not meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the application must be denied.

(3) A marijuana research licensee may only sell marijuana grown or within its operation to other marijuana research licensees. The ((liquor and cannabis)) board may revoke a marijuana research license for violations of this subsection.

(4) A marijuana research licensee may contract with the University of Washington or Washington State University to perform research in conjunction with the university. All research projects, not including those projects conducted pursuant to a contract entered into under RCW 28B.20.502(3), must be approved by the scientific reviewer and meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

(5) In establishing a marijuana research license, the ((liquor and cannabis)) board may adopt rules on the following:

(a) Application requirements;

(b) Marijuana research license renewal requirements, including whether additional research projects may be added or considered;

(c) Conditions for license revocation;

(d) Security measures to ensure marijuana is not diverted to purposes other than research;

(e) Amount of plants, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products a licensee may have on its premises;

(f) Licensee reporting requirements;

(g) Conditions under which marijuana grown by licensed marijuana producers and other product types from licensed marijuana processors may be donated to marijuana research licensees; and

(h) Additional requirements deemed necessary by the ((liquor and cannabis)) board.

(6) The production, processing, possession, delivery, donation, and sale of marijuana, including immature plants or clones and seeds, in accordance with this section, RCW 69.50.366(3), and the rules adopted to implement and enforce this section and RCW 69.50.366(3), by a validly licensed marijuana researcher, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana research license must be issued in the name of the applicant, must specify the location at which the marijuana researcher intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof may not allow any other person to use the license.

(7) The application fee for a marijuana research license is two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana research license is one thousand three hundred dollars. The applicant must pay the cost of the review process directly to the scientific reviewer as designated by the ((liquor and cannabis)) board.

(8) The scientific reviewer shall review any reports made by marijuana research licensees under ((liquor and cannabis)) board rule and provide the ((liquor and cannabis)) board with its determination on whether the research project continues to meet research qualifications under this section.

(9) For the purposes of this section, "scientific reviewer" means an organization that convenes or contracts with persons who have the training and experience in research practice and research methodology to determine whether a project meets the criteria for a marijuana research license under this section and to review any reports submitted by marijuana research licensees under ((liquor and cannabis)) board rule. "Scientific reviewers" include, but are not limited to, educational institutions, research institutions, peer review bodies, or such other organizations that are focused on science or research in its day-to-day activities.

Sec. 72. RCW 69.50.375 and 2015 c 70 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A medical marijuana endorsement to a marijuana retail license is hereby established to permit a marijuana retailer to sell marijuana for medical use to qualifying patients and designated providers. This endorsement also permits such retailers to provide marijuana at no charge, at their discretion, to qualifying patients and designated providers.

(2) An applicant may apply for a medical marijuana endorsement concurrently with an application for a marijuana retail license.

(3) To be issued an endorsement, a marijuana retailer must:

(a) Not authorize the medical use of marijuana for qualifying patients at the retail outlet or permit health care professionals to authorize the medical use of marijuana for qualifying patients at the retail outlet;

(b) Carry marijuana concentrates and marijuana-infused products identified by the department under subsection (4) of this section;

(c) Not use labels or market marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products in a way that make them intentionally attractive to minors;

(d) Demonstrate the ability to enter qualifying patients and designated providers in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230 and issue recognition cards and agree to enter qualifying patients and designated providers into the database and issue recognition cards in compliance with department standards;

(e) Keep copies of the qualifying patient's or designated provider's recognition card, or keep equivalent records as required by rule of the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board or the department of revenue to document the validity of tax exempt sales; and

(f) Meet other requirements as adopted by rule of the department or the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

(4) The department, in conjunction with the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, must adopt rules on requirements for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products that may be sold, or provided at no charge, to qualifying patients or designated providers at a retail outlet holding a medical marijuana endorsement. These rules must include:

(a) THC concentration, CBD concentration, or low THC, high CBD ratios appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products sold to qualifying patients or designated providers;

(b) Labeling requirements including that the labels attached to marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products contain THC concentration, CBD concentration, and THC to CBD ratios;

(c) Other product requirements, including any additional mold, fungus, or pesticide testing requirements, or limitations to the types of solvents that may be used in marijuana processing that the department deems necessary to address the medical needs of qualifying patients;

(d) Safe handling requirements for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products; and

(e) Training requirements for employees.

(5) A marijuana retailer holding an endorsement to sell marijuana to qualifying patients or designated providers must train its employees on:

(a) Procedures regarding the recognition of valid authorizations and the use of equipment to enter qualifying patients and designated providers into the medical marijuana authorization database;

(b) Recognition of valid recognition cards; and

(c) Recognition of strains, varieties, THC concentration, CBD concentration, and THC to CBD ratios of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, available for sale when assisting qualifying patients and designated providers at the retail outlet.

Sec. 73. RCW 69.50.380 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Marijuana producers, processors, and retailers are prohibited from making sales of any marijuana or marijuana product, if the sale of the marijuana or marijuana product is conditioned upon the buyer's purchase of any service or nonmarijuana product. This subsection applies whether the buyer purchases such service or nonmarijuana product at the time of sale of the marijuana or marijuana product, or in a separate transaction.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Marijuana product" means "useable marijuana," "marijuana concentrates," and "marijuana-infused products," as those terms are defined in RCW 69.50.101.

(b) "Nonmarijuana product" includes paraphernalia, promotional items, lighters, bags, boxes, containers, and such other items as may be identified by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

(c) "Selling price" has the same meaning as in RCW 69.50.535.

(d) "Service" includes memberships and any other services identified by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

Sec. 74. RCW 69.50.382 and 2017 c 317 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A licensed marijuana producer, marijuana processor, marijuana researcher, or marijuana retailer, or their employees, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and the administrative rules adopted thereunder, may use the services of a common carrier subject to regulation under chapters 81.28 and 81.29 RCW and licensed in compliance with the regulations established under RCW 69.50.385, to physically transport or deliver, as authorized under this chapter, marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, immature plants or clones, marijuana seeds, and marijuana-infused products between licensed marijuana businesses located within the state.

(2) An employee of a common carrier engaged in marijuana-related transportation or delivery services authorized under subsection (1) of this section is prohibited from carrying or using a firearm during the course of providing such services, unless:

(a) Pursuant to RCW 69.50.385, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board explicitly authorizes the carrying or use of firearms by such employee while engaged in the transportation or delivery services;

(b) The employee has an armed private security guard license issued pursuant to RCW 18.170.040; and

(c) The employee is in full compliance with the ((regulations))rules established by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board under RCW 69.50.385.

(3) A common carrier licensed under RCW 69.50.385 may, for the purpose of transporting and delivering marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products, utilize Washington state ferry routes for such transportation and delivery.

(4) The possession of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products being physically transported or delivered within the state, in amounts not exceeding those that may be established under RCW 69.50.385(3), by a licensed employee of a common carrier when performing the duties authorized under, and in accordance with, this section and RCW 69.50.385, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

Sec. 75. RCW 69.50.385 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must adopt rules providing for an annual licensing procedure of a common carrier who seeks to transport or deliver marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products within the state.

(2) The rules for licensing must:

(a) Establish criteria for considering the approval or denial of a common carrier's original application or renewal application;

(b) Provide minimum qualifications for any employee authorized to drive or operate the transportation or delivery vehicle, including a minimum age of at least twenty-one years;

(c) Address the safety of the employees transporting or delivering the products, including issues relating to the carrying of firearms by such employees;

(d) Address the security of the products being transported, including a system of electronically tracking all products at both the point of pickup and the point of delivery; and

(e) Set reasonable fees for the application and licensing process.

(3) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may adopt rules establishing the maximum amounts of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products that may be physically transported or delivered at one time by a common carrier as provided under RCW 69.50.382.

Sec. 76. RCW 69.50.390 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A retailer licensed under this chapter is prohibited from operating a vending machine, as defined in RCW 82.08.080(3) for the sale of marijuana products at retail or a drive-through purchase facility where marijuana products are sold at retail and dispensed through a window or door to a purchaser who is either in or on a motor vehicle or otherwise located outside of the licensed premises at the time of sale.

(2) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may not issue, transfer, or renew a marijuana retail license for any licensee in violation of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 77. RCW 69.50.395 and 2017 c 317 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A licensed marijuana business may enter into a licensing agreement, or consulting contract, with any individual, partnership, employee cooperative, association, nonprofit corporation, or corporation, for:

(a) Any goods or services that are registered as a trademark under federal law or under chapter 19.77 RCW;

(b) Any unregistered trademark, trade name, or trade dress; or

(c) Any trade secret, technology, or proprietary information used to manufacture a cannabis product or used to provide a service related to a marijuana business.

(2) All agreements or contracts entered into by a licensed marijuana business, as authorized under this section, must be disclosed to the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

Sec. 78. RCW 69.50.450 and 2015 c 70 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this chapter permits anyone other than a validly licensed marijuana processor to use butane or other explosive gases to extract or separate resin from marijuana or to produce or process any form of marijuana concentrates or marijuana-infused products that include marijuana concentrates not purchased from a validly licensed marijuana retailer as an ingredient. The extraction or separation of resin from marijuana, the processing of marijuana concentrates, and the processing of marijuana-infused products that include marijuana concentrates not purchased from a validly licensed marijuana retailer as an ingredient by any person other than a validly licensed marijuana processor each constitute manufacture of marijuana in violation of RCW 69.50.401. Cooking oil, butter, and other nonexplosive home cooking substances may be used to make marijuana extracts for noncommercial personal use.

(2) Except for the use of butane, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may not enforce this section until it has adopted the rules required by RCW 69.51A.270.

Sec. 79. RCW 69.50.500 and 2013 c 3 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(a) It is hereby made the duty of the ((state board of)) pharmacy quality assurance commission, the department, the ((state liquor control)) board, and their officers, agents, inspectors and representatives, and all law enforcement officers within the state, and of all prosecuting attorneys, to enforce all provisions of this chapter, except those specifically delegated, and to cooperate with all agencies charged with the enforcement of the laws of the United States, of this state, and all other states, relating to controlled substances as defined in this chapter.

(b) Employees of the department of health, who are so designated by the ((board))commission as enforcement officers are declared to be peace officers and shall be vested with police powers to enforce the drug laws of this state, including this chapter.

Sec. 80. RCW 69.50.530 and 2018 c 299 s 909 are each amended to read as follows:

The dedicated marijuana account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, or any employee thereof, from marijuana-related activities must be deposited in the account. Unless otherwise provided in chapter 4, Laws of 2015 2nd sp. sess., all marijuana excise taxes collected from sales of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products under RCW 69.50.535, and the license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under this chapter from marijuana producer, marijuana processor, marijuana researcher, and marijuana retailer licenses, must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation. During the 2015-2017 and 2017-2019 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the dedicated marijuana account to the basic health plan trust account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 81. RCW 69.50.535 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) There is levied and collected a marijuana excise tax equal to thirty-seven percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products. This tax is separate and in addition to general state and local sales and use taxes that apply to retail sales of tangible personal property, and is not part of the total retail price to which general state and local sales and use taxes apply. The tax must be separately itemized from the state and local retail sales tax on the sales receipt provided to the buyer.

(b) The tax levied in this section must be reflected in the price list or quoted shelf price in the licensed marijuana retail store and in any advertising that includes prices for all useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products.

(2) All revenues collected from the marijuana excise tax imposed under this section must be deposited each day in the dedicated marijuana account.

(3) The tax imposed in this section must be paid by the buyer to the seller. Each seller must collect from the buyer the full amount of the tax payable on each taxable sale. The tax collected as required by this section is deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid to the board. If any seller fails to collect the tax imposed in this section or, having collected the tax, fails to pay it as prescribed by the board, whether such failure is the result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control, the seller is, nevertheless, personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) (("Board" means the state liquor and cannabis board.

)) "Retail sale" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(((c)))(b) "Selling price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010, except that when product is sold under circumstances where the total amount of consideration paid for the product is not indicative of its true value, "selling price" means the true value of the product sold.

(((d)))(c) "Product" means marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(((e)))(d) "True value" means market value based on sales at comparable locations in this state of the same or similar product of like quality and character sold under comparable conditions of sale to comparable purchasers. However, in the absence of such sales of the same or similar product, true value means the value of the product sold as determined by all of the seller's direct and indirect costs attributable to the product.

(5)(a) The board must regularly review the tax level established under this section and make recommendations, in consultation with the department of revenue, to the legislature as appropriate regarding adjustments that would further the goal of discouraging use while undercutting illegal market prices.

(b) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must report, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature every two years. The report at a minimum must include the following:

(i) The specific recommendations required under (a) of this subsection;

(ii) A comparison of gross sales and tax collections prior to and after any marijuana tax change;

(iii) The increase or decrease in the volume of legal marijuana sold prior to and after any marijuana tax change;

(iv) Increases or decreases in the number of licensed marijuana producers, processors, and retailers;

(v) The number of illegal and noncompliant marijuana outlets the board requires to be closed;

(vi) Gross marijuana sales and tax collections in Oregon; and

(vii) The total amount of reported sales and use taxes exempted for qualifying patients. The department of revenue must provide the data of exempt amounts to the board.

(c) The board is not required to report to the legislature as required in (b) of this subsection after January 1, 2025.

(6) The legislature does not intend and does not authorize any person or entity to engage in activities or to conspire to engage in activities that would constitute per se violations of state and federal antitrust laws including, but not limited to, agreements among retailers as to the selling price of any goods sold.

Sec. 82. RCW 69.50.540 and 2018 c 299 s 910 and 2018 c 201 s 8014 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The legislature must annually appropriate moneys in the dedicated marijuana account created in RCW 69.50.530 as follows:

(1) For the purposes listed in this subsection (1), the legislature must appropriate to the respective agencies amounts sufficient to make the following expenditures on a quarterly basis:

(a) Beginning July 1, 2017, one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the health care authority to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and ((state liquor and cannabis)) board. The survey must be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2017, fifty thousand dollars to the health care authority for the purpose of contracting with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluation and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This appropriation ends after production of the final report required by RCW 69.50.550;

(c) Beginning July 1, 2017, five thousand dollars to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(d)(i) An amount not less than one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board for administration of this chapter as appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act;

(ii) Two million six hundred fifty-one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 2018 and three hundred fifty-one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 2019 to the health professions account established under RCW 43.70.320 for the development and administration of the marijuana authorization database by the department of health;

(iii) Two million eight hundred three thousand dollars for fiscal year 2019 to the Washington state patrol for a drug enforcement task force. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium; and

(iv) Ninety-eight thousand dollars for fiscal year 2019 to the department of ecology for research on accreditation of marijuana product testing laboratories.

(e) Twenty-three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars to the department of enterprise services provided solely for the state building code council established under RCW 19.27.070, to develop and adopt fire and building code provisions related to marijuana processing and extraction facilities. The distribution under this subsection (1)(e) is for fiscal year 2016 only;

(2) From the amounts in the dedicated marijuana account after appropriation of the amounts identified in subsection (1) of this section, the legislature must appropriate for the purposes listed in this subsection (2) as follows:

(a)(i) Up to fifteen percent to the health care authority for the development, implementation, maintenance, and evaluation of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle school and high school-age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation, mental health services for children and youth, and services for pregnant and parenting women; PROVIDED, That:

(A) Of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services, at least eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based or research-based programs and practices that produce objectively measurable results and, by September 1, 2020, are cost-beneficial; and

(B) Up to fifteen percent of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services may be directed to proven and tested practices, emerging best practices, or promising practices.

(ii) In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the director of the health care authority must consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute.

(iii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-seven million seven hundred eighty-six thousand dollars, and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-five million five hundred thirty-six thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(a);

(b)(i) Up to ten percent to the department of health for the following, subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection (2):

(A) Creation, implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana education and public health program that contains the following:

(I) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(II) A grants program for local health departments or other local community agencies that supports development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of marijuana use by youth; and

(III) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(B) The Washington poison control center; and

(C) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the funds appropriated under this subsection (2)(b) may be used for prevention activities that target youth and populations with a high incidence of tobacco use.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of seven million five hundred thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(b);

(c)(i) Up to six-tenths of one percent to the University of Washington and four-tenths of one percent to Washington State University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use, to include but not be limited to formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairment, and for the dissemination of such research.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of two hundred seven thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year, except for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one million twenty-one thousand dollars to the University of Washington. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one hundred thirty-eight thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, except for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, a minimum of six hundred eighty-one thousand dollars to Washington State University under this subsection (2)(c). It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium;

(d) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(e) Five percent to the Washington state health care authority to be expended exclusively through contracts with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(f)(i) Up to three-tenths of one percent to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, and each subsequent fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of five hundred eleven thousand dollars to the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection (2)(f); and

(g) At the end of each fiscal year, the treasurer must transfer any amounts in the dedicated marijuana account that are not appropriated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and this subsection (2) into the general fund, except as provided in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(i) Beginning in fiscal year 2018, if marijuana excise tax collections deposited into the general fund in the prior fiscal year exceed twenty-five million dollars, then each fiscal year the legislature must appropriate an amount equal to thirty percent of all marijuana excise taxes deposited into the general fund the prior fiscal year to the treasurer for distribution to counties, cities, and towns as follows:

(A) Thirty percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns where licensed marijuana retailers are physically located. Each jurisdiction must receive a share of the revenue distribution under this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A) based on the proportional share of the total revenues generated in the individual jurisdiction from the taxes collected under RCW 69.50.535, from licensed marijuana retailers physically located in each jurisdiction. For purposes of this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A), one hundred percent of the proportional amount attributed to a retailer physically located in a city or town must be distributed to the city or town.

(B) Seventy percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns ratably on a per capita basis. Counties must receive sixty percent of the distribution, which must be disbursed based on each county's total proportional population. Funds may only be distributed to jurisdictions that do not prohibit the siting of any state licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer.

(ii) Distribution amounts allocated to each county, city, and town must be distributed in four installments by the last day of each fiscal quarter.

(iii) By September 15th of each year, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must provide the state treasurer the annual distribution amount, if any, for each county and city as determined in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(iv) The total share of marijuana excise tax revenues distributed to counties and cities in (g)(i) of this subsection (2) may not exceed fifteen million dollars in fiscal years 2018 and 2019 and twenty million dollars per fiscal year thereafter. It is the intent of the legislature that the policy for the maximum distributions in the subsequent fiscal biennia will be no more than fifteen million dollars per fiscal year.

For the purposes of this section, "marijuana products" means "useable marijuana," "marijuana concentrates," and "marijuana-infused products" as those terms are defined in RCW 69.50.101.

Sec. 83. RCW 69.50.560 and 2015 c 70 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may conduct controlled purchase programs to determine whether:

(a) A marijuana retailer is unlawfully selling marijuana to persons under the age of twenty-one;

(b) A marijuana retailer holding a medical marijuana endorsement is selling to persons under the age of eighteen or selling to persons between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one who do not hold valid recognition cards;

(c) ((Until July 1, 2016, collective gardens under RCW 69.51A.085 are providing marijuana to persons under the age of twenty-one; or

)) A cooperative organized under RCW 69.51A.250 is permitting a person under the age of twenty-one to participate.

(2) Every person under the age of twenty-one years who purchases or attempts to purchase marijuana is guilty of a violation of this section. This section does not apply to:

(a) Persons between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one who hold valid recognition cards and purchase marijuana at a marijuana retail outlet holding a medical marijuana endorsement;

(b) Persons between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years who are participating in a controlled purchase program authorized by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board under rules adopted by the board. Violations occurring under a private, controlled purchase program authorized by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may not be used for criminal or administrative prosecution.

(3) A marijuana retailer who conducts an in-house controlled purchase program authorized under this section shall provide his or her employees a written description of the employer's in-house controlled purchase program. The written description must include notice of actions an employer may take as a consequence of an employee's failure to comply with company policies regarding the sale of marijuana during an in-house controlled purchase program.

(4) An in-house controlled purchase program authorized under this section shall be for the purposes of employee training and employer self-compliance checks. A marijuana retailer may not terminate an employee solely for a first-time failure to comply with company policies regarding the sale of marijuana during an in-house controlled purchase program authorized under this section.

(5) Every person between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one who is convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 84. RCW 69.50.565 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the board determines that a limited liability business entity has collected trust fund taxes and has failed to remit those taxes to the board and that business entity has been terminated, dissolved, or abandoned, or is insolvent, the board may pursue collection of the entity's unpaid trust fund taxes, including penalties on those taxes, against any or all of the responsible individuals. For purposes of this subsection, "insolvent" means the condition that results when the sum of the entity's debts exceeds the fair market value of its assets. The board may presume that an entity is insolvent if the entity refuses to disclose to the board the nature of its assets and liabilities.

(2)(a) For a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer, liability under this section applies regardless of fault or whether the individual was or should have been aware of the unpaid trust fund tax liability of the limited liability business entity.

(b) For any other responsible individual, liability under this section applies only if he or she willfully failed to pay or to cause to be paid to the board the trust fund taxes due from the limited liability business entity.

(3)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (3)(a), a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer is liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability accrued during the period that he or she was the chief executive or chief financial officer. However, if the responsible individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes to the board during any period of time that the person was not the chief executive or chief financial officer, that individual is also liable for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period that he or she had the duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the board but was not the chief executive or chief financial officer.

(b) All other responsible individuals are liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period he or she had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the board.

(4) Persons described in subsection (3)(b) of this section are exempt from liability under this section in situations where nonpayment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes was due to reasons beyond their control as determined by the board by rule.

(5) Any person having been issued a notice of unpaid trust fund taxes under this section is entitled to an administrative hearing under RCW 69.50.334 and any such rules the board may adopt.

(6) This section does not relieve the limited liability business entity of its trust fund tax liability or otherwise impair other tax collection remedies afforded by law.

(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) (("Board" means the state liquor and cannabis board.

)) "Chief executive" means: The president of a corporation or for other entities or organizations other than corporations or if the corporation does not have a president as one of its officers, the highest ranking executive manager or administrator in charge of the management of the company or organization.

(((c)))(b) "Chief financial officer" means: The treasurer of a corporation or for entities or organizations other than corporations or if a corporation does not have a treasurer as one of its officers, the highest senior manager who is responsible for overseeing the financial activities of the entire company or organization.

(((d)))(c) "Limited liability business entity" means a type of business entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity, or a business entity that is managed or owned in whole or in part by an entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity. Limited liability business entities include corporations, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts, general partnerships and joint ventures in which one or more of the partners or parties are also limited liability business entities, and limited partnerships in which one or more of the general partners are also limited liability business entities.

(((e)))(d) "Manager" has the same meaning as in RCW ((25.15.005))25.15.006.

(((f)))(e) "Member" has the same meaning as in RCW ((25.15.005))25.15.006, except that the term only includes members of member-managed limited liability companies.

(((g)))(f) "Officer" means any officer or assistant officer of a corporation, including the president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer.

(((h)))(g)(i) "Responsible individual" includes any current or former officer, manager, member, partner, or trustee of a limited liability business entity with unpaid trust fund tax liability.

(ii) "Responsible individual" also includes any current or former employee or other individual, but only if the individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's unpaid trust fund tax liability.

(iii) Whenever any taxpayer has one or more limited liability business entities as a member, manager, or partner, "responsible individual" also includes any current and former officers, members, or managers of the limited liability business entity or entities or of any other limited liability business entity involved directly in the management of the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection (7)(((h)(iii)))(g)(iii), "taxpayer" means a limited liability business entity with unpaid trust fund taxes.

(((i)))(h) "Trust fund taxes" means taxes collected from buyers and deemed held in trust under RCW 69.50.535.

(((j)))(i) "Willfully failed to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the failure was the result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary course of action.

Sec. 85. RCW 69.50.580 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Applicants for a marijuana producer's, marijuana processor's, marijuana researcher's or marijuana retailer's license under this chapter must display a sign provided by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board on the outside of the premises to be licensed notifying the public that the premises are subject to an application for such license. The sign must:

(a) Contain text with content sufficient to notify the public of the nature of the pending license application, the date of the application, the name of the applicant, and contact information for the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board;

(b) Be conspicuously displayed on, or immediately adjacent to, the premises subject to the application and in the location that is most likely to be seen by the public;

(c) Be of a size sufficient to ensure that it will be readily seen by the public; and

(d) Be posted within seven business days of the submission of the application to the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

(2) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must adopt such rules as are necessary for the implementation of this section, including rules pertaining to the size of the sign and the text thereon, the textual content of the sign, the fee for providing the sign, and any other requirements necessary to ensure that the sign provides adequate notice to the public.

(3)(a) A city, town, or county may adopt an ordinance requiring individual notice by an applicant for a marijuana producer's, marijuana processor's, marijuana researcher's, or marijuana retailer's license under this chapter, sixty days prior to issuance of the license, to any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, church, public park, public transit center, library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older, that is within one thousand feet of the perimeter of the grounds of the establishment seeking licensure. The notice must provide the contact information for the ((liquor and cannabis)) board where any of the owners or operators of these entities may submit comments or concerns about the proposed business location.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "church" means a building erected for and used exclusively for religious worship and schooling or other activity in connection therewith.

Sec. 86. RCW 69.50.585 and 2016 sp.s. c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a producer or processor from providing retailers branded promotional items which are of nominal value, singly or in the aggregate. Such items include but are not limited to: Lighters, postcards, pencils, matches, shirts, hats, visors, and other similar items. Branded promotional items:

(i) Must be used exclusively by the retailer or its employees in a manner consistent with its license;

(ii) Must bear imprinted advertising matter of the producer or processor only;

(iii) May be provided by a producer or processor only to retailers and their employees and may not be provided by or through retailers or their employees to retail customers; and

(iv) May not be targeted to youth, including any: (A) Statement, picture, or illustration that depicts a child or other person under legal age for consuming cannabis; (B) objects, such as toys or characters, suggesting the presence of a child, or any other depiction designed in any manner to be especially appealing to children or other persons under legal age to consume cannabis; (C) advertising designed in any manner that would be especially appealing to children or other persons under twenty-one years of age; or (D) advertising implying that the consumption of cannabis is fashionable or the accepted course of behavior for persons under twenty-one years of age.

(b) A producer or processor is not obligated to provide any such branded promotional items, and a retailer may not require a producer or processor to provide such branded promotional items as a condition for selling any cannabis to the retailer.

(c) Any producer, processor, or retailer or any other person asserting that the provision of branded promotional items as allowed in (a) of this subsection has resulted or is more likely than not to result in undue influence or an adverse impact on public health and safety, or is otherwise inconsistent with the criteria in (a) of this subsection may file a complaint with the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board. Upon receipt of a complaint the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may conduct such investigation as it deems appropriate in the circumstances. If the investigation reveals the provision of branded promotional items has resulted in or is more likely than not to result in undue influence or has resulted or is more likely than not to result in an adverse impact on public health and safety or is otherwise inconsistent with (a) of this subsection the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may issue an administrative violation notice to the producer, processor, or retailer. The recipient of the administrative violation notice may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) Nothing in this chapter prohibits:

(a) Producers or processors from listing on their internet web sites information related to retailers who sell or promote their products, including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and

(b) Retailers from listing on their internet web sites information related to producers or processors whose products those retailers sell or promote, including direct links to the producers or processors' web sites; or

(c) Producers, processors, and retailers from producing, jointly or together with regional, state, or local industry associations, brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which contain information regarding retail licensees, producers, processors, and their products.

(3) Nothing in this chapter prohibits the performance of personal services offered from time to time by a producer or processor to retailers when the personal services are (a) conducted at a licensed premises, and (b) intended to inform, educate, or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the manufacturer's products. The performance of personal services may include participation in events and the use of informational or educational activities at the premises of a retailer holding a license under this chapter. A producer or processor is not obligated to perform any such personal services, and a retail licensee may not require a producer or processor to conduct any personal service as a condition for selling cannabis to the retail licensee.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "nominal value" means a value of thirty dollars or less.

Sec. 87. RCW 69.51A.010 and 2015 c 70 s 17 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)(a) ((Until July 1, 2016, "authorization" means:

(i) A statement signed and dated by a qualifying patient's health care professional written on tamper-resistant paper, which states that, in the health care professional's professional opinion, the patient may benefit from the medical use of marijuana; and

(ii) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's license or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035.

)) "Authorization" means a form developed by the department that is completed and signed by a qualifying patient's health care professional and printed on tamper-resistant paper.

(((c)))(b) An authorization is not a prescription as defined in RCW 69.50.101.

(2) "CBD concentration" means the percent of cannabidiol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product.

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Designated provider" means a person who is twenty-one years of age or older and:

(a)(i) Is the parent or guardian of a qualifying patient who is under the age of eighteen and ((beginning July 1, 2016,)) holds a recognition card; or

(ii) Has been designated in writing by a qualifying patient to serve as the designated provider for that patient;

(b)(i) Has an authorization from the qualifying patient's health care professional; or

(ii) ((Beginning July 1, 2016:))

(A) Has been entered into the medical marijuana authorization database as being the designated provider to a qualifying patient; and

(B) Has been provided a recognition card;

(c) Is prohibited from consuming marijuana obtained for the personal, medical use of the qualifying patient for whom the individual is acting as designated provider;

(d) Provides marijuana to only the qualifying patient that has designated him or her;

(e) Is in compliance with the terms and conditions of this chapter; and

(f) Is the designated provider to only one patient at any one time.

(5) "Health care professional," for purposes of this chapter only, means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, an osteopathic physicians' assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.

(6) "Housing unit" means a house, an apartment, a mobile home, a group of rooms, or a single room that is occupied as separate living quarters, in which the occupants live and eat separately from any other persons in the building, and which have direct access from the outside of the building or through a common hall.

(7) "Low THC, high CBD" means products determined by the department to have a low THC, high CBD ratio under RCW 69.50.375. Low THC, high CBD products must be inhalable, ingestible, or absorbable.

(8) "Marijuana" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(9) "Marijuana concentrates" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(10) "Marijuana processor" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(11) "Marijuana producer" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(12) "Marijuana retailer" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(13) "Marijuana retailer with a medical marijuana endorsement" means a marijuana retailer that has been issued a medical marijuana endorsement by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board pursuant to RCW 69.50.375.

(14) "Marijuana-infused products" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(15) "Medical marijuana authorization database" means the secure and confidential database established in RCW 69.51A.230.

(16) "Medical use of marijuana" means the manufacture, production, possession, transportation, delivery, ingestion, application, or administration of marijuana for the exclusive benefit of a qualifying patient in the treatment of his or her terminal or debilitating medical condition.

(17) "Plant" means a marijuana plant having at least three distinguishable and distinct leaves, each leaf being at least three centimeters in diameter, and a readily observable root formation consisting of at least two separate and distinct roots, each being at least two centimeters in length. Multiple stalks emanating from the same root ball or root system is considered part of the same single plant.

(18) "Public place" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.160.020.

(19) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:

(a)(i) Is a patient of a health care professional;

(ii) Has been diagnosed by that health care professional as having a terminal or debilitating medical condition;

(iii) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of such diagnosis;

(iv) Has been advised by that health care professional about the risks and benefits of the medical use of marijuana;

(v) Has been advised by that health care professional that they may benefit from the medical use of marijuana;

(vi)(A) Has an authorization from his or her health care professional; or

(B) ((Beginning July 1, 2016,))Has been entered into the medical marijuana authorization database and has been provided a recognition card; and

(vii) Is otherwise in compliance with the terms and conditions established in this chapter.

(b) "Qualifying patient" does not include a person who is actively being supervised for a criminal conviction by a corrections agency or department that has determined that the terms of this chapter are inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision and all related processes and procedures related to that supervision.

(20) "Recognition card" means a card issued to qualifying patients and designated providers by a marijuana retailer with a medical marijuana endorsement that has entered them into the medical marijuana authorization database.

(21) "Retail outlet" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(22) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(23) "Tamper-resistant paper" means paper that meets one or more of the following industry-recognized features:

(a) One or more features designed to prevent copying of the paper;

(b) One or more features designed to prevent the erasure or modification of information on the paper; or

(c) One or more features designed to prevent the use of counterfeit authorization.

(24) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means a condition severe enough to significantly interfere with the patient's activities of daily living and ability to function, which can be objectively assessed and evaluated and limited to the following:

(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis, epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders;

(b) Intractable pain, limited for the purpose of this chapter to mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications;

(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic, limited for the purpose of this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by standard treatments and medications;

(d) Crohn's disease with debilitating symptoms unrelieved by standard treatments or medications;

(e) Hepatitis C with debilitating nausea or intractable pain unrelieved by standard treatments or medications;

(f) Diseases, including anorexia, which result in nausea, vomiting, wasting, appetite loss, cramping, seizures, muscle spasms, or spasticity, when these symptoms are unrelieved by standard treatments or medications;

(g) Posttraumatic stress disorder; or

(h) Traumatic brain injury.

(25) "THC concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(26) "Useable marijuana" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(27) "Board" means the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.

Sec. 88. RCW 69.51A.230 and 2015 c 70 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department must contract with an entity to create, administer, and maintain a secure and confidential medical marijuana authorization database that((, beginning July 1, 2016,)) allows:

(a) A marijuana retailer with a medical marijuana endorsement to add a qualifying patient or designated provider and include the amount of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or plants for which the qualifying patient is authorized under RCW 69.51A.210;

(b) Persons authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled substances to access health care information on their patients for the purpose of providing medical or pharmaceutical care for their patients;

(c) A qualifying patient or designated provider to request and receive his or her own health care information or information on any person or entity that has queried their name or information;

(d) Appropriate local, state, tribal, and federal law enforcement or prosecutorial officials who are engaged in a bona fide specific investigation of suspected marijuana-related activity that may be illegal under Washington state law to confirm the validity of the recognition card of a qualifying patient or designated provider;

(e) A marijuana retailer holding a medical marijuana endorsement to confirm the validity of the recognition card of a qualifying patient or designated provider;

(f) The department of revenue to verify tax exemptions under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW;

(g) The department and the health care professional's disciplining authorities to monitor authorizations and ensure compliance with this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW by their licensees; and

(h) Authorizations to expire six months or one year after entry into the medical marijuana authorization database, depending on whether the authorization is for a minor or an adult.

(2) A qualifying patient and his or her designated provider, if any, may be placed in the medical marijuana authorization database at a marijuana retailer with a medical marijuana endorsement. After a qualifying patient or designated provider is placed in the medical marijuana authorization database, he or she must be provided with a recognition card that contains identifiers required in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) The recognition card requirements must be developed by the department in rule and include:

(a) A randomly generated and unique identifying number;

(b) For designated providers, the unique identifying number of the qualifying patient whom the provider is assisting;

(c) A photograph of the qualifying patient's or designated provider's face taken by an employee of the marijuana retailer with a medical marijuana endorsement at the same time that the qualifying patient or designated provider is being placed in the medical marijuana authorization database in accordance with rules adopted by the department;

(d) The amount of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or plants for which the qualifying patient is authorized under RCW 69.51A.210;

(e) The effective date and expiration date of the recognition card;

(f) The name of the health care professional who authorized the qualifying patient or designated provider; and

(g) For the recognition card, additional security features as necessary to ensure its validity.

(4) For qualifying patients who are eighteen years of age or older and their designated providers, recognition cards are valid for one year from the date the health care professional issued the authorization. For qualifying patients who are under the age of eighteen and their designated providers, recognition cards are valid for six months from the date the health care professional issued the authorization. Qualifying patients may not be reentered into the medical marijuana authorization database until they have been reexamined by a health care professional and determined to meet the definition of qualifying patient. After reexamination, a marijuana retailer with a medical marijuana endorsement must reenter the qualifying patient or designated provider into the medical marijuana authorization database and a new recognition card will then be issued in accordance with department rules.

(5) If a recognition card is lost or stolen, a marijuana retailer with a medical marijuana endorsement, in conjunction with the database administrator, may issue a new card that will be valid for six months to one year if the patient is reexamined by a health care professional and determined to meet the definition of qualifying patient and depending on whether the patient is under the age of eighteen or eighteen years of age or older as provided in subsection (4) of this section. If a reexamination is not performed, the expiration date of the replacement recognition card must be the same as the lost or stolen recognition card.

(6) The database administrator must remove qualifying patients and designated providers from the medical marijuana authorization database upon expiration of the recognition card. Qualifying patients and designated providers may request to remove themselves from the medical marijuana authorization database before expiration of a recognition card and health care professionals may request to remove qualifying patients and designated providers from the medical marijuana authorization database if the patient or provider no longer qualifies for the medical use of marijuana. The database administrator must retain database records for at least five calendar years to permit the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board and the department of revenue to verify eligibility for tax exemptions.

(7) During development of the medical marijuana authorization database, the database administrator must consult with the department, stakeholders, and persons with relevant expertise to include, but not be limited to, qualifying patients, designated providers, health care professionals, state and local law enforcement agencies, and the University of Washington computer science and engineering security and privacy research lab or a certified cybersecurity firm, vendor, or service.

(8) The medical marijuana authorization database must meet the following requirements:

(a) Any personally identifiable information included in the database must be nonreversible, pursuant to definitions and standards set forth by the national institute of standards and technology;

(b) Any personally identifiable information included in the database must not be susceptible to linkage by use of data external to the database;

(c) The database must incorporate current best differential privacy practices, allowing for maximum accuracy of database queries while minimizing the chances of identifying the personally identifiable information included therein; and

(d) The database must be upgradable and updated in a timely fashion to keep current with state of the art privacy and security standards and practices.

(9)(a) Personally identifiable information of qualifying patients and designated providers included in the medical marijuana authorization database is confidential and exempt from public disclosure, inspection, or copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(b) Information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database may be released in aggregate form, with all personally ((identifying [identifiable]))identifiable information redacted, for the purpose of statistical analysis and oversight of agency performance and actions.

(c) Information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database shall not be shared with the federal government or its agents unless the particular (([qualifying]))qualifying patient or designated provider is convicted in state court for violating this chapter or chapter 69.50 RCW.

(10)(((a))) The department must charge a one dollar fee for each initial and renewal recognition card issued by a marijuana retailer with a medical marijuana endorsement. The marijuana retailer with a medical marijuana endorsement shall collect the fee from the qualifying patient or designated provider at the time that he or she is entered into the database and issued a recognition card. The department shall establish a schedule for marijuana retailers with a medical marijuana endorsement to remit the fees collected. Fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the health professions account created under RCW 43.70.320.

(((b) By November 1, 2016, the department shall report to the governor and the fiscal committees of both the house of representatives and the senate regarding the cost of implementation and administration of the medical marijuana authorization database. The report must specify amounts from the health professions account used to finance the establishment and administration of the medical marijuana authorization database as well as estimates of the continuing costs associated with operating the medical marijuana [authorization] database. The report must also provide initial enrollment figures in the medical marijuana authorization database and estimates of expected future enrollment.))

(11) If the database administrator fails to comply with this section, the department may cancel any contracts with the database administrator and contract with another database administrator to continue administration of the database. A database administrator who fails to comply with this section is subject to a fine of up to five thousand dollars in addition to any penalties established in the contract. Fines collected under this section must be deposited into the health professions account created under RCW 43.70.320.

(12) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 89. RCW 69.51A.250 and 2017 c 317 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Qualifying patients or designated providers may form a cooperative and share responsibility for acquiring and supplying the resources needed to produce and process marijuana only for the medical use of members of the cooperative. No more than four qualifying patients or designated providers may become members of a cooperative under this section and all members must hold valid recognition cards. All members of the cooperative must be at least twenty-one years old. The designated provider of a qualifying patient who is under twenty-one years old may be a member of a cooperative on the qualifying patient's behalf. All plants grown in the cooperative must be from an immature plant or clone purchased from a licensed marijuana producer as defined in RCW 69.50.101. Cooperatives may also purchase marijuana seeds from a licensed marijuana producer.

(2) Qualifying patients and designated providers who wish to form a cooperative must register the location with the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board and this is the only location where cooperative members may grow or process marijuana. This registration must include the names of all participating members and copies of each participant's recognition card. Only qualifying patients or designated providers registered with the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board in association with the location may participate in growing or receive useable marijuana or marijuana-infused products grown at that location.

(3) No cooperative may be located in any of the following areas:

(a) Within one mile of a marijuana retailer;

(b) Within the smaller of either:

(i) One thousand feet of the perimeter of the grounds of any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, public transit center, library, or any game arcade that admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older; or

(ii) The area restricted by ordinance, if the cooperative is located in a city, county, or town that has passed an ordinance pursuant to RCW 69.50.331(8); or

(c) Where prohibited by a city, town, or county zoning provision.

(4) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must deny the registration of any cooperative if the location does not comply with the requirements set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) If a qualifying patient or designated provider no longer participates in growing at the location, he or she must notify the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board within fifteen days of the date the qualifying patient or designated provider ceases participation. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must remove his or her name from connection to the cooperative. Additional qualifying patients or designated providers may not join the cooperative until sixty days have passed since the date on which the last qualifying patient or designated provider notifies the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board that he or she no longer participates in that cooperative.

(6) Qualifying patients or designated providers who participate in a cooperative under this section:

(a) May grow up to the total amount of plants for which each participating member is authorized on their recognition cards, up to a maximum of sixty plants. At the location, the qualifying patients or designated providers may possess the amount of useable marijuana that can be produced with the number of plants permitted under this subsection, but no more than seventy-two ounces;

(b) May only participate in one cooperative;

(c) May only grow plants in the cooperative and if he or she grows plants in the cooperative may not grow plants elsewhere;

(d) Must provide assistance in growing plants. A monetary contribution or donation is not to be considered assistance under this section. Participants must provide nonmonetary resources and labor in order to participate; and

(e) May not sell, donate, or otherwise provide marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to a person who is not participating under this section.

(7) The location of the cooperative must be the domicile of one of the participants. Only one cooperative may be located per property tax parcel. A copy of each participant's recognition card must be kept at the location at all times.

(8) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may adopt rules to implement this section including:

(a) Any security requirements necessary to ensure the safety of the cooperative and to reduce the risk of diversion from the cooperative;

(b) A seed to sale traceability model that is similar to the seed to sale traceability model used by licensees that will allow the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to track all marijuana grown in a cooperative.

(9) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board or law enforcement may inspect a cooperative registered under this section to ensure members are in compliance with this section. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must adopt rules on reasonable inspection hours and reasons for inspections.

Sec. 90. RCW 69.51A.270 and 2015 c 70 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Once the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board adopts rules under subsection (2) of this section, qualifying patients or designated providers may only extract or separate the resin from marijuana or produce or process any form of marijuana concentrates or marijuana-infused products in accordance with those standards.

(2) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must adopt rules permitting qualifying patients and designated providers to extract or separate the resin from marijuana using noncombustable methods. The rules must provide the noncombustible methods permitted and any restrictions on this practice.

Sec. 91. RCW 70.155.010 and 2009 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set forth in RCW 82.24.010 shall apply to this chapter. In addition, for the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the context:

(1) "Board" means the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

(2) "Internet" means any computer network, telephonic network, or other electronic network.

(3) "Minor" refers to an individual who is less than eighteen years old.

(4) "Sample" means a tobacco product distributed to members of the general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product promotion purposes.

(5) "Sampling" means the distribution of samples to members of the public.

(6) "Tobacco product" means a product that contains tobacco and is intended for human use, including any product defined in RCW 82.24.010(2) or 82.26.010(((1)))(21), except that for the purposes of RCW 70.155.140 only, "tobacco product" does not include cigars defined in RCW 82.26.010 as to which one thousand units weigh more than three pounds.

Sec. 92. RCW 70.155.020 and 1993 c 507 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A person who holds a license issued under RCW 82.24.520 or 82.24.530 shall:

(1) Display the license or a copy in a prominent location at the outlet for which the license is issued; and

(2) Display a sign concerning the prohibition of tobacco sales to minors.

Such sign shall:

(a) Be posted so that it is clearly visible to anyone purchasing tobacco products from the licensee;

(b) Be designed and produced by the department of health to read: "THE SALE OF TOBACCO PRODUCTS TO PERSONS UNDER AGE 18 IS STRICTLY PROHIBITED BY STATE LAW. IF YOU ARE UNDER 18, YOU COULD BE PENALIZED FOR PURCHASING A TOBACCO PRODUCT; PHOTO ID REQUIRED"; and

(c) Be provided free of charge by the ((liquor control)) board.

Sec. 93. RCW 70.155.080 and 2002 c 175 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person under the age of eighteen who purchases or attempts to purchase, possesses, or obtains or attempts to obtain cigarettes or tobacco products commits a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and is subject to a fine as set out in chapter 7.80 RCW or participation in up to four hours of community restitution, or both. The court may also require participation in a smoking cessation program. This provision does not apply if a person under the age of eighteen, with parental authorization, is participating in a controlled purchase as part of a ((liquor control)) board, law enforcement, or local health department activity.

(2) Municipal and district courts within the state have jurisdiction for enforcement of this section.

Sec. 94. RCW 70.155.090 and 2006 c 14 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Where there may be a question of a person's right to purchase or obtain tobacco products by reason of age, the retailer or agent thereof((,)) shall require the purchaser to present any one of the following officially issued identification that shows the purchaser's age and bears his or her signature and photograph: (a) Liquor control authority card of identification of a state or province of Canada; (b) driver's license, instruction permit, or identification card of a state or province of Canada; (c) "identicard" issued by the Washington state department of licensing under chapter 46.20 RCW; (d) United States military identification; (e) passport; (f) enrollment card, issued by the governing authority of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in Washington, that incorporates security features comparable to those implemented by the department of licensing for Washington drivers' licenses. At least ninety days prior to implementation of an enrollment card under this subsection, the appropriate tribal authority shall give notice to the board. The board shall publish and communicate to licensees regarding the implementation of each new enrollment card; or (g) merchant marine identification card issued by the United States coast guard.

(2) It is a defense to a prosecution under RCW 26.28.080 that the person making a sale reasonably relied on any of the officially issued identification as defined in subsection (1) of this section. The ((liquor control)) board shall waive the suspension or revocation of a license if the licensee clearly establishes that he or she acted in good faith to prevent violations and a violation occurred despite the licensee's exercise of due diligence.

Sec. 95. RCW 70.155.100 and 2016 sp.s. c 38 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((liquor and cannabis)) board may suspend or revoke a retailer's license issued under RCW 82.24.510(1)(b) or 82.26.150(1)(b) held by a business at any location, or may impose a monetary penalty as set forth in subsection (3) of this section, if the ((liquor and cannabis)) board finds that the licensee has violated RCW 26.28.080, 70.155.020, 70.155.030, 70.155.040, 70.155.050, 70.155.070, or 70.155.090.

(2) Any retailer's licenses issued under RCW 70.345.020 to a person whose license or licenses under chapter 82.24 or 82.26 RCW have been suspended or revoked for violating RCW 26.28.080 must also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or revocation under this section.

(3) The sanctions that the ((liquor and cannabis)) board may impose against a person licensed under RCW 82.24.530 or 82.26.170 based upon one or more findings under subsection (1) of this section may not exceed the following:

(a) For violations of RCW 26.28.080, 70.155.020, or 21 C.F.R. Sec. 1140.14, and for violations of RCW 70.155.040 occurring on the licensed premises:

(i) A monetary penalty of two hundred dollars for the first violation within any three-year period;

(ii) A monetary penalty of six hundred dollars for the second violation within any three-year period;

(iii) A monetary penalty of two thousand dollars and suspension of the license for a period of six months for the third violation within any three-year period;

(iv) A monetary penalty of three thousand dollars and suspension of the license for a period of twelve months for the fourth violation within any three-year period;

(v) Revocation of the license with no possibility of reinstatement for a period of five years for the fifth or more violation within any three-year period;

(b) If the board finds that a person licensed under chapter 82.24 or 82.26 RCW and RCW 70.345.020 has violated RCW 26.28.080, each subsequent violation of either of the person's licenses counts as an additional violation within that three-year period.

(c) For violations of RCW 70.155.030, a monetary penalty in the amount of one hundred dollars for each day upon which such violation occurred;

(d) For violations of RCW 70.155.050, a monetary penalty in the amount of six hundred dollars for each violation;

(e) For violations of RCW 70.155.070, a monetary penalty in the amount of two thousand dollars for each violation.

(4) The ((liquor and cannabis)) board may impose a monetary penalty upon any person other than a licensed cigarette or tobacco product retailer if the ((liquor and cannabis)) board finds that the person has violated RCW 26.28.080, 70.155.020, 70.155.030, 70.155.040, 70.155.050, 70.155.070, or 70.155.090.

(5) The monetary penalty that the ((liquor and cannabis)) board may impose based upon one or more findings under subsection (4) of this section may not exceed the following:

(a) For violation of RCW 26.28.080 or 70.155.020, one hundred dollars for the first violation and two hundred dollars for each subsequent violation;

(b) For violations of RCW 70.155.030, two hundred dollars for each day upon which such violation occurred;

(c) For violations of RCW 70.155.040, two hundred dollars for each violation;

(d) For violations of RCW 70.155.050, six hundred dollars for each violation;

(e) For violations of RCW 70.155.070, two thousand dollars for each violation.

(6) The ((liquor and cannabis)) board may develop and offer a class for retail clerks and use this class in lieu of a monetary penalty for the clerk's first violation.

(7) The ((liquor and cannabis)) board may issue a cease and desist order to any person who is found by the ((liquor and cannabis)) board to have violated or intending to violate the provisions of this chapter, RCW 26.28.080, 82.24.500, or 82.26.190 requiring such person to cease specified conduct that is in violation. The issuance of a cease and desist order does not preclude the imposition of other sanctions authorized by this statute or any other provision of law.

(8) The ((liquor and cannabis)) board may seek injunctive relief to enforce the provisions of RCW 26.28.080, 82.24.500, 82.26.190 or this chapter. The ((liquor and cannabis)) board may initiate legal action to collect civil penalties imposed under this chapter if the same have not been paid within thirty days after imposition of such penalties. In any action filed by the ((liquor and cannabis)) board under this chapter, the court may, in addition to any other relief, award the ((liquor and cannabis)) board reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

(9) All proceedings under subsections (1) through (7) of this section shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(10) The ((liquor and cannabis)) board may reduce or waive either the penalties or the suspension or revocation of a license, or both, as set forth in this chapter where the elements of proof are inadequate or where there are mitigating circumstances. Mitigating circumstances may include, but are not limited to, an exercise of due diligence by a retailer. Further, the board may exceed penalties set forth in this chapter based on aggravating circumstances.

Sec. 96. RCW 70.155.110 and 1993 c 507 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((liquor control)) board shall, in addition to the board's other powers and authorities, have the authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter and RCW 26.28.080(((4))) and 82.24.500. The ((liquor control)) board shall have full power to revoke or suspend the license of any retailer or wholesaler in accordance with the provisions of RCW 70.155.100.

(2) The ((liquor control)) board and the board's authorized agents or employees shall have full power and authority to enter any place of business where tobacco products are sold for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

(3) For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter and RCW 26.28.080(((4))) and 82.24.500, a peace officer or enforcement officer of the ((liquor control)) board who has reasonable grounds to believe a person observed by the officer purchasing, attempting to purchase, or in possession of tobacco products is under the age of eighteen years of age, may detain such person for a reasonable period of time and in such a reasonable manner as is necessary to determine the person's true identity and date of birth. Further, tobacco products possessed by persons under the age of eighteen years of age are considered contraband and may be seized by a peace officer or enforcement officer of the ((liquor control)) board.

(4) The ((liquor control)) board may work with local county health departments or districts and local law enforcement agencies to conduct random, unannounced, inspections to assure compliance.

Sec. 97. RCW 70.155.120 and 2016 sp.s. c 38 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The youth tobacco and vapor products prevention account is created in the state treasury. All fees collected pursuant to RCW 82.24.520, 82.24.530, 82.26.160, and 82.26.170 and funds collected by the ((liquor and cannabis)) board from the imposition of monetary penalties shall be deposited into this account, except that ten percent of all such fees and penalties shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(2) Moneys appropriated from the youth tobacco and vapor products prevention account to the department of health shall be used by the department of health for implementation of this chapter, including collection and reporting of data regarding enforcement and the extent to which access to tobacco products and vapor products by youth has been reduced.

(3) The department of health shall enter into interagency agreements with the ((liquor and cannabis)) board to pay the costs incurred, up to thirty percent of available funds, in carrying out its enforcement responsibilities under this chapter. Such agreements shall set forth standards of enforcement, consistent with the funding available, so as to reduce the extent to which tobacco products and vapor products are available to individuals under the age of eighteen. The agreements shall also set forth requirements for data reporting by the ((liquor and cannabis)) board regarding its enforcement activities.

(4) The department of health, the ((liquor and cannabis)) board, and the department of revenue shall enter into an interagency agreement for payment of the cost of administering the tobacco retailer licensing system and for the provision of quarterly documentation of tobacco wholesaler, retailer, and vending machine names and locations.

(5) The department of health shall, within up to seventy percent of available funds, provide grants to local health departments or other local community agencies to develop and implement coordinated tobacco and vapor product intervention strategies to prevent and reduce tobacco and vapor product use by youth.

Sec. 98. RCW 70.158.020 and 2003 c 25 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following definitions apply to this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Brand family" means all styles of cigarettes sold under the same trademark and differentiated from one another by means of additional modifiers or descriptors, including, but not limited to, "menthol," "lights," "kings," and "100s," and includes any brand name alone or in conjunction with any other word, trademark, logo, symbol, motto, selling message, recognizable pattern of colors, or any other indicia of product identification identical or similar to, or identifiable with, a previously known brand of cigarettes.

(2) "Board" means the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

(3) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.157.010(d).

(4) "Director" means the director of the department of revenue except as otherwise noted.

(5) "Directory" means the directory to be created and published on a web site by the attorney general pursuant to RCW 70.158.030(2).

(6) "Distributor" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.26.010(((3))), except that for purposes of this chapter, no person is a distributor if that person does not deal with cigarettes as defined in this section.

(7) "Master settlement agreement" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.157.010(e).

(8) "Nonparticipating manufacturer" means any tobacco product manufacturer that is not a participating manufacturer.

(9) "Participating manufacturer" has the meaning given that term in section II(jj) of the master settlement agreement.

(10) "Qualified escrow fund" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.157.010(f).

(11) "Stamp" means "stamp" as defined in RCW 82.24.010(((7))) or as referred to in RCW 43.06.455(4).

(12) "Tobacco product manufacturer" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.157.010(i).

(13) "Units sold" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.157.010(j).

(14) "Wholesaler" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.

Sec. 99. RCW 77.15.750 and 2011 c 320 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of a department permit if the person:

(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the department or the director; or

(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable to the requirement for, issuance of, or use of the permit.

(2)(a) Permits covered under subsection (1) of this section include, but are not limited to, master hunter permits, crab pot removal permits and shellfish pot removal permits under RCW 77.70.500, depredation permits, landowner hunting permits, commercial carp license permits, permits to possess or dispense beer or malt liquor pursuant to RCW 66.28.210, and permits to hold, sponsor, or attend an event requiring a banquet permit from the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

(b) Permits excluded from subsection (1) of this section include the discover pass created in RCW 79A.80.020, the vehicle access pass created in RCW 79A.80.040, the day-use permit created in RCW 79A.80.030, commercial use or activity permits, noncommercial use or activity permits, parking permits, experimental fishery permits, trial commercial fishery permits, and scientific collection permits.

(3) Unlawful use of a department permit is a misdemeanor.

(4) A person is guilty of unlawful use of an experimental fishery permit or a trial commercial fishery permit if the person:

(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the department or the director; or

(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable to the issuance or use of the permit.

(5) Unlawful use of an experimental fishery permit or a trial commercial fishery permit is a gross misdemeanor.

(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Experimental fishery permit" means a permit issued by the director for either:

(i) An "emerging commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a newly classified species for which the department has determined that there is a need to limit participation; or

(ii) An "expanding commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a previously classified species in a new area, by a new method, or at a new effort level, for which the department has determined that there is a need to limit participation.

(b) "Trial commercial fishery permit" means a permit issued by the department for trial harvest of a newly classified species or harvest of a previously classified species in a new area or by a new means.

Sec. 100. RCW 82.08.155 and 2012 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If the department determines that a taxpayer is more than thirty days delinquent in reporting or remitting spirits taxes on a tax return or assessed by the department, including any applicable penalties and interest on such taxes, the department may request that the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board suspend the taxpayer's spirits license or licenses and refuse to renew any existing spirits license held by the taxpayer or issue any new spirits license to the taxpayer. The department must provide written notice to the affected taxpayer of the department's request to the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

(b) Before the department may make a request to the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board as authorized in (a) of this subsection (1), the department must have provided the taxpayer with at least seven calendar days prior written notice. This notice must inform the taxpayer that the department intends to request that the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board suspend the taxpayer's spirits license or licenses and refuse to renew any existing license of the taxpayer or issue any new spirits license to the taxpayer unless, within seven calendar days of the date of the notice, the taxpayer submits any unfiled tax returns for reporting spirits taxes and remits full payment of its outstanding spirits tax liability to the department or negotiates payment arrangements for the unpaid spirits taxes. The notice required by this subsection (1)(b) must include information listing any unfiled tax returns; the amount of unpaid spirits taxes, including any applicable penalties and interest; who to contact to inquire about payment arrangements; and that the taxpayer may seek administrative review by the department of the notice, and the deadline for seeking such review. Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) requires the department to enter into any payment arrangement proposed by a taxpayer if the department determines that the taxpayer's proposal is not satisfactory.

(c) The department may not make a request to the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board under ((subsection (1)))(a) of this ((section))subsection relating to any spirits taxes that are the subject of pending administrative review by the department.

(2) A taxpayer's right to administrative review of the notice required in subsection (1)(b) of this section:

(a) May be conducted under any rule adopted pursuant to RCW 82.01.060(4) or as a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494; and

(b) Does not include the right to challenge the amount of any spirits taxes assessed by the department if the taxpayer previously sought or could have sought administrative review of the assessment as provided in RCW 82.32.160.

(3) The notices required by this section may be provided electronically in accordance with RCW 82.32.135.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Spirits license" has the same meaning as in RCW 66.24.010(3)(c); and

(b) "Spirits taxes" means the taxes imposed in RCW 82.08.150.

Sec. 101. RCW 82.24.010 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

(2) "Cigarette" means any roll for smoking made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of size or shape and irrespective of the tobacco being flavored, adulterated, or mixed with any other ingredient, where such roll has a wrapper or cover made of paper or any material, except where such wrapper is wholly or in the greater part made of natural leaf tobacco in its natural state. "Cigarette" includes a roll-your-own cigarette.

(3) "Cigarette paper" means any paper or any other material except tobacco, prepared for use as a cigarette wrapper.

(4) "Cigarette tube" means cigarette paper made into a hollow cylinder for use in making cigarettes.

(5) "Commercial cigarette-making machine" means a machine that is operated in a retail establishment and that is capable of being loaded with loose tobacco, cigarette paper or tubes, and any other components related to the production of roll-your-own cigarettes, including filters.

(6) "Indian tribal organization" means a federally recognized Indian tribe, or tribal entity, and includes an Indian wholesaler or retailer that is owned by an Indian who is an enrolled tribal member conducting business under tribal license or similar tribal approval within Indian country. For purposes of this chapter "Indian country" is defined in the manner set forth in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151.

(7) "Precollection obligation" means the obligation of a seller otherwise exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter to collect the tax from that seller's buyer.

(8) "Retailer" means every person, other than a wholesaler, who purchases, sells, offers for sale or distributes any one or more of the articles taxed herein, irrespective of quantity or amount, or the number of sales, and all persons operating under a retailer's registration certificate.

(9) "Retail selling price" means the ordinary, customary or usual price paid by the consumer for each package of cigarettes, less the tax levied by this chapter and less any similar tax levied by this state.

(10) "Roll-your-own cigarettes" means cigarettes produced by a commercial cigarette-making machine.

(11) "Stamp" means the stamp or stamps by use of which the tax levy under this chapter is paid or identification is made of those cigarettes with respect to which no tax is imposed.

(12) "Wholesaler" means every person who purchases, sells, or distributes any one or more of the articles taxed herein to retailers for the purpose of resale only.

(13) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the words "person," "sale," "business" and "successor" applies equally in this chapter.

Sec. 102. RCW 82.24.551 and 1997 c 420 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall appoint, as duly authorized agents, enforcement officers of the ((liquor control)) board to enforce provisions of this chapter. These officers shall not be considered employees of the department.

Sec. 103. RCW 82.26.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 22 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Actual price" means the total amount of consideration for which tobacco products are sold, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise, including any charges by the seller necessary to complete the sale such as charges for delivery, freight, transportation, or handling.

(2) "Affiliated" means related in any way by virtue of any form or amount of common ownership, control, operation, or management.

(3) "Board" means the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

(4) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing tobacco products in this state.

(5) "Cigar" means a roll for smoking that is of any size or shape and that is made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of whether the tobacco is pure or flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other ingredient, if the roll has a wrapper made wholly or in greater part of tobacco. "Cigar" does not include a cigarette.

(6) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.

(7) "Department" means the department of revenue.

(8) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products in this state who brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from without the state any tobacco products for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures, fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for sale in this state, (c) any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products without this state who ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state, to be sold by those retailers, (d) any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products in this state who handles for sale any tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not been imposed.

(9) "Indian country" means the same as defined in chapter 82.24 RCW.

(10) "Little cigar" means a cigar that has a cellulose acetate integrated filter.

(11) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells tobacco products.

(12) "Manufacturer's representative" means a person hired by a manufacturer to sell or distribute the manufacturer's tobacco products, and includes employees and independent contractors.

(13) "Moist snuff" means tobacco that is finely cut, ground, or powdered; is not for smoking; and is intended to be placed in the oral, but not the nasal, cavity.

(14) "Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator, executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company, business trust, municipal corporation, the state and its departments and institutions, political subdivision of the state of Washington, corporation, limited liability company, association, society, any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise. The term excludes any person immune from state taxation, including the United States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.

(15) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco products are sold or where tobacco products are manufactured, stored, or kept for the purpose of sale, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or vending machine.

(16) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco products are sold to consumers.

(17) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products to ultimate consumers.

(18)(a) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes and means all sales made by any person.

(b) The term "sale" includes a gift by a person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products, for advertising, promoting, or as a means of evading the provisions of this chapter.

(19)(a) "Taxable sales price" means:

(i) In the case of a taxpayer that is not affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the taxpayer purchased tobacco products, the actual price for which the taxpayer purchased the tobacco products;

(ii) In the case of a taxpayer that purchases tobacco products from an affiliated manufacturer, affiliated distributor, or other affiliated person, and that sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers, the actual price for which that taxpayer sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers;

(iii) In the case of a taxpayer that sells tobacco products only to affiliated distributors or affiliated retailers, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that other distributors sell similar tobacco products of like quality and character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers;

(iv) In the case of a taxpayer that is a manufacturer selling tobacco products directly to ultimate consumers, the actual price for which the taxpayer sells those tobacco products to ultimate consumers;

(v) In the case of a taxpayer that has acquired tobacco products under a sale as defined in subsection (18)(b) of this section, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers; or

(vi) In any case where (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection do not apply, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers.

(b) For purposes of (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection only, "person" includes both persons as defined in subsection (14) of this section and any person immune from state taxation, including the United States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.

(c) The department may adopt rules regarding the determination of taxable sales price under this subsection.

(20) "Taxpayer" means a person liable for the tax imposed by this chapter.

(21) "Tobacco products" means cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques, granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings and sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds and forms of tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for chewing or smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking, and any other product, regardless of form, that contains tobacco and is intended for human consumption or placement in the oral or nasal cavity or absorption into the human body by any other means, but does not include cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010.

(22) "Unaffiliated distributor" means a distributor that is not affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the distributor has purchased tobacco products.

(23) "Unaffiliated retailer" means a retailer that is not affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the retailer has purchased tobacco products.

Sec. 104. RCW 82.26.121 and 1997 c 420 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall appoint, as duly authorized agents, enforcement officers of the ((liquor control)) board to enforce provisions of this chapter. These officers shall not be considered employees of the department.

Sec. 105. RCW 82.32.300 and 1997 c 420 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The administration of this and chapters 82.04 through 82.27 RCW of this title is vested in the department of revenue which shall prescribe forms and rules of procedure for the determination of the taxable status of any person, for the making of returns and for the ascertainment, assessment and collection of taxes and penalties imposed thereunder.

The department of revenue shall make and publish rules and regulations, not inconsistent therewith, necessary to enforce provisions of this chapter and chapters 82.02 through 82.23B and 82.27 RCW, and the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board shall make and publish rules necessary to enforce chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW, which shall have the same force and effect as if specifically included therein, unless declared invalid by the judgment of a court of record not appealed from.

The department may employ such clerks, specialists, and other assistants as are necessary. Salaries and compensation of such employees shall be fixed by the department and shall be charged to the proper appropriation for the department.

The department shall exercise general supervision of the collection of taxes and, in the discharge of such duty, may institute and prosecute such suits or proceedings in the courts as may be necessary and proper.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. RCW 66.24.620 (Sale of spirits by a holder of a spirits distributor or spirits retail license—State liquor store closure) is decodified.

--- END ---