BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that target zero is Washington's strategic highway safety plan of zero traffic fatalities by 2030 and the number of motorcycle involved fatalities has doubled since the 1990s and remains at a high level. Motorcycles are involved in nearly twenty percent of fatal and serious injury crashes while they make up only three percent of the total registered vehicles. Motorcyclists are also at fault in seventy-five percent of motorcycle fatalities. In order to move Washington closer to target zero, the department of licensing is updating its motorcycle safety program with feedback from the national highway traffic safety administration, the Washington traffic safety commission, and other stakeholders. These changes will improve public safety by creating a more meaningful and comprehensive motorcycle endorsement test, providing training programs greater flexibility, increasing penalties to discourage unendorsed riders, and focusing motorcycle subsidies on expanding access to motorcycle ridership.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.81A.020 and 2013 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall administer and enforce the law pertaining to the motorcycle skills education program as set forth in this chapter.

(2) The director may adopt and enforce reasonable rules that are consistent with this chapter.

(3) The director shall revise the Washington motorcycle safety program to:

(a) Institute separate novice and advanced motorcycle skills education courses for both two-wheeled and three-wheeled motorcycles that are each a minimum of eight hours ((and no more than sixteen hours at a cost, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, of (i) no more than fifty dollars for Washington state residents under the age of eighteen, and (ii) no more than one hundred twenty-five dollars for Washington state residents who are eighteen years of age or older and military personnel of any age stationed in Washington state));

(b) Encourage the use of loaned or used motorcycles for use in the motorcycle skills education course if the instructor approves them;

(c) Require all instructors for two-wheeled motorcycles to conduct at least three classes in a one-year period, and all instructors for three-wheeled motorcycles to conduct at least one class in a one-year period, to maintain their teaching eligibility.

(4) The department may enter into agreements to review and certify that a private motorcycle skills education course meets educational standards equivalent to those required of courses conducted under the motorcycle skills education program. An agreement entered into under this subsection must provide that the department may conduct periodic audits to ensure that educational standards continue to meet those required for courses conducted under the motorcycle skills education program, and that the costs of the review, certification, and audit process will be borne by the party seeking certification.

(5) ((Subject to the requirements provided in this subsection, the department must allow private motorcycle skills education programs to offer motorcycle safety education where students pay the full cost for the training. After the department has reviewed and certified that a private motorcycle skills education course proposed under this subsection meets educational standards equivalent to those offered under subsection (3)(a) of this section, the department must enter into an agreement with the private motorcycle skills education program. An agreement entered into under this subsection must provide that (a) the department may conduct periodic audits to ensure that educational standards continue to meet those of other programs approved by the department, and (b) the costs of the review, certification, and audit process will be borne by the program seeking certification))The department shall adopt rules to establish a motorcycle operator subsidy program, which may address testing costs, offer financial need-based subsidies for motorcycle training, and employ other strategies to improve access to motorcycle ridership.

(6) The department shall obtain and compile information from applicants for a motorcycle endorsement regarding whether they have completed a state approved or certified motorcycle skills education course.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.20.510 and 2011 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Motorcycle instruction permit. A person holding a valid driver's license who wishes to learn to ride a motorcycle may apply for a motorcycle instruction permit. The department may issue a motorcycle instruction permit after the applicant has successfully passed all ((parts of the motorcycle examination other than the driving test))knowledge and skills examinations required and approved by the department. The director shall collect a fee of fifteen dollars for the motorcycle instruction permit or renewal, and deposit the fee in the motorcycle safety education account of the highway safety fund.

(a) The examination for a two-wheeled motorcycle instruction permit and the examination for a three-wheeled motorcycle instruction permit must be separate and distinct examinations.

(b) The department may authorize an entity that has entered into a contract authorized under RCW 46.20.520 to administer the motorcycle instruction permit examinations.

(c) If a motorcyclist fails the motorcycle endorsement skills test, but demonstrates a level of riding skill consistent with a motorcycle instruction permit, the department may waive any further skills testing required to obtain a motorcycle instruction permit.

(2) Effect of motorcycle instruction permit. A person holding a motorcycle instruction permit may drive a motorcycle upon the public highways if the person has immediate possession of the permit and a valid driver's license. An individual with a motorcyclist's instruction permit may not carry passengers and may not operate a motorcycle during the hours of darkness.

(3) Term of motorcycle instruction permit. A motorcycle instruction permit is valid for ((ninety))one hundred eighty days from the date of issue.

(a) The department may issue one additional ((ninety))one hundred eighty-day permit.

(b) ((The department may issue a third motorcycle instruction permit upon presentation of documented evidence that the permittee is enrolled in a motorcycle skills education program as authorized in RCW 46.81A.020 with a class start date prior to the expiration of the third permit.)) The department may not issue more than ((three))two motorcycle instruction permits to an applicant within a five-year period.

(4) The director may adopt and enforce reasonable rules that are consistent with this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.20.500 and 2018 c 60 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may drive either a two-wheeled or a three-wheeled motorcycle, or a motor-driven cycle unless such person has a valid driver's license specially endorsed by the director to enable the holder to drive such vehicles. A person who violates this section commits a traffic infraction and is subject to: (a) The base penalty provided under RCW 46.63.110; and (b) an additional monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars, which must be deposited in the motorcycle safety education account under RCW 46.68.065.

(2) However, a person sixteen years of age or older, holding a valid driver's license of any class issued by the state of the person's residence, may operate a moped without taking any special examination for the operation of a moped.

(3) No driver's license is required for operation of an electric-assisted bicycle. Persons under sixteen years of age may not operate a class 3 electric-assisted bicycle.

(4) No driver's license is required to operate an electric personal assistive mobility device or a power wheelchair.

(5) No driver's license is required to operate a motorized foot scooter. Motorized foot scooters may not be operated at any time from a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise without reflectors of a type approved by the state patrol.

(6) A person holding a valid driver's license may operate a motorcycle as defined under RCW 46.04.330(2) without a motorcycle endorsement.

(7) A person operating a motorcycle with a stabilizing conversion kit must have a valid driver's license specially endorsed by the director for a three-wheeled motorcycle to enable the holder to operate such a motorcycle.

Sec. 5. RCW 3.62.090 and 2004 c 15 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines, forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions, by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW a public safety and education assessment equal to seventy percent of such fines, forfeitures, or penalties, which shall be remitted as provided in chapters 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW. The assessment required by this section shall not be suspended or waived by the court.

(2) There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines, forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions and for fines levied under RCW 46.61.5055, and in addition to the public safety and education assessment required under subsection (1) of this section, by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, an additional public safety and education assessment equal to fifty percent of the public safety and education assessment required under subsection (1) of this section, which shall be remitted to the state treasurer and deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The additional assessment required by this subsection shall not be suspended or waived by the court.

(3) This section does not apply to the fee imposed under RCW 46.63.110(7), the penalty imposed under RCW 46.63.110(8), the additional penalty imposed under RCW 46.20.500, or the penalty assessment imposed under RCW 10.99.080.

Sec. 6. RCW 2.68.040 and 1994 c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To support the judicial information system account provided for in RCW 2.68.020, the supreme court may provide by rule for an increase in fines, penalties, and assessments, and the increased amount shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the account:

(a) Pursuant to the authority of RCW 46.63.110(((2)))(3), the sum of ten dollars to any penalty collected by a court pursuant to supreme court infraction rules for courts of limited jurisdiction;

(b) Pursuant to RCW 3.62.060, a mandatory appearance cost in the initial sum of ten dollars to be assessed on all defendants; and

(c) Pursuant to RCW 46.63.110(((5)))(6), a ten-dollar assessment for each account for which a person requests a time payment schedule.

(2) Notwithstanding a provision of law or rule to the contrary, the assessments provided for in this section may not be waived or suspended and shall be immediately due and payable upon forfeiture, conviction, deferral of prosecution, or request for time payment, as each shall occur.

(3) The supreme court is requested to adjust these assessments for inflation.

(4) This section does not apply to the additional monetary penalty under RCW 46.20.500.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.63.110 and 2012 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or title.

(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of (a) RCW 46.55.105(2) is two hundred fifty dollars for each offense; (b) RCW 46.61.210(1) is five hundred dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this subsection (2) may be reduced.

(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.

(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by the local legislative body.

(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter, it is immediately payable and is enforceable as a civil judgment under Title 6 RCW. If the court determines, in its discretion, that a person is not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, and not more than one year has passed since the later of July 1, 2005, or the date the monetary obligation initially became due and payable, the court shall enter into a payment plan with the person, unless the person has previously been granted a payment plan with respect to the same monetary obligation, or unless the person is in noncompliance of any existing or prior payment plan, in which case the court may, at its discretion, implement a payment plan. If the court has notified the department that the person has failed to pay or comply and the person has subsequently entered into a payment plan and made an initial payment, the court shall notify the department that the infraction has been adjudicated, and the department shall rescind any suspension of the person's driver's license or driver's privilege based on failure to respond to that infraction. "Payment plan," as used in this section, means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on the financial ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily pay an amount at any time in addition to the payments required under the payment plan.

(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is delinquent or the person fails to complete a community restitution program on or before the time established under the payment plan, unless the court determines good cause therefor and adjusts the payment plan or the community restitution plan accordingly, the court may refer the unpaid monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation for civil enforcement until all monetary obligations, including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, have been paid, and court authorized community restitution has been completed, or until the court has entered into a new time payment or community restitution agreement with the person. For those infractions subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.289, the court shall notify the department of the person's failure to meet the conditions of the plan, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or driving privileges.

(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court and has not paid the monetary obligation in full on or before the time established for payment, the court may refer the unpaid monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation to a collections agency until all monetary obligations have been paid, including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, or until the person has entered into a payment plan under this section. For those infractions subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.289, the court shall notify the department of the person's delinquency, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or driving privileges.

(c) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction or twenty-five dollars per payment plan, whichever is less.

(d) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with outside entities to administer its payment plan system. When outside entities are used for the administration of a payment plan, the court may assess the person a reasonable fee for such administrative services, which fee may be calculated on a periodic, percentage, or other basis.

(e) If a court authorized community restitution program for offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court may allow conversion of all or part of the monetary obligations due under this section to court authorized community restitution in lieu of time payments if the person is unable to make reasonable time payments.

(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed:

(a) A fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040;

(b) A fee of ten dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the Washington auto theft prevention authority account; and

(c) A fee of two dollars per infraction. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the traumatic brain injury account established in RCW 74.31.060.

(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other than of RCW 46.61.527 or 46.61.212 shall be assessed an additional penalty of twenty dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a court authorized community restitution program for offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in the court authorized community restitution program.

(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under (a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited in the state general fund. The balance of the revenue received by the county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.

(9) If a legal proceeding, such as garnishment, has commenced to collect any delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty imposed by the court under this section, the court may, at its discretion, enter into a payment plan.

(10) The monetary penalty for violating RCW 46.37.395 is: (a) Two hundred fifty dollars for the first violation; (b) five hundred dollars for the second violation; and (c) seven hundred fifty dollars for each violation thereafter.

(11) The additional monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.20.500 is not subject to assessments or fees provided under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect January 1, 2020.

--- END ---