BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.155.030 and 1999 c 153 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public works board is hereby created.

(2) The board shall be composed of ((thirteen))fourteen members, one of which shall be the state treasurer, or the state treasurer's designee, and thirteen of which shall be appointed by the governor for terms of four years, except that five members initially shall be appointed for terms of two years. The board members appointed by the governor shall include: (a) Three members, two of whom shall be elected officials and one shall be a public works manager, appointed from a list of at least six persons nominated by the association of Washington cities or its successor; (b) three members, two of whom shall be elected officials and one shall be a public works manager, appointed from a list of at least six persons nominated by the Washington state association of counties or its successor; (c) three members appointed from a list of at least six persons nominated jointly by the Washington public utility districts association and a state association of water-sewer districts, or their successors; and (d) four members appointed from the general public. In appointing the four general public members, the governor shall endeavor to balance the geographical composition of the board and to include members with special expertise in relevant fields such as public finance, architecture and civil engineering, and public works construction. The governor shall appoint one of the general public members of the board as chair. The term of the chair shall coincide with the term of the governor.

(3) Staff support to the board shall be provided by the department.

(4) Members of the board shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) If a vacancy ((on))of a governor-appointed member of the board occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise, the governor shall fill the vacant position for the unexpired term. Each vacancy in a position appointed from lists provided by the associations under subsection (2) of this section shall be filled from a list of at least three persons nominated by the relevant association or associations. Any members of the board((, appointive or otherwise,))appointed by the governor may be removed by the governor for cause in accordance with RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.

--- END ---