BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2020, shall provide benefits or coverage for contralateral prophylactic mastectomies to covered individuals who:

(a) Are determined by their physician to be at a high risk of developing breast cancer in the contralateral breast;

(b) Have a genetic defect that predisposes them to breast cancer; or

(c) Have a desire for symmetry and reconstruction of both breasts following removal of a breast due to breast cancer.

(2)(a) A health carrier is not required under this section to provide for a referral to a nonparticipating health care provider, unless the carrier does not have an appropriate health care provider that is available and accessible to administer the procedure and that is a participating health care provider with respect to such procedure.

(b) If a health carrier refers an individual to a nonparticipating health care provider pursuant to this section, screening services or a resulting procedure, if any, must be provided at no additional cost to the individual beyond what the individual would otherwise pay for services provided by a participating health care provider.

--- END ---