BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.23 RCW to be codified between RCW 48.23.030 and 48.23.130 to read as follows:

There shall be a provision that the first five percent or fifteen thousand dollars, whichever is greater, of any sum becoming due by reason of the death of the individual insured shall be used to pay for funeral or other expenses related to the last illness or death of the individual insured.

--- END ---