BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.04 RCW to read as follows:

It is unlawful for an electric utility, as defined under RCW 19.29A.010, to advertise or offer any benefit, program, or service in terms indicating that the benefit, program, or service will combat, counteract, defeat, fight, prevent, retard, reverse, slow, stop, or in any similar way affect, climate change, unless the electric utility provides in or with the advertisement or offer a detailed description of the discernable and quantifiable effects that the electric utility's advertised benefit, program, or service will have in relation to global climate change, displayed in a manner that discloses the discernable and quantifiable effects on global climate change attributable to the average individual customer who uses the benefit, program, or service.

--- END ---