BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.36.151 and 2000 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((It is unlawful to sell, offer for sale, or deliver:))

(1) It is unlawful to sell, offer for sale, or deliver milk or products produced from milk from cows, goats, or other mammals affected with disease or of which the owner thereof has refused official examination and tests for disease((; or)).

(2) It is unlawful to sell, offer for sale, or deliver colostrum milk for consumption by humans, except that this prohibition regarding colostrum milk does not apply to:

(a) Colostrum milk made or to be made available to persons having multiple sclerosis, or other persons acting on their behalf, who, at the time of the initial sale, present a form, signed by a licensed physician, certifying that the intended user has multiple sclerosis and that the user releases the provider of the milk from liability resulting from the consumption of the milk; or

(b) Colostrum milk processed or to be processed by a licensed food processing facility or a milk processing plant as a nutritional supplement in accordance with the federal dietary supplement health and education act. Colostrum milk used for this purpose must be pasteurized or otherwise subjected to a heat process or other treatment sufficient to kill harmful organisms.

(3) Colostrum milk described in subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section is exempt from the prohibition provided by subsection (2) of this section if it comes from a licensed producer. Such colostrum milk is also exempt from meeting the standards for grade A raw milk required by this chapter.

(4) It is unlawful to sell, offer for sale, or deliver any product that is identified by the word "milk" and that is intended for human consumption as food or drink if the product is not milk or does not contain milk or milk products.

--- END ---