BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 79.38 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall maintain any road under its ownership or control that has been the exclusive means of accessing private property by road for a continuous period of at least ten years. The duty imposed on the department under this section terminates if the property that is made accessible by a road under the department's ownership or control ceases to be privately owned.

--- END ---