BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Personal delivery devices are a new automated electrically powered ground-based delivery device that are being tested in Washington. Several jurisdictions, including several states and the District of Columbia, have adopted laws or regulations in recent years governing automated ground-based delivery devices.

(1) The joint transportation committee shall convene a work group to provide policy recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature on a regulatory framework for automated electrically powered ground-based delivery devices.

(2) The work group must be comprised of representatives for the following stakeholder groups: Companies that want to operate the devices in Washington, the association of Washington cities, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the administrative office of the courts, the department of licensing, the office of the insurance commissioner, and any other stakeholder the joint transportation committee finds would assist the work group to meet its goal.

(3)(a) The work group must consider the following regulatory issues from both a local and state government perspective:

(i) Minimum and/or maximum speed allowance;

(ii) Right-of-way where the devices would be allowed to operate;

(iii) Size and weight restrictions of the devices when empty and loaded;

(iv) Safety equipment or visibility (lighting or flag) requirements;

(v) Operational requirements;

(vi) Insurance requirements;

(vii) Applicability and enforcement of traffic infractions;

(viii) Registration of the devices and/or the business entity operating the devices, including fees.

(b) The work group may consider issues in addition to those listed in (a) of this subsection.

(4) The work group shall develop policy options for implementation of a regulatory framework for automated electrically powered ground-based delivery devices. As a result of its discussions, the work group shall also produce draft legislation. The final report and draft legislation are due to the standing transportation committees of the legislature on December 1, 2019.

(5) This section expires January 1, 2020.

--- END ---