BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.400 and 1993 c 478 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Tiny house" means a dwelling to be used as permanent housing with permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation built in accordance with the 2018 International Resident Code Appendix Q.

(b) "Tiny house with wheels" means a dwelling to be used as permanent housing with permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation built by a manufacturer that is self-certified under RCW 43.22.355.

(2) Any local government, as defined in RCW 43.63A.215, that is planning under this chapter shall comply with RCW 43.63A.215(3).

(3) A tiny house may be allowed as an accessory dwelling unit within designated urban growth areas for the purposes of permanent residence without being attached to or constructed within the primary dwelling unit.

(4) A tiny house with wheels for which the owner has made reasonable accommodation for water, power, and sewage disposal for use as a permanent residence may be allowed as an accessory dwelling unit within designated urban growth areas without being attached to or constructed within the primary dwelling unit.

(5) An accessory dwelling unit under this section is not considered or classified as a manufactured home.

--- END ---