BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.40.1987 and 2018 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2017, shall receive, effective July 1, 2018, an increase to their monthly benefit of one and one-half percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed sixty-two dollars and fifty cents.

(2) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2019, shall receive, effective July 1, 2020, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed sixty-two dollars and fifty cents.

(3) This section does not apply to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.40.1984.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.32.4992 and 2018 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2017, shall receive, effective July 1, 2018, an increase to their monthly benefit of one and one-half percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed sixty-two dollars and fifty cents.

(2) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2019, shall receive, effective July 1, 2020, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed sixty-two dollars and fifty cents.

(3) This section does not apply to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.32.489 or 41.32.540.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2020.

--- END ---