BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.32.235 and 2016 c 95 s 8 and 2016 c 19 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In each county ((with a population of four hundred thousand or more)) which by resolution establishes a county purchasing department, the purchasing department shall enter into leases of personal property on a competitive basis and purchase all supplies, materials, and equipment on a competitive basis, for all departments of the county, as provided in this chapter and chapter 39.04 RCW, except that the county purchasing department is not required to make purchases that are paid from the county road fund or equipment rental and revolving fund.

(2) As used in this section:

(a) "Public works" has the same definition as in RCW 39.04.010.

(b) "Riverine project" means a project of construction, alteration, repair, replacement, or improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of the state or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge on any property, carried out on a river or stream and its tributaries and associated floodplains, beds, banks, and waters for the purpose of improving aquatic habitat, improving water quality, restoring floodplain function, or providing flood protection.

(c) "Stormwater project" means a project of construction, alteration, repair, replacement, or improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of the state or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge on any property, carried out on a municipal separate storm sewer system, and any connections to the system, that is regulated under a state-issued national pollutant discharge elimination system general municipal stormwater permit for the purpose of improving control of stormwater runoff quantity and quality from developed land, safely conveying stormwater runoff, or reducing erosion or other water quality impacts caused by municipal separate storm sewer system discharges.

(3) Except as otherwise specified in this chapter or in chapter 36.77 RCW, all counties subject to these provisions shall contract on a competitive basis for all public works after bids have been submitted to the county upon specifications therefor. Such specifications shall be in writing and shall be filed with the clerk of the county legislative authority for public inspection.

(4) An advertisement shall be published in the county official newspaper stating the time and place where bids will be opened, the time after which bids will not be received, the character of the work to be done, the materials and equipment to be furnished, and that specifications therefor may be seen at the office of the clerk of the county legislative authority. An advertisement shall also be published in a legal newspaper of general circulation in or as near as possible to that part of the county in which such work is to be done. If the county official newspaper is a newspaper of general circulation covering at least forty percent of the residences in that part of the county in which such public works are to be done, then the publication of an advertisement of the applicable specifications in the county official newspaper is sufficient. Such advertisements shall be published at least once at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids will be received.

(5) The bids shall be in writing, may be in either hard copy or electronic form as specified by the county, shall be filed with the clerk, shall be opened and read in public at the time and place named therefor in the advertisements, and, after being opened, shall be filed for public inspection. No bid may be considered for public work unless it is accompanied by a bid deposit in the form of a surety bond, postal money order, cash, cashier's check, or certified check in an amount equal to five percent of the amount of the bid proposed.

(6) The contract for the public work shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. Any or all bids may be rejected for good cause. The county legislative authority shall require from the successful bidder for such public work a contractor's bond in the amount and with the conditions imposed by law.

(7) If the bidder to whom the contract is awarded fails to enter into the contract and furnish the contractor's bond as required within ten days after notice of the award, exclusive of the day of notice, the amount of the bid deposit shall be forfeited to the county and the contract awarded to the next lowest and best bidder. The bid deposit of all unsuccessful bidders shall be returned after the contract is awarded and the required contractor's bond given by the successful bidder is accepted by the county legislative authority. Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded and open to public inspection and shall be available by telephone inquiry.

(8) As limited by subsection (((10)))(11) of this section, a county subject to these provisions may have public works performed by county employees in any annual or biennial budget period equal to a dollar value not exceeding ten percent of the public works construction budget, including any amount in a supplemental public works construction budget, over the budget period.

Whenever a county subject to these provisions has had public works performed in any budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for that budget period, all remaining public works except emergency work under subsection (((12)))(13) of this section within that budget period shall be done by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids as specified in subsection (3) of this section. The state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any county subject to these provisions that exceeds this amount and the extent to which the county has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed by public employees in subsequent years.

(9) A county may procure public works with a unit priced contract under this section for the purpose of completing anticipated types of work based on hourly rates or unit pricing for one or more categories of work or trades.

(a) For the purposes of this section, "unit priced contract" means a competitively bid contract in which public works are anticipated on a recurring basis to meet the business or operational needs of the county, under which the contractor agrees to a fixed period indefinite quantity delivery of work, at a defined unit price for each category of work.

(b) Unit priced contracts must be executed for an initial contract term not to exceed three years, with the county having the option of extending or renewing the unit priced contract for one additional year.

(c) Invitations for unit price bids shall include, for purposes of the bid evaluation, estimated quantities of the anticipated types of work or trades, and specify how the county will issue or release work assignments, work orders, or task authorizations pursuant to a unit priced contract for projects, tasks, or other work based on the hourly rates or unit prices bid by the contractor. The contract must be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder as defined under RCW 39.04.010. Whenever possible, the county must invite at least one bid from a minority or woman contractor who otherwise qualifies under this section.

(d) Unit price contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. Prevailing wages for all work performed pursuant to each work order must be the prevailing wage rates in effect at the beginning date for each contract year. Unit priced contracts must have prevailing wage rates updated annually. Intents and affidavits for prevailing wages paid must be submitted annually for all work completed within the previous twelve-month period of the unit priced contract.

(10) If a county subject to these provisions has public works performed by public employees in any budget period that are in excess of this ten percent limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted amount shall be reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of public works that may be performed by public employees for that county in its next budget period. Ten percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to that county shall be withheld if two years after the year in which the excess amount of work occurred, the county has failed to so reduce the amount of public works that it has performed by public employees. The amount withheld shall be distributed to the county when it has demonstrated in its reports to the state auditor that the amount of public works it has performed by public employees has been reduced as required.

(((10)))(11) In addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection (8) of this section, counties subject to these provisions containing a population of four hundred thousand or more shall not have public employees perform: A public works project in excess of ninety thousand dollars if more than a single craft or trade is involved with the public works project, a riverine project or stormwater project in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars if more than a single craft or trade is involved with the riverine project or stormwater project, a public works project in excess of forty-five thousand dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved with the public works project, or a riverine project or stormwater project in excess of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved with the riverine project or stormwater project. A public works project, a riverine project, and a stormwater project means a complete project. The restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the project into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that may be performed by public employees on a single project.

The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs of materials, supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of that project. The value of the public works budget shall be the value of all the separate public works projects within the budget.

(((11)))(12) In addition to the accounting and recordkeeping requirements contained in chapter 39.04 RCW, any county which uses public employees to perform public works projects under RCW 36.32.240(1) shall prepare a year-end report to be submitted to the state auditor indicating the total dollar amount of the county's public works construction budget and the total dollar amount for public works projects performed by public employees for that year.

The year-end report submitted pursuant to this subsection to the state auditor shall be in accordance with the standard form required by RCW 43.09.205.

(((12)))(13) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, counties may use public employees without any limitation for emergency work performed under an emergency declared pursuant to RCW 36.32.270, and any such emergency work shall not be subject to the limitations of this section. Publication of the description and estimate of costs relating to correcting the emergency may be made within seven days after the commencement of the work. Within two weeks of the finding that such an emergency existed, the county legislative authority shall adopt a resolution certifying the damage to public facilities and costs incurred or anticipated relating to correcting the emergency. Additionally this section shall not apply to architectural and engineering or other technical or professional services performed by public employees in connection with a public works project.

(((13)))(14) In lieu of the procedures of subsections (3) through (((11)))(12) of this section, a county may let contracts using the small works roster process provided in RCW 39.04.155.

Whenever possible, the county shall invite at least one proposal from a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

(((14)))(15) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by county employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.

(((15)))(16) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

(((16)))(17) Nothing in this section prohibits any county from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

(((17)))(18) This section does not apply to contracts between the public stadium authority and a team affiliate under RCW 36.102.060(4), or development agreements between the public stadium authority and a team affiliate under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8).

Sec. 2. RCW 39.04.155 and 2015 c 225 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used by state agencies and by any local government that is expressly authorized to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in lieu of other procedures to award contracts for such work with an estimated cost of ((three))five hundred thousand dollars or less. The small works roster process includes the limited public works process authorized under subsection (3) of this section and any local government authorized to award contracts using the small works roster process under this section may award contracts using the limited public works process under subsection (3) of this section.

(2)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may create a single general small works roster, or may create a small works roster for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where required by law are properly licensed or registered to perform such work in this state. A state agency or local government establishing a small works roster or rosters may require eligible contractors desiring to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep current records of any applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance, or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At least once a year, the state agency or local government shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of contractors for such roster or rosters. In addition, responsible contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any time they submit a written request and necessary records. Master contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a specific award is made using a small works roster.

(b) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt rules implementing this subsection. A local government establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance or resolution implementing this subsection. Procedures included in rules adopted by the department of enterprise services in implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these activities has been delegated to it by the department of enterprise services under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.

(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone, written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, as defined in RCW 39.04.010. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate of the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as materials and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. Quotations may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work being contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if the estimated cost of the work is from one hundred fifty thousand dollars to ((three))five hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local government that chooses to solicit bids from less than all the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster must also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works roster that quotations on the work are being sought. The government has the sole option of determining whether this notice to the remaining contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice in a legal newspaper in general circulation in the area where the work is to be done; (ii) mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii) sending a notice to these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For purposes of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute" means that a state agency or local government soliciting bids may not favor certain contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar services.

(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section need not be advertised.

(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by telephone inquiry.

(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this section, a state agency or authorized local government may award a contract for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement projects estimated to cost less than ((thirty-five))fifty thousand dollars using the limited public works process provided under this subsection. Public works projects awarded under this subsection are exempt from the other requirements of the small works roster process provided under subsection (2) of this section and are exempt from the requirement that contracts be awarded after advertisement as provided under RCW 39.04.010.

For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a minimum of three contractors from the appropriate small works roster and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder as defined under RCW 39.04.010. After an award is made, the quotations shall be open to public inspection and available by electronic request. A state agency or authorized local government shall attempt to distribute opportunities for limited public works projects equitably among contractors willing to perform in the geographic area of the work. A state agency or authorized local government shall maintain a list of the contractors contacted and the contracts awarded during the previous twenty-four months under the limited public works process, including the name of the contractor, the contractor's registration number, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of work performed, and the date the contract was awarded. For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government may waive the payment and performance bond requirements of chapter 39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of laborers, mechanics, subcontractors, materialpersons, suppliers, and taxes imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the limited public works project, however the state agency or authorized local government shall have the right of recovery against the contractor for any payments made on the contractor's behalf.

(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using the small works roster process or limited public works process.

(5)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may use the limited public works process of subsection (3) of this section to solicit and award small works roster contracts to small businesses that are registered contractors with gross revenues under one million dollars annually as reported on their federal tax return.

(b) A state agency or authorized local government may adopt additional procedures to encourage small businesses that are registered contractors with gross revenues under two hundred fifty thousand dollars annually as reported on their federal tax returns to submit quotations or bids on small works roster contracts.

(6) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of enterprise services, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of transportation, any institution of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated authority by the department of enterprise services to engage in construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, improvement, or repair activities.

Sec. 3. RCW 54.04.070 and 2017 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any item, or items of the same kind of materials, equipment, or supplies purchased, the estimated cost of which is in excess of ((fifteen))thirty thousand dollars, exclusive of sales tax, shall be by contract. However, a district may make purchases of the same kind of items of materials, equipment, and supplies not exceeding ((seven))twelve thousand ((five hundred)) dollars in any calendar month without a contract, purchasing any excess thereof over ((seven))twelve thousand ((five hundred)) dollars by contract.

(2) Any work ordered by a district commission, the estimated cost of which is in excess of ((twenty-five))fifty thousand dollars, exclusive of sales tax, shall be by contract. However, a district commission may have its own regularly employed personnel perform work which is an accepted industry practice under prudent utility management without a contract. For purposes of this section, "prudent utility management" means performing work with regularly employed personnel utilizing material of a worth not exceeding ((one))three hundred ((fifty)) thousand dollars in value without a contract. This limit on the value of material being utilized in work being performed by regularly employed personnel shall not include the value of individual items of equipment ((purchased or acquired and used as one unit of a project)). For the purposes of this section, the term "equipment" includes but is not limited to conductor, cabling, wire, pipe, or lines used for electrical, water, fiber optic, or telecommunications.

(3) Before awarding a contract required under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the commission shall publish a notice once or more in a newspaper of general circulation in the district at least thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for the work or materials. Plans and specifications for the work or materials shall at the time of publication be on file at the office of the district and subject to public inspection. Any published notice ordering work to be performed for the district shall be mailed at the time of publication to any established trade association which files a written request with the district to receive such notices. The commission may, at the same time and as part of the same notice, invite tenders for the work or materials upon plans and specifications to be submitted by the bidders.

(4) As an alternative to the competitive bidding requirements of this section and RCW 54.04.080, a district may let contracts using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.

(5) Whenever equipment or materials required by a district are held by a governmental agency and are available for sale but such agency is unwilling to submit a proposal, the commission may ascertain the price of such items and file a statement of such price supported by the sworn affidavit of one member of the commission, and may consider such price as a bid without a deposit or bond.

(6) Pursuant to RCW 39.04.280, the commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section and RCW 54.04.080 if an exemption contained within RCW 39.04.280 applies to the purchase or public work.

(7)(a) A district may procure public works with a unit priced contract under this section, RCW 54.04.080, or 54.04.085 for the purpose of completing anticipated types of work based on hourly rates or unit pricing for one or more categories of work or trades.

(b) For the purposes of this section, unit priced contract means a competitively bid contract in which public works are anticipated on a recurring basis to meet the business or operational needs of a district, under which the contractor agrees to a fixed period indefinite quantity delivery of work, at a defined unit price, for each category of work.

(c) Unit priced contracts must be executed for an initial contract term not to exceed three years, with the district having the option of extending or renewing the unit priced contract for one additional year.

(d) Invitations for unit price bids shall include, for purposes of the bid evaluation, estimated quantities of the anticipated types of work or trades, and specify how the district will issue or release work assignments, work orders, or task authorizations pursuant to a unit priced contract for projects, tasks, or other work based on the hourly rates or unit prices bid by the contractor. Where electrical facility construction or improvement work is anticipated, contractors on a unit priced contract shall comply with the requirements under RCW 54.04.085 (1) through (5). Contracts must be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder as per RCW 39.04.010.

(e) Unit price contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. Prevailing wages for all work performed pursuant to each work order must be the ((rates in effect at the time the individual work order is issued))prevailing wage rates in effect at the beginning date for each contract year. Unit priced contracts must have prevailing wage rates updated annually. Intents and affidavits for prevailing wages paid must be submitted annually for all work completed within the previous twelve-month period of the unit priced contract.

Sec. 4. RCW 57.08.050 and 2015 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of fifty thousand dollars, shall be let by contract and competitive bidding. Before awarding any such contract the board of commissioners shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation where the district is located at least once thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for such work, plans and specifications which must at the time of publication of such notice be on file in the office of the board of commissioners subject to the public inspection. The notice shall state generally the work to be done and shall call for proposals for doing the same to be sealed and filed with the board of commissioners on or before the day and hour named therein.

Each bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or postal money order payable to the order of the county treasurer for a sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, or accompanied by a bid bond in an amount not less than five percent of the bid with a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state, conditioned that the bidder will pay the district as liquidated damages the amount specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be considered unless accompanied by such check, cash or bid bond. At the time and place named such bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of commissioners shall proceed to canvass the bids and may let such contract to the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications on file or to the best bidder submitting the bidder's own plans and specifications. The board of commissioners may reject all bids for good cause and readvertise and in such case all checks, cash or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders, except that of the successful bidder, which shall be retained until a contract shall be entered into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such work furnished with sureties satisfactory to the board of commissioners in the full amount of the contract price between the bidder and the commission in accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish the bond within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that the bidder is the successful bidder, the check, cash, or bid bonds and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the district. If the bidder fails to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and the board of commissioners deems it necessary to take legal action to collect on any bid bond required by this section, then the district shall be entitled to collect from the bidder any legal expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

(2) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (1) of this section, a water-sewer district may let contracts using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.

(3) Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost in excess of forty thousand dollars, shall be by contract. Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost of less than fifty thousand dollars shall be made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of fifty thousand dollars or more shall be made by competitive bidding following the procedure for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this section.

(4) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (3) of this section, a water-sewer district may let contracts for purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment with the suppliers designated on current state agency, county, city, or town purchasing rosters for the materials, supplies, or equipment, when the roster has been established in accordance with the competitive bidding law for purchases applicable to the state agency, county, city, or town. The price and terms for purchases shall be as described on the applicable roster.

(5) The board may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

(6)(a) A district may procure public works with a unit priced contract under this section for the purpose of completing anticipated types of work based on hourly rates or unit pricing for one or more categories of work or trades.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "unit priced contract" means a competitively bid contract in which public works are anticipated on a recurring basis to meet the business or operational needs of the district, under which the contractor agrees to a fixed period indefinite quantity delivery of work, at a defined unit price for each category of work.

(c) Unit priced contracts must be executed for an initial contract term not to exceed three years, with the district having the option of extending or renewing the unit priced contract for one additional year.

(d) Invitations for unit price bids must include, for purposes of the bid evaluation, estimated quantities of the anticipated types of work or trades, and specify how the district will issue or release work assignments, work orders, or task authorizations pursuant to a unit priced contract for projects, tasks, or other work based on the hourly rates or unit prices bid by the contractor. Contracts must be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder as per RCW 39.04.010. Whenever possible, the district must invite at least one proposal from a minority or woman contractor who otherwise qualifies under this section.

(e) Unit price contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. Prevailing wages for all work performed pursuant to each work order must be the prevailing wage rates in effect at the beginning date for each contract year. Unit priced contracts must have prevailing wage rates updated annually. Intents and affidavits for prevailing wages paid must be submitted annually for all work completed within the previous twelve-month period of the unit priced contract.

Sec. 5. RCW 35.23.352 and 2018 c 74 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any second-class city or any town may construct any public works, as defined in RCW 39.04.010, by contract or day labor without calling for bids therefor whenever the estimated cost of the work or improvement, including cost of materials, supplies and equipment will not exceed the sum of ((sixty-five thousand))one hundred sixteen thousand one hundred fifty-five dollars if more than one craft or trade is involved with the public works, or ((forty thousand))seventy-five thousand five hundred dollars if a single craft or trade is involved with the public works or the public works project is street signalization or street lighting. A public works project means a complete project. The restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the project into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that may be performed by day labor on a single project.

Whenever the cost of the public work or improvement, including materials, supplies and equipment, will exceed these figures, the same shall be done by contract. All such contracts shall be let at public bidding upon publication of notice calling for sealed bids upon the work. The notice shall be published in the official newspaper, or a newspaper of general circulation most likely to bring responsive bids, at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids will be received. The notice shall generally state the nature of the work to be done that plans and specifications therefor shall then be on file in the city or town hall for public inspections, and require that bids be sealed and filed with the council or commission within the time specified therein. Each bid shall be accompanied by a bid proposal deposit in the form of a cashier's check, postal money order, or surety bond to the council or commission for a sum of not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be considered unless accompanied by such bid proposal deposit. The council or commission of the city or town shall let the contract to the lowest responsible bidder or shall have power by resolution to reject any or all bids and to make further calls for bids in the same manner as the original call.

When the contract is let then all bid proposal deposits shall be returned to the bidders except that of the successful bidder which shall be retained until a contract is entered into and a bond to perform the work furnished, with surety satisfactory to the council or commission, in accordance with RCW 39.08.030. If the bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance with his or her bid and furnish a bond within ten days from the date at which he or she is notified that he or she is the successful bidder, the check or postal money order and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the council or commission or the council or commission shall recover the amount of the surety bond. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

If no bid is received on the first call the council or commission may readvertise and make a second call, or may enter into a contract without any further call or may purchase the supplies, material or equipment and perform the work or improvement by day labor.

(2) Until July 28, 2022, for the purposes of this section, "lowest responsible bidder" means a bid that meets the criteria under RCW 39.04.350; and has the lowest bid, or has a bid that is within five percent of the lowest bid and meets the following supplemental criteria:

(a) The bidder has delivered at least one project of similar size and scope within the last five years for the city on time, within budget, and according to required specifications; and

(b) The bidder has not delivered a project to the city within the last five years that was late, over budget, or did not meet specifications.

(3) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city or town employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.

(((3)))(4) In lieu of the procedures of subsection (1) of this section, a second-class city or a town may let contracts using the small works roster process provided in RCW 39.04.155.

Whenever possible, the city or town shall invite at least one proposal from a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

(((4)))(5) The form required by RCW 43.09.205 shall be to account and record costs of public works in excess of five thousand dollars that are not let by contract.

(((5)))(6) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs of the materials, equipment, supplies, and labor on that construction project.

(((6)))(7) Any purchase of supplies, material, or equipment, except for public work or improvement, where the cost thereof exceeds seven thousand five hundred dollars shall be made upon call for bids.

(((7)))(8) Bids shall be called annually and at a time and in the manner prescribed by ordinance for the publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town of all notices or newspaper publications required by law. The contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder.

(((8)))(9) For advertisement and formal sealed bidding to be dispensed with as to purchases with an estimated value of fifteen thousand dollars or less, the council or commission must authorize by resolution, use of the uniform procedure provided in RCW 39.04.190.

(((9)))(10) The city or town legislative authority may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

(((10)))(11) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

(((11)))(12) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any second class city or any town from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

(((12)))(13)(a) Any second-class city or any town may procure public works with a unit priced contract under this section for the purpose of completing anticipated types of work based on hourly rates or unit pricing for one or more categories of work or trades.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "unit priced contract" means a competitively bid contract in which public works are anticipated on a recurring basis to meet the business or operational needs of the city or town, under which the contractor agrees to a fixed period indefinite quantity delivery of work, at a defined unit price for each category of work.

(c) Unit priced contracts must be executed for an initial contract term not to exceed three years, with the city or town having the option of extending or renewing the unit priced contract for one additional year.

(d) Invitations for unit price bids shall include, for purposes of the bid evaluation, estimated quantities of the anticipated types of work or trades, and specify how the city or town will issue or release work assignments, work orders, or task authorizations pursuant to a unit priced contract for projects, tasks, or other work based on the hourly rates or unit prices bid by the contractor. Contracts must be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder as per RCW 39.04.010. Whenever possible, the city or town must invite at least one proposal from a minority or woman contractor who otherwise qualifies under this section.

(e) Unit price contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. Prevailing wages for all work performed pursuant to each work order must be the prevailing wage rates in effect at the beginning date for each contract year. Unit priced contracts must have prevailing wage rates updated annually. Intents and affidavits for prevailing wages paid must be submitted annually for all work completed within the previous twelve-month period of the unit priced contract.

Sec. 6. RCW 35.22.620 and 2018 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section, the term "public works" means as defined in RCW 39.04.010.

(2) A first-class city may have public works performed by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids. As limited by subsection (3) of this section, a first-class city may have public works performed by city employees in any annual or biennial budget period equal to a dollar value not exceeding ten percent of the public works construction budget, including any amount in a supplemental public works construction budget, over the budget period. The amount of public works that a first-class city has a county perform for it under RCW 35.77.020 shall be included within this ten percent limitation.

If a first-class city has public works performed by public employees in any budget period that are in excess of this ten percent limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted amount shall be reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of public works that may be performed by public employees for that city in its next budget period. Twenty percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to that city shall be withheld if two years after the year in which the excess amount of work occurred, the city has failed to so reduce the amount of public works that it has performed by public employees. The amount so withheld shall be distributed to the city when it has demonstrated in its reports to the state auditor that the amount of public works it has performed by public employees has been so reduced.

Whenever a first-class city has had public works performed in any budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for that budget period, all remaining public works within that budget period shall be done by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids.

The state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any first-class city that exceeds this amount and the extent to which the city has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed by public employees in subsequent years.

(3) In addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection (2) of this section, a first-class city shall not have public employees perform a public works project in excess of ((ninety))one hundred sixteen thousand one hundred fifty-five thousand dollars if more than a single craft or trade is involved with the public works project, or a public works project in excess of ((forty-five thousand))seventy-five thousand five hundred dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved with the public works project or the public works project is street signalization or street lighting. A public works project means a complete project. The restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the project into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that may be performed by day labor on a single project.

(4) In addition to the accounting and recordkeeping requirements contained in RCW 39.04.070, every first-class city annually may prepare a report for the state auditor indicating the total public works construction budget and supplemental public works construction budget for that year, the total construction costs of public works performed by public employees for that year, and the amount of public works that is performed by public employees above or below ten percent of the total construction budget. However, if a city budgets on a biennial basis, this annual report may indicate the amount of public works that is performed by public employees within the current biennial period that is above or below ten percent of the total biennial construction budget.

Each first-class city with a population of one hundred fifty thousand or less shall use the form required by RCW 43.09.205 to account and record costs of public works in excess of five thousand dollars that are not let by contract.

(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs of materials, supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of that project. The value of the public works budget shall be the value of all the separate public works projects within the budget.

(6) The competitive bidding requirements of this section may be waived by the city legislative authority pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the work or contract.

(7) In lieu of the procedures of subsections (2) and (6) of this section, a first-class city may let contracts using the small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155.

Whenever possible, the city shall invite at least one proposal from a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

(8) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.

(9) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

(10) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any first-class city from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

(11)(a) Any first-class city may procure public works with a unit priced contract under this section for the purpose of completing anticipated types of work based on hourly rates or unit pricing for one or more categories of work or trades.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "unit priced contract" means a competitively bid contract in which public works are anticipated on a recurring basis to meet the business or operational needs of the city, under which the contractor agrees to a fixed period indefinite quantity delivery of work, at a defined unit price for each category of work.

(c) Unit priced contracts must be executed for an initial contract term not to exceed three years, with the city having the option of extending or renewing the unit priced contract for one additional year.

(d) Invitations for unit price bids shall include, for purposes of the bid evaluation, estimated quantities of the anticipated types of work or trades, and specify how the city will issue or release work assignments, work orders, or task authorizations pursuant to a unit priced contract for projects, tasks, or other work based on the hourly rates or unit prices bid by the contractor. Contracts must be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder as per RCW 39.04.010. Whenever possible, the city must invite at least one proposal from a minority or woman contractor who otherwise qualifies under this section.

(e) Unit price contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. Prevailing wages for all work performed pursuant to each work order must be the prevailing wage rates in effect at the beginning date for each contract year. Unit priced contracts must have prevailing wage rates updated annually. Intents and affidavits for prevailing wages paid must be submitted annually for all work completed within the previous twelve-month period of the unit priced contract.

Sec. 7. RCW 52.14.110 and 2009 c 229 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Insofar as practicable, purchases and any public works by the district shall be based on competitive bids. A formal sealed bid procedure shall be used as standard procedure for purchases and contracts for purchases executed by the board of commissioners. Formal sealed bidding shall not be required for:

(1) The purchase of any materials, supplies, or equipment if the cost will not exceed the sum of ((ten))forty thousand dollars. However, whenever the estimated cost does not exceed ((fifty))seventy-five thousand dollars, the commissioners may by resolution use the process provided in RCW 39.04.190 to award contracts;

(2) Contracting for work to be done involving the construction or improvement of a fire station or other buildings where the estimated cost will not exceed the sum of ((twenty))thirty thousand dollars, which includes the costs of labor, material, and equipment;

(3) Contracts using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155; and

(4) Any contract for purchases or public work pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec. 8. RCW 39.04.105 and 2003 c 300 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within two business days of the bid opening on a public works project that is the subject of competitive bids, the municipality must provide, if requested by a bidder, copies of the bids the municipality received for the project. The municipality shall then allow at least two full business days after providing bidders with copies of all bids before executing a contract for the project. Intermediate Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted.

(2) When a municipality receives a written protest from a bidder for a public works project ((which))that is the subject of competitive bids, the municipality ((shall))must not execute a contract for the project with anyone other than the protesting bidder without first providing at least two full business days' written notice of the municipality's intent to execute a contract for the project; provided that the protesting bidder submits notice in writing of its protest no later than:

(a) Two full business days following bid opening, if no bidder requested copies of the bids received for the project under subsection (1) of this section; or

(b) Two full business days following when the municipality provided copies of the bids to those bidders requesting bids under subsection (1) of this section. Intermediate Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. (1) The capital projects advisory review board must review the public works contracting processes for local governments, including the small works roster and limited public works processes provided in RCW 39.04.155, and report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2020. The report must include the following:

(a) Identification of the most common contracting procedures used by local governments;

(b) Identification of the dollar amounts set for local government public works contracting processes;

(c) Analysis of whether the dollar amounts identified in (b) of this subsection comport with estimated project costs within the relevant industries;

(d) An analysis of the potential application of an inflation-based increaser to the dollar amounts identified in (b) of this subsection, for example, applying the implicit price deflator for state and local government purchases of goods and services for the United States as published by the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce;

(e) Recommendations to increase uniformity and efficiency for local government public works contracting and procurement processes;

(f) Rates of participation of all contractor types, including qualified minority and women-owned and controlled businesses, in the small works roster and limited public works contracting processes; and

(g) Barriers to improving the participation rate in the small works roster and limited public works contracting processes.

(2) For purposes of this section, "local governments" refers to all counties, cities, towns, other political subdivisions, and special purpose districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1 through 9 of this act expire on March 31, 2021.

--- END ---