BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the appropriation of funds for this specific purpose, the state universities, regional universities, and the state college shall each employ at least one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans. The counselor must prioritize work with student veterans. Each institution's veteran resource center must make available information about mental health services offered by other agencies for veterans and the spouses and dependents of veterans. The mental health counselor must be accessible through, but not necessarily located in, each institution's veteran resource center.

--- END ---