BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess on, licensed child care center premises, child care center-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used exclusively by a child care center:

(a) Any firearm;

(b) Any other dangerous weapon as described in RCW 9.41.250;

(c) Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide, or other gas; or

(d)(i) Any portable device manufactured to function as a weapon and which is commonly known as a stun gun, including a projectile stun gun that projects wired probes that are attached to the device that emit an electrical charge designed to administer to a person or an animal an electric shock, charge, or impulse; or

(ii) Any device, object, or instrument that is used or intended to be used as a weapon with the intent to injure a person by an electric shock, charge, or impulse.

(2) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. If a person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any, revoked for a period of three years. Anyone convicted under subsection (1)(a) of this section is prohibited from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years from the date of conviction. The court shall send notice of the concealed pistol license revocation to the department of licensing and the city, town, or county that issued the concealed pistol license.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a) Family day care provider homes as defined in RCW 43.216.010;

(b) Any person at least eighteen years of age legally in possession of a firearm or dangerous weapon that is secured within an attended vehicle or concealed from view within a locked unattended vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the child care center; or

(c) Any law enforcement officer of a federal, state, or local government agency.

(4) Child care centers must post "GUN-FREE ZONE" signs giving warning of the prohibition of the possession of firearms on center premises.

(5) A child care center that is located on public or private elementary or secondary school premises is subject to the requirements of RCW 9.41.280.

(6) For the purposes of this section, child care center has the same meaning as "child day care center" as defined in RCW 43.216.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every child day care center and early childhood education and assistance program provider is subject to section 1 of this act.

(2)(a) A family day care provider must store any firearm, ammunition, or other dangerous weapon as described in RCW 9.41.250 in a secure area when children are present on the premises.

(b) The secure area must be inaccessible to children and must consist of a locked gun safe or a locked room. If stored in a locked room, each firearm must be stored unloaded and with a trigger lock or other disabling feature.

(3) The department may deny, suspend, revoke, modify or not renew the license of a child care provider in violation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:

The department must adopt rules to implement sections 1 and 2 of this act.

--- END ---