BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to separate the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors from the department of licensing and establish the board as a separate, independent state agency.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.43.020 and 2007 c 193 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Engineer" means a professional engineer as defined in this section.

(2) "Professional engineer" means a person who, by reason of his or her special knowledge of the mathematical and physical sciences and the principles and methods of engineering analysis and design, acquired by professional education and practical experience, is qualified to practice engineering as defined in this section, as attested by his or her legal registration as a professional engineer.

(3) "Engineer-in-training" means a candidate who: (a) Has satisfied the experience requirements in RCW 18.43.040 for registration; (b) has successfully passed the examination in the fundamental engineering subjects; and (c) is enrolled by the board as an engineer-in-training.

(4) "Engineering" means the "practice of engineering" as defined in this section.

(5)(a) "Practice of engineering" means any professional service or creative work requiring engineering education, training, and experience and the application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences to such professional services or creative work as consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, design, and supervision of construction for the purpose of assuring compliance with specifications and design, in connection with any public or private utilities, structures, buildings, machines, equipment, processes, works, or projects.

(b) A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice engineering, within the meaning and intent of this chapter, who practices any branch of the profession of engineering; or who, by verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other way represents himself or herself to be a professional engineer, or through the use of some other title implies that he or she is a professional engineer; or who holds himself or herself out as able to perform, or who does perform, any engineering service or work or any other professional service designated by the practitioner or recognized by educational authorities as engineering.

(c) The practice of engineering does not include the work ordinarily performed by persons who operate or maintain machinery or equipment.

(6) "Land surveyor" means a professional land surveyor.

(7) "Professional land surveyor" means a person who, by reason of his or her special knowledge of the mathematical and physical sciences and principles and practices of land surveying, which is acquired by professional education and practical experience, is qualified to practice land surveying and as attested to by his or her legal registration as a professional land surveyor.

(8) "Land-surveyor-in-training" means a candidate who: (a) Has satisfied the experience requirements in RCW 18.43.040 for registration; (b) successfully passes the examination in the fundamental land surveying subjects; and (c) is enrolled by the board as a land-surveyor-in-training.

(9) "Practice of land surveying" means assuming responsible charge of the surveying of land for the establishment of corners, lines, boundaries, and monuments, the laying out and subdivision of land, the defining and locating of corners, lines, boundaries, and monuments of land after they have been established, the survey of land areas for the purpose of determining the topography thereof, the making of topographical delineations and the preparing of maps and accurate records thereof, when the proper performance of such services requires technical knowledge and skill.

(10) "Board" means the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors, provided for by this chapter.

(11) "Significant structures" include:

(a) Hazardous facilities, defined as: Structures housing, supporting, or containing sufficient quantities of explosive substances to be of danger to the safety of the public if released;

(b) Essential facilities that have a ground area of more than five thousand square feet and are more than twenty feet in mean roof height above average ground level. Essential facilities are defined as:

(i) Hospitals and other medical facilities having surgery and emergency treatment areas;

(ii) Fire and police stations;

(iii) Tanks or other structures containing, housing, or supporting water or fire suppression material or equipment required for the protection of essential or hazardous facilities or special occupancy structures;

(iv) Emergency vehicle shelters and garages;

(v) Structures and equipment in emergency preparedness centers;

(vi) Standby power-generating equipment for essential facilities;

(vii) Structures and equipment in government communication centers and other facilities requiring emergency response;

(viii) Aviation control towers, air traffic control centers, and emergency aircraft hangars; and

(ix) Buildings and other structures having critical national defense functions;

(c) Structures exceeding one hundred feet in height above average ground level;

(d) Buildings that are customarily occupied by human beings and are five stories or more above average ground level;

(e) Bridges having a total span of more than two hundred feet and piers having a surface area greater than ten thousand square feet; and

(f) Buildings and other structures where more than three hundred people congregate in one area.

(12) "Director" means the executive director of the Washington state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.43.050 and 1995 c 356 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Application for registration shall be on forms prescribed by the board and furnished by the director, shall contain statements made under oath, showing the applicant's education and detail summary of his or her technical work and shall contain not less than five references, of whom three or more shall be engineers having personal knowledge of the applicant's engineering experience.

The registration fee for professional engineers shall be determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board, which shall accompany the application and shall include the cost of examination and issuance of certificate. The fee for engineer-in-training shall be determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board, which shall accompany the application and shall include the cost of examination and issuance of certificate.

The registration fee for professional land surveyors shall be determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board, which shall accompany the application and shall include the cost of examination and issuance of certificate. The fee for land-surveyor-in-training shall be determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board, which shall accompany the application and shall include the cost of examination and issuance of certificate.

Should the board find an applicant ineligible for registration, the registration fee shall be retained as an application fee.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.43.060 and 1991 c 19 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

When oral or written examinations are required, they shall be held at such time and place as the board shall determine. If examinations are required on fundamental engineering subjects (such as ordinarily given in college curricula) the applicant shall be permitted to take this part of the professional examination prior to his or her completion of the requisite years of experience in engineering work. The board shall issue to each applicant upon successfully passing the examination in fundamental engineering subjects a certificate stating that the applicant has passed the examination in fundamental engineering subjects and that his or her name has been recorded as an engineer-in-training.

The scope of the examination and the methods of procedure shall be prescribed by the board with special reference to the applicant's ability to design and supervise engineering works so as to insure the safety of life, health and property. Examinations shall be given for the purpose of determining the qualifications of applicants for registration separately in engineering and in land surveying. A candidate failing an examination may apply for reexamination. Subsequent examinations will be granted upon payment of a fee to be determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.43.070 and 2011 c 336 s 482 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((director of licensing))board shall issue a certificate of registration upon payment of a registration fee as provided for in this chapter, to any applicant who, in the opinion of the board, has satisfactorily met all the requirements of this chapter. In case of a registered engineer, the certificate shall authorize the practice of "professional engineering" and specify the branch or branches in which specialized, and in case of a registered land surveyor, the certificate shall authorize the practice of "land surveying."

In case of engineer-in-training, the certificate shall state that the applicant has successfully passed the examination in fundamental engineering subjects required by the board and has been enrolled as an "engineer-in-training." In case of land-surveyor-in-training, the certificate shall state that the applicant has successfully passed the examination in fundamental surveying subjects required by the board and has been enrolled as a "land-surveyor-in-training." All certificates of registration shall show the full name of the registrant, shall have a serial number, and shall be signed by the chair and the secretary of the board and by the director ((of licensing)).

The issuance of a certificate of registration by the ((director of licensing))board shall be prima facie evidence that the person named therein is entitled to all the rights and privileges of a registered professional engineer or a registered land surveyor, while the said certificate remains unrevoked and unexpired.

Each registrant hereunder shall upon registration obtain a seal of the design authorized by the board, bearing the registrant's name and the legend "registered professional engineer" or "registered land surveyor." Plans, specifications, plats, and reports prepared by the registrant shall be signed, dated, and stamped with said seal or facsimile thereof. Such signature and stamping shall constitute a certification by the registrant that the same was prepared by or under his or her direct supervision and that to his or her knowledge and belief the same was prepared in accordance with the requirements of the statute. It shall be unlawful for anyone to stamp or seal any document with said seal or facsimile thereof after the certificate of registrant named thereon has expired or been revoked, unless said certificate shall have been renewed or reissued.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.43.080 and 2005 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Certificates of registration, and certificates of authorization and renewals thereof, shall expire on the last day of the month of December following their issuance or renewal and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. It shall be the duty of the ((administrator of the division of professional licensing))board to notify every person, firm, or corporation registered under this chapter of the date of the expiration of his or her certificate and the amount of the renewal fee that shall be required for its renewal for one year. Such notice shall be mailed at least thirty days before the end of December of each year. Renewal may be effected during the month of December by the payment of a fee determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board. In case any professional engineer and/or land surveyor registered under this chapter shall fail to pay the renewal fee hereinabove provided for, within ninety days from the date when the same shall become due, the renewal fee shall be the current fee plus an amount equal to one year's fee.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2007, the ((department of licensing))board may not renew a certificate of registration for a land surveyor unless the registrant verifies to the board that he or she has completed at least fifteen hours of continuing professional development per year of the registration period. By July 1, 2006, the board shall adopt rules governing continuing professional development for land surveyors that are generally patterned after the model rules of the national council of examiners for engineering and surveying.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.43.100 and 1991 c 19 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may, upon application and the payment of a fee determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board, issue a certificate without further examination as a professional engineer or land surveyor to any person who holds a certificate of qualification of registration issued to the applicant following examination by proper authority, of any state or territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or of any foreign country, provided: (1) That the applicant's qualifications meet the requirements of the chapter and the rules established by the board, and (2) that the applicant is in good standing with the licensing agency in said state, territory, possession, district, or foreign country.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.43.110 and 2002 c 86 s 226 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall have the exclusive power to discipline the registrant and sanction the certificate of registration of any registrant.

Any person may file a complaint alleging unprofessional conduct, as set out in RCW ((18.235.130 and)) 18.43.105, against any registrant. The complaint shall be in writing and shall be sworn to in writing by the person making the allegation. A registrant against whom a complaint was made must be immediately informed of such complaint by the board.

The board, for reasons it deems sufficient, may reissue a certificate of registration to any person whose certificate has been revoked or suspended, providing a majority of the board vote in favor of such issuance. A new certificate of registration to replace any certificate revoked, lost, destroyed, or mutilated may be issued, subject to the rules of the board, and a charge determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board shall be made for such issuance.

In addition to the imposition of disciplinary action under RCW 18.235.110 and 18.43.105, the board may refer violations of this chapter to the appropriate prosecuting attorney for charges under RCW 18.43.120.

Sec. 9. RCW 18.43.130 and 2002 c 86 s 227 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall not be construed to prevent or affect:

(1) The practice of any other legally recognized profession or trade; or

(2) The practice of a person not a resident and having no established place of business in this state, practicing or offering to practice herein the profession of engineering or land surveying, when such practice does not exceed in the aggregate more than thirty days in any calendar year: PROVIDED, Such person has been determined by the board to be legally qualified by registration to practice the said profession in his or her own state or country in which the requirements and qualifications for obtaining a certificate of registration are not lower than those specified in this chapter. The person shall request such a determination by completing an application prescribed by the board and accompanied by a fee determined by the ((director))board. Upon approval of the application, the board shall issue a permit authorizing temporary practice; or

(3) The practice of a person not a resident and having no established place of business in this state, or who has recently become a resident thereof, practicing or offering to practice herein for more than thirty days in any calendar year the profession of engineering or land surveying, if he or she shall have filed with the board an application for a certificate of registration and shall have paid the fee required by this chapter: PROVIDED, That such person is legally qualified by registration to practice engineering or land surveying in his or her own state or country in which the requirements and qualifications of obtaining a certificate of registration are not lower than those specified in this chapter. Such practice shall continue only for such time as the board requires for the consideration of the application for registration; or

(4) The work of an employee or a subordinate of a person holding a certificate of registration under this chapter, or an employee of a person practicing lawfully under provisions of this section: PROVIDED, That such work does not include final design or decisions and is done under the direct responsibility, checking, and supervision of a person holding a certificate of registration under this chapter or a person practicing lawfully under the provisions of this section; or

(5) The work of a person rendering engineering or land surveying services to a corporation, as an employee of such corporation, when such services are rendered in carrying on the general business of the corporation and such general business does not consist, either wholly or in part, of the rendering of engineering services to the general public: PROVIDED, That such corporation employs at least one person holding a certificate of registration under this chapter or practicing lawfully under the provisions of this chapter; or

(6) The practice of officers or employees of the government of the United States while engaged within the state in the practice of the profession of engineering or land surveying for the government of the United States; or

(7) Nonresident engineers employed for the purpose of making engineering examinations; or

(8) The practice of engineering or land surveying, or both, in this state by a corporation or joint stock association: PROVIDED, That

(a) The corporation has filed with the board an application for certificate of authorization upon a form to be prescribed by the board and containing information required to enable the board to determine whether such corporation is qualified in accordance with this chapter to practice engineering or land surveying, or both, in this state;

(b) For engineering, the corporation has filed with the board a certified copy of a resolution of the board of directors of the corporation that shall designate a person holding a certificate of registration under this chapter as responsible for the practice of engineering by the corporation in this state and shall provide that full authority to make all final engineering decisions on behalf of the corporation with respect to work performed by the corporation in this state shall be granted and delegated by the board of directors to the person so designated in the resolution. For land surveying, the corporation has filed with the board a certified copy of a resolution of the board of directors of the corporation which shall designate a person holding a certificate of registration under this chapter as responsible for the practice of land surveying by the corporation in this state and shall provide full authority to make all final land surveying decisions on behalf of the corporation with respect to work performed by the corporation in this state be granted and delegated by the board of directors to the person so designated in the resolution. If a corporation offers both engineering and land surveying services, the board of directors shall designate both a licensed engineer and a licensed land surveyor. If a person is licensed in both engineering and land surveying, the person may be designated for both professions. The resolution shall further state that the bylaws of the corporation shall be amended to include the following provision: "The designated engineer or land surveyor, respectively, named in the resolution as being in responsible charge, or an engineer or land surveyor under the designated engineer or land surveyor's direct supervision, shall make all engineering or land surveying decisions pertaining to engineering or land surveying activities in the state of Washington." However, the filing of the resolution shall not relieve the corporation of any responsibility or liability imposed upon it by law or by contract;

(c) If there is a change in the designated engineer or designated land surveyor, the corporation shall notify the board in writing within thirty days after the effective date of the change. If the corporation changes its name, the corporation shall submit a copy of its amended certificate of authority or amended certificate of incorporation as filed with the secretary of state within thirty days of the filing;

(d) Upon the filing with the board the application for certificate for authorization, certified copy of resolution and an affidavit, the designation of a designated engineer or designated land surveyor, or both, specified in (b) of this subsection, a certificate of incorporation or certificate of authorization as filed with the secretary of state, and a copy of the corporation's current Washington business license, the board shall issue to the corporation a certificate of authorization to practice engineering or land surveying, or both, in this state upon a determination by the board that:

(i) The designated engineer or designated land surveyor, or both, hold a certificate of registration in this state in accordance with this chapter and the certificate is in force;

(ii) The designated engineer or designated land surveyor, or both, are not designated in responsible charge for another corporation or a limited liability company; and

(iii) The corporation is licensed with the secretary of state and holds a current unified business identification number and the board determines, based on evaluating the findings and information in this section, that the applicant corporation possesses the ability and competence to furnish engineering or land surveying services, or both, in the public interest.

The board may exercise its discretion to take any of the actions under RCW 18.235.110 or this chapter with respect to a certificate of authorization issued to a corporation if the board finds that any of the officers, directors, incorporators, or the stockholders holding a majority of stock of such corporation has engaged in unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.43.105 or 18.235.130 or has been found personally responsible for unprofessional conduct under (f) and (g) of this subsection.

(e) Engineers or land surveyors organized as a professional service corporation under chapter 18.100 RCW are exempt from applying for a certificate of authorization under this chapter.

(f) Any corporation authorized to practice engineering under this chapter, together with its directors and officers for their own individual acts, are responsible to the same degree as an individual registered engineer, and must conduct its business without unprofessional conduct in the practice of engineering as defined in this chapter and RCW 18.235.130.

(g) Any corporation that is certified under this chapter is subject to the authority of the board as provided in RCW 18.43.035, 18.43.105, 18.43.110, 18.43.120, and chapter 18.235 RCW.

(h) All plans, specifications, designs, and reports when issued in connection with work performed by a corporation under its certificate of authorization shall be prepared by or under the direct supervision of and shall be signed by and shall be stamped with the official seal of a person holding a certificate of registration under this chapter.

(i) For each certificate of authorization issued under this subsection (8) there shall be paid an initial fee determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board and an annual renewal fee determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board.

(9) The practice of engineering and/or land surveying in this state by a partnership if the partnership employs at least one person holding a valid certificate of registration under this chapter to practice engineering or land surveying, or both. The board shall not issue certificates of authorization to partnerships after July 1, 1998. Partnerships currently registered with the board are not required to pay an annual renewal fee after July 1, 1998.

(10) The practice of engineering or land surveying, or both, in this state by limited liability companies: Provided, That

(a) The limited liability company has filed with the board an application for certificate of authorization upon a form to be prescribed by the board and containing information required to enable the board to determine whether the limited liability company is qualified under this chapter to practice either or both engineering or land surveying in this state.

(b) The limited liability company has filed with the board a certified copy of a resolution by the company manager or managers that shall designate a person holding a certificate of registration under this chapter as being responsible for the practice of engineering or land surveying, or both, by the limited liability company in this state and that the designated person has full authority to make all final engineering or land surveying decisions on behalf of the limited liability company with respect to work performed by the limited liability company in this state. The resolution shall further state that the limited liability company agreement shall be amended to include the following provision: "The designated engineer or land surveyor, respectively, named in the resolution as being in responsible charge, or an engineer or land surveyor under the designated engineer or land surveyor's direct supervision, shall make all engineering or land surveying decisions pertaining to engineering or land surveying activities in the state of Washington." However, the filing of the resolution shall not relieve the limited liability company of responsibility or liability imposed upon it by law or by contract.

(c) The designated engineer for the limited liability company must hold a current professional engineer license issued by this state.

The designated land surveyor for the limited liability company must hold a current professional land surveyor license issued by this state.

If a person is licensed as both a professional engineer and as a professional land surveyor in this state, then the limited liability company may designate the person as being in responsible charge for both professions.

If there is a change in the designated engineer or designated land surveyor, the limited liability company shall notify the board in writing within thirty days after the effective date of the change. If the limited liability company changes its name, the company shall submit to the board a copy of the certificate of amendment filed with the secretary of state's office.

(d) Upon the filing with the board the application for certificate of authorization, a certified copy of the resolution, an affidavit from the designated engineer or the designated land surveyor, or both, specified in (b) and (c) of this subsection, a copy of the certificate of formation as filed with the secretary of state, and a copy of the company's current business license, the board shall issue to the limited liability company a certificate of authorization to practice engineering or land surveying, or both, in this state upon determination by the board that:

(i) The designated engineer or designated land surveyor, or both, hold a certificate of registration in this state under this chapter and the certificate is in force;

(ii) The designated engineer or designated land surveyor, or both, are not designated in responsible charge for another limited liability company or a corporation;

(iii) The limited liability company is licensed with the secretary of state and has a current unified business identification number and that the board determines, based on evaluating the findings and information under this subsection, that the applicant limited liability company possesses the ability and competence to furnish either or both engineering or land surveying services in the public interest.

The board may exercise its discretion to take any of the actions under RCW 18.235.110 and 18.43.105 with respect to a certificate of authorization issued to a limited liability company if the board finds that any of the managers or members holding a majority interest in the limited liability company has engaged in unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.43.105 or 18.235.130 or has been found personally responsible for unprofessional conduct under the provisions of (f) and (g) of this subsection.

(e) Engineers or land surveyors organized as a professional limited liability company are exempt from applying for a certificate of authorization under this chapter.

(f) Any limited liability company authorized to practice engineering or land surveying, or both, under this chapter, together with its manager or managers and members for their own individual acts, are responsible to the same degree as an individual registered engineer or registered land surveyor, and must conduct their business without unprofessional conduct in the practice of engineering or land surveying, or both.

(g) A limited liability company that is certified under this chapter is subject to the authority of the board as provided in RCW 18.43.035, 18.43.105, 18.43.110, 18.43.120, and chapter 18.235 RCW.

(h) All plans, specifications, designs, and reports when issued in connection with work performed by a limited liability company under its certificate of authorization shall be prepared by or under the direct supervision of and shall be signed by and shall be stamped with the official seal of a person holding a certificate of registration under this chapter.

(i) For each certificate of authorization issued under this subsection (10) there shall be paid an initial fee determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board and an annual renewal fee determined by the ((director as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.43.150 and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 913 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall set fees at a level adequate to pay the costs of administering this chapter. All fees collected under the provisions of RCW 18.43.050, 18.43.060, 18.43.080, 18.43.100, and 18.43.130 and fines collected under RCW 18.43.110 shall be paid into the professional engineers' account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury to be used to carry out the purposes and provisions of RCW 18.43.050, 18.43.060, 18.43.080, 18.43.100, 18.43.110, 18.43.120, 18.43.130, and all other duties required for operation and enforcement of this chapter. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium [biennia]))biennia, the legislature may transfer moneys from the professional engineers' account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.210.010 and 2011 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors as defined in chapter 18.43 RCW.

(2) "Certificate of competency" or "certificate" means a certificate issued to employees of local health jurisdictions indicating that the certificate holder has passed the licensing examination required under this chapter.

(3) "Designer" or "licensee" means an individual authorized under this chapter to perform design services for on-site wastewater treatment systems.

(4) "Director" means the executive director of the Washington state ((department of licensing))board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors.

(5) "Engineer" means a professional engineer licensed under chapter 18.43 RCW.

(6) "License" means a license to design on-site wastewater treatment systems under this chapter.

(7) "Local health jurisdiction" or "jurisdictional health department" means an administrative agency created under chapter 70.05, 70.08, or 70.46 RCW, that administers the regulation and codes regarding on-site wastewater treatment systems.

(8) "On-site wastewater design" means the development of plans, details, specifications, instructions, or inspections by application of specialized knowledge in analysis of soils, on-site wastewater treatment systems, disposal methods, and technologies to create an integrated system of collection, transport, distribution, treatment, and disposal of on-site wastewater.

(9) "On-site wastewater treatment system" means an integrated system of components that: Convey, store, treat, and/or provide subsurface soil treatment and disposal of wastewater effluent on the property where it originates or on adjacent or other property and includes piping, treatment devices, other accessories, and soil underlying the disposal component of the initial and reserve areas, for on-site wastewater treatment under three thousand five hundred gallons per day when not connected to a public sewer system.

(10) "Practice of engineering" has the meaning set forth in RCW 18.43.020(5).

Sec. 12. RCW 18.210.050 and 2011 c 256 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((director))board may:

(1) Employ administrative, clerical, and investigative staff as necessary to administer and enforce this chapter;

(2) Establish fees for applications, examinations, and renewals in accordance with chapter ((43.24))18.43 RCW;

(3) Issue licenses to applicants who meet the requirements of this chapter; and

(4) Exercise rule-making authority to implement this section.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.210.120 and 2011 c 256 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Application for licensure must be on forms prescribed by the board and furnished by the director. The application must contain statements, made under oath, demonstrating the applicant's education and work experience.

(2) Applicants shall provide not less than two verifications of experience. Verifications of experience may be provided by licensed professional engineers, licensed on-site wastewater treatment system designers, or state/local regulatory officials in the on-site wastewater treatment field who have direct knowledge of the applicant's qualifications to practice in accordance with this chapter and who can verify the applicant's work experience.

(3) The ((director, as provided in RCW 43.24.086))board, shall determine an application fee for licensure as an on-site wastewater treatment system designer. A nonrefundable application fee must accompany the application. The ((director))board shall ensure that the application fee includes the cost of the examination and the cost issuance of a license and certificate. A candidate who fails an examination may apply for reexamination. The ((director))board shall determine the fee for reexamination.

Sec. 14. RCW 18.210.140 and 2011 c 256 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Licenses and certificates issued under this chapter are valid for a period of time as determined by the ((director))board and may be renewed under the conditions described in this chapter. An expired license or certificate is invalid and must be renewed. Any licensee or certificate holder who fails to pay the renewal fee within ninety days following the date of expiration shall be assessed a penalty fee as determined by the ((director))board and must pay the penalty fee and the base renewal fee before the license or certificate may be renewed.

(2) Any license issued under this chapter that is not renewed within two years of its date of expiration must be canceled. Following cancellation, a person seeking to renew must reapply as a new applicant under this chapter.

(3) The ((director, as provided in RCW 43.24.086,))board shall determine the fee for applications and for renewals of licenses and certificates issued under this chapter. For determining renewal fees, the pool of licensees and certificate holders under this chapter must be combined with the licensees established in chapter 18.43 RCW.

Sec. 15. RCW 18.43.035 and 2002 c 86 s 224 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may adopt and amend bylaws establishing its organization and method of operation, including but not limited to meetings, maintenance of books and records, publication of reports, code of ethics, and rosters, and adoption and use of a seal.

(2) Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of any business of the board.

(3) The governor shall appoint an executive director of the board. The executive director must hold a valid Washington license as a professional engineer or professional land surveyor.

(4) The board may employ such persons as are necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter.

(5) It may adopt rules reasonably necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter. The board shall submit to the governor ((such)) periodic reports as may be required. A roster, showing the names and places of business of all registered professional engineers and land surveyors may be published for distribution, upon request, to professional engineers and land surveyors registered under this chapter and to the public.

Sec. 16. RCW 70.118.120 and 1999 c 263 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The local board of health shall ensure that individuals who conduct inspections of on-site wastewater treatment systems or who otherwise conduct reviews of such systems are qualified in the technology and application of on-site sewage treatment principles. A certificate of competency issued by the ((department of licensing))state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors is adequate demonstration that an individual is competent in the engineering aspects of on-site wastewater treatment system technology.

(2) A local board of health may allow noncertified individuals to review designs of, and conduct inspections of, on-site wastewater treatment systems for a maximum of two years after the date of hire, if a certified individual reviews or supervises the work during that time.

Sec. 17. RCW 18.235.010 and 2017 c 281 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means those boards specified in RCW 18.235.020(2)(b).

(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(3)(a) "Director" means the:

(i) Executive director of the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors for matters under the authority of the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors established under chapter 18.43 RCW; or

(ii) Director of the department or the director's designee in all other contexts.

(b) The director of the department has no authority under this chapter over the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors.

(4) "Disciplinary action" means sanctions identified in RCW 18.235.110.

(5) "Disciplinary authority" means the director, board, or commission having the authority to take disciplinary action against a holder of, or applicant for, a professional or business license upon a finding of a violation of this chapter or a chapter specified under RCW 18.235.020.

(6) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" are deemed equivalent to the terms "license," "licensing," "licensure," "certificate," "certification," and "registration" as those terms are defined in RCW 18.118.020. Each of these terms, and the term "commission" under chapter 42.45 RCW, are interchangeable under the provisions of this chapter.

(7) "Unlicensed practice" means:

(a) Practicing a profession or operating a business identified in RCW 18.235.020 without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, and unsuspended license to do so; or

(b) Representing to a person, through offerings, advertisements, or use of a professional title or designation, that the individual or business is qualified to practice a profession or operate a business identified in RCW 18.235.020 without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, and unsuspended license to do so.

Sec. 18. RCW 18.210.200 and 1999 c 263 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall set fees at a level adequate to pay the costs of administering this chapter. All fees and fines collected under this chapter shall be paid into the professional engineers' account established under RCW 18.43.150. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation and must be used to carry out all the purposes and provisions of this chapter and chapter 18.43 RCW, including the cost of administering this chapter.

(2) The director shall biennially prepare a budget request based on the anticipated cost of administering licensing and certification activities. The budget request shall include the estimated income from fees contained in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. A new section is added to chapter 18.43 RCW to read as follows:

The department of licensing, through an interagency agreement with the board, must provide specified administrative staff support and associated technical services, materials, and equipment to the board. The initial interagency agreement must be for a term of three years and may be renewed by mutual agreement between the department of licensing and the board.

--- END ---