BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is a retailer's license designated as a promoter special event license to sell spirits, beer, wine, and cider by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified event at a specified date and time. Sale, service, and consumption of alcohol at the event is to be confined to specified premises or designated areas only. The fee for a promoter special event license is one hundred fifty dollars for each event.

(2) Promoter special event licensees may also:

(a) Sell at retail at the licensed event wine, malt beverages, and cider in factory-sealed containers for off-premises consumption; and

(b) Sell at retail wine or beer in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale for off-premises consumption.

(3) All alcohol at the licensed special event may only be provided by vendors with temporary special event licenses issued pursuant to section 2, 3, or 4 of this act.

(4) Applicants for a promoter special event license must submit a management plan for board approval detailing, at a minimum, how minors will be prevented from gaining access to alcoholic beverages at the designated event.

(5) Every person who participates in any manner in the service of alcohol must obtain a class 12 alcohol server permit.

(6) License issuance under this section is subject to RCW 66.24.010 and the regulations adopted thereunder.

(7) The board must establish rules necessary to implement this section including, but not limited to:

(a) Additional eligibility requirements to receive a promoter special event license;

(b) Food service requirements for the designated event; and

(c) Minimum insurance requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) At a special event licensed under section 1 of this act, there is a retailer's license designated as a temporary special event distiller vendor license for distillers licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or 66.24.145 to:

(a) Sell spirits of its own production by the individual serving for on-premises consumption; and

(b) Sell spirits of its own production in original sealed containers for off-premises consumption.

(2) The fee for a temporary special event distiller license is fifteen dollars per day.

(3) Licenses issued under this section may not be for a period of time exceeding five days.

(4) Every person who participates in any manner in the service of spirits must obtain a class 12 alcohol server permit.

(5) Applicants for a temporary special event distiller license must demonstrate adequate liquor liability insurance for the event.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) At a special event licensed under section 1 of this act, there is a retailer's license designated as a temporary special event winery vendor license for wineries licensed under RCW 66.24.170 to, within a location licensed under section 1 of this act:

(a) Sell wine and cider of its own production by the individual serving for on-premises consumption;

(b) Sell bottled wine and cider of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption; and

(c) Sell wine and cider of its own production for off-premises consumption in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.

(2) The fee for the temporary special event winery vendor license is fifteen dollars per day.

(3) A license under this section may not be issued for a period of time exceeding five days.

(4) Every person who participates in any manner in the service of wine must obtain a class 12 alcohol server permit.

(5) Applicants for a temporary special event winery license must demonstrate adequate liquor liability insurance for the event.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) At a special event licensed under section 1 of this act, there is a retailer's license designated as a temporary special event brewery license for breweries licensed under RCW 66.24.240 or 66.24.244 to:

(a) Sell beer, including strong beer, of its own production by the individual serving for on-premises consumption;

(b) Sell beer, including strong beer, of its own production in brewery-sealed packaging for off-premises consumption; and

(c) Sell beer, including strong beer, of its own production for off-premises consumption in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of purchase.

(2) The fee for a temporary special event brewery license is fifteen dollars per day.

(3) A license issued under this section may not be issued for a period of time exceeding five days.

(4) Every person who participates in any manner in the service of beer must obtain a class 12 alcohol server permit.

(5) Applicants for a temporary special event winery license must demonstrate adequate liquor liability insurance for the event.

--- END ---