BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.232.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall separately calculate and allocate moneys appropriated under RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for each full-time equivalent student enrolled in an alternative learning experience course. The calculation shall be based on the estimated statewide annual average allocation per full-time equivalent student in grades nine through twelve in general education, excluding small high school enhancements, and including applicable rules and provisions of the omnibus appropriations act.

(2) In addition to the allocation provided under subsection (1) of this section, if the course is a vocational alternative learning experience course, the allocated state funding shall also include vocational program funding enhancement, subject to RCW 28A.150.265.

--- END ---