BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.065 and 2014 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be in the county of Grant, three judges of the superior court; in the county of Okanogan, two judges of the superior court; in the county of Mason, three judges of the superior court; in the county of Thurston, eight judges of the superior court; in the counties of Pacific and Wahkiakum jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the counties of Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens jointly, ((two))three judges of the superior court; in the county of San Juan, one judge of the superior court; and in the county of Island, two judges of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act is effective only if Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens counties, jointly through their duly constituted legislative authorities, document their approval of the additional position and their agreement that they will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by state law and the state Constitution.

(2) The judicial position created by section 1 of this act is effective no later than January 1, 2020. An earlier starting date for the position may be established by joint action of the duly constituted legislative authorities of Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens counties, upon request of the superior court and by recommendation of the executive authorities of each of Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens counties, if any.

--- END ---