BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.64.360 and 2013 c 19 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this chapter any pharmacy located outside this state that ships, mails, or delivers, in any manner, except when delivered in person to an individual, controlled substances, legend drugs, or devices into this state is a nonresident pharmacy, and shall be licensed by the department of health, and shall disclose to the department the following:

(a) The location, names, and titles of all owners including corporate officers and all pharmacists employed by the pharmacy who are dispensing controlled substances, legend drugs, or devices to residents of this state. A report containing this information shall be made on an annual basis and within ninety days after a change of location, corporate officer, or pharmacist;

(b) Proof of compliance with all lawful directions and requests for information from the regulatory or licensing agency of the state or Canadian province in which it is licensed as well as with all requests for information made by the department of health under this section. The nonresident pharmacy shall maintain, at all times, a valid unexpired license, permit, or registration to operate the pharmacy in compliance with the laws of the state or Canadian province in which it is located. As a prerequisite ((to be licensed by the department of health, the nonresident pharmacy shall submit a copy of the most recent inspection report issued by the regulatory licensing agency of the state or Canadian province in which it is located;))for initial licensure and renewal of a license by the department of health, the nonresident pharmacy must submit a copy of an inspection report:

(i) Conducted by an inspection program approved by the commission as having substantially equivalent standards to those of the commission; and

(ii) Issued within two years of application or renewal of a license; and

(c) Proof that it maintains its records of controlled substances, legend drugs, or devices dispensed to patients in this state so that the records are readily retrievable from the records of other drugs dispensed.

(2) Any pharmacy subject to this section shall, during its regular hours of operation, provide a toll-free telephone service to facilitate communication between patients in this state and a pharmacist at the pharmacy who has access to the patient's records. This toll-free number shall be disclosed on the label affixed to each container of drugs dispensed to patients in this state.

(3) A pharmacy subject to this section shall comply with commission rules regarding the maintenance and use of patient medication record systems.

(4) A pharmacy subject to this section shall comply with commission rules regarding the provision of drug information to the patient. Drug information may be contained in written form setting forth directions for use and any additional information necessary to assure the proper utilization of the medication prescribed. A label bearing the expiration date of the prescription must be affixed to each box, bottle, jar, tube, or other container of a prescription that is dispensed in this state by a pharmacy subject to this section.

(5) A pharmacy subject to this section shall not dispense medication in a quantity greater than authorized by the prescriber.

(6) The license fee specified by the secretary, in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.70.250, shall not exceed the fee charged to a pharmacy located in this state.

(7) The license requirements of this section apply to nonresident pharmacies that ship, mail, or deliver controlled substances, legend drugs, and devices into this state only under a prescription. The commission may grant an exemption from licensing under this section upon application by an out-of-state pharmacy that restricts its dispensing activity in Washington to isolated transactions.

(8) Each nonresident pharmacy that ships, mails, or delivers legend drugs or devices into this state shall designate a resident agent in Washington for service of process. The designation of such an agent does not indicate that the nonresident pharmacy is a resident of Washington for tax purposes.

(9) The commission shall attempt to develop a reciprocal licensing agreement for licensure of nonresident pharmacies with Health Canada or an applicable Canadian province. If the commission is unable to develop such an agreement, the commission shall develop a process to license participating Canadian nonresident pharmacies through on-site inspection and certification.

--- END ---