BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, school districts that receive funds under Title I, Part C of the federal elementary and secondary education act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) may select a program of their own choosing for the purposes of student credit retrieval.

(b) School districts selecting programs under (a) of this subsection must offer at least one program with bilingual instruction.

(2) In choosing programs under this section, school districts must comply with appropriate federal guidelines and regulations.

--- END ---