BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 31.12.185 and 1997 c 397 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A credit union's annual membership meeting shall be held at such time and ((place))in such manner as the bylaws prescribe, and shall be conducted according to the rules of procedure approved by the board.

(2) Notice of the annual membership meetings of a credit union shall be given as provided in the bylaws of the credit union.

Sec. 2. RCW 31.12.195 and 2017 c 61 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A special membership meeting of a credit union may be called by:

(a) A majority vote of the board;

(b) Written petition signed or similarly authenticated by at least ten percent or two thousand of the members of a credit union, whichever is less;

(c) A unanimous vote of the supervisory committee for the purpose of presenting and discussing a special report by the supervisory committee regarding the failure of the board to adequately respond within a reasonable time frame to findings or recommendations previously provided to the board by the supervisory committee pursuant to RCW 31.12.335; or

(d) Unanimous vote of the supervisory committee to suspend a director for cause pursuant to RCW 31.12.345 if the supervisory committee has provided the director and the board with written notice of such cause and a statement of reasons why cause was found, and the board and the director have failed to act within a reasonable period to rectify the activity that constitutes cause.

(2) A call of a special membership meeting of a credit union shall be in writing submitted to the secretary of the credit union by the board, the petitioners, or the supervisory committee as applicable, and shall state specifically the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called and the agenda item or items for consideration by the members at the meeting. If the special membership meeting is called for the removal of one or more directors or supervisory committee members, the call shall state the name of each individual whose removal is sought.

(3)(a) Upon receipt of a call for a special membership meeting, the secretary of the credit union shall determine whether the call satisfies the requirements of this section. If so, the secretary shall determine the date((,))and time((, and place at))on which the special membership meeting will be held, and provide notice of the special membership meeting in accordance with the requirements of this subsection and the credit union's bylaws. ((The special membership meeting must be held at a reasonable location within the county in which the principal place of business of the credit union is located, unless provided otherwise by the bylaws.)) The special membership meeting must be held no later than ninety days after the date on which the call is received by the secretary.

(b) The secretary shall give notice of the special membership meeting at least thirty days before the date of the meeting, or within such other reasonable time period as may be provided by the bylaws. The notice must state the purpose or purposes for which the special membership meeting is called, and the agenda items for the meeting. If the special membership meeting is called for the removal of one or more directors or supervisory committee members, the notice must state the name of each individual whose removal is sought.

(4) Except as provided in this subsection, the chairperson of the board shall preside over special membership meetings. If the purpose of the special membership meeting includes the removal of the chairperson, the next highest ranking board officer whose removal is not sought shall preside over the meeting. If the removal of all board officers is sought, the chairperson of the supervisory committee shall preside over the special membership meeting.

(5) At the special membership meeting, only those agenda items that are stated in the notice for the meeting may be considered.

(6) Special membership meetings shall be conducted according to the rules of procedure approved by the board.

Sec. 3. RCW 31.12.335 and 2017 c 61 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The supervisory committee of a credit union shall:

(a) Keep informed as to the financial condition of the credit union and the decisions of the credit union's board;

(b) Perform or arrange for:

(i) A complete annual audit of the credit union; and

(ii) A verification of its members' accounts at least once every two years, and shall provide any related findings and recommendations from such audits and verifications to the board;

(c) Provide an annual report to members at each annual membership meeting;

(d) Perform or arrange for additional audits as requested by the board or management or as deemed necessary by the supervisory committee and provide any related findings and recommendations to management or the board as deemed appropriate by the supervisory committee;

(e) Monitor the implementation of management responses to material adverse findings in audits and regulatory examinations;

(f) Implement a process for the supervisory committee to receive and respond to whistleblower complaints; and

(g) Perform any additional duties as specified by the board or in the credit union's bylaws.

(2) The supervisory committee may in its sole discretion retain, at the credit union's expense, independent counsel or other professional advisors or consultants as necessary to perform the duties under this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 31.12.382 and 1994 c 92 s 178 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Membership in a credit union shall be limited to groups having a common bond of occupation or association, or to groups within a well-defined neighborhood, community, or rural district. The director may adopt rules: (a) Reasonably defining "common bond"; and (b) setting forth standards for the approval of charters.

(2) The director may approve the inclusion within the field of membership of a credit union a group having a separate common bond if the director determines that the group is not of sufficient size or resources to support a viable credit union of its own.

(3) The director may approve, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the inclusion within a credit union's field of membership of groups having a common bond of occupation or association, or groups within a well-defined neighborhood, community, or rural district, notwithstanding the fact that such groups are situated partially or wholly outside this state.

Sec. 5. RCW 31.12.404 and 2017 c 61 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to all powers and authorities, express or implied, that a credit union has under the laws of this state, a credit union has the powers and authorities that a federal credit union had on December 31, 1993, or a subsequent date not later than ((July 23, 2017))the effective date of this section.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to the powers and authorities, express or implied, that a credit union has under subsection (1) of this section, a credit union has the powers and authorities that a federal credit union has((, and an out-of-state credit union operating a branch in Washington has,)) subsequent to ((July 23, 2017))the effective date of this section, if the director finds that the exercise of the power and authority serves the convenience and advantage of members of credit unions, and maintains the fairness of competition and parity between credit unions and federal ((or out-of-state)) credit unions. However, a credit union((:

(a)))must ((still)) comply with RCW 31.12.408((; and

(b) Is not granted the field of membership powers or authorities of any out-of-state credit union operating a branch in Washington)).

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to the powers and authorities, express or implied, that a credit union has under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a credit union may exercise the powers and authorities that it would have if it were an out-of-state credit union. Any such power or authority is subject to regulation by the director. In exercising such power or authority, a credit union:

(a) Must comply with RCW 31.12.408;

(b) Is not granted the field of membership powers or authorities of any out-of-state credit union; and

(c) Must be able to exercise such power or authority consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(4) Before exercising any power or authority afforded under subsection (3) of this section, a credit union must first notify the director of its intent to do so. This notice must be sent to the director by United States mail or by electronic means if the director accepts electronic delivery. If the director takes no action on the request within thirty days of delivery of the notice, the right to exercise the power or authority is deemed granted, subject to the restrictions in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section. In order to grant the request, the director must find that:

(a) The request complies with subsection (3)(a), (b), and (c) of this section; and

(b) The exercise of such power or authority serves the convenience and advantage of members of credit unions and maintains the fairness of competition and parity between credit unions and out-of-state credit unions.

(5) The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to specific powers or authorities of federal or out-of-state credit unions apply to credit unions exercising those powers or authorities permitted under this section but only insofar as the restrictions, limitations, and requirements relate to the specific exercise of the powers or authorities granted credit unions solely under this section.

(((4)))(6) As used in this section, "powers and authorities" include, but are not limited to, powers and authorities in corporate governance matters.

Sec. 6. RCW 31.12.436 and 2017 c 61 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A credit union may invest its funds in any of the following, as long as the investments are deemed prudent by the board:

(a) Loans held by credit unions, out-of-state credit unions, or federal credit unions; loans to members held by other lenders; and loans to nonmembers held by other lenders, with the approval of the director;

(b) Bonds, securities, or other investments that are fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States government, and general obligations of this state and its political subdivisions;

(c) Obligations issued by corporations designated under 31 U.S.C. Sec. 9101, or obligations, participations or other instruments issued and guaranteed by the federal national mortgage association, federal home loan mortgage corporation, government national mortgage association, or other government-sponsored enterprise;

(d) Participations or obligations which have been subjected by one or more government agencies to a trust or trusts for which an executive department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States has been named to act as trustee;

(e) Share or deposit accounts of other financial institutions, the accounts of which are federally insured or insured or guaranteed by another insurer or guarantor approved by the director. The shares and deposits made by a credit union under this subsection (1)(e) may exceed the insurance or guarantee limits established by the organization insuring or guaranteeing the institution into which the shares or deposits are made;

(f) Common trust or mutual funds whose investment portfolios consist of securities issued or guaranteed by the federal government or an agency of the government;

(g) Up to five percent of the capital of the credit union, in debt or equity issued by an organization owned by the Northwest credit union association or its successor credit union association;

(h) Shares, stocks, loans, or other obligations of organizations whose primary purpose is to strengthen, advance, or provide services to the credit union industry or credit union members. A credit union may invest in or make loans to organizations under this subsection (1)(h) in an aggregate amount not to exceed ((five))ten percent of its assets. This limit does not apply to investments in, and loans to, an organization:

(i) That is wholly owned by one or more credit unions or federal or out-of-state credit unions; and

(ii) Whose activities are limited exclusively to those authorized by this chapter for a credit union;

(i) Loans to credit unions, out-of-state credit unions, or federal credit unions. However, the aggregate of loans issued under this subsection (1)(i) is limited to twenty-five percent of the total shares and deposits of the credit union making the loans;

(j) Key person insurance policies and investment products related to employee benefits, the proceeds of which inure exclusively to the benefit of the credit union;

(k) A registered investment company or collective investment fund, as long as the prospectus of the company or fund restricts the investment portfolio to investments and investment transactions that are permissible for credit unions; ((or))

(l) For credit unions that are approved public depositaries, any securities listed in RCW 39.58.050 as eligible collateral for public deposits;

(m) Investments of the type in which the state treasurer may invest state funds pursuant to RCW 43.84.080; or

(n) Other investments approved by the director by rule or upon written application.

(2) If a credit union has lawfully made an investment that later becomes impermissible because of a change in circumstances or law, and the director finds that this investment will have an adverse effect on the safety and soundness of the credit union, then the director may require that the credit union develop a reasonable plan for the divestiture of the investment.

--- END ---