BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No holder of a retail license to sell liquor may allow or permit any contest or promotion or other form of recreational activity involving exploitation that endangers the health, safety, and welfare of any person with dwarfism. This subsection does not apply to wrestling events under chapter 67.08 RCW.

(2) The board may suspend or revoke the licensee's license to sell alcoholic beverages and impose a fine of up to one thousand dollars per contest or event, for any retail licensee who violates this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the term "dwarfism" means a condition of being abnormally small that is caused by heredity, endocrine dysfunction, renal insufficiency or deficiency, or skeletal disease that results in disproportionate short stature and adult height of less than four feet ten inches.

(4) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Adult entertainment venues, with performances that contain erotic material where minors under the age of eighteen are prohibited under RCW 9.68A.150, may not allow or permit any contest or promotion or other form of recreational activity involving exploitation that endangers the health, safety, and welfare of any person with dwarfism. This subsection does not apply to wrestling events under chapter 67.08 RCW.

(2) Any city or town may suspend or revoke the business license and impose a fine of up to one thousand dollars per contest or event, for any business that violates this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the term "dwarfism" means a condition of being abnormally small that is caused by heredity, endocrine dysfunction, renal insufficiency or deficiency, or skeletal disease that results in disproportionate short stature and adult height of less than four feet ten inches.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Adult entertainment venues, with performances that contain erotic material where minors under the age of eighteen are prohibited under RCW 9.68A.150, may not allow or permit any contest or promotion or other form of recreational activity involving exploitation that endangers the health, safety, and welfare of any person with dwarfism. This subsection does not apply to wrestling events under chapter 67.08 RCW.

(2) Any code city may suspend or revoke the business license and impose a fine of up to one thousand dollars per contest or event, for any business that violates this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the term "dwarfism" means a condition of being abnormally small that is caused by heredity, endocrine dysfunction, renal insufficiency or deficiency, or skeletal disease that results in disproportionate short stature and adult height of less than four feet ten inches.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Adult entertainment venues, with performances that contain erotic material where minors under the age of eighteen are prohibited under RCW 9.68A.150, may not allow or permit any contest or promotion or other form of recreational activity involving exploitation that endangers the health, safety, and welfare of any person with dwarfism. This subsection does not apply to wrestling events under chapter 67.08 RCW.

(2) Any county may suspend or revoke the business license and impose a fine of up to one thousand dollars per contest or event, for any business that violates this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the term "dwarfism" means a condition of being abnormally small that is caused by heredity, endocrine dysfunction, renal insufficiency or deficiency, or skeletal disease that results in disproportionate short stature and adult height of less than four feet ten inches.

--- END ---