BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that Washington state has a thriving economy that spans both east and west, and encompasses agriculture, food processing, timber, construction, health care, technology, and the hospitality industries.

(2) The legislature also finds that Washington employers rely on a diverse workforce to ensure the economic vitality of the state. Nearly one million Washingtonians are immigrants, which is one out of every seven people in the state. Immigrants make up over sixteen percent of the workforce. In addition, fifteen percent of all business owners in the state were born outside the country, and these business owners have a large impact on the economy through innovation and the creation of jobs. Immigrants make a significant contribution to the economic vitality of this state, and it is essential that the state have policies that recognize their importance to Washington's economy.

(3) In recognition of this significant contribution to the overall prosperity and strength of Washington state, the legislature, therefore, has a substantial and compelling interest in ensuring the state of Washington remains a place where the rights and dignity of all residents are maintained and protected in order to keep Washington working.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and sections 3 through 9 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Civil immigration warrant" means any warrant for a violation of federal civil immigration law issued by a federal immigration authority. A "civil immigration warrant" includes, but is not limited to, administrative warrants issued on forms I-200 or I-203, or their successors, and civil immigration warrants entered in the national crime information center database.

(2) "Court order" means a directive issued by a judge or magistrate under the authority of Article III of the United States Constitution or Article IV of the Washington Constitution. A "court order" includes but is not limited to warrants and subpoenas.

(3) "Federal immigration authority" means any officer, employee, or person otherwise paid by or acting as an agent of the United States department of homeland security including but not limited to its subagencies, immigration and customs enforcement and customs and border protection, and any present or future divisions thereof, charged with immigration enforcement.

(4) "Health facility" has the same meaning as the term "health care facility" provided in RCW 70.175.020, and includes substance abuse treatment facilities.

(5) "Hold request" or "immigration detainer request" means a request from a federal immigration authority, without a court order, that a state or local law enforcement agency maintain custody of an individual currently in its custody beyond the time he or she would otherwise be eligible for release in order to facilitate transfer to a federal immigration authority. A "hold request" or "immigration detainer request" includes, but is not limited to, department of homeland security form I-247A or prior or subsequent versions of form I-247.

(6) "Immigration detention agreement" means any contract, agreement, intergovernmental service agreement, or memorandum of understanding that permits a state or local law enforcement agency to house or detain individuals for federal civil immigration violations.

(7) "Immigration or citizenship status" means as such status has been established to such individual under the immigration and nationality act.

(8) "Language services" includes but is not limited to translation, interpretation, training, or classes. Translation means written communication from one language to another while preserving the intent and essential meaning of the original text. Interpretation means transfer of an oral communication from one language to another.

(9) "Local government" means any governmental entity other than the state, federal agencies, or an operating system established under chapter 43.52 RCW. It includes, but is not limited to, cities, counties, school districts, and special purpose districts.

(10) "Local law enforcement agency" means any agency of a city, county, special district, or other political subdivision of the state that is a general authority Washington law enforcement agency, as defined by RCW 10.93.020, or that is authorized to operate jails or to maintain custody of individuals in jails; or to operate juvenile detention facilities or to maintain custody of individuals in juvenile detention facilities; or to monitor compliance with probation or parole conditions.

(11) "Notification request" means a request from a federal immigration authority that a state or local law enforcement agency inform a federal immigration authority of the release date and time in advance of the release of an individual in its custody. "Notification request" includes, but is not limited to, the department of homeland security's form I-247A, form I-247N, or prior or subsequent versions of such forms.

(12) "Physical custody of the department of corrections" means only those individuals detained in a state correctional facility but does not include minors detained pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW, or individuals in community custody as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

(13) "Public schools" means all public elementary and secondary schools under the jurisdiction of local governing boards or a charter school board and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(14) "School resource officer" means any person who contracts with or whose law enforcement agency contracts with any charter school, educational service district, school, school district, or institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 to provide law enforcement services, or any law enforcement officer whose primary responsibility is to provide law enforcement to schools.

(15) "State agency" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 42.56.010.

(16) "State law enforcement agency" means any agency of the state of Washington that:

(a) Is a general authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined by RCW 10.93.020;

(b) Is authorized to operate prisons or to maintain custody of individuals in prisons; or

(c) Is authorized to operate juvenile detention facilities or to maintain custody of individuals in juvenile detention facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A keep Washington working statewide work group is established within the department. The work group must:

(a) Develop strategies with private sector businesses, labor, and immigrant advocacy organizations to support current and future industries across the state;

(b) Conduct research on methods to strengthen career pathways for immigrants and create and enhance partnerships with projected growth industries;

(c) Support business and agriculture leadership, civic groups, government, and immigrant advocacy organizations in a statewide effort to provide predictability and stability to the workforce in the agriculture industry; and

(d) Recommend approaches to improve Washington's ability to attract and retain immigrant business owners that provide new business and trade opportunities.

(2) The work group must consist of eleven representatives, each serving a term of three years, representing members from geographically diverse immigrant advocacy groups, professional associations representing business, labor organizations with a statewide presence, agriculture and immigrant legal interests, faith-based community nonprofit organizations, legal advocacy groups focusing on immigration and criminal justice, academic institutions, and law enforcement. The terms of the members must be staggered. Members of the work group must select a chair from among the membership. The work group must meet at least four times a year and hold meetings in various locations throughout the state. Following each meeting, the work group must report on its status, including meeting minutes and a meeting summary to the department. The department must provide a report to the legislature annually.

(3) In addition to the duties and powers described in RCW 43.330.040, it is the director's duty to provide support to the work group.

(4) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The attorney general, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, must publish model policies within six months after the effective date of this section for limiting immigration enforcement to the fullest extent possible consistent with federal and state law at public schools, health facilities operated by the state or a political subdivision of the state, courthouses, and shelters, to ensure they remain safe and accessible to all Washington residents, regardless of immigration or citizenship status.

(2) All public schools, health facilities either operated by the state or a political subdivision of the state, and courthouses must:

(a) Adopt necessary changes to policies consistent with the model policy; or

(b) Notify the attorney general that the agency is not adopting the changes to its policies consistent with the model policy, state the reasons that the agency is not adopting the changes, and provide the attorney general with a copy of the agency's policies.

(3) All other organizations and entities that provide services related to physical or mental health and wellness, education, or access to justice, are encouraged to adopt the model policy.

(4) Implementation of any policy under this section must be in accordance with state and federal law; policies, grants, waivers, or other requirements necessary to maintain funding; or other agreements related to the operation and functions of the organization, including databases within the organization.

(5) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no state agency, including law enforcement, may use agency funds, facilities, property, equipment, or personnel to investigate, enforce, cooperate with, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal registration or surveillance programs or any other laws, rules, or policies that target Washington residents solely on the basis of race, religion, immigration, or citizenship status, or national or ethnic origin. This subsection does not apply to any program with the primary purpose of providing persons with services or benefits, or to RCW 9.94A.685.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the state agencies listed in subsections (5) and (6) of this section shall review their policies and identify and make any changes necessary to ensure that:

(a) Information collected from individuals is limited to the minimum necessary to comply with subsection (3) of this section;

(b) Information collected from individuals is not disclosed except as necessary to comply with subsection (3) of this section or as permitted by state or federal law;

(c) Agency employees may not condition services or request information or proof regarding a person's immigration status, citizenship status, or place of birth; and

(d) Public services are available to, and agency employees shall serve, all Washington residents without regard to immigration or citizenship status.

(3) Nothing in subsection (1) or (2) of this section prohibits the collection, use, or disclosure of information that is:

(a) Required to comply with state or federal law;

(b) In response to a lawfully issued court order;

(c) Necessary to perform agency duties, functions, or other business, as permitted by statute or rule, conducted by the agency that is not related to immigration enforcement;

(d) Required to comply with policies, grants, waivers, or other requirements necessary to maintain funding; or

(e) In the form of deidentified or aggregated data, including census data.

(4) Any changes to agency policies required by this section must be made as expeditiously as possible, consistent with agency procedures. Final policies must be published.

(5) The following state agencies shall begin implementation of this section within six months after the effective date of this section and demonstrate full compliance by December 1, 2021:

(a) Department of licensing;

(b) Department of labor and industries;

(c) Employment security department;

(d) Department of revenue;

(e) Department of health;

(f) Health care authority;

(g) Department of social and health services;

(h) Department of children, youth, and families;

(i) Office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(j) State patrol.

(6) The following state agencies may begin implementation of this section by December 1, 2021, and must demonstrate full compliance by December 1, 2023:

(a) Department of agriculture;

(b) Department of financial institutions;

(c) Department of fish and wildlife;

(d) Department of natural resources;

(e) Department of retirement systems;

(f) Department of services for the blind;

(g) Department of transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 10.93 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The definitions contained in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

(2) The legislature finds that it is not the primary purpose of state and local law enforcement agencies or school resource officers to enforce civil federal immigration law. The legislature further finds that the immigration status of an individual or an individual's presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in the United States alone, is not a matter for police action, and that United States federal immigration authority has primary jurisdiction for enforcement of the provisions of Title 8 U.S.C. dealing with illegal entry.

(3) School resource officers, when acting in their official capacity as a school resource officer, may not:

(a) Inquire into or collect information about an individual's immigration or citizenship status, or place of birth; or

(b) Provide information pursuant to notification requests from federal immigration authorities for the purposes of civil immigration enforcement, except as required by law.

(4) State and local law enforcement agencies may not:

(a) Inquire into or collect information about an individual's immigration or citizenship status, or place of birth unless there is a connection between such information and an investigation into a violation of state or local criminal law; or

(b) Provide information pursuant to notification requests from federal immigration authorities for the purposes of civil immigration enforcement, except as required by law.

(5) State and local law enforcement agencies may not provide nonpublicly available personal information about an individual, including individuals subject to community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 and 9.94A.702, to federal immigration authorities in a noncriminal matter, except as required by state or federal law.

(6)(a) State and local law enforcement agencies may not give federal immigration authorities access to interview individuals about a noncriminal matter while they are in custody, except as required by state or federal law, a court order, or by (b) of this subsection.

(b) Permission may be granted to a federal immigration authority to conduct an interview regarding federal immigration violations with a person who is in the custody of a state or local law enforcement agency if the person consents in writing to be interviewed. In order to obtain consent, agency staff shall provide the person with an oral explanation and a written consent form that explains the purpose of the interview, that the interview is voluntary, and that the person may decline to be interviewed or may choose to be interviewed only with the person's attorney present. The form must state explicitly that the person will not be punished or suffer retaliation for declining to be interviewed. The form must be available at least in English and Spanish and explained orally to a person who is unable to read the form, using, when necessary, an interpreter from the district communications center "language line" or other district resources.

(7) An individual may not be detained solely for the purpose of determining immigration status.

(8) An individual must not be taken into custody, or held in custody, solely for the purposes of determining immigration status or based solely on a civil immigration warrant, or an immigration hold request.

(9)(a) To ensure compliance with all treaty obligations, including consular notification, and state and federal laws, on the commitment or detainment of any individual, state and local law enforcement agencies must explain in writing:

(i) The individual's right to refuse to disclose their nationality, citizenship, or immigration status; and

(ii) That disclosure of their nationality, citizenship, or immigration status may result in civil or criminal immigration enforcement, including removal from the United States.

(b) Nothing in this subsection allows for any violation of subsection (4) of this section.

(10) A state and local government or law enforcement agency may not deny services, benefits, privileges, or opportunities to individuals in custody, or under community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 and 9.94A.702, or in probation status, on the basis of the presence of an immigration detainer, hold, notification request, or civil immigration warrant, except as required by law or as necessary for classification or placement purposes for individuals in the physical custody of the department of corrections.

(11) No state or local law enforcement officer may enter into any contract, agreement, or arrangement, whether written or oral, that would grant federal civil immigration enforcement authority or powers to state and local law enforcement officers, including but not limited to agreements created under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1357(g), also known as 287(g) agreements.

(12)(a) No state agency or local government or law enforcement officer may enter into an immigration detention agreement. All immigration detention agreements must be terminated no later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Any immigration detention agreement in effect prior to January 1, 2019, and under which a payment was made between July 1, 2017, and December 31, 2018, may remain in effect until the date of completion or December 31, 2021, whichever is earlier.

(13) No state or local law enforcement agency or school resource officer may enter into or renew a contract for the provision of language services from federal immigration authorities, nor may any language services be accepted from such for free or otherwise.

(14) The department of corrections may not give federal immigration authorities access to interview individuals about federal immigration violations while they are in custody, except as required by state or federal law or by court order, unless such individuals consent to be interviewed in writing. Before agreeing to be interviewed, individuals must be advised that they will not be punished or suffer retaliation for declining to be interviewed.

(15) Subsections (3) through (6) of this section do not apply to individuals who are in the physical custody of the department of corrections.

(16) Nothing in this section prohibits the collection, use, or disclosure of information that is:

(a) Required to comply with state or federal law; or

(b) In response to a lawfully issued court order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. To ensure state and law enforcement agencies are able to foster the community trust necessary to maintain public safety, within six months of the effective date of this section, the attorney general must, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, publish model policies, guidance, and training recommendations consistent with this act and state and local law, aimed at ensuring that state and local law enforcement duties are carried out in a manner that limits, to the fullest extent practicable and consistent with federal and state law, engagement with federal immigration authorities for the purpose of immigration enforcement. All state and local law enforcement agencies must either:

(1) Adopt policies consistent with that guidance; or

(2) Notify the attorney general that the agency is not adopting the guidance and model policies, state the reasons that the agency is not adopting the model policies and guidance, and provide the attorney general with a copy of the agency's policies to ensure compliance with this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. No section of this act is intended to limit or prohibit any state or local agency or officer from:

(1) Sending to, or receiving from, federal immigration authorities the citizenship or immigration status of a person, or maintaining such information, or exchanging the citizenship or immigration status of an individual with any other federal, state, or local government agency, in accordance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1373; or

(2) Complying with any other state or federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 10.70.140 (Aliens committed—Notice to immigration authority) and 1992 c 7 s 29 & 1925 ex.s. c 169 s 1; and

(2) RCW 10.70.150 (Aliens committed—Copies of clerk's records) and 1925 ex.s. c 169 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---