BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Within existing resources, the Washington state institute for public policy must prepare an updated report of the 2014 early childhood education and assistance program outcome evaluation report. To the maximum extent possible, the report must:

(a) Include an evaluation of the long-term outcomes after 2020 when the children in the analysis are expected to graduate from high school; and

(b) Provide a comparison to evaluations of early and childhood education programs in other states and jurisdictions.

(2) The Washington state institute for public policy must submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2020, that describes the work completed. A final report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by January 6, 2021.

(3) At no cost to the Washington state institute for public policy, the department of children, youth, and families and the office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide the Washington state institute for public policy with all data necessary to complete the report.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2021.

--- END ---