BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.655.065 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 31 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature has made a commitment to rigorous academic standards for receipt of a high school diploma. ((The primary way that students will demonstrate that they meet the standards in reading, writing, mathematics, and science is through the statewide student assessment. Only objective assessments that are comparable in rigor to the state assessment are authorized as an alternative assessment. Before seeking an alternative assessment, the legislature expects students to make a genuine effort to meet state standards, through regular and consistent attendance at school and participation in extended learning and other assistance programs.))

(2) Under RCW 28A.655.061, beginning in the 2006-07 school year and through the 2018-19 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall implement objective alternative assessment methods as provided in this section for students to demonstrate achievement of the state standards in content areas in which the student has not yet met the standard on the high school statewide student assessment. A student may access an alternative if the student meets applicable eligibility criteria in RCW 28A.655.061 and this section and other eligibility criteria established by the superintendent of public instruction, including but not limited to attendance criteria and participation in the remediation or supplemental instruction contained in the student learning plan developed under RCW 28A.655.061. A school district may waive attendance and/or remediation criteria for special, unavoidable circumstances.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means a student seeking to use one of the alternative assessment methods in this section.

(4) One alternative assessment method shall be a combination of the applicant's grades in applicable courses and the applicant's highest score on the high school statewide student assessment, as provided in this subsection. A student is eligible to apply for the alternative assessment method under this subsection (4) if the student has a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.2 on a four point grading scale. The superintendent of public instruction shall determine which high school courses are applicable to the alternative assessment method and shall issue guidelines to school districts.

(a) Using guidelines prepared by the superintendent of public instruction, a school district shall identify the group of students in the same school as the applicant who took the same high school courses as the applicant in the applicable content area. From the group of students identified in this manner, the district shall select the comparison cohort that shall be those students who met or slightly exceeded the state standard on the statewide student assessment.

(b) The district shall compare the applicant's grades in high school courses in the applicable content area to the grades of students in the comparison cohort for the same high school courses. If the applicant's grades are equal to or above the mean grades of the comparison cohort, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state standard on the alternative assessment.

(c) An applicant may not use the alternative assessment under this subsection (4) if there are fewer than six students in the comparison cohort.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement:

(a) By June 1, 2006, a process for students to appeal the score they received on the high school assessments;

(b) By January 1, 2007, guidelines and appeal processes for waiving specific requirements in RCW 28A.655.061 pertaining to the certificate of academic achievement and to the certificate of individual achievement for students who: (i) Transfer to a Washington public school in their junior or senior year with the intent of obtaining a public high school diploma, or (ii) have special, unavoidable circumstances;

(c)(i) For the graduating classes of 2014((, 2015, 2016, 2017, and 2018))through 2019, an expedited appeal process for waiving specific requirements in RCW 28A.655.061 pertaining to the certificate of academic achievement and the certificate of individual achievement for eligible students who have not met the state standard on the English language arts statewide student assessment, the mathematics high school statewide student assessment, or both. The student or the student's parent, guardian, or principal may initiate an appeal with the district and the district has the authority to determine which appeals are submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for review and approval. The superintendent of public instruction may only approve an appeal if it has been demonstrated that the student has the necessary skills and knowledge to meet the high school graduation standard and that the student has the skills necessary to successfully achieve the college or career goals established in his or her high school and beyond plan. Pathways for demonstrating the necessary skills and knowledge may include, but are not limited to:

(A) Successful completion of a college-level class in the relevant subject area;

(B) Admission to a higher education institution or career preparation program;

(C) Award of a scholarship for higher education; or

(D) Enlistment in a branch of the military.

(ii) A student in the class of 2014, 2015, 2016, ((or)) 2017, 2018, or 2019 is eligible for the expedited appeal process in (c)(i) of this subsection if he or she has met all other graduation requirements established by the state and district.

(iii) A student in the class of 2018 is eligible for the expedited appeal process in (c)(i) of this subsection if he or she has met all other graduation requirements established by the state and district and has attempted at least one alternative assessment option as established in ((RCW 28A.655.065))this section.

(6) The state board of education shall examine opportunities for additional alternative assessments, including the possible use of one or more standardized norm-referenced student achievement tests and the possible use of the reading, writing, or mathematics portions of the ACT ASSET and ACT COMPASS test instruments as objective alternative assessments for demonstrating that a student has met the state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board shall submit its findings and recommendations to the education committees of the legislature by January 10, 2008.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement this section.

(8) This section only applies to students in the graduating class of 2019 and prior. This section no longer applies beginning with the graduating class of 2020.

(9) This section expires January 1, 2020.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.090 and 2018 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board of education shall establish high school graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and section 20 of this act and except those equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.

(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including information on the culture, history, and government of the American Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.

(b) Ending with the class of 2019, the certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation.

(c)(i) Each student must have a high school and beyond plan to guide the student's high school experience and ((prepare))inform course taking that is aligned with the student's goals for ((postsecondary)) education or training and career after high school.

(ii)(A) A high school and beyond plan must be initiated for each student during the seventh or eighth grade. In preparation for initiating that plan, each student must first be administered a career interest and skills inventory.

(B) For students with an individualized education program, the high school and beyond plan must be developed in alignment with their individualized education program. The high school and beyond plan must be developed in a similar manner and with similar school personnel as for all other students.

(iii)(A) The high school and beyond plan must be updated to reflect high school assessment results in RCW 28A.655.070(3)(b) and to review transcripts, assess progress toward identified goals, and revised as necessary for changing interests, goals, and needs. The plan must identify available interventions and academic support, courses, or both, that are designed for students who ((have not met the high school graduation standard))are not on track to graduate, to enable them to ((meet the standard))fulfill high school graduation requirements. Each student's high school and beyond plan must be updated to inform junior year course taking.

(B) For students with an individualized education program, the high school and beyond plan must be updated in alignment with their school to postschool transition plan. The high school and beyond plan must be updated in a similar manner and with similar school personnel as for all other students.

(iv) School districts are encouraged to involve parents and guardians in the process of developing and updating the high school and beyond plan, and the plan must be provided to the students' parents or guardians in their native language if that language is one of the two most frequently spoken non-English languages of students in the district. Nothing in this subsection (1)(c)(((iii)))(iv) prevents districts from providing high school and beyond plans to parents and guardians in additional languages that are not required by this subsection.

(((iv)))(v) All high school and beyond plans must, at a minimum, include the following elements:

(A) Identification of career goals, aided by a skills and interest assessment;

(B) Identification of educational goals;

(C) Identification of dual credit programs and the opportunities they create for students, including but not limited to career and technical education programs, running start programs, and college in the high school programs;

(D) Information about the college bound scholarship program established in chapter 28B.118 RCW;

(E) A four-year plan for course taking that:

(I) Includes information about options for satisfying state and local graduation requirements;

(II) Satisfies state and local graduation requirements;

(III) Aligns with the student's secondary and postsecondary goals, which can include education, training, and career;

(IV) Identifies ((dual credit programs and the opportunities they create for students))course sequences to inform academic acceleration, as described in RCW 28A.320.195 that include dual credit courses or programs and are aligned with the student's goals; and

(V) Includes information about the college bound scholarship program; ((and))

(F) Evidence that the student has received the following information on federal and state financial aid programs that help pay for the costs of a postsecondary program:

(I) Information about the documentation necessary for completing the applications; application timeliness and submission deadlines; the importance of submitting applications early; information specific to students who are or have been in foster care; information specific to students who are, or are at risk of being, homeless; information specific to students whose family member or guardians will be required to provide financial and tax information necessary to complete applications; and

(II) Opportunities to participate in sessions that assist students and, when necessary, their family members or guardians, fill out financial aid applications; and

(G) By the end of the twelfth grade, a current resume or activity log that provides a written compilation of the student's education, any work experience, and any community service and how the school district has recognized the community service pursuant to RCW 28A.320.193.

(d) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan shall remain at the local level. ((Effective with the graduating class of 2015,))The state board of education may not establish a requirement for students to complete a culminating project for graduation. A district may establish additional, local requirements for a high school and beyond plan to serve the needs and interests of its students and the purposes of this section.

(e)(i) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement the career and college ready graduation requirement proposal adopted under board resolution on November 10, 2010, and revised on January 9, 2014, to take effect beginning with the graduating class of 2019 or as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(e). The rules must include authorization for a school district to waive up to two credits for individual students based on ((unusual))individual student circumstances ((and in accordance with)), so long as none of the credits waived are identified as mandatory core credits by the state board of education. School districts must adhere to written policies that must be adopted by each board of directors of a school district that grants diplomas. The rules must also provide that the content of the third credit of mathematics and the content of the third credit of science may be chosen by the student based on the student's interests and high school and beyond plan with agreement of the student's parent or guardian or agreement of the school counselor or principal. The state board of education may update rules under this subsection (1)(e)(i) as needed.

(ii) School districts may apply to the state board of education for a waiver to implement the career and college ready graduation requirement proposal beginning with the graduating class of 2020 or 2021 instead of the graduating class of 2019. In the application, a school district must describe why the waiver is being requested, the specific impediments preventing timely implementation, and efforts that will be taken to achieve implementation with the graduating class proposed under the waiver. The state board of education shall grant a waiver under this subsection (1)(e) to an applying school district at the next subsequent meeting of the board after receiving an application.

(iii) A school district must update the high school and beyond plans for each student who has not earned a score of level 3 or level 4 on the middle school mathematics assessment identified in RCW 28A.655.070 by ninth grade, to ensure that the student takes a mathematics course in both ninth and tenth grades. This course may include career and technical education equivalencies in mathematics adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.230.097.

(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.

(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's certificate or credential, and complete other state and local graduation requirements.

(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high school graduation requirements to the education committees of the legislature for review. The legislature shall have the opportunity to act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted legislation.

(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other than English established by the state board of education or a local school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation, students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied the state or local school district graduation requirement for instruction in one or more languages other than English.

(4) ((If requested by the))(a) Unless a student and his or her ((family))parents or guardians request otherwise, a student who has completed high school courses before attending high school shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling high school graduation requirements if:

(((a)))(i) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing the same course requirements and examinations as the high school students enrolled in the class; or

(((b)))(ii) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school district board of directors.

(b) The school district's transcript policy governs the incorporation of credits under this subsection.

(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform any other additional assignment to receive credit.

(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.155.045 and 2007 c 354 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

((Beginning with))Through the ((graduating)) class of ((2008))2021, students served under this chapter, who are not appropriately ((assessed by the high school Washington assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061))served by the other pathways to graduation as provided under section 20 of this act, even with accommodations, may ((earn a certificate of individual achievement. The certificate may be earned))graduate using one of the multiple ((ways))measures previously used as a way to earn the certificate of individual achievement and to demonstrate skills and abilities commensurate with their individual education programs. The determination of whether the ((high school assessment system is))other pathways under section 20 of this act or the measures identified in this section are appropriate shall be made by the student's individual education program team. ((Except as provided in RCW 28A.655.0611, for these students, the certificate of individual achievement is required for graduation from a public high school, but need not be the only requirement for graduation. When measures other than the high school assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used,))The measures used to demonstrate skills and abilities of students under this section shall be in agreement with the appropriate educational opportunity provided for the student as required by this chapter. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop the guidelines for determining ((which students should not be required to participate in the high school assessment system and)) which types of assessments are appropriate to use.

((When measures other than the high school assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used for high school graduation purposes, the student's high school transcript shall note whether that student has earned a certificate of individual achievement.))

Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a student the right to participation in the ((high school assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061))pathways under section 20 of this act, and, upon successfully meeting the high school standard, receipt of the certificate of academic achievement.

This section expires January 1, 2022.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.655.061 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 31 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Through the graduating class of 2019, the high school assessment system shall include but need not be limited to the statewide student assessment, opportunities for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which the student was not successful, and, if approved by the legislature pursuant to subsection (((10)))(9) of this section, one or more objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student assessment for each content area.

(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of academic achievement shall be obtained and is evidence that the students have successfully met the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate. With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045 ((or 28A.655.0611)), and only through the graduating class of 2019, acquisition of the certificate is required for graduation from a public high school but is not the only requirement for graduation.

(3)(a) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 through the graduating class of 2015, with the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who meets the state standards on the English language arts and mathematics high school statewide student assessment shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. The mathematics assessment shall be the end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school mathematics that assesses the standards common to algebra I and integrated mathematics I or the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics that assesses standards common to geometry and integrated mathematics II.

(b) As the state transitions from reading and writing assessments to an English language arts assessment and from end-of-course assessments to a comprehensive assessment for high school mathematics, a student in a graduating class of 2016 through 2018 shall earn a certificate of academic achievement if the student meets the high school graduation standard as follows:

(i) Students in the graduating class of 2016 may use the results from:

(A) The reading and writing assessment or the English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium; and

(B) The end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school mathematics, the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics, or the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium.

(ii) Students in the graduating classes of 2017 and 2018 may use the results from:

(A) The tenth grade English language arts assessment developed by the superintendent of public instruction using resources from the multistate consortium or the English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium; and

(B) The end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school mathematics, the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics, or the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium.

(c) Beginning with the graduating class of 2019, a student who meets the high school graduation standard on the high school English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium and the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.

(d) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2020, a student who meets the high school graduation standard on the high school English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium and the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium to be administered in tenth grade shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.

)) If a student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement, then the student may retake the assessment in the content area at least twice a year at no cost to the student. If the student successfully meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection (((10)))(9) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the state standards for that content area if the student has taken the statewide student assessment at least once. If the student successfully meets the state standards on the objective alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.

(4) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2021, a student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the statewide student assessment, a retake, or the objective alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement. The assessment under this subsection must be a comprehensive assessment of the science essential academic learning requirements adopted by the superintendent of public instruction in 2013.

)) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.

(((6)))(5) A student may retain and use the highest result from each successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.

(((7)))(6) School districts must make available to students the following options:

(a) To retake the statewide student assessment at least twice a year in the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or

(b) To retake the statewide student assessment at least twice a year in the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of public instruction and the state board for community and technical colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these programs can be assessed.

(((8)))(7) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the superintendent of public instruction.

(((9)))(8) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be available to each school district.

(((10)))(9)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop options for implementing objective alternative assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores, for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student assessment and be objective in its determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.

(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or writing portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on the statewide student assessment. A student's score on the science portion of the ACT or the science subject area tests of the SAT may be used as an objective alternative assessment under this section as soon as the state board of education determines that sufficient data is available to identify reliable equivalent scores for the science content area of the statewide student assessment. After the first scores are established, the state board may increase but not decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state standards.

(ii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing portion of the statewide student assessment; and for the English language arts portion of the assessment developed with the multistate consortium, once established in the 2014-15 school year. A score of three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition, macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history, world history, United States government and politics, or comparative government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for the reading portion of the statewide student assessment; and for the English language arts portion of the assessment developed with the multistate consortium, once established in the 2014-15 school year. A score of three on the AP examination in biology, physics, chemistry, or environmental science may be used as an alternative assessment for the science portion of the statewide student assessment.

(iii) A student who scores at least a four on selected externally administered international baccalaureate (IB) examinations may use the score as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that the student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. A score of four on the higher level IB examinations for any of the IB English language and literature courses or for any of the IB individuals and societies courses may be used as an alternative assessment for the reading, writing, or English language arts portions of the statewide student assessment. A score of four on the higher level IB examinations for any of the IB mathematics courses may be used as an alternative assessment for the mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of four on the higher level IB examinations for IB biology, chemistry, or physics may be used as an alternative assessment for the science portion of the statewide student assessment.

(iv)(A) Beginning in the 2018-19 school year, high school students who have not earned a certificate of academic achievement due to not meeting the high school graduation standard on the mathematics or English language arts assessment may take and pass a locally determined course in the content area in which the student was not successful, and may use the passing score on a locally administered assessment tied to that course and approved under the provisions of this subsection (((10)))(9)(b)(iv), as an objective alternative assessment for demonstrating that the student has met or exceeded the high school graduation standard. High school transition courses and the assessments offered in association with high school transition courses shall be considered an approved locally determined course and assessment for demonstrating that the student met or exceeded the high school graduation standard. The course must be rigorous and consistent with the student's educational and career goals identified in his or her high school and beyond plan, and may include career and technical education equivalencies in English language arts or mathematics adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.230.097. School districts shall record students' participation in locally determined courses under this section in the statewide individual data system.

(B) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a process by which local school districts can submit assessments for review and approval for use as objective alternative assessments for graduation as allowed by (b)(iv) of this subsection. This process shall establish means to determine whether a local school district-administered assessment is comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student assessment and is objective in its determination of student achievement of the state standards. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall post on its agency web site a compiled list of local school district-administered assessments approved as objective alternative assessments, including the comparable scores on these assessments necessary to meet the standard.

(C) For the purpose of this section, "high school transition course" means an English language arts or mathematics course offered in high school where successful completion by a high school student ensures the student college-level placement at participating institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. High school transition courses must, in accordance with this section, satisfy core or elective credit graduation requirements established by the state board of education. A student's successful completion of a high school transition course does not entitle the student to be admitted to any institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(v) A student who completes a dual credit course in English language arts or mathematics in which the student earns college credit may use passage of the course as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that the student has met or exceeded the high school graduation standard for the certificate of academic achievement.

(((11)))(10) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are on track for high school graduation, each school district shall:

(a) Provide students who have not earned a certificate of academic achievement before the beginning of grade eleven with the opportunity to access interventions and academic supports, courses, or both, designed to enable students to meet the high school graduation standard. These interventions, supports, or courses must be rigorous and consistent with the student's educational and career goals identified in his or her high school and beyond plan, and may include career and technical education equivalencies in English language arts or mathematics adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.230.097; and

(b) Prepare student learning plans and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as provided in this subsection. Student learning plans are required for eighth grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content areas of the state assessment during the previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the family. The plan shall include the following information as applicable:

(i) The student's results on the state assessment;

(ii) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;

(iii) Any credit deficiencies;

(iv) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;

(v) The student's progress toward meeting state and local graduation requirements;

(vi) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for graduation;

(vii) Remediation strategies and alternative education options available to students, including informing students of the option to continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until the age of twenty-one;

(viii) The alternative assessment options available to students under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;

(ix) School district programs, high school courses, and career and technical education options available for students to meet graduation requirements; and

(x) Available programs offered through skill centers or community and technical colleges, including the college high school diploma options under RCW 28B.50.535.

(11) This section expires January 1, 2020.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.155.170 and 2007 c 318 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, each school district that operates a high school shall establish a policy and procedures that permit any student who is receiving special education or related services under an individualized education program pursuant to state and federal law and who will continue to receive such services between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one to participate in the graduation ceremony and activities after four years of high school attendance with his or her age-appropriate peers and receive a certificate of attendance.

(2) Participation in a graduation ceremony and receipt of a certificate of attendance under this section does not preclude a student from continuing to receive special education and related services under an individualized education program beyond the graduation ceremony.

(3) A student's participation in a graduation ceremony and receipt of a certificate of attendance under this section shall not be construed as the student's receipt of ((either:

))a high school diploma pursuant to RCW 28A.230.120((; or

)).

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.180.100 and 2004 c 19 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board for community and technical colleges shall jointly develop a program plan to provide a continuing education option for students who are eligible for the state transitional bilingual instruction program and who need more time to develop language proficiency but who are more age-appropriately suited for a postsecondary learning environment than for a high school. ((In developing the plan, the superintendent of public instruction shall consider options to formally recognize the accomplishments of students in the state transitional bilingual instruction program who have completed the twelfth grade but have not earned a certificate of academic achievement.)) By December 1, 2004, the agencies shall report to the legislative education and fiscal committees with any recommendations for legislative action and any resources necessary to implement the plan.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.195.010 and 2018 c 177 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any specific educational or other programs for private schools except as hereinafter in this section provided.

The administrative or executive authority of private schools or private school districts shall file each year with the state board of education a statement certifying that the minimum requirements hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. The state board of education may request clarification or additional information. After review of the statement, the state board of education will notify schools or school districts of any concerns, deficiencies, and deviations which must be corrected. If there are any unresolved concerns, deficiencies, or deviations, the school or school district may request or the state board of education on its own initiative may grant provisional status for one year in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the requirements. The state board of education shall not require private school students to meet the student learning goals, ((obtain a certificate of academic achievement, or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from high school,)) to ((master))learn the essential academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW ((28A.655.061))28A.655.070. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary basis, to have their students ((master))learn these essential academic learning requirements((,))or take the assessments((, and obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement)). Minimum requirements shall be as follows:

(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall consist of no less than one hundred eighty school days or the equivalent in annual minimum instructional hour offerings, with a school-wide annual average total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours for students enrolled in grades one through twelve, and at least four hundred fifty hours for students enrolled in kindergarten.

(2) The school day shall be the same as defined in RCW 28A.150.203.

(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state certification except as follows:

(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a state certificate to teach those courses.

(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without certification may teach students so long as a certified person exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be submitted to the state board of education reporting and explaining such circumstances.

(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a minimum that:

(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of an employee of the approved private school who is certificated under chapter 28A.410 RCW;

(b) The planning by the certificated person and the parent, guardian, or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;

(c) The certificated person spend a minimum average each month of one contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;

(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the certificated person; and

(e) The certificated employee shall not supervise more than thirty students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.

(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent records against loss or damage.

(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district: PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and fire safety requirements. A residential dwelling of the parent, guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.

(7) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.

(8) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and operation of the school or school district.

All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching material, curriculum, except as in subsection (7) of this section provided, school rules and administration, or other matters not specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility of the administration and administrators of the particular private school involved.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.200.010 and 2004 c 19 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the duty to:

(a) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction. The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the statement by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the superintendent of the public school district within which the parent resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the student shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district. Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;

(b) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review of the child's records; and

(c) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the state board of education is administered annually to the child by a qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently working in the field of education. The state board of education shall not require these children to meet the student learning goals, ((master))learn the essential academic learning requirements, ((to))or take the assessments((, or to obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.155.045))under RCW 28A.655.070. The standardized test administered or the annual academic progress assessment written shall be made a part of the child's permanent records. If, as a result of the annual test or assessment, it is determined that the child is not making reasonable progress consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the parent shall make a good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.

(2) Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section shall be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school without valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(4).

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.230.122 and 2011 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A student who fulfills the requirements specified in subsection (3) of this section toward completion of an international baccalaureate diploma programme is considered to have met the requirements of the pathway to graduation identified in section 20(2)(c)(iv) and to have satisfied state minimum requirements for graduation from a public high school, except that((:

(a) The provisions of RCW 28A.655.061 regarding the certificate of academic achievement or RCW 28A.155.045 regarding the certificate of individual achievement apply to students under this section; and

))the provisions of RCW 28A.230.170 regarding study of the United States Constitution and the Washington state Constitution apply to students under this section.

(2) School districts may require students under this section to complete local graduation requirements that are in addition to state minimum requirements before issuing a high school diploma under RCW 28A.230.120. However, school districts are encouraged to waive local requirements as necessary to encourage students to pursue an international baccalaureate diploma.

(3) To receive a high school diploma under this section, a student must complete and pass all required international baccalaureate diploma programme courses as scored at the local level; pass all internal assessments as scored at the local level; successfully complete all required projects and products as scored at the local level; and complete the final examinations administered by the international baccalaureate organization in each of the required subjects under the diploma programme.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.230.125 and 2014 c 102 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the four-year institutions as defined in RCW 28B.76.020, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall develop for use by all public school districts a standardized high school transcript. The superintendent shall establish clear definitions for the terms "credits" and "hours" so that school programs operating on the quarter, semester, or trimester system can be compared.

(2) ((The standardized high school transcript shall include a notation of whether the student has earned a certificate of individual achievement or a certificate of academic achievement.

)) The standardized high school transcript may include a notation of whether the student has earned the Washington state seal of biliteracy established under RCW 28A.300.575.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.320.190 and 2009 c 578 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The extended learning opportunities program is created for eligible eleventh and twelfth grade students who are not on track to meet local or state graduation requirements as well as eighth grade students who need additional assistance in order to have the opportunity for a successful entry into high school. The program shall provide early notification of graduation status and information on education opportunities including preapprenticeship programs that are available.

(2) Under the extended learning opportunities program and to the extent funds are available for that purpose, districts shall make available to students in grade twelve who have failed to meet one or more local or state graduation requirements the option of continuing enrollment in the school district in accordance with RCW 28A.225.160. Districts are authorized to use basic education program funding to provide instruction to eligible students under RCW 28A.150.220(((3)))(5).

(3) Under the extended learning opportunities program, instructional services for eligible students can occur during the regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at a time and location deemed appropriate by the school district, including the educational service district, in order to meet the needs of these students. Instructional services provided under this section do not include services offered at private schools. Instructional services can include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Individual or small group instruction;

(b) ((Instruction in English language arts and/or mathematics that eligible students need to pass all or part of the Washington assessment of student learning;

)) Attendance in a public high school or public alternative school classes or at a skill center;

(((d)))(c) Inclusion in remediation programs, including summer school;

(((e)))(d) Language development instruction for English language learners;

(((f)))(e) Online curriculum and instructional support, including programs for credit retrieval and ((Washington))statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) preparatory classes; and

(((g)))(f) Reading improvement specialists available at the educational service districts to serve eighth, eleventh, and twelfth grade educators through professional development in accordance with RCW 28A.415.350. The reading improvement specialist may also provide direct services to eligible students and those students electing to continue a fifth year in a high school program who are still struggling with basic reading skills.

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.320.208 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the beginning of each school year, school districts must notify parents and guardians of enrolled students from eighth through twelfth grade about each student assessment required by the state, the minimum state-level graduation requirements, and any additional school district graduation requirements. The information may be provided when the student is enrolled, contained in the student or parent handbook, or posted on the school district's web site. The notification must include the following:

(a) When each assessment will be administered;

(b) ((Which assessments will be required for graduation and what options students have to meet graduation requirements if they do not pass a given assessment;

)) Whether the results of the assessment will be used for program placement or grade-level advancement;

(((d)))(c) When the assessment results will be released to parents or guardians and whether there will be an opportunity for parents and teachers to discuss strategic adjustments; and

(((e)))(d) Whether the assessment is required by the school district, state, federal government, or more than one of these entities.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide information to the school districts to enable the districts to provide the information to the parents and guardians in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.600.310 and 2015 c 202 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received the credits required for the award of a high school diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education.

(b) The course sections and programs offered as running start courses must also be open for registration to matriculated students at the participating institution of higher education and may not be a course consisting solely of high school students offered at a high school campus.

(c) A student receiving home-based instruction enrolling in a public high school for the sole purpose of participating in courses or programs offered by institutions of higher education shall not be counted by the school district in any required state or federal accountability reporting if the student's parents or guardians filed a declaration of intent to provide home-based instruction and the student received home-based instruction during the school year before the school year in which the student intends to participate in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. Students receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students attending private schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not be required to meet the student learning goals((, obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from high school,)) or to ((master))learn the essential academic learning requirements. However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or programs in participating universities only if the board of directors of the student's school district has decided to participate in the program. Participating institutions of higher education, in consultation with school districts, may establish admission standards for these students. If the institution of higher education accepts a secondary school pupil for enrollment under this section, the institution of higher education shall send written notice to the pupil and the pupil's school district within ten days of acceptance. The notice shall indicate the course and hours of enrollment for that pupil.

(2)(a) In lieu of tuition and fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041:

(i) Running start students shall pay to the community or technical college all other mandatory fees as established by each community or technical college and, in addition, the state board for community and technical colleges may authorize a fee of up to ten percent of tuition and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041; and

(ii) All other institutions of higher education operating a running start program may charge running start students a fee of up to ten percent of tuition and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 in addition to technology fees.

(b) The fees charged under this subsection (2) shall be prorated based on credit load.

(c) Students may pay fees under this subsection with advanced college tuition payment program tuition units at a rate set by the advanced college tuition payment program governing body under chapter 28B.95 RCW.

(3)(a) The institutions of higher education must make available fee waivers for low-income running start students. Each institution must establish a written policy for the determination of low-income students before offering the fee waiver. A student shall be considered low income and eligible for a fee waiver upon proof that the student is currently qualified to receive free or reduced-price lunch. Acceptable documentation of low-income status may also include, but is not limited to, documentation that a student has been deemed eligible for free or reduced-price lunches in the last five years, or other criteria established in the institution's policy.

(b) Institutions of higher education, in collaboration with relevant student associations, shall aim to have students who can benefit from fee waivers take advantage of these waivers. Institutions shall make every effort to communicate to students and their families the benefits of the waivers and provide assistance to students and their families on how to apply. Information about waivers shall, to the greatest extent possible, be incorporated into financial aid counseling, admission information, and individual billing statements. Institutions also shall, to the greatest extent possible, use all means of communication, including but not limited to web sites, online catalogues, admission and registration forms, mass email messaging, social media, and outside marketing to ensure that information about waivers is visible, compelling, and reaches the maximum number of students and families that can benefit.

(4) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, participating institutions of higher education, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and distribution of the funds. The funds received by the institution of higher education from the school district shall not be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall be counted for the purpose of meeting enrollment targets in accordance with terms and conditions specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

Sec. 14. RCW 28A.700.080 and 2008 c 170 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and conduct an ongoing campaign for career and technical education to increase awareness among teachers, counselors, students, parents, principals, school administrators, and the general public about the opportunities offered by rigorous career and technical education programs. Messages in the campaign shall emphasize career and technical education as a high quality educational pathway for students, including for students who seek advanced education that includes a bachelor's degree or beyond. In particular, the office shall provide information about the following:

(a) The model career and technical education programs of study developed under RCW 28A.700.060;

(b) Career and technical education course equivalencies and dual credit for high school and college;

(c) ((The career and technical education alternative assessment guidelines under RCW 28A.655.065;

)) The availability of scholarships for postsecondary workforce education, including the Washington award for vocational excellence, and apprenticeships through the opportunity grant program under RCW 28B.50.271, grants under RCW 28A.700.090, and other programs; and

(((e)))(d) Education, apprenticeship, and career opportunities in emerging and high-demand programs.

(2) The office shall use multiple strategies in the campaign depending on available funds, including developing an interactive web site to encourage and facilitate career exploration; conducting training and orientation for guidance counselors and teachers; and developing and disseminating printed materials.

(3) The office shall seek advice, participation, and financial assistance from the workforce training and education coordinating board, higher education institutions, foundations, employers, apprenticeship and training councils, workforce development councils, and business and labor organizations for the campaign.

Sec. 15. RCW 28A.415.360 and 2009 c 548 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, targeted professional development programs, to be known as learning improvement days, are authorized to further the development of outstanding mathematics, science, and reading teaching and learning opportunities in the state of Washington. The intent of this section is to provide guidance for the learning improvement days in the omnibus appropriations act. The learning improvement days authorized in this section shall not be considered part of the definition of basic education.

(2) A school district is eligible to receive funding for learning improvement days that are limited to specific activities related to student learning that contribute to the following outcomes:

(a) Provision of meaningful, targeted professional development for all teachers in mathematics, science, or reading;

(b) Increased knowledge and instructional skill for mathematics, science, or reading teachers;

(c) Increased use of curriculum materials with supporting diagnostic and supplemental materials that align with state standards;

(d) ((Skillful guidance for students participating in alternative assessment activities;

)) Increased rigor of course offerings especially in mathematics, science, and reading;

(((f)))(e) Increased student opportunities for focused, applied mathematics and science classes;

(((g)))(f) Increased student success on state achievement measures; and

(((h)))(g) Increased student appreciation of the value and uses of mathematics, science, and reading knowledge and exploration of related careers.

(3) School districts receiving resources under this section shall submit reports to the superintendent of public instruction documenting how the use of the funds contributes to measurable improvement in the outcomes described under subsection (2) of this section; and how other professional development resources and programs authorized in statute or in the omnibus appropriations act contribute to the expected outcomes. The superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial management shall collaborate on required report content and format.

Sec. 16. RCW 28A.655.068 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 31 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in the ((2011-12))2017-18 school year, the statewide high school assessment in science shall be ((an end-of-course))a comprehensive assessment ((for biology)) that measures the state standards for the application of science and engineering practices, disciplinary core ideas, and crosscutting concepts in the domains of physical sciences, life sciences, ((in addition to systems, inquiry, and application as they pertain to life sciences))Earth and spaces sciences, and engineering design.

(2)(((a) The superintendent of public instruction may develop or adopt science end-of-course assessments or a comprehensive science assessment that includes subjects in addition to biology for purposes of RCW 28A.655.061, when so directed by the legislature. The legislature intends to transition from a biology end-of-course assessment to a more comprehensive science assessment in a manner consistent with the way in which the state transitioned to an English language arts assessment and a comprehensive mathematics assessment. The legislature further intends that the transition will include at least two years of using the student assessment results from either the biology end-of-course assessment or the more comprehensive assessment in order to provide students with reasonable opportunities to demonstrate high school competencies while being mindful of the increasing rigor of the new assessment.

)) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop or adopt a science assessment in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070(10) that is not biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.

(((c) Before the next subsequent school year after the legislature directs the superintendent to develop or adopt a new science assessment, the superintendent of public instruction shall review the objective alternative assessments for the science assessment and make recommendations to the legislature regarding additional objective alternatives, if any.))

(3) The superintendent of public instruction may participate with consortia of multiple states as common student learning standards and assessments in science are developed. The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, may modify the essential academic learning requirements and statewide student assessments in science, including the high school assessment, according to the multistate common student learning standards and assessments as long as the education committees of the legislature have opportunities for review before the modifications are adopted, as provided under RCW 28A.655.070.

(4) The statewide high school assessment under this section shall be used to demonstrate that a student meets the state standards in the science content area of the statewide student assessment until a comprehensive science assessment is required under RCW 28A.655.061.

Sec. 17. RCW 28A.655.070 and 2018 c 177 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state board of education.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:

(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential academic learning requirements; and

(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the grade level content expectations to be assessed on the statewide student assessment and used for state or federal accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing the statewide student assessment.

(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system may include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.

(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the Washington assessment of student learning and continuing with the statewide student assessment, the superintendent shall redesign the assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in all grades except high school by shortening test administration and reducing the number of short answer and extended response questions.

(c) By the 2014-15 school year, the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, shall modify the statewide student assessment system to transition to assessments developed with a multistate consortium, as provided in this subsection:

(i) The assessments developed with a multistate consortium to assess student proficiency in English language arts and mathematics shall be administered beginning in the 2014-15 school year, and beginning with the graduating class of 2020, the assessments must be administered to students in the tenth grade. The reading and writing assessments shall not be administered by the superintendent of public instruction or schools after the 2013-14 school year.

(ii) The high school assessments in English language arts and mathematics in (c)(i) of this subsection shall be used for the purposes of ((earning a certificate of academic achievement for high school graduation under the timeline established in RCW 28A.655.061))federal and state accountability and for assessing student career and college readiness.

(iii) During the transition period specified in RCW 28A.655.061, the superintendent of public instruction shall use test items and other resources from the consortium assessment to develop and administer a tenth grade high school English language arts assessment, an end-of-course mathematics assessment to assess the standards common to algebra I and integrated mathematics I, and an end-of-course mathematics assessment to assess the standards common to geometry and integrated mathematics II.

(d) The statewide academic assessment system must include assessments based on alternate achievement standards that are developed for students with significant cognitive challenges.

(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments, then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.

(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational support for students who have not mastered the essential academic learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's educational development.

(6) ((By September 2007,))The results for reading and mathematics shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content areas from one school year to the next.

(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide educational support to individual students, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance information as possible within the constraints of the assessment system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school districts:

(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may provide additional achievement information for individual students; and

(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily shared with parents and students.

(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.

(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and assessments for goals one and two.

(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.

(11) The superintendent shall review available and appropriate options for competency-based assessments that meet the essential academic learning requirements. In accordance with the review required by this subsection, the superintendent shall provide a report and recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November 1, 2019.

(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique needs of special education students when developing the assessments under this section.

(13) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments under this section.

(14) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness.

(15) The superintendent shall integrate financial education skills and content knowledge into the state learning standards pursuant to RCW 28A.300.460(2)(d).

(16)(a) The superintendent shall notify the state board of education in writing before initiating the development or revision of the essential academic learning requirements under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The notification must be provided to the state board of education in advance for review at a regularly scheduled or special board meeting and must include the following information:

(i) The subject matter of the essential academic learning requirements;

(ii) The reason or reasons the superintendent is initiating the development or revision; and

(iii) The process and timeline that the superintendent intends to follow for the development or revision.

(b) The state board of education may provide a response to the superintendent's notification for consideration in the development or revision process in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Prior to adoption by the superintendent of any new or revised essential academic learning requirements, the superintendent shall submit the proposed new or revised essential academic learning requirements to the state board of education in advance in writing for review at a regularly scheduled or special board meeting. The state board of education may provide a response to the superintendent's proposal for consideration prior to final adoption.

(17) The state board of education may propose new or revised essential academic learning requirements to the superintendent. The superintendent must respond to the state board of education's proposal in writing.

Sec. 18. RCW 28A.655.090 and 2008 c 165 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By September 10, 1998, and by September 10th each year thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall report to schools, school districts, and the legislature on the results of the ((Washington assessment of student learning and state-mandated norm-referenced standardized tests))statewide student assessment.

(2) The reports shall include the assessment results by school and school district, and include changes over time. For the ((Washington assessment of student learning))statewide student assessment, results shall be reported as follows:

(a) The percentage of students meeting the standards;

(b) The percentage of students performing at each level of the assessment;

(c) Disaggregation of results by at least the following subgroups of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan Native, Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, low income, transitional bilingual, migrant, special education, and, beginning with the 2009-10 school year, students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794); and

(d) A learning improvement index that shows changes in student performance within the different levels of student learning reported on the ((Washington assessment of student learning))statewide student assessment.

(3) The reports shall contain data regarding the different characteristics of schools, such as poverty levels, percent of English as a second language students, dropout rates, attendance, percent of students in special education, and student mobility so that districts and schools can learn from the improvement efforts of other schools and districts with similar characteristics.

(4) The reports shall contain student scores on mandated tests by comparable Washington schools of similar characteristics.

(5) The reports shall contain information on public school choice options available to students, including vocational education.

(6) The reports shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's internet web site.

(7) To protect the privacy of students, the results of schools and districts that test fewer than ten students in a grade level shall not be reported. In addition, in order to ensure that results are reported accurately, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain the confidentiality of statewide data files until the superintendent determines that the data are complete and accurate.

(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the percentage and number of special education and limited English-proficient students exempted from taking the assessments by schools and school districts to ensure the exemptions are in compliance with exemption guidelines.

Sec. 19. RCW 28A.655.200 and 2009 c 539 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature intends to permit school districts to offer norm-referenced assessments, make diagnostic tools available to school districts, and provide funding for diagnostic assessments to enhance student learning at all grade levels and provide early intervention before the high school ((Washington assessment of student learning))statewide student assessment.

(2) In addition to the diagnostic assessments provided under this section, school districts may, at their own expense, administer norm-referenced assessments to students.

(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall post on its web site for voluntary use by school districts, a guide of diagnostic assessments. The assessments in the guide, to the extent possible, shall include the characteristics listed in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose, beginning September 1, 2007, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make diagnostic assessments in reading, writing, mathematics, and science in elementary, middle, and high school grades available to school districts. Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall also provide funding to school districts for administration of diagnostic assessments to help improve student learning, identify academic weaknesses, enhance student planning and guidance, and develop targeted instructional strategies to assist students before the high school ((Washington assessment of student learning))statewide student assessment. To the greatest extent possible, the assessments shall be:

(a) Aligned to the state's grade level expectations;

(b) Individualized to each student's performance level;

(c) Administered efficiently to provide results either immediately or within two weeks;

(d) Capable of measuring individual student growth over time and allowing student progress to be compared to other students across the country;

(e) Readily available to parents; and

(f) Cost-effective.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offer training at statewide and regional staff development activities in:

(a) The interpretation of diagnostic assessments; and

(b) Application of instructional strategies that will increase student learning based on diagnostic assessment data.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. A new section is added to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The legislature intends to continue providing students with the opportunity to access a challenging learning environment and a meaningful diploma that supports every student in achieving whatever his or her individualized college or career goals are. Over the last decade, the legislature has implemented numerous reforms that have significantly strengthened our educational system, including increased course requirements and more challenging learning standards. Despite ongoing efforts to create an educational system focused on individualized student learning that is cultural responsive to the needs of our diverse student population, we continue to rely on a high-stakes test as a single barrier to graduation. This does not support the legislature's goal. The legislature recognizes that research shows that high-stakes testing is a one-size-fits-all approach that does not improve student achievement or increase graduation rates. The negative impacts of high-stakes testing often disproportionately affect our state's most vulnerable students.

(b) The legislature recognizes that to truly have an education system that supports student-focused learning and is responsive to the needs of each student, we must provide a system that allows each student to work with his or her teachers, parents, and counselors to identify the best way to demonstrate readiness to pursue his or her career or college goals. The legislature further recognizes that student-focused graduation pathways must be adaptable and allow students to change pathways as their goals shift. While standardized tests may be one option chosen by some students to show academic success, it should not be the only option for students to choose from. The legislature therefore intends to create a system of multiple pathways to graduation that each student may choose from in order to tailor the student's educational experience in a way that supports his or her individual goals for high school and beyond.

(2) Beginning with the class of 2020, in addition to the graduation requirements established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090 or by local high schools or school districts, a student shall, at minimum, meet the requirements of (a) and (b) of this subsection and at least one of the pathways provided in (c) of this subsection in order to obtain a high school diploma. The options under (c) of this subsection are intended to provide a student with multiple pathways to graduating with a meaningful high school diploma that are tailored to the goals of the student. A student may choose to pursue one or more of the pathways under (c) of this subsection.

(a) Demonstrate career and college readiness through successful completion of the high school and beyond plan, as described in RCW 28A.230.090.

(b) Earn required credits towards graduation.

(c) Successfully complete one or more of the following pathways:

(i) Meet or exceed the graduation standard on the high school assessments in English language arts and mathematics as provided for under RCW 28A.655.070. The state board of education shall establish the high school graduation cut score for the tenth grade statewide student assessments in English language arts and mathematics;

(ii) Complete and earn college credit in dual credit courses in English language arts and mathematics. For the purposes of this subsection, "a dual credit course" means a course in which a student earns college credit and high school credit in English language arts or mathematics;

(iii) Earn high school credit in a high school transition course in English language arts and mathematics, such as bridge to college courses. For the purposes of this subsection, "high school transition course" means an English language arts or mathematics course offered in high school where successful completion by a high school student ensures the student college-level placement at participating institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. High school transition courses must satisfy core or elective credit graduation requirements established by the state board of education. A student's successful completion of a high school transition course does not entitle the student to be admitted to any institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;

(iv) Meet or exceed the scores comparable in rigor to the graduation cut score set by the state board of education on advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or Cambridge international exams in English language arts and mathematics;

(v) Meet or exceed the scores set by the state board of education for the mathematics portion and the reading, English, or writing portion of the SAT or ACT;

(vi) Meet any combination of the English language arts and mathematics portions of (i) through (v) of this subsection;

(vii) Meet standard in the armed services vocational aptitude battery;

(viii) Complete a sequence of career and technical education courses, including those leading to workforce entry, state or nationally approved apprenticeships, or postsecondary education, that meet the minimum criteria identified in RCW 28A.700.030. However, nothing in this section requires that a student must enroll in a preparatory course that is approved under RCW 28A.700.030 for the purposes of meeting the graduation requirements under this section;

(ix) Ending with the class of 2021, for students eligible under chapter 28A.155 RCW, earn a certificate of individual achievement under RCW 28A.155.045.

(3) For the pathway under subsection (2)(c)(vii) of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt in rule what is considered meeting standard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. A new section is added to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are on track for high school graduation in whichever graduation pathway the student chooses, each school district shall:

(1) Provide students who did not meet or exceed standard on the high school assessments in English language arts or mathematics as provided for under RCW 28A.655.070 with the opportunity to access interventions and academic supports, courses, or both, designed to support students in meeting high school graduation requirements. These interventions, supports, or courses must be rigorous and consistent with the student's educational and career goals identified in his or her high school and beyond plan, and may include career and technical education equivalencies in English language arts or mathematics adopted under RCW 28A.230.097; and

(2) Prepare student learning plans and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as provided in this subsection. Student learning plans are required for eighth grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content areas of the state assessment during the previous school year or who are not on track to graduate due to credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their parents, shall translate the student learning plan into the primary language of the family. The student learning plan shall include the following information as applicable:

(a) The student's results on the state assessment;

(b) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;

(c) Any credit deficiencies;

(d) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;

(e) The student's progress toward meeting state and local graduation requirements;

(f) The courses, competencies, and other steps the student needs to take to meet state academic standards and stay on track for graduation;

(g) Remediation strategies and alternative education options available to students, including informing students of the option to continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until the age of twenty-one;

(h) School district programs, high school courses, and career and technical education options available for students to meet graduation requirements; and

(i) Available programs offered through skill centers or community and technical colleges, including diploma options under RCW 28B.50.535.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28A.345.080 (Model policy and procedure for granting waivers of credit for high school graduation) and 2014 c 217 s 203; and

(2) RCW 28A.655.066 (Statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 3, 2011 c 25 s 2, 2009 c 310 s 3, & 2008 c 163 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. Section 21 of this act takes effect January 1, 2020.

--- END ---