BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that more than three-fourths of the world's flowering plants and about thirty-five percent of the world's food crops depend on pollinators to reproduce. In Washington state, honey bees and other pollinators are responsible for the production of tree fruits, small fruits, and other crops, with the value in 2016 of crops pollinated by honey bees exceeding three billion dollars. The legislature further finds that, beyond agriculture, pollinators are keystone species in the terrestrial ecosystems of Washington, with fruit and seeds derived from insect pollination providing a major part of the diet of numerous bird and mammal species. The state has experienced pollinator habitat loss through property conversion, fragmentation, and degradation of land, and with the state's population continuing to grow at a fast pace, the additional loss of habitat is a significant concern.

Therefore, the legislature intends by this act to initiate a concerted effort to protect and expand the habitat upon which pollinators depend, by providing technical and financial assistance to public and private landowners, and by coordinating with other state agencies and local governments in promoting practices to ensure sustainable, healthy populations of managed and native pollinators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall establish a program to promote and protect pollinator habitat and the health and sustainability of pollinator species. As funds are made available, the program must provide technical and financial assistance to state agencies, local governments, and private landowners to implement practices that promote habitat for managed pollinators, as well as beekeeper and grower best management practices. The program must be administered in coordination with the apiary program established in chapter 15.60 RCW, the honey bee commission authorized in chapter 15.62 RCW, and programs administered by the conservation commission and conservation districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The department of agriculture shall create and chair a pollinator health task force. The department of agriculture shall appoint the members of the task force, which must include but is not limited to representatives of the following interests, organizations, and state agencies:

(a) The conservation commission;

(b) The department of natural resources;

(c) The department of fish and wildlife;

(d) The state parks and recreation commission;

(e) The Washington state department of transportation;

(f) The state noxious weed control board;

(g) The tree fruit industry;

(h) The seed industry;

(i) The berry industry;

(j) Other agricultural industries dependent upon pollinators;

(k) Washington State University;

(l) Pesticide distributors and applicators;

(m) Conservation organizations;

(n) Organizations representing beekeepers or apiarists;

(o) A member of the public from west of the crest of the Cascade mountains; and

(p) A member of the public from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(2) One or more representatives of Washington tribes must also be invited to participate on the task force.

(3) One youth representative from an organization that encourages students to engage in agricultural education must also be invited to participate on the task force when available.

(4) The task force shall build upon existing pollinator and pollinator habitat plans at the national and state level including, but not limited to, the state-managed pollinator plan, to develop a state pollinator health strategy that includes, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(a) A research action plan to focus state efforts on understanding, preventing, and recovering from pollinator losses;

(b) A plan to expand and coordinate public education programs outlining steps that individuals and businesses can take to help address the loss of pollinators;

(c) A plan to expand research on and education related to varroa mites and other pests and diseases that affect bees;

(d) Recommendations for developing public and private partnerships to encourage pollinator protection and increase the quality and amount of habitat and forage for pollinators;

(e) Specific targets and plans that state agencies should adopt to enhance pollinator habitat on their managed lands and facilities;

(f) Recommendations for promoting seed banks and native plants beneficial for pollinators;

(g) Recommendations for developing a plan to improve communication between beekeepers, landowners, and pesticide applicators, including a draft policy for the director of agriculture to consider that would allow the release of contact information for registered apiarists when requested by a landowner or pesticide applicator in order to protect the apiary when possible; and

(h) Recommendations for legislative, administrative, or budgetary actions necessary to implement the strategy.

(5) The department of agriculture shall provide the strategy to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31, 2020, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(6) This section expires January 1, 2021.

Sec. 4. RCW 17.10.145 and 2016 c 44 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All state agencies shall control noxious weeds on lands they own, lease, or otherwise control through integrated pest management practices. Agencies shall develop plans in cooperation with county noxious weed control boards to control noxious weeds in accordance with standards in this chapter.

(2) All state agencies' lands must comply with this chapter, regardless of noxious weed control efforts on adjacent lands.

(3) While conducting planned projects to ensure compliance with this chapter, all agencies must give preference, when deemed appropriate by the acting agency for the project and targeted resource management goals, to replacing ((pollen-rich or nectar-rich)) noxious weeds with native forage plants that are pollen-rich or nectar-rich and beneficial for all pollinators, including honey bees.

Sec. 5. RCW 79.10.120 and 2014 c 114 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Multiple uses additional to and compatible with those basic activities necessary to fulfill the financial obligations of trust management may include but are not limited to:

(1) Recreational areas;

(2) Recreational trails for both vehicular and nonvehicular uses developed or maintained consistent with RCW 79.10.500;

(3) Special educational or scientific studies;

(4) Experimental programs by the various public agencies;

(5) Special events;

(6) Hunting and fishing and other sports activities;

(7) Maintenance of pollinator habitat and habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators, including honey bees;

(8) Nonconsumptive wildlife activities as defined by the board of natural resources;

(((8)))(9) Maintenance of scenic areas;

(((9)))(10) Maintenance of historical sites;

(((10)))(11) Municipal or other public watershed protection;

(((11)))(12) Greenbelt areas;

(((12)))(13) Public rights-of-way;

(((13)))(14) Other uses or activities by public agencies((;)).

If such additional uses are not compatible with the financial obligations in the management of trust land they may be permitted only if there is compensation from such uses satisfying the financial obligations.

Sec. 6. RCW 79.10.200 and 2003 c 334 s 542 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may adopt a multiple use land resource allocation plan for all or portions of the lands under its jurisdiction providing for the identification and establishment of areas of land uses and identifying those uses which are best suited to achieve the purposes of RCW 79.10.060, 79.10.070, 79.10.100 through 79.10.120, 79.10.130, 79.10.200 through 79.10.330, 79.44.003, and ((79.90.456))79.105.050. Such plans shall take into consideration the various ecological conditions, elevations, soils, natural features, vegetative cover, pollinator habitat, climate, geographical location, values, public use potential, accessibility, economic uses, recreational potentials, local and regional land use plans or zones, local, regional, state, and federal comprehensive land use plans or studies, and all other factors necessary to achieve the purposes of RCW 79.10.060, 79.10.070, 79.10.100 through 79.10.120, 79.10.130, 79.10.200 through 79.10.330, 79.44.003, and ((79.90.456))79.105.050.

Sec. 7. RCW 79.10.280 and 2003 c 334 s 545 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall design expansion of its land use data bank to include additional information that will assist in the formulation, evaluation, and updating of intermediate and long-range goals and policies for land use, population growth and distribution, urban expansion, open space, resource preservation and utilization, and other factors which shape statewide development patterns and significantly influence the quality of the state's environment. The system shall be designed to permit inclusion of other lands in the state and will do so as financing and time permit.

(2) Such data bank shall contain any information relevant to the future growth of agriculture, forestry, industry, business, residential communities, and recreation; the wise use of land and other natural resources which are in accordance with their character and adaptability; the conservation and protection of the soil, air, water, pollinator habitat, and forest resources; the protection of the beauty of the landscape; and the promotion of the efficient and economical uses of public resources.

The information shall be assembled from all possible sources, including but not limited to, the federal government and its agencies, all state agencies, all political subdivisions of the state, all state operated universities and colleges, and any source in the private sector. All state agencies, all political subdivisions of the state, and all state universities and colleges are directed to cooperate to the fullest extent in the collection of data in their possession. Information shall be collected on all areas of the state but collection may emphasize one region at a time.

(3) The data bank shall make maximum use of computerized or other advanced data storage and retrieval methods. The department is authorized to engage consultants in data processing to ensure that the data bank will be as complete and efficient as possible.

(4) The data shall be made available for use by any governmental agency, research organization, university or college, private organization, or private person as a tool to evaluate the range of alternatives in land and resource planning in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The department must implement practices necessary to maintain pollinator habitat on department-owned and managed agricultural and grazing lands where practicable. For the purposes of this section, "pollinator habitat" means an area of land that is or may be developed as habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators, including honey bees, as determined by the department.

Sec. 9. RCW 79A.05.305 and 1984 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature declares that it is the continuing policy of the state of Washington to set aside and manage certain lands within the state for public park purposes. To comply with public park purposes, these lands shall be acquired and managed to:

(1) Maintain and enhance ecological, aesthetic, and recreational purposes;

(2) Preserve and maintain mature and old-growth forests containing trees of over ninety years and other unusual ecosystems as natural forests or natural areas, which may also be used for interpretive purposes;

(3) Protect cultural and historical resources, locations, and artifacts, which may also be used for interpretive purposes;

(4) Provide a variety of recreational opportunities to the public, including but not limited to use of developed recreation areas, trails, and natural areas;

(5) Preserve and maintain habitat which will protect and promote endangered, threatened, and sensitive plants, ((and)) endangered, threatened, and sensitive animal species, and habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators, including honey bees; and

(6) Encourage public participation in the formulation and implementation of park policies and programs.

Sec. 10. RCW 47.40.040 and 1961 c 13 s 47.40.040 are each amended to read as follows:

Each application for a permit to plant, cultivate and grow any hedge, shade or ornamental trees or shrubbery along or upon the right-of-way of any state highway or improve such right-of-way shall be in writing, signed by the applicant, and shall describe the state highway or portion thereof along or upon the right-of-way of which permit to plant, cultivate, grow or improve is sought, by name, number, or other reasonable description, and the lands bordering thereon by governmental subdivisions, and shall state the names, places or residence and post office addresses of the applicant or applicants owning the land abutting upon such state highway or the name of the person, firm, corporation, association or organization applying for the permit and the names of its officers and their places of residence and their post office addresses, and shall state definitely the purpose for which the permit is sought, giving a description of the kind of hedge, or variety of shrubbery or trees desired to be planted or the kinds of crops to be grown, or improvement to be made, with a diagram illustrating the location and number of hedges, trees or shrubs or the area of cultivation desired or plans of the improvement proposed to be made. Whenever possible, applicants should use native forage plants that are pollen-rich or nectar-rich and beneficial for all pollinators, including honey bees, in order to develop habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of pollinators.

Sec. 11. RCW 47.40.100 and 1995 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department of transportation shall establish a statewide adopt-a-highway program. The purpose of the program is to provide volunteers and businesses an opportunity to contribute to a cleaner environment, enhanced roadsides, and protection of wildlife habitats. Participating volunteers and businesses shall adopt department-designated sections of state highways, rest areas, park and ride lots, intermodal facilities, and any other facilities the department deems appropriate, in accordance with rules adopted by the department. The department may elect to coordinate a consortium of participants for adopt-a-highway projects.

(b) The adopt-a-highway program shall include, at a minimum, litter control for the adopted section, and may include additional responsibilities such as planting and maintaining vegetation, controlling weeds, graffiti removal, and any other roadside improvement or clean-up activities the department deems appropriate. Whenever possible, when planting and maintaining vegetation, volunteers and businesses should use native forage plants that are pollen-rich or nectar-rich and beneficial for all pollinators, including honey bees, in order to develop habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of pollinators. The department shall not accept adopt-a-highway proposals that would have the effect of terminating classified employees or classified employee positions.

(2) A volunteer group or business choosing to participate in the adopt-a-highway program must submit a proposal to the department. The department shall review the proposal for consistency with departmental policy and rules. The department may accept, reject, or modify an applicant's proposal.

(3) The department shall seek partnerships with volunteer groups and businesses to facilitate the goals of this section. The department may solicit funding for the adopt-a-highway program that allows private entities to undertake all or a portion of financing for the initiatives. The department shall develop guidelines regarding the cash, labor, and in-kind contributions to be performed by the participants.

(4) An organization whose name: (a) Endorses or opposes a particular candidate for public office, (b) advocates a position on a specific political issue, initiative, referendum, or piece of legislation, or (c) includes a reference to a political party shall not be eligible to participate in the adopt-a-highway program.

(5) In administering the adopt-a-highway program, the department shall:

(a) Provide a standardized application form, registration form, and contractual agreement for all participating groups. The forms shall notify the prospective participants of the risks and responsibilities to be assumed by the department and the participants;

(b) Require all participants to be at least fifteen years of age;

(c) Require parental consent for all minors;

(d) Require at least one adult supervisor for every eight minors;

(e) Require one designated leader for each participating organization, unless the department chooses to coordinate a consortium of participants;

(f) Assign each participating organization a section or sections of state highway, or other state-owned transportation facilities, for a specified period of time;

(g) Recognize the efforts of a participating organization by erecting and maintaining signs with the organization's name on both ends of the organization's section of highway;

(h) Provide appropriate safety equipment. Safety equipment issued to participating groups must be returned to the department upon termination of the applicable adopt-a-highway agreement;

(i) Provide safety training for all participants;

(j) Pay any and all premiums or assessments required under RCW 51.12.035 to secure medical aid benefits under chapter 51.36 RCW for all volunteers participating in the program;

(k) Require participating businesses to pay all employer premiums or assessments required to secure medical aid benefits under chapter 51.36 RCW for all employees or agents participating in the program;

(l) Maintain records of all injuries and accidents that occur;

(m) Adopt rules that establish a process to resolve any question of an organization's eligibility to participate in the adopt-a-highway program;

(n) Obtain permission from property owners who lease right-of-way before allowing an organization to adopt a section of highway on such leased property; and

(o) Establish procedures and guidelines for the adopt-a-highway program.

(6) Nothing in this section affects the rights or activities of, or agreements with, adjacent landowners, including the use of rights-of-way and crossings, nor impairs these rights and uses by the placement of signs.

Sec. 12. RCW 79A.15.060 and 2016 c 149 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and priorities for distributions from the habitat conservation account.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 79A.15.030(8), moneys appropriated for this chapter may not be used by the board to fund staff positions or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional, or local agency to fund operation or maintenance of areas acquired under this chapter.

(3) Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used by grant recipients for costs incidental to acquisition, including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, noxious weed control, and signing.

(4) The board may not approve a local project where the local agency share is less than the amount to be awarded from the habitat conservation account.

(5) In determining acquisition priorities with respect to the habitat conservation account, the board shall consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:

(a) For critical habitat and natural areas proposals:

(i) Multiple benefits for the project;

(ii) Whether, and the extent to which, a conservation easement can be used to meet the purposes for the project;

(iii) Community support for the project based on input from, but not limited to, local citizens, local organizations, and local elected officials;

(iv) The project proposal's ongoing stewardship program that includes estimated costs of maintaining and operating the project including, but not limited to, control of noxious weeds and detrimental invasive species, and that identifies the source of the funds from which the stewardship program will be funded;

(v) Recommendations as part of a watershed plan or habitat conservation plan, or a coordinated regionwide prioritization effort, and for projects primarily intended to benefit salmon, limiting factors, or critical pathways analysis;

(vi) Immediacy of threat to the site;

(vii) Uniqueness of the site;

(viii) Diversity of species using the site;

(ix) Quality of the habitat;

(x) Long-term viability of the site;

(xi) Presence of endangered, threatened, or sensitive species;

(xii) Enhancement of existing public property;

(xiii) Consistency with a local land use plan, or a regional or statewide recreational or resource plan, including projects that assist in the implementation of local shoreline master plans updated according to RCW 90.58.080 or local comprehensive plans updated according to RCW 36.70A.130;

(xiv) Educational and scientific value of the site;

(xv) Integration with recovery efforts for endangered, threatened, or sensitive species;

(xvi) The statewide significance of the site;

(xvii) Habitat benefits for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators, including honey bees.

(b) For urban wildlife habitat proposals, in addition to the criteria of (a) of this subsection:

(i) Population of, and distance from, the nearest urban area;

(ii) Proximity to other wildlife habitat;

(iii) Potential for public use; and

(iv) Potential for use by special needs populations.

(c) For riparian protection proposals, the board must consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:

(i) Whether the project continues the conservation reserve enhancement program. Applications that extend the duration of leases of riparian areas that are currently enrolled in the conservation reserve enhancement program are eligible. These applications are eligible for a conservation lease extension of at least twenty-five years of duration;

(ii) Whether the projects are identified or recommended in a watershed plan, salmon recovery plan, or other local plans, such as habitat conservation plans, and these must be highly considered in the process;

(iii) Whether there is community support for the project;

(iv) Whether the proposal includes an ongoing stewardship program that includes control of noxious weeds, detrimental invasive species, and that identifies the source of the funds from which the stewardship program will be funded;

(v) Whether there is an immediate threat to the site;

(vi) Whether the quality of the habitat is improved or, for projects including restoration or enhancement, the potential for restoring quality habitat including linkage of the site to other high quality habitat;

(vii) Whether the project is consistent with a local land use plan or a regional or statewide recreational or resource plan. The projects that assist in the implementation of local shoreline master plans updated according to RCW 90.58.080 or local comprehensive plans updated according to RCW 36.70A.130 must be highly considered in the process;

(viii) Whether the site has educational or scientific value; ((and))

(ix) Whether the site has passive recreational values for walking trails, wildlife viewing, the observation of natural settings, or other multiple benefits; and

(x) Whether the project provides habitat benefits for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators, including honey bees.

(d) Moneys appropriated for this chapter to riparian protection projects must be distributed for the acquisition or enhancement or restoration of riparian habitat. All enhancement or restoration projects, except those qualifying under (c)(i) of this subsection, must include the acquisition of a real property interest in order to be eligible.

(6) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the board shall recommend to the governor a prioritized list of all projects to be funded under RCW 79A.15.040. The governor may remove projects from the list recommended by the board and shall submit this amended list in the capital budget request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be limited to, a description of each project and any particular match requirement, and describe for each project any anticipated restrictions upon recreational activities allowed prior to the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 15.58 RCW to read as follows:

The department must develop educational materials regarding the best practices for avoiding adverse effects from pesticides on populations of bees, honey bees, and other pollinating insects. The educational materials must include, but not be limited to, measures that anyone applying pesticides can take to protect bees, honey bees, and other pollinating insects. The department must design requirements to ensure that any pesticide applicator applying or supervising the application of a restricted-use pesticide is highly knowledgeable regarding alternatives to, the appropriateness of, and precautions for, the use of restricted-use pesticides that may be injurious to the health of bees, honey bees, and other pollinating insects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A city or town may, by ordinance, establish an urban agriculture zone within the boundaries of the city or town.

(2) To establish an urban agriculture zone, the city or town must conduct at least one public hearing on the question of whether to establish the urban agriculture zone.

(3) An ordinance adopted pursuant to this section must not prohibit the use of structures that support agricultural activity including, without limitation, apiaries, toolsheds, greenhouses, produce stands, and instructional spaces.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

A city or town may authorize, by ordinance, the use of vacant or blighted city land for the purpose of community gardening under the terms and conditions established for the use of the city land set forth by the ordinance. The ordinance may establish fees for the use of the city land, provide requirements for liability insurance, and provide requirements for a deposit to use the city land, which may be refunded. The ordinance must require that a portion of the community garden include habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators, including honey bees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A code city may, by ordinance, establish an urban agriculture zone within the boundaries of the code city.

(2) To establish an urban agriculture zone, the code city must conduct at least one public hearing on the question of whether to establish the urban agriculture zone.

(3) An ordinance adopted pursuant to this section must not prohibit the use of structures that support agricultural activity including, without limitation, apiaries, toolsheds, greenhouses, produce stands, and instructional spaces.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

A code city may authorize, by ordinance, the use of vacant or blighted city land for the purpose of community gardening under the terms and conditions established for the use of the city land set forth by the ordinance. The ordinance may establish fees for the use of the city land, provide requirements for liability insurance, and provide requirements for a deposit to use the city land, which may be refunded. The ordinance must require that a portion of the community garden include habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators, including honey bees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. A new section is added to chapter 36.34 RCW to read as follows:

A county may, by ordinance, authorize the use of vacant or blighted county land for the purpose of community gardening under the terms and conditions established for the use of the county land set forth by the ordinance. The ordinance may establish fees for the use of the county land, provide requirements for liability insurance, and provide requirements for a deposit to use the county land, which may be refunded. The ordinance must require that a portion of the community garden include habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators, including honey bees.

--- END ---