BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A school district superintendent, or his or her designee, or a principal of a school who receives information pursuant to RCW 28A.225.330, 9A.44.138, 13.04.155, 13.40.215, or 72.09.730 shall comply with the notification provisions described in this section.

(2) Upon receipt of information described in subsection (1) of this section, a school district superintendent, or his or her designee, must provide the information to the principal of the school that the student, whom the information is about, was, or will be, enrolled in.

(3)(a) Upon receipt of information about a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the principal must comply with the notification requirements in RCW 9A.44.138.

(b) Upon receipt of information about a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, or a school disciplinary action, the principal has discretion to share the information with a staff member if, in the principal's judgment, the information is necessary for:

(i) The staff member to supervise the student;

(ii) The staff member to provide or refer the student to therapeutic or behavioral health services; or

(iii) Security purposes.

(4) Any information received by school district staff under this section is confidential and may not be further disseminated except as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other statutes or case law, and the family and educational and privacy rights act of 1994 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.195 RCW to read as follows:

The administrator of a private school approved under this chapter must comply with the notification provisions of section 1 of this act that apply to administrators and principals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.710 RCW to read as follows:

The administrator of a charter public school governed by this chapter must comply with the notification provisions of section 1 of this act that apply to administrators and principals.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.320.128 and 2002 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By September 1, ((2003))2019, each school district board of directors shall adopt a policy that addresses the following issues:

(a) Procedures for providing notice of threats of violence or harm to the student or school employee who is the subject of the threat. The policy shall define "threats of violence or harm"; and

(b) Procedures for ((disclosing information that is provided to the school administrators about a student's conduct, including but not limited to the student's prior disciplinary records, official juvenile court records, and history of violence, to classroom teachers, school staff, and school security who, in the judgment of the principal, should be notified ; and

(c) Procedures for determining whether or not any threats or conduct established in the policy may be grounds for suspension or expulsion of the student))complying with the notification provisions in section 1 of this act.

(2) The ((superintendent of public instruction))Washington state school directors' association, in consultation with educators and representatives of law enforcement, classified staff, and organizations with expertise in violence prevention and intervention, shall adopt, and revise as necessary, a model policy that includes the issues listed in subsection (1) of this section ((by January 1, 2003)). The model policy shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site. The school districts, in drafting their own policies, shall review the model policy.

(3) School districts, school district boards of directors, school officials, and school employees providing notice in good faith as required and consistent with the board's policies adopted under this section are immune from any liability arising out of such notification.

(4) A person who intentionally and in bad faith or maliciously, knowingly makes a false notification of a threat under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 5. RCW 9A.44.138 and 2011 c 337 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receiving notice from a registered person pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130 that the person will be attending a school enrolling students in grades kindergarten through twelve or an institution of higher education, or will be employed with an institution of higher education, the sheriff must promptly notify the administrator of the school ((district and the school principal)) or institution(('s department)) of ((public safety and shall provide that school or department with)) the person's: (a) Name and any aliases used; (b) complete residential address; (c) date and place of birth; (d) place of employment; (e) crime for which convicted; (f) date and place of conviction; (g) social security number; (h) photograph; and (i) risk level classification.

(2) ((A principal or department))Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an administrator receiving notice under this ((subsection))section must disclose the information received from the sheriff as follows:

(a) If the student is classified as a risk level II or III, the ((principal))administrator shall provide the information received to every teacher of the student and to any other personnel who, in the judgment of the ((principal))administrator, supervises the student or for security purposes should be aware of the student's record;

(b) If the student is classified as a risk level I, the ((principal or department))administrator shall provide the information received only to personnel who, in the judgment of the ((principal or department))administrator, for security purposes should be aware of the student's record.

(3) When the administrator is the administrator of a school district, the administrator must disclose the information to the principal of the school that the registered person will be attending, whether the school is a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW. The principal must then disclose the information as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The sheriff shall notify the applicable ((school district and school principal or institution's department of public safety))administrator whenever a student's risk level classification is changed or the sheriff is notified of a change in the student's address.

(((4)))(5) Any information received by school or institution personnel under this ((subsection))section is confidential and may not be further disseminated except as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other statutes or case law, and the family and educational and privacy rights act of 1994, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "administrator" means: (a) The superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, of a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW; (b) the administrator of a charter public school governed by chapter 28A.710 RCW; (c) the administrator of a private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW; or (d) the director of the department of public safety at an institution of higher education.

Sec. 6. RCW 13.04.155 and 2000 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Whenever a minor enrolled in any common school is))The provisions of this section apply only to persons who:

(a) Were adjudicated in juvenile court or convicted in adult criminal court((, or adjudicated or entered into a diversion agreement with the juvenile court on any)) of ((the following offenses, the court must notify the principal of the student's school of the disposition of the case, after first notifying the parent or legal guardian that such notification will be made:

(a)))a violent offense ((as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) A))or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(((c) Inhaling toxic fumes under chapter 9.47A RCW;

(d) A controlled substances violation under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(e) A liquor violation under RCW 66.44.270; and

(f) Any crime under chapters 9.41, 9A.36, 9A.40, 9A.46, and 9A.48 RCW.

(2) The principal must provide the information received under subsection (1) of this section to every teacher of any student who qualifies under subsection (1) of this section and any other personnel who, in the judgment of the principal, supervises the student or for security purposes should be aware of the student's record. The principal must provide the information to teachers and other personnel based on any written records that the principal maintains or receives from a juvenile court administrator or a law enforcement agency regarding the student.))

(b) Are twenty-one years of age or younger; and

(c) Who have not received a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(2)(a) The court must provide written notification of the juvenile court adjudication or adult criminal court conviction of a person described in subsection (1) of this section to the administrator of the school where the person:

(i) Was enrolled prior to adjudication or conviction; or

(ii) Has expressed an intention to enroll following adjudication or conviction.

(b) The notification required under (a) of this subsection may only be made after first notifying the person's parent or guardian of the requirements of (a) of this subsection.

(3) Any information received by ((a principal or school personnel))an administrator under this section is confidential and may not be further disseminated except as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other statutes or case law, and the family and educational and privacy rights act of 1994, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "administrator" means: (a) The superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, of a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW; (b) the administrator of a charter public school governed by chapter 28A.710 RCW; or (c) the administrator of a private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

Sec. 7. RCW 13.40.215 and 1999 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest ((possible))practicable date, and in no event later than thirty days before discharge, parole, or any other authorized leave or release, or before transfer to a community residential facility, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, to the following:

(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the juvenile will reside; and

(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the juvenile will reside((; and

(iii) The approved private schools and the common school district board of directors of the district in which the juvenile intends to reside or the approved private school or public school district in which the juvenile last attended school, whichever is appropriate, except when it has been determined by the department that the juvenile is twenty-one years old or will be in the community for less than seven consecutive days on approved leave and will not be attending school during that time)).

(b) ((After July 25, 1999, the department shall send a written notice to approved private and public schools under the same conditions identified in subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section when a juvenile adjudicated of any offense is transferred to a community residential facility, discharged, paroled, released, or granted a leave.))(i) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest practicable date, and in no event later than thirty days before discharge, parole, or any other authorized leave or release, or before transfer to a community residential facility, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of an individual who is found to have committed a violent offense or a sex offense, is twenty-one years of age or younger, and has not received a high school diploma or its equivalent, to the administrator of the school where the juvenile either: (A) Was enrolled prior to incarceration or detention; or (B) has expressed an intention to enroll following his or her release. This notice must also include the restrictions described in subsection (5) of this section.

(ii) The community residential facility shall provide written notice of the offender's criminal history to the administrator of any school that the offender attends while residing at the community residential facility and to any employer that employs the offender while residing at the community residential facility.

(iii) As used in this subsection, "administrator" means: (A) The superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, of a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW; (B) the administrator of a charter public school governed by chapter 28A.710 RCW; or (C) the administrator of a private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

(c) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific juvenile:

(i) The victim of the offense for which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;

(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the juvenile in any court proceedings involving the offense; and

(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.

Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available to the juvenile. The notice to the chief of police or the sheriff shall include the identity of the juvenile, the residence where the juvenile will reside, the identity of the person, if any, responsible for supervising the juvenile, and the time period of any authorized leave.

(d) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection shall not apply to emergency medical furloughs.

(e) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection will not require any extension of the release date in the event the release plan changes after notification.

(2)(a) If a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking escapes from a facility of the department, the secretary shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the juvenile resided immediately before the juvenile's arrest. If previously requested, the secretary shall also notify the witnesses and the victim of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. If the juvenile is recaptured, the secretary shall send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working days after the department learns of such recapture.

(b) The secretary may authorize a leave, for a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. Prior to the commencement of an emergency or medical leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will be during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave. If previously requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and victim of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the offense was a homicide.

In case of an emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portion of the requirements for leaves pursuant to RCW 13.40.205 (2)(a), (3), (4), and (5).

(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.

(4) The secretary shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last address provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department with a current address.

(5) Upon discharge, parole, transfer to a community residential facility, or other authorized leave or release, a convicted juvenile sex offender shall not attend a public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school that is attended by a victim or a sibling of a victim of the sex offender. The parents or legal guardians of the convicted juvenile sex offender shall be responsible for transportation or other costs associated with or required by the sex offender's change in school that otherwise would be paid by a school district. ((Upon discharge, parole, transfer to a community residential facility, or other authorized leave or release of a convicted juvenile sex offender, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, or other authorized leave or release and the requirements of this subsection to the common school district board of directors of the district in which the sex offender intends to reside or the district in which the sex offender last attended school, whichever is appropriate. The secretary shall send a similar notice to any approved private school the juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the approved private schools within the district the juvenile resides or intends to reside.))

(6) For purposes of this section the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(c) "Stalking" means the crime of stalking as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;

(d) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and children.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.225.330 and 2013 c 182 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When enrolling a student who has attended school in another school district, the school enrolling the student may request the parent and the student to briefly indicate in writing whether or not the student has:

(a) Any history of placement in special educational programs;

(b) Any past, current, or pending disciplinary action;

(c) Any history of violent behavior, or behavior listed in RCW 13.04.155;

(d) Any unpaid fines or fees imposed by other schools; and

(e) Any health conditions affecting the student's educational needs.

(2) The school enrolling the student shall request ((the school the student previously attended to send)) the student's permanent record including records of disciplinary action, history of violent behavior or behavior listed in RCW 13.04.155, attendance, immunization records, and academic performance from the school the student previously attended. If the student has not paid a fine or fee under RCW 28A.635.060, or tuition, fees, or fines at approved private schools the school may withhold the student's official transcript, but shall transmit information about the student's academic performance, special placement, immunization records, records of disciplinary action, and history of violent behavior or behavior listed in RCW 13.04.155. If the official transcript is not sent due to unpaid tuition, fees, or fines, the enrolling school shall notify both the student and parent or guardian that the official transcript will not be sent until the obligation is met, and failure to have an official transcript may result in exclusion from extracurricular activities or failure to graduate.

(3) Upon request, school districts shall furnish a set of unofficial educational records to a parent or guardian of a student who is transferring out of state and who meets the definition of a child of a military family in transition under Article II of RCW 28A.705.010. School districts may charge the parent or guardian the actual cost of providing the copies of the records.

(4) If information is requested under subsection (2) of this section, the information shall be transmitted within two school days after receiving the request and the records shall be sent as soon as possible. The records of a student who meets the definition of a child of a military family in transition under Article II of RCW 28A.705.010 shall be sent within ten days after receiving the request. Any school district or district employee who releases the information in compliance with this section is immune from civil liability for damages unless it is shown that the school district employee acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The professional educator standards board shall provide by rule for the discipline under chapter 28A.410 RCW of a school principal or other chief administrator of a public school building who fails to make a good faith effort to assure compliance with this subsection.

(5) Any school district or district employee who releases the information in compliance with federal and state law is immune from civil liability for damages unless it is shown that the school district or district employee acted with gross negligence or in bad faith.

(6) ((When a school receives information under this section or RCW 13.40.215 that a student has a history of disciplinary actions, criminal or violent behavior, or other behavior that indicates the student could be a threat to the safety of educational staff or other students, the school shall provide this information to the student's teachers and security personnel.

(7))) A school may not prevent a student who is dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW from enrolling if there is incomplete information as enumerated in subsection (1) of this section during the ten business days that the department of social and health services has to obtain that information under RCW 74.13.631. In addition, upon enrollment of a student who is dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW, the school district must make reasonable efforts to obtain and assess that child's educational history in order to meet the child's unique needs within two business days.

Sec. 9. RCW 72.09.730 and 2011 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((At the earliest possible date and in no event later than thirty days before))The provisions of this section apply only to an offender ((is)) released from confinement((, the department shall provide notice to the school district board of directors of the district in which the offender last attended school if the offender))who:

(a) Was convicted of a violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.9A.030;

(b) Is twenty-one years of age or younger at the time of release((;

(b) Has been convicted of a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking)); and

(c) ((Last attended))Has not received a high school ((in this state))diploma or its equivalent.

(2) At the earliest practicable date, and in no event later than thirty days before release from confinement, the department must provide written notification of the release of an offender described in subsection (1) of this section to the administrator of the school where the offender:

(a) Was enrolled prior to incarceration or detention; or

(b) Has expressed an intention to enroll following his or her release.

(3) If after providing notification as required under subsection (2) of this section, the release of an offender described in subsection (1) of this section is delayed, the department must inform the administrator of the modified release date.

(4) This section applies whenever an offender is being released from total confinement, regardless if the release is to parole, community custody, work release placement, or furlough.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "administrator" means: (a) The superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, of a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW; (b) the administrator of a charter public school governed by chapter 28A.710 RCW; or (c) the administrator of a private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

--- END ---