BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.250 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In order to improve health outcomes for children placed in out-of-home placement pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW, the collaborative shall evaluate the most effective and beneficial way to screen children placed in out-of-home care for traumatic brain injuries.

(2) By December 1, 2020, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the collaborative shall report, at a minimum, the following information to the governor and the legislature:

(a) The most effective way to screen children entering foster care for traumatic brain injury; and

(b) Recommendations as to when the screenings should occur, who should conduct the screenings, and what screening tools should be used to conduct the screenings.

(3) This section expires December 31, 2020.

--- END ---