BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

A city or town may not impose a tax measured by employee wages, employee hours, or the number of employment positions, which is initially enacted on or after January 1, 2019.

--- END ---