BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.120 and 2010 c 161 s 513 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for a certificate of title for a vehicle previously registered in any other state or country, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay a fee of fifteen dollars. The fifteen dollar fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.020.

(2) An applicant is exempt from the fifteen dollar fee if the applicant previously registered the vehicle in Washington state and maintained ownership of the vehicle while registered in another state or country.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2020.

--- END ---