BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a grant program for the purposes of supporting media literacy and digital citizenship through school district leadership teams. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish and publish criteria for the grant program, and may accept gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources for the grant program.

(2)(a) For a school district to qualify for a grant under this section, the grant proposal must provide that the grantee shall create a district leadership team that develops a curriculum unit on media literacy or digital citizenship, or both, that may be integrated into one of the following areas:

(i) Social studies;

(ii) English language arts; or

(iii) Health.

(b) School districts selected under the grant program are expected to evaluate the curriculum unit they develop under this subsection.

(c) In developing their curriculum unit, school districts selected under the grant program are encouraged to work with school district teacher-librarians or a school district library information technology program, if applicable.

(3) The establishment of the grant program under this section is subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose.

(4) The curriculum unit developed under this section shall be made available as an open educational resource.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2029.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene two regional conferences on the subject of media literacy and digital citizenship.

(2) The conferences in this section should highlight the work performed by the recipients of the grant program established under section 1 of this act, as well as best practices in media literacy and digital citizenship.

(3) The locations for conferences convened under this section must include one site in western Washington and one site in eastern Washington.

--- END ---