BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.0321 and 1987 c 4 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations organized primarily for purposes other than the conduct of such activities are hereby authorized to conduct bingo, raffles, and amusement games, without obtaining a license to do so from the commission but only when:

(1) Such activities are held in accordance with all other requirements of this chapter, other applicable laws, and rules of the commission;

(2) Said activities are, alone or in any combination, conducted no more than twice each calendar year and over a period of no more than twelve consecutive days each time, notwithstanding the limitations of RCW 9.46.0205: PROVIDED, That a raffle conducted under this subsection may be conducted for a period longer than twelve days;

(3) Only bona fide members of that organization, who are not paid for such services, participate in the management or operation of the activities;

(4) Gross revenues to the organization from all the activities together do not exceed five thousand dollars during any calendar year;

(5) All revenue therefrom, after deducting the cost of prizes and other expenses of the activity, is devoted solely to the purposes for which the organization qualifies as a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization;

(6) The organization gives notice at least five days in advance of the conduct of any of the activities to the local police agency of the jurisdiction within which the activities are to be conducted of the organization's intent to conduct the activities, the location of the activities, and the date or dates they will be conducted; and

(7) The organization conducting the activities maintains records for a period of one year from the date of the event which accurately show at a minimum the gross revenue from each activity, details of the expenses of conducting the activities, and details of the uses to which the gross revenue therefrom is put.

Subsections (2) and (4) of this section do not apply to organizations whose net revenues, after deducting the cost of prizes and other expenses of the activities, from all the activities together do not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars during any calendar year.

--- END ---