BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.225 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Children of military families comply with the residency requirements for school attendance in a school district if their parent is transferred or pending transfer to a military installation within the state while on active military duty pursuant to an official military order.

(2) A school district must accept, on a conditional basis, applications for enrollment and course registration by electronic means for children of military families who meet the conditions prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. Upon satisfaction of the requirement of subsection (3) of this section, the school district must finalize the enrollment of children of military families.

(3) The parent of a child who meets the conditions prescribed in subsection (1) of this section must provide proof of residence in the school district within fourteen days after the published arrival date provided on official documentation. The following addresses may be used to establish proof of residence for the purposes of this subsection:

(a) A temporary on-base billeting facility;

(b) A purchased or leased home or apartment;

(c) Federal government or public-private venture off-base military housing.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Active military duty" means full-time duty status in the active uniformed service of the United States, including members of the national guard and reserve on active duty orders.

(b) "Children of military families" means school aged children, enrolled in kindergarten through twelfth grade, in the household of an active duty member.

(c) "Military installation" means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, homeport facility for any ship, or other activity under the jurisdiction of the United States department of defense or the United States coast guard.

(d) "Parent" means the biological or adoptive parent or guardian of a dependent child.

--- END ---