BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Prior to engaging in the practice of manicuring for a client, the manicurist performing the service must ask the client if he or she is diabetic.

(2) The director, in consultation with the board, must develop training for manicurists regarding the risks associated with performing manicure services for diabetics, how to reduce those risks, and how to provide reasonable accommodation to clients with diabetes if necessary. The training developed under this subsection must be included in the required curriculum for manicurists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2020.

--- END ---