BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The department of fish and wildlife must conduct a pilot project to test "New Zealand design" elk fencing, including materials and construction techniques, and determine the cost and effectiveness of the fence design in reducing damage to private property and agricultural lands within the range of the north Cascades elk herd. The department of fish and wildlife shall work with at least two agricultural property owners in Skagit county with property abutting state highway 20 from highly impacted areas that volunteer to build and test the elk fence design and, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, report back to the natural resources committees of the legislature by November 1, 2020, on the results of the pilot project.

--- END ---