BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the healthy energy work group is created. The purpose of the work group is to develop the healthy energy workers board to address chemical exposure to tank farm vapors at the Hanford site.

(2) The University of Washington department of environmental and occupational health sciences shall provide administrative support to the healthy energy work group, including making arrangements for the initial meeting of the work group and subsequent meetings. The first meeting shall be in person and subsequent meetings may be convened over audio and/or video conferencing. In addition to the initial meetings, the work group shall meet no less than four times and no more than six times in 2019.

(3) The healthy energy work group is composed of the following members, who must be appointed by the governor:

(a) The director of the department of labor and industries, or the director's designee;

(b) The state secretary of health, or the secretary's designee;

(c) An individual representing Harborview medical center;

(d) An individual representing the University of Washington department of environmental and occupational health sciences;

(e) An individual representing the United States department of energy Richland operations office;

(f) A training director for construction safety and health at the volpentest hazardous materials management and emergency response federal training facility in Richland, Washington;

(g) An individual representing the central Washington building construction trades council;

(h) An individual representing the Hanford atomic metal trades council;

(i) An individual representing the Washington state building and construction trades council; and

(j) An individual representing UA local 598 plumbers and steamfitters.

(4) The healthy energy work group shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019, regarding the development of the healthy energy workers board, including recommendations for the membership and any draft legislation.

(5) The healthy energy work group is a class one group under RCW 43.03.220.

(6) This section expires December 31, 2019.

--- END ---