BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For plan years beginning January 1, 2020, a health carrier may not reimburse a contracted provider who is an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW in an amount less than the health carrier would reimburse for the same service if provided by a contracted provider who is a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW in the same area served.

(2) A health carrier may not reduce the reimbursement amount paid to physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW to comply with this section.

(3) This section does not apply to employees of a health maintenance organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW.

--- END ---