BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.230.020 and 2013 c 23 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

All common schools shall give instruction in reading, handwriting including cursive writing, orthography, written and mental arithmetic, geography, the history of the United States, English grammar, physiology and hygiene with special reference to the effects of alcohol and drug abuse on the human system, science with special reference to the environment, and such other studies as may be prescribed by rule of the superintendent of public instruction. All teachers shall stress the importance of the cultivation of manners, the fundamental principles of honesty, honor, industry, and economy, the minimum requisites for good health including the beneficial effect of physical exercise and methods to prevent exposure to and transmission of sexually transmitted diseases, and the worth of kindness to all living creatures and the land. The prevention of child abuse may be offered as part of the curriculum in the common schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning the effective date of this section, when a school district board of directors reviews or adopts its English language arts curriculum, it shall incorporate curricula to teach cursive writing.

--- END ---