BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning January 1, 2020, any general or individual waste discharge permit or national pollution discharge elimination system permit issued or renewed by the department for any publicly owned wastewater treatment plant that directly discharges to Puget Sound must require that opioids and other pollution derived from opioids are removed or neutralized to the maximum extent that is technologically feasible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.146 RCW to read as follows:

A public body that is subject to the provisions of section 1 of this act is ineligible to receive a grant or loan under this chapter if the public body is responsible for a water pollution control facility that does not comply with the terms of a permit relating to the reduction of opioid pollution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 70.150 RCW to read as follows:

A public body that is subject to the provisions of section 1 of this act is ineligible to receive a grant or loan under this chapter if the public body is responsible for a water pollution control facility that does not comply with the terms of a permit relating to the reduction of opioid pollution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A public body that is subject to the provisions of section 1 of this act is ineligible to receive a grant or loan under this chapter if the public body is responsible for a water pollution control facility that does not comply with the terms of a permit relating to the reduction of opioid pollution.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Public body" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.146.020.

(b) "Water pollution control facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.146.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 90.50A RCW to read as follows:

A public body that is subject to the provisions of section 1 of this act is ineligible to receive a grant or loan under this chapter if the public body is responsible for a water pollution control facility that does not comply with the terms of a permit relating to the reduction of opioid pollution.

--- END ---