BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other taxes imposed under this chapter, a surcharge is imposed on amounts received by any person, including persons engaging within this state in the business of radio and television broadcasting, for the sale of advertising space or time in a media outlet to promote the sale of prescription drugs directly to consumers. The surcharge is equal to 2.0 percent.

(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section must be used for services related to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of substance addiction and behavioral health conditions.

(3) For the purpose of this section, "media outlet" means a publication or broadcast medium that includes, but is not limited to, newspapers, magazines, radio, television, and billboards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect October 1, 2019.

--- END ---