BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 52.14.110 and 2009 c 229 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Insofar as practicable, purchases and any public works by the district shall be based on competitive bids. A formal sealed bid procedure shall be used as standard procedure for purchases and contracts for purchases executed by the board of commissioners. Formal sealed bidding shall not be required for:

(1) The purchase of any materials, supplies, or equipment if the cost will not exceed the sum of ((ten))forty thousand dollars. However, whenever the estimated cost does not exceed ((fifty))seventy-five thousand dollars, the commissioners may by resolution use the process provided in RCW 39.04.190 to award contracts;

(2) Contracting for work to be done involving the construction or improvement of a fire station or other buildings where the estimated cost will not exceed the sum of ((twenty))thirty thousand dollars, which includes the costs of labor, material, and equipment;

(3) Contracts using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155; and

(4) Any contract for purchases or public work pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

--- END ---