BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the developmental disabilities administration within the department shall work with stakeholders to design and implement services for individuals living in adult family homes who have a primary need of care related to a developmental or intellectual disability. These services must be designed to meet the specific provisions related to the assessment, environment, regulations, provision of care, and training requirements. These services must be designed to support an intentional environment to improve resident quality of life, increase resident length of stay, clarify regulations, streamline training requirements, reduce the need for institutional settings, and attract more adult family home providers to develop such highly needed resources. The recommendations for these services must be completed by June 1, 2020, for consideration and implementation in the 2021-2023 biennium.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the aging and long-term support administration within the department shall work with stakeholders to design and implement proposed services for individuals living in adult family homes that are dedicated solely to the care of individuals with dementia, including Alzheimer's disease. These services must be designed to include specific provisions related to the assessment, environment, regulations, provision of care, and training requirements. These services must be designed to support an intentional environment to improve resident quality of life, increase resident length of stay, clarify regulations, streamline training requirements, reduce the need for institutional settings, and attract more adult family home providers to develop such highly needed resources. The recommendations for these services must be completed by June 1, 2020, for consideration and implementation in the 2021-2023 biennium.

--- END ---