BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No promoter or promotion company may assist a liquor licensee in any capacity with organization or conduct of a public event where alcohol is sold unless the promoter or promotion company holds a valid promoter's permit issued by the board.

(2) An application for the promoter's permit must be submitted to the board at least sixty days before the initial event and, once issued, must be available for inspection at the premises where the permit is in use. The permit holder must notify the board at least thirty days prior to each event. The permit holder must abide by all state liquor laws and rules. A promoter's permit does not authorize the holder to sell liquor.

(3) The holder of a promoter's permit: (a) Must have a valid Washington business license prior to obtaining, and during possession of, the permit; and (b) when assisting a liquor licensee, including a special occasion licensee, with any public event, the liquor licensee must retain all profits from the liquor sales pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW.

(4) The promoter's permit is valid for a period of one year, unless the board suspends or revokes the promoter's permit prior to the expiration of the permit.

(5) The board must adopt rules to implement this section, including guidelines for promoters and promotion companies, qualifications for permits, penalties, and fees.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "promoter" and "promotion company" mean an individual or entity, respectively, that assists liquor licensees with events open to the public at a licensed premises.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act takes effect January 1, 2020.

--- END ---