BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART 1 - LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. The legislature recognizes that domestic violence treatment has been the most common, and sometimes only, legal response in domestic violence cases. There is a growing concern about the "one size fits all" approach for domestic violence misdemeanors, felonies, and other cases. In 2012, the legislature directed the Washington state institute for public policy to update its analysis of the scientific literature on domestic violence treatment. The institute found traditional domestic violence treatment to be ineffective. Treatment needs to be differentiated and grounded in science, risk, and long-term evaluation. The institute's findings coincided with a wave of federal, state, and local reports highlighting concerns with the efficacy of traditional domestic violence treatment. A new approach was needed to reduce recidivism by domestic violence offenders, provide both victims and offenders with meaningful answers about what works, and close critical safety gaps. Subsequently, the legislature directed the gender and justice commission to establish work groups and make recommendations to improve domestic violence treatment and risk assessments. The work group recommended establishing sentencing alternatives for domestic violence offenders, integrated systems response, and domestic violence risk assessments. During this time, the department of social and health services repealed the administrative codes for domestic violence treatment, and issued new codes grounded in a differentiated approach and evidence-based practice. There is no easy answer to what works to reduce domestic violence recidivism, and offenders often present with co-occurring substance abuse and mental health issues, but new administrative codes and work group recommendations reflect the best available evidence in how best to respond and treat domestic violence criminal offenders.

Improving rehabilitation and treatment of domestic violence offenders, and those offenders with co-occurring substance and mental health issues, is critical, given how often practitioners and courts use treatment as the primary, and sometimes only, intervention for domestic violence. Given the pervasiveness of domestic violence and because of the link between domestic violence and many community issues including violent recidivism, victims and offenders are owed effective treatment and courts need better tools. State studies have found domestic violence crimes to be the most predictive of future violent crime.

The legislature intends to modify sentencing alternatives and other sentencing practices to require use of a validated risk assessment tool and domestic violence treatment certified under the Washington Administrative Code. These new practices should be consistently used when criminal conduct is based on domestic violence behavioral problems. Further, the legislature intends to establish a long-term plan to study the significant changes and new multitiered treatment model of domestic violence perpetrator treatment in order to inform future practices and legislative changes.

PART II - CRIMINAL NO-CONTACT ORDERS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. (1) The legislature believes the existing language of RCW 10.99.050 has always authorized courts to issue domestic violence no-contact orders in adult and juvenile cases that last up to the adult statutory maximum in felony cases and up to the maximum period for which an adult sentence can be suspended or deferred in nonfelony cases. However, in State v. Granath, 200 Wn. App. 26, 401 P.3d 405 (2017), aff'd, 190 Wn.2d 548, 415 P.3d 1179 (2018), the court of appeals and supreme court recently interpreted this provision to limit domestic violence no-contact orders in nonfelony sentences to the duration of the defendant's conditions of sentence. The legislature finds that this interpretation inadequately protects victims of domestic violence. The legislature intends to clarify the trial courts' authority to issue no-contact orders that remain in place in adult and juvenile nonfelony cases for the maximum period of time that an adult sentence could be suspended, and in adult and juvenile felony cases for the adult statutory maximum.

(2) The legislature further finds that there is a discrepancy in which sentences for nonfelony domestic violence offenses can be suspended for up to five years in district and municipal courts, but only for up to two years in superior courts in most cases, creating inconsistent protection for victims. The legislature intends to rectify this discrepancy to allow nonfelony domestic violence sentences to be suspended for up to five years in all courts.

Sec. 202. RCW 9.95.210 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 6 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection in granting probation, the superior court may suspend the imposition or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the suspension may continue upon such conditions and for such time as it shall designate, not exceeding the maximum term of sentence or two years, whichever is longer.

(b) For a defendant sentenced for a domestic violence offense, or under RCW 46.61.5055, the superior court may suspend the imposition or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the suspension continue upon such conditions and for such time as the court shall designate, not to exceed five years. The court shall have continuing jurisdiction and authority to suspend the execution of all or any part of the sentence upon stated terms, including installment payment of fines. A defendant who has been sentenced, and who then fails to appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance with the terms of probation when ordered to do so by the court shall have the term of probation tolled until such time as the defendant makes his or her presence known to the court on the record. Any time before entering an order terminating probation, the court may modify or revoke its order suspending the imposition or execution of the sentence if the defendant violates or fails to carry out any of the conditions of the suspended sentence.

(2) In the order granting probation and as a condition thereof, the superior court may in its discretion imprison the defendant in the county jail for a period not exceeding one year and may fine the defendant any sum not exceeding the statutory limit for the offense committed, and court costs. As a condition of probation, the superior court shall require the payment of the penalty assessment required by RCW 7.68.035. The superior court may also require the defendant to make such monetary payments, on such terms as it deems appropriate under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any order of the court for the payment of family support; (b) to make restitution to any person or persons who may have suffered loss or damage by reason of the commission of the crime in question or when the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay such fine as may be imposed and court costs, including reimbursement of the state for costs of extradition if return to this state by extradition was required; (d) following consideration of the financial condition of the person subject to possible electronic monitoring, to pay for the costs of electronic monitoring if that monitoring was required by the court as a condition of release from custody or as a condition of probation; (e) to contribute to a county or interlocal drug fund; and (f) to make restitution to a public agency for the costs of an emergency response under RCW 38.52.430, and may require bonds for the faithful observance of any and all conditions imposed in the probation.

(3) The superior court shall order restitution in all cases where the victim is entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the superior court does not order restitution and the victim of the crime has been determined to be entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, the department of labor and industries, as administrator of the crime victims' compensation program, may petition the superior court within one year of imposition of the sentence for entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt of a petition from the department of labor and industries, the superior court shall hold a restitution hearing and shall enter a restitution order.

(4) In granting probation, the superior court may order the probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or such officer as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the probation to follow the instructions of the secretary for up to twelve months. If the county legislative authority has elected to assume responsibility for the supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers within its jurisdiction, the superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report to a probation officer employed or contracted for by the county. In cases where a superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one county, but resides within another county, there must be provisions for the probationer to report to the agency having supervision responsibility for the probationer's county of residence.

(5) If the probationer has been ordered to make restitution and the superior court has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the probationer shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether restitution has been made. If the superior court has ordered supervision and restitution has not been made as ordered, the officer shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms of probation not less than three months prior to the termination of the probation period. The secretary of corrections will promulgate rules and regulations for the conduct of the person during the term of probation. For defendants found guilty in district court, like functions as the secretary performs in regard to probation may be performed by probation officers employed for that purpose by the county legislative authority of the county wherein the court is located.

(6) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011 apply to sentences imposed under this section.

(7) For purposes of this section, "domestic violence" means the same as in RCW 10.99.020.

Sec. 203. RCW 10.99.050 and 2000 c 119 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a defendant is found guilty of a crime and a condition of the sentence restricts the defendant's ability to have contact with the victim, such condition shall be recorded and a written certified copy of that order shall be provided to the victim.

(2)(a) Willful violation of a court order issued under this section is punishable under RCW 26.50.110.

(b) The written order shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend: Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 26.50 RCW and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting, or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony.

(c) An order issued pursuant to this section in conjunction with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor sentence or juvenile disposition remains in effect for a fixed period of time determined by the court, which may not exceed five years from the date of sentencing or disposition.

(d) An order issued pursuant to this section in conjunction with a felony sentence or juvenile disposition remains in effect for a fixed period of time determined by the court, which may not exceed the adult maximum sentence established in RCW 9A.20.021.

(3) Whenever an order prohibiting contact is issued pursuant to this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state.

(4) If an order prohibiting contact issued pursuant to this section is modified or terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

PART III - RISK ASSESSMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. A new section is added to chapter 26.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington State University department of criminal justice shall develop and periodically update an actuarial domestic violence risk assessment tool to be used by the department of corrections and domestic violence treatment providers for the purpose of determining whether an offender's domestic violence crime and domestic violence history is such that there is a probability the offender will commit domestic violence in the future. In addition, the domestic violence risk assessment tool must have a component to determine how mental illness and chemical dependency affect whether an offender will commit domestic violence in the future.

(2) The domestic violence risk assessment tool must be based on best available evidence. In developing the tool, the Washington State University department of criminal justice shall consult with the Washington state institute for public policy, the Washington state supreme court gender and justice commission, the department of children, youth, and families, the department of corrections, domestic violence treatment providers, and other appropriate stakeholders.

(3) The Washington State University department of criminal justice shall make the domestic violence risk assessment tool available for use no later than July 1, 2020.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2021.

PART IV - SENTENCING

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

When sentencing an offender convicted of a domestic violence offense, the court, in addition to imposing the provisions of this chapter, shall order the offender to undergo alcohol or chemical dependency treatment or domestic violence treatment services during incarceration. The offender is responsible for the cost of treatment unless the court finds the offender indigent and no third-party insurance coverage is available.

Sec. 402. RCW 9.94A.500 and 2013 c 200 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before imposing a sentence upon a defendant, the court shall conduct a sentencing hearing. The sentencing hearing shall be held within forty court days following conviction. Upon the motion of either party for good cause shown, or on its own motion, the court may extend the time period for conducting the sentencing hearing.

Except in cases where the defendant shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for life without the possibility of release or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree, sentenced to death, the court may order the department to complete a risk assessment report. If available before sentencing, the report shall be provided to the court.

Unless specifically waived by the court, the court shall order the department to complete a chemical dependency screening report before imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of a violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50 RCW, a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW, or any felony where the court finds that the offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense. In addition, the court shall, at the time of plea or conviction, order the department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of a felony sexual offense. The department of corrections shall give priority to presentence investigations for sexual offenders. If the court determines that the defendant may be a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025, although the defendant has not established that at the time of the crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit the crime, was incompetent to commit the crime, or was insane at the time of the crime, the court shall order the department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence.

Unless specifically waived by the court, in cases of domestic violence the court shall order the department to complete a presentence investigation and domestic violence risk assessment before imposing a drug offender sentencing alternative or residential drug offender sentencing alternative upon a defendant who has been convicted of a domestic violence offense under chapter 26.50 RCW or any felony where the court finds that domestic violence contributed to his or her offense.

The court shall consider the risk assessment report and presentence reports, if any, including any victim impact statement and criminal history, and allow arguments from the prosecutor, the defense counsel, the offender, the victim, the survivor of the victim, or a representative of the victim or survivor, and an investigative law enforcement officer as to the sentence to be imposed.

A criminal history summary relating to the defendant from the prosecuting authority or from a state, federal, or foreign governmental agency shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and validity of the convictions listed therein. If the court is satisfied by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant has a criminal history, the court shall specify the convictions it has found to exist. All of this information shall be part of the record. Copies of all risk assessment reports, domestic violence risk assessment reports, and presentence reports presented to the sentencing court and all written findings of facts and conclusions of law as to sentencing entered by the court shall be sent to the department by the clerk of the court at the conclusion of the sentencing and shall accompany the offender if the offender is committed to the custody of the department. Court clerks shall provide, without charge, certified copies of documents relating to criminal convictions requested by prosecuting attorneys.

(2) To prevent wrongful disclosure of information and records related to mental health services, as described in RCW 71.05.445 and 70.02.250, a court may take only those steps necessary during a sentencing hearing or any hearing in which the department presents information related to mental health services to the court. The steps may be taken on motion of the defendant, the prosecuting attorney, or on the court's own motion. The court may seal the portion of the record relating to information relating to mental health services, exclude the public from the hearing during presentation or discussion of information and records relating to mental health services, or grant other relief to achieve the result intended by this subsection, but nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the subsequent release of information and records related to mental health services as authorized by RCW 71.05.445, 70.02.250, or 72.09.585. Any person who otherwise is permitted to attend any hearing pursuant to chapter 7.69 or 7.69A RCW shall not be excluded from the hearing solely because the department intends to disclose or discloses information related to mental health services.

Sec. 403. RCW 9.94A.660 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 524 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative if:

(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);

(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.504(6);

(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the United States;

(d) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled substance;

(e) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not become subject to a deportation order during the period of the sentence;

(f) The end of the standard sentence range for the current offense is greater than one year; and

(g) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current offense.

(2) A motion for a special drug offender sentencing alternative may be made by the court, the offender, or the state.

(3) If the sentencing court determines that the offender is eligible for an alternative sentence under this section and that the alternative sentence is appropriate, the court shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose a sentence consisting of either a prison-based alternative under RCW 9.94A.662 or a residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative under RCW 9.94A.664. The residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative is only available if the midpoint of the standard range is twenty-four months or less.

(4) To assist the court in making its determination, the court may order the department to complete either or both a risk assessment report and a chemical dependency screening report as provided in RCW 9.94A.500. To assist the court in making its determination in domestic violence cases, the court shall order the department to complete a domestic violence risk assessment validated by the Washington State University department of criminal justice and a chemical dependency screening report as provided in RCW 9.94A.500.

(5)(a) If the court is considering imposing a sentence under the residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative, the court may order an examination of the offender by the department. The examination shall, at a minimum, address the following issues:

(i) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;

(ii) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that criminal behavior will occur in the future;

(iii) Whether, in cases of domestic violence, the offender's domestic violence crime and domestic violence history is such that there is a probability the offender will commit domestic violence in the future;

(iv) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the department of ((social and health services))health, and where applicable, whether effective domestic violence perpetrator treatment is available from a state-certified domestic violence treatment provider pursuant to chapter 26.50 RCW; and

(((iv)))(v) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the use of the alternative.

(b) The examination report must contain:

(i) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members and others; ((and))

(ii) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions; and

(iii) Use of a domestic violence risk assessment tool validated by the Washington State University department of criminal justice.

(6) When a court imposes a sentence of community custody under this section:

(a) The court may impose conditions as provided in RCW 9.94A.703 and may impose other affirmative conditions as the court considers appropriate. In addition, an offender may be required to pay thirty dollars per month while on community custody to offset the cost of monitoring for alcohol or controlled substances, or in cases of domestic violence for monitoring with global positioning system technology for compliance with a no-contact order.

(b) The department may impose conditions and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.704 and 9.94A.737.

(7)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under this section back into court at any time on its own initiative to evaluate the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any violations of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.

(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify the conditions of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c) of this subsection.

(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense at any time during the period of community custody if the offender violates the conditions or requirements of the sentence or if the offender is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment.

(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under (c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously served under this section.

(8) In serving a term of community custody imposed upon failure to complete, or administrative termination from, the special drug offender sentencing alternative program, the offender shall receive no credit for time served in community custody prior to termination of the offender's participation in the program.

(9) An offender sentenced under this section shall be subject to all rules relating to earned release time with respect to any period served in total confinement.

(10) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans under a special drug offender sentencing alternative may be paid, at the option of the county, from funds provided to the county from the criminal justice treatment account under RCW 71.24.580.

Sec. 404. RCW 9.94A.662 and 2009 c 389 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentence for a prison-based special drug offender sentencing alternative shall include:

(a) A period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half the midpoint of the standard sentence range or twelve months, whichever is greater;

(b) One-half the midpoint of the standard sentence range as a term of community custody, which must include appropriate substance abuse treatment in a program that has been approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health services, and for co-occurring drug and domestic violence cases, must also include an appropriate domestic violence treatment program by a state-certified domestic violence treatment provider pursuant to chapter 26.50 RCW;

(c) Crime-related prohibitions, including a condition not to use illegal controlled substances;

(d) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that status; and

(e) A term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 to be imposed upon the failure to complete or administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing alternative program.

(2) During incarceration in the state facility, offenders sentenced under this section shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse assessment and, in cases of domestic violence, a domestic violence risk assessment, and receive, within available resources, treatment services appropriate for the offender. The treatment services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation with the department of corrections.

(3) If the department finds that conditions of community custody have been willfully violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence. An offender who fails to complete the program or who is administratively terminated from the program shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing court.

(4) If an offender sentenced to the prison-based alternative under this section is found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation order, a hearing shall be held by the department unless waived by the offender, and, if the department finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order, the department may administratively terminate the offender from the program and reclassify the offender to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.

PART V - COMMUNITY CUSTODY AND REENTRY

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall develop and monitor transition and relapse prevention strategies, including risk assessment and release plans, to reduce risk to the community after domestic violence offenders' terms of confinement in the custody of the department.

Sec. 502. RCW 9.94A.664 and 2009 c 389 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentence for a residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative shall include a term of community custody equal to one-half the midpoint of the standard sentence range or two years, whichever is greater, conditioned on the offender entering and remaining in residential chemical dependency treatment certified under chapter 70.96A RCW for a period set by the court between three and six months.

(2)(a) The court shall impose, as conditions of community custody, treatment and other conditions as proposed in the examination report completed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660.

(b) If the court imposes a term of community custody, the department shall, within available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and treatment services available to the offender during the term of community custody, and within available resources, make domestic violence assessment and treatment services available to a domestic violence offender during the term of community custody.

(3)(a) If the court imposes a sentence under this section, the treatment provider must send the treatment plan to the court within thirty days of the offender's arrival to the residential chemical dependency treatment program.

(b) Upon receipt of the plan, the court shall schedule a progress hearing during the period of residential chemical dependency treatment, and schedule a treatment termination hearing for three months before the expiration of the term of community custody.

(c) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination hearing, the treatment provider and the department shall submit written reports to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance with treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from treatment.

(4) At a progress hearing or treatment termination hearing, the court may:

(a) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's community custody status on the expiration date determined under subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration date of community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of community custody; or

(c) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half the midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.701.

(5) If the court imposes a term of total confinement, the department shall, within available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and treatment services available to the offender during the term of total confinement and subsequent term of community custody.

Sec. 503. RCW 9.94A.704 and 2016 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who is sentenced to a period of community custody shall report to and be placed under the supervision of the department, subject to RCW 9.94A.501.

(2)(a)(i) The department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of community custody based upon the risk to community safety.

(ii) For domestic violence crimes, the department shall assess the offender's risk of domestic violence reoffense pursuant to a risk assessment tool validated by the Washington State University department of criminal justice, and the department may establish and modify additional conditions of community custody based on the risk to community safety.

(b) Within the funds available for community custody, the department shall determine conditions on the basis of risk to community safety and risk of domestic violence reoffense, and shall supervise offenders during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety, risk of domestic violence reoffense, and conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection (2)(b).

(3) If the offender is supervised by the department, the department shall at a minimum instruct the offender to:

(a) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;

(b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries;

(c) Notify the community corrections officer of any change in the offender's address or employment;

(d) Pay the supervision fee assessment; and

(e) Disclose the fact of supervision to any mental health ((or)), chemical dependency, or domestic violence treatment provider, as required by RCW 9.94A.722.

(4) The department may require the offender to participate in rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and to obey all laws.

(5) If the offender was sentenced pursuant to a conviction for a sex offense or domestic violence, the department may:

(a) Require the offender to refrain from direct or indirect contact with the victim of the crime or immediate family member of the victim of the crime. If a victim or an immediate family member of a victim has requested that the offender not contact him or her after notice as provided in RCW 72.09.340, the department shall require the offender to refrain from contact with the requestor. Where the victim is a minor, the parent or guardian of the victim may make a request on the victim's behalf. This subsection is not intended to reduce the preexisting authority of the department to impose no-contact conditions regardless of the offender's crime and regardless of who is protected by the no-contact condition, where such condition is based on risk to community safety.

(b) Impose electronic monitoring. Within the resources made available by the department for this purpose, the department shall carry out any electronic monitoring using the most appropriate technology given the individual circumstances of the offender. As used in this section, "electronic monitoring" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030.

(6) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court-imposed conditions.

(7)(a) The department shall notify the offender in writing of any additional conditions or modifications.

(b) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department. The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds that it is not reasonably related to the crime of conviction, the offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community.

(8) The department shall notify the offender in writing upon community custody intake of the department's violation process.

(9) The department may require offenders to pay for special services rendered including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and telephone reporting, dependent on the offender's ability to pay. The department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(10)(a) When an offender on community custody is under the authority of the board, the department shall assess the offender's risk of recidivism and shall recommend to the board any additional or modified conditions based upon the offender's risk to community safety and may recommend affirmative conduct or electronic monitoring consistent with subsections (4) through (6) of this section.

(b) The board may impose conditions in addition to court-ordered conditions. The board must consider and may impose department-recommended conditions. The board must impose a condition requiring the offender to refrain from contact with the victim or immediate family member of the victim as provided in subsection (5)(a) of this section.

(c) By the close of the next business day, after receiving notice of a condition imposed by the board or the department, an offender may request an administrative hearing under rules adopted by the board. The condition shall remain in effect unless the hearing examiner finds that it is not reasonably related to any of the following:

(i) The crime of conviction;

(ii) The offender's risk of reoffending;

(iii) The safety of the community;

(iv) The offender's risk of domestic violence reoffense.

(d) If the department finds that an emergency exists requiring the immediate imposition of additional conditions in order to prevent the offender from committing a crime, the department may impose such conditions. The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to those set by the board or the court and may not contravene or decrease court-imposed or board-imposed conditions. Conditions imposed under this subsection shall take effect immediately after notice to the offender by personal service, but shall not remain in effect longer than seven working days unless approved by the board.

(11) In setting, modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

Sec. 504. RCW 9.94A.722 and 2004 c 166 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

When an offender receiving court-ordered mental health ((or)), chemical dependency, or domestic violence treatment or treatment ordered by the department of corrections presents for treatment from a mental health or chemical dependency treatment provider, the offender must disclose to the mental health ((or)), chemical dependency, or domestic violence treatment provider whether he or she is subject to supervision by the department of corrections. If an offender has received relief from disclosure pursuant to RCW 9.94A.562, 70.96A.155, or 71.05.132, the offender must provide the mental health ((or)), chemical dependency, or domestic violence treatment provider with a copy of the order granting the relief.

PART VI - DEFERRED PROSECUTIONS

Sec. 601. RCW 10.05.010 and 2008 c 282 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a court of limited jurisdiction a person charged with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor may petition the court to be considered for a deferred prosecution program. The petition shall be filed with the court at least seven days before the date set for trial but, upon a written motion and affidavit establishing good cause for the delay and failure to comply with this section, the court may waive this requirement subject to the defendant's reimbursement to the court of the witness fees and expenses due for subpoenaed witnesses who have appeared on the date set for trial.

(2) A person charged with a traffic infraction, misdemeanor, or gross misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW, or a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor domestic violence offense, shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution program unless the court makes specific findings pursuant to RCW 10.05.020 ((or section 18 of this act. Such person shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution program more than once; and cannot receive a deferred prosecution under both RCW 10.05.020 and section 18 of this act)). A person may not participate in a deferred prosecution program for a traffic infraction, misdemeanor, or gross misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW if he or she has participated in a deferred prosecution program for a prior traffic infraction, misdemeanor, or gross misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW, and a person may not participate in a deferred prosecution program for a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor domestic violence offense if he or she has participated in a deferred prosecution program for a prior domestic violence offense. Separate offenses committed more than seven days apart may not be consolidated in a single program.

(3) A person charged with a misdemeanor or a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.42 RCW shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution program unless the court makes specific findings pursuant to RCW 10.05.020. Such person shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution program more than once.

(4) A person is not eligible for a deferred prosecution program if the misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor domestic violence offense was originally charged as a felony offense in superior court.

Sec. 602. RCW 10.05.015 and 1985 c 352 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time of arraignment a person charged with a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor domestic violence offense may be given a statement by the court that explains the availability, operation, and effects of the deferred prosecution program.

Sec. 603. RCW 10.05.020 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 525 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the petitioner shall allege under oath in the petition that the wrongful conduct charged is the result of or caused by substance use disorders or mental problems or domestic violence behavior problems for which the person is in need of treatment and unless treated the probability of future recurrence is great, along with a statement that the person agrees to pay the cost of a diagnosis and treatment of the alleged problem or problems if financially able to do so. The petition shall also contain a case history and written assessment prepared by an approved substance use disorder treatment program as designated in chapter 71.24 RCW if the petition alleges a substance use disorder ((or)), by an approved mental health center if the petition alleges a mental problem, or by a state-certified domestic violence treatment provider pursuant to chapter 26.50 RCW if the petition alleges a domestic violence behavior problem.

(2) In the case of a petitioner charged with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.42 RCW, the petitioner shall allege under oath in the petition that the petitioner is the natural or adoptive parent of the alleged victim; that the wrongful conduct charged is the result of parenting problems for which the petitioner is in need of services; that the petitioner is in need of child welfare services under chapter 74.13 RCW to improve his or her parenting skills in order to better provide his or her child or children with the basic necessities of life; that the petitioner wants to correct his or her conduct to reduce the likelihood of harm to his or her minor children; that in the absence of child welfare services the petitioner may be unable to reduce the likelihood of harm to his or her minor children; and that the petitioner has cooperated with the department of social and health services to develop a plan to receive appropriate child welfare services; along with a statement that the person agrees to pay the cost of the services if he or she is financially able to do so. The petition shall also contain a case history and a written service plan from the department of social and health services.

(3) Before entry of an order deferring prosecution, a petitioner shall be advised of his or her rights as an accused and execute, as a condition of receiving treatment, a statement that contains: (a) An acknowledgment of his or her rights; (b) an acknowledgment and waiver of the right to testify, the right to a speedy trial, the right to call witnesses to testify, the right to present evidence in his or her defense, and the right to a jury trial; (c) a stipulation to the admissibility and sufficiency of the facts contained in the written police report; and (d) an acknowledgment that the statement will be entered and used to support a finding of guilty if the court finds cause to revoke the order granting deferred prosecution. The petitioner shall also be advised that he or she may, if he or she proceeds to trial and is found guilty, be allowed to seek suspension of some or all of the fines and incarceration that may be ordered upon the condition that he or she seek treatment and, further, that he or she may seek treatment from public and private agencies at any time without regard to whether or not he or she is found guilty of the offense charged. He or she shall also be advised that the court will not accept a petition for deferred prosecution from a person who: (i) Sincerely believes that he or she is innocent of the charges; (ii) sincerely believes that he or she does not, in fact, suffer from alcoholism, drug addiction, ((or)) mental problems, or domestic violence behavior problems; or (iii) in the case of a petitioner charged under chapter 9A.42 RCW, sincerely believes that he or she does not need child welfare services.

(4) Before entering an order deferring prosecution, the court shall make specific findings that: (a) The petitioner has stipulated to the admissibility and sufficiency of the facts as contained in the written police report; (b) the petitioner has acknowledged the admissibility of the stipulated facts in any criminal hearing on the underlying offense or offenses held subsequent to revocation of the order granting deferred prosecution; (c) the petitioner has acknowledged and waived the right to testify, the right to a speedy trial, the right to call witnesses to testify, the right to present evidence in his or her defense, and the right to a jury trial; and (d) the petitioner's statements were made knowingly and voluntarily. Such findings shall be included in the order granting deferred prosecution.

Sec. 604. RCW 10.05.030 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 526 are each amended to read as follows:

The arraigning judge upon consideration of the petition and with the concurrence of the prosecuting attorney may continue the arraignment and refer such person for a diagnostic investigation and evaluation to:

(1) An approved substance use disorder treatment program as designated in chapter 71.24 RCW((,)) if the petition alleges a substance use disorder((, to));

(2) An approved mental health center((,)) if the petition alleges a mental problem((, or));

(3) The department of social and health services if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2); or

(4) An approved state-certified domestic violence treatment provider pursuant to chapter 26.50 RCW if the petition alleges a domestic violence behavior problem.

Sec. 605. RCW 10.05.040 and 2018 c 201 s 9005 are each amended to read as follows:

The program to which such person is referred, or the department of social and health services if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2), shall conduct an investigation and examination to determine:

(1) Whether the person suffers from the problem described;

(2) Whether the problem is such that if not treated, or if no child welfare services are provided, there is a probability that similar misconduct will occur in the future. For petitions alleging domestic violence, the examination must include a domestic violence risk assessment validated by the Washington State University department of criminal justice;

(3) Whether extensive and long term treatment is required;

(4) Whether effective treatment or child welfare services for the person's problem are available; and

(5) Whether the person is amenable to treatment or willing to cooperate with child welfare services.

Sec. 606. RCW 10.05.120 and 2003 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Three years after receiving proof of successful completion of the two-year treatment program, and following proof to the court that the petitioner has complied with the conditions imposed by the court following successful completion of the two-year treatment program, but not before five years following entry of the order of deferred prosecution pursuant to a petition brought under RCW 10.05.020(1), the court shall dismiss the charges pending against the petitioner.

(2) When a deferred prosecution is ordered pursuant to a petition brought under RCW 10.05.020(2) and the court has received proof that the petitioner has successfully completed the child welfare service plan, or the plan has been terminated because the alleged victim has reached his or her majority and there are no other minor children in the home, the court shall dismiss the charges pending against the petitioner: PROVIDED, That in any case where the petitioner's parental rights have been terminated with regard to the alleged victim due to abuse or neglect that occurred during the pendency of the deferred prosecution, the termination shall be per se evidence that the petitioner did not successfully complete the child welfare service plan.

(3) When a deferred prosecution is ordered for a petition brought under RCW 10.05.020(1) involving a domestic violence behavior problem and the court has received proof that the petitioner has successfully completed the domestic violence treatment plan, the court shall dismiss the charges pending against the petitioner.

Sec. 607. RCW 10.05.140 and 2016 c 203 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition, the court shall order that the petitioner shall not operate a motor vehicle upon the public highways without a valid operator's license and proof of liability insurance. The amount of liability insurance shall be established by the court at not less than that established by RCW 46.29.490. As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition on any alcohol-dependency based case, the court shall also order the installation of an ignition interlock under RCW 46.20.720. The required periods of use of the interlock shall be not less than the periods provided for in RCW 46.20.720. As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition, the court may order the petitioner to make restitution and to pay costs as defined in RCW 10.01.160. To help ensure continued sobriety and reduce the likelihood of reoffense, the court may order reasonable conditions during the period of the deferred prosecution including, but not limited to, attendance at self-help recovery support groups for alcoholism or drugs, complete abstinence from alcohol and all nonprescribed mind-altering drugs, periodic urinalysis or breath analysis, and maintaining law-abiding behavior. The court may terminate the deferred prosecution program upon violation of the deferred prosecution order.

(2) As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition for a case involving a domestic violence behavior problem:

(a) The court shall order the petitioner not to possess firearms and order the petitioner to surrender firearms under RCW 9.41.800; and

(b) The court may order the petitioner to make restitution and to pay costs as defined in RCW 10.01.160. In addition, to help ensure continued sobriety and reduce the likelihood of reoffense in co-occurring domestic violence and substance abuse or mental health cases, the court may order reasonable conditions during the period of the deferred prosecution including, but not limited to, attendance at self-help recovery support groups for alcoholism or drugs, complete abstinence from alcohol and all nonprescribed mind-altering drugs, periodic urinalysis or breath analysis, and maintaining law-abiding behavior. The court may terminate the deferred prosecution program upon violation of the deferred prosecution order.

Sec. 608. RCW 10.05.160 and 2010 c 269 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The prosecutor may appeal an order granting deferred prosecution on any or all of the following grounds:

(1) Prior deferred prosecution has been granted to the defendant;

(2) For a present petition alleging a domestic violence behavior problem, a prior stipulated order of continuance has been granted to the defendant;

(3) Failure of the court to obtain proof of insurance or a treatment plan conforming to the requirements of this chapter;

(((3)))(4) Failure of the court to comply with the requirements of RCW 10.05.100;

(((4)))(5) Failure of the evaluation facility to provide the information required in RCW 10.05.040 and 10.05.050, if the defendant has been referred to the facility for treatment. If an appeal on such basis is successful, the trial court may consider the use of another treatment program;

(((5)))(6) Failure of the court to order the installation of an ignition interlock or other device under RCW 10.05.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609. A new section is added to chapter 10.05 RCW to read as follows:

A deferred prosecution program for domestic violence behavior, or domestic violence co-occurring with substance abuse or mental health, must include, but is not limited to, the following requirements:

(1) Completion of a domestic violence risk assessment;

(2) Participation in the level of treatment recommended by the program as outlined in the current treatment plan;

(3) Compliance with the contract for treatment;

(4) Participation in any ancillary or co-occurring treatments that are determined to be necessary for the successful completion of the domestic violence intervention treatment including, but not limited to, mental health or substance use treatment;

(5) Domestic violence intervention treatment within the purview of this section to be completed with a state-certified domestic violence intervention treatment program;

(6) Signature of the petitioner agreeing to the terms and conditions of the treatment program;

(7) Proof of compliance with any active order to surrender weapons issued in this program or related civil protection orders or no-contact orders.

PART VII - EVALUATION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE TREATMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. A new section is added to chapter 26.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall evaluate the effectiveness of the multitiered domestic violence treatment model under chapter 110-60A WAC as to whether this model reduces or otherwise impacts the recidivism of domestic violence offenders. The evaluation must include a comparison of the effectiveness of the multitiered treatment model under chapter 110-60A WAC to the former single model. To the extent feasible, the evaluation must also include: (a) An assessment of the effectiveness of various treatment approaches utilized within the state under chapter 110-60A WAC based on available data obtained through the courts and treatment providers; and (b) a comprehensive review of the research evidence on the effectiveness of treatment models.

(2) The institute shall publish its initial findings and submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor no later than December 1, 2022, and the institute shall publish and submit a final report no later than December 1, 2024.

(3) This section expires June 30, 2025.

PART VIII - DOMESTIC VIOLENCE WORK GROUPS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. In 2017 the legislature established two work groups managed by the Washington state supreme court gender and justice commission to study domestic violence treatment and domestic violence risk. The work groups successfully pulled together stakeholders from across the state and published two reports with groundbreaking recommendations. The legislature finds that there is a need to continue the work groups. The work groups shall review best practices for alternatives to mandatory arrest in cases of domestic violence, and the work groups shall monitor implementation of prior recommendations for the purpose of promoting effective strategies to reduce domestic violence homicides, serious injuries, and recidivism.

Sec. 802. 2017 c 272 s 7 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative office of the courts shall, through the Washington state gender and justice commission of the supreme court, convene a work group to address the issue of domestic violence perpetrator treatment and the role of certified perpetrator treatment programs in holding domestic violence perpetrators accountable.

(2) The work group must include a representative for each of the following organizations or interests: Superior court judges, district court judges, municipal court judges, court probation officers, prosecuting attorneys, defense attorneys, civil legal aid attorneys, domestic violence victim advocates, domestic violence perpetrator treatment providers, the department of social and health services, the department of corrections, the Washington state institute for public policy, and the University of Washington evidence based practice institute. At least two domestic violence perpetrator treatment providers must be represented as members of the work group.

(3)(a) For its initial report in 2018, the work group shall: (((a)))(i) Review laws, regulations, and court and agency practices pertaining to domestic violence perpetrator treatment used in civil and criminal contexts, including criminal domestic violence felony and misdemeanor offenses, family law, child welfare, and protection orders; (((b)))(ii) consider the development of a universal diagnostic evaluation tool to be used by treatment providers and the department of corrections to assess the treatment needs of domestic violence perpetrators; and (((c)))(iii) develop recommendations on changes to existing laws, regulations, and court and agency practices to improve victim safety, decrease recidivism, advance treatment outcomes, and increase the courts' confidence in domestic violence perpetrator treatment.

(((4)))(b) The work group shall report its recommendations to the affected entities and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than June 30, 2018.

(4)(a) For its report in 2019, the work group shall:

(i) Provide guidance and additional recommendations with respect to how prior recommendations of the work group should be implemented for the purpose of promoting effective strategies to reduce domestic violence in Washington state;

(ii) Monitor, evaluate, and provide recommendations for the implementation of the newly established domestic violence treatment administrative codes;

(iii) Monitor, evaluate, and provide recommendations on the implementation and supervision of domestic violence sentencing alternatives in different counties to promote consistency; and

(iv) Provide recommendations on other items deemed appropriate by the work group.

(b) The work group shall report its recommendations to the affected entities and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 30, 2019.

(5) The work group must operate within existing funds.

(6) This section expires June 30, ((2019))2020.

Sec. 803. 2017 c 272 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The legislature finds that Washington state has a serious problem with domestic violence offender recidivism and lethality. The Washington state institute for public policy studied domestic violence offenders finding not just high rates of domestic violence recidivism but among the highest rates of general criminal and violent recidivism. The Washington state coalition against domestic violence has issued fatality reviews of domestic violence homicides in Washington under chapter 43.235 RCW for over fifteen years. These fatality reviews demonstrate the significant impact of domestic violence on our communities as well as the barriers and high rates of lethality faced by victims. The legislature further notes there have been several high profile domestic violence homicides with multiple prior domestic violence incidents not accounted for in the legal response. Many jurisdictions nationally have encountered the same challenges as Washington and now utilize risk assessment as a best practice to assist in the response to domestic violence.))

The Washington domestic violence risk assessment work group is established to study how and when risk assessment can best be used to improve the response to domestic violence offenders and victims and find effective strategies to reduce domestic violence homicides, serious injuries, and recidivism that are a result of domestic violence incidents in Washington state.

(2)(a) The Washington state gender and justice commission, in collaboration with the Washington state coalition against domestic violence and the Washington State University criminal justice program, shall coordinate the work group and provide staff support.

(b) The work group must include a representative from each of the following organizations:

(i) The Washington state gender and justice commission;

(ii) The department of corrections;

(iii) The department of social and health services;

(iv) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(v) The superior court judges' association;

(vi) The district and municipal court judges' association;

(vii) The Washington state association of counties;

(viii) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(ix) The Washington defender association;

(x) The Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;

(xi) The Washington state association of cities;

(xii) The Washington state coalition against domestic violence;

(xiii) The Washington state office of civil legal aid; and

(xiv) The family law section of the Washington state bar association.

(c) The work group must additionally include representation from:

(i) Treatment providers;

(ii) City law enforcement;

(iii) County law enforcement;

(iv) Court administrators; and

(v) Domestic violence victims or family members of a victim.

(3) ((At a minimum,))(a) For its initial report in 2018, the work group shall research, review, and make recommendations on the following:

(((a)))(i) How to best develop and use risk assessment in domestic violence response utilizing available research and Washington state data;

(((b)))(ii) Providing effective strategies for incorporating risk assessment in domestic violence response to reduce deaths, serious injuries, and recidivism due to domestic violence;

(((c)))(iii) Promoting access to domestic violence risk assessment for advocates, police, prosecutors, corrections, and courts to improve domestic violence response;

(((d)))(iv) Whether or how risk assessment could be used as an alternative to mandatory arrest in domestic violence;

(((e)))(v) Whether or how risk assessment could be used in bail determinations in domestic violence cases, and in civil protection order hearings;

(((f)))(vi) Whether or how offender risk, needs, and responsivity could be used in determining eligibility for diversion, sentencing alternatives, and treatment options;

(((g)))(vii) Whether or how victim risk, needs, and responsivity could be used in improving domestic violence response;

(((h)))(viii) Whether or how risk assessment can improve prosecution and encourage prosecutors to aggressively enforce domestic violence laws; and

(((i)))(ix) Encouraging private sector collaboration.

(((4)))(b) The work group shall compile its findings and recommendations into ((a final))an initial report and provide its report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by June 30, 2018.

(4)(a) For its report in 2019, the work group shall:

(i) Research, review, and make recommendations on whether criminal and civil definitions of domestic violence should be amended to separate "intimate partner violence" and "family violence," and whether the civil definition of domestic violence appropriately accounts for issues of coercive control;

(ii) Research, review, and make recommendations on how prior recommendations of the work group should be implemented in order to promote effective strategies to reduce domestic violence in Washington state;

(iii) Monitor, evaluate, and provide recommendations on the development and use of the assessment tool under section 301 of this act; and

(iv) Provide recommendations on other items deemed appropriate by the work group.

(b) The work group shall compile its findings and recommendations into a final report and provide its report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by November 30, 2019.

(5) The work group must operate within existing funds.

(6) This section expires June 30, ((2019))2020.

PART IX - UNIFORM RECOGNITION AND ENFORCEMENT OF CANADIAN DOMESTIC

VIOLENCE PROTECTION ORDERS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. SHORT TITLE.This chapter may be cited as the uniform recognition and enforcement of Canadian domestic violence protection orders act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902. DEFINITIONS.The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Canadian domestic violence protection order" means a judgment or part of a judgment or order issued in a civil proceeding by a court of Canada under law of the issuing jurisdiction which relates to domestic violence and prohibits a respondent from:

(a) Being in physical proximity to a protected individual or following a protected individual;

(b) Directly or indirectly contacting or communicating with a protected individual or other individual described in the order;

(c) Being within a certain distance of a specified place or location associated with a protected individual; or

(d) Molesting, annoying, harassing, or engaging in threatening conduct directed at a protected individual.

(2) "Domestic protection order" means an injunction or other order issued by a tribunal which relates to domestic or family violence laws to prevent an individual from engaging in violent or threatening acts against, harassment of, direct or indirect contact or communication with, or being in physical proximity to another individual.

(3) "Issuing court" means the court that issues a Canadian domestic violence protection order.

(4) "Law enforcement officer" means an individual authorized by law of this state other than this chapter to enforce a domestic protection order.

(5) "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

(6) "Protected individual" means an individual protected by a Canadian domestic violence protection order.

(7) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(8) "Respondent" means an individual against whom a Canadian domestic violence protection order is issued.

(9) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(10) "Tribunal" means a court, agency, or other entity authorized by law of this state other than this chapter to establish, enforce, or modify a domestic protection order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903. ENFORCEMENT OF CANADIAN DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROTECTION ORDER BY LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER.(1) If a law enforcement officer determines under subsection (2) or (3) of this section that there is probable cause to believe a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order exists and the order has been violated, the officer shall enforce the terms of the Canadian domestic violence protection order as if the terms were in an order of a tribunal. Presentation to a law enforcement officer of a certified copy of a Canadian domestic violence protection order is not required for enforcement.

(2) Presentation to a law enforcement officer of a record of a Canadian domestic violence protection order that identifies both a protected individual and a respondent and on its face is in effect constitutes probable cause to believe that a valid order exists.

(3) If a record of a Canadian domestic violence protection order is not presented as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a law enforcement officer may consider other information in determining whether there is probable cause to believe that a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order exists.

(4) If a law enforcement officer determines that an otherwise valid Canadian domestic violence protection order cannot be enforced because the respondent has not been notified of or served with the order, the officer shall notify the protected individual that the officer will make reasonable efforts to contact the respondent, consistent with the safety of the protected individual. After notice to the protected individual and consistent with the safety of the individual, the officer shall make a reasonable effort to inform the respondent of the order, notify the respondent of the terms of the order, provide a record of the order, if available, to the respondent, and allow the respondent a reasonable opportunity to comply with the order before the officer enforces the order.

(5) If a law enforcement officer determines that an individual is a protected individual, the officer shall inform the individual of available local victim services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904. ENFORCEMENT OF CANADIAN DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROTECTION ORDER BY TRIBUNAL.(1) A tribunal may issue an order enforcing or refusing to enforce a Canadian domestic violence protection order on application of:

(a) A person authorized by law of this state other than this chapter to seek enforcement of a domestic protection order; or

(b) A respondent.

(2) In a proceeding under subsection (1) of this section, the tribunal shall follow the procedures of this state for enforcement of a domestic protection order. An order entered under this section is limited to the enforcement of the terms of the Canadian domestic violence protection order as defined in section 902 of this act.

(3) A Canadian domestic violence protection order is enforceable under this section if:

(a) The order identifies a protected individual and a respondent;

(b) The order is valid and in effect;

(c) The issuing court had jurisdiction over the parties and the subject matter under law applicable in the issuing court; and

(d) The order was issued after:

(i) The respondent was given reasonable notice and had an opportunity to be heard before the court issued the order; or

(ii) In the case of an ex parte order, the respondent was given reasonable notice and had or will have an opportunity to be heard within a reasonable time after the order was issued, in a manner consistent with the right of the respondent to due process.

(4) A Canadian domestic violence protection order valid on its face is prima facie evidence of its enforceability under this section.

(5) A claim that a Canadian domestic violence protection order does not comply with subsection (3) of this section is an affirmative defense in a proceeding seeking enforcement of the order. If the tribunal determines that the order is not enforceable, the tribunal shall issue an order that the Canadian domestic violence protection order is not enforceable under this section and section 903 of this act and may not be registered under section 905 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905. REGISTRATION OF CANADIAN DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROTECTION ORDER.(1) A person entitled to protection who has a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order may file that order by presenting a certified, authenticated, or exemplified copy of the Canadian domestic violence protection order to a clerk of the court of a Washington court in which the person entitled to protection resides or to a clerk of the court of a Washington court where the person entitled to protection believes enforcement may be necessary. Any out-of-state department, agency, or court responsible for maintaining protection order records, may by facsimile or electronic transmission send a reproduction of the foreign protection order to the clerk of the court of Washington as long as it contains a facsimile or digital signature by any person authorized to make such transmission.

(2) On receipt of a certified copy of a Canadian domestic violence protection order, the clerk of the court shall register the order in accordance with this section.

(3) An individual registering a Canadian domestic violence protection order under this section shall file an affidavit stating that, to the best of the individual's knowledge, the order is valid and in effect.

(4) After a Canadian domestic violence protection order is registered under this section, the clerk of the court shall provide the individual registering the order a certified copy of the registered order.

(5) A Canadian domestic violence protection order registered under this section may be entered in a state or federal registry of protection orders in accordance with law.

(6) An inaccurate, expired, or unenforceable Canadian domestic violence protection order may be corrected or removed from the registry of protection orders maintained in this state in accordance with law of this state other than this chapter.

(7) A fee may not be charged for the registration of a Canadian domestic violence protection order under this section.

(8) Registration in this state or filing under law of this state other than this chapter of a Canadian domestic violence protection order is not required for its enforcement under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906. IMMUNITY.The state, state agency, local governmental agency, law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, clerk of court, and state or local governmental official acting in an official capacity are immune from civil and criminal liability for an act or omission arising out of the registration or enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence protection order or the detention or arrest of an alleged violator of a Canadian domestic violence protection order if the act or omission was a good faith effort to comply with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907. OTHER REMEDIES.An individual who seeks a remedy under this chapter may seek other legal or equitable remedies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908. UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION.In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909. RELATION TO ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES IN GLOBAL AND NATIONAL COMMERCE ACT.This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910. TRANSITION.This chapter applies to a Canadian domestic violence protection order issued before, on, or after the effective date of this section and to a continuing action for enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence protection order commenced before, on, or after the effective date of this section. A request for enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence protection order made on or after the effective date of this section for a violation of the order occurring before, on, or after the effective date of this section is governed by this chapter.

Sec. 911. RCW 10.31.100 and 2017 c 336 s 3 and 2017 c 223 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor only when the offense is committed in the presence of an officer, except as provided in subsections (1) through (11) of this section.

(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070 or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:

(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.92, 7.90, 9A.46, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, ((26.26))26.26A, 26.26B, 26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon the person; or

(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, or a Canadian domestic violence protection order, as defined in section 902 of this act, has been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign protection order or the Canadian domestic violence protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of any provision for which the foreign protection order or the Canadian domestic violence protection order specifically indicates that a violation will be a crime; or

(c) The person is eighteen years or older and within the preceding four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination, the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (A) The intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010; (B) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats creating fear of physical injury; and (C) the history of domestic violence of each person involved, including whether the conduct was part of an ongoing pattern of abuse.

(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:

(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;

(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or racing of vehicles;

(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(e) RCW 46.61.503 or 46.25.110, relating to persons having alcohol or THC in their system;

(f) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while operator's license is suspended or revoked;

(g) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a negligent manner.

(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any traffic law or regulation.

(5)(a) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor vessel accident may arrest the operator of a motor vessel involved in the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the operator has committed, in connection with the accident, a criminal violation of chapter 79A.60 RCW.

(b) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor vessel accident may issue a citation for an infraction to the operator of a motor vessel involved in the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the operator has committed, in connection with the accident, a violation of any boating safety law of chapter 79A.60 RCW.

(6) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040 shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(7) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop, detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.

(8) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.

(9) A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.

(10) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation, committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.

(11) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.

For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).

(12) A law enforcement officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed a violation under RCW 77.15.160(((4)))(5) may issue a citation for an infraction to the person in connection with the violation.

(13) A law enforcement officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed a criminal violation under RCW 77.15.809 or 77.15.811 may arrest the person in connection with the violation.

(14) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4), and (7) of this section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.

(15) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest pursuant to subsection (2) or (9) of this section if the police officer acts in good faith and without malice.

(16)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a police officer shall arrest and keep in custody, until release by a judicial officer on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that the person has violated RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance and the police officer: (i) Has knowledge that the person has a prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055 within ten years; or (ii) has knowledge, based on a review of the information available to the officer at the time of arrest, that the person is charged with or is awaiting arraignment for an offense that would qualify as a prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055 if it were a conviction.

(b) A police officer is not required to keep in custody a person under (a) of this subsection if the person requires immediate medical attention and is admitted to a hospital.

Sec. 912. RCW 26.50.035 and 2005 c 282 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop and prepare instructions and informational brochures required under RCW 26.50.030(4), standard petition and order for protection forms, and a court staff handbook on domestic violence and the protection order process. The standard petition and order for protection forms must be used after September 1, 1994, for all petitions filed and orders issued under this chapter. The instructions, brochures, forms, and handbook shall be prepared in consultation with interested persons, including a representative of the state domestic violence coalition, judges, and law enforcement personnel.

(a) The instructions shall be designed to assist petitioners in completing the petition, and shall include a sample of standard petition and order for protection forms.

(b) The informational brochure shall describe the use of and the process for obtaining, modifying, and terminating a domestic violence protection order as provided under this chapter, an antiharassment no-contact order as provided under chapter 9A.46 RCW, a domestic violence no-contact order as provided under chapter 10.99 RCW, a restraining order as provided under chapters 26.09, 26.10, ((26.26))26.26A, 26.26B, and 26.44 RCW, an antiharassment protection order as provided by chapter 10.14 RCW, ((and)) a foreign protection order as defined in chapter 26.52 RCW, and a Canadian domestic violence protection order as defined in section 902 of this act.

(c) The order for protection form shall include, in a conspicuous location, notice of criminal penalties resulting from violation of the order, and the following statement: "You can be arrested even if the person or persons who obtained the order invite or allow you to violate the order's prohibitions. The respondent has the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's provisions. Only the court can change the order upon written application."

(d) The court staff handbook shall allow for the addition of a community resource list by the court clerk.

(2) All court clerks shall obtain a community resource list from a domestic violence program, defined in RCW 70.123.020, serving the county in which the court is located. The community resource list shall include the names and telephone numbers of domestic violence programs serving the community in which the court is located, including law enforcement agencies, domestic violence agencies, sexual assault agencies, legal assistance programs, interpreters, multicultural programs, and batterers' treatment programs. The court shall make the community resource list available as part of or in addition to the informational brochures described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The administrative office of the courts shall distribute a master copy of the petition and order forms, instructions, and informational brochures to all court clerks and shall distribute a master copy of the petition and order forms to all superior, district, and municipal courts.

(4) For purposes of this section, "court clerks" means court administrators in courts of limited jurisdiction and elected court clerks.

(5) The administrative office of the courts shall determine the significant non-English-speaking or limited English-speaking populations in the state. The administrator shall then arrange for translation of the instructions and informational brochures required by this section, which shall contain a sample of the standard petition and order for protection forms, into the languages spoken by those significant non-English-speaking populations and shall distribute a master copy of the translated instructions and informational brochures to all court clerks by January 1, 1997.

(6) The administrative office of the courts shall update the instructions, brochures, standard petition and order for protection forms, and court staff handbook when changes in the law make an update necessary.

Sec. 913. RCW 26.50.110 and 2017 c 230 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Whenever an order is granted under this chapter, chapter 7.92, 7.90, 9A.40, 9A.46, 9A.88, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, ((26.26))26.26A, 26.26B, or 74.34 RCW, any temporary order for protection is granted under chapter 7.40 RCW pursuant to chapter 74.34 RCW, ((or)) there is a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, or there is a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order as defined in section 902 of this act, and the respondent or person to be restrained knows of the order, a violation of any of the following provisions of the order is a gross misdemeanor, except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section:

(i) The restraint provisions prohibiting acts or threats of violence against, or stalking of, a protected party, or restraint provisions prohibiting contact with a protected party;

(ii) A provision excluding the person from a residence, workplace, school, or day care;

(iii) A provision prohibiting a person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location;

(iv) A provision prohibiting interfering with the protected party's efforts to remove a pet owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by the petitioner, respondent, or a minor child residing with either the petitioner or the respondent; or

(v) A provision of a foreign protection order or a Canadian domestic violence protection order specifically indicating that a violation will be a crime.

(b) Upon conviction, and in addition to any other penalties provided by law, the court:

(i) May require that the respondent submit to electronic monitoring. The court shall specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed. The order also may include a requirement that the respondent pay the costs of the monitoring. The court shall consider the ability of the convicted person to pay for electronic monitoring.

(ii) Shall impose a fine of fifteen dollars, in addition to any penalty or fine imposed, for a violation of a domestic violence protection order issued under this chapter. Revenue from the fifteen dollar fine must be remitted monthly to the state treasury for deposit in the domestic violence prevention account.

(2) A peace officer shall arrest without a warrant and take into custody a person whom the peace officer has probable cause to believe has violated an order issued under this chapter, chapter 7.92, 7.90, 9A.40, 9A.46, 9A.88, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, ((26.26))26.26A, 26.26B, or 74.34 RCW, any temporary order for protection granted under chapter 7.40 RCW pursuant to chapter 74.34 RCW, ((or)) a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, or a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order as defined in section 902 of this act, that restrains the person or excludes the person from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibits the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location, if the person restrained knows of the order. Presence of the order in the law enforcement computer-based criminal intelligence information system is not the only means of establishing knowledge of the order.

(3) A violation of an order issued under this chapter, chapter 7.92, 7.90, 9A.40, 9A.46, 9A.88, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, ((26.26))

(4) Any assault that is a violation of an order issued under this chapter, chapter 7.92, 7.90, 9A.40, 9A.46, 9A.88, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, ((26.26))26.26A, 26.26B, or 74.34 RCW, ((or of)) a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, or a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order as defined in section 902 of this act, and that does not amount to assault in the first or second degree under RCW 9A.36.011 or 9A.36.021 is a class C felony, and any conduct in violation of such an order that is reckless and creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to another person is a class C felony.

(5) A violation of a court order issued under this chapter, chapter 7.92, 7.90, 9A.40, 9A.46, 9A.88, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, ((26.26))26.26A, 26.26B, or 74.34 RCW, ((or of)) a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, or a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order as defined in section 902 of this act, is a class C felony if the offender has at least two previous convictions for violating the provisions of an order issued under this chapter, chapter 7.90, 9A.40, 9A.46, 9A.88, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, ((26.26))26.26A, 26.26B, or 74.34 RCW, ((or)) a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020 or a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order as defined in section 902 of this act. The previous convictions may involve the same victim or other victims specifically protected by the orders the offender violated.

(6) Upon the filing of an affidavit by the petitioner or any peace officer alleging that the respondent has violated an order granted under this chapter, chapter 7.92, 7.90, 9A.40, 9A.46, 9A.88, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, ((26.26))26.26A, 26.26B, or 74.34 RCW, ((or)) a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, or a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order as defined in section 902 of this act, the court may issue an order to the respondent, requiring the respondent to appear and show cause within fourteen days why the respondent should not be found in contempt of court and punished accordingly. The hearing may be held in the court of any county or municipality in which the petitioner or respondent temporarily or permanently resides at the time of the alleged violation.

Sec. 914. RCW 26.50.160 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 335 are each amended to read as follows:

To prevent the issuance of competing protection orders in different courts and to give courts needed information for issuance of orders, the judicial information system shall be available in each district, municipal, and superior court by July 1, 1997, and shall include a database containing the following information:

(1) The names of the parties and the cause number for every order of protection issued under this title, every sexual assault protection order issued under chapter 7.90 RCW, every criminal no-contact order issued under chapters 9A.46 and 10.99 RCW, every antiharassment order issued under chapter 10.14 RCW, every dissolution action under chapter 26.09 RCW, every third-party custody action under chapter 26.10 RCW, every parentage action under chapter ((26.26))26.26A or 26.26B RCW, every restraining order issued on behalf of an abused child or adult dependent person under chapter 26.44 RCW, every foreign protection order filed under chapter 26.52 RCW, every Canadian domestic violence protection order filed under chapter 26.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 1001 of this act), and every order for protection of a vulnerable adult under chapter 74.34 RCW. When a guardian or the department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families has petitioned for relief on behalf of an abused child, adult dependent person, or vulnerable adult, the name of the person on whose behalf relief was sought shall be included in the database as a party rather than the guardian or appropriate department;

(2) A criminal history of the parties; and

(3) Other relevant information necessary to assist courts in issuing orders under this chapter as determined by the judicial information system committee.

Sec. 915. RCW 36.28A.410 and 2017 c 261 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create and operate a statewide automated protected person notification system to automatically notify a registered person via the registered person's choice of telephone or email when a respondent subject to a court order specified in (b) of this subsection has attempted to purchase or acquire a firearm and been denied based on a background check or completed and submitted firearm purchase or transfer application that indicates the respondent is ineligible to possess a firearm under state or federal law. The system must permit a person to register for notification, or a registered person to update the person's registration information, for the statewide automated protected person notification system by calling a toll-free telephone number or by accessing a public web site.

(b) The notification requirements of this section apply to any court order issued under chapter 7.92 RCW and RCW 7.90.090, 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, ((26.26.130, 26.26.590))26.26B.020, 26.50.060, or 26.50.070, ((and)) any foreign protection order filed with a Washington court pursuant to chapter 26.52 RCW, and any Canadian domestic violence protection order filed with a Washington court pursuant to chapter 26.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 1001 of this act), where the order prohibits the respondent from possessing firearms or where by operation of law the respondent is ineligible to possess firearms during the term of the order. The notification requirements of this section apply even if the respondent has notified the Washington state patrol that he or she has appealed a background check denial under RCW 43.43.823.

(2) An appointed or elected official, public employee, or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or combination of units of government and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil liability for damages for any release of information or the failure to release information related to the statewide automated protected person notification system in this section, so long as the release or failure to release was without gross negligence. The immunity provided under this subsection applies to the release of relevant and necessary information to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the general public.

(3) Information and records prepared, owned, used, or retained by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs pursuant to chapter 261, Laws of 2017, including information a person submits to register and participate in the statewide automated protected person notification system, are exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

PART X - MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. Sections 901 through 910 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 26 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. Sections 901 through 915, 1001, and 1002 of this act take effect January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. Sections 401 through 404, 501 through 504, and 601 through 609 of this act take effect July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. Sections 801 through 803 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect June 30, 2019.

--- END ---