BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.250.010 and 2016 c 41 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Athlete" means a person who participates in exercise, recreation, sport, or games requiring physical strength, range-of-motion, flexibility, body awareness and control, speed, stamina, or agility, and the exercise, recreation, sports, or games are of a type conducted in association with an educational institution or professional, amateur, or recreational sports club or organization.

(2) "Athletic injury" means an injury or condition sustained by an athlete that affects the person's participation or performance in exercise, recreation, sport, or games and the injury or condition is within the professional preparation and education of an athletic trainer.

(3) "Athletic trainer" means a person who is licensed as a health care professional under this chapter. An athletic trainer can practice athletic training through the consultation, referral, or guidelines of a licensed health care provider as defined under subsection (7) of this section working within their scope of practice.

(4)(a) "Athletic training" means the application of the following principles and methods as provided by a licensed athletic trainer:

(i) Risk management and prevention of athletic injuries through preactivity screening and evaluation, educational programs, physical conditioning and reconditioning programs, application of commercial products, use of protective equipment, promotion of healthy behaviors, and reduction of environmental risks;

(ii) Recognition, evaluation, and assessment of athletic injuries by obtaining a history of the athletic injury, inspection and palpation of the injured part and associated structures, and performance of specific testing techniques related to stability and function to determine the extent of an injury;

(iii) Immediate care of athletic injuries, including emergency medical situations through the application of first-aid and emergency procedures and techniques for nonlife-threatening or life-threatening athletic injuries;

(iv) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of athletic injuries through the application of physical agents and modalities, therapeutic activities and exercise, standard reassessment techniques and procedures, commercial products, and educational programs, in accordance with guidelines established with a licensed health care provider as provided in RCW 18.250.070;

(v) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of work-related injuries through the application of physical agents and modalities, therapeutic activities and exercise, standard reassessment techniques and procedures, commercial products, and educational programs, under the direct supervision of and in accordance with a plan of care for an individual worker established by a provider authorized to provide physical medicine and rehabilitation services for injured workers; and

(vi) Referral of an athlete to an appropriately licensed health care provider if the athletic injury requires further definitive care or the injury or condition is outside an athletic trainer's scope of practice, in accordance with RCW 18.250.070.

(b) "Athletic training" does not include:

(i) The use of spinal adjustment or manipulative mobilization of the spine and its immediate articulations;

(ii) Orthotic or prosthetic services with the exception of evaluation, measurement, fitting, and adjustment of temporary, prefabricated or direct-formed orthosis as defined in chapter 18.200 RCW;

(iii) The practice of occupational therapy as defined in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(iv) The practice of East Asian medicine as defined in chapter 18.06 RCW;

(v) Any medical diagnosis; and

(vi) Prescribing legend drugs or controlled substances, or surgery.

(5) "Committee" means the athletic training advisory committee.

(6) "Department" means the department of health.

(7) "Licensed health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, osteopathic physician, osteopathic physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, naturopath, physical therapist, chiropractor, dentist, massage therapist, acupuncturist, occupational therapist, or podiatric physician and surgeon.

(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.250.040 and 2007 c 253 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to practice as an athletic trainer, or to represent themselves or other persons to be legally able to provide services as an athletic trainer, unless the person is licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) No person may use the title "athletic trainer," the letters "ATC" or "LAT," the terms "sports trainer," "team trainer," or any other words, abbreviations, or insignia in connection with his or her name to indicate or imply, directly or indirectly, that he or she is an athletic trainer without being licensed in accordance with this chapter as an athletic trainer.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.250.050 and 2007 c 253 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter may prohibit, restrict, or require licensure of:

(1) Any person licensed, certified, or registered in this state and performing services within the authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the United States as an athletic trainer while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States;

(3) Any person pursuing a supervised course of study in an accredited athletic training educational program, if the person is designated by a title that clearly indicates a student or trainee status;

(4) An athletic trainer from another state for purposes of continuing education, consulting, or performing athletic training services while accompanying his or her group, individual, or representatives into Washington state on a temporary basis for no more than ninety days in a calendar year;

(5) Any elementary, secondary, or postsecondary school teacher, educator, or coach((, or authorized volunteer)) who does not represent themselves to the public as an athletic trainer; or

(6) A personal or fitness trainer employed by an athletic club or fitness center and not representing themselves as an athletic trainer or performing the duties of an athletic trainer provided under RCW 18.250.010(4)(a) (ii) through (vi).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.250 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An athletic trainer licensed under this chapter may purchase, store, and administer over-the-counter medications such as pain relievers, hydrocortisone, fluocinonide, topical anesthetics, silver sulfadiazine, lidocaine, magnesium sulfate, zinc oxide, and other similar medications, as prescribed by an authorized health care practitioner for the practice of athletic training.

(a) An athletic trainer may not administer any medications to a student in a public school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 or private schools governed by chapter 28A.195 RCW.

(b) An athletic trainer may administer medications consistent with this section to a minor in a setting other than a school, if the minor's parent or guardian provides written consent.

(2) An athletic trainer licensed under this chapter who has completed an anaphylaxis training program in accordance with RCW 70.54.440 may administer an epinephrine autoinjector to any individual who the athletic trainer believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis as authorized by RCW 70.54.440.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.70.442 and 2016 c 90 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each of the following professionals certified or licensed under Title 18 RCW shall, at least once every six years, complete training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved, in rule, by the relevant disciplining authority:

(i) An adviser or counselor certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(ii) A chemical dependency professional licensed under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(iii) A marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(iv) A mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(v) An occupational therapy practitioner licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW;

(vi) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW;

(vii) An advanced social worker or independent clinical social worker licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW; and

(viii) A social worker associate—advanced or social worker associate—independent clinical licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.

(b) The requirements in (a) of this subsection apply to a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions in (a) of this subsection.

(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.

(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (1)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section must complete the first training required by this section by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2014, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure or certification, whichever occurs later.

(b) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section applying for initial licensure may delay completion of the first training required by this section for six years after initial licensure if he or she can demonstrate successful completion of the training required in subsection (1) of this section no more than six years prior to the application for initial licensure.

(3) The hours spent completing training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management under this section count toward meeting any applicable continuing education or continuing competency requirements for each profession.

(4)(a) A disciplining authority may, by rule, specify minimum training and experience that is sufficient to exempt an individual professional from the training requirements in subsections (1) and (5) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (4)(a) allows a disciplining authority to provide blanket exemptions to broad categories or specialties within a profession.

(b) A disciplining authority may exempt a professional from the training requirements of subsections (1) and (5) of this section if the professional has only brief or limited patient contact.

(5)(a) Each of the following professionals credentialed under Title 18 RCW shall complete a one-time training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved by the relevant disciplining authority:

(i) A chiropractor licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW;

(ii) A naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) A licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, or advanced registered nurse practitioner, other than a certified registered nurse anesthetist, licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;

(iv) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, other than a holder of a postgraduate osteopathic medicine and surgery license issued under RCW 18.57.035;

(v) An osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW;

(vi) A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed under chapter 18.74 RCW;

(vii) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, other than a resident holding a limited license issued under RCW 18.71.095(3);

(viii) A physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW;

(ix) A pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW; ((and))

(x) An athletic trainer licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW; and

(xi) A person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (((ix)))(x) of this subsection.

(b)(i) A professional listed in (a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection or a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2016, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between June 12, 2014, and January 1, 2016, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).

(ii) A licensed pharmacist or a person holding a retired active pharmacist license must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2017, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later.

(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.

(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (5)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.

(6)(a) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall work collaboratively to develop a model list of training programs in suicide assessment, treatment, and management.

(b) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall update the list at least once every two years.

(c) By June 30, 2016, the department shall adopt rules establishing minimum standards for the training programs included on the model list. The minimum standards must require that six-hour trainings include content specific to veterans and the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means or self-injurious behaviors and that three-hour trainings for pharmacists include content related to the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means. When adopting the rules required under this subsection (6)(c), the department shall:

(i) Consult with the affected disciplining authorities, public and private institutions of higher education, educators, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, the Washington department of veterans affairs, and affected professional associations; and

(ii) Consider standards related to the best practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention and the suicide prevention resource center.

(d) Beginning January 1, 2017:

(i) The model list must include only trainings that meet the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection and any three-hour trainings that met the requirements of this section on or before July 24, 2015;

(ii) The model list must include six-hour trainings in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, and three-hour trainings that include only screening and referral elements; and

(iii) A person or entity providing the training required in this section may petition the department for inclusion on the model list. The department shall add the training to the list only if the department determines that the training meets the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection.

(7) The department shall provide the health profession training standards created in this section to the professional educator standards board as a model in meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.410.226 and provide technical assistance, as requested, in the review and evaluation of educator training programs. The educator training programs approved by the professional educator standards board may be included in the department's model list.

(8) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(9) The secretary and the disciplining authorities affected by this section shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

(10) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.130.020.

(b) "Training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management" means empirically supported training approved by the appropriate disciplining authority that contains the following elements: Suicide assessment, including screening and referral, suicide treatment, and suicide management. However, the disciplining authority may approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for the profession in question based on the profession's scope of practice. The board of occupational therapy may also approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for occupational therapy practitioners based on practice setting.

(11) A state or local government employee is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.

(12) An employee of a community mental health agency licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW or a chemical dependency program certified under chapter ((70.96A))71.24 RCW is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.70.442 and 2017 c 262 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each of the following professionals certified or licensed under Title 18 RCW shall, at least once every six years, complete training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved, in rule, by the relevant disciplining authority:

(i) An adviser or counselor certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(ii) A chemical dependency professional licensed under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(iii) A marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(iv) A mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(v) An occupational therapy practitioner licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW;

(vi) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW;

(vii) An advanced social worker or independent clinical social worker licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW; and

(viii) A social worker associate—advanced or social worker associate—independent clinical licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.

(b) The requirements in (a) of this subsection apply to a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions in (a) of this subsection.

(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.

(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (1)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section must complete the first training required by this section by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2014, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure or certification, whichever occurs later.

(b) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section applying for initial licensure may delay completion of the first training required by this section for six years after initial licensure if he or she can demonstrate successful completion of the training required in subsection (1) of this section no more than six years prior to the application for initial licensure.

(3) The hours spent completing training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management under this section count toward meeting any applicable continuing education or continuing competency requirements for each profession.

(4)(a) A disciplining authority may, by rule, specify minimum training and experience that is sufficient to exempt an individual professional from the training requirements in subsections (1) and (5) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (4)(a) allows a disciplining authority to provide blanket exemptions to broad categories or specialties within a profession.

(b) A disciplining authority may exempt a professional from the training requirements of subsections (1) and (5) of this section if the professional has only brief or limited patient contact.

(5)(a) Each of the following professionals credentialed under Title 18 RCW shall complete a one-time training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved by the relevant disciplining authority:

(i) A chiropractor licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW;

(ii) A naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) A licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, or advanced registered nurse practitioner, other than a certified registered nurse anesthetist, licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;

(iv) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, other than a holder of a postgraduate osteopathic medicine and surgery license issued under RCW 18.57.035;

(v) An osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW;

(vi) A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed under chapter 18.74 RCW;

(vii) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, other than a resident holding a limited license issued under RCW 18.71.095(3);

(viii) A physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW;

(ix) A pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW;

(x) A dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW;

(xi) A dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW; ((and))

(xii) An athletic trainer licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW; and

(xiii) A person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (((xi)))(xii) of this subsection.

(b)(i) A professional listed in (a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection or a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2016, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between June 12, 2014, and January 1, 2016, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).

(ii) A licensed pharmacist or a person holding a retired active pharmacist license must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2017, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later.

(iii) A licensed dentist, a licensed dental hygienist, or a person holding a retired active license as a dentist shall complete the one-time training by the end of the full continuing education reporting period after August 1, 2020, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between July 23, 2017, and August 1, 2020, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b)(iii), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).

(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.

(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (5)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.

(6)(a) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall work collaboratively to develop a model list of training programs in suicide assessment, treatment, and management.

(b) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall update the list at least once every two years.

(c) By June 30, 2016, the department shall adopt rules establishing minimum standards for the training programs included on the model list. The minimum standards must require that six-hour trainings include content specific to veterans and the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means or self-injurious behaviors and that three-hour trainings for pharmacists or dentists include content related to the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means. When adopting the rules required under this subsection (6)(c), the department shall:

(i) Consult with the affected disciplining authorities, public and private institutions of higher education, educators, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, the Washington department of veterans affairs, and affected professional associations; and

(ii) Consider standards related to the best practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention and the suicide prevention resource center.

(d) Beginning January 1, 2017:

(i) The model list must include only trainings that meet the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection and any three-hour trainings that met the requirements of this section on or before July 24, 2015;

(ii) The model list must include six-hour trainings in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, and three-hour trainings that include only screening and referral elements; and

(iii) A person or entity providing the training required in this section may petition the department for inclusion on the model list. The department shall add the training to the list only if the department determines that the training meets the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection.

(7) The department shall provide the health profession training standards created in this section to the professional educator standards board as a model in meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.410.226 and provide technical assistance, as requested, in the review and evaluation of educator training programs. The educator training programs approved by the professional educator standards board may be included in the department's model list.

(8) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(9) The secretary and the disciplining authorities affected by this section shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

(10) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.130.020.

(b) "Training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management" means empirically supported training approved by the appropriate disciplining authority that contains the following elements: Suicide assessment, including screening and referral, suicide treatment, and suicide management. However, the disciplining authority may approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for the profession in question based on the profession's scope of practice. The board of occupational therapy may also approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for occupational therapy practitioners based on practice setting.

(11) A state or local government employee is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.

(12) An employee of a community mental health agency licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW or a chemical dependency program certified under chapter ((70.96A))71.24 RCW is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.

Sec. 7. RCW 69.41.010 and 2016 c 148 s 10 and 2016 c 97 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a legend drug whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(a) A practitioner; or

(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.

(2) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(3) "Community-based care settings" include: Community residential programs for persons with developmental disabilities, certified by the department of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities.

(4) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of a legend drug, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a legend drug and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(7) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(8) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a legend drug.

(9) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(10) "Drug" means:

(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or animals;

(c) Substances (other than food, minerals or vitamins) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of human beings or animals; and

(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. It does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(11) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization transmitted verbally by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(12) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of temporary and permanent residence, but does not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care settings.

(13) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by state law or regulation of the pharmacy quality assurance commission to be dispensed on prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.

(14) "Legible prescription" means a prescription or medication order issued by a practitioner that is capable of being read and understood by the pharmacist filling the prescription or the nurse or other practitioner implementing the medication order. A prescription must be hand printed, typewritten, or electronically generated.

(15) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by a nonpractitioner to an individual residing in a community-based care setting or in-home care setting to facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or controlled substance. It includes reminding or coaching the individual, handing the medication container to the individual, opening the individual's medication container, using an enabler, or placing the medication in the individual's hand, and such other means of medication assistance as defined by rule adopted by the department. A nonpractitioner may help in the preparation of legend drugs or controlled substances for self-administration where a practitioner has determined and communicated orally or by written direction that such medication preparation assistance is necessary and appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include assistance with intravenous medications or injectable medications, except prefilled insulin syringes.

(16) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity.

(17) "Practitioner" means:

(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, an East Asian medicine practitioner to the extent authorized under chapter 18.06 RCW and the rules adopted under RCW 18.06.010(1)(j), a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, an optometrist under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a licensed athletic trainer to the extent authorized under chapter 18.250 RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, or, when acting under the required supervision of a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW, a dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(b) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, or to administer a legend drug in the course of professional practice or research in this state; and

(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in any state, or province of Canada, which shares a common border with the state of Washington.

(18) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. Section 5 of this act expires August 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Section 6 of this act takes effect August 1, 2020.

--- END ---