BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:

The department must adopt education equivalencies for licensed child care providers. The equivalencies must identify professional experience and skills that may be considered equivalent to education levels required by child care licensing rules. When adopting education equivalencies, the department must consider years of child care or related experience and time spent by a provider engaged in professional development activities. Professional development activities may include, but are not limited to: Participating in professional training opportunities; researching peer-reviewed best practices; and engaging in peer-to-peer mentoring.

--- END ---