BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.205 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall develop training standards for the certification of the following health care providers as chemical dependency counselors:

(a) Psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW;

(b) Independent clinical social workers licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(c) Marriage and family therapists licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(d) Mental health counselors licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW; and

(e) An agency affiliated counselor under chapter 18.19 RCW with a master's degree or further advanced degree in counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or university who has at least two years of experience, experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional recognized by the department or attested to by the licensed behavioral health agency, in direct treatment of persons with mental illness or emotional disturbance.

(2) The training standards must be designed with consideration of the practices of the health professions listed in subsection (1) of this section and consist of no more than thirty-five hours of instruction in the following topics:

(a) Understanding addiction;

(b) Pharmacological action of alcohol and other drugs;

(c) Understanding addiction placement, continuing care, and discharge criteria, including American society of addiction medicine criteria;

(d) Treatment planning specific to substance abuse;

(e) Relapse prevention; and

(f) Confidentiality issues specific to substance use disorder treatment.

(3) In developing the training standards, the department shall consult with the examining board of psychology established in chapter 18.83 RCW, the Washington state mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory committee established in chapter 18.225 RCW, the chemical dependency certification advisory committee established in chapter 18.205 RCW, and educational institutions in Washington state that train psychologists, marriage and family therapists, mental health counselors, independent clinical social workers, and chemical dependency professionals.

(4) The department shall approve educational programs that meet the training standards, which must not be limited to university-based courses.

(5) The department shall develop an examination to determine competency in the training standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.205 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2020, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall contract with an educational program to offer the training developed under section 1 of this act. The contracted educational program shall offer the training at a reduced cost to health care providers identified in section 1 of this act. The training must be (a) available online on an ongoing basis and (b) offered in person at least four times per calendar year.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2020, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall contract with an entity to provide a telephonic consultation service to assist health care providers who have been issued a chemical dependency professional certification pursuant to RCW 18.205.090 with the diagnosis and treatment of patients with co-occurring behavioral health disorders.

(3) The department shall identify supervisors who are trained and available to supervise persons seeking to meet the supervised experience requirements established under RCW 18.205.090(1)(b)(iv).

(4) This section expires July 1, 2025.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.205.090 and 2001 c 251 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a)(i) Completion of an educational program approved by the secretary or successful completion of alternate training that meets established criteria;

(((b)))(ii) Successful completion of an approved examination, based on core competencies of chemical dependency counseling; and

(((c)))(iii) Successful completion of an experience requirement that establishes fewer hours of experience for applicants with higher levels of relevant education. In meeting any experience requirement established under this subsection, the secretary may not require more than one thousand five hundred hours of experience in chemical dependency counseling for applicants who are licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW or under chapter 18.79 RCW as advanced registered nurse practitioners; or

(b)(i) The applicant is one of the following health care providers:

(A) A psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW;

(B) An independent clinical social worker under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(C) A marriage and family therapist under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(D) A mental health counselor under chapter 18.225 RCW; or

(E) An agency affiliated counselor under chapter 18.19 RCW with a master's degree or further advanced degree in counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or university who has at least two years of experience, experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional recognized by the department or attested to by the licensed behavioral health agency, in direct treatment of persons with mental illness or emotional disturbance;

(ii) Submits proof of successful completion of a training program that is approved by the department under section 1 of this act as meeting the training standards;

(iii) Successfully completes the examination required under (a)(ii) of this subsection; and

(iv) Successfully completes an experience requirement of:

(A) Eighty hours of supervised experience for an applicant listed under (b)(i) of this subsection with fewer than five years of experience; or

(B) Forty hours of supervised experience for an applicant listed under (b)(i) of this subsection with five or more years of experience.

(2) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the criteria.

(3) Applicants are subject to the grounds for denial of a certificate or issuance of a conditional certificate under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(4) Certified chemical dependency professionals shall not be required to be registered under chapter 18.19 RCW or licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.205.020 and 2008 c 135 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Certification" means a voluntary process recognizing an individual who qualifies by examination and meets established educational prerequisites, and which protects the title of practice.

(2) "Certified chemical dependency professional" means an individual certified in chemical dependency counseling, under this chapter.

(3) "Certified chemical dependency professional trainee" means an individual working toward the education and experience requirements for certification as a chemical dependency professional.

(4) "Chemical dependency counseling" means employing the core competencies of chemical dependency counseling to assist or attempt to assist ((an alcohol or drug addicted person to develop and maintain abstinence from alcohol and other mood-altering))individuals who are using or dependent on alcohol or other drugs.

(5) "Committee" means the chemical dependency certification advisory committee established under this chapter.

(6) "Core competencies of chemical dependency counseling" means competency in the nationally recognized knowledge, skills, and attitudes of professional practice, including assessment and diagnosis of chemical dependency, chemical dependency treatment planning and referral, patient and family education in the disease of chemical dependency, individual and group counseling with alcoholic and drug addicted individuals, relapse prevention counseling, and case management((, all oriented to assist alcoholic and drug addicted patients to achieve and maintain abstinence from mood-altering substances and develop independent support systems)).

(7) "Department" means the department of health.

(8) "Health profession" means a profession providing health services regulated under the laws of this state.

(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 18.83 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall reduce the total number of supervised experience hours required under RCW 18.83.070 by three months for any applicant for a license under this chapter who has practiced as a certified chemical dependency professional for three years in the previous ten years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 18.225 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall reduce the total number of supervised experience hours required under RCW 18.225.090 by ten percent for any applicant for a license under this chapter who has practiced as a certified chemical dependency professional for three years in the previous ten years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect July 1, 2020.

--- END ---