BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.375 and 2007 c 370 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Society or organization" as used in RCW 66.24.380 means a not-for-profit group organized and operated (1) solely for charitable, religious, social, political, educational, civic, ((fraternal,)) athletic, or benevolent purposes, ((or)) (2) as a fraternal society, order, or association registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(8) or (10) of the internal revenue code as it existed on the effective date of this section, or (3) as a local wine industry association registered under ((section))Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code as it exists on July 22, 2007. No portion of the profits from events sponsored by a not-for-profit group may be paid directly or indirectly to members, officers, directors, or trustees except for services performed for the organization. Any compensation paid to its officers and executives must be only for actual services and at levels comparable to the compensation for like positions within the state. A society or organization which is registered with the secretary of state or the federal internal revenue service as a nonprofit organization shall submit such registration, upon request, as proof that it is a not-for-profit group.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.28.040 and 2016 c 235 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided under section 4 of this act, or permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery, importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other manufacturer of liquor may, within the state of Washington, give to any person any liquor((; but)).

(2) Nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.305 prevents:

(a) A domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with ((regulations))rules adopted by the ((liquor and cannabis)) board, provided that the samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210; ((nothing in this section prevents))

(b) A domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval holder, or distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; ((nothing in this section prevents))

(c) A domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine so furnished solely for such educational purposes ((or));

(d) A domestic winery, or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distiller licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor licensed under RCW 66.24.310, from furnishing spirits without charge, to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) ((or)), (6), (8), or (10) of the internal revenue code ((of 1986))as it existed on the effective date of this section for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such exemption; ((nothing in this section prevents))

(e) A domestic brewery or microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the brewery premises; ((nothing in this section prevents))

(f) Donations of wine for the purposes of RCW 66.12.180; ((nothing in this section prevents))

(g) A domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on the winery premises; and ((nothing in this section prevents))

(h) A craft distillery from serving spirits, on the distillery premises subject to RCW 66.24.145.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.28.295 and 2011 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in RCW 66.28.290 ((shall)) prohibits:

(1) A licensed domestic brewery or microbrewery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the brewery premises and at one additional off-site retail only location.

(2) A domestic winery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the winery premises. Such beer and wine so sold at retail shall be subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to reporting and bonding requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is not produced by the brewery or winery shall be purchased from a licensed beer or wine distributor.

(3) A microbrewery holding a beer and/or wine restaurant license under RCW 66.24.320 from holding the same privileges and endorsements attached to the beer and/or wine restaurant license.

(4) A licensed craft distillery from selling spirits of its own production under RCW 66.24.145.

(5) A licensed distiller, domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or a lessee of a licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery, from being licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling liquor at a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant premises on the property on which the primary manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller, domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on contiguous property owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6) A microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license under RCW 66.24.420 from holding the same privileges and endorsements attached to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license.

(7) A brewery or microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license or a beer and/or wine license under chapter 66.24 RCW operated on the premises of the brewery or microbrewery from holding a second retail only license at a location separate from the premises of the brewery or microbrewery.

(8) Retail licensees with a caterer's endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from operating on a domestic winery premises.

(9) An organization qualifying under RCW 66.24.375 formed for the purpose of constructing and operating a facility to promote Washington wines from holding retail licenses on the facility property or leasing all or any portion of such facility property to a retail licensee on the facility property if the members of the board of directors or officers of the board for the organization include officers, directors, owners, or employees of a licensed domestic winery. Financing for the construction of the facility must include both public and private money.

(10) A bona fide charitable nonprofit society or association registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the ((federal)) internal revenue code, a fraternal society, order, or association registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(8) or (10) of the internal revenue code as it existed on the effective date of this section, or a local wine industry association registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(6) of the ((federal)) internal revenue code as it existed on July 22, 2007, and having an officer, director, owner, or employee of a licensed domestic winery or a wine certificate of approval holder on its board of directors from holding a special occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.

(11) A person licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.170, 66.24.240, or 66.24.244 from exercising the privileges of distributing and selling at retail such person's own production or from exercising any other right or privilege that attaches to such license.

(12) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant to RCW 66.24.206 from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor of their own product or from shipping their own product directly to consumers as authorized by RCW 66.20.360.

(13) A person holding a wine shipper's permit pursuant to RCW 66.20.375 from shipping their own product directly to consumers.

(14) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant to RCW 66.24.270(2) from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor of their own product.

(15) A domestic winery and a restaurant licensed under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.400 from entering an arrangement to waive a corkage fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is a special permit to be designated as a banquet permit to be issued to a not-for-profit society or charitable organization to provide free of charge, spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified date and place.

(2) The banquet permit is available for an unlimited number of the organization's business or social events that are held solely for the organization's members and guests. The events may not be open to the general public.

(3) Liquor served at the event may be:

(a) Provided by individuals attending the event for their own consumption or with the intent to share, at no cost, with other attendees;

(b) Included in the total price for an event when participants receive an equal share by distribution of exchangeable tickets as part of the package;

(c) Donated to the organization by any person, industry member, or entity so long as the donor or the organization pays any fees established by RCW 66.24.630(4), taxes imposed on a retail sale under RCW 82.08.150, or other sales taxes that would be paid, if the sale were made to a consumer; or

(d) Purchased by the event organizers at an authorized retail source.

(4) The organization may accept cash donations at an event so long as there is no expectation or implied obligation to give a donation in exchange for a beverage containing liquor.

(5) The fee for the banquet permit is ten dollars per day.

(6) For events occurring under this section, the board must provide for an online permit to be issued on the day the event occurs.

Sec. 5. RCW 66.20.010 and 2017 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the employee must issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such fee as may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as follows:

(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly conducted as a hospital or sanitorium for the care of persons in ill health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);

(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the purpose named in the permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);

(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to:

(a) Such applicants as may be fixed by the board; and

(b) A not-for-profit society or charitable organization as authorized under section 4 of this act;

(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;

(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor, or other products, a special permit;

(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);

(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such military installation;

(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a vendor that manufactures or sells a product which cannot be effectively presented to potential buyers without serving it with liquor or by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the said liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and when the liquor so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or display room during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;

(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the liquor so donated is for consumption at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;

(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a liquor spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;

(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility. "Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means a facility offering from one to eight lodging units and breakfast to travelers and guests;

(12) Where the application is for a special permit to allow tasting of alcohol by persons at least eighteen years of age under the following circumstances:

(a) The application is from a community or technical college as defined in RCW 28B.50.030, a regional university, or a state university;

(b) The person who is permitted to taste under this subsection is enrolled as a student in a required or elective class that is part of a culinary, sommelier, wine business, enology, viticulture, wine technology, beer technology, or spirituous technology-related degree program;

(c) The alcohol served to any person in the degree-related programs under (b) of this subsection is tasted but not consumed for the purposes of educational training as part of the class curriculum with the approval of the educational provider;

(d) The service and tasting of alcoholic beverages is supervised by a faculty or staff member of the educational provider who is twenty-one years of age or older. The supervising faculty or staff member ((shall))must possess a class 12 or 13 alcohol server permit under the provisions of RCW 66.20.310;

(e) The enrolled student permitted to taste the alcoholic beverages does not purchase the alcoholic beverages; and

(f) The permit fee for the special permit provided for in this subsection (12) must be waived by the board;

(13) Where the application is for a special permit by a distillery or craft distillery for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place, including at the licensed premise of the applying distillery or craft distillery, upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling spirits of its own production. The distillery or craft distillery must obtain a permit for a fee of ten dollars per event. An application for the permit must be submitted for private banquet permits prior to the event and, once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No licensee may receive more than twelve permits under this subsection (13) each year;

(14) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer of wine for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling wine of its own production. The winery must obtain a permit for a fee of ten dollars per event. An application for the permit must be submitted at least ten days before the event and once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No more than twelve events per year may be held by a single manufacturer under this subsection;

(15) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer of beer for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling beer of its own production. The brewery or microbrewery must obtain a permit for a fee of ten dollars per event. An application for the permit must be submitted at least ten days before the event and, once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No more than twelve events per year may be held by a single manufacturer under this subsection;

(16) Where the application is for a special permit by an individual or business to sell a private collection of wine or spirits to an individual or business. The seller must obtain a permit at least five business days before the sale, for a fee of twenty-five dollars per sale. The seller must provide an inventory of products sold and the agreed price on a form provided by the board. The seller shall submit the report and taxes due to the board no later than twenty calendar days after the sale. A permit may be issued under this section to allow the sale of a private collection to licensees, but may not be issued to a licensee to sell to a private individual or business which is not otherwise authorized under the license held by the seller. If the liquor is purchased by a licensee, all sales are subject to taxes assessed as on liquor acquired from any other source. The board may adopt rules to implement this section;

(17)(a) A special permit, where the application is for a special permit by a nonprofit organization to sell wine through an auction, not open to the public, to be conducted at a specific place, upon a specific date, and to allow wine tastings at the auction of the wine to be auctioned.

(b) A permit holder under this subsection (17) may at the specified event:

(i) Sell wine by auction for off-premises consumption; and

(ii) Allow tastings of samples of the wine to be auctioned at the event.

(c) An application is required for a permit under this subsection (17). The application must be submitted prior to the event and once issued must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use.

(d) Wine from more than one winery may be sold at the auction; however, each winery selling wine at the auction must be listed on the permit application. Only a single application form may be required for each auction, regardless of the number of wineries that are selling wine at the auction. The total fee per event for a permit issued under this subsection (17) is twenty-five dollars multiplied by the number of wineries that are selling wine at the auction.

(e) For the purposes of this subsection (17), "nonprofit organization" means an entity incorporated as a nonprofit organization under Washington state law.

(f) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---