BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature intends to support the burning of solid waste, which is the ultimate renewable resource, to produce renewable energy. By December 31, 2019, the department of ecology and the utilities and transportation commission shall submit a jointly prepared report to the legislature examining opportunities, and making recommendations, for expanding the use of waste-to-energy plants in Washington.

(2) The legislature intends to appropriate sufficient moneys to carry out the purposes of this act.

--- END ---