BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.12.110 and 1994 c 164 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

For any occupation in which a minimum wage has been established, the director may issue to an employer, a special certificate or permit ((for an employee who is physically or mentally handicapped to such a degree that he or she is unable to obtain employment in the competitive labor market, or)) to a trainee or learner not otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of the apprenticeship council, ((a special certificate or permit)) authorizing the employment of such employee for a wage less than the legal minimum wage; and the director shall fix the minimum wage for said person, such special certificate or permit to be issued only in such cases as the director may decide the same is applied for in good faith and that such certificate or permit shall be in force for such length of time as the director shall decide and determine is proper.

Sec. 2. RCW 49.46.060 and 1959 c 294 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The director, to the extent necessary in order to prevent curtailment of opportunities for employment, shall by regulations provide for (((1))) the employment of learners, of apprentices, and of messengers employed primarily in delivering letters and messages, under special certificates issued pursuant to regulations of the director, at such wages lower than the minimum wage applicable under RCW 49.46.020 and subject to such limitations as to time, number, proportion, and length of service as the director shall prescribe((, and

)).

--- END ---