BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.540 and 2018 c 201 s 7019 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to remove barriers to employment for individuals with disabilities by providing medical assistance to working individuals with disabilities through a buy-in program in accordance with section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social security act and eligibility and cost-sharing requirements established by the authority.

(2) The authority shall establish ((income, resource, and)) cost-sharing requirements for the buy-in program in accordance with federal law and any conditions or limitations specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The authority shall establish and modify eligibility and cost-sharing requirements in order to administer the program within available funds. The authority may consider a person's income when establishing cost-sharing requirements. The authority may not establish eligibility restrictions for the buy-in program based upon a person's income or maximum age. The authority shall make every effort to coordinate benefits with employer-sponsored coverage available to the working individuals with disabilities receiving benefits under this chapter or other applicable law.

(3) The authority shall seek federal approval to exclude resources accumulated in a separate account that results from earnings during an individual's enrollment in the buy-in program when determining the individual's subsequent eligibility for another medical assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2020.

--- END ---