BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.22.470 and 1970 ex.s. c 44 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall have the authority to delegate all or part of its duties of inspection to a local enforcement agency or a qualified inspection agency.

Qualified inspection agencies shall be objective, competent, and independent from the companies responsible for the work being inspected. The qualified inspection agency will disclose to the department any conflict of interest so that objectivity may be confirmed. Qualified inspection agencies shall have adequate equipment to perform the required inspections and shall employ experienced personnel with appropriate certifications and knowledge for the inspections being performed. Certification by the international code council will be recognized as meeting this last requirement.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.22.450 and 2001 c 335 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever used in RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490:

(1) "Department" means the Washington state department of labor and industries;

(2) "Approved" means approved by the department;

(3) "Factory built housing" means any structure designed primarily for human occupancy other than a manufactured or mobile home the structure or any room of which is either entirely or substantially prefabricated or assembled at a place other than a building site;

(4) "Install" means the assembly of factory built housing or factory built commercial structures at a building site;

(5) "Building site" means any tract, parcel or subdivision of land upon which factory built housing or a factory built commercial structure is installed or is to be installed;

(6) "Local enforcement agency" means any agency of the governing body of any city ((or)), county, or state which enforces laws or ordinances governing the construction of buildings;

(7) "Commercial structure" means a structure designed or used for human habitation, or human occupancy for industrial, educational, assembly, professional or commercial purposes;

(8) "Qualified inspection agency" means a nongovernmental entity approved to perform inspections under contract for the department.

--- END ---