BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.60A.200 and 2010 c 5 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) State agencies are encouraged to award three percent of all public works and procurement ((contracts that are exempt from competitive bidding requirements under RCW 43.19.1906(2)))of goods and services to veteran-owned businesses certified by the department under RCW 43.60A.195.

(2) State agencies shall:

(a) Perform outreach to veteran-owned businesses in collaboration with the department to increase opportunities for veteran-owned businesses to sell goods and services to the state; and

(b) Work to match agency procurement records with the department's database of certified veteran-owned businesses to establish how many procurement contracts are being awarded to those businesses.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.10.024 and 2010 c 5 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or after ((June 10, 2010))the effective date of this section, are subject to the requirements established under RCW 43.60A.200.

Sec. 3. RCW 39.04.162 and 2010 c 5 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or after ((June 10, 2010))the effective date of this section, are subject to the requirements established under RCW 43.60A.200.

Sec. 4. RCW 39.26.240 and 2010 c 5 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or after ((June 10, 2010))the effective date of this section, are subject to the requirements established under RCW 43.60A.200.

Sec. 5. RCW 39.26.245 and 2010 c 5 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All contracts entered into and purchases made, including leasing or renting, under this chapter on or after September 1, 1983, are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.19 RCW.

(2) All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or after ((June 10, 2010))the effective date of this section, are subject to the requirements established under RCW 43.60A.200.

--- END ---