BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.225 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A child of a military family complies with the residency requirements for enrollment in a school district if a parent of the child is transferred to, or is pending transfer to, a military installation within the state while on active duty pursuant to official military orders.

(b) A parent of the child must provide to the school district proof of residence in the school district within fourteen days of the arrival date provided on official military documentation. The parent may use the address of any of the following as proof of residence in the school district:

(i) A temporary on-base billeting facility;

(ii) A purchased or leased home or apartment; or

(iii) Any federal government housing or off-base military housing, including off-base military housing that may be provided through a public-private venture.

(2) A school district shall accept, on a conditional basis, an application for enrollment and course registration, including enrollment in a specific school or program within the school district, by electronic means for children of military families who meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section. Upon satisfaction of the requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this section, the school district shall finalize the enrollment of children of military families.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Active duty" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.705.010.

(b) "Child of a military family" and "children of military families" have the same meaning as "children of military families" in RCW 28A.705.010.

(c) "Military installation" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.705.010.

(d) "Parent" means a parent, guardian, or other person or entity having legal custody of a child of a military family.

--- END ---