BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.80.050 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Biennial appropriations to the department of transportation to carry out the regional transportation planning program shall set forth the amounts to be allocated as follows:

(((1)))(a) A base amount per county for each county within each regional transportation planning organization, to be distributed to the lead planning agency;

(((2)))(b) An amount to be distributed to each lead planning agency on a per capita basis; and

(((3)))(c) An amount to be administered by the department of transportation as a discretionary grant program for special regional planning projects, including grants to allow counties which have significant transportation interests in common with an adjoining region to also participate in that region's planning efforts.

(2) In order for a regional transportation planning organization to be eligible to receive state funds that are appropriated for regional transportation planning organizations, a regional transportation planning organization must provide a reasonable opportunity for voting membership to federally recognized tribes that hold reservation or trust lands within the planning area of the regional transportation planning organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect August 1, 2019.

--- END ---