BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.03.011 and 2017 1st sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Pursuant to Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution and RCW 43.03.010 and 43.03.310, the annual salaries of the state elected officials of the executive branch shall be as follows:

(1) Effective September 1, 2016:

(a) Governor. . . .$173,617

(b) Lieutenant governor. . . .$101,889

(c) Secretary of state. . . .$121,663

(d) Treasurer. . . .$140,438

(e) Auditor. . . .$121,663

(f) Attorney general. . . .$159,395

(g) Superintendent of public instruction. . . .$134,212

(h) Commissioner of public lands. . . .$132,858

(i) Insurance commissioner. . . .$124,061

(2) Effective September 1, 2017:

(a) Governor. . . .$175,353

(b) Lieutenant governor. . . .$102,908

(c) Secretary of state. . . .$122,880

(d) Treasurer. . . .$143,247

(e) Auditor. . . .$122,880

(f) Attorney general. . . .$160,989

(g) Superintendent of public instruction. . . .$135,554

(h) Commissioner of public lands. . . .$135,515

(i) Insurance commissioner. . . .$125,302

(3) Effective September 1, 2018:

(a) Governor. . . .$177,107

(b) Lieutenant governor. . . .$103,937

(c) Secretary of state. . . .$124,108

(d) Treasurer. . . .$144,679

(e) Auditor. . . .$124,108

(f) Attorney general. . . .$162,599

(g) Superintendent of public instruction. . . .$136,910

(h) Commissioner of public lands. . . .$138,225

(i) Insurance commissioner. . . .$126,555

(4) The lieutenant governor shall receive the fixed amount of his or her salary plus 1/260th of the difference between his or her salary and that of the governor for each day that the lieutenant governor is called upon to perform the duties of the governor by reason of the absence from the state, removal, resignation, death, or disability of the governor. Such amounts must be paid from funds appropriated to the office of the governor.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.03.020 and 2009 c 549 s 5006 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever by reason of the absence from the state or the disability of the governor, the lieutenant governor is called upon temporarily to perform the duties of the office of governor, he or she shall be paid upon his or her personal voucher therefor the sum of ten dollars per day for expenses. Such amounts must be paid from funds appropriated to the office of the governor.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.06.040 and 2009 c 549 s 5014 are each amended to read as follows:

If the governor absents himself or herself from the state, he or she shall, prior to his or her departure, notify the lieutenant governor of his or her proposed absence, and during such absence the lieutenant governor shall perform all the duties of the governor. Any salary or expenses from performing all the duties of the governor must be paid from funds appropriated to the office of the governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---