BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.068 and 2016 c 233 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the postretirement employment options available in RCW 41.32.802 or 41.32.862, and only until ((August 1, 2020))June 30, 2023, a teacher in plan 2 or plan 3 who has retired under the alternate early retirement provisions of RCW 41.32.765(3)(b) or 41.32.875(3)(b) may be employed with an employer for up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year without suspension of his or her benefit, provided that: (((1)))

(a) The retired teacher reenters employment more than one calendar month after his or her accrual date and after June 9, 2016; (((2) [the retired teacher]))

(b) The retired teacher is employed exclusively as((either)):

(i) A substitute teacher as defined in RCW 41.32.010(48)(a) in an instructional capacity, as opposed to other capacities identified in RCW 41.32.010(49);

(ii) An athletic coach;

(iii) A mentor to teachers or an adviser to students in teacher preparation programs; or

(iv) A counselor; and (((3)))

(c) The employing school district compensates the district's substitute teachers at a rate that is at least eighty-five percent of the full daily amount allocated by the state to the district for substitute teacher compensation.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "mentor" means an educator who has achieved appropriate training in assisting, coaching, and advising beginning teachers or student teaching residents as defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, such as national board certification or other specialized training.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. 2016 c 233 s 19 (uncodified) is repealed.

--- END ---