BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.205 and 2002 c 175 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A juvenile sentenced to a term of confinement to be served under the supervision of the department shall not be released from the physical custody of the department prior to the release date established under RCW 13.40.210 except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) A juvenile serving a term of confinement under the supervision of the department may be released on authorized leave from the physical custody of the department only if consistent with public safety and if:

(a) Sixty percent of the minimum term of confinement has been served; and

(b) The purpose of the leave is to enable the juvenile:

(i) To visit the juvenile's family for the purpose of strengthening or preserving family relationships;

(ii) To make plans for parole or release which require the juvenile's personal appearance in the community and which will facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into the community; or

(iii) To make plans for a residential placement out of the juvenile's home which requires the juvenile's personal appearance in the community.

(3) No authorized leave may exceed seven consecutive days. The total of all pre-minimum term authorized leaves granted to a juvenile prior to final discharge from confinement shall not exceed thirty days.

(4) Prior to authorizing a leave, the secretary shall require a written leave plan, which shall detail the purpose of the leave and how it is to be achieved, the address at which the juvenile shall reside, the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave, and a statement by such person acknowledging familiarity with the leave plan and agreeing to supervise the juvenile and to notify the secretary immediately if the juvenile violates any terms or conditions of the leave. The leave plan shall include such terms and conditions as the secretary deems appropriate and shall be signed by the juvenile.

(5) Upon authorizing a leave, the secretary shall issue to the juvenile an authorized leave order which shall contain the name of the juvenile, the fact that the juvenile is on leave from a designated facility, the time period of the leave, and the identity of an appropriate official of the department to contact when necessary. The authorized leave order shall be carried by the juvenile at all times while on leave.

(6) Prior to the commencement of any authorized leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will reside during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave.

(7) The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the period of time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. In cases of emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portions of subsections (2)(a), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section.

(8) If requested by the juvenile's victim or the victim's immediate family, the secretary shall give notice of any leave to the victim or the victim's immediate family.

(9) A juvenile who violates any condition of an authorized leave plan may be taken into custody and returned to the department in the same manner as an adult in identical circumstances.

(10) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a juvenile placed in minimum security status may participate in work, educational, community restitution, or treatment programs in the community up to twelve hours a day if approved by the secretary. Such a release shall not be deemed a leave of absence. This authorization may be increased to more than twelve hours a day up to sixteen hours a day if approved by the secretary and operated within the department's appropriations.

(11) Subsections (6), (7), and (8) of this section do not apply to juveniles covered by RCW 13.40.215.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.05.405 and 1998 c 269 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall adopt an infraction policy for juveniles placed in community facilities. The policy shall require written documentation by the department and service providers of all infractions and violations by juveniles of conditions set by the department. Any juvenile who commits a serious infraction or a serious violation of conditions set by the department ((shall))must be returned to an institution. The secretary shall not return a juvenile to a community facility until a new risk assessment has been completed and the secretary reasonably believes that the juvenile can adhere to the conditions set by the department. The department ((shall))must define the terms "serious infraction" and "serious violation" in rule ((and shall include but not necessarily [be] limited to)), which must include the commission of any criminal offense((, any))excluding unlawful use or possession of a controlled substance((, and any))or use or possession of an alcoholic beverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 72.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall consult empirically validated best practices and evidence concerning most effective interventions before adopting an amended policy to appropriately address infractions involving unlawful use or possession of a controlled substance or alcohol under section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (section 2 of this act).

(2) This section expires June 30, 2020.

--- END ---