BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of transportation shall cease operations of the express toll lanes on Interstate 405 and state route number 167, and the high occupancy toll lanes on state route number 167, for one hundred twenty consecutive days, to commence no later than October 2, 2019. During the temporary shutdown of the express toll lanes and high occupancy toll lanes, the department of transportation shall allow all vehicles to travel in all lanes of Interstate 405 between Lynnwood and Bellevue and in all lanes of state route number 167. The department of transportation shall conduct adequate public outreach prior to the one hundred twenty day change and shall modify the toll facility's operation by changing the messaging on the electronic signage to inform drivers the lanes are open to all, similar to the current procedure when operations change for the weekend or evening hours.

(2) The department of transportation shall continue to collect corridor data in the same way and aggregate the data solely for the one hundred twenty day period of the temporary shutdown of the express toll lanes and high occupancy toll lanes. A report for this one hundred twenty day period summarizing the same performance measures as the first twenty-four month period quarterly performance updates, including applicable performance measures listed in RCW 47.56.880(4), is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 10, 2020.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---