BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.62 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person operating a transient accommodation as defined in this chapter must include, at minimum, the following information in a short-term agreement for rental of a lodging unit entered into on or after the effective date of this section:

(a) The price per night;

(b) The duration of the short-term rental period;

(c) The full name of the parties to the agreement, including the full name of the guest and the person operating the transient accommodation; and

(d) The notice language provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) A short-term agreement for rental of a lodging unit entered into on or after the effective date of this section must include the following language:

NOTICE: Information about specified registered sex offenders is made available to the public via a web site maintained by the Washington Association of Sheriffs and Police Chiefs at www.waspc.org/sex-offender-information. Depending on an offender's criminal history, this information includes either the address at which the offender resides, or the community of residence and ZIP Code in which he or she resides. This notice is provided in accordance with RCW 70.62.--- (this section).

Sec. 2. RCW 70.62.210 and 1991 c 3 s 347 are each amended to read as follows:

((The following terms whenever used or referred to in this chapter shall have the following respective meanings for the purposes of this chapter, except in those instances where the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) The term "transient accommodation" shall mean any facility such as a hotel, motel, condominium, resort, or any other facility or place offering three or more lodging units to travelers and transient guests.

(2) The term "person" shall mean any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association or joint stock association, and the legal successor thereof.

(3) The term "secretary" shall mean the secretary of the Washington state department of health and any duly authorized representative thereof.

(4) The term "board" shall mean the Washington state board of health.

(5) The term "department" shall mean the Washington state department of health.

))The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of health.

(2) "Department" mean the Washington state department of health.

(3) "Lodging unit" means one self-contained unit within a transient accommodation designated by number, letter, name, or some other method of identification.

(4) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, limited liability company,

(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Washington state department of health and any duly authorized representative thereof.

(6) "Short-term agreement" means an agreement for the short-term rental of a lodging unit that (a) meets the requirements of section 1 of this act, and (b) is signed by the parties to the agreement, including the guest and the person operating the transient accommodation or the person's agent or designee.

(7) "Transient accommodation" means any facility such as a hotel, motel, condominium, resort, or any other facility or place offering one or more lodging units to travelers and transient guests.

--- END ---