BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.155.050 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 5 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 974 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. On and after July 1, 2023, money in the ((public works assistance account shall))bank may only be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Until July 1, 2023, moneys in the ((account))bank may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving ((account [fund]))fund and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Not more than twenty percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this ((account))bank may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this ((account))bank may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. ((During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account [fund], and the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2015-2017 and 2017-2019 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, and the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the state general fund such amounts as specified by the legislature.)) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. ((It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.))

Sec. 2. RCW 43.84.092 and 2018 c 287 s 7, 2018 c 275 s 10, and 2018 c 203 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle charging infrastructure account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.84.180 and 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 6021 are each amended to read as follows:

The proportionate share of earnings based on the average daily balance in the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank shall be placed in the public facilities construction loan revolving fund((, provided that during the 2015-2017 biennium the public works assistance account must retain its own interest earnings and costs)).

Sec. 4. RCW 43.155.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.

(2) "Capital facility plan" means a capital facility plan required by the growth management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for local governments not fully planning under the growth management act, a plan required by the public works board.

(3) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(4) "Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank, or money to be received by the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank, to the repayment of all or a portion of the principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to finance public works projects.

(5) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, special purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state excluding school districts and port districts.

(6) "Public works project" means a project of a local government for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads, bridges, water systems, or storm and sanitary sewage systems, lead remediation of drinking water systems, and solid waste facilities, including recycling facilities. A planning project may include the compilation of biological, hydrological, or other data on a county, drainage basin, or region necessary to develop a base of information for a capital facility plan.

(7) "Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial actions necessary to bring abandoned or closed landfills into compliance with regulatory requirements and the repair, restoration, and replacement of existing solid waste transfer, recycling facilities, and landfill projects limited to the opening of landfill cells that are in existing and permitted landfills.

(8) "Technical assistance" means training and other services provided to local governments to: (a) Help such local governments plan, apply, and qualify for loans, grants, and financing guarantees from the board, and (b) help local governments improve their ability to plan for, finance, acquire, construct, repair, replace, rehabilitate, and maintain public facilities.

(9) "Value planning" means a uniform approach to assist in decision making through systematic evaluation of potential alternatives to solving an identified problem.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.155.060 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to aid the financing of public works projects, the board may:

(a) Make loans or grants to local governments from the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank or other funds and accounts for the purpose of assisting local governments in financing public works projects. Money received from local governments in repayment of loans made under this section shall be paid into the ((public works assistance account))bank for uses consistent with this chapter.

(b) Pledge money in the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank, or money to be received by the ((public works assistance account))bank, to the repayment of all or a portion of the principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to finance public works projects. The board shall not pledge any amount greater than the sum of money in the ((public works assistance account))bank plus money to be received from the payment of the debt service on loans made from ((that account))the bank, nor shall the board pledge the faith and credit or the taxing power of the state or any agency or subdivision thereof to the repayment of obligations issued by any local government.

(c) Create such subaccounts in the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank as the board deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(d) Provide a method for the allocation of loans, grants, and financing guarantees and the provision of technical assistance under this chapter.

(2) When establishing interest rates for loan programs authorized in this chapter for projects which are supported by a rate base of at least fifty thousand equivalent residential units, the board must base interest rates on the average daily market interest rate for tax-exempt municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer's index for the period from sixty to thirty days before the start of the application cycle.

(a) For projects with a repayment period between five and twenty years, the rate must be fifty percent of the market rate.

(b) For projects with a repayment period under five years, the rate must be twenty-five percent of the market rate.

(c) For any year in which the average daily market interest rate for tax-exempt municipal bonds for the period from sixty to thirty days before the start of an application cycle is nine percent or greater, the board may cap interest rates at four percent for projects with a repayment period between five and twenty years and at two percent for projects with a repayment period under five years.

(d) The board may also provide reduced interest rates, extended repayment periods, or grants for projects that meet financial hardship criteria as measured by the affordability index or similar standard measure of financial hardship. The board may provide reduced interest rates, extended repayment periods, or grants for projects that are supported by a rate base of less than fifty thousand equivalent residential units.

(3) All local public works projects aided in whole or in part under the provisions of this chapter shall be put out for competitive bids, except for emergency public works under RCW 43.155.065 for which the recipient jurisdiction shall comply with this requirement to the extent feasible and practicable. The competitive bids called for shall be administered in the same manner as all other public works projects put out for competitive bidding by the local governmental entity aided under this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.155.070 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To qualify for financial assistance under this chapter the board must determine that a local government meets all of the following conditions:

(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;

(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility plan; and

(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into consideration local employment and economic factors.

(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive financial assistance under this chapter unless it has adopted a comprehensive plan, including a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or receiving financial assistance under this chapter if such request is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 may apply for and receive financial assistance under this chapter if the comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040 before executing a contractual agreement for financial assistance with the board.

(3) In considering awarding financial assistance for public facilities to special districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board must consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.

(4)(a) The board must develop a process to prioritize applications and funding of loans and grants for public works projects submitted by local governments. The board must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following factors in prioritizing projects:

(i) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the health and safety of many people;

(ii) The extent to which the project leverages other funds;

(iii) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to construction;

(iv) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment, compared to the average state unemployment;

(v) Whether the project promotes the sustainable use of resources and environmental quality, as applicable;

(vi) Whether the project consolidates or regionalizes systems;

(vii) Whether the project encourages economic development through mixed-use and mixed income development consistent with chapter 36.70A RCW;

(viii) Whether the system is being well-managed in the present and for long-term sustainability;

(ix) Achieving equitable distribution of funds by geography and population;

(x) The extent to which the project meets the following state policy objectives:

(A) Efficient use of state resources;

(B) Preservation and enhancement of health and safety;

(C) Abatement of pollution and protection of the environment;

(D) Creation of new, family-wage jobs, and avoidance of shifting existing jobs from one Washington state community to another;

(E) Fostering economic development consistent with chapter 36.70A RCW;

(F) Efficiency in delivery of goods and services and transportation; and

(G) Reduction of the overall cost of public infrastructure;

(xi) Whether the applicant sought or is seeking funding for the project from other sources; and

(xii) Other criteria that the board considers necessary to achieve the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Before September 1, 2018, and each year thereafter, the board must develop and submit a report regarding the construction loans and grants to the office of financial management and appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives. The report must include:

(i) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested for public works projects;

(ii) A list and description of projects approved in the preceding fiscal year with project scores against the board's prioritization criteria;

(iii) The total amount of loan and grants disbursements made from the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank in the preceding fiscal year;

(iv) The total amount of loan repayments in the preceding fiscal year for outstanding loans from the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank;

(v) The total amount of loan repayments due for outstanding loans for each fiscal year over the following ten-year period; and

(vi) The total amount of funds obligated and timing of when the funds were obligated in the preceding fiscal year.

(c) The maximum amount of funding that the board may provide for any jurisdiction is ten million dollars per biennium.

(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments may not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government applicant must provide documentation of attempts to secure additional local or other sources of funding for each public works project for which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.

(6) Before September 1st of each year, the board must develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a description of the loans and grants made under RCW 43.155.065 and 43.155.068.

(7) The board may not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds from the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank before the legislature has appropriated funds to the board for the purpose of funding public works projects under this chapter.

(8) To qualify for loans, grants, or pledges for solid waste or recycling facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.

(9) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the effects of stormwater or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

(10) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank program loan or grant.

(11) The board must implement policies and procedures designed to maximize local government consideration of other funds to finance local infrastructure.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.155.090 and 1987 c 19 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Loans from the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank under this chapter shall be made by loan agreement under chapter 39.69 RCW.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.160.070 and 2008 c 327 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Public facilities financial assistance, when authorized by the board, is subject to the following conditions:

(1) The moneys in the public facilities construction loan revolving account shall be used solely to fulfill commitments arising from financial assistance authorized in this chapter. The total outstanding amount which the board shall dispense at any time pursuant to this section shall not exceed the moneys available from the account.

(2) On contracts made for public facilities loans the board shall determine the interest rate which loans shall bear. The interest rate shall not exceed ten percent per annum. The board may provide reasonable terms and conditions for repayment for loans, including partial forgiveness of loan principal and interest payments on projects located in rural communities as defined by the board, or rural counties. The loans shall not exceed twenty years in duration.

(3) Repayments of loans made from the public facilities construction loan revolving account under the contracts for public facilities construction loans shall be paid into the public facilities construction loan revolving account. Repayments of loans from moneys from the new appropriation from the public works assistance account for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 1999, shall be paid into the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank.

(4) When every feasible effort has been made to provide loans and loans are not possible, the board may provide grants upon finding that unique circumstances exist.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.16.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected from every person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after the business, as follows:

(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three and six-tenths percent;

(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths percent;

(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;

(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;

(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats, operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;

(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;

(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;

(h) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight one- hundredths percent. The reduced rate established in this subsection (1)(h) is not subject to the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage collection businesses must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2023, and thereafter in the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank created in RCW 43.155.050. On and after July 1, 2023, all moneys collected under this section must be deposited in the Washington state infrastructure bank.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.18.040 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Taxes collected under this chapter must be held in trust until paid to the state. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), taxes received by the state must be deposited in the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank created in RCW 43.155.050. ((For the period beginning July 1, 2011, and ending June 30, 2015, taxes received by the state under this chapter must be deposited in the general fund for general purpose expenditures.)) For fiscal years 2016, 2017, and 2018, one-half of the taxes received by the state under this chapter must be deposited in the general fund for general purpose expenditures and the remainder deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230. For fiscal years 2019 through 2023, taxes received by the state under this chapter must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230. On and after July 1, 2023, all taxes received by the state under this chapter must be deposited in the Washington state infrastructure bank. Any person collecting the tax who appropriates or converts the tax collected is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the date payment is due. If a taxpayer fails to pay the tax imposed by this chapter to the person charged with collection of the tax and the person charged with collection fails to pay the tax to the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the taxpayer for collection of the tax.

(2) The tax is due from the taxpayer within twenty-five days from the date the taxpayer is billed by the person collecting the tax.

(3) The tax is due from the person collecting the tax at the end of the tax period in which the tax is received from the taxpayer. If the taxpayer remits only a portion of the total amount billed for taxes, consideration, and related charges, the amount remitted must be applied first to payment of the solid waste collection tax and this tax has priority over all other claims to the amount remitted.

Sec. 11. RCW 82.45.060 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling price. Beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2023, an amount equal to two percent of the proceeds of this tax must be deposited in the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank created in RCW 43.155.050, and an amount equal to four and one-tenth percent must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230. Thereafter, an amount equal to six and one-tenth percent of the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer must be deposited in the ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank created in RCW 43.155.050. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an amount equal to one and six-tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer must be deposited in the city-county assistance account created in RCW 43.08.290.

Sec. 12. RCW 90.71.370 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 977 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2008, and by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2010, the council shall provide to the governor and the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives its recommendations for the funding necessary to implement the action agenda in the succeeding biennium. The recommendations shall:

(a) Identify the funding needed by action agenda element;

(b) Address funding responsibilities among local, state, and federal governments, as well as nongovernmental funding; and

(c) Address funding needed to support the work of the partnership, the panel, the ecosystem work group, and entities assisting in coordinating local efforts to implement the plan.

(2) In the 2008 report required under subsection (1) of this section, the council shall include recommendations for projected funding needed through 2020 to implement the action agenda; funding needs for science panel staff; identify methods to secure stable and sufficient funding to meet these needs; and include proposals for new sources of funding to be dedicated to Puget Sound protection and recovery. In preparing the science panel staffing proposal, the council shall consult with the panel.

(3) By November 1st of each odd-numbered year beginning in 2009, the council shall produce a state of the Sound report that includes, at a minimum:

(a) An assessment of progress by state and nonstate entities in implementing the action agenda, including accomplishments in the use of state funds for action agenda implementation;

(b) A description of actions by implementing entities that are inconsistent with the action agenda and steps taken to remedy the inconsistency;

(c) The comments by the panel on progress in implementing the plan, as well as findings arising from the assessment and monitoring program;

(d) A review of citizen concerns provided to the partnership and the disposition of those concerns;

(e) A review of the expenditures of funds to state agencies for the implementation of programs affecting the protection and recovery of Puget Sound, and an assessment of whether the use of the funds is consistent with the action agenda; and

(f) An identification of all funds provided to the partnership, and recommendations as to how future state expenditures for all entities, including the partnership, could better match the priorities of the action agenda.

(4)(a) The council shall review state programs that fund facilities and activities that may contribute to action agenda implementation. By November 1, 2009, the council shall provide initial recommendations regarding program changes to the governor and appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of representatives. By November 1, 2010, the council shall provide final recommendations regarding program changes, including proposed legislation to implement the recommendation, to the governor and appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of representatives.

(b) The review in this subsection shall be conducted with the active assistance and collaboration of the agencies administering these programs, and in consultation with local governments and other entities receiving funding from these programs:

(i) Water pollution control facilities financing, chapter 70.146 RCW;

(ii) The water pollution control revolving fund, chapter 90.50A RCW;

(iii) The ((public works assistance account))Washington state infrastructure bank, chapter 43.155 RCW;

(iv) The aquatic lands enhancement account, RCW 79.105.150;

(v) The state toxics control account and local toxics control account and clean-up program, chapter 70.105D RCW;

(vi) The acquisition of habitat conservation and outdoor recreation land, chapter 79A.15 RCW;

(vii) The salmon recovery funding board, RCW 77.85.110 through 77.85.150;

(viii) The community economic revitalization board, chapter 43.160 RCW;

(ix) Other state financial assistance to water quality-related projects and activities; and

(x) Water quality financial assistance from federal programs administered through state programs or provided directly to local governments in the Puget Sound basin.

(c) The council's review shall include but not be limited to:

(i) Determining the level of funding and types of projects and activities funded through the programs that contribute to implementation of the action agenda;

(ii) Evaluating the procedures and criteria in each program for determining which projects and activities to fund, and their relationship to the goals and priorities of the action agenda;

(iii) Assessing methods for ensuring that the goals and priorities of the action agenda are given priority when program funding decisions are made regarding water quality-related projects and activities in the Puget Sound basin and habitat-related projects and activities in the Puget Sound basin;

(iv) Modifying funding criteria so that projects, programs, and activities that are inconsistent with the action agenda are ineligible for funding;

(v) Assessing ways to incorporate a strategic funding approach for the action agenda within the outcome-focused performance measures required by RCW 43.41.270 in administering natural resource-related and environmentally based grant and loan programs.

(((5) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the council's review must result in a ranking of projects affecting the protection and recovery of the Puget Sound basin that are proposed in the governor's capital budget submitted under RCW 43.88.060. The ranking shall include recommendations for reallocation of total requested funds for Puget Sound basin projects to achieve the greatest positive outcomes for protection and recovery of Puget Sound and shall be submitted to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature no later than February 1, 2011.

))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. This act takes effect January 1, 2020, if the proposed amendment to Article VIII of the state Constitution creating the Washington state infrastructure bank is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---