BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the writings and teachings of American history have often overlooked the role of people of color, among them the history of Filipino Americans, whose heritage spans a colonial, political, economic, and cultural relationship with the United States. The legislature also finds that the earliest documented proof of Filipino presence in the continental United States was on October 18, 1587, when the first "Luzones Indios" set foot in Morro Bay, California. The Filipino American national historical society recognizes the year of 1763 as the date of the first permanent Filipino settlement in the United States in St. Malo Parrish, Louisiana. Subsequent waves of migration followed, and today Filipino Americans continue to make a lasting impact on the history and heritage of Washington state and the United States. In recognition of the critical economic, cultural, social, and other notable contributions by Filipino Americans to Washington state and the United States, the legislature has proclaimed October as Filipino American history month since 2010.

The legislature further finds that the prominence of Filipino and Filipino American population in Washington state warrants official commemoration of the history and heritage of Filipino Americans. Therefore the legislature intends to designate the month of October as Filipino American history month, a period of commemoration that highlights the contributions of Filipino Americans to Washington state and the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.117 RCW to read as follows:

October of each year will be known as Filipino American history month. Each October is designated as a time for people of this state to commemorate the contributions of Filipino Americans to the history and heritage of Washington state and the United States.

--- END ---