BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that Washington state is home to some of the most unique art and most talented artists in the world, reflecting the state's supreme natural beauty and diverse mixture of agricultural, maritime, industrial, and high-technology influences. Aside from its striking appeal and originality, the art of Washingtonians is compelling because of its aesthetic sensibility and extraordinary sense of place.

The legislature further finds that the state legislative buildings, in addition to serving as home for the legislative bodies of the state of Washington, provide a scenic and impressive space for celebrating the incredible artistic talents of Washingtonians. Therefore, the legislature intends to establish a program for the display of art and exhibits in the legislative buildings of the capitol campus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In coordination with the state historical societies, the state archives, and others, the state arts commission must establish a program to furnish art, artworks, artifacts, photographs, and exhibits from the collections housed in the Washington state history research center and any donations to the state for display in the legislative buildings of the capitol campus.

(2) The commission must work with the state historical societies to develop a list of art, artworks, artifacts, photographs, and exhibits eligible for display in the program. The list must take into account the particular spaces of each legislative building and the suitability of the work for display in the particular area.

(3) Art, artworks, artifacts, photographs, and exhibits must be rotated on a quarterly basis, with each series connected to a theme when practicable to do so.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "legislative buildings" means the legislative building, the John A. Cherberg building, the John L. O'Brien building, the Irving R. Newhouse building, and the Joel M. Pritchard building, of the capitol campus.

--- END ---