BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.37.435 and 1990 c 95 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((From June 7, 1990, person))(1) A mechanic or commercial installer of safety glazing or film sunscreening material who installs, for monetary or commercial gain, safety glazing or film sunscreening material in violation of RCW 46.37.430 is guilty of unlawful commercial installation of safety glazing or film sunscreening materials. ((Unlawful installation is))A mechanic or commercial installer who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is subject to a fine of five hundred dollars.

(2) A person who is not a mechanic or commercial installer of safety glazing or film sunscreening material who installs safety glazing or film sunscreening material in violation of RCW 46.37.430 is guilty of unlawful installation of safety glazing or film sunscreening materials. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is subject to a fine of one hundred dollars.

--- END ---