BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds and declares:

(1) All people deserve the right to choose the health services that are right for them, and the right to confidential access to those health services.

(2) When people are assured of the ability to confidentially access health care services, they are more likely to seek health services, disclose health risk behaviors to a clinician, and return for follow-up care.

(3) When denied confidential access to needed care, people may delay or forgo care, leading to higher rates of unprotected sex, unintended pregnancy, untreated sexually transmitted infections, and mental health issues, or they may turn to public health safety net funds or free clinics to receive confidential care—important resources that should be reserved for people who do not have insurance coverage.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.43.005 and 2016 c 65 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.

(2) "Adverse benefit determination" means a denial, reduction, or termination of, or a failure to provide or make payment, in whole or in part, for a benefit, including a denial, reduction, termination, or failure to provide or make payment that is based on a determination of an enrollee's or applicant's eligibility to participate in a plan, and including, with respect to group health plans, a denial, reduction, or termination of, or a failure to provide or make payment, in whole or in part, for a benefit resulting from the application of any utilization review, as well as a failure to cover an item or service for which benefits are otherwise provided because it is determined to be experimental or investigational or not medically necessary or appropriate.

(3) "Applicant" means a person who applies for enrollment in an individual health plan as the subscriber or an enrollee, or the dependent or spouse of a subscriber or enrollee.

(4) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter 70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.

(5) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required in RCW 70.47.060(2)(e).

(6) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered health services, including the description of how those benefits are to be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.

(7) "Board" means the governing board of the Washington health benefit exchange established in chapter 43.71 RCW.

(8)(a) For grandfathered health benefit plans issued before January 1, 2014, and renewed thereafter, "catastrophic health plan" means:

(i) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three thousand five hundred dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by the insurance commissioner; and

(ii) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand five hundred dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least six thousand dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by the insurance commissioner.

(b) In July 2008, and in each July thereafter, the insurance commissioner shall adjust the minimum deductible and out-of-pocket expense required for a plan to qualify as a catastrophic plan to reflect the percentage change in the consumer price index for medical care for a preceding twelve months, as determined by the United States department of labor. For a plan year beginning in 2014, the out-of-pocket limits must be adjusted as specified in section 1302(c)(1) of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended. The adjusted amount shall apply on the following January 1st.

(c) For health benefit plans issued on or after January 1, 2014, "catastrophic health plan" means:

(i) A health benefit plan that meets the definition of catastrophic plan set forth in section 1302(e) of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended; or

(ii) A health benefit plan offered outside the exchange marketplace that requires a calendar year deductible or out-of-pocket expenses under the plan, other than for premiums, for covered benefits, that meets or exceeds the commissioner's annual adjustment under (b) of this subsection.

(9) "Certification" means a determination by a review organization that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided, meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable health benefit plan.

(10) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.

(11) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder, beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health plan.

(12) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse and dependent children who qualify for coverage under the enrollee's health benefit plan.

(13) "Emergency medical condition" means a medical condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe pain, such that a prudent layperson, who possesses an average knowledge of health and medicine, could reasonably expect the absence of immediate medical attention to result in a condition (a) placing the health of the individual, or with respect to a pregnant woman, the health of the woman or her unborn child, in serious jeopardy, (b) serious impairment to bodily functions, or (c) serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.

(14) "Emergency services" means a medical screening examination, as required under section 1867 of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1395dd), that is within the capability of the emergency department of a hospital, including ancillary services routinely available to the emergency department to evaluate that emergency medical condition, and further medical examination and treatment, to the extent they are within the capabilities of the staff and facilities available at the hospital, as are required under section 1867 of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1395dd) to stabilize the patient. Stabilize, with respect to an emergency medical condition, has the meaning given in section 1867(e)(3) of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1395dd(e)(3)).

(15) "Employee" has the same meaning given to the term, as of January 1, 2008, under section 3(6) of the federal employee retirement income security act of 1974.

(16) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to health carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or health care facilities by enrollees and may include copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles.

(17) "Exchange" means the Washington health benefit exchange established under chapter 43.71 RCW.

(18) "Final external review decision" means a determination by an independent review organization at the conclusion of an external review.

(19) "Final internal adverse benefit determination" means an adverse benefit determination that has been upheld by a health plan or carrier at the completion of the internal appeals process, or an adverse benefit determination with respect to which the internal appeals process has been exhausted under the exhaustion rules described in RCW 48.43.530 and 48.43.535.

(20) "Grandfathered health plan" means a group health plan or an individual health plan that under section 1251 of the patient protection and affordable care act, P.L. 111-148 (2010) and as amended by the health care and education reconciliation act, P.L. 111-152 (2010) is not subject to subtitles A or C of the act as amended.

(21) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on behalf of a covered person regarding service delivery issues other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.

(22) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes such facilities if owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state and such other facilities as required by federal law and implementing regulations.

(23) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:

(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this state consistent with state law; or

(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.

(24) "Health care service" means that service offered or provided by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.

(25) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and includes "issuers" as that term is used in the patient protection and affordable care act (P.L. 111-148).

(26) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy, contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange, reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:

(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 or 48.83 RCW;

(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter 48.66 RCW;

(c) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter 55, Title 10, United States Code;

(d) Limited health care services offered by limited health care service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;

(e) Disability income;

(f) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and homeowner guest medical;

(g) Workers' compensation coverage;

(h) Accident only coverage;

(i) Specified disease or illness-triggered fixed payment insurance, hospital confinement fixed payment insurance, or other fixed payment insurance offered as an independent, noncoordinated benefit;

(j) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;

(k) Dental only and vision only coverage;

(l) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a regular full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher education institution, after a written request for such classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance commissioner; and

(m) Civilian health and medical program for the veterans affairs administration (CHAMPVA).

(27) "Individual market" means the market for health insurance coverage offered to individuals other than in connection with a group health plan.

(28) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial value of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than fifteen percent.

(29) "Open enrollment" means a period of time as defined in rule to be held at the same time each year, during which applicants may enroll in a carrier's individual health benefit plan without being subject to health screening or otherwise required to provide evidence of insurability as a condition for enrollment.

(30) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness, or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of coverage.

(31) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy," "contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a health carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.

(32) "Review organization" means a disability insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.

(33) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision, sole proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in business that employed an average of at least one but no more than fifty employees, during the previous calendar year and employed at least one employee on the first day of the plan year, is not formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance, and in which a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the number of employees, companies that are affiliated companies, or that are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of taxation by this state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to the issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for the purpose of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided, a small employer shall continue to be considered a small employer until the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no longer meets the requirements of this definition. A self-employed individual or sole proprietor who is covered as a group of one must also: (a) Have been employed by the same small employer or small group for at least twelve months prior to application for small group coverage, and (b) verify that he or she derived at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade or business through which the individual or sole proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for the previous taxable year, except a self-employed individual or sole proprietor in an agricultural trade or business, must have derived at least fifty-one percent of his or her income from the trade or business through which the individual or sole proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, for the previous taxable year.

(34) "Special enrollment" means a defined period of time of not less than thirty-one days, triggered by a specific qualifying event experienced by the applicant, during which applicants may enroll in the carrier's individual health benefit plan without being subject to health screening or otherwise required to provide evidence of insurability as a condition for enrollment.

(35) "Standard health questionnaire" means the standard health questionnaire designated under chapter 48.41 RCW.

(36) "Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the allocation of health care resources and services of a provider or facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of enrollees.

(37) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an activity consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health service costs.

(38)(a) "Protected individual" means:

(i) An adult covered as a dependent on the enrollee's health benefit plan, including an individual enrolled on the health benefit plan of the individual's registered domestic partner; or

(ii) A minor who may obtain health care without the consent of a parent or legal guardian, pursuant to state or federal law.

(b) "Protected individual" does not include an individual deemed not competent to provide informed consent for care under RCW 11.88.010(1)(e).

(39) "Sensitive health care services" means health services related to reproductive health, sexually transmitted diseases, substance use disorder, gender dysphoria, gender affirming care, domestic violence, and mental health.

Sec. 3. RCW 48.43.505 and 2000 c 5 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Health carriers and insurers shall adopt policies and procedures that conform administrative, business, and operational practices to protect an enrollee's and protected individual's right to privacy or right to confidential health care services granted under state or federal laws.

(2) A health carrier may not require protected individuals to obtain the policyholder, primary subscriber, or other covered person's authorization to receive health care services or to submit a claim if the protected individual has the right to consent to care.

(3) A health carrier must recognize the right of a protected individual or enrollee to exclusively exercise rights granted under this section regarding health information related to care that the enrollee or protected individual has received.

(4) A health carrier or insurer must direct all communication regarding a protected individual's receipt of sensitive health care services directly to the protected individual receiving care, or to a physical or email address or telephone number specified by the protected individual. A carrier or insurer may not disclose nonpublic personal health information concerning sensitive health care services provided to a protected individual to any person, including the policyholder, the primary subscriber, or any plan enrollees other than the protected individual receiving care, without the express written consent or verbal authorization on a recorded telephone line of the protected individual receiving care. Communications subject to this limitation include the following written, verbal, or electronic communications:

(a) Bills and attempts to collect payment;

(b) A notice of adverse benefits determinations;

(c) An explanations of benefits notice;

(d) A carrier's request for additional information regarding a claim;

(e) A notice of a contested claim;

(f) The name and address of a provider, a description of services provided, and other visit information; and

(g) Any written, oral, or electronic communication from a carrier that contains protected health information.

(5) Protected individuals may request that health carrier communications regarding the receipt of sensitive health care services be sent to another individual, including the policyholder, primary subscriber, or a health care provider, for the purposes of appealing adverse benefits determinations.

(6) Health carriers shall:

(a) Limit disclosure of any information, including personal health information, about a protected individual who is the subject of the information and shall direct communications containing such information directly to the protected individual, or to a physical or email address or telephone number specified by the protected individual, if he or she requests such a limitation, regardless of whether the information pertains to sensitive services;

(b) Permit protected individuals to use the form described in section 4(2) of this act and must also allow enrollees and protected individuals to make the request by telephone, email, or the internet;

(c) Ensure that requests for nondisclosure remain in effect until the protected individual revokes or modifies the request in writing;

(d) Limit disclosure of information under this subsection consistent with the protected individual's request; and

(e) Ensure that requests for nondisclosure are implemented no later than three business days after receipt of a request.

(7) Health carriers may not require a protected individual to waive any right to limit disclosure under this section as a condition of eligibility for or coverage under a health benefit plan.

(8) For the protection of patient confidentiality, any communication from a health carrier relating to the provision of health care services, if the communications disclose protected health information, including medical information or provider name and address, relating to receipt of sensitive services, must be provided in the form and format requested by the individual patient receiving care.

(9) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section after considering relevant standards adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations and the national association of insurance commissioners, and after considering the effect of those standards on the ability of carriers to undertake enrollee care management and disease management programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commissioner shall:

(a) Develop a process for the regular collection of information from carriers on requests for confidential communications pursuant to RCW 48.43.505 for the purposes of monitoring compliance, including monitoring:

(i) The effectiveness of the process described in RCW 48.43.505 in allowing protected individuals to redirect insurance communications, the extent to which protected individuals are using the process, and whether the process is working properly; and

(ii) The education and outreach activities conducted by carriers to inform enrollees about their right to confidential communications.

(b) Establish a process for ensuring compliance; and

(c) Develop rules necessary to implement this act.

(2) The commissioner shall work with stakeholders to develop and make available to the public a standardized form that a protected individual may submit to a carrier to make a confidential communications request. At minimum, this form must:

(a) Inform a protected individual about the protected individual's right to confidential communications;

(b) Allow a protected individual to indicate where to redirect communications, including a specified physical or email address or specified telephone number; and

(c) Include a disclaimer that it may take up to three business days from the date of receipt for a carrier to process the form.

Sec. 5. RCW 48.43.510 and 2012 c 211 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A carrier that offers a health plan may not offer to sell a health plan to an enrollee or to any group representative, agent, employer, or enrollee representative without first offering to provide, and providing upon request, the following information before purchase or selection:

(a) A listing of covered benefits, including prescription drug benefits, if any, a copy of the current formulary, if any is used, definitions of terms such as generic versus brand name, and policies regarding coverage of drugs, such as how they become approved or taken off the formulary, and how consumers may be involved in decisions about benefits;

(b) A listing of exclusions, reductions, and limitations to covered benefits, and any definition of medical necessity or other coverage criteria upon which they may be based;

(c) A statement of the carrier's policies for protecting the confidentiality of health information;

(d) A statement of the cost of premiums and any enrollee cost-sharing requirements;

(e) A summary explanation of the carrier's review of adverse benefit determinations and grievance processes;

(f) A statement regarding the availability of a point-of-service option, if any, and how the option operates; and

(g) A convenient means of obtaining lists of participating primary care and specialty care providers, including disclosure of network arrangements that restrict access to providers within any plan network. The offer to provide the information referenced in this subsection (1) must be clearly and prominently displayed on any information provided to any prospective enrollee or to any prospective group representative, agent, employer, or enrollee representative.

(2) Upon the request of any person, including a current enrollee, prospective enrollee, or the insurance commissioner, a carrier must provide written information regarding any health care plan it offers, that includes the following written information:

(a) Any documents, instruments, or other information referred to in the medical coverage agreement;

(b) A full description of the procedures to be followed by an enrollee for consulting a provider other than the primary care provider and whether the enrollee's primary care provider, the carrier's medical director, or another entity must authorize the referral;

(c) Procedures, if any, that an enrollee must first follow for obtaining prior authorization for health care services;

(d) A written description of any reimbursement or payment arrangements, including, but not limited to, capitation provisions, fee-for-service provisions, and health care delivery efficiency provisions, between a carrier and a provider or network;

(e) Descriptions and justifications for provider compensation programs, including any incentives or penalties that are intended to encourage providers to withhold services or minimize or avoid referrals to specialists;

(f) An annual accounting of all payments made by the carrier which have been counted against any payment limitations, visit limitations, or other overall limitations on a person's coverage under a plan; however, the individual requesting an annual accounting may only receive information about that individual's own care, and may not receive information pertaining to protected individuals who have requested confidential communications pursuant to RCW 48.43.505;

(g) A copy of the carrier's review of adverse benefit determinations grievance process for claim or service denial and its grievance process for dissatisfaction with care; and

(h) Accreditation status with one or more national managed care accreditation organizations, and whether the carrier tracks its health care effectiveness performance using the health employer data information set (HEDIS), whether it publicly reports its HEDIS data, and how interested persons can access its HEDIS data.

(3) Each carrier shall provide to all enrollees and prospective enrollees a list of available disclosure items.

(4) Nothing in this section requires a carrier or a health care provider to divulge proprietary information to an enrollee, including the specific contractual terms and conditions between a carrier and a provider.

(5) No carrier may advertise or market any health plan to the public as a plan that covers services that help prevent illness or promote the health of enrollees unless it:

(a) Provides all clinical preventive health services provided by the basic health plan, authorized by chapter 70.47 RCW;

(b) Monitors and reports annually to enrollees on standardized measures of health care and satisfaction of all enrollees in the health plan. The state department of health shall recommend appropriate standardized measures for this purpose, after consideration of national standardized measurement systems adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that purchase managed health care services; and

(c) Makes available upon request to enrollees its integrated plan to identify and manage the most prevalent diseases within its enrolled population, including cancer, heart disease, and stroke.

(6) No carrier may preclude or discourage its providers from informing an enrollee of the care he or she requires, including various treatment options, and whether in the providers' view such care is consistent with the plan's health coverage criteria, or otherwise covered by the enrollee's medical coverage agreement with the carrier. No carrier may prohibit, discourage, or penalize a provider otherwise practicing in compliance with the law from advocating on behalf of an enrollee with a carrier. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a provider to bind a carrier to pay for any service.

(7) No carrier may preclude or discourage enrollees or those paying for their coverage from discussing the comparative merits of different carriers with their providers. This prohibition specifically includes prohibiting or limiting providers participating in those discussions even if critical of a carrier.

(8) Each carrier must communicate enrollee information required in chapter 5, Laws of 2000 by means that ensure that a substantial portion of the enrollee population can make use of the information. Carriers may implement alternative, efficient methods of communication to ensure enrollees have access to information including, but not limited to, web site alerts, postcard mailings, and electronic communication in lieu of printed materials.

(9) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section. In developing rules to implement this section, the commissioner shall consider relevant standards adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that purchase managed health care services, as well as opportunities to reduce administrative costs included in health plans.

Sec. 6. RCW 48.43.530 and 2012 c 211 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each carrier and health plan must have fully operational, comprehensive grievance and appeal processes, and for plans that are not grandfathered, fully operational, comprehensive, and effective grievance and review of adverse benefit determination processes that comply with the requirements of this section and any rules adopted by the commissioner to implement this section. For the purposes of this section, the commissioner must consider applicable grievance and appeal or review of adverse benefit determination process standards adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that purchase managed health care services, and for health plans that are not grandfathered health plans as approved by the United States department of health and human services or the United States department of labor. In the case of coverage offered in connection with a group health plan, if either the carrier or the health plan complies with the requirements of this section and RCW 48.43.535, then the obligation to comply is satisfied for both the carrier and the plan with respect to the health insurance coverage.

(2) Each carrier and health plan must process as a grievance an enrollee's expression of dissatisfaction about customer service or the quality or availability of a health service. Each carrier must implement procedures for registering and responding to oral and written grievances in a timely and thorough manner.

(3) Each carrier and health plan must provide written notice to an enrollee or the enrollee's designated representative, and the enrollee's provider, of its decision to deny, modify, reduce, or terminate payment, coverage, authorization, or provision of health care services or benefits, including the admission to or continued stay in a health care facility. Such notice must be sent directly to a protected individual receiving care when accessing sensitive health care services or when a protected individual has requested confidential communication pursuant to RCW 48.43.505(5).

(4) An enrollee's written or oral request that a carrier reconsider its decision to deny, modify, reduce, or terminate payment, coverage, authorization, or provision of health care services or benefits, including the admission to, or continued stay in, a health care facility must be processed as follows:

(a) When the request is made under a grandfathered health plan, the plan and the carrier must process it as an appeal;

(b) When the request is made under a health plan that is not grandfathered, the plan and the carrier must process it as a review of an adverse benefit determination; and

(c) Neither a carrier nor a health plan, whether grandfathered or not, may require that an enrollee file a complaint or grievance prior to seeking appeal of a decision or review of an adverse benefit determination under this subsection.

(5) To process an appeal, each plan that is not grandfathered and each carrier offering that plan must:

(a) Provide written notice to the enrollee when the appeal is received;

(b) Assist the enrollee with the appeal process;

(c) Make its decision regarding the appeal within thirty days of the date the appeal is received. An appeal must be expedited if the enrollee's provider or the carrier's medical director reasonably determines that following the appeal process response timelines could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's life, health, or ability to regain maximum function. The decision regarding an expedited appeal must be made within seventy-two hours of the date the appeal is received;

(d) Cooperate with a representative authorized in writing by the enrollee;

(e) Consider information submitted by the enrollee;

(f) Investigate and resolve the appeal; and

(g) Provide written notice of its resolution of the appeal to the enrollee and, with the permission of the enrollee, to the enrollee's providers. The written notice must explain the carrier's and health plan's decision and the supporting coverage or clinical reasons and the enrollee's right to request independent review of the carrier's decision under RCW 48.43.535.

(6) Written notice required by subsection (3) of this section must explain:

(a) The carrier's and health plan's decision and the supporting coverage or clinical reasons; and

(b) The carrier's and grandfathered plan's appeal or for plans that are not grandfathered, adverse benefit determination review process, including information, as appropriate, about how to exercise the enrollee's rights to obtain a second opinion, and how to continue receiving services as provided in this section.

(7) When an enrollee requests that the carrier or health plan reconsider its decision to modify, reduce, or terminate an otherwise covered health service that an enrollee is receiving through the health plan and the carrier's or health plan's decision is based upon a finding that the health service, or level of health service, is no longer medically necessary or appropriate, the carrier and health plan must continue to provide that health service until the appeal, or for health plans that are not grandfathered, the review of an adverse benefit determination, is resolved. If the resolution of the appeal, review of an adverse benefit determination, or any review sought by the enrollee under RCW 48.43.535 affirms the carrier's or health plan's decision, the enrollee may be responsible for the cost of this continued health service.

(8) Each carrier and health plan must provide a clear explanation of the grievance and appeal, or for plans that are not grandfathered, the process for review of an adverse benefit determination process upon request, upon enrollment to new enrollees, and annually to enrollees and subcontractors.

(9) Each carrier and health plan must ensure that each grievance, appeal, and for plans that are not grandfathered, grievance and review of adverse benefit determinations, process is accessible to enrollees who are limited English speakers, who have literacy problems, or who have physical or mental disabilities that impede their ability to file a grievance, appeal or review of an adverse benefit determination.

(10)(a) Each plan that is not grandfathered and the carrier that offers it must: Track each appeal until final resolution; maintain, and make accessible to the commissioner for a period of three years, a log of all appeals; and identify and evaluate trends in appeals.

(b) Each grandfathered plan and the carrier that offers it must: Track each review of an adverse benefit determination until final resolution; maintain and make accessible to the commissioner, for a period of six years, a log of all such determinations; and identify and evaluate trends in requests for and resolution of review of adverse benefit determinations.

(11) In complying with this section, plans that are not grandfathered and the carriers offering them must treat a rescission of coverage, whether or not the rescission has an adverse effect on any particular benefit at that time, and any decision to deny coverage in an initial eligibility determination as an adverse benefit determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect January 1, 2020.

--- END ---