BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.38 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall:

(1) Provide an online calendar that provides information on volunteer refreshment and coffee services offered at each safety rest area that provides such a service. The calendar must provide:

(a) The date or dates that a volunteer group is scheduled to participate in the service; and

(b) All dates that a volunteer group is not scheduled to participate in the service; and

(2) Ensure the calendar described in this section is regularly updated to include changes to the participation schedule. The updates must note the date or dates where a volunteer group has canceled its scheduled participation in the service and the date or dates where a volunteer group has scheduled participation in the service that was not previously provided by the lottery process.

--- END ---