BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that state resources have been invested to: (a) Identify model standards for cultural competency; (b) incorporate these cultural competency standards into both the standards for effective teaching and the standards of practice for paraeducators; (c) develop cultural competency training programs for school district staff from paraeducators to administrators; and (d) develop a plan for the creation and delivery of cultural competency training for school board directors and superintendents.

(2) The legislature plans to continue this important work and recognizes the importance of increasing equity, diversity, inclusion, and cultural competency training throughout the entire public schools system by providing a continuum of training materials for classified staff, certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and superintendents that is job-embedded and provided in an ongoing manner.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.345.100 and 2016 c 72 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state school directors' association, in consultation with the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the professional educator standards board, ((the steering committee established in RCW 28A.405.100, and the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, must develop a plan for the creation and delivery of))must develop a recommended list of available equity, diversity, inclusion, and cultural competency training for school board directors ((and superintendents)). The training programs identified must ((also)) include the foundational elements of cultural competence, focusing on multicultural education and principles of English language acquisition, including information regarding best practices to implement the tribal history and culture curriculum. The training programs identified must instruct school board directors on examining school district policies with an equity lens and how to use school district data to identify disproportionate student outcomes. The content of the cultural competency training programs identified must be aligned with the standards for cultural competence developed by the professional educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.270 and training programs identified for equity, diversity, and inclusion must consider various races, ethnicities, religions, disabilities, sexualities, and genders.

(2) Beginning in the 2021-22 school year, the Washington state school directors' association must provide ongoing training to school board members using an equity, diversity, inclusion, and cultural competency training program from the list of recommended trainings created under this section. The training provided must be funded through the use of the association's dues, from nominal fees charged to participants by the association, or a combination of both.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.415.420 and 2016 c 72 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to ((funds appropriated specifically for this))the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the professional educator standards board, colleges of education, and representatives from diverse communities and community-based organizations, must develop a content outline for professional development and training in cultural competence for school staff.

(2) The content of the cultural competence professional development and training must be aligned with the standards developed by the professional educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.270. The training program must also include the foundational elements of cultural competence, focusing on multicultural education and principles of English language acquisition, including information regarding best practices to implement the tribal history and culture curriculum.

(3) The cultural competence professional development and training must contain components that are appropriate for classified school staff and district administrators as well as certificated instructional staff and principals at the building level. The professional development and training must also contain components suitable for delivery by individuals from the local community or community-based organizations with appropriate expertise.

(4) ((The legislature encourages))Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, educational service districts and school districts ((to))must use the cultural competence professional development and training developed under this section ((and))to provide job-embedded, ongoing opportunities for all school and school district staff, from classified staff to the superintendent, to gain knowledge and skills in cultural competence, including in partnership with their local communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28A.415 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning in 2021-22 school year and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, school districts and educational service districts must use equity, diversity, inclusion, and cultural competence training materials from the recommended list developed under section 2 of this act to provide job-embedded, ongoing training opportunities for classified staff, certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and the superintendent.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.150.415 and 2019 c 387 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2018-19 school year, the legislature shall begin phasing in funding for professional learning days for certificated instructional staff. At a minimum, the state must allocate funding for:

(a) One professional learning day in the 2018-19 school year;

(b) Two professional learning days in the 2019-20 school year; and

(c) Three professional learning days in the 2020-21 school year.

(2) Beginning with the 2021-22 school year, any new state funding for professional learning days must be prioritized by school districts to focus first on providing equity, diversity, inclusion, and cultural competence training as established in section 4 of this act.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall calculate each school district's professional learning allocation as provided in subsection (1) of this section separate from the minimum state allocation for salaries as specified in RCW 28A.150.410 and associated fringe benefits on the apportionment reports provided to each school district. The professional learning allocation shall be equal to the proportional increase resulting from adding the professional learning days provided in subsection (1) of this section to the required minimum number of school days in RCW 28A.150.220(5)(a) applied to the school district's minimum state allocation for salaries and associated fringe benefits for certificated instructional staff as specified in the omnibus operating appropriations act. Professional learning allocations shall be included in per-pupil calculations, such as special education, for programs funded on a per-pupil basis.

(((3)))(4) Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(((4)))(5) The professional learning days must meet the definitions and standards provided in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. RCW 28A.657.140 (Cultural competence professional development and training) and 2016 c 72 s 205 are each repealed.

--- END ---