BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The nurse educator incentive grant program is established. The program shall be administered by the college board. In administering the program, the college board shall:

(a) Verify nurse educators who are eligible to participate in the program;

(b) Adopt rules and develop guidelines to administer the program;

(c) Coordinate with the community and technical colleges, professional associations, and the student achievement council to publicize the program, particularly to maximize participation among individuals in shortage areas and among populations expected to experience the greatest growth in the workforce; and

(d) Accept grants and donations from public and private sources for the program.

(2) Nurse educators employed by a Washington state community or technical college are eligible to participate in the program immediately after commencing their employment as a nurse educator for a college.

(3) Each participant is eligible for a maximum benefit amount equal to the total cost of tuition fees for an approved doctorate of nursing program or educational doctorate in nursing leadership.

(4) Incentive grant payments under the program shall begin no later than ninety days after a nurse educator has become a participant. Subject to the rules deemed appropriate by the college board, incentive grant payments shall be made to the participant until:

(a) The maximum benefit amount has been reached; or

(b) The participant becomes ineligible due to discontinued service as a nurse educator on behalf of a Washington state community or technical college.

(5) The college board may provide incentive grants to eligible participants from the funds appropriated for this purpose or from any private or public funds given to the college board for this purpose. Funds appropriated for the program, including reasonable administrative costs, may be used by the college board for the purposes of program administration.

(6) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Nurse educator" means a person who teaches nursing candidates within a nursing program at a state community or technical college.

(b) "Participant" means a nurse educator who has earned a doctorate from an approved program, received an incentive grant, and commenced practice as a nurse educator at a state community or technical college.

(c) "Program" means the nurse educator incentive grant program.

(d) "Tuition fees" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.15.020.

--- END ---