BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.31.545 and 1991 c 319 s 210 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is the lead state agency to assist in establishing and improving markets for recyclable materials generated in the state.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Industrial waste" has the meaning as defined in RCW 82.34.010.

(b) "Materials" means any waste product that may be used in another process;

(c) "Waste heat" means any heat or energy that may be used in another process.

(3)(a) By December 1, 2019, the department shall produce a proposal and recommendations for setting up an industrial waste coordination program and deliver proposals to relevant committees of the legislature. The department shall work with relevant industry stakeholders to assist in development of the proposal and must convene at least two meetings with industry stakeholders prior to producing the proposal.

(b) The proposal in this section must include:

(i) A strategy to develop inventories of industrial waste innovation currently in operation;

(ii) Recommendations regarding data collection for material flows to generate potential industry waste matches and opportunities;

(iii) Guidance and best practices for emerging local industrial resource hubs; and

(iv) Recommendations regarding performance metrics to track results of industrial or commercial hubs that measure the economic and environmental outcomes.

(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may:

(a) Make loans or grants for the development, demonstration, and deployment of projects that encourage and enhance projects to create a cooperative use of waste heat and materials;

(b) Develop a method for and criteria for the allocation of loans and grants and a provision for technical assistance.

--- END ---