BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.09.080 and 2012 c 257 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person subjected to restricted liberty as a sexually violent predator pursuant to this chapter shall not forfeit any legal right or suffer any legal disability as a consequence of any actions taken or orders made, other than as specifically provided in this chapter, or as otherwise authorized by law.

(2)(a) Any person committed or detained pursuant to this chapter shall be prohibited from possessing or accessing a personal computer if the resident's individualized treatment plan states that access to a computer is harmful to bringing about a positive response to a specific and certain phase or course of treatment.

(b) A person who is prohibited from possessing or accessing a personal computer under (a) of this subsection shall be permitted to access a limited functioning personal computer capable of word processing and limited data storage on the computer only that does not have: (i) Internet access capability; (ii) an optical drive, external drive, universal serial bus port, or similar drive capability; or (iii) the capability to display photographs, images, videos, or motion pictures, or similar display capability from any drive or port capability listed under (b)(ii) of this subsection.

(3) Any person committed pursuant to this chapter has the right to adequate care and individualized treatment, including an individualized discharge plan. The department of social and health services shall keep records detailing all medical, expert, and professional care and treatment received by a committed person, and shall keep copies of all reports of periodic examinations made pursuant to this chapter. All such records and reports shall be made available upon request only to: The committed person, his or her attorney, the prosecuting agency, the court, the protection and advocacy agency, or another expert or professional person who, upon proper showing, demonstrates a need for access to such records.

(4) At the time a person is taken into custody or transferred into a facility pursuant to a petition under this chapter, the professional person in charge of such facility or his or her designee shall take reasonable precautions to inventory and safeguard the personal property of the persons detained or transferred. A copy of the inventory, signed by the staff member making it, shall be given to the person detained and shall, in addition, be open to inspection to any responsible relative, subject to limitations, if any, specifically imposed by the detained person. For purposes of this subsection, "responsible relative" includes the guardian, conservator, attorney, spouse, parent, adult child, or adult brother or sister of the person. The facility shall not disclose the contents of the inventory to any other person without consent of the patient or order of the court.

(5) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person presently committed from exercising a right presently available to him or her for the purpose of obtaining release from confinement, including the right to petition for a writ of habeas corpus.

(6) No indigent person may be conditionally released or unconditionally discharged under this chapter without suitable clothing, and the secretary shall furnish the person with such sum of money as is required by RCW 72.02.100 for persons without ample funds who are released from correctional institutions. As funds are available, the secretary may provide payment to the indigent persons conditionally released pursuant to this chapter consistent with the optional provisions of RCW 72.02.100 and 72.02.110, and may adopt rules to do so.

(7) If a civil commitment petition is dismissed, or a trier of fact determines that a person does not meet civil commitment criteria, the person shall be released within twenty-four hours of service of the release order on the superintendent of the special commitment center, or later by agreement of the person who is the subject of the petition.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.09.090 and 2018 c 131 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so changed that either: (a) The person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, the secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court and served upon the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment. The court, upon receipt of the petition for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge, shall within forty-five days order a hearing.

(2)(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person from otherwise petitioning the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge without the secretary's approval. The secretary shall provide the committed person with an annual written notice of the person's right to petition the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The notice shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall file the notice and waiver form and the annual report with the court. If the person does not affirmatively waive the right to petition, the court shall set a show cause hearing to determine whether probable cause exists to warrant a hearing on whether the person's condition has so changed that: (i) He or she no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (ii) conditional release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.

(b)(i) The committed person shall have a right to have an attorney represent him or her at the show cause hearing, which may be conducted solely on the basis of affidavits or declarations, but the person is not entitled to be present at the show cause hearing. At the show cause hearing, the prosecuting agency shall present prima facie evidence establishing: (A) That the committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator; and (B) that a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the community.

(ii)(A) If the state produces prima facie evidence that the committed person continues to be a sexually violent predator, then the state's burden under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection is met and an unconditional release trial may not be ordered unless the committed person produces evidence satisfying: Subsection (((4)))(5)(a) of this section; and subsection (((4)))(5)(b) (i) or (ii) of this section.

(B) If the state produces prima facie evidence that a less restrictive alternative is not appropriate for the committed person, then the state's burden under (b)(i)(B) of this subsection is met, and a conditional release trial may not be ordered unless the committed person:

(I) Produces evidence satisfying: Subsection (((4)))(5)(a) of this section; and subsection (((4)))(5)(b) (i) or (ii) of this section; ((and))

(II) Presents the court with a specific placement satisfying the requirements of RCW 71.09.092; and

(III) If the placement includes a residence outside the county of commitment, presents the court with documentation of his or her efforts to secure an appropriate residential placement meeting the requirements of RCW 71.09.092 within the county of commitment.

(iii) In making the showing required under (b)(i) of this subsection, the state may rely exclusively upon the annual report prepared pursuant to RCW 71.09.070. The committed person may present responsive affidavits or declarations to which the state may reply.

(c) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that either: (i) The state has failed to present prima facie evidence that the committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator and that no proposed less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that would adequately protect the community; or (ii) probable cause exists to believe that the person's condition has so changed that: (A) The person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (B) release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community, then the court shall set a hearing on either or both issues. If conditional release will be considered at the hearing, the court must provide notice of the hearing and a copy of the proposed placement plan to the department.

(d) If the court has not previously considered the issue of release to a less restrictive alternative, either through a trial on the merits or through the procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), the court shall consider whether release to a less restrictive alternative would be in the best interests of the person and conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community, without considering whether the person's condition has changed. The court may not find probable cause for a trial addressing less restrictive alternatives unless a proposed less restrictive alternative placement meeting the conditions of RCW 71.09.092 is presented to the court at the show cause hearing.

(3) If a hearing is set on the issue of a committed person's conditional release to a less restrictive alternative, either upon petition following the secretary's authorization under subsection (1) of this section or following a show cause hearing under subsection (2) of this section, the department must review the committed person's proposed less restrictive alternative placement plan and provide a report for the court's review. The report must be filed with the court and served on the parties at least fourteen days before the scheduled hearing. At a minimum, the report must contain the following:

(a) Based on the committed person's record and other information known to the department, the department must provide an assessment as to the appropriateness of the placement plan proposed by the committed person and any recommendations for specific conditions of release that are in the best interest of the person and that are necessary to adequately protect the community; and

(b) If the committed person has proposed a less restrictive placement plan that includes a residence outside of the county of commitment, the department must investigate and report on whether or not an appropriate placement in the county of commitment is available. If the department's conclusion is that an appropriate placement in the county of commitment is not available due to lack of treatment providers, available housing, or other factors, the department must investigate and report on whether or not an appropriate placement in a county other than the county proposed by the committed person is available. If the department is unable to identify an appropriate placement in the county of commitment or a county other than the county of residence proposed by the committed person, the report must contain an explanation as to its reasoning in coming to this conclusion. The explanation must detail all efforts to find alternative treatment providers and residential placement options and other inquiries conducted as to alternative placements.

(4)(a) At the hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the committed person shall be entitled to be present and to the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to the person at the initial commitment proceeding. The prosecuting agency shall represent the state and shall have a right to a jury trial and to have the committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state. The prosecuting agency shall have a right to a current evaluation of the person by experts chosen by the state. The judge may require the person to complete any or all of the following procedures or tests if requested by the evaluator: (i) A clinical interview; (ii) psychological testing; (iii) plethysmograph testing; and (iv) polygraph testing. The judge may order the person to complete any other procedures and tests relevant to the evaluation. The state is responsible for the costs of the evaluation. The committed person shall also have the right to a jury trial and the right to have experts evaluate him or her on his or her behalf and the court shall appoint an expert if the person is indigent and requests an appointment.

(b) Whenever any indigent person is subjected to an evaluation under (a) of this subsection, the office of public defense is responsible for the cost of one expert or professional person conducting an evaluation on the person's behalf. When the person wishes to be evaluated by a qualified expert or professional person of his or her own choice, such expert or professional person must be permitted to have reasonable access to the person for the purpose of such evaluation, as well as to all relevant medical and psychological records and reports. In the case of a person who is indigent, the court shall, upon the person's request, assist the person in obtaining an expert or professional person to perform an evaluation or participate in the hearing on the person's behalf. Nothing in this chapter precludes the person from paying for additional expert services at his or her own expense.

(c) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be unconditionally discharged, the burden of proof shall be upon the state to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person's condition remains such that the person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator. Evidence of the prior commitment trial and disposition is admissible. The recommitment proceeding shall otherwise proceed as set forth in RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060.

(d) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, the burden of proof at the hearing shall be upon the state to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that conditional release to any proposed less restrictive alternative either: (i) Is not in the best interest of the committed person; or (ii) does not include conditions that would adequately protect the community. Evidence of the prior commitment trial and disposition is admissible.

(((4)))(5)(a) Probable cause exists to believe that a person's condition has "so changed," under subsection (2) of this section, only when evidence exists, since the person's last commitment trial, or less restrictive alternative revocation proceeding, of a substantial change in the person's physical or mental condition such that the person either no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator or that a conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the person's best interest and conditions can be imposed to adequately protect the community.

(b) A new trial proceeding under subsection (((3)))(4) of this section may be ordered, or a trial proceeding may be held, only when there is current evidence from a licensed professional of one of the following and the evidence presents a change in condition since the person's last commitment trial proceeding:

(i) An identified physiological change to the person, such as paralysis, stroke, or dementia, that renders the committed person unable to commit a sexually violent act and this change is permanent; or

(ii) A change in the person's mental condition brought about through positive response to continuing participation in treatment which indicates that the person meets the standard for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or that the person would be safe to be at large if unconditionally released from commitment.

(c) For purposes of this section, a change in a single demographic factor, without more, does not establish probable cause for a new trial proceeding under subsection (((3)))(4) of this section. As used in this section, a single demographic factor includes, but is not limited to, a change in the chronological age, marital status, or gender of the committed person.

(((5)))(6) The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly committed pursuant to this chapter continues until such time as the person is unconditionally discharged.

(((6)))(7) During any period of confinement pursuant to a criminal conviction, or for any period of detention awaiting trial on criminal charges, this section is suspended.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.09.092 and 2009 c 409 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Before the court may enter an order directing conditional release to a less restrictive alternative, it must find the following: (1) The person will be treated by a treatment provider who is qualified to provide such treatment in the state of Washington under chapter 18.155 RCW; (2) the treatment provider has presented a specific course of treatment and has agreed to assume responsibility for such treatment and will report progress to the court on a regular basis, and will report violations immediately to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special commitment center; (3) housing exists in Washington that is sufficiently secure to protect the community, and the person or agency providing housing to the conditionally released person has agreed in writing to accept the person, to provide the level of security required by the court, and immediately to report to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special commitment center if the person leaves the housing to which he or she has been assigned without authorization; (4) if the person has been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of an offense with a victim under the age of eighteen, the housing proposed in subsection (3) of this section is not within one-quarter mile of any public or private school providing instruction to kindergarten or any of grades one through twelve; (5) if proposed housing is outside of the county of commitment, a documented effort was made to find an appropriate residential placement in the county of commitment; (6) the person is willing to comply with the treatment provider and all requirements imposed by the treatment provider and by the court; and (((5)))(7) the person will be under the supervision of the department of corrections and is willing to comply with supervision requirements imposed by the department of corrections.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.09.096 and 2015 c 278 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the court or jury determines that conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and includes conditions that would adequately protect the community, and the court determines that the minimum conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092 and in this section are met, the court shall enter judgment and direct a conditional release.

(2) The court shall impose any additional conditions necessary to ensure compliance with treatment and to protect the community. If the court finds that conditions do not exist that will both ensure the person's compliance with treatment and protect the community, then the person shall be remanded to the custody of the department of social and health services for control, care, and treatment in a secure facility as designated in RCW 71.09.060(1).

(3) If the service provider designated by the court to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment or to monitor or supervise any other terms and conditions of a person's placement in a less restrictive alternative is other than the department of social and health services or the department of corrections, then the service provider so designated must agree in writing to provide such treatment, monitoring, or supervision in accord with this section. Any person providing or agreeing to provide treatment, monitoring, or supervision services pursuant to this chapter may be compelled to testify and any privilege with regard to such person's testimony is deemed waived.

(4) Prior to authorizing any release to a less restrictive alternative, the court shall impose such conditions upon the person as are necessary to ensure the safety of the community. The court shall consider any conditions proposed by the department under RCW 71.09.090(3). The court shall additionally order the department of corrections to investigate the less restrictive alternative and recommend any additional conditions to the court. These conditions shall include, but are not limited to the following: Specification of residence, prohibition of contact with potential or past victims, prohibition of alcohol and other drug use, participation in a specific course of inpatient or outpatient treatment that may include monitoring by the use of polygraph and plethysmograph, monitoring through the use of global positioning ((satellite [global positioning system]))system technology, supervision by a department of corrections community corrections officer, a requirement that the person remain within the state unless the person receives prior authorization by the court, and any other conditions that the court determines are in the best interest of the person or others. A copy of the conditions of release shall be given to the person and to any designated service providers.

(5)(a) Prior to authorizing release to a less restrictive alternative, the court shall consider whether it is appropriate to release the person to the person's county of commitment. In making its determination, the court must consider the report and any alternative placements proposed by the department under RCW 71.09.090(3). To ensure equitable distribution of releases, and prevent the disproportionate grouping of persons subject to less restrictive orders in any one county, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a county, the legislature finds it is appropriate for releases to a less restrictive alternative to occur in the person's county of commitment, unless the court determines that the person's return to his or her county of commitment would be inappropriate ((considering))based on consideration of: Any court-issued protection orders, victim safety concerns that cannot be addressed by ordering the use of global positioning system technology, the ((availability))unavailability of appropriate treatment or facilities that would adequately protect the community, negative influences on the person, ((or))and the location of family or other persons or organizations offering support to the person. If the court authorizes conditional release to a county other than the county of commitment, the court shall enter specific findings concerning the decision.

(b) If a proposed placement plan includes a residence in a county other than the county of commitment, the state shall serve written notice of the plan on the county prosecuting attorney of the proposed county of residence at least ten days before the hearing authorizing less restrictive placement. The county prosecuting attorney may file an objection with the court no fewer than five days prior to the court's final approval of the placement. The court must consider the county prosecutor's objection prior to approving the placement.

(c) When the department ((or court)) assists in developing a less restrictive alternative placement under this section ((which is outside of the county of commitment, and there are two or more options for placement,)) it shall attempt to identify an appropriate placement in the committed person's county of commitment. If such placement is not available, it shall endeavor to develop the placement in a manner that does not have a disproportionate effect on a single county and document its rationale for the placement chosen.

(((b)))(d) If the committed person is not conditionally released to his or her county of commitment, the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county in which the person is conditionally released with notice and a written explanation.

(((c)))(e) For purposes of this section, the person's county of commitment means the county of the court which ordered the person's commitment.

(((d)))(f) This subsection (5) does not apply to releases to a secure community transition facility under RCW 71.09.250.

(6) Any service provider designated to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment shall monthly, or as otherwise directed by the court, submit to the court, to the department of social and health services facility from which the person was released, to the prosecuting agency, and to the supervising community corrections officer, a report stating whether the person is complying with the terms and conditions of the conditional release to a less restrictive alternative.

(7) Each person released to a less restrictive alternative shall have his or her case reviewed by the court that released him or her no later than one year after such release and annually thereafter until the person is unconditionally discharged. Review may occur in a shorter time or more frequently, if the court, in its discretion on its own motion, or on motion of the person, the secretary, or the prosecuting agency so determines. The sole question to be determined by the court is whether the person shall continue to be conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative. The court in making its determination shall be aided by the periodic reports filed pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and the opinions of the secretary and other experts or professional persons.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.09.140 and 2012 c 257 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the earliest possible date, and in no event later than thirty days before conditional release, change of address for a person on conditional release, or unconditional discharge, except in the event of escape, the department of social and health services shall send written notice of conditional release, change of address, unconditional discharge, or escape, to the following:

(a) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person will reside or in which placement will be made under a less restrictive alternative;

(b) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside or in which placement will be made under a less restrictive alternative; and

(c) The sheriff of the county where the person was last convicted of a sexually violent offense, if the department does not know where the person will reside.

The department shall notify the state patrol of the release of all sexually violent predators and that information shall be placed in the Washington crime information center for dissemination to all law enforcement.

(2) The same notice as required by subsection (1) of this section shall be sent to the following if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific person found to be a sexually violent predator under this chapter:

(a) The victim or victims of any sexually violent offenses for which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. "Next of kin" as used in this section means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and children;

(b) Any witnesses who testified against the person in his or her commitment trial under RCW 71.09.060; and

(c) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting agency.

Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting agency to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available to the committed person.

(3) If a person committed as a sexually violent predator under this chapter escapes from a department of social and health services facility, the department shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the committed person resided immediately before his or her commitment as a sexually violent predator, or immediately before his or her incarceration for his or her most recent offense. If previously requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and the victims of the sexually violent offenses for which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. If the person is recaptured, the department shall send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working days after the department learns of such recapture.

(4) If the victim or victims of any sexually violent offenses for which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.

(5) The department of social and health services shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last address provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department with a current address.

(6) Nothing in this section shall impose any liability upon a chief of police of a city or sheriff of a county for failing to request in writing a notice as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.09.250 and 2003 c 216 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The secretary is authorized to site, construct, occupy, and operate (i) a secure community transition facility on McNeil Island for persons authorized to petition for a less restrictive alternative under RCW 71.09.090(1) and who are conditionally released; and (ii) a special commitment center on McNeil Island with up to four hundred four beds as a total confinement facility under this chapter, subject to appropriated funding for those purposes. The secure community transition facility shall be authorized for the number of beds needed to ensure compliance with the orders of the superior courts under this chapter and the federal district court for the western district of Washington. The total number of beds in the secure community transition facility shall be limited to twenty-four, consisting of up to fifteen transitional beds and up to nine pretransitional beds. The residents occupying the transitional beds shall be the only residents eligible for transitional services occurring in Pierce county. In no event shall more than fifteen residents of the secure community transition facility be participating in off-island transitional, educational, or employment activity at the same time in Pierce county. The department shall provide the Pierce county sheriff, or his or her designee, with a list of the fifteen residents so designated, along with their photographs and physical descriptions, and the list shall be immediately updated whenever a residential change occurs. The Pierce county sheriff, or his or her designee, shall be provided an opportunity to confirm the residential status of each resident leaving McNeil Island.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "transitional beds" means beds only for residents who are judged by a qualified expert to be suitable to leave the island for treatment, education, and employment.

(2)(a) The secretary is authorized to site, either within the secure community transition facility established pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section, or within the special commitment center, up to nine pretransitional beds.

(b) Residents assigned to pretransitional beds shall not be permitted to leave McNeil Island for education, employment, treatment, or community activities in Pierce county.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "pretransitional beds" means beds for residents whose progress toward a less secure residential environment and transition into more complete community involvement is projected to take substantially longer than a typical resident of the special commitment center.

(3) Notwithstanding RCW 36.70A.103 or any other law, this statute preempts and supersedes local plans, development regulations, permitting requirements, inspection requirements, and all other laws as necessary to enable the secretary to site, construct, occupy, and operate a secure community transition facility on McNeil Island and a total confinement facility on McNeil Island.

(4) To the greatest extent possible, until June 30, 2003, persons who were not civilly committed from the county in which the secure community transition facility established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is located may not be conditionally released to a setting in that same county less restrictive than that facility.

(5) As of June 26, 2001, the state shall immediately cease any efforts in effect on such date to site secure community transition facilities, other than the facility authorized by subsection (1) of this section, and shall instead site such facilities in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(6) The department must:

(a) Identify the minimum and maximum number of secure community transition facility beds in addition to the facility established under subsection (1) of this section that may be necessary for the period of May 2004 through May 2007 and provide notice of these numbers to all counties by August 31, 2001; and

(b) Develop and publish policy guidelines for the siting and operation of secure community transition facilities.

(7)(a) The total number of secure community transition facility beds that may be required to be sited in a county between June 26, 2001, and June 30, 2008, may be no greater than the total number of persons civilly committed from that county, or detained at the special commitment center under a pending civil commitment petition from that county where a finding of probable cause had been made on April 1, 2001. The total number of secure community transition facility beds required to be sited in each county between July 1, 2008, and June 30, 2015, may be no greater than the total number of persons civilly committed from that county or detained at the special commitment center under a pending civil commitment petition from that county where a finding of probable cause had been made as of July 1, 2008.

(b) Counties and cities that provide secure community transition facility beds above the maximum number that they could be required to site under this subsection are eligible for a bonus grant under the incentive provisions in RCW 71.09.255. The county where the special commitment center is located shall receive this bonus grant for the number of beds in the facility established in subsection (1) of this section in excess of the maximum number established by this subsection.

(c) No secure community transition facilities in addition to the one established in subsection (1) of this section may be required to be sited in the county where the special commitment center is located until after June 30, 2008, provided however, that the county and its cities may elect to site additional secure community transition facilities and shall be eligible under the incentive provisions of RCW 71.09.255 for any additional facilities meeting the requirements of that section.

(8) The state is authorized to site and operate secure community transition facilities in any county in the state. In identifying potential counties within which to site a secure community transition facility, and in identifying sites within a county for the location of a secure community transition facility, the department shall work with and assist local governments to provide for the equitable distribution of such facilities. In coordinating and deciding upon the siting of a secure community transition ((facilities))facility within a county, great weight shall be given by the county and cities within the county to:

(a) The number and location of existing residential facility beds operated by the department of corrections or the mental health division of the department of social and health services in each jurisdiction in the county; and

(b) The number of registered sex offenders classified as level II or level III and the number of sex offenders registered as homeless residing in each jurisdiction in the county.

(9)(a) "Equitable distribution" means siting or locating secure community transition facilities in a manner that will not cause a disproportionate grouping of similar facilities either in any one county, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a county, as relevant; and

(b) "Jurisdiction" means a city, town, or geographic area of a county in which distinct political or judicial authority may be exercised.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

To facilitate the equitable geographic distribution of conditional releases under this chapter, the department shall notify the secretary of health, or the secretary's designee, whenever a sex offender treatment provider in an underserved county has been contracted to provide treatment services to persons on conditional release under this chapter, in which case the secretary of health shall waive any fees for the initial issue, renewal, and reissuance of a credential for the provider under chapter 18.155 RCW. An underserved county is any county identified by the department as having an inadequate supply of qualified sex offender treatment providers to achieve equitable geographic distribution of conditional releases under this chapter.

--- END ---