BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the goal of the motion picture competitiveness program is to provide an economic development tool for rebuilding motion picture and associated creative industries' infrastructure by attracting producers who will support the development of a strong and diverse motion picture industry.

The legislature further finds that an evaluation of this tool is necessary to ensure that local producers have equity of access to industry opportunities and to ensure that the motion picture competitiveness program is achieving the desired result for the people of the state.

Therefore, the legislature intends to create a joint task force to study the motion picture competitiveness program's progress as an economic development tool that facilitates equal opportunities for producers in motion picture industries and develops an infrastructure that supports motion picture, video, and media production and postproduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)(a) A joint legislative task force on motion picture competitiveness is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) The president of the senate must appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives must appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly must appoint six members representing the interests of motion picture, video, and media production and associated creative industries, including postproduction.

(iv) The task force must include diverse, statewide representation and its membership must reflect regional, racial, and cultural diversity.

(b) The task force must choose its cochairs from among its membership. The legislative members must convene the initial meeting of the task force.

(2) The task force must:

(a) Evaluate data on motion picture competitiveness program funding assistance recipients to identify trends that may affect equity of access to funding assistance;

(b) Develop practices that will promote equity of access to funding assistance;

(c) Make recommendations to the legislature regarding policies to improve the motion picture competitiveness program.

(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(4) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(7) This section expires December 1, 2020.

--- END ---