BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature of the state of Washington acknowledges that the Peace Arch Historical State Park is a unique nineteen acre park that lies on the boundary between the United States and Canada. The sixty-seven foot concrete peace arch was constructed in 1921 to honor the centennial of the treaties resulting from the War of 1812. The peace arch was the first arch in the United States to be dedicated to peace and is still one of very few in the world. Located on the border in Blaine, Washington, the peace arch monument serves as an important symbol of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

The peace arch is hereby designated as the official peace monument of the state of Washington.

--- END ---