BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.920 and 2018 c 7 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state patrol shall establish and administer a bump-fire stock buy-back program to allow a person in possession of a bump-fire stock to relinquish the device to the Washington state patrol ((or a participating local law enforcement agency)) in exchange for a monetary payment established under this section. The Washington state patrol shall adopt rules to implement the bump-fire stock buy-back program according to the following standards:

(a) The buy-back program must be implemented between July 1, 2018, and June 30, 2019, at locations in regions throughout the state.

(b) The buy-back program must allow ((an individual))a Washington resident to relinquish ((a))up to five bump-fire stocks((to the Washington state patrol or a local law enforcement agency participating in the program))as provided in subsection (2) of this section in exchange for a monetary payment of one hundred fifty dollars. ((The Washington state patrol shall coordinate with local law enforcement agencies in implementing the program.))

(c) The Washington state patrol shall establish the method for providing the monetary ((payment and reimbursing a participating law enforcement agency for)) payments made to individuals under the buy-back program.

(d) The buy-back program is subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose. This section does not create a right or entitlement in a person to receive a monetary payment under the buy-back program. The program must be operated on a first-come, first-served basis and no payments may be made that would require the Washington state patrol to exceed the amount appropriated in section 2 of this act.

(e) The Washington state patrol ((and participating law enforcement agencies)) shall establish guidelines for the destruction or other disposition of bump-fire stocks relinquished under this section.

(2) A Washington resident may obtain payment for relinquishing up to five bump-fire stocks by taking one of the following actions:

(a) By relinquishing an operable or inoperable bump-fire stock to the Washington state patrol before the effective date of any federal law or rule that prohibits possession of bump-fire stocks or June 30, 2019, whichever is earlier; or

(b) No later than June 30, 2019, by providing the Washington state patrol with a receipt or statement from the federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives that a bump-fire stock was relinquished to the agency before the effective date of any federal law or rule that prohibits possession of bump-fire stocks.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2019, from the general fund to the Washington state patrol for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---