BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.06.030 and 1981 c 338 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

For a gubernatorial appointment to be effective, the governor must:

(1) Use a background check to screen the appointee in a uniform and timely manner to verify that the appointee does not have a history that would disqualify the appointee. At a minimum, the background check must include a name and date of birth check for a conviction record, as defined in RCW 10.97.030; and

(2) Transmit to the secretary of the senate notice of the appointment, along with pertinent information regarding the appointee, within fourteen days after making any appointment subject to senate confirmation. Pertinent information must include, but is not limited to, verification that a background check has been completed under subsection (1) of this section. If the applicant has a conviction record or if the screening reveals other information that was considered as part of the appointment, the office of the governor must make that information available to the senate for consideration.

--- END ---