BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.272 (Tax on warehousing and reselling prescription drugs) and 2013 c 19 s 127, 2003 c 168 s 401, & 1998 c 343 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

By January 1, 2020, and by January 1st of each year thereafter, the department must estimate the increase to the general fund due to the elimination of the tax preference in RCW 82.04.272 for the current biennium and two subsequent biennia. The department must notify the appropriate legislative fiscal committees of the amount determined by the department under this section. The state omnibus appropriations act must separately appropriate the amount determined under this section specifically for opioid abuse treatment services in rural and high need areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2019.

--- END ---