BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

Narrowing the Nonresident Sales and Use Tax Exemption

Sec. 101. RCW 82.08.0273 and 2014 c 140 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to))Subject to the conditions and limitations in this section, an exemption from the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 in the form of a remittance from the department is provided for sales to nonresidents of this state of tangible personal property, digital goods, and digital codes((, when)). The exemption only applies if:

(a) The property is for use outside this state;

(b) The purchaser is a bona fide resident of a province or territory of Canada or a state, territory, or possession of the United States, other than the state of Washington; and

(i) Such state, possession, territory, or province does not impose, or have imposed on its behalf, a generally applicable retail sales tax, use tax, value added tax, gross receipts tax on retailing activities, or similar generally applicable tax, of three percent or more; or

(ii) If imposing a tax described in (b)(i) of this subsection, provides an exemption for sales to Washington residents by reason of their residence; and

(c) The purchaser agrees, when requested, to grant the department of revenue access to such records and other forms of verification at ((his or her))the purchaser's place of residence to assure that such purchases are not first used substantially in the state of Washington.

(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if parts or other tangible personal property are installed by the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a separate charge for the tangible personal property, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the separately stated charge to a nonresident purchaser for the tangible personal property but only if the seller certifies in writing to the purchaser that the separately stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current publicly stated retail price for the tangible personal property or, if no publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the tangible personal property. However, the exemption provided by this section does not apply if tangible personal property is installed by the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a single nonitemized charge for providing the tangible personal property and service. All of the ((requirements))provisions in subsections (1) and (3) through (((6)))(7) of this section apply to this subsection.

(3)(a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under the provisions of this section must ((display proof of his or her current nonresident status as provided in this section))pay the state and local sales tax to the seller at the time of purchase and then request a remittance from the department in accordance with this subsection and subsection (4) of this section. A request for remittance must include proof of the person's status as a nonresident at the time of the purchase for which a remittance is requested. The request for a remittance must also include any additional information and documentation as required by the department, which may include a description of the item purchased for which a remittance is requested, the sales price of the item, the amount of sales tax paid on the item, the date of the purchase, the name of the seller and the physical address where the sale took place, and copies of sales receipts showing the qualified purchases.

(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status includes one piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid identification card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection (3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state jurisdiction.

(((c) In lieu of furnishing proof of a person's nonresident status under (b) of this subsection (3), a person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under the provisions of this section may provide the seller with an exemption certificate in compliance with subsection (4)(b) of this section.))

(4)(a) ((Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales tax, the vendor must examine the purchaser's proof of nonresidence, determine whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (3)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale which must show the type of proof accepted, including any identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if any.

(b) In lieu of using the method provided in (a) of this subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may accept from the purchaser a properly completed uniform exemption certificate approved by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement governing board or any other exemption certificate as may be authorized by the department and properly completed by the purchaser. A nonresident purchaser who uses an exemption certificate authorized in this subsection (4)(b) must include the purchaser's driver's license number or other state-issued identification number and the state of issuance.

(c) In lieu of using the methods provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements, which includes the offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the tax due on such purchases.

(6)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax and who fails to maintain records of sales to nonresidents as provided in this section is personally liable for the amount of tax due.

(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the purchaser and the vendor are liable for any penalties and interest assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW.

(7)))(i) Beginning January 1, 2020, through December 31, 2020, a person may request a remittance from the department for state sales taxes paid by the person on qualified retail purchases made in Washington between July 1, 2019, and December 31, 2019.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2021, a person may request a remittance from the department during any calendar year for state sales taxes paid by the person on qualified retail purchases made in Washington during the immediately preceding calendar year only. No application may be made with respect to purchases made before the immediately preceding calendar year.

(b) The remittance request, including proof of nonresident status and any other documentation and information required by the department, must be provided in a form and manner as prescribed by the department. Only one remittance request may be made by a person per calendar year.

(c) The total amount of a remittance request must be at least twenty-five dollars. The department must deny any request for a remittance that is less than twenty-five dollars.

(d) The department will examine the applicant's proof of nonresident status and any other documentation and information as required in the application to determine whether the applicant is entitled to a remittance under this section.

(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements to the department, which includes the offer of fraudulent or fraudulently procured identification or fraudulent sales receipts, in order to receive a remittance of retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW and is ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(b) Any person obtaining a remittance of retail sales tax from the department by providing proof of identification or sales receipts not the person's own, or counterfeit identification or sales receipts is (i) liable for repayment of the remittance, including interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW from the date the remittance was transmitted to the person until repaid in full, (ii) liable for a civil penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the amount of the remittance obtained in violation of this subsection (5)(b), and (iii) ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(c) Any person assisting another person in obtaining a remittance of retail sales tax in violation of (b) of this subsection is jointly and severally liable for amounts due under (b) of this subsection and is also ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(6) A person who receives a refund of sales tax from the seller for any reason with respect to a purchase made in this state is not entitled to a remittance for the tax paid on the purchase. A person who receives both a remittance under this section and a refund of sales tax from the seller with respect to the same purchase must immediately repay the remittance to the department. Interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW applies to amounts due under this section from the date that the department made the remittance until the amount due under this subsection is paid to the department. A person who receives a remittance with respect to a purchase for which the person had, at the time the person submitted the application for a remittance, already received a refund of sales tax from the seller is also liable for a civil penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the amount of the remittance obtained in violation of this subsection and is ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(7) The exemption provided by this section is only for the state portion of the sales tax. For purposes of this section, the state portion of the sales tax is not reduced by any local sales tax that is deducted or credited against the state sales tax as provided by law.

(8) The exemption in this section does not apply to sales of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

PART II

Creating a Deferred Finding Program for Nonpayment of License Fees and Taxes for Vehicle, Vessel, and Aircraft Registration

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. (1) The legislature finds that counties that border other states and Canada experience a significant problem of residents of Washington state who evade taxes and fees by failing to register their vehicles, aircraft, and vessels in Washington state. According to a 2007 Washington State University study, the department of revenue lost eighty million dollars over the previous five years to persons avoiding taxes and fees in this manner. It was also estimated in the study that twenty thousand vehicles were illegally registered in Oregon to residents of Clark county, Washington. The problem has undoubtedly grown worse in the decade since the study was completed resulting in hundreds of millions of dollars in lost revenue to state and local coffers as these new residents fail to pay their fair share for public services. Moreover, a public safety risk is created when inaccurate information is provided to law enforcement or insurance companies in the event of an accident or infraction.

(2) Current statutes contain monetarily significant penalties that are appropriate given the scope of the harm. It is the intent of the legislature that law enforcement and prosecutors proceed against violators to the fullest extent of the law. In order to give them more tools and ensure compliance with the law, it is the intent of the legislature to set up a deferred finding program consistent with other programs in the state that allows defendants to obtain dismissal of charges if they take certain remedial steps. It is the intent of the legislature that the punishment for those who do not comply with the deferred finding program remain in force and be fully implemented.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. A new section is added to chapter 10.05 RCW to read as follows:

Any county may set up a deferred finding program for persons who receive a citation for failing to register a vehicle under RCW 46.16A.030, an aircraft under RCW 47.68.255, or a vessel under RCW 88.02.400. Upon receipt of proof satisfactory to the prosecuting attorney's office with jurisdiction over the offense, which shall include payment of a five hundred dollar fine, that the person cited has a valid Washington state driver's license, and that the person cited has registered the vehicle, aircraft, or vessel that was the subject of the citation in Washington state, the citation must be dismissed. If receipt of proof does not occur within ninety days of the citation, the prosecuting attorney must seek the full penalty available for the citation. Fines generated pursuant to this program shall be used by the county for the purpose of enforcement and prosecution of registration requirements under RCW 46.16A.030, 47.68.255, or 88.02.400. This section applies to persons who have never received a previous citation or participated in a program of deferred finding for failing to register a vehicle under RCW 46.16A.030, an aircraft under RCW 47.68.255, or a vessel under RCW 88.02.400.

Sec. 203. RCW 46.16A.030 and 2011 c 171 s 43 and 2011 c 96 s 31 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Vehicles must be registered as required by this chapter and must display license plates or decals assigned by the department.

(2) It is unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle on a public highway of this state without having in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle registration and displaying license plates on the vehicle.

(3) Vehicle license plates or registration certificates, whether original issues or duplicates, may not be issued or furnished by the department until the applicant makes satisfactory application for a certificate of title or presents satisfactory evidence that a certificate of title covering the vehicle has been previously issued.

(4) Failure to make initial registration before operating a vehicle on the public highways of this state is a traffic infraction. A person committing this infraction must pay a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars, which may not be suspended((, deferred,)) or reduced. This fine is in addition to any delinquent taxes and fees that must be deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a timely fashion. The five hundred twenty-nine dollar fine must be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250.

(5) Failure to renew an expired registration before operating a vehicle on the public highways of this state is a traffic infraction.

(6) It is a gross misdemeanor for a resident, as identified in RCW 46.16A.140, to register a vehicle in another state, evading the payment of any tax or vehicle license fee imposed in connection with registration. It is punishable, in lieu of the fine in subsection (4) of this section, as follows:

(a) For a first offense:

(i) Up to three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail;

(ii) Payment of a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars plus any applicable assessments, which may not be suspended((, deferred,)) or reduced. The fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars must be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250;

(iii) A fine of one thousand dollars to be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250, which may not be suspended((, deferred,)) or reduced; and

(iv) The delinquent taxes and fees, which must be deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a timely fashion, and which may not be suspended((, deferred,)) or reduced;

(b) For a second or subsequent offense:

(i) Up to three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail;

(ii) Payment of a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars plus any applicable assessments, which may not be suspended((, deferred,)) or reduced. The fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars must be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250;

(iii) A fine of five thousand dollars to be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250, which may not be suspended((, deferred,)) or reduced; and

(iv) The amount of delinquent taxes and fees, which must be deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a timely fashion, and which may not be suspended((, deferred,)) or reduced.

(7) A vehicle with an expired registration of more than forty-five days parked on a public street may be impounded by a police officer under RCW 46.55.113(2).

Sec. 204. RCW 47.68.255 and 2010 c 161 s 1147 are each amended to read as follows:

A person who is required to register an aircraft under this chapter and who registers an aircraft in another state or foreign country evading the Washington aircraft excise tax is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. For a second or subsequent offense, the person convicted is also subject to a fine equal to four times the amount of avoided taxes and fees, no part of which may be suspended ((or deferred)). Excise taxes owed and fines assessed ((will))must be deposited in the manner provided under RCW 46.16A.030(6).

Sec. 205. RCW 88.02.400 and 2010 c 161 s 1007 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is a gross misdemeanor punishable as provided under chapter 9A.20 RCW for any person owning a vessel subject to taxation under chapter 82.49 RCW to:

(a) Register a vessel in another state to avoid Washington state vessel excise tax required under chapter 82.49 RCW; or

(b) Obtain a vessel dealer's license for the purpose of evading excise tax on vessels under chapter 82.49 RCW.

(2) For a second or subsequent offense, the person convicted is also subject to a fine equal to four times the amount of avoided taxes and fees, which may not be suspended ((or deferred)).

(3) Excise taxes owed and fines assessed must be deposited in the manner provided under RCW 46.16A.030(6).

PART III

Miscellaneous Provisions

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2019.

--- END ---