BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.24.026 and 2011 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in RCW 82.24.020, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to ((three))6.75 cents per cigarette.

((Beginning July 1, 2010,))(2) The revenue collected under this section must be deposited into the general fund.

--- END ---