BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person may not modify a motor vehicle with the intent to increase the amount of smoke or soot emitted from the motor vehicle's exhaust system.

(2) This section does not apply to a person who, during the course of maintenance or repair, increases the amount of smoke or soot that may be emitted from a motor vehicle's exhaust system if the motor vehicle is not permanently altered in a manner that increases the emission of smoke or soot from the motor vehicle's exhaust system after maintenance or repair is completed.

(3) A violation of this section is a class 3 civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.

--- END ---