BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE.This chapter may be known and cited as the uniform electronic transactions act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. DEFINITIONS.The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agreement" means the bargain of the parties in fact, as found in their language or inferred from other circumstances and from rules, regulations, and procedures given the effect of agreements under laws otherwise applicable to a particular transaction.

(2) "Automated transaction" means a transaction conducted or performed, in whole or in part, by electronic means or electronic records, in which the acts or records of one or both parties are not reviewed by an individual in the ordinary course in forming a contract, performing under an existing contract, or fulfilling an obligation required by the transaction.

(3) "Blockchain" means a cryptographically secured, chronological, and decentralized consensus ledger or consensus database maintained via internet, peer-to-peer network, or other similar interaction.

(4) "Computer program" means a set of statements or instructions to be used directly or indirectly in an information processing system in order to bring about a certain result.

(5) "Contract" means the total legal obligation resulting from the parties' agreement as affected by this chapter and other applicable law.

(6) "Distributed ledger technology" means any distributed ledger protocol and supporting infrastructure, including blockchain, that uses a distributed, decentralized, shared, and replicated ledger.

(7) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities, including without limitation blockchain and distributed ledger technology.

(8) "Electronic agent" means a computer program or an electronic or other automated means used independently to initiate an action or respond to electronic records or performances in whole or in part, without review or action by an individual.

(9) "Electronic record" means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

(10) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

(11) "Governmental agency" means an executive, legislative, or judicial agency, department, board, commission, authority, institution, or instrumentality of the federal government or of a state or of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of a state.

(12) "Information" means data, text, images, sounds, codes, computer programs, software, databases, or the like.

(13) "Information processing system" means an electronic system for creating, generating, sending, receiving, storing, displaying, or processing information.

(14) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, governmental agency, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(15) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(16) "Security procedure" means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that an electronic signature, record, or performance is that of a specific person or for detecting changes or errors in the information in an electronic record. The term includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures.

(17) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian tribe or band, or Alaskan native village, which is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

(18) "Transaction" means an action or set of actions occurring between two or more persons relating to the conduct of business, commercial, or governmental affairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. SCOPE.(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, this chapter applies to electronic records and electronic signatures relating to a transaction.

(2) This chapter does not apply to a transaction to the extent it is governed by:

(a) A law governing the creation and execution of wills, codicils, or testamentary trusts; and

(b) Title 62A RCW other than RCW 62A.1-306 and chapters 62A.2 and 62A.2A RCW.

(3) This chapter applies to an electronic record or electronic signature otherwise excluded from the application of this chapter under subsection (2) of this section to the extent it is governed by a law other than those specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) A transaction subject to this chapter is also subject to other applicable substantive law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. PROSPECTIVE APPLICATION.This chapter applies to any electronic record or electronic signature created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored on or after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. USE OF ELECTRONIC RECORDS AND ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES—VARIATION BY AGREEMENT.(1) This chapter does not require a record or signature to be created, generated, sent, communicated, received, stored, or otherwise processed or used by electronic means or in electronic form.

(2) This chapter applies only to transactions between parties each of which has agreed to conduct transactions by electronic means. Whether the parties agree to conduct a transaction by electronic means is determined from the context and surrounding circumstances, including the parties' conduct.

(3) A party that agrees to conduct a transaction by electronic means may refuse to conduct other transactions by electronic means. The right granted by this subsection may not be waived by agreement.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the effect of any of its provisions may be varied by agreement. The presence in certain provisions of this chapter of the words "unless otherwise agreed," or words of similar import, does not imply that the effect of other provisions may not be varied by agreement.

(5) Whether an electronic record or electronic signature has legal consequences is determined by this chapter and other applicable law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. CONSTRUCTION AND APPLICATION.This chapter must be construed and applied:

(1) To facilitate electronic transactions consistent with other applicable law;

(2) To be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic transactions and with the continued expansion of those practices; and

(3) To effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. LEGAL RECOGNITION OF ELECTRONIC RECORDS, ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES, AND ELECTRONIC CONTRACTS.(1) A record or signature may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form.

(2) A contract may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because an electronic record was used in its formation.

(3) If a law requires a record to be in writing, an electronic record satisfies the law.

(4) If a law requires a signature, an electronic signature satisfies the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. PROVISION OF INFORMATION IN WRITING—PRESENTATION OF RECORDS.(1) If parties have agreed to conduct a transaction by electronic means and a law requires a person to provide, send, or deliver information in writing to another person, the requirement is satisfied if the information is provided, sent, or delivered, as the case may be, in an electronic record capable of retention by the recipient at the time of receipt. An electronic record is not capable of retention by the recipient if the sender or its information processing system inhibits the ability of the recipient to print or store the electronic record.

(2) If a law other than this chapter requires a record (a) to be posted or displayed in a certain manner, (b) to be sent, communicated, or transmitted by a specified method, or (c) to contain information that is formatted in a certain manner, the following rules apply:

(i) The record must be posted or displayed in the manner specified in the other law.

(ii) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, the record must be sent, communicated, or transmitted by the method specified in the other law.

(iii) The record must contain the information formatted in the manner specified in the other law.

(3) If a sender inhibits the ability of a recipient to store or print an electronic record, the electronic record is not enforceable against the recipient.

(4) The requirements of this section may not be varied by agreement, but:

(a) To the extent a law other than this chapter requires information to be provided, sent, or delivered in writing but permits that requirement to be varied by agreement, the requirement under subsection (1) of this section that the information be in the form of an electronic record capable of retention may also be varied by agreement; and

(b) A requirement under a law other than this chapter to send, communicate, or transmit a record by regular United States mail may be varied by agreement to the extent permitted by the other law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. ATTRIBUTION AND EFFECT OF ELECTRONIC RECORD AND ELECTRONIC SIGNATURE.(1) An electronic record or electronic signature is attributable to a person if it was the act of the person. The act of the person may be shown in any manner, including a showing of the efficacy of any security procedure applied to determine the person to which the electronic record or electronic signature was attributable.

(2) The effect of an electronic record or electronic signature attributed to a person under subsection (1) of this section is determined from the context and surrounding circumstances at the time of its creation, execution, or adoption, including the parties' agreement, if any, and otherwise as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. EFFECT OF CHANGE OR ERROR.If a change or error in an electronic record occurs in a transmission between parties to a transaction, the following rules apply:

(1) If the parties have agreed to use a security procedure to detect changes or errors and one party has conformed to the procedure, but the other party has not, and the nonconforming party would have detected the change or error had that party also conformed, the conforming party may avoid the effect of the changed or erroneous electronic record.

(2) In an automated transaction involving an individual, the individual may avoid the effect of an electronic record that resulted from an error made by the individual in dealing with the electronic agent of another person if the electronic agent did not provide an opportunity for the prevention or correction of the error and, at the time the individual learns of the error, the individual:

(a) Promptly notifies the other person of the error and that the individual did not intend to be bound by the electronic record received by the other person;

(b) Takes reasonable steps, including steps that conform to the other person's reasonable instructions, to return to the other person or, if instructed by the other person, to destroy the consideration received, if any, as a result of the erroneous electronic record; and

(c) Has not used or received any benefit or value from the consideration, if any, received from the other person.

(3) If neither subsection (1) of this section nor subsection (2) of this section applies, the change or error has the effect provided by other law, including the law of mistake, and the parties' contract, if any.

(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section may not be varied by agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. NOTARIZATION AND ACKNOWLEDGMENT.If a law requires a signature or record to be notarized, acknowledged, verified, or made under oath, the requirement is satisfied if the electronic signature of the person authorized to perform those acts, together with all other information required to be included by other applicable law, is attached to or logically associated with the signature or record.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. RETENTION OF ELECTRONIC RECORDS—ORIGINALS.(1) If a law requires that a record be retained, the requirement is satisfied by retaining an electronic record of the information in the record which:

(a) Accurately reflects the information set forth in the record after it was first generated in its final form as an electronic record or otherwise; and

(b) Remains accessible for later reference.

(2) A requirement to retain a record in accordance with subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any information the sole purpose of which is to enable the record to be sent, communicated, or received.

(3) A person may satisfy subsection (1) of this section by using the services of another person if the requirements of that subsection are satisfied.

(4) If a law requires a record to be presented or retained in its original form, or provides consequences if the record is not presented or retained in its original form, that law is satisfied by an electronic record retained in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

(5) If a law requires retention of a check, that requirement is satisfied by retention of an electronic record of the information on the front and back of the check in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

(6) A record retained as an electronic record in accordance with subsection (1) of this section satisfies a law requiring a person to retain a record for evidentiary, audit, or like purposes, unless a law enacted after the effective date of this section specifically prohibits the use of an electronic record for the specified purpose.

(7) This section does not preclude a governmental agency of this state from specifying additional requirements for the retention of a record subject to the agency's jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. ADMISSIBILITY IN EVIDENCE.In a proceeding, evidence of a record or signature may not be excluded solely because it is in electronic form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. AUTOMATED TRANSACTION.In an automated transaction, the following rules apply:

(1) A contract may be formed by the interaction of electronic agents of the parties, even if no individual was aware of or reviewed the electronic agents' actions or the resulting terms and agreements.

(2) A contract may be formed by the interaction of an electronic agent and an individual, acting on the individual's own behalf or for another person, including by an interaction in which the individual performs actions that the individual is free to refuse to perform and which the individual knows or has reason to know will cause the electronic agent to complete the transaction or performance.

(3) The terms of the contract are determined by the substantive law applicable to it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. TIME AND PLACE OF SENDING AND RECEIPT.(1) Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic record is sent when it:

(a) Is addressed properly or otherwise directed properly to an information processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purpose of receiving electronic records or information of the type sent and from which the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic record;

(b) Is in a form capable of being processed by that system; and

(c) Enters an information processing system outside the control of the sender or of a person that sent the electronic record on behalf of the sender or enters a region of the information processing system designated or used by the recipient which is under the control of the recipient.

(2) Unless otherwise agreed between a sender and the recipient, an electronic record is received when:

(a) It enters an information processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purpose of receiving electronic records or information of the type sent and from which the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic record; and

(b) It is in a form capable of being processed by that system.

(3) Subsection (2) of this section applies even if the place the information processing system is located is different from the place the electronic record is deemed to be received under subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Unless otherwise expressly provided in the electronic record or agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic record is deemed to be sent from the sender's place of business and to be received at the recipient's place of business. For purposes of this subsection, the following rules apply:

(a) If the sender or recipient has more than one place of business, the place of business of that person is the place having the closest relationship to the underlying transaction.

(b) If the sender or the recipient does not have a place of business, the place of business is the sender's or recipient's residence, as the case may be.

(5) An electronic record is received under subsection (2) of this section even if no individual is aware of its receipt.

(6) Receipt of an electronic acknowledgment from an information processing system described in subsection (2) of this section establishes that a record was received but, by itself, does not establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

(7) If a person is aware that an electronic record purportedly sent under subsection (1) of this section, or purportedly received under subsection (2) of this section, was not actually sent or received, the legal effect of the sending or receipt is determined by other applicable law. Except to the extent permitted by the other law, the requirements of this subsection may not be varied by agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. TRANSFERABLE RECORDS.(1) In this section, "transferable record" means an electronic record that:

(a) Would be a note under chapter 62A.3 RCW or a document under chapter 62A.7 RCW if the electronic record were in writing; and

(b) The issuer of the electronic record expressly has agreed is a transferable record.

(2) A person has control of a transferable record if a system employed for evidencing the transfer of interests in the transferable record reliably establishes that person as the person to which the transferable record was issued or transferred.

(3) A system satisfies subsection (2) of this section, and a person is deemed to have control of a transferable record, if the transferable record is created, stored, and assigned in such a manner that:

(a) A single authoritative copy of the transferable record exists which is unique, identifiable, and, except as otherwise provided in (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection, unalterable;

(b) The authoritative copy identifies the person asserting control as:

(i) The person to which the transferable record was issued; or

(ii) If the authoritative copy indicates that the transferable record has been transferred, the person to which the transferable record was most recently transferred;

(c) The authoritative copy is communicated to and maintained by the person asserting control or its designated custodian;

(d) Copies or revisions that add or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made only with the consent of the person asserting control;

(e) Each copy of the authoritative copy and any copy of a copy is readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative copy; and

(f) Any revision of the authoritative copy is readily identifiable as authorized or unauthorized.

(4) Except as otherwise agreed, a person having control of a transferable record is the holder, as defined in RCW 62A.1-201(b)(21), of the transferable record and has the same rights and defenses as a holder of an equivalent record or writing under the uniform commercial code including, if the applicable statutory requirements under RCW 62A.3-302(a), 62A.7-501, or 62A.9A-330 are satisfied, the rights and defenses of a holder in due course, a holder to which a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated, or a purchaser, respectively. Delivery, possession, and endorsement are not required to obtain or exercise any of the rights under this subsection.

(5) Except as otherwise agreed, an obligor under a transferable record has the same rights and defenses as an equivalent obligor under equivalent records or writings under the uniform commercial code.

(6) If requested by a person against which enforcement is sought, the person seeking to enforce the transferable record shall provide reasonable proof that the person is in control of the transferable record. Proof may include access to the authoritative copy of the transferable record and related business records sufficient to review the terms of the transferable record and to establish the identity of the person having control of the transferable record.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. CREATION AND RETENTION OF ELECTRONIC RECORDS AND CONVERSION OF WRITTEN RECORDS BY GOVERNMENTAL AGENCIES.Each governmental agency of this state shall determine whether, and the extent to which, a governmental agency will create and retain electronic records and convert written records to electronic records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. ACCEPTANCE AND DISTRIBUTION OF ELECTRONIC RECORDS BY GOVERNMENTAL AGENCIES.(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 12(6) of this act, each governmental agency of this state shall determine whether, and the extent to which, a governmental agency will send and accept electronic records and electronic signatures to and from other persons and otherwise create, generate, communicate, store, process, use, and rely upon electronic records and electronic signatures.

(2) To the extent that a governmental agency uses electronic records and electronic signatures under subsection (1) of this section, the governmental agency, giving due consideration to security, may specify:

(a) The manner and format in which the electronic records must be created, generated, sent, communicated, received, and stored and the systems established for those purposes;

(b) If electronic records must be signed by electronic means, the type of electronic signature required, the manner and format in which the electronic signature must be affixed to the electronic record, and the identity of, or criteria that must be met by, any third party used by a person filing a document to facilitate the process;

(c) Control processes and procedures as appropriate to ensure adequate preservation, disposition, integrity, security, confidentiality, and auditability of electronic records; and

(d) Any other required attributes for electronic records which are specified for corresponding nonelectronic records or reasonably necessary under the circumstances.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in section 12(6) of this act, this chapter does not require a governmental agency of this state to use or permit the use of electronic records or electronic signatures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. INTEROPERABILITY.The governmental agency of this state which adopts standards pursuant to section 18 of this act may encourage and promote consistency and interoperability with similar requirements adopted by other governmental agencies of this and other states and the federal government and nongovernmental persons interacting with governmental agencies of this state. If appropriate, those standards may specify differing levels of standards from which governmental agencies of this state may choose in implementing the most appropriate standard for a particular application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. RELATION TO ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES IN GLOBAL AND NATIONAL COMMERCE ACT.This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

Sec. 21. RCW 4.92.100 and 2013 c 188 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All claims against the state, or against the state's officers, employees, or volunteers, acting in such capacity, for damages arising out of tortious conduct, must be presented to the office of risk management. A claim is deemed presented when the claim form is delivered in person or by regular mail, registered mail, or certified mail, with return receipt requested, or as an attachment to ((electronic mail))email or by fax, to the office of risk management. For claims for damages presented after July 26, 2009, all claims for damages must be presented on the standard tort claim form that is maintained by the office of risk management. The standard tort claim form must be posted on the department of enterprise services' web site.

(a) The standard tort claim form must, at a minimum, require the following information:

(i) The claimant's name, date of birth, and contact information;

(ii) A description of the conduct and the circumstances that brought about the injury or damage;

(iii) A description of the injury or damage;

(iv) A statement of the time and place that the injury or damage occurred;

(v) A listing of the names of all persons involved and contact information, if known;

(vi) A statement of the amount of damages claimed; and

(vii) A statement of the actual residence of the claimant at the time of presenting the claim and at the time the claim arose.

(b)(i) The standard tort claim form must be signed either:

(A) By the claimant, verifying the claim;

(B) Pursuant to a written power of attorney, by the attorney-in-fact for the claimant;

(C) By an attorney admitted to practice in Washington state on the claimant's behalf; or

(D) By a court-approved guardian or guardian ad litem on behalf of the claimant.

(ii) For the purpose of this subsection (1)(b), when the claim form is presented electronically it must bear an electronic signature in lieu of a written original signature. ((An electronic signature means a facsimile of an original signature that is affixed to the claim form and executed or adopted by the person with the intent to sign the document.))

(iii) When an electronic signature is used and the claim is submitted as an attachment to ((electronic mail))email, the conveyance of that claim must include the date, time the claim was presented, and the internet provider's address from which it was sent. The attached claim form must be a format approved by the office of risk management.

(iv) When an electronic signature is used and the claim is submitted via a facsimile machine, the conveyance must include the date, time the claim was submitted, and the fax number from which it was sent.

(v) In the event of a question on an electronic signature, the claimant shall have an opportunity to cure and the cured notice shall relate back to the date of the original filing.

(c) The amount of damages stated on the claim form is not admissible at trial.

(2) The state shall make available the standard tort claim form described in this section with instructions on how the form is to be presented and the name, address, and business hours of the office of risk management. The standard tort claim form must not list the claimant's social security number and must not require information not specified under this section. The claim form and the instructions for completing the claim form must provide the United States mail, physical, and electronic addresses and numbers where the claim can be presented.

(3) With respect to the content of claims under this section and all procedural requirements in this section, this section must be liberally construed so that substantial compliance will be deemed satisfactory.

Sec. 22. RCW 5.50.010 and 2019 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In this chapter:

(1) "Law" includes a statute, judicial decision or order, rule of court, executive order, and administrative rule, regulation, or order.

(2) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(3) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol;

(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process;

(c) To affix or place the declarant's signature as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 on the record;

(d) ((To attach or logically associate the declarant's digital signature or electronic signature as defined in RCW 19.34.020 to the record;

(e))) To affix or logically associate the declarant's signature in the manner described in general rule 30 to the record if he or she is a licensed attorney; or

(((f)))(e) To affix or logically associate the declarant's full name, department or agency, and badge or personnel number to any record that is electronically submitted to a court, a prosecutor, or a magistrate from an electronic device that is owned, issued, or maintained by a criminal justice agency if the declarant is a law enforcement officer.

(4) "Sworn declaration" means a declaration in a signed record given under oath. The term includes a sworn statement, verification, certificate, and affidavit.

(5) "Unsworn declaration" means a declaration in a signed record not given under oath but given under penalty of perjury. The term includes an unsworn statement, verification, and certificate.

Sec. 23. RCW 5.50.030 and 2011 c 22 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, if a law of this state requires or permits use of a sworn declaration, an unsworn declaration meeting the requirements of this chapter has the same effect as a sworn declaration.

(2) This chapter does not apply to:

(a) A deposition;

(b) An oath of office;

(c) An oath required to be given before a specified official other than a notary public; or

(d) A declaration to be recorded pursuant to Title 64 or 65 RCW((; or

(e) An oath required by RCW 11.20.020)).

Sec. 24. RCW 9.38.060 and 2019 c 132 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person shall not knowingly misrepresent the person's identity or authorization to obtain a public key certificate used to reference a private key for creating a digital signature.

(2) A person shall not knowingly forge ((a))an electronic or digital signature.

(3) A person shall not knowingly present a public key certificate for which the person is not the owner of the corresponding private key in order to obtain unauthorized access to information or engage in an unauthorized transaction.

(4) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(5)(a) "Digital signature" means an electronic signature that is a transformation of a message using an asymmetric cryptosystem such that a person who has the initial message and the signer's public key can accurately determine whether the:

(((a)))(i) Transformation was created using the private key that corresponds to the signer's public key; and

(((b)))(ii) Initial message has been altered since the transformation was made.

(b) "Electronic signature" has the meaning provided in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 25. RCW 10.79.080 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 42 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may be subjected to a body cavity search by or at the direction of a law enforcement agency unless a search warrant is issued pursuant to superior court criminal rules.

(2) No law enforcement officer may seek a warrant for a body cavity search without first obtaining specific authorization for the body cavity search from the ranking shift supervisor of the law enforcement authority. Authorization for the body cavity search may be obtained electronically((: PROVIDED, That such electronic authorization shall be reduced to writing by the law enforcement officer seeking the authorization and signed by the ranking supervisor as soon as possible thereafter)).

(3) Before any body cavity search is authorized or conducted, a thorough pat-down search, a thorough electronic metal-detector search, and a thorough clothing search, where appropriate, must be used to search for and seize any evidence of a crime, contraband, fruits of crime, things otherwise criminally possessed, weapons, or other things by means of which a crime has been committed or reasonably appears about to be committed. No body cavity search shall be authorized or conducted unless these other methods do not satisfy the safety, security, or evidentiary concerns of the law enforcement agency.

(4) A law enforcement officer requesting a body cavity search shall prepare and sign a report regarding the body cavity search. The report shall include:

(a) A copy of the written authorization required under subsection (2) of this section;

(b) A copy of the warrant and any supporting documents required under subsection (1) of this section;

(c) The name and sex of all persons conducting or observing the search;

(d) The time, date, place, and description of the search; and

(e) A statement of the results of the search and a list of any items removed from the person as a result of the search.

The report shall be retained as part of the law enforcement agency's records.

Sec. 26. RCW 18.27.114 and 2007 c 436 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any contractor agreeing to perform any contracting project: (a) For the repair, alteration, or construction of four or fewer residential units or accessory structures on such residential property when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or more; or (b) for the repair, alteration, or construction of a commercial building when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or more but less than sixty thousand dollars, must provide the customer with the following disclosure statement in substantially the following form using lower case and upper case twelve-point and bold type where appropriate, prior to starting work on the project:

"NOTICE TO CUSTOMER

This contractor is registered with the state of Washington, registration no. . . ., and has posted with the state a bond or deposit of . . . . . for the purpose of satisfying claims against the contractor for breach of contract including negligent or improper work in the conduct of the contractor's business. The expiration date of this contractor's registration is . . . . ..

THIS BOND OR DEPOSIT MIGHT NOT BE SUFFICIENT TO COVER A CLAIM THAT MIGHT ARISE FROM THE WORK DONE UNDER YOUR CONTRACT.

This bond or deposit is not for your exclusive use because it covers all work performed by this contractor. The bond or deposit is intended to pay valid claims up to . . . . . that you and other customers, suppliers, subcontractors, or taxing authorities may have.

FOR GREATER PROTECTION YOU MAY WITHHOLD A PERCENTAGE OF YOUR CONTRACT.

You may withhold a contractually defined percentage of your construction contract as retainage for a stated period of time to provide protection to you and help insure that your project will be completed as required by your contract.

YOUR PROPERTY MAY BE LIENED.

If a supplier of materials used in your construction project or an employee or subcontractor of your contractor or subcontractors is not paid, your property may be liened to force payment and you could pay twice for the same work.

FOR ADDITIONAL PROTECTION, YOU MAY REQUEST THE CONTRACTOR TO PROVIDE YOU WITH ORIGINAL "LIEN RELEASE" DOCUMENTS FROM EACH SUPPLIER OR SUBCONTRACTOR ON YOUR PROJECT.

The contractor is required to provide you with further information about lien release documents if you request it. General information is also available from the state Department of Labor and Industries.

I have received a copy of this disclosure statement.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(Signature of customer)"

(2) The contractor must retain a signed copy of the disclosure statement in his or her files for a minimum of three years, and produce a ((signed or electronic signature)) copy of the signed disclosure statement to the department upon request.

(3) A contractor subject to this section shall notify any consumer to whom notice is required under subsection (1) of this section if the contractor's registration has expired or is revoked or suspended by the department prior to completion or other termination of the contract with the consumer.

(4) No contractor subject to this section may bring or maintain any lien claim under chapter 60.04 RCW based on any contract to which this section applies without alleging and proving that the contractor has provided the customer with a copy of the disclosure statement as required in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) This section does not apply to contracts authorized under chapter 39.04 RCW or to contractors contracting with other contractors.

(6) Failure to comply with this section shall constitute an infraction under the provisions of this chapter.

(7) The department shall produce model disclosure statements, and public service announcements detailing the information needed to assist contractors and contractors' customers to comply under this section. As necessary, the department shall periodically update these education materials.

Sec. 27. RCW 18.64.550 and 2016 c 148 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A chart order must be considered a prescription if it contains:

(a) The full name of the patient;

(b) The date of issuance;

(c) The name, strength, and dosage form of the drug prescribed;

(d) Directions for use; and

(e) An authorized signature((:

(i) For written orders,)). The order must contain the prescribing practitioner's signature or the signature of the practitioner's authorized agent, including the name of the prescribing practitioner((; or

(ii) For electronic or digital orders, the order must contain the prescribing practitioner's electronic or digital signature, or the electronic or digital signature of the practitioner's authorized agent, including the name of the prescribing practitioner)).

(2) A licensed nurse, pharmacist, or physician practicing in a long-term care facility or hospice program may act as the practitioner's agent for purposes of this chapter, without need for a written agency agreement, to document a chart order in the patient's medical record on behalf of the prescribing practitioner pending the prescribing practitioner's signature; or to communicate a prescription to a pharmacy whether telephonically, via facsimile, or electronically. The communication of a prescription to a dispenser by the prescriber's agent has the same force and effect as if communicated directly by the authorized practitioner.

(3) Nothing in this chapter prevents an authorized credentialed employee of a long-term care facility from transmitting a chart order pursuant to RCW 74.42.230, or transmitting a prescription on behalf of a resident to the extent otherwise authorized by law.

Sec. 28. RCW 19.09.020 and 2011 c 199 s 2 and 2011 c 60 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

When used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) A "bona fide officer or employee" of a charitable organization is one (a) whose conduct is subject to direct control by such organization; (b) who does not act in the manner of an independent contractor in his or her relation with the organization; and (c) whose compensation is not computed on funds raised or to be raised.

(2) "Charitable organization" means any entity that solicits or collects contributions from the general public where the contribution is or is purported to be used to support a charitable purpose, but does not include any commercial fund-raiser, commercial fund-raising entity, commercial coventurer, or any fund-raising counsel, as defined in this section. Churches and their integrated auxiliaries, and political organizations are not charitable organizations, but all are subject to RCW 19.09.100 (15) through (18).

(3) "Charitable purpose" means any religious, charitable, scientific, testing for public safety, literary, or educational purpose or any other purpose that is beneficial to the community, including environmental, humanitarian, patriotic, or civic purposes, the support of national or international amateur sports competition, the prevention of cruelty to children or animals, the advancement of social welfare, or the benefit of law enforcement personnel, firefighters, and other persons who protect public safety. The term "charitable" is used in its generally accepted legal sense and includes relief of the poor, the distressed, or the underprivileged; advancement of religion; advancement of education or science; erecting or maintaining public buildings, monuments, or works; lessening the burdens of government; lessening neighborhood tensions; eliminating prejudice and discrimination; defending human and civil rights secured by law; and combating community deterioration and juvenile delinquency.

(4) "Commercial coventurer" means any individual or corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, limited liability company, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, or any other legal entity, that:

(a) Is regularly and primarily engaged in making sales of goods or services for profit directly to the general public;

(b) Is not otherwise regularly or primarily engaged in making solicitations in this state or otherwise raising funds in this state for one or more charitable organizations;

(c) Represents to prospective purchasers that, if they purchase a good or service from the commercial coventurer, a portion of the sales price or a sum of money or some other specified thing of value will be donated to a named charitable organization; and

(d) Does not ask purchasers to make checks or other instruments payable to a named charitable organization or any entity other than the commercial coventurer itself under its regular commercial name.

(5) "Commercial fund-raiser" or "commercial fund-raising entity" means any entity that for compensation or other consideration directly or indirectly solicits or receives contributions within this state for or on behalf of any charitable organization or charitable purpose, or that is engaged in the business of, or represents to persons in this state as independently engaged in the business of, soliciting or receiving contributions for such purposes. However, a commercial coventurer, fund-raising counsel, or consultant is not a commercial fund-raiser or commercial fund-raising entity.

(6) "Compensation" means salaries, wages, fees, commissions, or any other remuneration or valuable consideration.

(7) "Contribution" means the payment, donation, or promise, for consideration or otherwise, of any money or property of any kind or value which contribution is wholly or partly induced by a solicitation. Reference to dollar amounts of "contributions" or "solicitations" in this chapter means in the case of payments or promises to pay for merchandise or rights of any description, the value of the total amount paid or promised to be paid for such merchandise or rights.

(8) "Cost of solicitation" means and includes all direct and indirect costs, expenditures, debts, obligations, salaries, wages, commissions, fees, or other money or thing of value paid or incurred in making a solicitation.

(9) "Entity" means an individual, organization, group, association, partnership, corporation, agency or unit of state government, or any combination thereof.

(10) "Fund-raising counsel" or "consultant" means any entity or individual who is retained by a charitable organization, for a fixed fee or rate, that is not computed on a percentage of funds raised, or to be raised, under a written agreement only to plan, advise, consult, or prepare materials for a solicitation of contributions in this state, but who does not manage, conduct, or carry on a fund-raising campaign and who does not solicit contributions or employ, procure, or engage any compensated person to solicit contributions, and who does not at any time have custody or control of contributions. A volunteer, employee, or salaried officer of a charitable organization maintaining a permanent establishment or office in this state is not a fund-raising counsel. An attorney, investment counselor, or banker who advises an individual, corporation, or association to make a charitable contribution is not a fund-raising counsel as a result of the advice.

(11) "General public" or "public" means any individual or entity located in Washington state without a membership or other official relationship with a charitable organization before a solicitation by the charitable organization.

(12) "Gross revenue" or "annual gross revenue" means, for any accounting period, the total value of revenue, excluding unrealized capital gains, but including noncash contributions of tangible, personal property received by or on behalf of a charitable organization from all sources, without subtracting any costs or expenses.

(13) "Membership" means that for the payment of fees, dues, assessments, etc., an organization provides services and confers a bona fide right, privilege, professional standing, honor, or other direct benefit, in addition to the right to vote, elect officers, or hold office. The term "membership" does not include those persons who are granted a membership upon making a contribution as the result of solicitation.

(14) "Other employee" of a charitable organization means any person (a) whose conduct is subject to direct control by such organization; (b) who does not act in the manner of any independent contractor in his or her relation with the organization; and (c) who is not engaged in the business of or held out to persons in this state as independently engaged in the business of soliciting contributions for charitable purposes or religious activities.

(15) "Political organization" means those organizations whose activities are subject to chapter 42.17A RCW or the federal elections campaign act of 1971, as amended.

(16) "Religious organization" means those entities that are not churches or integrated auxiliaries and includes nondenominational ministries, interdenominational and ecumenical organizations, mission organizations, speakers' organizations, faith-based social agencies, and other entities whose principal purpose is the study, practice, or advancement of religion.

(17) "Secretary" means the secretary of state.

(18) (("Signed" means hand-written, or, if the secretary adopts rules facilitating electronic filing that pertain to this chapter, in the manner prescribed by those rules.))"Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

(19)(a) "Solicitation" means any oral or written request for a contribution, including the solicitor's offer or attempt to sell any property, rights, services, or other thing in connection with which:

(i) Any appeal is made for any charitable purpose;

(ii) The name of any charitable organization is used as an inducement for consummating the sale; or

(iii) Any statement is made that implies that the whole or any part of the proceeds from the sale will be applied toward any charitable purpose or donated to any charitable organization.

(b) The solicitation shall be deemed completed when made, whether or not the person making it receives any contribution or makes any sale.

(c) "Solicitation" does not include bingo activities, raffles, and amusement games conducted under chapter 9.46 RCW and applicable rules of the Washington state gambling commission.

(20) "Solicitation report" means the financial information the secretary requires pursuant to RCW 19.09.075 or 19.09.079.

Sec. 29. RCW 23.95.105 and 2019 c 37 s 1401 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise or as set forth in RCW 23.95.400 or 23.95.600.

(1) "Annual report" means the report required by RCW 23.95.255.

(2) "Business corporation" means a domestic business corporation incorporated under or subject to Title 23B RCW or a foreign business corporation.

(3) "Commercial registered agent" means a person listed under RCW 23.95.420.

(4) "Domestic," with respect to an entity, means governed as to its internal affairs by the law of this state.

(5) "Electronic transmission" means an electronic communication:

(a) Not directly involving the physical transfer of a record in a tangible medium; and

(b) That may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by the sender and the recipient thereof, and that may be directly reproduced in a tangible medium by such a sender and recipient.

(6) "Entity" means:

(a) A business corporation;

(b) A nonprofit corporation;

(c) A limited liability partnership;

(d) A limited partnership;

(e) A limited liability company;

(f) A general cooperative association; or

(g) A limited cooperative association.

(7) "Entity filing" means a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to this chapter.

(8) "Execute," "executes," or "executed" means with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

(a) ((Signed with respect to a written record))To sign or adopt a tangible symbol;

(b) ((Electronically transmitted along with sufficient information to determine the sender's identity with respect to an electronic transmission))To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process; or

(c) With respect to a record to be filed with the secretary of state, in compliance with the standards for filing with the office of the secretary of state as prescribed by the secretary of state.

(9) "Filed record" means a record filed by the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter.

(10) "Foreign," with respect to an entity, means governed as to its internal affairs by the law of a jurisdiction other than this state.

(11) "General cooperative association" means a domestic general cooperative association formed under or subject to chapter 23.86 RCW.

(12) "Governor" means:

(a) A director of a business corporation;

(b) A director of a nonprofit corporation;

(c) A partner of a limited liability partnership;

(d) A general partner of a limited partnership;

(e) A manager of a manager-managed limited liability company;

(f) A member of a member-managed limited liability company;

(g) A director of a general cooperative association;

(h) A director of a limited cooperative association; or

(i) Any other person under whose authority the powers of an entity are exercised and under whose direction the activities and affairs of the entity are managed pursuant to the organic law and organic rules of the entity.

(13) "Interest" means:

(a) A share in a business corporation;

(b) A membership in a nonprofit corporation;

(c) A share in a nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 24.06 RCW;

(d) A partnership interest in a limited liability partnership;

(e) A partnership interest in a limited partnership;

(f) A limited liability company interest;

(g) A share or membership in a general cooperative association; or

(h) A member's interest in a limited cooperative association.

(14) "Interest holder" means:

(a) A shareholder of a business corporation;

(b) A member of a nonprofit corporation;

(c) A shareholder of a nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 24.06 RCW;

(d) A partner of a limited liability partnership;

(e) A general partner of a limited partnership;

(f) A limited partner of a limited partnership;

(g) A member of a limited liability company;

(h) A shareholder or member of a general cooperative association; or

(i) A member of a limited cooperative association.

(15) "Jurisdiction," when used to refer to a political entity, means the United States, a state, a foreign country, or a political subdivision of a foreign country.

(16) "Jurisdiction of formation" means the jurisdiction whose law includes the organic law of an entity.

(17) "Limited cooperative association" means a domestic limited cooperative association formed under or subject to chapter 23.100 RCW or a foreign limited cooperative association.

(18) "Limited liability company" means a domestic limited liability company formed under or subject to chapter 25.15 RCW or a foreign limited liability company.

(19) "Limited liability limited partnership" means a domestic limited liability limited partnership formed under or subject to chapter 25.10 RCW or a foreign limited liability limited partnership.

(20) "Limited liability partnership" means a domestic limited liability partnership registered under or subject to chapter 25.05 RCW or a foreign limited liability partnership.

(21) "Limited partnership" means a domestic limited partnership formed under or subject to chapter 25.10 RCW or a foreign limited partnership. "Limited partnership" includes a limited liability limited partnership.

(22) "Noncommercial registered agent" means a person that is not a commercial registered agent and is:

(a) An individual or domestic or foreign entity that serves in this state as the registered agent of an entity;

(b) An individual who holds the office or other position in an entity which is designated as the registered agent pursuant to RCW 23.95.415(1)(b)(ii); or

(c) A government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or a separate legal entity comprised of two or more of these entities, that serves as the registered agent of an entity.

(23) "Nonprofit corporation" means a domestic nonprofit corporation incorporated under or subject to chapter 24.03 or 24.06 RCW or a foreign nonprofit corporation.

(24) "Nonregistered foreign entity" means a foreign entity that is not registered to do business in this state pursuant to a statement of registration filed by the secretary of state.

(25) "Organic law" means the law of an entity's jurisdiction of formation governing the internal affairs of the entity.

(26) "Organic rules" means the public organic record and private organic rules of an entity.

(27) "Person" means an individual, business corporation, nonprofit corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, general cooperative association, limited cooperative association, unincorporated nonprofit association, statutory trust, business trust, common-law business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(28) "Principal office" means the principal executive office of an entity, whether or not the office is located in this state.

(29) "Private organic rules" means the rules, whether or not in a record, that govern the internal affairs of an entity, are binding on all its interest holders, and are not part of its public organic record, if any. "Private organic rules" includes:

(a) The bylaws of a business corporation and any agreement among shareholders pursuant to RCW 23B.07.320;

(b) The bylaws of a nonprofit corporation;

(c) The partnership agreement of a limited liability partnership;

(d) The partnership agreement of a limited partnership;

(e) The limited liability company agreement;

(f) The bylaws of a general cooperative association; and

(g) The bylaws of a limited cooperative association.

(30) "Proceeding" means civil suit and criminal, administrative, and investigatory action.

(31) "Property" means all property, whether real, personal, or mixed or tangible or intangible, or any right or interest therein.

(32) "Public organic record" means the record the filing of which by the secretary of state is required to form an entity and any amendment to or restatement of that record. The term includes:

(a) The articles of incorporation of a business corporation;

(b) The articles of incorporation of a nonprofit corporation;

(c) The certificate of limited partnership of a limited partnership;

(d) The certificate of formation of a limited liability company;

(e) The articles of incorporation of a general cooperative association;

(f) The articles of organization of a limited cooperative association; and

(g) The document under the laws of another jurisdiction that is equivalent to a document listed in this subsection.

(33) "Receipt," as used in this chapter, means actual receipt. "Receive" has a corresponding meaning.

(34) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or ((contained in an electronic transmission))that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(35) "Registered agent" means an agent of an entity which is authorized to receive service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the entity. The term includes a commercial registered agent and a noncommercial registered agent.

(36) "Registered foreign entity" means a foreign entity that is registered to do business in this state pursuant to a certificate of registration filed by the secretary of state.

(37) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(38) "Tangible medium" means a writing, copy of a writing, facsimile, or a physical reproduction, each on paper or on other tangible material.

(39) "Transfer" includes:

(a) An assignment;

(b) A conveyance;

(c) A sale;

(d) A lease;

(e) An encumbrance, including a mortgage or security interest;

(f) A change of record owner of interest;

(g) A gift; and

(h) A transfer by operation of law.

(((39)))(40) "Type of entity" means a generic form of entity:

(a) Recognized at common law; or

(b) Formed under an organic law, whether or not some entities formed under that law are subject to provisions of that law that create different categories of the form of entity.

(((40) "Writing" does not include an electronic transmission.

(41) "Written" means embodied in a tangible medium.))

Sec. 30. RCW 23.95.200 and 2015 c 176 s 1201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To be filed by the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter, an entity filing must be received by the secretary of state, comply with this chapter, and satisfy the following:

(a) The entity filing must be required or permitted by Title 23, 23B, 24, or 25 RCW.

(b) The entity filing must be delivered in ((written form))a tangible medium unless and to the extent the secretary of state permits electronic delivery of entity filings pursuant to RCW 23.95.115(2).

(c) The words in the entity filing must be in English, and numbers must be in Arabic or Roman numerals, but the name of the entity need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals.

(d) The entity filing must be executed by or on behalf of a person authorized or required under this chapter or the entity's organic law to execute the filing.

(e) The entity filing must state the name and capacity, if any, of each individual who executed it, on behalf of either the individual or the person authorized or required to execute the filing, but need not contain a seal, attestation, acknowledgment, or verification.

(2) When an entity filing is delivered to the secretary of state for filing, any fee required under this chapter and any fee, interest, or penalty required to be paid under this chapter or law other than this chapter must be paid in a manner permitted by the secretary of state or by that law.

(3) The secretary of state may require that an entity filing delivered in ((written form))a tangible medium be accompanied by an identical or conformed copy.

(4) A record filed under this chapter may be executed by an individual acting in a valid representative capacity.

Sec. 31. RCW 23.95.265 and 2015 c 176 s 1214 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state may, where exigent or mitigating circumstances are presented, waive penalty fees due from any entity previously in good standing which would otherwise be penalized or lose its active status. An entity desiring to seek relief under this section must, within fifteen days of discovery of the missed filing or lapse, notify the secretary of state ((in writing))as provided in rule. The notification must include the name and mailing address of the entity, the governor or other entity official to whom correspondence should be sent, and a statement under oath by a governor or other entity official, setting forth the nature of the missed filing or lapse, the circumstances giving rise to the missed filing or lapse, and the relief sought. If the secretary of state is satisfied that sufficient exigent or mitigating circumstances exist, that the entity has demonstrated good faith and a reasonable attempt to comply with the applicable statutes of this state, the secretary of state may issue an order allowing relief from the penalty. If the secretary of state determines the request does not comply with the requirements for relief, the secretary of state shall deny the relief and state the reasons for the denial. Any denial of relief by the secretary of state is not reviewable notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 32. RCW 23.95.420 and 2015 c 176 s 1405 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may become listed as a commercial registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a commercial-registered-agent listing statement executed by the person which states:

(a) The name of the individual or the name of the entity, type of entity, and jurisdiction of formation of the entity;

(b) That the person is in the business of serving as a commercial registered agent in this state; and

(c) The address of a place of business of the person in this state to which service of process, notices, and demands being served on or sent to entities represented by the person may be delivered.

(2) A commercial-registered-agent listing statement may include the information regarding acceptance by the agent of service of process, notices, and demands in a form other than a ((written record))tangible medium as provided in RCW 23.95.450(5).

(3) If the name of a person delivering to the secretary of state for filing a commercial-registered-agent listing statement is not distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from the name of another commercial registered agent listed under this section, the person shall adopt a fictitious name that is distinguishable and use that name in its statement and when it does business in this state as a commercial registered agent.

(4) The secretary of state shall note the filing of a commercial-registered-agent listing statement in the records maintained by the secretary of state for each entity represented by the agent at the time of the filing. The statement has the effect of amending the registered agent filing for each of those entities to:

(a) Designate the person becoming listed as a commercial registered agent as the commercial registered agent of each of those entities; and

(b) Delete the name and address of the former agent from the registered agent filing of each of those entities.

Sec. 33. RCW 23.95.450 and 2015 c 176 s 1411 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A represented entity may be served with any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law by serving its registered agent.

(2) If a represented entity ceases to have a registered agent, or if its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served, the entity may be served by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or by similar commercial delivery service, addressed to the entity at the entity's principal office. The address of the principal office must be as shown in the entity's most recent annual report filed by the secretary of state. Service is effected under this subsection on the earliest of:

(a) The date the entity receives the mail or delivery by the commercial delivery service;

(b) The date shown on the return receipt, if executed by the entity; or

(c) Five days after its deposit with the United States postal service or commercial delivery service, if correctly addressed and with sufficient postage or payment.

(3) If process, notice, or demand cannot be served on an entity pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section, service may be made by handing a copy to the individual in charge of any regular place of business or activity of the entity if the individual served is not a plaintiff in the action.

(4) The secretary of state shall be an agent of the entity for service of process if process, notice, or demand cannot be served on an entity pursuant to subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section.

(5) Service of process, notice, or demand on a registered agent must be in a ((written record))tangible medium, but service may be made on a commercial registered agent in other forms, and subject to such requirements, as the agent has stated in its listing under RCW 23.95.420 that it will accept.

(6) Service of process, notice, or demand may be made by other means under law other than this chapter.

Sec. 34. RCW 23B.01.200 and 2015 c 176 s 2101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A ((record))document required or permitted by this title to be filed in the office of the secretary of state must satisfy the requirements of Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW, this section, and any other section that adds to or varies from these requirements, to be entitled to filing by the secretary of state.

(2) Unless otherwise indicated in this title, all ((records))documents delivered to the secretary of state for filing must be executed:

(a) By the chairperson of the board of directors of a domestic or foreign corporation, by its president, or by another of its officers;

(b) If directors have not been selected or the corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

(c) If the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

Sec. 35. RCW 23B.01.230 and 2015 c 176 s 2103 are each amended to read as follows:

A ((record))document filed with the secretary of state is effective as provided in RCW 23.95.210, and may state a delayed effective date and time in accordance with RCW 23.95.210.

Sec. 36. RCW 23B.01.240 and 2015 c 176 s 2104 are each amended to read as follows:

A domestic or foreign corporation may correct a ((record))document filed by the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.220.

Sec. 37. RCW 23B.01.250 and 2015 c 176 s 2105 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 23.95.225 governs the secretary of state's duty to file ((records))documents delivered to the secretary of state for filing, the manner and effect of filing, and procedures that apply when the secretary of state refuses to file a ((record))document.

Sec. 38. RCW 23B.01.290 and 2015 c 176 s 2107 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 23.95.240 governs the penalty that applies for executing a false ((record))document that is intended to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

Sec. 39. RCW 23B.01.400 and 2019 c 141 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this title.

(1) "Articles of incorporation" include amended and restated articles of incorporation and articles of merger.

(2) "Authorized shares" means the shares of all classes a domestic or foreign corporation is authorized to issue.

(3) "Conspicuous" means so prepared that a reasonable person against whom the ((record))writing is to operate should have noticed it. For example, ((printing))text in italics ((or)), boldface ((or)), contrasting color, ((or typing in)) capitals, or underlined((,)) is conspicuous.

(4) "Controlling interest" means ownership of an entity's outstanding shares or interests in such number as to entitle the holder at the time to elect a majority of the entity's directors or other governors without regard to voting power which may thereafter exist upon a default, failure, or other contingency.

(5) "Corporate action" means any resolution, act, policy, contract, transaction, plan, adoption or amendment of articles of incorporation or bylaws, or other matter approved by or submitted for approval to a corporation's incorporators, board of directors or a committee thereof, or shareholders.

(6) "Corporation" or "domestic corporation" means a corporation for profit, including a social purpose corporation, which is not a foreign corporation, incorporated under or subject to the provisions of this title.

(7) "Deliver" ((includes (a) mailing, (b) for purposes of delivering a demand, consent, notice, or waiver to the corporation or one of its officers, directors, or shareholders, transmission by facsimile equipment, and (c) for purposes of delivering a demand, consent, notice, or waiver to the corporation or one of its officers, directors, or shareholders under RCW 23B.01.410 or chapter 23B.07, 23B.08, 23B.11, 23B.13, 23B.14, or 23B.16 RCW delivery))or "delivery" means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery, and, if authorized in accordance with RCW 23B.01.410, by electronic transmission.

(8) "Distribution" means a direct or indirect transfer of money or other property, except its own shares, or incurrence of indebtedness by a corporation to or for the benefit of its shareholders in respect to any of its shares. A distribution may be in the form of a declaration or payment of a dividend; a distribution in partial or complete liquidation, or upon voluntary or involuntary dissolution; a purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of shares; a distribution of indebtedness; or otherwise.

(9) (("Effective date of notice" has the meaning provided in RCW 23B.01.410.

(10) "Electronic transmission" means an electronic communication (a) not directly involving the physical transfer of a record in a tangible medium and (b) that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by the sender and the recipient thereof, and that may be directly reproduced in a tangible medium by such a sender and recipient.

(11) "Electronically transmitted" means the initiation of an electronic transmission.

(12)))"Document" means:

(a) Any tangible medium on which information is inscribed, and includes handwritten, typed, printed, or similar instruments or copies of such instruments; and

(b) An electronic record.

(10) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

(11) "Electronic mail" means an electronic transmission directed to a unique electronic mail address, which electronic mail will be deemed to include any files attached thereto and any information hyperlinked to a web site if the electronic mail includes the contact information of an officer or agent of the corporation who is available to assist with accessing such files and information.

(12) "Electronic mail address" means a destination, commonly expressed as a string of characters, consisting of a unique user name or mailbox, commonly referred to as the "local part" of the address, and a reference to an internet domain, commonly referred to as the "domain part" of the address, whether or not displayed, to which electronic mail can be sent or delivered.

(13) "Electronic record" means information that is stored in an electronic or other nontangible medium and is retrievable in paper form through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with RCW 23B.01.410(10).

(14) "Electronic transmission" or "electronically transmitted" means internet transmission, telephonic transmission, electronic mail transmission, transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or datagram, the use of, or participation in, one or more electronic networks or databases including one or more distributed electronic networks or databases, or any other form or process of communication, not directly involving the physical transfer of paper or another tangible medium, which:

(a) Is suitable for the retention, retrieval, and reproduction of information by the recipient; and

(b) Is retrievable in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with RCW 23B.01.410(10).

(15) "Employee" includes an officer but not a director. A director may accept duties that make the director also an employee.

(((13)))(16) "Entity" includes a corporation and foreign corporation, not-for-profit corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, two or more persons having a joint or common economic interest, the state, United States, and a foreign governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(((14)))(17) "Execute," "executes," or "executed" means (((a) signed with respect to a written record or (b) electronically transmitted along with sufficient information to determine the sender's identity with respect to)), with present intent to authenticate or adopt a document:

(a) To sign or adopt a tangible symbol to the document, and includes any manual, facsimile, or conformed signature;

(b) To attach or logically associate with an electronic transmission((, or))an electronic sound, symbol, or process, and includes an electronic signature; or

(c) ((with))With respect to a ((record))document to be filed with the secretary of state, in compliance with the standards for filing with the office of the secretary of state as prescribed by the secretary of state.

(((15)))(18) "Foreign corporation" means a corporation for profit incorporated under a law other than the law of this state.

(((16)))(19) "Foreign limited partnership" means a partnership formed under laws other than of this state and having as partners one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

(((17)))(20) "General social purpose" means the general social purpose for which a social purpose corporation is organized as set forth in the articles of incorporation of the corporation in accordance with RCW 23B.25.040(1)(c).

(((18)))(21) "Governmental subdivision" includes authority, county, district, and municipality.

(((19)))(22) "Governor" has the meaning given that term in RCW 23.95.105.

(((20)))(23) "Includes" denotes a partial definition.

(((21)))(24) "Individual" includes the estate of an incompetent or deceased individual.

(((22)))(25) "Limited partnership" or "domestic limited partnership" means a partnership formed by two or more persons under the laws of this state and having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

(((23)))(26) "Means" denotes an exhaustive definition.

(((24)))(27) "Notice" has the meaning provided in RCW 23B.01.410.

(((25)))(28) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(((26)))(29) "Principal office" means the office, in or out of this state, so designated in the annual report where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign corporation are located.

(((27)))(30) "Proceeding" includes civil suit and criminal, administrative, and investigatory action.

(((28)))(31) "Public company" means a corporation that has a class of shares registered with the federal securities and exchange commission pursuant to section 12 or 15 of the securities exchange act of 1934, or section 8 of the investment company act of 1940, or any successor statute.

(((29)))(32) "Qualified director" means (a) with respect to a director's conflicting interest transaction as defined in RCW 23B.08.700, any director who does not have either (i) a conflicting interest respecting the transaction, or (ii) a familial, financial, professional, or employment relationship with a second director who does have a conflicting interest respecting the transaction, which relationship would, in the circumstances, reasonably be expected to exert an influence on the first director's judgment when voting on the transaction; (b) with respect to RCW 23B.08.735, a qualified director under (a) of this subsection if the business opportunity were a director's conflicting interest transaction; and (c) with respect to RCW 23B.02.020(5)(k), a director who is not a director (i) to whom the limitation or elimination of the duty of an officer to offer potential business opportunities to the corporation would apply, or (ii) who has a familial, financial, professional, or employment relationship with another officer to whom the limitation or elimination would apply, which relationship would, in the circumstances, reasonably be expected to exert an influence on the director's judgment when voting on the limitation or elimination.

(((30) "Record" means information inscribed on a tangible medium or contained in an electronic transmission.

(31)))(33) "Record date" means the date established under chapter 23B.07 RCW on which a corporation determines the identity of its shareholders and their shareholdings for purposes of this title. The determinations shall be made as of the close of business on the record date unless another time for doing so is specified when the record date is fixed.

(((32)))(34) "Registered office" means the address of the corporation's registered agent.

(((33)))(35) "Secretary" means the corporate officer to whom the board of directors has delegated responsibility under RCW 23B.08.400(3) for custody of the minutes of the meetings of the board of directors and of the shareholders and for authenticating records of the corporation.

(((34)))(36) "Shareholder" means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of a corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with a corporation.

(((35)))(37) "Shares" means the units into which the proprietary interests in a corporation are divided.

(((36)))(38) "Social purpose" includes any general social purpose and any specific social purpose.

(((37)))(39) "Social purpose corporation" means a corporation that has elected to be governed as a social purpose corporation under chapter 23B.25 RCW.

(((38)))(40) "Specific social purpose" means the specific social purpose or purposes for which a social purpose corporation is organized as set forth in the articles of incorporation of the corporation in accordance with RCW 23B.25.040(2)(a).

(((39)))(41) "State," when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state and commonwealth, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions, and a territory and insular possession, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions, of the United States.

(((40)))(42) "Subscriber" means a person who subscribes for shares in a corporation, whether before or after incorporation.

(((41)))(43) "Subsidiary" means an entity in which the corporation has, directly or indirectly, a controlling interest.

(((42) "Tangible medium" means a writing, copy of a writing, or facsimile, or a physical reproduction, each on paper or on other tangible material.

(43)))(44) "United States" includes a district, authority, bureau, commission, department, and any other agency of the United States.

(((44)))(45) "Voting group" means all shares of one or more classes or series that under the articles of incorporation or this title are entitled to vote and be counted together collectively on a matter at a meeting of shareholders. All shares entitled by the articles of incorporation or this title to vote generally on the matter are for that purpose a single voting group.

(((45) "Writing" does not include an electronic transmission.

(46) "Written" means embodied in a tangible medium.))(46) "Writing" or "written" means any information in the form of a document.

Sec. 40. RCW 23B.01.410 and 2015 c 176 s 2108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Notice))A notice under this title must be ((provided in the form of a record))in writing, except that oral notice of any meeting of the board of directors may be given if expressly authorized by the articles of incorporation or bylaws. A notice includes material that this title requires to accompany the notice. Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, words in a notice or other communication under this title must be in English.

(2) ((Permissible means of transmission.

(a) Oral notice. Oral notice may be communicated in person, by telephone, wire, or wireless equipment which does not transmit a facsimile of the notice, or by any electronic means which does not create a record. If these forms of oral notice are impracticable, oral notice may be communicated by radio, television, or other form of public broadcast communication.

(b) Notice provided in a tangible medium. Notice may be provided in a tangible medium and be transmitted by mail, private carrier, or personal delivery; telegraph or teletype; or telephone, wire, or wireless equipment which transmits a facsimile of the notice. If these forms of notice in a tangible medium are impracticable, notice in a tangible medium may be transmitted by an advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the area where published.

(c) Notice provided in an electronic transmission.

(i) Notice may be provided in an electronic transmission and be electronically transmitted.

(ii) Notice to shareholders or directors in an electronic transmission is effective only with respect to shareholders and directors that have consented, in the form of a record, to receive electronically transmitted notices under this title and designated in the consent the address, location, or system to which these notices may be electronically transmitted and with respect to a notice that otherwise complies with any other requirements of this title and applicable federal law.

(A) Notice to shareholders or directors for this purpose includes material that this title requires to accompany the notice.

(B) A shareholder or director who has consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may revoke this consent by delivering a revocation to the corporation in the form of a record.

(C) The consent of any shareholder or director is revoked if (I) the corporation is unable to electronically transmit two consecutive notices given by the corporation in accordance with the consent, and (II) this inability becomes known to the secretary of the corporation, the transfer agent, or any other person responsible for giving the notice. The inadvertent failure by the corporation to treat this inability as a revocation does not invalidate any meeting or other corporate action.

(iii) Notice to shareholders or directors who have consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may be provided by (A) posting the notice on an electronic network and (B) delivering to the shareholder or director a separate record of the posting, together with comprehensible instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network.

(iv) Notice to a domestic or foreign corporation, authorized to transact business in this state, in an electronic transmission is effective only with respect to a corporation that has designated in a record an address, location, or system to which the notices may be electronically transmitted.

(d) Materials accompanying notice to shareholders of public companies.))A notice or other communication may be given by any method of delivery, except that electronic transmissions must be in accordance with this section. If the methods of delivery are impracticable, a notice or other communication may be given by means of a broad nonexclusionary distribution to the public, which may include a newspaper of general circulation in the area where published; radio, television, or other form of public broadcast communication; or other methods of distribution that the corporation has previously identified to its shareholders.

(3) A notice or other communication to a domestic or foreign corporation registered to do business in this state may be delivered to the corporation's registered agent or to the secretary at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report or, in the case of a foreign corporation that has not yet delivered an annual report, in its foreign registration statement.

(4) A notice or other communications may be delivered by electronic transmission if consented to by the recipient or if authorized by subsection (10) of this section; except that if the articles of incorporation or bylaws authorize or require delivery of notices of meetings of directors by electronic transmission, then no consent to delivery of such notices by electronic transmission is required.

(5) Any consent under subsection (4) of this section may be revoked by the person who consented by written notice to the person to whom the consent was delivered. Any such consent is deemed revoked if:

(a) The corporation is unable to deliver two consecutive electronic transmissions given by the corporation in accordance with such consent; and

(b) Such inability becomes known to the secretary or to the transfer agent, or other person responsible for the giving of notice or other communications. The inadvertent failure to treat such inability as a revocation will not invalidate any meeting or other corporate action.

(6) Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic transmission is received when:

(a) If by electronic mail, it is directed to the recipient's electronic mail address including, in the case of a shareholder, to the shareholder's electronic mail address as it appears in the corporation's records;

(b) If by posting on an electronic network, upon the later of such posting and the delivery of separate notice to the recipient of such specific posting together with comprehensible instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network; and

(c) If by any other electronic transmission, it enters an information processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purposes of receiving electronic transmissions or information of the type sent, and from which the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic transmission and it is in a form capable of being processed by that system.

(7) Receipt of an electronic acknowledgment from an information processing system described in subsection (6)(c) of this section establishes that an electronic transmission was received but, by itself, does not establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

(8) An electronic transmission is received under this section even if no person is aware of its receipt.

(9) A notice or other communication, if in a comprehensible form or manner, is effective at the earliest of the following:

(a) If in a physical form, the earliest of when it is actually received, or when it is left at:

(i) A shareholder's address as it appears in the corporation's records;

(ii) A director's residence or usual place of business; or

(iii) The corporation's principal office;

(b) If mailed to a shareholder, upon deposit in the United States mail with first-class postage prepaid and correctly addressed to the shareholder's mailing address as it appears in the corporation's records;

(c) If mailed to a recipient other than a shareholder, the earliest of when it is actually received, or:

(i) If sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, the date shown on the return receipt signed by or on behalf of the addressee; or

(ii) Five days after it is deposited in the United States mail with first-class postage prepaid and correctly addressed to the recipient;

(d) If sent by air courier, when dispatched and correctly addressed to a shareholder's mailing address as it appears in the corporation's records;

(e) If an electronic transmission, when it is received as provided in subsection (6) of this section; and

(f) If oral, when communicated.

(10) A notice or other communication may be in the form of an electronic transmission that cannot be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice only if:

(a) The electronic transmission is otherwise retrievable in perceivable form; and

(b) The sender and the recipient have consented in writing to the use of such form of electronic transmission.

(11) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or any other section of this title, if this title requires that a notice to shareholders be accompanied by certain material, a public company may satisfy such a requirement, whether or not a shareholder has consented to receive electronically transmitted notice, by (((i)))(a) posting the material on an electronic network (either separate from, or in combination or as part of, any other materials the public company has posted on the electronic network in compliance with applicable federal law) at or prior to the time that the notice is delivered to the public company's shareholders entitled to receive the notice, and (((ii)))(b) delivering to the public company's shareholders entitled to receive the notice a separate record of the posting (which record may accompany, or be contained in, the notice), together with comprehensible instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network. In such a case, the material is deemed to have been delivered to the public company's shareholders at the time the notice to the shareholders is effective under this section. A public company that elects pursuant to this section to post on an electronic network any material required by this title to accompany a notice to shareholders is required, at its expense, to provide a copy of the material in a tangible medium (alone or in combination or as part of any other materials the public company has posted on the electronic network in compliance with federal law) to any shareholder entitled to such a notice who so requests.

(((3) Effective time and date of notice.

(a) Oral notice. Oral notice is effective when received.

(b) Notice provided in a tangible medium.

(i) Notice in a tangible medium, if in a comprehensible form, is effective at the earliest of the following:

(A) If expressly authorized by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, and if notice is sent to the person's address, telephone number, or other number appearing on the records of the corporation, when dispatched by telegraph, teletype, or facsimile equipment;

(B) When received;

(C) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, five days after its deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the postmark, if mailed with first-class postage, prepaid and correctly addressed; or

(D) On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee.

(ii) Notice in a tangible medium by a domestic or foreign corporation to its shareholder, if in a comprehensible form and correctly addressed to the shareholder's address shown in the corporation's current record of shareholders, is effective:

(A) When mailed, if mailed with first-class postage prepaid; and

(B) When dispatched, if prepaid, by air courier.

(iii) Notice in a tangible medium to a domestic or foreign corporation, authorized to transact business in this state, may be addressed to the corporation's registered agent or to the corporation or its secretary at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report, or in the case of a foreign corporation that has not yet delivered its annual report in its foreign registration statement.

(c) Notice provided in an electronic transmission. Notice provided in an electronic transmission, if in comprehensible form, is effective when it: (i) Is electronically transmitted to an address, location, or system designated by the recipient for that purpose; or (ii) has been posted on an electronic network and a separate record of the posting has been delivered to the recipient together with comprehensible instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network.

(4)))(12) If this title prescribes ((notice)) requirements for notices or other communications in particular circumstances, those requirements govern. If articles of incorporation or bylaws prescribe ((notice)) requirements for notices or other communications, not inconsistent with this section or other provisions of this title, those requirements govern. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may authorize or require delivery of notices of meetings of directors by electronic transmission.

(13) In the event that any provisions of this title are deemed to modify, limit, or supersede the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., the provisions of this title will control to the maximum extent permitted by section 102(a)(2) of that federal act.

Sec. 41. RCW 23B.01.420 and 2003 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A corporation has ((provided))delivered written notice or any other ((record to))report or statement to all shareholders of record who share a common address if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The corporation delivers one copy of the notice ((or other record)), report, or statement to the common address;

(b) The corporation addresses the notice ((or other record)), report, or statement to the shareholders who share that address either as a group or to each of the shareholders individually; and

(c) Each of those shareholders consents ((in a record)) to delivery of a single copy of such ((a)) notice ((or other record)), report, or statement to the shareholders' common address, and the corporation notifies each shareholder of the duration of that shareholder's consent, and explains the manner by which the shareholder can revoke the consent.

(2) For purposes of this section, "address" means a street address, a post office box number, a facsimile telephone number, ((a common))an address, location, or system for electronic transmissions, an email address, or another similar destination to which records are delivered.

(3) If a shareholder ((revokes))delivers written notice of revocation to consent to delivery of a single copy of any notice ((or other record)), report, or statement to a common address, or ((notifies))delivers written notice to the corporation that the shareholder wishes to receive an individual copy of any notice ((or other record)), report, or statement, the corporation shall begin sending individual copies to that shareholder within thirty days after ((the corporation receives the revocation of consent or))delivery of the written notice.

(4) Prior to the delivery of notice by electronic transmission to a common address, ((location, or system for electronic transmissions under this section,)) each shareholder consenting to receive notice under this section must also have consented to the receipt of notices by electronic transmission as provided in RCW 23B.01.410.

Sec. 42. RCW 23B.02.050 and 2015 c 176 s 2113 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After incorporation:

(a) If initial directors are named in the articles of incorporation, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting, at the call of a majority of the directors, to complete the organization of the corporation by appointing officers, adopting bylaws, and carrying on any other business brought before the meeting;

(b) If initial directors are not named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators:

(i) To elect directors and complete the organization of the corporation; or

(ii) To elect a board of directors who shall complete the organization of the corporation.

(2) Corporate action required or permitted by this title to be approved by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be approved without a meeting if the approval is evidenced by ((the consent of each of the incorporators in the form of a record))one or more written consents describing the corporate action so approved and executed by each incorporator.

(3) An organizational meeting may be held in or out of this state.

(4) A corporation must deliver an initial report to the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.255.

Sec. 43. RCW 23B.06.200 and 1989 c 165 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A written subscription for shares entered into before incorporation is irrevocable for six months unless the subscription agreement provides a longer or shorter period or all the subscribers agree to revocation.

(2) The board of directors may determine the payment terms of subscriptions for shares that were entered into before incorporation, unless the subscription agreement specifies them. A call for payment by the board of directors must be uniform so far as practicable as to all shares of the same class or series, unless the subscription agreement specifies otherwise.

(3) Shares issued pursuant to subscriptions entered into before incorporation are fully paid and nonassessable when the corporation receives the consideration specified in the subscription agreement.

(4) If a subscriber defaults in payment of money or property under a subscription agreement entered into before incorporation, the corporation may collect the amount owed as any other debt. Alternatively, unless the subscription agreement provides otherwise, the corporation may rescind the agreement and may sell the shares if the debt remains unpaid more than twenty days after the corporation ((sends))delivers a written demand for payment to the subscriber.

(5) A subscription agreement entered into after incorporation is a contract between the subscriber and the corporation subject to RCW 23B.06.210.

Sec. 44. RCW 23B.06.250 and 1989 c 165 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Shares may, but need not, be represented by certificates. Unless this title or another statute expressly provides otherwise, the rights and obligations of shareholders are identical regardless of whether ((or not)) their shares are represented by certificates.

(2) At a minimum each share certificate must state on its face:

(a) The name of the issuing corporation and that it is organized under the laws of this state;

(b) The name of the person to whom issued; and

(c) The number and class of shares and the designation of the series, if any, the certificate represents.

(3) If the issuing corporation is authorized to issue different classes of shares or different series within a class, the designations, relative rights, preferences, and limitations applicable to each class and the variations in rights, preferences, and limitations determined for each series, and the authority of the board of directors to determine variations for future series, must be summarized on the front or back of each certificate. Alternatively, each certificate may state conspicuously on its front or back that the corporation will furnish the shareholder this information without charge on request in writing.

(4) Each share certificate (a) must be ((signed, either manually or in facsimile,))executed by two officers designated in the bylaws or by the board of directors and (b) may bear the corporate seal or its facsimile.

(5) If the person who ((signed, either manually or in facsimile,))executed a share certificate no longer holds office when the certificate is issued, the certificate is nevertheless valid.

Sec. 45. RCW 23B.06.260 and 2009 c 189 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may approve the ((issue))issuance of some or all of the shares of any or all of its classes or series without certificates. The approval does not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered to the corporation.

(2) Within a reasonable time after the ((issue))issuance or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation shall ((send))deliver to the shareholder a ((record))written statement containing the information required on certificates by RCW 23B.06.250 (2) and (3), and, if applicable, RCW 23B.06.270.

Sec. 46. RCW 23B.06.300 and 2019 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The shareholders of a corporation do not have a preemptive right to acquire the corporation's unissued shares except to the extent the articles of incorporation provide otherwise or as set forth in subsection (2) of this section. A statement included in the articles of incorporation that "the corporation elects to have preemptive rights," or words of similar import, means that the provisions set forth in subsection (3) of this section apply except to the extent that the articles of incorporation provide otherwise.

(2) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, the shareholders of a corporation formed before January 1, 2020, have a preemptive right to acquire the corporation's unissued shares.

(3) If shareholders of a corporation have a preemptive right to acquire the corporation's unissued shares under this section, the following provisions apply:

(a) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, such preemptive right is granted on uniform terms and conditions prescribed by the board of directors to provide a fair and reasonable opportunity to exercise the right, to acquire proportional amounts of the corporation's unissued shares upon the decision of the board of directors to issue them.

(b) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a shareholder may waive the shareholder's preemptive right. A waiver evidenced by ((an executed record))a writing is irrevocable even though it is not supported by consideration.

(c) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, there is no preemptive right with respect to:

(i) Shares issued as compensation to directors, officers, agents, employees, or other service providers of the corporation, or its subsidiaries or affiliates;

(ii) Shares issued to satisfy conversion or option rights created to provide compensation to directors, officers, agents, or employees of the corporation, or its subsidiaries or affiliates;

(iii) Shares issued pursuant to the corporation's initial plan of financing; and

(iv) Shares issued for consideration other than money.

(d) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise:

(i) Holders of shares of any class without general voting rights but with preferential rights to distributions or assets have no preemptive rights with respect to shares of any class; and

(ii) Holders of shares of any class with general voting rights but without preferential rights to distributions or assets have no preemptive rights with respect to shares of any class with preferential rights to distributions or assets unless the shares with preferential rights are convertible into or carry a right to subscribe for or acquire shares without preferential rights.

(e) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, shares subject to preemptive rights that are not acquired by shareholders may be issued to any person for a period of one year after being offered to shareholders at a consideration set by the board of directors that is not lower than the consideration set for the exercise of preemptive rights. An offer at a lower consideration or after the expiration of one year is subject to the shareholders' preemptive rights.

(f) For purposes of this section, "shares" includes a security convertible into or carrying a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.

Sec. 47. RCW 23B.07.010 and 2018 c 55 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (6) of this section, a corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually for the election of directors at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

(2)(a) If the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of a corporation registered as an investment company under the investment company act of 1940 so provide, the corporation is not required to hold an annual meeting of shareholders in any year in which the election of directors is not required by the investment company act of 1940.

(b) If a corporation is required under (a) of this subsection to hold an annual meeting of shareholders to elect directors, the meeting shall be held no later than one hundred twenty days after the occurrence of the event requiring the meeting.

(3) Subject to subsection (4) of this section:

(a) Annual shareholders' meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws; and

(b) If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office.

(4) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, if the board of directors or another person is authorized in the bylaws to determine the place of annual meetings, the board of directors or such other person may, in the sole discretion of the board of directors or such other person, determine that an annual meeting will not involve a physical assembly of shareholders at a particular geographic location, but instead will be held solely by means of remote communication, in accordance with RCW 23B.07.080.

(5) The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation's bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

(6) Shareholders may ((act by consent set forth in a record to)) elect directors by written consent as permitted by RCW 23B.07.040 in lieu of holding an annual meeting.

Sec. 48. RCW 23B.07.020 and 2018 c 55 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A corporation shall hold a special meeting of shareholders:

(a) On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles of incorporation or bylaws; or

(b) Except as set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if ((the holders of))shareholders holding at least ten percent of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting execute, date, and deliver to the ((corporation's secretary))corporation one or more written demands ((set forth in an executed and dated record)) for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held((, which demands shall be set forth either (i) in an executed record or (ii) if the corporation has designated an address, location, or system to which the demands may be electronically transmitted and the demands are electronically transmitted to that designated address, location, or system, in an executed electronically transmitted record)).

(2) The right of shareholders of a public company to call a special meeting may be limited or denied to the extent provided in the articles of incorporation.

(3) If the corporation is other than a public company, the articles of incorporation or bylaws may require the demand specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section be made by a greater percentage, not in excess of twenty-five percent, of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting.

(4) If not otherwise fixed under RCW 23B.07.030 or 23B.07.070, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting is the ((date of delivery of the)) first date on which an executed shareholder demand ((in compliance with subsection (1) of this section))is delivered to the corporation.

(5) Subject to subsection (6) of this section:

(a) Special shareholders' meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws; and

(b) If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office.

(6) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, if the board of directors or another person is authorized in the bylaws to determine the place of special meetings, the board of directors or such other person may, in the sole discretion of the board of directors or such other person, determine that a special meeting will not involve a physical assembly of shareholders at a particular geographic location, but instead will be held solely by means of remote communication, in accordance with RCW 23B.07.080.

(7) Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by RCW 23B.07.050(3) may be conducted at a special shareholders' meeting.

Sec. 49. RCW 23B.07.035 and 2007 c 467 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A corporation having any shares listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one or more members of a national or affiliated securities association shall, and any other corporation may, appoint one or more inspectors to act at a meeting of shareholders ((and make a written report of the inspectors' determinations))in connection with determining voting results. Each inspector shall ((take and sign an oath))verify in writing that the inspector will faithfully ((to)) execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of the inspector's ability.

(2) The inspectors shall:

(a) Ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each;

(b) Determine the shares represented at a meeting;

(c) Determine the validity of ((proxies))proxy appointments and ballots;

(d) Count ((all))the votes and ballots; and

(e) ((Determine))Make a written report of the results.

(3) An inspector may be an officer or employee of the corporation.

(4) If no challenge of a determination by the inspectors is timely made, such determination is conclusive. Challenge of any determination by the inspectors may be made in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Sec. 50. RCW 23B.07.040 and 2009 c 189 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Corporate action required or permitted by this title to be approved by a shareholder vote at a meeting may be approved without a meeting or a vote if either:

(i) The corporate action is approved by all shareholders entitled to vote on the corporate action; or

(ii) The corporate action is approved by shareholders holding of record or otherwise entitled to vote in the aggregate not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to approve such corporate action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote on the corporate action were present and voted, and at the time the corporate action is approved the corporation is not a public company and is authorized to approve such corporate action under this subsection (1)(a)(ii) by a general or limited authorization contained in its articles of incorporation.

(b) Corporate action may be approved by shareholders without a meeting or a vote ((by means of execution of a single consent or multiple counterpart consents by))if the approval is evidenced by one or more written consents:

(i) Executed by shareholders holding of record or otherwise entitled to vote in the aggregate not less than the minimum number of votes necessary under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection((. Any such shareholder consent must: (i) Be in the form of an executed record));

(ii) ((indicate))Indicating the date of execution ((of the consent by each shareholder who executes it)), which date must be on or after the applicable record date determined in accordance with subsection (2) of this section;

(iii) ((describe))Describing the corporate action being approved; and

(iv) ((when))Delivered to the corporation for filing by the corporation with the minutes or corporate records in accordance with subsection (4) of this section. When delivered to each shareholder for execution, the consent must include or be accompanied by the same material that would have been required by this title to be delivered to shareholders in or accompanying a notice of meeting at which the proposed corporate action would have been submitted for shareholder approval((; and (v) be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records in accordance with subsection (4) of this section)). A shareholder may withdraw an executed shareholder consent by delivering a written notice of withdrawal ((in the form of an executed record)) to the corporation prior to the time when shareholder consents sufficient to approve the corporate action have been delivered to the corporation.

(c) A written consent in the form of an electronic transmission must contain or be accompanied by information from which the corporation can determine that the electronic transmission was transmitted by the shareholder and the date on which the shareholder transmitted the electronic transmission.

(2) The record date for determining shareholders entitled to approve a corporate action without a meeting may be fixed under RCW 23B.07.030 or 23B.07.070, but if not so fixed shall be the date of execution indicated on the earliest dated shareholder consent executed under subsection (1) of this section, even though such shareholder consent may not have been delivered to the corporation on that date.

(3)(a) Notice that shareholder consents are being sought under subsection (1)(a) of this section ((shall))must be given, by the corporation or by another person soliciting such consents, on or promptly after the record date, to all shareholders entitled to vote on the record date who have not yet executed the shareholder consent and, if this title would otherwise require that notice of a meeting of shareholders to consider the proposed corporate action be given to nonvoting shareholders, to all nonvoting shareholders as of the record date. Notice given under this subsection (3)(a) ((shall))must include or be accompanied by the same information required to be included in or to accompany the shareholder consent under subsection (1)(b)(iii) and (iv) of this section.

(b) Notice that sufficient ((shareholder))written consents have been executed to approve the proposed corporate action under either of subsection (1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section ((shall))must be given by the corporation, promptly after delivery to the corporation of ((shareholder))written consents sufficient to approve the corporate action in accordance with subsection (4) of this section, to all shareholders entitled to vote on the record date and, if this title would otherwise require that notice of a meeting of shareholders to consider the proposed corporate action be given to nonvoting shareholders, to all nonvoting shareholders as of the record date.

(4) Unless the consent executed by shareholders specifies a later time as the time at which the approval of the corporate action is to be effective ((date)), shareholder approval obtained under this section is effective when:

(a) Executed shareholder consents sufficient to approve the proposed corporate action have been delivered to the corporation((, either at an address designated by the corporation for delivery of such shareholder consents or at the corporation's registered office, or to such electronic address, location, or system as the corporation may have designated for delivery of such shareholder consents))in any manner authorized by RCW 23B.01.410; and

(b) ((any))Any period of advance notice required by the corporation's articles of incorporation to be given to any nonconsenting shareholders has been satisfied. ((Executed shareholder consents are not))No written consent is effective to approve a proposed corporate action unless, within sixty days after the earliest date ((of the earliest dated shareholder))on which a consent delivered to the corporation as required by this section was executed, written consents executed by a sufficient number of shareholders to approve the corporate action are delivered to the corporation.

(5) Approval of corporate action by ((execution of shareholder))written consents under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any ((record))document, except that, if the corporate action requires the filing of a certificate under any other section of this title, the certificate so filed shall state, in lieu of any statement required by that section concerning any vote of shareholders, that shareholder approval has been obtained in accordance with this section and that notice to any nonconsenting shareholders has been given to the extent required by this section.

Sec. 51. RCW 23B.07.060 and 2009 c 189 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A shareholder may waive any notice required by this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time ((of the meeting that is the subject of such))stated in the notice, or in the case of notice required by RCW 23B.07.040(3), before or after the corporate action to be approved by ((executed))written consent becomes effective. Except as provided by subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the waiver must be ((delivered))in writing, be executed by the shareholder entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for ((inclusion in))filing by the corporation with the minutes or ((filing with the)) corporate records((, which waiver shall be set forth either (a) in an executed and dated record or (b) if the corporation has designated an address, location, or system to which the waiver may be electronically transmitted and the waiver is electronically transmitted to the designated address, location, or system, in an executed and dated electronically transmitted record)).

(2) A shareholder's attendance at a meeting waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting.

(3) A shareholder waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at a meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

Sec. 52. RCW 23B.07.200 and 2009 c 189 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After fixing a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its shareholders on the record date who are entitled to notice of a shareholders' meeting. The list must be arranged by voting group, and within each voting group by class or series of shares, and show the address of and number of shares held by each shareholder. Nothing contained in this section requires the corporation to include on such list the electronic mail address or other electronic contact information of a shareholder.

(2) The shareholders' list must be available for inspection by any shareholder, beginning ten days prior to the meeting and continuing through the meeting, at the corporation's principal office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. A shareholder, the shareholder's agent, or the shareholder's attorney is entitled to inspect the list, during regular business hours and at the shareholder's expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

(3) The corporation shall make the shareholders' list available at the meeting, and any shareholder, the shareholder's agent, or the shareholder's attorney is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment.

(4) If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder, the shareholder's agent, or the shareholder's attorney to inspect the shareholders' list before or at the meeting, the superior court of the county where a corporation's principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located, on application of the shareholder, may summarily order the inspection at the corporation's expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection is complete.

(5) A shareholder's right to copy the shareholders' list, and a shareholder's right to otherwise inspect and copy the record of shareholders, is governed by RCW 23B.16.020(3).

(6) Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders' list does not affect the validity of corporate action approved at the meeting.

Sec. 53. RCW 23B.07.220 and 2002 c 297 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A shareholder may vote the shareholder's shares in person or by proxy.

(2) A shareholder or the shareholder's agent or attorney-in-fact may appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the shareholder by((:

(a) Executing a writing authorizing another person or persons to act for the shareholder as proxy. Execution may be accomplished by the shareholder or the shareholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent signing the writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to the writing by any reasonable means including, but not limited to, by facsimile signature; or

(b) Authorizing another person or persons to act for the shareholder as proxy by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a recorded telephone call, voice mail, or other electronic transmission to the person who will be the holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service organization, or like agent duly authorized by the person who will be the holder of the proxy to receive the transmission, provided that the transmission must either set forth or be submitted with information, including any security or validation controls used, from which it can reasonably be determined that the transmission was authorized by the shareholder. If it is determined that the transmission is valid, the inspectors of election or, if there are no inspectors, any officer or agent of the corporation making that determination on behalf of the corporation shall specify the information upon which they relied. The corporation shall require the holders of proxies received by transmission to provide to the corporation copies of the transmission and the corporation shall retain copies of the transmission for a reasonable period of time after the election provided that they are retained for at least sixty days))executing an appointment form, or by an electronic transmission. An electronic transmission must contain or be accompanied by information from which the recipient can determine the date of the transmission and that the transmission was authorized by the sender or the sender's agent or attorney-in-fact.

(3) An appointment of a proxy is effective when ((a signed))an executed appointment form or ((telegram, cablegram, recorded telephone call, voice mail, or other))an electronic transmission of the appointment is received by the inspector((s)) of election or the officer or agent of the corporation authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for ((eleven months unless a longer period is expressly))the term provided in the appointment form or electronic transmission, and, if no term is provided, is valid for eleven months unless the appointment is irrevocable under subsection (4) of this section.

(4) An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the shareholder unless the appointment ((indicates))form or electronic transmission states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. Appointments coupled with an interest include the appointment of:

(a) A pledgee;

(b) A person who purchased or agreed to purchase the shares;

(c) A creditor of the corporation who extended it credit under terms requiring the appointment;

(d) An employee of the corporation whose employment contract requires the appointment; or

(e) A party to a voting agreement created under RCW 23B.07.310.

(5) The death or incapacity of the shareholder appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy's authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the officer or agent of the corporation authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises the proxy's authority under the appointment.

(6) An appointment made irrevocable under subsection (4) of this section is revoked when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished.

(7) A transferee for value of shares subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if the transferee did not know of its existence when the transferee acquired the shares and the existence of the irrevocable appointment was not noted conspicuously on the certificate representing the shares or on the information statement for shares without certificates.

(8) Subject to RCW 23B.07.240 and to any express limitation on the proxy's authority stated in the appointment form or ((recorded telephone call, voice mail, or other)) electronic transmission, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy's vote or other action as that of the shareholder making the appointment.

(((9) For the purposes of this section only, "sign" or "signature" includes any manual, facsimile, conformed, or electronic signature.))

Sec. 54. RCW 23B.07.240 and 2002 c 297 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the name executed on a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is entitled to accept the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

(2) If the name executed on a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the name of its shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

(a) The shareholder is an entity and the name executed purports to be that of an officer, partner, or agent of the entity;

(b) The name executed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

(c) The name executed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

(d) The name executed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory's authority to ((sign))execute for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment; or

(e) Two or more persons are the shareholder as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name executed purports to be the name of at least one of the co-owners and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the co-owners.

(3) The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the ((secretary or other officer or agent))person authorized to ((tabulate))count votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of its execution.

(4) ((The))Neither the corporation ((and its officer or agent who))nor the person authorized to count votes, including an inspector of election under RCW 23B.07.035, that accepts or rejects a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section or RCW 23B.07.220(2) ((are not))is liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

(5) Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section, or RCW 23B.07.220(2) is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

Sec. 55. RCW 23B.07.300 and 2017 c 28 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) One or more shareholders may create a voting trust, conferring on a trustee the right to vote or otherwise act for them, by ((signing))executing an agreement setting out the provisions of the trust, which may include anything consistent with its purpose, and transferring their shares to the trustee. When a voting trust agreement is ((signed))executed, the trustee shall prepare a list of the names and addresses of all voting trust beneficial owners, together with the number and class of shares each voting trust beneficial owner transferred to the trust, and deliver copies of the list and agreement to the corporation's principal office.

(2) A voting trust becomes effective on the date the first shares subject to the trust are registered in the trustee's name.

(3) Limits, if any, on the duration of a voting trust are to be as set forth in the voting trust agreement. A voting trust that became effective when this section limited the term of a voting trust to ten years will remain governed by the provisions of this section then in effect relating to the duration of voting trusts, unless the voting trust agreement is amended to provide otherwise by unanimous agreement of the parties to that agreement.

Sec. 56. RCW 23B.07.310 and 1989 c 165 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Two or more shareholders may provide for the manner in which they will vote their shares by ((signing))executing an agreement for that purpose. A voting agreement created under this section is not subject to the provisions of RCW 23B.07.300.

(2) A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

Sec. 57. RCW 23B.07.320 and 2017 c 28 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An agreement among the shareholders of a corporation that is not contrary to public policy and that complies with this section is effective among the shareholders and the corporation even though it is inconsistent with one or more other provisions of this title in that it:

(a) Eliminates the board of directors or restricts the discretion or powers of the board of directors;

(b) Governs the approval or making of distributions whether or not in proportion to ownership of shares, subject to the limitations in RCW 23B.06.400;

(c) Establishes who shall be directors or officers of the corporation, or their terms of office or manner of selection or removal;

(d) Governs, in general or in regard to specific matters, the exercise or division of voting power by or between the shareholders and directors or by or among any of them, including use of weighted voting rights or director proxies;

(e) Establishes the terms and conditions of any agreement for the transfer or use of property or the provision of services between the corporation and any shareholder, director, officer, or employee of the corporation or among any of them;

(f) Transfers to one or more shareholders or other persons all or part of the authority to exercise the corporate powers or to manage the business and affairs of the corporation;

(g) Provides a process by which a deadlock among directors or shareholders may be resolved;

(h) Requires dissolution of the corporation at the request of one or more shareholders or upon the occurrence of a specified event or contingency; or

(i) Otherwise governs the exercise of the corporate powers or the management of the business and affairs of the corporation or the relationship among the shareholders, the directors, and the corporation, or among any of them.

(2) An agreement authorized by this section shall be:

(a) Set forth in a written agreement that is ((signed))executed by all persons who are shareholders at the time of the agreement and is made known to the corporation; and

(b) Subject to amendment only by all persons who are shareholders at the time of the amendment, unless the agreement provides otherwise.

(3) The existence of an agreement authorized by this section shall be noted conspicuously on the front or back of each certificate for outstanding shares or on the information statement required by RCW 23B.06.260(2). If at the time of the agreement the corporation has shares outstanding represented by certificates, the corporation shall recall the outstanding certificates and issue substitute certificates that comply with this subsection. The failure to note the existence of the agreement on the certificate or information statement shall not affect the validity of the agreement or any action taken pursuant to it. Unless the agreement provides otherwise, any person who acquires outstanding or newly issued shares in the corporation after an agreement authorized by this section has been effected, whether by purchase, gift, operation of law, or otherwise, is deemed to have assented to the agreement and to be a party to the agreement. A purchaser of shares who is aggrieved because he or she at the time of purchase did not have actual or constructive knowledge of the existence of the agreement may either: (a) Bring an action to rescind the purchase within the earlier of ninety days after discovery of the existence of the agreement or two years after the purchase of the shares; or (b) continue to hold the shares subject to the agreement but with a right of action for any damages resulting from nondisclosure of the existence of the agreement. A purchaser shall be deemed to have constructive knowledge of the existence of the agreement if its existence is noted on the certificate or information statement for the shares in compliance with this subsection and, if the shares are not represented by a certificate, the information statement is delivered to the purchaser at or prior to the time of purchase of the shares.

(4) An agreement authorized by this section shall cease to be effective when shares of the corporation are listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one or more members of a national or affiliated securities association.

(5) An agreement authorized by this section that limits the discretion or powers of the board of directors shall relieve the directors of, and impose upon the person or persons in whom such discretion or powers are vested, liability for acts or omissions imposed by law on directors to the extent that the discretion or powers of the directors are limited by the agreement.

(6) The existence or performance of an agreement authorized by this section shall not be a ground for imposing personal liability on any shareholder for the acts or debts of the corporation even if the agreement or its performance treats the corporation as if it were a partnership or results in failure to observe the corporate formalities otherwise applicable to the matters governed by the agreement.

(7) Incorporators or subscribers for shares may act as shareholders with respect to an agreement authorized by this section if no shares have been issued when the agreement is made.

(8) Limits, if any, on the duration of an agreement governed by this section are to be as set forth in the agreement. An agreement governed by this section that became effective when this section limited the term of such an agreement to ten years unless the agreement provided otherwise will remain governed by the provisions of this section then in effect relating to the duration of agreements among shareholders.

Sec. 58. RCW 23B.08.070 and 2007 c 467 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A director may resign at any time by delivering a written notice ((in the form of an executed))of resignation to the board of directors, its chairperson, the president, or the secretary of the corporation.

(2) A ((notice of)) resignation is effective ((when the resignation is delivered unless the resignation specifies a later effective date, or an effective date))as provided in RCW 23B.01.410(9) unless the notice provides for a delayed effectiveness, including effectiveness determined upon ((the happening of an))a future event or events. A ((notice of)) resignation that is conditioned upon failing to receive a specified vote for election as a director may provide that it is irrevocable.

Sec. 59. RCW 23B.08.210 and 2009 c 189 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, corporate action required or permitted by this title to be approved at a board of directors' meeting may be approved without a meeting if the corporate action is approved by all members of the board. The approval of the corporate action must be evidenced by one or more written consents describing the corporate action being approved, executed by each director either before or after the corporate action becomes effective, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records((, each of which consents shall be set forth either (a) in an executed record or (b) if the corporation has designated an address, location, or system to which the consents may be electronically transmitted and the consent is electronically transmitted to the designated address, location, or system, in an executed electronically transmitted record)).

(2) A written consent in the form of an electronic transmission must contain or be accompanied by information from which the corporation can determine that the electronic transmission was transmitted by the director and the date on which the director transmitted the electronic transmission.

(3) Corporate action is approved under this section when the last director executes the consent.

(((3)))(4) A consent under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any ((record))document.

Sec. 60. RCW 23B.08.230 and 2009 c 189 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A director may waive any notice required by this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice, and such waiver shall be equivalent to the giving of such notice. Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, the waiver must be ((delivered))in writing, executed by the director entitled to the notice, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records((, which waiver shall be set forth either (a) in an executed record or (b) if the corporation has designated an address, location, or system to which the waiver may be electronically transmitted and the waiver has been electronically transmitted to the designated address, location, or system, in an executed electronically transmitted record)).

(2) A director's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon the director's arrival, objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to any corporate action approved at the meeting.

Sec. 61. RCW 23B.08.240 and 2009 c 189 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require a greater or lesser number, a quorum of a board of directors consists of a majority of the number of directors specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a quorum of a board of directors may in no event be less than one-third of the number of directors specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(3) If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

(4) A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors when corporate action is approved is deemed to have assented to the corporate action unless: (a) The director objects at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon the director's arrival, to holding it or transacting business at the meeting; (b) the director's dissent or abstention as to the corporate action is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or (c) the director delivers written notice of the director's dissent or abstention as to the corporate action to the presiding officer of the meeting before adjournment or to the corporation within a reasonable time after adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the corporate action.

Sec. 62. RCW 23B.08.430 and 1989 c 165 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An officer may resign at any time by delivering a written notice to the board of directors, its chairperson, or to the appointing officer or the secretary of the corporation. A resignation is effective ((when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective date))as provided in RCW 23B.01.410(9) unless the notice provides for a delayed effectiveness, including effectiveness determined upon a future event or events. If effectiveness of a resignation is stated to be delayed and the board of directors or the appointing officer accepts the delay, the board of directors or the appointing officer may fill the pending vacancy before the delayed effectiveness but the new officer may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

(2) ((A))The board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause. An officer or assistant officer((, if appointed by another officer,)) may be removed by ((any officer authorized to appoint officers or assistant officers)):

(a) An appointing officer at any time with or without cause, unless the bylaws or the board of directors provide otherwise; or

(b) Any other officer if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

(3) In this section, "appointing officer" means the officer, including any successor to that officer, who appointed the officer resigning or being removed.

Sec. 63. RCW 23B.08.530 and 1989 c 165 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A corporation may pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred by a director who is a party to a proceeding in advance of final disposition of the proceeding if:

(a) The director ((furnishes))delivers to the corporation ((a))an executed written affirmation of the director's good faith belief that the director has met the standard of conduct described in RCW 23B.08.510; and

(b) The director ((furnishes))delivers to the corporation ((a))an executed written undertaking, executed personally or on the director's behalf, to repay the advance if it is ultimately determined that the director did not meet the standard of conduct.

(2) The undertaking required by subsection (1)(b) of this section must be an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment.

(3) Authorization of payments under this section may be made by provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, by resolution adopted by the shareholders or board of directors, or by contract.

Sec. 64. RCW 23B.09.020 and 2014 c 83 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

A plan of entity conversion must ((be in a record and must)) include:

(1) The name of the domestic corporation before conversion;

(2) The name and form of the surviving entity after conversion;

(3) The terms and conditions of the conversion, including the manner and basis for converting interests in the domestic corporation into any combination of the interests, shares, obligations, or other securities of the surviving entity or any other entity or into cash or other property in whole or part; and

(4) The organic documents of the surviving entity as they will be in effect immediately after consummation of the conversion.

Sec. 65. RCW 23B.09.030 and 2014 c 83 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

In the case of an entity conversion of a domestic corporation to an other entity:

(1) The plan of entity conversion must be adopted by the board of directors of the converting entity and the shareholders entitled to vote must approve the plan.

(2) After adopting a plan of entity conversion, the board of directors of the converting entity must submit the plan of entity conversion for approval by its shareholders.

(3) The board of directors must recommend the plan of entity conversion to the shareholders, unless (a) the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation; or (b) RCW 23B.08.245 applies, and in either case the board of directors communicates the basis for so proceeding to the shareholders.

(4) The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan of entity conversion on any basis, including the affirmative vote of holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of shareholders not otherwise entitled to vote as a separate voting group on the plan of entity conversion.

(5) In the case of an entity conversion of a domestic corporation to a foreign corporation, in addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, approval of the plan of entity conversion requires the affirmative vote of shareholders that would be required to approve a plan of merger under RCW 23B.11.030, and of each other voting group entitled under RCW 23B.11.035 or the articles of incorporation to vote separately on a plan of merger. Separate voting by additional voting groups is required on a plan of entity conversion if such voting group or groups would be entitled to vote on a plan of merger under the circumstances described in RCW 23B.11.035. The articles of incorporation may require a greater or lesser vote to approve a plan of entity conversion than that provided in this subsection, or a greater or lesser vote by separate voting groups, so long as the required vote is not less than a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan of entity conversion and of each other voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan.

(6) In the case of an entity conversion of a domestic corporation to an other entity that is not a foreign corporation, approval of the plan of entity conversion requires the approval of all shareholders of the domestic corporation, whether or not entitled to vote under this title or the articles of incorporation.

(7) If as a result of the conversion one or more shareholders of the domestic corporation would become subject to owner liability for the debts, obligations, or liabilities of any other person or entity, in addition to the approval requirements under subsections (5) and (6) of this section, approval of the plan of entity conversion must also require each such shareholder to execute a separate ((record consenting))written consent to become subject to such owner liability.

(8) If the approval of the shareholders is to be given at a meeting, the domestic corporation must notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed meeting of shareholders at which the plan of entity conversion is to be submitted for approval in accordance with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice must state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of entity conversion and must contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan of entity conversion. The notice must include or be accompanied by a copy of the organic documents of the surviving entity as they will be in effect immediately after the conversion.

(9) If any provision of the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or an agreement to which any of the directors or shareholders of the domestic corporation are parties, adopted, or entered into before June 12, 2014, applies to a merger of the domestic corporation, other than a provision that limits or eliminates voting or dissenters' rights, and the document does not refer to an entity conversion of the domestic corporation, the provision is deemed to apply to an entity conversion of the domestic corporation until the provision is subsequently amended.

Sec. 66. RCW 23B.09.040 and 2015 c 176 s 2121 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After a plan of entity conversion by a domestic corporation converting into an other entity has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, articles of entity conversion must be ((signed))executed on behalf of the domestic corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative and must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

(2) After the conversion of an other entity into a domestic corporation has been adopted and approved as required by the organic law of the converting entity, articles of entity conversion must be ((signed))executed on behalf of the converting entity by any officer or other duly authorized representative and must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

(3) The articles of entity conversion must set forth:

(a) A statement that the converting entity has been converted into the surviving entity;

(b) The name and form of the converting entity before conversion;

(c) The name and form of the surviving entity after conversion, which must be a name that satisfies the requirements of Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW if the surviving entity after conversion is a domestic corporation;

(d) Articles of incorporation that comply with RCW 23B.02.020 if the surviving entity after conversion is a domestic corporation;

(e) The date the conversion is effective under the organic law of the surviving entity;

(f) If the converting entity is a domestic corporation, a statement that the conversion was duly approved by the shareholders of the domestic corporation pursuant to RCW 23B.09.030;

(g) If the converting entity is an other entity, a statement that the conversion was duly approved as required by the organic law of the converting entity; and

(h) If the surviving entity is a foreign other entity not authorized to transact business in this state: (i) A statement that the surviving entity consents to service of process pursuant to RCW 23.95.450 in a proceeding to enforce any obligation or the rights of dissenting shareholders of the domestic corporation; and (ii) the street and mailing address of the entity's principal office that may be used for service of process under RCW 23.95.450.

(4) The articles of entity conversion take effect at the effective time provided in RCW 23.95.210. Articles of entity conversion under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be combined with any required conversion filing under the organic law of the other entity if the combined filing satisfies the requirements of both this section and the organic law of the other entity.

Sec. 67. RCW 23B.09.060 and 2015 c 176 s 2123 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless otherwise provided in a plan of entity conversion of a domestic corporation, after the plan of entity conversion has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, and at any time before the articles of entity conversion have become effective, the planned conversion may be abandoned by the board of directors without action by the shareholders.

(2) If any entity conversion is abandoned after articles of entity conversion have been filed with the secretary of state but before the entity conversion has become effective, a statement that the entity conversion has been abandoned in accordance with this section, ((signed))executed by an officer or other duly authorized representative, must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing prior to the effective date of the entity conversion and in accordance with RCW 23.95.215. Upon filing, the statement takes effect and the entity conversion is deemed abandoned and may not become effective.

Sec. 68. RCW 23B.13.030 and 2002 c 297 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A record shareholder may assert dissenters' rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in the shareholder's name only if the shareholder dissents with respect to all shares beneficially owned by any one person and delivers to the corporation a notice of the name and address of each person on whose behalf the shareholder asserts dissenters' rights. The rights of a partial dissenter under this subsection are determined as if the shares as to which the dissenter dissents and the dissenter's other shares were registered in the names of different shareholders.

(2) A beneficial shareholder may assert dissenters' rights as to shares held on the beneficial shareholder's behalf only if:

(a) The beneficial shareholder ((submits))delivers to the corporation the record shareholder's executed written consent to the dissent not later than the time the beneficial shareholder asserts dissenters' rights((, which consent shall be set forth either (i) in a record or (ii) if the corporation has designated an address, location, or system to which the consent may be electronically transmitted and the consent is electronically transmitted to the designated address, location, or system, in an electronically transmitted record)); and

(b) The beneficial shareholder does so with respect to all shares of which such shareholder is the beneficial shareholder or over which such shareholder has power to direct the vote.

Sec. 69. RCW 23B.13.210 and 2009 c 189 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters' rights must (a) deliver to the corporation before the vote is taken written notice of the shareholder's intent to demand payment for the shareholder's shares if the proposed corporate action is effected, and (b) not vote such shares in favor of the proposed corporate action.

(2) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 is submitted for approval without a vote of shareholders in accordance with RCW 23B.07.040, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters' rights must not execute the consent or otherwise vote such shares in favor of the proposed corporate action.

(3) A shareholder who does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) or (2) of this section is not entitled to payment for the shareholder's shares under this chapter.

Sec. 70. RCW 23B.13.260 and 2009 c 189 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the corporation does not effect the proposed corporate action within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment and depositing share certificates, the corporation shall return the deposited certificates and release any transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares.

(2) If after returning deposited certificates and releasing transfer restrictions, the corporation wishes to effect the proposed corporate action, it must ((send))deliver a new dissenters' notice under RCW 23B.13.220 and repeat the payment demand procedure.

Sec. 71. RCW 23B.13.270 and 2009 c 189 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A corporation may elect to withhold payment required by RCW 23B.13.250 from a dissenter unless the dissenter was the beneficial owner of the shares before the date set forth in the dissenters' notice as the date of the first announcement to news media or to shareholders of the terms of the proposed corporate action.

(2) To the extent the corporation elects to withhold payment under subsection (1) of this section, after the effective date of the proposed corporate action, it shall estimate the fair value of the shares, plus accrued interest, and shall pay this amount to each dissenter who agrees to accept it in full satisfaction of the dissenter's demand. The corporation shall ((send))deliver with its offer an explanation of how it estimated the fair value of the shares, an explanation of how the interest was calculated, and a statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under RCW 23B.13.280.

Sec. 72. RCW 23B.15.090 and 2015 c 176 s 2138 are each amended to read as follows:

The registered agent of a foreign corporation may resign as agent by ((signing))executing and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation in accordance with RCW 23.95.445.

Sec. 73. RCW 23B.16.010 and 2015 c 176 s 2142 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its shareholders and board of directors, a record of all corporate actions approved by the shareholders or board of directors by executed consent without a meeting, and a record of all corporate actions approved by a committee of the board of directors exercising the authority of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation.

(2) A corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

(3) A corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its current shareholders, in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names and mailing addresses of all shareholders, in alphabetical order by class of shares showing the number and class of shares held by each. Nothing contained in this section requires the corporation to include on such list the electronic mail address or other electronic contact information of a shareholder.

(4) A corporation shall maintain its records ((in written form or in another))specified in this section in a form capable of conversion into ((written))paper form within a reasonable time.

(5) A corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office:

(a) Its articles or restated articles of incorporation and all amendments to them currently in effect;

(b) Its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

(c) The minutes of all shareholders' meetings, and records of all corporate actions approved by shareholders without a meeting, for the past three years;

(d) The financial statements described in RCW 23B.16.200(1), for the past three years;

(e) All written communications ((in the form of a record)) to shareholders generally within the past three years;

(f) A list of the names and business mailing addresses of its current directors and officers; and

(g) Its initial report or most recent annual report delivered to the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.255.

Sec. 74. RCW 23B.16.020 and 2009 c 189 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the corporation's principal office, any of the records of the corporation described in RCW 23B.16.010(5) if the shareholder gives the corporation an executed written notice of the shareholder's demand at least five business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy.

(2) A shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the shareholder meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section and gives the corporation an executed written notice of the shareholder's demand at least five business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy:

(a) Excerpts from minutes of any meeting of the board of directors, or of any meeting of a committee of the board of directors while exercising the authority of the board of directors, minutes of any meeting of the shareholders, and records of corporate actions approved by the shareholders or board of directors or a committee thereof without a meeting, to the extent not subject to inspection under subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Accounting records of the corporation; and

(c) The record of shareholders.

(3) A shareholder may inspect and copy the records described in subsection (2) of this section only if:

(a) The shareholder's demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

(b) The shareholder describes with reasonable particularity the shareholder's purpose and the records the shareholder desires to inspect; and

(c) The records are directly connected with the shareholder's purpose.

(4) The right of inspection granted by this section may not be abolished or limited by a corporation's articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(5) This section does not affect:

(a) The right of a shareholder to inspect records under RCW 23B.07.200 or, if the shareholder is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant; or

(b) The power of a court, independently of this title, to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

(6) For purposes of this section, "shareholder" includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the beneficial owner's behalf.

Sec. 75. RCW 23B.16.030 and 1989 c 165 s 184 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A shareholder's agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the shareholder.

(2) The corporation may, if reasonable, satisfy the right to copy records under RCW 23B.16.020 ((includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic,))by furnishing copies by photocopy or other means chosen by the corporation, including furnishing copies ((in))through an electronic ((or other nonwritten form if the shareholder so requests))transmission.

(3) The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any ((records))documents provided to the shareholder. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the ((records))documents.

(4) The corporation may comply with a shareholder's demand to inspect the record of shareholders under RCW 23B.16.020(2)(c) by providing the shareholder with a list of its shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of the shareholder's demand.

Sec. 76. RCW 23B.16.200 and 2002 c 297 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Not later than four months after the close of each fiscal year, and in any event prior to the annual meeting of shareholders, each corporation shall prepare (a) a balance sheet showing in reasonable detail the financial condition of the corporation as of the close of its fiscal year, and (b) an income statement showing the results of its operation during its fiscal year. Such statements may be consolidated or combined statements of the corporation and one or more of its subsidiaries, as appropriate. If financial statements are prepared by the corporation for any purpose on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the annual statements must also be prepared, and disclose that they are prepared, on that basis. If financial statements are prepared only on a basis other than generally accepted accounting principles, they must be prepared, and disclose that they are prepared, on the same basis as other reports and statements prepared by the corporation for the use of others.

(2) Upon the written request of a shareholder, the corporation shall promptly deliver to ((any))the requesting shareholder a copy of the most recent balance sheet and income statement((, which request shall be set forth either (a) in a written record or (b) if the corporation has designated an address, location, or system to which the request may be electronically transmitted and the request is electronically transmitted to the corporation at the designated address, location, or system, in an electronically transmitted record)). If prepared for other purposes, the corporation shall also ((furnish))deliver to a requesting shareholder upon the written request of that shareholder a statement of sources and applications of funds, and a statement of changes in shareholders' equity, for the most recent fiscal year.

(3) If the annual financial statements are reported upon by a public accountant, the accountant's report must accompany them. If not, the statements must be accompanied by a statement of the president or the person responsible for the corporation's accounting records:

(a) Stating the person's reasonable belief whether the statements were prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles and, if not, describing the basis of preparation; and

(b) Describing any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis of accounting consistent with the basis used for statements prepared for the preceding year.

(4) For purposes of this section, "shareholder" includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the beneficial owner's behalf.

Sec. 77. RCW 23B.25.040 and 2012 c 215 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the matters required to be set forth in the articles of incorporation pursuant to RCW 23B.02.020 (1) and (2), the articles of incorporation of a social purpose corporation must set forth:

(a) A corporate name for the social purpose corporation that contains the words "social purpose corporation" or "SPC" as an abbreviation of those words;

(b) A statement that the corporation is organized as a social purpose corporation governed by this chapter;

(c) A statement setting forth the general social purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized pursuant to RCW 23B.25.020;

(d) If the corporation has designated one or more specific social purpose or purposes pursuant to RCW 23B.25.030, a statement setting forth such specific social purpose or purposes; and

(e) A provision that states the following: "The mission of this social purpose corporation is not necessarily compatible with and may be contrary to maximizing profits and earnings for shareholders, or maximizing shareholder value in any sale, merger, acquisition, or other similar actions of the corporation."

(2) In addition to the matters that must be set forth in the articles of incorporation in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and the provisions that may be set forth in the articles of incorporation pursuant to RCW 23B.02.020 (5) and (6), the articles of incorporation of a social purpose corporation may contain the following provisions:

(a) A provision requiring the corporation's directors or officers to consider the impacts of any corporate action or proposed corporate action upon one or more of the social purposes of the corporation;

(b) A provision requiring the corporation to furnish to the shareholders an assessment of the overall performance of the corporation with respect to its social purpose or purposes, prepared in accordance with a third-party standard;

(c) A provision requiring, for any or all corporate actions, the vote of a larger proportion or of all of the shares of any class or series, or the vote or quorum for taking action of a larger proportion or of all of the directors, than is otherwise required by this title or this chapter;

(d) A provision requiring the approval of the shareholders for any corporate action, even though not otherwise required by this title; and

(e) A provision limiting the duration of the corporation's existence to a specified date.

(3) Prior to the issuance of shares, the corporation shall furnish a prospective shareholder with a copy of the articles of incorporation ((in the form of a record)).

(4) Prior to the transfer of shares, the transferor shareholder ((shall give))must deliver written notice of the transfer to the corporation. Within a reasonable time after receiving notice, the corporation shall provide the prospective transferee with a copy of the articles of incorporation ((in the form of a record)).

Sec. 78. RCW 23B.25.070 and 2012 c 215 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Shares issued by a social purpose corporation may but need not be represented by certificates.

(2) If shares are represented by certificates, in addition to the information required on certificates by RCW 23B.06.250 (2) and (3), each share certificate must state on its face the following language in a conspicuous manner:

"This entity is a social purpose corporation organized under Title 23B RCW of the Washington business corporation act. The articles of incorporation of this corporation state one or more social purposes of this corporation. The corporation will furnish the shareholder this information without charge on request in writing."

(3) If shares are not represented by certificates, within a reasonable time after the issue or transfer of such shares, the corporation shall ((send))deliver to the shareholder a ((record containing))written statement of the information required on certificates pursuant to RCW 23B.06.260(2) and the language required on certificates by subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 79. RCW 23B.30.070 and 2017 c 28 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a defective corporate action ratified or validated under this chapter would have required under any other section of this title a ((record))document to be filed with the secretary of state, then, whether or not a ((record))document was previously filed in respect of that defective corporate action and in lieu of filing the ((record))document otherwise required by this title, the corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of validation setting forth:

(a) The defective corporate action that was ratified or validated and, if the defective corporate action involved the purported issuance of putative shares, the number and class or series of putative shares purportedly issued;

(b) The date of the defective corporate action that was ratified or validated and, if the defective corporate action involved the purported issuance of putative shares, the date or dates on which the putative shares were purportedly issued;

(c) The nature of the failure of authorization with respect to the defective corporate action that was ratified or validated;

(d) A statement that the defective corporate action was (i) ratified in accordance with RCW 23B.30.030, including the date on which the board of directors ratified the defective corporate action and the date, if any, on which the shareholders approved the ratification of the defective corporate action, or (ii) validated in accordance with RCW 23B.30.080, including the date on which the court validated the defective corporate action; and

(e) The information required by subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The articles of validation must also contain the following information:

(a) If the corporation previously filed a ((record))document in respect of a defective corporate action that was ratified or validated and no changes to that ((record))document are required to give effect to the ratification or validation of the defective corporate action in accordance with RCW 23B.30.040(5), the corporation shall (i) describe the ((record))document, together with any articles of correction thereto, including its filing date, in the articles of validation, and (ii) attach a copy of the ((record))document, together with any articles of correction thereto, to the articles of validation;

(b) If the corporation previously filed a ((record))document in respect of a defective corporate action that was ratified or validated and any change to that ((record))document is required to give effect to the ratification or validation of the defective corporate action in accordance with RCW 23B.30.040(5), the corporation shall (i) describe the previously filed ((record))document, together with any articles of correction thereto, including its filing date, (ii) attach a copy of the ((record))document containing all of the information required to be included under the applicable section or sections of this title to give effect to the defective corporate action that was ratified or validated to the articles of validation, and (iii) state the date and time that the ((record))filing is deemed to have become effective; or

(c) If the corporation did not previously file a ((record))document in respect of a defective corporate action that was ratified or validated and that defective corporate action would have required a filing under any other section of this title, the corporation shall (i) attach a copy of a ((record))document containing all of the information required to be included under the applicable section or sections of this title to give effect to the defective corporate action that was ratified or validated to the articles of validation, and (ii) state the date and time that the ((record))filing is deemed to have become effective.

(3) Articles of validation that comply with this section supersede any other ((record))document in respect of a defective corporate action that was ratified in accordance with RCW 23B.30.030 or validated in accordance with RCW 23B.30.080.

Sec. 80. RCW 24.03.005 and 2015 c 176 s 3101 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:

(1) "An officer of the corporation" means, in connection with the execution of records submitted for filing with the secretary of state, the president, a vice president, the secretary, or the treasurer of the corporation.

(2) "Articles of incorporation" and "articles" mean the original articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, and includes articles of merger and restated articles.

(3) "Board of directors" means the group of persons vested with the management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name by which such group is designated in the articles or bylaws.

(4) "Bylaws" means the code or codes of rules adopted for the regulation or management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name or names by which such rules are designated.

(5) "Conforms to ((law[,]))law," as used in connection with duties of the secretary of state in reviewing records for filing under this chapter, means the secretary of state has determined that the record complies as to form with the applicable requirements of this chapter and Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

(6) "Corporation" or "domestic corporation" means a corporation not for profit subject to the provisions of this chapter, except a foreign corporation.

(7) "Deliver" means: (a) Mailing; (b) transmission by facsimile equipment, for purposes of delivering a demand, consent, notice, or waiver to the corporation or one of its officers, directors, or members; (c) electronic transmission, in accordance with the officer's, director's, or member's consent, for purposes of delivering a demand, consent, notice, or waiver to the corporation or one of its officers, directors, or members under RCW 24.03.009; and (d) as prescribed by the secretary of state for purposes of submitting a record for filing with the secretary of state.

(8) "Effective date" means, in connection with a record filing made by the secretary of state, the date on which the filing becomes effective under RCW 23.95.210.

(9) "Electronic transmission" means an electronic communication (a) not directly involving the physical transfer of a record in a tangible medium and (b) that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by the sender and the recipient thereof, and that may be directly reproduced in a tangible medium by a sender and recipient.

(10) "Electronically transmitted" means the initiation of an electronic transmission.

(11) "Execute," "executes," or "executed" means with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

(a) ((signed, with respect to a written record or))To sign or adopt a tangible symbol;

(b) ((electronically transmitted along with sufficient information to determine the sender's identity, with respect to an electronic transmission,))To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process; or

(c) Filed in compliance with the standards for filing with the office of the secretary of state as prescribed by the secretary of state, with respect to a record to be filed with the secretary of state.

(12) "Executed by an officer of the corporation," or words of similar import, means that any record executed by such person shall be and is executed by that person under penalties of perjury and in an official and authorized capacity on behalf of the corporation or person making the record submission with the secretary of state and, for the purpose of records filed electronically with the secretary of state, in compliance with the rules adopted by the secretary of state for electronic filing.

(13) "Foreign corporation" means a corporation not for profit organized under laws other than the laws of this state.

(14) "Insolvent" means inability of a corporation to pay debts as they become due in the usual course of its affairs.

(15) "Member" means an individual or entity having membership rights in a corporation in accordance with the provisions of its articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(16) "Not for profit corporation" or "nonprofit corporation" means a corporation no part of the income of which is distributable to its members, directors or officers.

(17) "Public benefit not for profit corporation" or "public benefit nonprofit corporation" means a corporation no part of the income of which is distributable to its members, directors, or officers and that holds a current tax exempt status as provided under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or is specifically exempted from the requirement to apply for its tax exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).

(18) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or ((contained in an electronic transmission))that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(19) "Registered office" means the address of the corporation's registered agent.

(20) "Tangible medium" means a writing, copy of a writing, facsimile, or a physical reproduction, each on paper or on other tangible material.

(((21) "Writing" does not include an electronic transmission.

(22) "Written" means embodied in a tangible medium.))

Sec. 81. RCW 25.10.011 and 2015 c 176 s 6101 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Certificate of limited partnership" means the certificate required by RCW 25.10.201, including the certificate as amended or restated.

(2) "Contribution," except in the term "right of contribution," means any benefit provided by a person to a limited partnership in order to become a partner or in the person's capacity as a partner.

(3) "Debtor in bankruptcy" means a person that is the subject of:

(a) An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

(b) A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

(4) "Designated office" means the principal office indicated in the limited partnership's most recent annual report, or, if the principal office is not located within this state, the office of the limited partnership's registered agent.

(5) "Distribution" means a transfer of money or other property from a limited partnership to a partner in the partner's capacity as a partner or to a transferee on account of a transferable interest owned by the transferee.

(6) "Foreign limited liability limited partnership" means a foreign limited partnership whose general partners have limited liability for the obligations of the foreign limited partnership under a provision similar to RCW 25.10.401(3).

(7) "Foreign limited partnership" means a partnership formed under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this state and required by those laws to have one or more general partners and one or more limited partners. "Foreign limited partnership" includes a foreign limited liability limited partnership.

(8) "General partner" means:

(a) With respect to a limited partnership, a person that:

(i) Becomes a general partner under RCW 25.10.371; or

(ii) Was a general partner in a limited partnership when the limited partnership became subject to this chapter under RCW 25.10.911 (1) or (2); and

(b) With respect to a foreign limited partnership, a person that has rights, powers, and obligations similar to those of a general partner in a limited partnership.

(9) "Limited liability limited partnership," except in the term "foreign limited liability limited partnership," means a limited partnership whose certificate of limited partnership states that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

(10) "Limited partner" means:

(a) With respect to a limited partnership, a person that:

(i) Becomes a limited partner under RCW 25.10.301; or

(ii) Was a limited partner in a limited partnership when the limited partnership became subject to this chapter under RCW 25.10.911 (1) or (2); and

(b) With respect to a foreign limited partnership, a person that has rights, powers, and obligations similar to those of a limited partner in a limited partnership.

(11) "Limited partnership," except in the terms "foreign limited partnership" and "foreign limited liability limited partnership," means an entity, having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners, that is formed under this chapter by two or more persons or becomes subject to this chapter under article 11 of this chapter or RCW 25.10.911 (1) or (2). "Limited partnership" includes a limited liability limited partnership.

(12) "Partner" means a limited partner or general partner.

(13) "Partnership agreement" means the partners' agreement, whether oral, implied, in a record, or in any combination, concerning the limited partnership. "Partnership agreement" includes the agreement as amended.

(14) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(15) "Person dissociated as a general partner" means a person dissociated as a general partner of a limited partnership.

(16) "Principal office" means the office where the principal executive office of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership is located, whether or not the office is located in this state.

(17) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(18) "Required information" means the information that a limited partnership is required to maintain under RCW 25.10.091.

(19) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

(a) To ((sign with respect to a written record))execute or adopt a tangible symbol;

(b) To ((electronically transmit along with sufficient information to determine the sender's identity with respect to an electronic transmission))attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process; or

(c) With respect to a record to be filed with the secretary of state, to comply with the standard for filing with the office of the secretary of state as prescribed by the secretary of state.

(20) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(21) "Tangible medium" means a writing, copy of a writing, facsimile, or a physical reproduction, each on paper or on other tangible material.

(22) "Transfer" includes an assignment, conveyance, deed, bill of sale, lease, mortgage, security interest, encumbrance, gift, and transfer by operation of law.

(((22)))(23) "Transferable interest" means a partner's right to receive distributions.

(((23)))(24) "Transferee" means a person to which all or part of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether or not the transferor is a partner.

Sec. 82. RCW 25.15.006 and 2015 c 188 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agreed value" means the value of the contributions made by a member to the limited liability company. Such value shall equal the amount agreed upon in a limited liability company agreement or, if no value is agreed upon, the value shall be determined based on the records of the limited liability company.

(2) "Certificate of formation" means the certificate of formation required by RCW 25.15.071 and such certificate as amended or restated.

(3) "Distribution" means a transfer of money or other property from a limited liability company to a member in the member's capacity as a member or to a transferee on account of a transferable interest owned by the transferee.

(4) "Execute," "executes," or "executed" means((, with respect to a record, either (a) signed with respect to a written record or (b) electronically transmitted along with sufficient information to determine the sender's identity with respect to an electronic transmission))with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

(a) To sign or adopt a tangible symbol; or

(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

(5) "Foreign limited liability company" means an unincorporated entity formed under the law of a jurisdiction other than this state and denominated by that law as a limited liability company.

(6) "Limited liability company" or "domestic limited liability company" means a limited liability company having one or more members or transferees that is formed under this chapter.

(7) "Limited liability company agreement" means the agreement, including the agreement as amended or restated, whether oral, implied, in a record, or in any combination, of the member or members of a limited liability company concerning the affairs of the limited liability company and the conduct of its business.

(8) "Manager" means a person, or a board, committee, or other group of persons, named as a manager of a limited liability company in, or designated as a manager of a limited liability company pursuant to, a limited liability company agreement.

(9) "Manager-managed" means, with respect to a limited liability company, that the limited liability company agreement vests management of the limited liability company in one or more managers.

(10) "Member" means a person who has been admitted to a limited liability company as a member as provided in RCW 25.15.116 and who has not been dissociated from the limited liability company.

(11) "Member-managed" means, with respect to a limited liability company, that the limited liability company is not manager-managed.

(12) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality or any other legal or commercial entity.

(13) "Principal office" means the office, in or out of this state, so designated in the annual report, where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign limited liability company are located.

(14) "Professional limited liability company" means a limited liability company that is formed in accordance with RCW 25.15.046 for the purpose of rendering professional service.

(15) "Professional service" means the same as defined under RCW 18.100.030.

(16) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(17) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(18) "Tangible medium" means a writing, copy of a writing, facsimile, or a physical reproduction, each on paper or on other tangible material.

(19) "Transfer" includes an assignment, conveyance, deed, bill of sale, lease, gift, and transfer by operation of law, except as otherwise provided in RCW 25.15.251(6).

(((19)))(20) "Transferable interest" means a member's or transferee's right to receive distributions of the limited liability company's assets.

(((20)))(21) "Transferee" means a person to which all or part of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether or not the transferor is a member.

Sec. 83. RCW 26.52.030 and 1999 c 184 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person entitled to protection who has a valid foreign protection order may file that order by presenting a certified, authenticated, or exemplified copy of the foreign protection order to a clerk of the court of a Washington court in which the person entitled to protection resides or to a clerk of the court of a Washington court where the person entitled to protection believes enforcement may be necessary. Any out-of-state department, agency, or court responsible for maintaining protection order records, may by facsimile or electronic transmission send a reproduction of the foreign protection order to the clerk of the court of Washington as long as it contains a facsimile or ((digital))electronic signature by any person authorized to make such transmission.

(2) Filing of a foreign protection order with a court and entry of the foreign protection order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants are not prerequisites for enforcement of the foreign protection order.

(3) The court shall accept the filing of a foreign protection order without a fee or cost.

(4) The clerk of the court shall provide information to a person entitled to protection of the availability of domestic violence, sexual abuse, and other services to victims in the community where the court is located and in the state.

(5) The clerk of the court shall assist the person entitled to protection in completing an information form that must include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(a) The name of the person entitled to protection and any other protected parties;

(b) The name and address of the person who is subject to the restraint provisions of the foreign protection order;

(c) The date the foreign protection order was entered;

(d) The date the foreign protection order expires;

(e) The relief granted under . . . . . . . . . . (specify the relief awarded and citations thereto, and designate which of the violations are arrestable offenses);

(f) The judicial district and contact information for court administration for the court in which the foreign protection order was entered;

(g) The social security number, date of birth, and description of the person subject to the restraint provisions of the foreign protection order;

(h) Whether the person who is subject to the restraint provisions of the foreign protection order is believed to be armed and dangerous;

(i) Whether the person who is subject to the restraint provisions of the foreign protection order was served with the order, and if so, the method used to serve the order;

(j) The type and location of any other legal proceedings between the person who is subject to the restraint provisions and the person entitled to protection.

An inability to answer any of the above questions does not preclude the filing or enforcement of a foreign protection order.

(6) The clerk of the court shall provide the person entitled to protection with a copy bearing proof of filing with the court.

(7) Any assistance provided by the clerk under this section does not constitute the practice of law. The clerk is not liable for any incomplete or incorrect information that he or she is provided.

Sec. 84. RCW 41.05.014 and 2009 c 201 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((administrator))director may require applications, enrollment forms, and eligibility certification documents for benefits that are administered by the authority under this chapter and ((chapters))chapter 70.47 ((and 70.47A)) RCW to be signed by the person submitting them. The ((administrator))director may accept electronic signatures.

(2) For the purpose of this section, "electronic signature" means ((a signature in electronic form attached to or logically associated with an electronic record including, but not limited to, a digital signature))an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

Sec. 85. RCW 58.09.050 and 2019 c 132 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The records of survey to be filed under authority of this chapter shall be processed as follows:

(1)(a) The record of survey filed under RCW 58.09.040(1) shall be an original map, eighteen by twenty-four inches, that is legibly drawn in black ink on mylar and is suitable for producing legible prints through scanning, microfilming, or other standard copying procedures.

(b) The following are allowable formats for the original that may be used in lieu of the format set forth under (a) of this subsection:

(i) Photo mylar with original signatures;

(ii) Any standard material as long as the format is compatible with the auditor's recording process and records storage system. This format is only allowed in those counties that are excepted from permanently storing the original document as required in RCW 58.09.110(5);

(iii) An electronic version of the original if the county has the capability to accept ((a digital signature issued by a certification authority under))electronic signatures which meet the standards provided by the rules adopted by the Washington state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors, and can import electronic files into an imaging system. The electronic version shall be a standard raster file format acceptable to the county.

A two inch margin on the left edge and a one-half inch margin on other edges of the map shall be provided. The auditor shall reject for recording any maps not suitable for producing legible prints through scanning, microfilming, or other standard copying procedures.

(2) Information required by RCW 58.09.040(2) shall be filed on a standard form eight and one-half inches by fourteen inches as designed and prescribed by the department of natural resources. The auditor shall reject for recording any records of corner information not suitable for producing legible prints through scanning, microfilming, or other standard copying procedures. An electronic version of the standard form may be filed if the county has the capability to accept ((a digital signature issued by a certification authority under))electronic signatures which meet the standards provided by the rules adopted by the Washington state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors, and can import electronic files into an imaging system. The electronic version shall be a standard raster file format acceptable to the county.

(3) Two legible prints of each record of survey as required under the provisions of this chapter shall be furnished to the county auditor in the county in which the survey is to be recorded. The auditor, in those counties using imaging systems, may require only the original, and fewer prints, as needed, to meet the requirements of their duties. If any of the prints submitted are not suitable for scanning or microfilming the auditor shall not record the original.

(4) Legibility requirements are set forth in the recorder's checklist under RCW 58.09.110.

Sec. 86. RCW 58.09.110 and 2019 c 132 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The auditor shall accept for recording those records of survey and records of corner information that are in compliance with the recorder's checklist as jointly developed by a committee consisting of the survey advisory board and two representatives from the Washington state association of county auditors. This checklist shall be adopted in rules by the department of natural resources.

(1) The auditor shall keep proper indexes of such record of survey by the name of owner and by quarter-quarter section, township, and range, with reference to other legal subdivisions.

(2) The auditor shall keep proper indexes of the record of corner information by section, township, and range.

(3) After entering the recording data on the record of survey and all prints received from the surveyor, the auditor shall send one of the surveyor's prints to the department of natural resources in Olympia, Washington, for incorporation into the statewide survey records repository. However, the county and the department of natural resources may mutually agree to process the original or an electronic version of the original in lieu of the surveyor's print.

(4) After entering the recording data on the record of corner information the auditor shall send a legible copy, suitable for scanning, to the department of natural resources in Olympia, Washington. However, the county and the department of natural resources may mutually agree to process the original or an electronic version of the original in lieu of the copy.

(5) The auditor shall permanently keep the original document filed using storage and handling processes that do not cause excessive deterioration of the document. A county may be excepted from the requirement to permanently store the original document if it has a document scanning, filming, or other process that creates a permanent, archival record that meets or surpasses the standards as adopted in rule by the division of archives and records management in chapter 434-663 or 434-677 WAC. The auditor must be able to provide full-size copies upon request. The auditor shall maintain a copy or image of the original for public reference.

(6) If the county has the capability to accept ((a digital signature issued by a certification authority under))electronic signatures which meet the standards provided by the rules adopted by the Washington state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors, and can import electronic files into an imaging system, the auditor may accept for recording electronic versions of the documents required by this chapter. The electronic version shall be a standard raster file format acceptable to the county.

(7) This section does not supersede other existing recording statutes.

Sec. 87. RCW 69.41.041 and 2016 c 148 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A pharmacy may dispense legend drugs to the resident of a long-term care facility or hospice program on the basis of a written or ((digitally))electronically signed prescription or chart order sent via facsimile copy by the prescriber to the long-term care facility or hospice program, and communicated or transmitted to the pharmacy pursuant to RCW 18.64.550.

(2) For the purpose of this section, the terms "long-term care facility," "hospice program," and "chart order" have the meanings provided in RCW 18.64.011.

Sec. 88. RCW 69.41.055 and 2019 c 314 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Information concerning an original prescription or information concerning a prescription refill for a legend drug may be electronically communicated between an authorized practitioner and a pharmacy of the patient's choice with no intervening person having access to the prescription drug order pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the electronically communicated prescription information complies with the following:

(a) Electronically communicated prescription information must comply with all applicable statutes and rules regarding the form, content, recordkeeping, and processing of a prescription or order for a legend drug;

(b) An explicit opportunity for practitioners must be made to indicate their preference on whether or not a therapeutically equivalent generic drug or interchangeable biological product may be substituted. This section does not limit the ability of practitioners and pharmacists to permit substitution by default under a prior-consent authorization;

(c) Prescription drug orders are confidential health information, and may be released only to the patient or the patient's authorized representative, the prescriber or other authorized practitioner then caring for the patient, or other persons specifically authorized by law to receive such information;

(d) To maintain confidentiality of prescription records, the electronic system shall have adequate security and systems safeguards designed to prevent and detect unauthorized access, modification, or manipulation of these records; and

(e) The pharmacist shall exercise professional judgment regarding the accuracy, validity, and authenticity of the prescription drug order received by way of electronic transmission, consistent with federal and state laws and rules and guidelines of the commission.

(2) The electronic ((or digital)) signature of the prescribing practitioner's agent on behalf of the prescribing practitioner for a resident in a long-term care facility or hospice program, pursuant to a valid order and authorization under RCW 18.64.550, constitutes a valid electronic communication of prescription information. Such an authorized signature and transmission by an agent in a long-term care facility or hospice program does not constitute an intervening person having access to the prescription drug order.

(3) The commission may adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 89. RCW 74.08.055 and 2009 c 201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each applicant for or recipient of public assistance shall complete and sign a physical application or, if available, electronic application for assistance which shall contain or be verified by a written declaration that it is signed under the penalties of perjury. The department may make electronic applications available. The secretary, by rule and regulation, may require that any other forms filled out by applicants or recipients of public assistance shall contain or be verified by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury and such declaration shall be in lieu of any oath otherwise required, and each applicant shall be so informed at the time of the signing. The application and signature verification shall be in accordance with federal requirements for that program.

(2) Any applicant for or recipient of public assistance who willfully makes and signs any application, statement, other paper, or electronic record which contains or is verified by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury and which he or she does not believe to be true and correct as to every material matter is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) As used in this section:

(a) "Electronic record" means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means ((for use in an information system or for transmission from one information system to another)).

(b) (("Electronic signature" means a signature in electronic form attached to or logically associated with an electronic record including, but not limited to, a digital signature. An electronic signature is a paperless way to sign a document using an electronic sound, symbol, or process, attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

(c))) "Sign" includes signing by physical signature, if available, or electronic signature. An application must contain a signature in either physical or, if available, electronic form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 90. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 19.360.010 (Intent) and 2015 c 72 s 1;

(2) RCW 19.360.020 (State and local agencies—Electronic signatures and records—Use and acceptance) and 2016 c 95 s 2 & 2015 c 72 s 2;

(3) RCW 19.360.030 (Definition—"Electronic signature"—Use of term) and 2016 c 95 s 3 & 2015 c 72 s 3;

(4) RCW 19.360.040 (Definition—"Record"—Use of term) and 2016 c 95 s 4 & 2015 c 72 s 4;

(5) RCW 19.360.050 (Definition—"Electronic"—Use of term) and 2016 c 95 s 5 & 2015 c 72 s 5;

(6) RCW 19.360.060 (Definitions—"State agency" and "local agency") and 2016 c 95 s 6 & 2015 c 72 s 6;

(7) RCW 19.400.010 (Intent) and 2019 c 153 s 1;

(8) RCW 19.400.020 (Definitions) and 2019 c 153 s 2; and

(9) RCW 19.400.030 (Electronic records—Legal status) and 2019 c 153 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 91. Sections 1 through 20 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 1 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 92. SEVERABILITY.If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---