BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.60.230 and 2008 c 266 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Who may file a complaint:

(a) Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an alleged unfair practice may, personally or by his or her attorney, make, sign, and file with the commission a complaint in writing under oath or by declaration. The complaint shall state the name of the person alleged to have committed the unfair practice and the particulars thereof, and contain such other information as may be required by the commission.

(b) Whenever it has reason to believe that any person has been engaged or is engaging in an unfair practice, the commission may issue a complaint.

(c) Any employer or principal whose employees, or agents, or any of them, refuse or threaten to refuse to comply with the provisions of this chapter may file with the commission a written complaint under oath or by declaration asking for assistance by conciliation or other remedial action.

(2) Any complaint filed pursuant to this section must be ((so)) filed within six months after the alleged act of discrimination, except that complaints alleging an unfair practice ((in))related to:

(a) A real estate transaction pursuant to RCW 49.60.222 through 49.60.225 must be ((so)) filed within one year after the alleged unfair practice in a real estate transaction has occurred or terminated;

(b) Pregnancy discrimination pursuant to RCW 49.60.180 must be filed within one year after the alleged unfair practice; and

(c) A complaint alleging whistleblower retaliation must be filed within two years.

--- END ---