BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.83B RCW to read as follows:

The department of ecology may allow water rights donated to the trust water rights program to be used for drought mitigation in accordance with an order issued under this chapter, subject to chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.38.020 and 2002 c 329 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department may acquire water rights, including but not limited to storage rights, by purchase, lease, gift, or other appropriate means other than by condemnation, from any person or entity or combination of persons or entities. Once acquired, such rights are trust water rights. A water right acquired by the state that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be administered as a trust water right in compliance with that condition.

(b) If the holder of a right to water from a body of water chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to the trust water system to assist in providing instream flows on a temporary or permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such terms as the person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the requirements of subsection (4) of this section and the other applicable requirements of this chapter and the terms prescribed are relevant and material to protecting any interest in the water right retained by the donor. Once accepted, such rights are trust water rights within the conditions prescribed by the donor.

(c) When a person donates a water right to the Yakima river basin trust water rights program, the department shall inform the person that he or she may agree to allow the trust water right to be used for drought mitigation in accordance with an order issued for the Yakima river basin under chapter 43.83B RCW. The donor is not required to allow any trust water right to be used for drought mitigation. The conditions under which a trust water right may be used for drought mitigation under this subsection must be approved by the donor before they take effect, and the donor may terminate the approval at any time.

(2) The department may make such other arrangements, including entry into contracts with other persons or entities as appropriate to ensure that trust water rights acquired in accordance with this chapter can be exercised to the fullest possible extent.

(3) The trust water rights may be acquired on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4) A water right donated under subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section shall not exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised during the five years before the donation nor may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the donor plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised during the five years before the donation. A water right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust water right donated under subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section may request that the department review the impairment claim. If the department determines that exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation or exercising a portion of that trust water right donated under subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section is impairing existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.38.902, the trust water right shall be altered by the department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of the department to alter or not alter a trust water right donated under subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section is appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. A donated water right's status as a trust water right under this subsection is not evidence of the validity or quantity of the water right.

(5) Any water right conveyed to the trust water right system as a gift that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream or drought mitigation purposes shall be managed by the department for public purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is deductible for federal income taxation purposes for the person or entity conveying the water right.

(6) If the department acquires a trust water right by lease, the amount of the trust water right shall not exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised during the five years before the acquisition was made nor may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the original water right holder plus the portion of the water right leased by the department exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised during the five years before the acquisition. A water right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust water right leased under this subsection may request that the department review the impairment claim. If the department determines that exercising the trust water right resulting from the leasing or exercising of a portion of that trust water right leased under this subsection is impairing existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.38.902, the trust water right shall be altered by the department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of the department to alter or not to alter a trust water right leased under this subsection is appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. The department's leasing of a trust water right under this subsection is not evidence of the validity or quantity of the water right.

(7) For a water right donated to or acquired by the trust water rights program on a temporary basis, the full quantity of water diverted or withdrawn to exercise the right before the donation or acquisition shall be placed in the trust water rights program and shall revert to the donor or person from whom it was acquired when the trust period ends.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.38.040 and 2001 c 237 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All trust water rights acquired by the department shall be placed in the Yakima river basin trust water rights program to be managed by the department. The department shall issue a water right certificate in the name of the state of Washington for each trust water right it acquires.

(2) Trust water rights shall retain the same priority date as the water right from which they originated. Trust water rights may be modified as to purpose or place of use or point of diversion, including modification from a diversionary use to a nondiversionary instream use.

(3) Trust water rights may be held by the department for instream flows, irrigation use, drought mitigation, or other beneficial use. Trust water rights may be acquired on a temporary or permanent basis. To the extent practicable and subject to legislative appropriation, trust water rights acquired in an area with an approved watershed plan developed under chapter 90.82 RCW shall be consistent with that plan if the plan calls for such acquisition.

(4) A schedule of the amount of net water saved as a result of water conservation projects carried out in accordance with this chapter((,)) shall be developed annually to reflect the predicted hydrologic and water supply conditions, as well as anticipated water demands, for the upcoming irrigation season. This schedule shall serve as the basis for the distribution and management of trust water rights each year.

(5)(a) No exercise of a trust water right may be authorized unless the department first determines that no existing water rights, junior or senior in priority, will be impaired as to their exercise or injured in any manner whatever by such authorization.

(b) Before any trust water right is exercised, the department shall publish notice thereof in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county or counties in which the storage, diversion, and use are to be made, and in such other newspapers as the department determines are necessary, once a week for two consecutive weeks. At the same time the department may also send notice thereof containing pertinent information to the director of the department of fish and wildlife.

(c) Subsections (4) and (5)(b) of this section do not apply to a trust water right resulting from a donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.38.020(1)(b), a donation for drought mitigation, or ((from)) the lease of a water right under RCW 90.38.020(6) if the period of the lease does not exceed five years. However, the department shall provide the notice described in (b) of this subsection the first time the trust water right resulting from the donation is exercised.

(6) RCW 90.03.380 and 90.14.140 through 90.14.910 shall have no applicability to trust water rights held by the department under this chapter or exercised under this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.42.005 and 2003 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to recognize and preserve water rights in accordance with RCW 90.03.010.

(2) The legislature finds that:

(a) The state of Washington is faced with a shortage of water with which to meet existing and future needs, particularly during the summer and fall months and in dry years when the demand is greatest;

(b) Consistent with RCW 90.54.180, issuance of new water rights, voluntary water transfers, and conservation and water use efficiency programs, including storage, all are acceptable methods of addressing water uses because they can relieve current critical water situations, provide for presently unmet needs, and assist in meeting future water needs. Presently unmet needs or current needs includes the water required to increase the frequency of occurrence of base or minimum flow levels in streams of the state, the water necessary to satisfy existing water rights, or the water necessary to provide full supplies to existing water systems with current supply deficiencies;

(c) The interests of the state and its citizens will be served by developing programs and regional water resource plans, in cooperation with local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, appropriate federal agencies, private citizens, and the various water users and water interests in the state, that increase the overall ability to manage the state's waters in order to resolve conflicts and to better satisfy both present and future needs for water; ((and))

(d) Water banking as a function of the trust water (([rights]))rights program and as authorized by this chapter can provide an effective means to facilitate the voluntary transfer of water rights established through conservation, purchase, lease, or donation, to preserve water rights and provide water for presently unmet and future needs; and to achieve a variety of water resource management objectives throughout the state, including drought response, improving streamflows on a voluntary basis, providing water mitigation, or reserving water supply for future uses; and

(e) Trust water rights donated to the trust water rights program are a potential source of water that may be used for drought mitigation in accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.42.040 and 2009 c 283 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A trust water right acquired by the state shall be placed in the state trust water rights program to be managed by the department. The department shall exercise its authorities under the law in a manner that protects trust water rights. Trust water rights acquired by the state shall be held in trust and authorized for use by the department for instream flows, irrigation, municipal, or other beneficial uses consistent with applicable regional plans for pilot planning areas, or to resolve critical water supply problems. The state may acquire a groundwater right to be placed in the state trust water rights program. To the extent practicable and subject to legislative appropriation, trust water rights acquired in an area with an approved watershed plan developed under chapter 90.82 RCW shall be consistent with that plan if the plan calls for such acquisition.

(b) When a person donates a water right to the state trust water rights program, the department shall inform the person that he or she may agree to allow the trust water right to be used for drought mitigation in accordance with an order issued under chapter 43.83B RCW. The donor is not required to allow any trust water right to be used for drought mitigation. The conditions under which a trust water right may be used for drought mitigation under this subsection (1)(b) must be approved by the donor before they take effect, and the donor may terminate the approval at any time.

(2) The department shall issue a water right certificate in the name of the state of Washington for each permanent trust water right conveyed to the state indicating the quantity of water transferred to trust, the reach or reaches of the stream or the body of public groundwater that constitutes the place of use of the trust water right, and the use or uses to which it may be applied. A superseding certificate shall be issued that specifies the amount of water the water right holder would continue to be entitled to as a result of the water conservation project. The superseding certificate shall retain the same priority date as the original right. For nonpermanent conveyances, the department shall issue certificates or such other instruments as are necessary to reflect the changes in purpose or place of use or point of diversion or withdrawal.

(3) A trust water right retains the same priority date as the water right from which it originated, but as between the two rights, the trust right shall be deemed to be inferior in priority unless otherwise specified by an agreement between the state and the party holding the original right.

(4)(a) Exercise of a trust water right may be authorized only if the department first determines that neither water rights existing at the time the trust water right is established, nor the public interest will be impaired.

(b) If impairment becomes apparent during the time a trust water right is being exercised, the department shall cease or modify the use of the trust water right to eliminate the impairment.

(c) A trust water right acquired by the state and held or authorized for beneficial use by the department is considered to be exercised as long as it is in the trust water rights program.

(d) For the purposes of RCW 90.03.380(1) and 90.42.080(9), the consumptive quantity of a trust water right acquired by the state and held or authorized for use by the department is equal to the consumptive quantity of the right prior to transfer into the trust water rights program.

(5)(a) Before any trust water right is created or modified, the department shall, at a minimum, require that a notice be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county or counties in which the storage, diversion, and use are to be made, and in other newspapers as the department determines is necessary, once a week for two consecutive weeks.

(b) At the same time the department shall send a notice containing pertinent information to all appropriate state agencies, potentially affected local governments and federally recognized tribal governments, and other interested parties.

(c) For a trust water right donation described in RCW 90.42.080(1)(b), or for a trust water right lease described in RCW 90.42.080(8) that does not exceed five years, the department may post equivalent information on its web site to meet the notice requirements in (a) of this subsection and may send pertinent information by email to meet the notice requirements in (b) of this subsection.

(6) RCW 90.14.140 through 90.14.230 have no applicability to trust water rights held by the department under this chapter or exercised under this section.

(7) RCW 90.03.380 has no applicability to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding of water conservation projects.

(8) Subsection (4)(a) of this section does not apply to a trust water right resulting from a donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.42.080(1)(b) or to a trust water right leased under RCW 90.42.080(8) if the period of the lease does not exceed five years.

(9) Where a portion of an existing water right that is acquired or donated to the trust water rights program will assist in achieving established instream flows, the department shall process the change or amendment of the existing right without conducting a review of the extent and validity of the portion of the water right that will remain with the water right holder.

Sec. 6. RCW 90.42.100 and 2009 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is hereby authorized to use the trust water rights program for water banking purposes statewide.

(2) Water banking may be used for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To authorize the use of trust water rights to mitigate for water resource impacts, future water supply needs, or any beneficial use under chapter 43.83B, 90.03, 90.44, or 90.54 RCW, consistent with any terms and conditions established by the transferor, except that within the Yakima river basin return flows from water rights authorized in whole or in part for any purpose shall remain available as part of the Yakima basin's total water supply available and to satisfy existing rights for other downstream uses and users;

(b) To document transfers of water rights to and from the trust water rights program; and

(c) To provide a source of water rights the department can make available to third parties on a temporary or permanent basis for any beneficial use under chapter 43.83B, 90.03, 90.44, or 90.54 RCW.

(3) The department shall not use water banking to:

(a) Cause detriment or injury to existing rights;

(b) Issue temporary water rights or portions thereof for new potable uses requiring an adequate and reliable water supply under RCW 19.27.097;

(c) Administer federal project water rights, including federal storage rights; or

(d) Allow carryover of stored water in the Yakima basin from one water year to another water year if it would negatively impact the total water supply available.

(4) The department shall provide electronic notice and opportunity for comment to affected local governments and affected federally recognized tribal governments prior to initiating use of the trust water rights program for water banking purposes for the first time in each water resource inventory area.

(5) Nothing in this section may be interpreted or administered in a manner that precludes the use of the department's existing authority to process trust water rights applications under this chapter or to process water right applications under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW.

(6) For purposes of this section and RCW 90.42.135, "total water supply available" shall be defined as provided in the 1945 consent decree between the United States and water users in the Yakima river basin, and consistent with later interpretation by state and federal courts.

--- END ---