BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.61.150 and 2019 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Metropolitan park commissioners selected by election according to RCW 35.61.050(2) shall perform their duties and may provide, by resolution passed by the commissioners, for the payment of compensation to each of its commissioners at a rate up to the daily compensation maximum amount provided in subsection (3) of this section for each day or portion of a day spent in actual attendance at official meetings or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district. However, the compensation for each commissioner must not exceed the annual compensation maximum amount provided in subsection (3) of this section per year.

(2) Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the clerk of the board. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

(3)(a) For purposes of the references in subsection (1) of this section, the daily compensation maximum amount is one hundred twenty-eight dollars and the annual compensation maximum amount is twelve thousand two hundred eighty-eight dollars. However, for any metropolitan park district with facilities including an aquarium, a wildlife park, and a zoo, accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency, the annual compensation maximum amount is twenty-four thousand five hundred seventy-six dollars.

(b) The dollar thresholds established in this subsection (3) must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2023))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

(4) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.57A.050 and 2018 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Within sixty days of the establishment of the boundaries of the public transportation benefit area the members of the county legislative authority and the elected representative of each city within the area shall provide for the selection of the governing body of such area, the public transportation benefit area authority, which shall consist of elected officials selected by and serving at the pleasure of the governing bodies of component cities within the area and the county legislative authority of each county within the area. The members of the governing body of the public transportation benefit area, if the population of the county in which the public transportation benefit area is located is more than four hundred thousand and the county does not also contain a city with a population of seventy-five thousand or more operating a transit system pursuant to chapter 35.95 RCW, must be selected to assure proportional representation, based on population, of each of the component cities located within the public transportation benefit area and the unincorporated areas of the county located within the public transportation benefit area, to the extent possible within the restrictions placed on the size of the governing body of a public transportation benefit area. If necessary to assure such proportional representation, multiple cities may be represented by a single elected official from one of the cities. A majority of the governing board may not be selected to represent a single component city. If at the time a public transportation benefit area authority assumes the public transportation functions previously provided under the interlocal cooperation act (chapter 39.34 RCW) there are citizen positions on the governing board of the transit system, those positions may be retained as positions on the governing board of the public transportation benefit area authority.

Within such sixty-day period, any city may by resolution of its legislative body withdraw from participation in the public transportation benefit area. The county legislative authority and each city remaining in the public transportation benefit area may disapprove and prevent the establishment of any governing body of a public transportation benefit area if the composition thereof does not meet its approval.

In no case shall the governing body of a single county public transportation benefit area be greater than nine voting members and in the case of a multicounty area, fifteen voting members. Those cities within the public transportation benefit area and excluded from direct membership on the authority are hereby authorized to designate a member of the authority who shall be entitled to represent the interests of such city which is excluded from direct membership on the authority. The legislative body of such city shall notify the authority as to the determination of its authorized representative on the authority.

There is one nonvoting member of the public transportation benefit area authority. The nonvoting member is recommended by the labor organization representing the public transportation employees within the local public transportation system. If the public transportation employees are represented by more than one labor organization, all such labor organizations shall select the nonvoting member by majority vote. The nonvoting member shall comply with all governing bylaws and policies of the authority. The chair or cochairs of the authority shall exclude the nonvoting member from attending any executive session held for the purpose of discussing negotiations with labor organizations. The chair or cochairs may exclude the nonvoting member from attending any other executive session. The requirement that a nonvoting member be appointed to the governing body of a public transportation benefit area authority does not apply to an authority that has no employees represented by a labor union.

Each member of the authority is eligible to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to receive compensation, as set by the authority, in an amount not to exceed forty-four dollars for each day during which the member attends official meetings of the authority or performs prescribed duties approved by the chair of the authority. Except that the authority may, by resolution, increase the payment of per diem compensation to each member from forty-four dollars up to ninety dollars per day or portion of a day for actual attendance at board meetings or for performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the authority. In no event may a member be compensated in any year for more than seventy-five days, except the chair who may be paid compensation for not more than one hundred days: PROVIDED, That compensation shall not be paid to an elected official or employee of federal, state, or local government who is receiving regular full-time compensation from such government for attending meetings and performing prescribed duties of the authority.

The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 3. RCW 53.12.260 and 2011 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each commissioner of a port district shall receive ninety dollars, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (4) of this section, per day or portion thereof spent (a) in actual attendance at official meetings of the port district commission, or (b) in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district. The total per diem compensation of a port commissioner shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in a year, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (4) of this section, or ten thousand eight hundred dollars in any year, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (4) of this section, for a port district with gross operating income of twenty-five million or more in the preceding calendar year.

(2) Port commissioners shall receive additional compensation as follows: (a) Each commissioner of a port district with gross operating revenues of twenty-five million dollars or more in the preceding calendar year shall receive a salary of five hundred dollars per month, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (4) of this section; and (b) each commissioner of a port district with gross operating revenues of from one million dollars to less than twenty-five million dollars in the preceding calendar year shall receive a salary of two hundred dollars per month, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) In lieu of the compensation specified in this section, a port commission may set compensation to be paid to commissioners.

(4) For any commissioner who has not elected to become a member of public employees retirement system before May 1, 1975, the compensation provided pursuant to this section shall not be considered salary for purposes of the provisions of any retirement system created pursuant to the general laws of this state nor shall attendance at such meetings or other service on behalf of the district constitute service as defined in RCW 41.40.010(37): PROVIDED, That in the case of a port district when commissioners are receiving compensation and contributing to the public employees retirement system, these benefits shall continue in full force and effect notwithstanding the provisions of ((RCW 53.12.260))this section and RCW 53.12.265.

The dollar thresholds for salaries and per diem compensation established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 4. RCW 54.12.080 and 2010 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Commissioners of public utility districts shall receive salaries as follows:

(a) Each public utility district commissioner of a district operating utility properties shall receive a salary of one thousand eight hundred dollars per month, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (6) of this section, during a calendar year if the district received total gross revenue of over fifteen million dollars during the fiscal year ending June 30th before the calendar year.

(b) Each public utility district commissioner of a district operating utility properties shall receive a salary of one thousand three hundred dollars per month, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (6) of this section, during a calendar year if the district received total gross revenue of from two million dollars to fifteen million dollars during the fiscal year ending June 30th before the calendar year.

(c) Commissioners of other districts shall receive a salary of six hundred dollars per month, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (6) of this section, for each commissioner.

(2) In addition to salary, all districts shall provide for the payment of per diem compensation to each commissioner at a rate of ninety dollars, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (6) of this section, for each day or portion thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the district commission or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district, to include meetings of the commission of his or her district or meetings attended by one or more commissioners of two or more districts called to consider business common to them, but such compensation paid during any one year to a commissioner shall not exceed twelve thousand six hundred dollars, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (6) of this section. Per diem compensation shall not be paid for services of a ministerial or professional nature.

(3) Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the district as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

(4) Each district commissioner shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with such business and meetings, including his or her subsistence and lodging and travel while away from his or her place of residence.

(5) Any district providing group insurance for its employees, covering them, their immediate family, and dependents, may provide insurance for its commissioner with the same coverage.

(6) The dollar thresholds for salaries and per diem compensation established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

(7) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 5. RCW 57.12.010 and 2008 c 31 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body of a district shall be a board of commissioners consisting of three members, or five or seven members as provided in RCW 57.12.015. The board shall annually elect one of its members as president and another as secretary.

The board shall by resolution adopt rules governing the transaction of its business and shall adopt an official seal. All proceedings shall be by resolution recorded in a book kept for that purpose which shall be a public record.

Each commissioner shall receive ninety dollars for each day or portion thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the district commission, or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district. However, the compensation for each commissioner shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars per year. In addition, the secretary may be paid a reasonable sum for clerical services.

Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during the commissioner's term of office, by a written waiver filed with the district at any time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

No commissioner shall be employed full time by the district. A commissioner shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with district business, including subsistence and lodging while away from the commissioner's place of residence and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle at the mileage rate authorized in RCW 43.03.060.

The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 6. RCW 68.52.220 and 2013 c 167 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The affairs of the cemetery district must be managed by a board of cemetery district commissioners composed of three members. The board may provide, by resolution passed by the commissioners, for the payment of compensation to each of its commissioners at a rate of up to ninety dollars for each day or portion of a day spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the district commission, or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district. However, the compensation for each commissioner must not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars per year.

(2) Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the clerk of the board. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver must specify the month or period of months for which it is made. The board must fix the compensation to be paid the secretary and other employees of the district. Cemetery district commissioners and candidates for cemetery district commissioner are exempt from the requirements of chapter 42.17A RCW.

(3) The initial cemetery district commissioners must assume office immediately upon their election and qualification. Staggering of terms of office must be accomplished as follows: (a) The person elected receiving the greatest number of votes is elected to a six-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a five-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (b) the person who is elected receiving the next greatest number of votes is elected to a four-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a three-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (c) the other person who is elected is elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial commissioners must assume office immediately after they are elected and qualified but their terms of office must be calculated from the first day of January after the election.

(4) Thereafter, commissioners are elected to six-year terms of office. Commissioners must serve until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office as provided in RCW ((29A.20.040))29A.60.280.

(5) The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items must be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

(6) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts may receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 7. RCW 70.44.050 and 2008 c 31 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Each commissioner shall receive ninety dollars for each day or portion thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the district commission, or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district, to include meetings of the commission of his or her own district, or meetings attended by one or more commissioners of two or more districts called to consider business common to them, except that the total compensation paid to such commissioner during any one year shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars. The commissioners may not be compensated for services performed of a ministerial or professional nature.

Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the district as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

Any district providing group insurance for its employees, covering them, their immediate family, and dependents, may provide insurance for its commissioners with the same coverage. Each commissioner shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with such business and meetings, including his or her subsistence and lodging and travel while away from his or her place of residence. No resolution shall be adopted without a majority vote of the whole commission. The commission shall organize by election of its own members of a president and secretary, shall by resolution adopt rules governing the transaction of its business and shall adopt an official seal. All proceedings of the commission shall be by motion or resolution recorded in a book or books kept for such purpose, which shall be public records.

The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 8. RCW 85.05.410 and 2007 c 469 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Members of the board of diking commissioners of any diking district in this state may receive as compensation the sum of up to ninety dollars for actual attendance at official meetings of the district and for each day or part thereof, or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district and shall receive the same compensation as other labor of a like character for all other necessary work or services performed in connection with their duties: PROVIDED, That such compensation shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in one calendar year, except when the commissioners declare an emergency. Allowance of such compensation shall be established and approved at regular meetings of the board, and when a copy of the extracts of minutes of the board meeting relative thereto showing such approval is certified by the secretary of such board and filed with the county auditor, the allowance made shall be paid as are other claims against the district.

Each commissioner is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with such business, including subsistence and lodging, while away from the commissioner's place of residence, and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.

Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 9. RCW 85.06.380 and 2007 c 469 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

In performing their duties under the provisions of this title the board and members of the board of drainage commissioners may receive as compensation up to ninety dollars per day or portion thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the district, or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district: PROVIDED, That such compensation shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in one calendar year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such services and compensation are allowed and approved at a regular meeting of the board. Upon the submission of a copy, certified by the secretary, of the extracts of the relevant minutes of the board showing such approval, to the county auditor, the same shall be paid as other claims against the district are paid. Each commissioner is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with such business, including subsistence and lodging, while away from the commissioner's place of residence and mileage for use of a privately-owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.

Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 10. RCW 85.08.320 and 2007 c 469 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The compensation of the superintendent of construction, the board of appraisers hereinafter provided for, and any special engineer, attorney or agent employed by the district in connection with the improvement, the maximum wages to be paid, and the maximum price of materials to be used, shall be fixed by the district board of supervisors. Members of the board of supervisors may receive compensation up to ninety dollars per day or portion thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the district, or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district: PROVIDED, That such compensation shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in one calendar year. Each supervisor shall be entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with business, including subsistence and lodging while away from the supervisor's place of residence and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW. All costs of construction or maintenance done under the direction of the board of supervisors shall be paid upon vouchers or payrolls verified by two of the said supervisors. All costs of construction and all other expenses, fees and charges on account of such improvement shall be paid by warrants drawn by the county auditor upon the county treasurer upon the proper fund, and shall draw interest at a rate determined by the county legislative authority until paid or called by the county treasurer as warrants of the county are called.

Any supervisor may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the supervisor's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 11. RCW 85.24.080 and 2007 c 469 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The members of the board may receive as compensation up to ninety dollars per day or portion thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the district, or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district: PROVIDED, That such compensation shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in one calendar year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the board may fix a different salary for the secretary thereof in lieu of the per diem. Each commissioner is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with such business, including subsistence and lodging, while away from the commissioner's place of residence, and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW. The salary and expenses shall be paid by the treasurer of the fund, upon orders made by the board. Each member of the board must before being paid for expenses, take vouchers therefore from the person or persons to whom the particular amount was paid, and must also make affidavit that the amounts were necessarily incurred and expended in the performance of his or her duties.

Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 12. RCW 85.38.075 and 2007 c 469 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The members of the governing body may each receive up to ninety dollars per day or portion thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the governing body or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district. The governing body shall fix the compensation to be paid to the members, secretary, and all other agents and employees of the district. Compensation for the members shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in one calendar year. A member is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with such business, including subsistence and lodging, while away from the member's place of residence, and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.

Any member may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the member's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 13. RCW 86.09.283 and 2007 c 469 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of directors may each receive up to ninety dollars per day or portion thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the board, or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the board. The board shall fix the compensation to be paid to the directors, secretary, and all other agents and employees of the district. Compensation for the directors shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in one calendar year. A director is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with such business, including subsistence and lodging, while away from the director's place of residence, and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.

Any director may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the director's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 14. RCW 86.15.055 and 2015 c 165 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a zone with supervisors elected pursuant to RCW 86.15.050, the supervisors may, as adjusted in accordance with subsection (4) of this section, each receive up to one hundred fourteen dollars per day or portion of a day spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the governing body or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the zone. The compensation for supervisors in office on January 1, 2015, is fixed at one hundred fourteen dollars per day. The board of county commissioners shall fix any such compensation to be paid to the initial supervisors during their initial terms of office. The supervisors shall fix the compensation to be paid to the supervisors thereafter. Compensation for the supervisors shall not exceed ten thousand nine hundred forty-four dollars in one calendar year.

(2) A supervisor is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with performance of the duties of a supervisor, including subsistence and lodging, while away from the supervisor's place of residence, and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.

(3) Any supervisor may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the supervisors as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the member's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

(4) The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2018))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state and including all items, must be used for the adjustments of inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

Sec. 15. RCW 87.03.460 and 2009 c 145 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to their reasonable expenses in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW, the directors shall each receive ninety dollars for each day or portion thereof spent by a director for such actual attendance at official meetings of the district, or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district. The total amount of such additional compensation received by a director may not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in a calendar year. The board shall fix the compensation of the secretary and all other employees.

(2) Any director may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the director's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

(3) The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning ((July 1, 2008))January 1, 2024, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

(4) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

--- END ---