BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:

No school district may discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, deny a promotion to, sanction, discipline, retaliate against, harass, or otherwise discriminate against a school district employee because the employee reported noncompliance with an individualized education program to an appropriate school official, school district administrator, or the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

--- END ---