BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 52.02.020 and 2010 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Fire protection districts for the provision of fire prevention services, fire suppression services, emergency medical services, and for the protection of life and property are authorized to be established as provided in this title.

(2) In addition to other services authorized under this section, fire protection districts that share a common border with Canada and are surrounded on three sides by water or are bounded on the north by Bremerton, on the west by Mason county, on the south by Pierce county, and on the east by the Puget Sound or are in Pierce county and surrounded by Case Inlet, Drayton Passage, Pitt Passage, and Carr Inlet, may also establish or participate in the provision of health clinic services.

--- END ---