BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.150.100 and 2007 c 267 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Direct practices must submit annual statements, beginning on October 1, 2007, to the office of (([the]))the insurance commissioner specifying the number of providers in each practice, total number of patients being served, the average direct fee being charged, providers' names, and the business address for each direct practice. The form and content for the annual statement must be developed in a manner prescribed by the commissioner.

(2) A health care provider may not act as, or hold himself or herself out to be, a direct practice in this state, nor may a direct agreement be entered into with a direct patient in this state, unless the provider submits the annual statement in subsection (1) of this section to the commissioner.

(3) The commissioner shall report annually to the legislature on direct practices including, but not limited to, participation trends, complaints received, voluntary data reported by the direct practices, and any necessary modifications to this chapter. The initial report shall be due December 1, 2009.

(4) This section expires November 30, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 48.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, beginning January 1, 2021, direct practices must register with the office of the insurance commissioner no later than thirty days prior to engaging in direct practice.

(2) To obtain a registration under this section, a direct practice must submit an application to the office of the insurance commissioner, containing:

(a) A list of providers' names at the practice;

(b) The business address of the practice;

(c) All direct agreements; and

(d) A written affirmation that the direct practice provider has read and understands the obligations under this chapter.

(3) A direct practice that filed an annual statement under RCW 48.150.100 during calendar year 2020 will be automatically registered by the office of the insurance commissioner.

(4) A registered direct practice must:

(a) Notify the insurance commissioner in writing of:

(i) A change of address; or

(ii) A discontinuation of the practice; and

(b) File updated direct agreements following any material change to the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2021.

--- END ---