BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.655.300 and 2019 c 279 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

By September 1, ((2020))2021, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ((adopt essential academic learning requirements and grade-level expectations that)) identify existing state learning standards that address the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of diverse cultures. These ((essential academic learning requirements and grade-level expectations))state learning standards must be periodically updated to incorporate best practices in ethnic studies.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.112 and 2019 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By September 1, ((2020))2021, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall identify and make available ethnic studies materials and resources for use in grades ((seven))kindergarten through twelve. The materials and resources must be designed to prepare students to be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of multiple cultures. The materials and resources must be posted on the office of the superintendent of public instruction's web site.

(2)(a) Public schools with students in grades seven through twelve are encouraged to offer an ethnic studies course that incorporates the materials and resources identified under subsection (1) of this section.

(b) Public schools with students in grades kindergarten through six are encouraged to incorporate the materials and resources identified under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 3. 2019 c 279 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction must establish an ethnic studies advisory committee to:

(a) Advise, assist, and make recommendations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction regarding the identification of ethnic studies materials and resources((: (i) Described under section 3 of this act; and (ii) for use in elementary schools; and))under RCW 28A.300.112;

(b) Develop a framework to support the teaching of ethnic studies to students in grades ((seven))kindergarten through twelve; and

(c) Consider the need for piloting ethnic studies materials and resources and professional development.

(2) The ethnic studies advisory committee must be composed of a majority of educators with experience in teaching ethnic studies from public high schools and institutions of higher education and educators with experience in age-appropriate ethnic studies curricula, including educators representing the Washington state commissions on African American affairs, Asian Pacific American affairs, and Hispanic affairs.

(3) This section expires June 30, ((2021))2022.

--- END ---