BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to provide access to the full complement of substance use disorder treatment services available under the state medicaid plan in adequate amounts within each regional service area established under RCW 74.09.870 to the extent feasible. This section does not require the state to provide secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility services under chapter 71.05 RCW within each regional service area before July 1, 2026.

(2) State funding may not be used to provide medical transportation to a person for substance use disorder treatment services located outside their home regional service area unless there is no equivalent service offered within the person's regional service area.

--- END ---