BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January 1, 2021, all substance use disorder treatment programs and facilities that receive medicaid funds or funding through the state capital budget must disclose to the public, upon request, the:

(a) Number of clients served and a list of treatment modalities offered at the program or facility during the most recent calendar year;

(b) Program completion rate for clients within the program or facility who have been served during the two most recent calendar years;

(c) Rate at which clients who have been served by the program or facility in the two most recent calendar years can be determined subsequent to their admission to the program or facility to have been:

(i) Readmitted for publicly funded substance use disorder treatment services;

(ii) Arrested or convicted of a criminal offense;

(iii) Civilly committed for involuntary behavioral health services; or

(iv) Deceased.

(2) The authority and department of social and health services must collaborate with substance use disorder treatment programs and facilities under subsection (1) of this section to assist in providing information needed to fulfill the requirements of that subsection.

(3) This section does not authorize or require the disclosure of personally identifiable information or personal health information that is not disclosable under state or federal privacy laws.

(4) For the purposes of this section, information related to the previous calendar year is not required to be provided or disclosed until the start of the second quarter of the subsequent year.

--- END ---