BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 1999 c 212 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that the taxation of "services rendered in respect to constructing buildings or other structures" has generally included the entire transaction for construction, including certain services provided directly to the consumer or owner rather than the person engaged in the performance of the constructing activity. Changes in business practices and recent administrative and court decisions have confused the issue. Recognizing the need to remove barriers to the creation of affordable housing, it is the intent of the legislature to clarify which services, if standing alone and not part of the construction agreement, are taxed as retail or wholesale sales, and which services will continue to be taxed as a service.

(2) It is further the intent of the legislature to confirm that the entire price for the construction of a building or other structure for a consumer or owner continues to be a retail sale, even though some of the individual services reflected in the price, if provided alone, would be taxed as services and not as separate retail or wholesale sales.

(3) Therefore, the intent of this act is to maintain the application of the law and not to extend retail treatment to activities not previously treated as retail activities. Services that are otherwise subject to tax as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2), including but not limited to engineering, architectural, surveying, flagging, accounting, legal, consulting, or administrative services, remain subject to tax as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2), if the person responsible for the performance of those services is not also responsible for the performance of the constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activities. Additionally, unless otherwise provided by law, a person entering into an agreement to be responsible for the performance of services otherwise subject to tax as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2), and subsequently entering into a separate agreement to be responsible for the performance of constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activities, is subject to tax as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) with respect to the first agreement, and is subject to tax under the appropriate section of chapter 82.04 RCW with respect to the second agreement, if at the time of the first agreement there was no contemplation by the parties, as evidenced by the facts, that the agreements would be awarded to the same person.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.051 and 1999 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in RCW 82.04.050, the term "services rendered in respect to" means those services that are directly related to the constructing, building, repairing, improving, and decorating of buildings or other structures and that are performed by a person who is responsible for the performance of the constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activity. The term does not include services such as engineering, architectural, surveying, flagging, accounting, legal, consulting, land development or management, or administrative services provided to the consumer of, or person responsible for performing, the constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating services.

(2) A contract or agreement under which a person is responsible for both services that would otherwise be subject to tax as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) and also constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activities that would otherwise be subject to tax under another section of this chapter is subject to the tax that applies to the predominant activity under the contract or agreement.

(3) Unless otherwise provided by law, a contract or agreement under which a person is responsible for activities that are subject to tax as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2), and a subsequent contract or agreement under which the same person is responsible for constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activities subject to tax under another section of this chapter, shall not be combined and taxed as a single activity if at the time of the first contract or agreement it was not contemplated by the parties, as evidenced by the facts, that the same person would be awarded both contracts.

(4) ((As used in this section))The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Land development or management" means site identification, zoning, permitting, and other preconstruction regulatory services provided to the consumer of the constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating services. This includes, but is not limited to, acting as an owner's representative during any design or construction period, including recommending a contractor, monitoring the budget and schedule, approving invoices, and interacting on the behalf of the consumer with the person who has control over the work itself or responsible for the performance of the work.

(b)"Responsible for the performance" means that the person is obligated to perform the activities, either personally or through a third party. A person who reviews work for a consumer, retailer, or wholesaler but does not supervise or direct the work is not responsible for the performance of the work. A person who is financially obligated for the work, such as a bank, but who does not have control over the work itself is not responsible for the performance of the work.

--- END ---