BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.010 and 2014 c 207 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All property belonging exclusively to the United States, the state, or any county or municipal corporation; all property belonging exclusively to any federally recognized Indian tribe, if (a) the tribe is located in the state, and (b) the property is used exclusively for essential government services; all state route number 16 corridor transportation systems and facilities constructed under chapter 47.46 RCW; all property under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW or recorded agreement granting immediate possession and use to the public bodies listed in this section or under an order of immediate possession and use pursuant to RCW 8.04.090; and, for a period of forty years from acquisition, all property of a community center; is exempt from taxation. All property belonging exclusively to a foreign national government is exempt from taxation if that property is used exclusively as an office or residence for a consul or other official representative of the foreign national government, and if the consul or other official representative is a citizen of that foreign nation.

(2) ((Property owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe, which is used for economic development purposes, may only qualify for the exemption from taxes in this section if the property was owned by the tribe prior to March 1, 2014.

(3))) For the purposes of this section the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Community center" means property, including a building or buildings, determined to be surplus to the needs of a district by a local school board, and purchased or acquired by a nonprofit organization for the purposes of converting them into community facilities for the delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for community members. The community center may make space available to businesses, individuals, or other parties through the loan or rental of space in or on the property.

(b) "Essential government services" means services such as tribal administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health, education, sewer, water, environmental and land use, transportation, utility services, and economic development.

(c) "Economic development" means commercial activities, including those that facilitate the creation or retention of businesses or jobs, or that improve the standard of living or economic health of tribal communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. 2014 c 207 s 14 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 2306 (uncodified) is repealed.

Sec. 4. 2017 c 323 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this part, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

(2) Parts IV, VI, VIII, and XIX of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect September 1, 2015.

(3) Part X of this act takes effect October 1, 2016.

(4) Section 1105 of this act takes effect January 1, 2016.

(5) Except for section 2004 of this act, Part XX of this act takes effect January 1, 2019.

(((6) Section 2004 of this act takes effect January 1, 2022.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---