BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as required in subsection (2) of this section, a health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2021, that provides coverage for prescription insulin drugs for the treatment of diabetes must cap the total amount that an enrollee is required to pay for a covered insulin drug at an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars per thirty-day supply of the drug. Prescription insulin drugs must be covered without being subject to a deductible, and any cost sharing paid by an enrollee must be applied toward the enrollee's deductible obligation. Beginning January 1, 2022, for every one hundred dollar increase in the cost of an insulin product for the health plan from the previous plan year, taking into account rebates and other price concessions, the health plan may submit a request to the office of the insurance commissioner, including proper documentation, to raise the cost-sharing amount for a thirty-day supply by five dollars.

(2) If the federal internal revenue service removes insulin from the list of preventive care services which can be covered by a qualifying health plan for a health savings account before the deductible is satisfied, for a health plan that provides coverage for prescription insulin drugs for the treatment of diabetes and is offered as a qualifying health plan for a health savings account, the carrier must establish the plan's cost sharing for the coverage of prescription insulin for diabetes at the minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax exempt contributions from his or her health savings account under internal revenue service laws and regulations. The office of the insurance commissioner must provide written notice of the change in internal revenue service guidance to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the office.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as required in subsection (2) of this section, a health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that is issued or renewed by the board on or after January 1, 2021, that provides coverage for prescription insulin drugs for the treatment of diabetes must cap the total amount that an enrollee is required to pay for a covered insulin drug at an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars per thirty-day supply of the drug. Prescription insulin drugs must be covered without being subject to a deductible, and any cost sharing paid by an enrollee must be applied toward the enrollee's deductible obligation. Beginning January 1, 2022, for every one hundred dollar increase in the cost of an insulin product for the health plan from the previous plan year, taking into account rebates and other price concessions, the health plan may submit a request to the office of the insurance commissioner, including proper documentation, to raise the cost-sharing amount for a thirty-day supply by five dollars.

(2) If the federal internal revenue service removes insulin from the list of preventive care services which can be covered by a qualifying health plan for a health savings account before the deductible is satisfied, for a health plan that provides coverage for prescription insulin drugs for the treatment of diabetes and is offered as a qualifying health plan for a health savings account, the health plan offered under this chapter must establish the plan's cost sharing for the coverage of prescription insulin for diabetes at the minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax exempt contributions from his or her health savings account under internal revenue service laws and regulations. The office of the insurance commissioner must provide written notice of the change in internal revenue service guidance to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the office.

(3) The authority must monitor the wholesale acquisition cost of all insulin products sold in the state.

(4) This section expires January 1, 2023.

Sec. 3. RCW 48.20.391 and 1997 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that diabetes imposes a significant health risk and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted standards of care for diabetes, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the short and long-term complications of diabetes and its attendant costs.

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Person with diabetes" means a person diagnosed by a health care provider as having insulin using diabetes, noninsulin using diabetes, or elevated blood glucose levels induced by pregnancy; and

(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(2) All disability insurance contracts providing health care services, delivered or issued for delivery in this state and issued or renewed after January 1, 1998, shall provide benefits for at least the following services and supplies for persons with diabetes:

(a) For disability insurance contracts that include pharmacy services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and supplies, as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is not limited to insulin, syringes, injection aids, blood glucose monitors, test strips for blood glucose monitors, visual reading and urine test strips, insulin pumps and accessories to the pumps, insulin infusion devices, prescriptive oral agents for controlling blood sugar levels, foot care appliances for prevention of complications associated with diabetes, and glucagon emergency kits; and

(b) For all disability insurance contracts providing health care services, outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutrition therapy, as ordered by the health care provider. Diabetes outpatient self-management training and education may be provided only by health care providers with expertise in diabetes. Nothing in this section prevents the insurer from restricting patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed participating provider agreements with the insurer or an insuring entity under contract with the insurer.

(3) ((Coverage))Except as provided in section 1 of this act, coverage required under this section may be subject to customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar services or supplies within a policy.

(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to this section.

(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her designee, subject to any referral and formulary requirements.

(6) The insurer need not include the coverage required in this section in a group contract offered to an employer or other group that offers to its eligible enrollees a self-insured health plan not subject to mandated benefits status under this title that does not offer coverage similar to that mandated under this section.

(7) This section does not apply to the health benefit plan that provides benefits identical to the schedule of services covered by the basic health plan, as required by RCW 48.20.028.

Sec. 4. RCW 48.21.143 and 2004 c 244 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that diabetes imposes a significant health risk and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted standards of care for diabetes, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the short and long-term complications of diabetes and its attendant costs.

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Person with diabetes" means a person diagnosed by a health care provider as having insulin using diabetes, noninsulin using diabetes, or elevated blood glucose levels induced by pregnancy; and

(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(2) All group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability insurance contracts providing health care services, issued or renewed after January 1, 1998, shall provide benefits for at least the following services and supplies for persons with diabetes:

(a) For group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability insurance contracts that include coverage for pharmacy services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and supplies, as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is not limited to insulin, syringes, injection aids, blood glucose monitors, test strips for blood glucose monitors, visual reading and urine test strips, insulin pumps and accessories to the pumps, insulin infusion devices, prescriptive oral agents for controlling blood sugar levels, foot care appliances for prevention of complications associated with diabetes, and glucagon emergency kits; and

(b) For all group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability insurance contracts providing health care services, outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutrition therapy, as ordered by the health care provider. Diabetes outpatient self-management training and education may be provided only by health care providers with expertise in diabetes. Nothing in this section prevents the insurer from restricting patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed participating provider agreements with the insurer or an insuring entity under contract with the insurer.

(3) ((Coverage))Except as provided in section 1 of this act, coverage required under this section may be subject to customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar services or supplies within a policy.

(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to this section.

(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her designee, subject to any referral and formulary requirements.

(6) The insurer need not include the coverage required in this section in a group contract offered to an employer or other group that offers to its eligible enrollees a self-insured health plan not subject to mandated benefits status under this title that does not offer coverage similar to that mandated under this section.

(7) This section does not apply to the health benefit plan that provides benefits identical to the schedule of services covered by the basic health plan.

Sec. 5. RCW 48.44.315 and 2004 c 244 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that diabetes imposes a significant health risk and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted standards of care for diabetes, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the short and long-term complications of diabetes and its attendant costs.

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Person with diabetes" means a person diagnosed by a health care provider as having insulin using diabetes, noninsulin using diabetes, or elevated blood glucose levels induced by pregnancy; and

(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(2) All health benefit plans offered by health care service contractors, issued or renewed after January 1, 1998, shall provide benefits for at least the following services and supplies for persons with diabetes:

(a) For health benefit plans that include coverage for pharmacy services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and supplies, as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is not limited to insulin, syringes, injection aids, blood glucose monitors, test strips for blood glucose monitors, visual reading and urine test strips, insulin pumps and accessories to the pumps, insulin infusion devices, prescriptive oral agents for controlling blood sugar levels, foot care appliances for prevention of complications associated with diabetes, and glucagon emergency kits; and

(b) For all health benefit plans, outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutrition therapy, as ordered by the health care provider. Diabetes outpatient self-management training and education may be provided only by health care providers with expertise in diabetes. Nothing in this section prevents the health care services contractor from restricting patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed participating provider agreements with the health care services contractor or an insuring entity under contract with the health care services contractor.

(3) ((Coverage))Except as provided in section 1 of this act, coverage required under this section may be subject to customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar services or supplies within a policy.

(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to this section.

(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her designee, subject to any referral and formulary requirements.

(6) The health care service contractor need not include the coverage required in this section in a group contract offered to an employer or other group that offers to its eligible enrollees a self-insured health plan not subject to mandated benefits status under this title that does not offer coverage similar to that mandated under this section.

(7) This section does not apply to the health benefit plans that provide benefits identical to the schedule of services covered by the basic health plan.

Sec. 6. RCW 48.46.272 and 2004 c 244 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that diabetes imposes a significant health risk and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted standards of care for diabetes, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the short and long-term complications of diabetes and its attendant costs.

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Person with diabetes" means a person diagnosed by a health care provider as having insulin using diabetes, noninsulin using diabetes, or elevated blood glucose levels induced by pregnancy; and

(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(2) All health benefit plans offered by health maintenance organizations, issued or renewed after January 1, 1998, shall provide benefits for at least the following services and supplies for persons with diabetes:

(a) For health benefit plans that include coverage for pharmacy services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and supplies, as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is not limited to insulin, syringes, injection aids, blood glucose monitors, test strips for blood glucose monitors, visual reading and urine test strips, insulin pumps and accessories to the pumps, insulin infusion devices, prescriptive oral agents for controlling blood sugar levels, foot care appliances for prevention of complications associated with diabetes, and glucagon emergency kits; and

(b) For all health benefit plans, outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutrition therapy, as ordered by the health care provider. Diabetes outpatient self-management training and education may be provided only by health care providers with expertise in diabetes. Nothing in this section prevents the health maintenance organization from restricting patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed participating provider agreements with the health maintenance organization or an insuring entity under contract with the health maintenance organization.

(3) ((Coverage))Except as provided in section 1 of this act, coverage required under this section may be subject to customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar services or supplies within a policy.

(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to this section.

(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her designee, subject to any referral and formulary requirements.

(6) The health maintenance organization need not include the coverage required in this section in a group contract offered to an employer or other group that offers to its eligible enrollees a self-insured health plan not subject to mandated benefits status under this title that does not offer coverage similar to that mandated under this section.

(7) This section does not apply to the health benefit plans that provide benefits identical to the schedule of services covered by the basic health plan.

--- END ---