BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.10.873 and 2007 c 519 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design, right-of-way, and construction of selected projects or improvements that are identified as 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements in ((the))an omnibus transportation ((budget chapter 313, Laws of 2005))appropriations act, there shall be issued and sold upon the request of the department of transportation a total of five billion three hundred million dollars of general obligation bonds of the state of Washington.

--- END ---