BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For individual and small group rate filings with an effective date on or after January 1, 2021, submitted by a nonprofit health carrier for either the individual or small group markets, the commissioner may review the carrier's surplus, capital, or profit levels as an element in determining the reasonableness of the proposed rate.

(2) In reviewing the surplus, capital, or profit levels, the commissioner must take into consideration whether a carrier's insurance holding company system offers a qualified health plan in the individual market in every county of the state, and the current capital facility needs for carriers, including those maintaining and operating hospital and clinical facilities.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, this section does not affect the rate review authority granted to the commissioner by chapter 48.19, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW.

(4) Nothing in this section affects the requirement that all approved individual and small group rates be actuarially sound according to chapter 48.19, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW.

(5) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---