BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.657.100 and 2013 c 159 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction must provide a report twice per year to the state board of education regarding the progress made by all school districts designated as required action districts.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction must recommend to the state board of education that a school district be released from the designation as a required action district after the district implements a required action plan for a period of three years; has made progress, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction using the criteria adopted under RCW 28A.657.020 including progress in closing the educational opportunity gap; and no longer has a school within the district identified as persistently lowest-achieving. The state board shall release a school district from the designation as a required action district upon confirmation that the district has met the requirements for a release.

(3) If the state board of education determines that the required action district has not met the requirements for release after at least three years of implementing a required action plan, the board may recommend that the district remain in required action and submit a new or revised plan under the process in RCW 28A.657.050, or the board may direct that the school district be assigned to level two of the required action process as provided in RCW 28A.657.105. If the required action district received a federal school improvement grant for the same persistently lowest-achieving school in 2010 or 2011, the board may direct that the school district be assigned to level two of the required action process after one year of implementing a required action plan under this chapter if the district is not making progress. ((Before making a determination of whether to recommend that a school district that is not making progress remain in required action or be assigned to level two of the required action process, the state board of education must submit its findings to the education accountability system oversight committee under RCW 28A.657.130 and provide an opportunity for the oversight committee to review and comment.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 28A.657.130 (Education accountability system oversight committee—Membership—Duties—Reports) and 2013 c 159 s 13 are each repealed.

--- END ---