BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By January 1, 2021, the board shall develop a pharmacy tourism program available to individuals enrolled in a health plan offered by the board to allow enrollees to obtain prescription drugs at lower cost outside of the United States.

(2) When designing the program, the board shall:

(a) Establish a list of prescription drugs eligible for the program, including but not limited to insulin, based on the projected cost savings of obtaining the drugs outside of the United States; and

(b) Contract with at least one clinic or pharmacy in a country bordering Washington.

(3) The program shall include:

(a) Reimbursement for necessary transportation and lodging expenses to program participants; and

(b) A participation incentive that may include:

(i) Premium discounts;

(ii) Rebates;

(iii) Reduction in out-of-pocket costs; or

(iv) Other rewards developed by the board.

(4) The authority may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

(5) For purposes of this section, "program" means a pharmacy tourism program established by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A carrier offering a health plan may develop a pharmacy tourism program for enrollees to obtain prescription drugs at lower cost outside of the United States.

(2) A carrier that establishes a program shall:

(a) Establish a list of prescription drugs eligible for the program, including but not limited to insulin, based on the projected cost savings of obtaining the drugs outside of the United States; and

(b) Contract with at least one clinic or pharmacy in a country bordering Washington.

(3) The program must provide:

(a) Reimbursement for necessary transportation and lodging expenses to the participants; and

(b) A participation incentive that may include:

(i) Premium discounts;

(ii) Rebates;

(iii) Reduction in out-of-pocket costs; or

(iv) Other rewards developed by the carrier.

(4) For purposes of this section, "program" means a pharmacy tourism program established by a carrier as part of a health plan.

--- END ---