BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The governor may enter into agreements with federally recognized Indian tribes principally located within this state concerning the licensing and registration of tribal government and tribal member-owned vehicles with tribal license plates issued by the department.

(2) Each agreement entered into under this section must contain the following provisions:

(a) The design of a tribal license plate to be determined by the compacting tribe, except that the design must be readable by toll collection facilities and configured in a manner allowing for electronic distribution through state and national law enforcement databases;

(b) That the eligibility for a tribal license plate is limited to tribal governments and enrolled tribal members of the compacting tribe who reside in the state, and that the agreement may address additional requirements;

(c) Information regarding a tribal-owned vehicle that has been issued a tribal license plate, including vehicle description and ownership information, be maintained in the department of licensing's recordkeeping systems.

(3) Each agreement must also address the following subjects:

(a) Taxes and fees for tribal license plates;

(b) The department's administrative costs for providing tribal license plates to the compacting tribe;

(c) Vehicle tolls and tribal member license plates;

(d) Information sharing between the department and the compacting tribe;

(e) The process for applying for and receiving a tribal license plate; and

(f) Dispute resolution, including the use of mediation or other nonjudicial process.

(4) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate agreements under this section to the department.

--- END ---