BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.04.410 and 2013 c 11 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Every county, city, town, and district, and the state is liable for its proportionate share of the costs when such elections are held in conjunction with other elections held under RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330.

Whenever any county, city, town, or district, or the state holds any primary or election, general or special, on an isolated date, all costs of such elections must be borne by the county, city, town, or district concerned, or the state as appropriate.

The purpose of this section is to clearly establish that the county is not responsible for any costs involved in the holding of any city, town, ((or)) district, state, or federal election.

In recovering such election expenses, including a reasonable ((pro-ration))proration of administrative costs, the county auditor shall certify the cost to the county treasurer with a copy to the clerk or auditor of the city, town, or district concerned, or the secretary of state as appropriate. Upon receipt of such certification relating to a city, town, or district, the county treasurer shall make the transfer from any available and appropriate city, town, or district funds to the county current expense fund or to the county election reserve fund if such a fund is established. Each city, town, or district must be promptly notified by the county treasurer whenever such transfer has been completed. However, in those districts wherein a treasurer, other than the county treasurer, has been appointed such transfer procedure does not apply, but the district shall promptly issue its warrant for payment of election costs. State and federal offices are to be considered one entity for purposes of election cost proration and reimbursement.

Sec. 2. RCW 29A.04.420 and 2019 c 161 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever federal officers, state officers, or measures are voted upon at a state primary or general election held ((in an odd-numbered year)) under RCW 29A.04.321, the state of Washington shall assume a prorated share of the costs of that state primary or general election((.

(2) The state shall reimburse counties for))for the federal and state offices and measures, including the prorated cost of return postage, required to be included on return envelopes pursuant to RCW 29A.40.091((, for all elections)).

(((3)))(2) Whenever a primary or vacancy election is held to fill a vacancy in the position of United States senator or United States representative under chapter 29A.28 RCW, the state of Washington shall assume a prorated share of the costs of that primary or vacancy election.

(((4)))(3) The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of these expenses when prorating election costs under RCW 29A.04.410 and in accordance with the state budgeting, accounting, and reporting system, shall file such expense claims with the secretary of state.

(((5)))(4) The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this section. Reimbursements for election costs shall be from appropriations specifically provided by law for that purpose.

(5) State and federal offices are to be considered one entity for purposes of election cost proration and reimbursement.

Sec. 3. RCW 29A.04.216 and 2013 c 11 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The county auditor of each county shall be ex officio the supervisor of all primaries and elections, general or special, and it shall be the county auditor's duty to provide places for holding such primaries and elections; to provide the supplies and materials necessary for the conduct of elections; and to publish and post notices of calling such primaries and elections in the manner provided by law. The auditor shall also apportion to the county, each city, town, or district, and to the state of Washington ((in the odd-numbered year)), its share of the expense of such primaries and elections. This section does not apply to general or special elections for any city, town, or district that is not subject to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, but all such elections must be held and conducted at the time, in the manner, and by the officials (with such notice, requirements for filing for office, and certifications by local officers) as provided and required by the laws governing such elections. State and federal offices are to be considered one entity for purposes of election cost proration and reimbursement.

Sec. 4. RCW 29A.04.430 and 2003 c 111 s 148 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For any reimbursement of election costs under RCW 29A.04.420, the secretary of state shall pay ((interest at an annual rate equal to two percentage points in excess of the discount rate on ninety-day commercial paper in effect at the federal reserve bank in San Francisco on the fifteenth day of the month immediately preceding the payment for any period of time in excess of))within thirty days after the receipt of a properly executed and documented voucher for such expenses and the entry of an allotment from specifically appropriated funds for this purpose until those funds are exhausted. If funds appropriated for this purpose are not sufficient to pay all claims, the secretary of state shall include a budget request to the legislature during the next legislative session for sufficient funds for reimbursement of all remaining claims and shall pay all properly executed and documented vouchers to the counties within thirty days of allotment of specifically appropriated funds for this purpose. The secretary of state shall promptly notify any county that submits an incomplete or inaccurate voucher for reimbursement under RCW 29A.04.420.

(2) Funding provided in this section to counties for election costs in even-numbered years is retrospective and prospective reimbursement under RCW 43.135.060 for any new or increased responsibilities under Title 29A RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 29A.64.081 and 2004 c 271 s 181 are each amended to read as follows:

The canvassing board shall determine the expenses for conducting a recount of votes.

((The))(1) For a recount conducted under RCW 29A.64.011, the cost of the recount shall be deducted from the amount deposited by the applicant for the recount at the time of filing the request for the recount, and the balance shall be returned to the applicant. If the costs of the recount exceed the deposit, the applicant shall pay the difference. No charges may be deducted by the canvassing board from the deposit for a recount if the recount changes the result of the nomination or election for which the recount was ordered.

(2) For a recount conducted under RCW 29A.64.021, for an office where the candidates filed the declarations of candidacy with the secretary of state, any legislative office, and any congressional office, the county auditor shall file an expense claim for such costs with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall include a budget request to the legislature during the next legislative session for sufficient funds for reimbursement of all costs of the recount and shall pay all properly executed and documented vouchers to the counties within thirty days of allotment of specifically appropriated funds for this purpose. The secretary of state shall promptly notify any county that submits an incomplete or inaccurate voucher for reimbursement under this section.

(3) State and federal offices are to be considered one entity for purposes of election cost proration and reimbursement.

Sec. 6. RCW 29A.32.210 and 2013 c 11 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

((At least ninety days before))Before any primary or general election, or ((at least forty days before)) any special election held under RCW 29A.04.321 or 29A.04.330, ((the legislative authority of any county or first-class or code city may adopt an ordinance authorizing the publication and distribution of))each county auditor shall print and distribute a local voters' pamphlet. The pamphlet shall provide information on all measures ((within that jurisdiction and may, if specified in the ordinance, include information on))and candidates within that jurisdiction. ((If both a county and a first-class or code city within that county authorize a local voters' pamphlet for the same election, the pamphlet shall be produced jointly by the county and the first-class or code city. If no agreement can be reached between the county and first-class or code city, the county and first-class or code city may each produce a pamphlet. Any ordinance adopted authorizing a local voters' pamphlet may be for a specific primary, special election, or general election or for any future primaries or elections.)) The format of any local voters' pamphlet shall, whenever applicable, comply with the provisions of this chapter regarding the publication of the state candidates' and voters' pamphlets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act takes effect July 1, 2021.

--- END ---