BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the Northwest's power system is undergoing significant changes, including the retirement of baseload power generation resources, changes in hydroelectric output, and increases in distributed generation and variable renewable generation. Maintaining the adequacy, sufficiency, and availability of power supply to the growing populace in the Northwest is critical to the future of the region. Additional information sharing and coordination among utilities, planning entities, and state agencies is necessary to ensure that the region is adapting to the changing power system while maintaining the adequacy, sufficiency, and availability of the power supply for the region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.280 RCW to read as follows:

(1) At least once every twelve months, the department and the commission shall jointly convene a meeting of representatives of the investor-owned utilities and consumer-owned utilities, regional planning organizations, transmission operators, and other stakeholders to discuss the current, short-term, and long-term adequacy of energy resources to serve the state's electric needs, and address specific steps the utilities can take to coordinate planning in light of the significant changes to the Northwest's power system including, but not limited to, technological developments, retirements of legacy baseload power generation resources, and changes in laws and regulations affecting power supply options. The department and commission shall provide a summary of these meetings, including any specific action items, to the governor and legislature within sixty days of the meeting.

(2) This section expires January 1, 2025.

--- END ---