BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.131.417 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 24 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The joint center for aerospace technology innovation shall be terminated July 1, ((2020))2030, as provided in RCW 43.131.418.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.131.418 and 2014 c 112 s 122 are each amended to read as follows:

The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, ((2021))2031:

(1) RCW 28B.155.010 and 2014 c 174 s 3, 2014 c 112 s 102, & 2012 c 242 s 1; ((and))

(2) RCW 28B.155.020 and 2012 c 242 s 2; and

(3) RCW 28B.155.--- and 2020 c . . . s 3 (section 3 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28B.155 RCW to read as follows:

When determining industry partners, the joint center for aerospace technology innovation shall ensure aerospace firms and aerospace industry associations adhere to the values of the state of Washington under RCW 49.60.030, which provide its citizens freedom from discrimination. Any relationship with a potential or current industry partner that is found to have violated RCW 49.60.030 by the attorney general shall not be considered and immediately terminated unless:

(1) The industry partner has fulfilled the conditions or obligations associated with any court order or settlement resulting from that violation; or

(2) The industry partner has taken significant and meaningful steps to correct the violation, as determined by the Washington state human rights commission.

--- END ---