BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

The initial effective date of an action that expands an urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, removes the designation of agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170, creates or expands a limited area of more intensive rural development designated under RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), establishes a new fully contained community under RCW 36.70A.350, or creates or expands a master planned resort designated under RCW 36.70A.360, is after the latest of the following dates:

(1) Sixty days after the date of publication of notice of adoption of the comprehensive plan, development regulation, or amendment to the plan or regulation, modifying the boundaries of the urban growth area as provided in RCW 36.70A.290(2); or

(2) If a petition for review to the growth management hearings board is timely filed, upon issuance of the board's final order.

--- END ---