BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.210 and 2013 c 329 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

((In))(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration under chapter 46.16A RCW, the holder of a personalized license plate shall pay an initial fee of fifty-two dollars and forty-two dollars for each renewal.

(2) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration under chapter 46.16A RCW and RCW 46.17.220(5), a registered owner with a collector vehicle license plate issued under RCW 46.18.220 may receive a personalized collector vehicle license plate upon payment of a one-time initial fee of fifty-two dollars.

(3) The personalized license plate ((fee))fees under this section must be distributed as provided in RCW 46.68.435.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.18.275 and 2010 c 161 s 626 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner may apply to the department for a personalized license plate or to personalize a collector vehicle license plate for any vehicle required to display one or two vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department. The application for personalized license plates must contain the combination of letters or numbers, or both, requested by the registered owner.

(2) Personalized license plates must:

(a) Be the same design as standard issue license plates;

(b) Consist of numbers or letters or any combination of numbers or letters;

(c) Not exceed seven positions unless proposed by the department and approved by the Washington state patrol; and

(d) Not contain less than one character.

(3) A person who purchased personalized license plates containing three letters and three digits on or between the dates of August 9, 1971, and November 6, 1973, is not required to pay the additional annual renewal fee described in RCW 46.17.210.

(4) The department shall not issue or may refuse to issue personalized license plates that:

(a) Duplicate or conflict with an existing or projected vehicle license plate series or other numbering systems for records kept by the department; or

(b) May carry connotations offensive to good taste and decency or which would be misleading.

(5) Personalized license plates must be issued only to the registered owner of the vehicle on which they are to be displayed. The registered owner must:

(a) Pay the personalized license plate fee required under RCW 46.17.210, in addition to any other fee or taxes due;

(b) Renew personalized license plates annually, except for personalized collector vehicle license plates, regardless of whether or not the vehicle on which the personalized license plates are displayed will be driven on the public highways;

(c) Surrender personalized license plates that have not been renewed to the department. The failure to surrender expired personalized license plates is a traffic infraction; and

(d) Immediately report to the department when personalized license plates have been transferred to another vehicle or another owner.

(6) The department may establish rules as necessary to carry out this section including, but not limited to, identifying the maximum number of positions on personalized license plates for motorcycles.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.17.220 and 2019 c 384 s 2 and 2019 c 177 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE

INITIAL FEE

RENEWAL FEE

DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(1) 4-H

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(2) Amateur radio license

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(3) Armed forces

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(4) Breast cancer awareness

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(5) Collector vehicle

(($ 35.00))$ 70.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(6) Collegiate

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.430

(7) Endangered wildlife

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(8) Fred Hutch

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(9) Gonzaga University alumni association

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(10) Helping kids speak

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(11) Horseless carriage

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(12) Keep kids safe

$ 45.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(13) Law enforcement memorial

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(14) Military affiliate radio system

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(15) Music matters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(16) Professional firefighters and paramedics

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(17) Purple Heart

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(18) Ride share

$ 25.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(19) San Juan Islands

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(20) Seattle Mariners

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(21) Seattle Seahawks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(22) Seattle Sounders FC

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(23) Seattle Storm

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(24) Seattle University

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(25) Share the road

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(26) Ski & ride Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(27) Square dancer

$ 40.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(28) State flower

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(29) Volunteer firefighters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(30) Washington farmers and ranchers

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(31) Washington lighthouses

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(32) Washington state aviation

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(33) Washington state parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(34) Washington state wrestling

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(35) Washington tennis

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(36) Washington's fish collection

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(37) Washington's national parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(38) Washington's wildlife collection

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(39) We love our pets

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(40) Wild on Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

Sec. 4. RCW 46.04.126 and 2015 c 200 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(("Collector))(1) Prior to July 1, 2026, "collector vehicle" means any motor vehicle or travel trailer that is at least thirty years old and meets the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.220. A collector vehicle shall not be used for business or commercial purposes or for routine transportation of persons or property.

(2) For initial collector vehicle registrations on or after July 1, 2026, "collector vehicle" means any motor vehicle or travel trailer that is at least forty years old and meets the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.220. A collector vehicle shall not be used for business or commercial purposes or for routine transportation of persons or property.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.04.1261 and 2010 c 161 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

(("Collector))(1) Prior to July 1, 2026, "collector vehicle license plate" means a special license plate that may be assigned to a vehicle that is ((more than))at least thirty years old and meets the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.220.

(2) For initial collector vehicle registrations on or after July 1, 2026, "collector vehicle license plate" means a special license plate that may be assigned to a vehicle that is at least forty years old and meets the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.220.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.04.199 and 2017 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Horseless carriage license plate" is a special license plate that may be assigned to a motor vehicle ((that is at least forty years old))manufactured or built before January 1, 1916, and meets the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.255.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.18.220 and 2015 c 200 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a collector vehicle license plate for a motor vehicle or travel trailer that is at least thirty years old. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the collector vehicle license plate shall:

(a) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle or travel trailer as required under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; ((and))

(b) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW 46.17.220(((1)(f)))(5), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by law; and

(c) Submit a certification as prescribed in subsection (5) of this section.

(2) A person applying for a collector vehicle license plate may:

(a) Receive a collector vehicle license plate assigned by the department; ((or))

(b) ((Provide))For vehicles manufactured and with a model year before January 1, 1989, provide an actual Washington state issued license plate designated for general use in the year of the vehicle's manufacture; or

(c) Personalize the person's collector vehicle license plate by paying the additional fee specified in RCW 46.17.210, in addition to any other fees or taxes required by law.

(3) Collector vehicle license plates:

(a) ((Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle or travel trailer;

(b))) Are ((not)) required to be renewed every five years in accordance with section 10 of this act; and

(((c)))(b) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle or travel trailer.

(4) A collector vehicle registered under this section may only be used for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, ((and)) occasional pleasure driving, and use as necessary for operation and maintenance of the vehicle. A collector vehicle shall not be used for business or commercial purposes or for routine transportation of persons or property.

(5) When applying for an initial or renewal registration of a collector vehicle, the registered owner(s) must submit a completed certification form created by the department for initial applications pay the applicable fees in RCW 46.17.005 and 46.17.040 and for renewals pay the applicable fees as specified in this subsection (5).

(a)(i) If the renewal transaction is conducted by the county auditor, the county auditor shall collect a service fee of five dollars for the registration renewal that will be retained by the county auditor;

(ii) If the renewal transaction is conducted by a subagent appointed by the director, the subagent shall collect a service fee of five dollars for the registration renewal that will be retained by the subagent; and

(iii) The service fee for a registration renewal does not apply to a transaction that is conducted online.

(6) Collector vehicle license plates under subsection (2)(b) of this section may be transferred from one vehicle to another vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section upon application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.

(((6)))(7) Any person who knowingly provides a false or facsimile license plate under subsection (2)(b) of this section is subject to a traffic infraction and fine in an amount equal to the monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.16A.200(7)(b). Additionally, the person must pay for the cost of a collector vehicle license plate as listed in RCW 46.17.220(((1)(f)))(5), unless already paid.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.18.255 and 2011 c 171 s 71 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a horseless carriage license plate for a motor vehicle that ((is at least forty years old))was manufactured or built before January 1, 1916. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the horseless carriage license plate shall:

(a) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle as required under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; and

(b) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW 46.17.220(((1)(i)))(11), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by law.

(2) Horseless carriage license plates:

(a) Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle;

(b) Are not required to be renewed;

(c) Are not transferable to any other motor vehicle; and

(d) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.16A.070 and 2011 c 171 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may ((refuse)):

(a) Refuse to issue or may cancel a registration certificate at any time when the department determines that an applicant for registration is not entitled to a registration certificate. Notice of cancellation may be accomplished by sending a notice by first-class mail using the last known address in department records for the registered or legal owner or owners, and completing an affidavit of first-class mail. It is unlawful for any person to remove, drive, or operate the vehicle until a proper registration certificate has been issued. A person removing, driving, or operating a vehicle after the refusal to issue or cancellation of the registration is guilty of a gross misdemeanor;

(b) Refuse to issue or renew a collector vehicle license plate and may cancel a registration certificate of a collector vehicle if the registered owner or applicant does not meet the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.220.

(2)(a) The suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal by the director of a registration certificate provided under this chapter is conclusive unless the person whose registration or certificate is suspended, revoked, canceled, or refused appeals to the superior court of Thurston county or the person's county of residence.

(b) Notice of appeal must be filed within ten days after receipt of the notice of suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal. Upon the filing of the notice of appeal, the court shall issue an order to the director to show cause why the registration should not be granted or reinstated and return the order not less than ten days after the date of service to the director. Service must be in the same manner as prescribed for the service of a summons and complaint in other civil actions.

(c) Upon the hearing on the order to show cause, the court shall hear evidence concerning matters with reference to the suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal of the registration and shall enter judgment either affirming or setting aside the suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) This act applies to all collector vehicle registrations issued before the effective date of this section, in addition to applying to all new collector vehicle registrations. The department of licensing shall notify all current collector vehicle plate holders of the new registration requirements in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The department of licensing shall establish a phase-in of the five-year renewal requirement for collector vehicle owners over a period not to exceed six years. This phase-in will be based on the age of the vehicles with the vehicles that are closest to the thirty-year old threshold first.

(3) The department of licensing may establish rules as necessary to carry out this section including, but not limited to, establishing the phase-in five-year renewal requirement for collector vehicle owners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act takes effect January 1, 2021.

--- END ---