BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) The sexual assault coordinated community response task force is established within the office of the attorney general with members as provided in this subsection. The purpose of the task force is to develop model protocols ensuring that adult or minor sexual assault victims receive a coordinated community response when presenting for care at any hospital or clinic following a sexual assault.

(b)(i) The caucus leaders from the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(ii) The caucus leaders from the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(iii) The attorney general, in consultation with the legislative members of the task force, shall appoint:

(A) One member representing each of the following:

(I) The Washington state association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(II) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(III) The Washington defender association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;

(IV) The Washington association of cities;

(V) The Washington association of county officials;

(VI) The Washington superior court judges association;

(VII) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs;

(VIII) The office of crime victims advocacy;

(IX) The Washington state hospital association;

(X) The office of the attorney general; and

(XI) The Washington state medical association;

(B) Two providers from a community sexual assault program, one representative from a program serving an urban community, and one representative from a program serving a rural community;

(C) Two members representing survivors of sexual assault;

(D) Two members representing sexual assault nurse examiners, one representative of a sexual assault nurse examiner serving an urban community, and one representative of a sexual assault nurse examiner serving a rural community;

(E) Two members representing children's advocacy centers, one representative from a center serving an urban community, and one representative from a center serving a rural community.

(2) The duties of the task force include, but are not limited to:

(a) Researching, reviewing, and making recommendations for best practice models in this state and from other states for collaborative and coordinated responses to sexual assault victims beginning with their arrival at a hospital or clinic;

(b) Researching and identifying any existing gaps in trauma-informed, victim-centered care and support and sexual assault victim resources in Washington;

(c) Researching, identifying, and making recommendations for securing nonstate funding for implementing a standardized and coordinated community response to provide appropriate support for sexual assault victims;

(d) Researching, identifying, and making recommendations for any legislative policy options for providing a coordinated community response for victims of sexual assault; and

(e) Collaborating with the legislature, state agencies, medical facilities, and local governments to implement coordinated community responses for sexual assault victims consistent with best practices and standardized protocols including but not limited to issues of access to sexual assault specific services, potential for assistance from the crime victims' compensation program, legal advocacy from system-based and community-based advocates, privacy of medical records, and access to necessary information among responding professionals and service providers.

(3) The office of the attorney general shall administer and provide staff support to the task force.

(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) The task force must meet no less than twice annually.

(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1st of each year.

(7) This section expires December 31, 2022.

--- END ---