BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.40.1987 and 2018 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2017, shall receive, effective July 1, 2018, an increase to their monthly benefit of one and one-half percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed sixty-two dollars and fifty cents.

(2) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2019, shall receive, effective July 1, 2020, an increase to their monthly benefit of one and one-half percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed twenty-two dollars.

(3) This section does not apply to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.40.1984.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.32.4992 and 2018 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2017, shall receive, effective July 1, 2018, an increase to their monthly benefit of one and one-half percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed sixty-two dollars and fifty cents.

(2) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2019, shall receive, effective July 1, 2020, an increase to their monthly benefit of one and one-half percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed twenty-two dollars.

(3) This section does not apply to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.32.489 or 41.32.540.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2020.

--- END ---