BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.08.010 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this title or rules adopted under this title unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable of being held in hand while landing the fish or a handheld line operated without rod or reel.

(2) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game birds, or game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by a person, as specified by rule of the commission for a particular period of time, or as to size, sex, or species.

(3) "Building" means a private domicile, garage, barn, or public or commercial building.

(4) "Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some or all species of wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.

(5) "Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places or waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an open season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or physical descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open season or that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest, or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.

(6) "Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or other body of water, where fishing or harvesting is prohibited.

(7) "Commercial" means related to or connected with buying, selling, or bartering.

(8) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.

(9) "Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters of the Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state boundary.

(10) "Contraband" means any property that is unlawful to produce or possess.

(11) "Covered animal species" means any species of elephant, rhinoceros, tiger, lion, leopard, cheetah, pangolin, marine turtle, shark, or ray either: (a) Listed in appendix I or appendix II of the convention on international trade in endangered species of wild flora and fauna; or (b) listed as critically endangered, endangered, or vulnerable on the international union for conservation of nature and natural resources red list of threatened species.

(12) "Covered animal species part or product" means any item that contains, or is wholly or partially made from, any covered animal species.

(13) "Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal kingdom not native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the environment or wildlife of the state.

(14) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.

(15) "Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.

(16) "Distribute" or "distribution" means either a change in possession for consideration or a change in legal ownership.

(17) "Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the commission as seriously threatened with extinction.

(18) "Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means:

(a) A commissioned officer of a municipal, county, or state agency having as its primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the officer is acting in the respective jurisdiction of that agency;

(b) An officer or special agent commissioned by one of the following: The national marine fisheries service; the Washington state parks and recreation commission; the United States fish and wildlife service; the Washington state department of natural resources; the United States forest service; or the United States parks service, if the agent or officer is in the respective jurisdiction of the primary commissioning agency and is acting under a mutual law enforcement assistance agreement between the department and the primary commissioning agency;

(c) A commissioned fish and wildlife peace officer from another state who meets the training standards set by the Washington state criminal justice training commission pursuant to RCW 10.93.090, 43.101.080, and 43.101.200, and who is acting under a mutual law enforcement assistance agreement between the department and the primary commissioning agency; or

(d) A Washington state tribal police officer who successfully completes the requirements set forth under RCW 43.101.157, is employed by a tribal nation that has complied with RCW 10.92.020(2) (a) and (b), and is acting under a mutual law enforcement assistance agreement between the department and the tribal government.

(19) "Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food fish by statute or rule, as well as all finfish not currently classified as food fish or game fish if such species exist in state waters. The term "fish" includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of fish species.

(20) "To fish" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure, harass, harvest, or capture a fish or shellfish.

(21) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and commissioned by the director, with authority to enforce this title and rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as prescribed by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a person commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a fisheries patrol officer.

(22) "Fish broker" means a person who facilitates the sale or purchase of raw or frozen fish or shellfish on a fee or commission basis, without assuming title to the fish or shellfish.

(23) "Fish dealer" means a person who engages in any activity that triggers the need to obtain a fish dealer license under RCW 77.65.280.

(24) "Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species of fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical area.

(25) "Food, food waste, or other substance" includes human and pet food or other waste or garbage that could attract large wild carnivores.

(26) "Fresh water" means all waters not defined as salt water including, but not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth, lakes, ponds, and reservoirs.

(27) "Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall not be trapped except as authorized by the commission.

(28) "Fur dealer" means a person who purchases, receives, or resells raw furs for commercial purposes.

(29) "Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted except as authorized by the commission.

(30) "Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except as authorized by the commission.

(31) "Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held, confined, propagated, hatched, fed, or otherwise raised for commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not include publicly owned facilities.

(32) "Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild animals and wild birds is prohibited.

(33) "To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure, harass, harvest, or capture a wild animal or wild bird.

(34) "Illegal items" means those items unlawful to be possessed.

(35)(a) "Intentionally feed, attempt to feed, or attract" means to purposefully or knowingly provide, leave, or place in, on, or about any land or building any food, food waste, or other substance that attracts or could attract large wild carnivores to that land or building.

(b) "Intentionally feed, attempt to feed, or attract" does not include keeping food, food waste, or other substance in an enclosed garbage receptacle or other enclosed container unless specifically directed by a fish and wildlife officer or animal control authority to secure the receptacle or container in another manner.

(36) "Large wild carnivore" includes wild bear, cougar, and wolf.

(37) "License year" means the period of time for which a recreational license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and ends March 31st.

(38) "Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.

(39) "Limited fish seller" means a licensed commercial fisher who sells his or her fish or shellfish to anyone other than a wholesale fish buyer thereby triggering the need to obtain a limited fish seller endorsement under RCW 77.65.510.

(40) "Money" means all currency, script, personal checks, money orders, or other negotiable instruments.

(41) "Natural person" means a human being.

(42)(a) "Negligently feed, attempt to feed, or attract" means to provide, leave, or place in, on, or about any land or building any food, food waste, or other substance that attracts or could attract large wild carnivores to that land or building, without the awareness that a reasonable person in the same situation would have with regard to the likelihood that the food, food waste, or other substance could attract large wild carnivores to the land or building.

(b) "Negligently feed, attempt to feed, or attract" does not include keeping food, food waste, or other substance in an enclosed garbage receptacle or other enclosed container unless specifically directed by a fish and wildlife officer or animal control authority to secure the receptacle or container in another manner.

(43) "Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the qualifications of a resident.

(44) "Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean outside the territorial boundaries of the state, including the marine waters of other states and countries.

(45) "Open season" means those times, manners of taking, and places or waters established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting, fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or shellfish that conform to the special restrictions or physical descriptions established by rule of the commission or that have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, or possess by rule of the commission. "Open season" includes the first and last days of the established time.

(46) "Owner" means the person in whom is vested the ownership dominion, or title of the property.

(47) "Person" means and includes an individual; a corporation; a public or private entity or organization; a local, state, or federal agency; all business organizations, including corporations and partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals acting with a common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative, or official capacity.

(48) "Personal property" or "property" includes both corporeal and incorporeal personal property and includes, among other property, contraband and money.

(49) "Personal use" means for the private use of the individual taking the fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.

(50) "Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted throughout the year as authorized by the commission.

(51) "To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving fish, wildlife, or shellfish.

(52) "Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the commission that shall not be hunted or fished.

(53) "Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing an individual number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars each and in which a permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access to hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.

(54) "Resident" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 77.08.075.

(55) "Salt water" means those marine waters seaward of river mouths.

(56) "Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are dependent upon the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in either an attached or free floating form, and includes but is not limited to marine aquatic plants in the classes Chlorophyta, Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.

(57) "Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.

(58) "Shark fin" means a raw, dried, or otherwise processed detached fin or tail of a shark.

(59)(a) "Shark fin derivative product" means any product intended for use by humans or animals that is derived in whole or in part from shark fins or shark fin cartilage.

(b) "Shark fin derivative product" does not include a drug approved by the United States food and drug administration and available by prescription only or medical device or vaccine approved by the United States food and drug administration.

(60) "Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken or possessed except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish" includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish species.

(61) "State waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within ordinary high water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the state.

(62) "To take" and its derivatives means to kill, injure, harvest, or capture a fish, shellfish, wild animal, bird, or seaweed.

(63) "Taxidermist" means a person who, for commercial purposes, creates lifelike representations of fish and wildlife using fish and wildlife parts and various supporting structures.

(64) "Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or engaging in sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or deleterious exotic wildlife.

(65) "To trap" and its derivatives means a method of hunting using devices to capture wild animals or wild birds.

(66) "Unclaimed" means that no owner of the property has been identified or has requested, in writing, the release of the property to themselves nor has the owner of the property designated an individual to receive the property or paid the required postage to effect delivery of the property.

(67) "Unclassified wildlife" means wildlife existing in Washington in a wild state that have not been classified as big game, game animals, game birds, predatory birds, protected wildlife, endangered wildlife, or deleterious exotic wildlife.

(68) "To waste" or "to be wasted" means to allow any edible portion of any game bird, food fish, game fish, shellfish, or big game animal other than cougar to be rendered unfit for human consumption, or to fail to retrieve edible portions of such a game bird, food fish, game fish, shellfish, or big game animal other than cougar from the field. For purposes of this chapter, edible portions of game birds must include, at a minimum, the breast meat of those birds. Entrails, including the heart and liver, of any wildlife species are not considered edible.

(69) "Wholesale fish buyer" means a person who engages in any fish buying or selling activity that triggers the need to obtain a wholesale fish buyer endorsement under RCW 77.65.340.

(70) "Wild animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose members exist in Washington in a wild state. The term "wild animal" does not include feral domestic mammals or old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order Rodentia.

(71) "Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves whose members exist in Washington in a wild state.

(72) "Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose members exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not limited to mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and invertebrates. The term "wildlife" does not include feral domestic mammals, old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified as food fish or shellfish by the director. The term "wildlife" includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of wildlife members.

(73) "Wildlife meat cutter" means a person who packs, cuts, processes, or stores wildlife for consumption for another for commercial purposes.

(74) "Youth" means a person ((fifteen years old for fishing and)) under sixteen years old for fishing and hunting.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.12.810 and 1998 c 191 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

((As provided in RCW 77.32.440, a portion))Four percent of the revenue received from the sale of each small game hunting license fee shall be deposited in the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement account created in RCW 77.12.820.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.32.070 and 2008 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Applicants for a license, permit, tag, or stamp shall furnish the information required by the director. However, the director may not require the purchaser of a razor clam license under RCW 77.32.520 to provide any personal information except for proof of residency. The commission may adopt rules requiring licensees or permittees to keep records and make reports concerning the taking of or effort to harvest fish, shellfish, and wildlife. The reporting requirement may be waived where, for any reason, the department is not able to receive the report. The department must provide reasonable options for a licensee to submit information to a live operator prior to the reporting deadline.

(2)(a) The commission may, by rule, set an administrative penalty for failure to comply with rules requiring the reporting of taking or effort to harvest wildlife. The commission may also adopt rules requiring hunters who have not reported ((for the previous license year)) to complete a report and pay the assessed administrative penalty before a new hunting license is issued.

(((a) The total administrative penalty per hunter set by the commission must not exceed ten dollars.))

(b) By December 31st of each year, the department shall report the rate of hunter compliance with the harvest reporting requirement, the administrative penalty imposed for failing to report, and the amount of administrative penalties collected during that year to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of representatives.

(3)(a) The commission may, by rule, set an administrative penalty for failure to comply with rules requiring the reporting of data from catch record cards officially endorsed for Puget Sound Dungeness crab. The commission may also adopt rules requiring fishers who possessed a catch record card officially endorsed for Puget Sound Dungeness crab and who have not reported ((for the previous license year)) to complete a report and pay the assessed administrative penalty before a new catch record card officially endorsed for Puget Sound Dungeness crab is issued.

(((a) The total administrative penalty per fisher set by the commission must not exceed ten dollars.))

(b) By December 31st of each year, the department shall report the rate of fisher compliance with the Puget Sound Dungeness crab catch record card reporting requirement, the administrative penalty imposed for failing to report, and the amount of administrative penalties collected during that year to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of representatives.

(4) Fees for recreational fishing are specified in section 17 of this act and fees for hunting are specified in section 18 of this act.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.32.155 and 2017 c 255 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age of eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms, safety, conservation, and sporting/hunting behavior. All persons purchasing any hunting license for the first time, if born after January 1, 1972, shall present such certification.

(b)(i) The director may establish a program for training persons in the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sporting/hunting behavior and shall prescribe the type of instruction and the qualifications of the instructors. The director shall, as part of establishing the training program, exempt the following individuals from the firearms skills portion of any instruction course completed over the internet:

(A) Members of the United States military;

(B) Current or retired general authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020;

(C) Current or retired limited authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020, if the officer is or was duly authorized by his or her employer to carry a concealed pistol;

(D) Current or retired specially commissioned Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020, if the officer is or was duly authorized by his or her commissioning agency to carry a concealed pistol; and

(E) Current or retired Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 43.101.010 who have met the requirements of RCW 43.101.095 or 43.101.157 and whose certification is in good standing or has not been revoked.

(ii) The director may cooperate with the national rifle association, organized sports/outdoor enthusiasts' groups, or other public or private organizations when establishing the training program.

(c) Upon the successful completion of a course established under this section, the trainee shall receive a hunter education certificate signed by an authorized instructor. The certificate is evidence of compliance with this section.

(d) The director may accept certificates from other states that persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education, or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.

(2)(a) The director may authorize a once in a lifetime, one license year deferral of hunter education training for individuals who are accompanied, while hunting, by a nondeferred Washington-licensed hunter who ((has held a Washington hunting license for the prior three years and)) is over eighteen years of age. The commission shall adopt rules for the administration of this subsection to avoid potential fraud and abuse.

(b) The director is authorized to collect an application fee((, not to exceed twenty dollars,)) for obtaining the once in a lifetime, one license year deferral of hunter education training from the department. This fee must be deposited into the fish and wildlife enforcement reward account and must be used exclusively to administer the deferral program created in this subsection.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "accompanied" means to go along with another person while staying within a range of the other person that permits continual unaided visual and auditory communication.

(3) To encourage the participation of an adequate number of instructors for the training program, the commission shall develop nonmonetary incentives available to individuals who commit to serving as an instructor. The incentives may include additional hunting opportunities for instructors.

(4) The commission is authorized to adopt rules to offer a one-time discount of up to twenty dollars on a hunting license purchase to first-time resident hunters who have completed the Washington hunter education training program.

Sec. 5. RCW 77.32.350 and 2011 c 339 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to a small game hunting license, a supplemental migratory bird permit is required to hunt for migratory birds.

((A))The migratory bird permit is required for all persons sixteen years of age or older ((to hunt migratory birds. The fee for the permit for hunters is fifteen dollars for residents and nonresidents)). Furthermore, a migratory bird authorization is required for all persons to hunt band-tailed pigeon, brant, sea duck, snow goose, and southwest Canada goose.

Sec. 6. RCW 77.32.370 and 2011 c 339 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A special hunting season permit is required to hunt in each special season.

(2) Persons may apply for special hunting season permits as provided by rule of the commission.

(3) ((The))Persons may apply for multiple season hunting season permits as provided by rule of the commission.

(4) Persons may apply for special hunting "quality" permits as provided by rule of the commission. The commission designates as "quality" hunts those that allow the harvest of buck deer, bull elk, or allow the harvest of male big game species that are only available for hunting by a special hunting permit. The commission may authorize a special hunting permit for goat, sheep, moose, or other big game species not specified.

(5) An application fee is required to enter a drawing for ((a special hunting season permit or authorization is:

(a) Six dollars for residents, or one hundred dollars for nonresidents, for the permits in categories designated by the commission for deer or elk, female big game, or for small game;

(b) Twelve dollars for residents, or one hundred dollars for nonresidents, for the permits that the commission designates as "quality" hunts that allow the harvest of buck deer, bull elk, or allow the harvest of male big game species that are only available for hunting by special permit;

(c) Twelve dollars for residents and nonresidents to apply for special authorizations to hunt for migratory birds; and

(d) Three dollars for youth for any special hunt drawing or special authorization))all permits in this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 77.32.430 and 2018 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Catch record card information is necessary for proper management of the state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish resources. Catch record card administration shall be under rules adopted by the commission. Except as provided in this section, there is no charge for an initial catch record card. Each subsequent or duplicate catch record card ((costs eleven dollars))is subject to a fee.

(2) A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in Puget Sound waters east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has in possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for Dungeness crab. ((The endorsement shall cost no more than seven dollars and fifty cents when purchased for a personal use saltwater, combination, or shellfish and seaweed license. The endorsement shall cost no more than three dollars when purchased for a temporary combination fishing license authorized under RCW 77.32.470(3)(a).))

(3) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term charter stamp licenses are neither subject to the ((ten-dollar charge))fee nor to the Dungeness crab endorsement fee provided for in this section. Charter boat or guide operators issuing temporary short-term charter stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to each catch record card issued before fishing commences. Catch record cards issued with a temporary short-term charter stamp are valid for one day.

(4) A catch record card for halibut ((may not cost more than five dollars))is subject to a fee when purchased with an annual saltwater or combination fishing license and must be provided at no cost for those who purchase a one-day temporary ((saltwater))combination fishing license or one-day temporary charter stamp.

(5) The department shall include provisions for recording marked and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31, 2004.

(6)(a) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards, catch card penalty fees, and the Dungeness crab endorsement must be deposited into the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170.

(i)(A) ((One dollar of the funds))Twelve percent of the revenue received from the sale of each Dungeness crab endorsement must be used for the removal and disposal of derelict shellfish gear either directly by the department or under contract with a third party. The department is required to maintain a separate accounting of these funds and provide an annual report to the commission and the legislature by January 1st of every year.

(B) The remaining portion of the funds received from the sale of each Dungeness crab endorsement must be used for education, sampling, monitoring, and management of catch associated with the Dungeness crab recreational fisheries.

(ii) Funds received from the sale of halibut catch record cards must be used for monitoring and management of recreational halibut fisheries, including expanding opportunities for recreational anglers.

(b) Moneys allocated under this section shall supplement and not supplant other federal, state, and local funds used for Dungeness crab recreational fisheries management.

Sec. 8. RCW 77.32.440 and 1999 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) The commission shall adopt rules to continue funding current))Enhancement programs ((at levels equal to the participation of licensees in each of the individual enhancement programs. All enhancement funding will continue to be deposited directly into the individual accounts created for each enhancement.

(2) In implementing subsection (1) of this section with regard to warm water game fish, the department shall deposit in the warm water game fish account the sum of one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars each fiscal year during the fiscal years 1999 and 2000, based on two hundred fifty thousand warm water anglers. Beginning in fiscal year 2001, and each year thereafter, the deposit to the warm water game fish account established in this subsection shall be adjusted annually to reflect the actual numbers of license holders fishing for warm water game fish based on an annual survey of licensed anglers from the previous year conducted by the department beginning with the April 1, 1999, to March 31, 2000, license year survey))receive revenue using a percentage rate applied to the fee of each eligible license and deposited within each dedicated account as follows:

(1) Five percent of all freshwater and combination fishing licenses, including temporary combination fishing licenses, must be deposited in the warm water game fish account created in RCW 77.44.050;

(2) Eleven percent of all saltwater and combination fishing licenses, including temporary combination fishing licenses, must be deposited in the recreational fisheries enhancement account created in RCW 77.105.150;

(3) Two percent of all saltwater, freshwater, and combination fishing licenses, including temporary combination fishing licenses, must be deposited in the regional fisheries enhancement group account created in RCW 77.95.090; and

(4) One percent of all saltwater and combination fishing licenses, including temporary combination fishing licenses, must be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.

Sec. 9. RCW 77.32.450 and 2011 c 339 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A big game hunting license is required to hunt for big game. A big game license allows the holder to hunt for forest grouse, unclassified wildlife, and the individual species identified within a specific big game combination license package. Each big game license includes one transport tag for each species purchased in that package. A hunter may not purchase more than one license for each big game species except as authorized by rule of the commission. ((The fees for annual big game combination packages are as follows:

(a) Big game number 1: Deer, elk, bear, and cougar. The fee for this license is eighty-five dollars for residents, seven hundred eighty dollars for nonresidents, and forty dollars for youth.

(b) Big game number 2: Deer and elk. The fee for this license is seventy-five dollars for residents, six hundred seventy dollars for nonresidents, and thirty-five dollars for youth.

(c) Big game number 3: Deer. The fee for this license is thirty-nine dollars for residents, three hundred ninety-three dollars for nonresidents, and eighteen dollars for youth.

(d) Big game number 4: Elk. The fee for this license is forty-four dollars for residents, four hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and eighteen dollars for youth.

(e) Big game number 5: Bear. The fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.

(f) Big game number 6: Cougar. The fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.

(2) In the event that the commission authorizes a two animal big game limit, the fees for the second animal are as follows:

(a) Elk: The fee is sixty dollars for residents, three hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and twenty dollars for youth.

(b) Deer: The fee is sixty dollars for residents, two hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and twenty dollars for youth.

(3)))(2) In the event that the commission authorizes a special hunt permit ((hunt)) for goat, sheep, moose, or other big game species not specified ((the permit fees are three hundred dollars for residents, one thousand five hundred dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth)), a license is required and is subject to a fee.

(((4)))(3) Multiple season big game ((permit))tag: The commission may, by rule, offer permits for hunters to hunt deer or elk during more than one general season. Only one deer or elk may be harvested annually under a multiple season big game ((permit))tag. ((The fee is one hundred sixty-five dollars.

(5)))(4) Authorization to hunt the species set out under subsection (((3)))(2) of this section is by special permit issued under RCW 77.32.370.

(5) A hunt Washington license for residents contains a combination license with deer, elk, bear, cougar, a small game license identified in RCW 77.32.460(1), a migratory bird permit identified in RCW 77.32.350, a migratory bird authorization identified in RCW 77.32.350, and two turkey tags identified in RCW 77.32.460(2).

Sec. 10. RCW 77.32.460 and 2011 c 339 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all classified wild animals and wild birds, except big game. A small game license also allows the holder to hunt for unclassified wildlife.

(((a) The fee for this license is thirty-five dollars for residents, one hundred sixty-five dollars for nonresidents, and fifteen dollars for youth.

(b) The fee for this license if purchased at the same time as a big game combination license package is twenty dollars for residents, eighty-eight dollars for nonresidents, and eight dollars for youth.

(c) The fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is sixty dollars for nonresidents.))

(2)(a) In addition to a small game license, a turkey tag is required to hunt for turkey.

(((a) The fee for a primary turkey tag is fourteen dollars for residents and forty dollars for nonresidents. A primary turkey tag will, on request, be issued to the purchaser of a youth small game license at no charge.

(b) The fee for each additional turkey tag is fourteen dollars for residents, sixty dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.

(c)))(b) All moneys received from turkey tags must be deposited in the state wildlife account. One-third of the moneys received from turkey tags must be appropriated solely for the purposes of turkey management. An additional one-third of the moneys received from turkey tags must be appropriated solely for upland game bird management. Moneys received from turkey tags may not supplant existing funds provided for these purposes.

(3) A hunt Washington birds license for residents contains a small game license identified in subsection (1) of this section, a migratory bird permit identified in RCW 77.32.350, a migratory bird authorization identified in RCW 77.32.350, and two turkey tags identified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 11. RCW 77.32.470 and 2011 c 339 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, or temporary((, or family fishing weekend)) license is required for all persons ((fifteen))sixteen years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal use from state waters or offshore waters.

(((2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or combination licenses are as follows:))

(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. ((The fee for this license is forty-five dollars for residents, one hundred eight dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth. There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.))

(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess fish taken from saltwater areas. ((The fee for this license is twenty-five dollars for residents, fifty-two dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors. There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.))

(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. ((The fee for this license is twenty-five dollars for residents, seventy-five dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.

(3)))(2)(a) A temporary combination fishing license is valid for one to three consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or possess fish, shellfish, and seaweed taken from state waters or offshore waters. ((The fee for this temporary fishing license is:

(i) One day - Eight dollars for residents and sixteen dollars for nonresidents;

(ii) Two days - Twelve dollars for residents and twenty-four dollars for nonresidents; and

(iii) Three days - Fifteen dollars for residents and thirty dollars for nonresidents.))

(b) ((The fee for))A charter stamp is ((eight dollars))valid for a one-day temporary combination fishing license for residents and nonresidents for use on a charter boat as defined in RCW 77.65.150. A guide stamp is valid for a one-day temporary combination fishing license for residents and nonresidents for use with a guide as defined in RCW 77.65.370, 77.65.480, or 77.65.590.

(c) ((Except for active duty military personnel serving in any branch of the United States armed forces, the temporary combination fishing license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake fishing season as defined by rule of the commission.

(d))) The temporary combination fishing license fee for active duty military personnel serving in any branch of the United States armed forces is the resident rate ((as set forth in (a) of this subsection)). Active duty military personnel must provide a valid military identification card at the time of purchase of the temporary license to qualify for the resident rate.

(((e) There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge on the temporary combination fishing license and the associated charter stamp, to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.

(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.

(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal to the total cost of the individual license contained within any combination.

(6)))(3) The commission may adopt rules to allow the use of two fishing poles per fishing license holder for use on selected state waters. If authorized by the commission, license holders must purchase a two-pole ((stamp))endorsement to use a second pole. The proceeds from the sale of the two-pole ((stamp))endorsement must be deposited into the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170 and used for the operation and maintenance of state-owned fish hatcheries. ((The fee for a two-pole stamp is thirteen dollars for residents and nonresidents, and five dollars for seniors.))

(4) A fish Washington license for residents contains a combination license identified in subsection (1)(a) of this section, a two-pole endorsement identified in subsection (3) of this section, a Dungeness crab endorsement identified in RCW 77.32.430(2), and a Columbia river salmon and steelhead endorsement identified in section 25 of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 77.32.480 and 2016 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon written application, a combination fishing license shall be issued at the reduced rate of ((five))six dollars and thirty-three cents and all hunting licenses shall be issued at the reduced rate of a youth hunting license fee for the following individuals:

(a) A resident sixty-five years old or older who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces having a service-connected disability;

(b) A resident who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces with a thirty percent or more service-connected disability;

(c) A resident with a disability who permanently uses a wheelchair;

(d) A resident who is blind or visually impaired; and

(e) A resident with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 with documentation of the disability certified by a physician licensed to practice in this state.

(2) Upon department verification of eligibility, a nonstate resident veteran with a disability who otherwise satisfies the criteria of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section must be issued a combination fishing license or any hunting license at the same cost charged to a nondisabled Washington resident for the same license.

(3) Upon written application and department verification, the following recreational hunting licenses must be issued at no cost to a resident member of the state guard or national guard, as defined in RCW 38.04.010, as long as the state guard or national guard member is: An active full-time state guard or national guard employee; or a state guard or national guard member whose status requires the state guard or national guard member to participate in drill training on a part-time basis:

(a) A small game hunting license under RCW 77.32.460(1);

(b) A supplemental migratory bird permit under RCW 77.32.350; and

(c) A big game hunting license under RCW 77.32.450(1) ((and (2))).

Sec. 13. RCW 77.32.520 and 2011 c 339 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license is required for all persons other than residents or nonresidents under ((fifteen))sixteen years of age to fish for, take, dig for, or possess seaweed or shellfish, including razor clams, for personal use from state waters or offshore waters including national park beaches.

(2) A razor clam license allows a person to harvest only razor clams for personal use from state waters, including national park beaches.

(3) ((The fees for annual personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses are:

(a) For a resident fifteen years of age or older, ten dollars;

(b) For a nonresident fifteen years of age or older, twenty-seven dollars; and

(c) For a senior, five dollars.

(4) The fee for an annual razor clam license is eight dollars for residents, fifteen dollars for nonresidents, and eight dollars for seniors.

(5) The fee for a three-day razor clam license is five dollars for both residents and nonresidents.

(6))) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license or razor clam license must be in immediate possession of the licensee and available for inspection while a licensee is harvesting shellfish or seaweed. However, the license does not need to be visible at all times.

Sec. 14. RCW 77.32.570 and 2009 c 333 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to effectively manage wildlife in areas or at times when a higher proficiency and demonstrated skill level are needed for resource protection or public safety, the department establishes the master hunter permit program. The master hunter permit program emphasizes safe, ethical, responsible, and lawful hunting practices. Program goals include improving the public's perception of hunting and perpetuating the highest hunting standards.

(2) A master hunter permit is required to participate in controlled hunts to eliminate problem animals that damage property or threaten public safety. The commission may establish by rule the requirements an applicant must comply with when applying for or renewing a master hunter permit, including but not limited to a criminal background check. The director may establish an advisory group to assist the department with administering the master hunter (([permit]))permit program.

(3) ((The fee for an initial master hunter permit may not exceed fifty dollars, and the cost of renewing a master hunter permit may not exceed twenty-five dollars.)) Funds generated under this section must be deposited into the fish and wildlife enforcement reward account established in RCW 77.15.425, and the funds must be used exclusively to administer the master hunter (([permit]))permit program.

Sec. 15. RCW 77.32.575 and 2009 c 333 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A western Washington pheasant ((permit))license is required to hunt for pheasant in western Washington.

(2) The ((permit))license is available as a season option, a youth full season option, or a three-day option. ((The fee for the permit is:

(a) For the resident full season option, seventy-five dollars;

(b) For the nonresident full season option, one hundred fifty dollars;

(c) For the youth full season option, thirty-five dollars;

(d) For the three-day option for a resident, thirty-five dollars and for a nonresident, seventy dollars.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

A sportsperson license for residents contains a fish Washington license as identified in RCW 77.32.470(4) and a hunt Washington license as identified in RCW 77.32.450(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

Recreational fishing fee table

LICENSE TYPES

RESIDENT

NONRESIDENT

RESIDENT SENIOR

YOUTH

RCW

Annual freshwater license

$28.75

$86.25

$5.75

----

77.32.470

Annual saltwater license

$29.33

$60.38

$6.33

----

77.32.470

Annual shellfish/seaweed license

$11.50

$31.05

$5.75

----

77.32.520

Annual combination license

$51.86

$124.78

$17.83

Free

77.32.470

Fish Washington license

$72.56

----

$72.56

----

77.32.470

1-day combination license

$9.78

$18.98

$9.78

----

77.32.470

2-day combination license

$14.38

$28.18

$14.38

----

77.32.470

3-day combination license

$17.83

$35.08

$17.83

----

77.32.470

Annual razor clam license

$9.20

$17.25

$9.20

----

77.32.520

3-day razor clam license

$5.75

$5.75

$5.75

----

77.32.520

Catch record cards

1st card free, additional cards $12.65/each

77.32.430

Halibut catch record card

$5.00

$5.00

$5.00

Free

77.32.430

Nonreporting crab administrative penalty

$10.00

$10.00

$10.00

$10.00

77.32.070

Two-pole endorsement

$14.95

$14.95

$5.75

----

77.32.470

Columbia river salmon/steelhead endorsement

$8.63

$8.63

$6.90

Free

Section 25 of this act

Puget Sound crab endorsement

$8.63

$8.63

$8.63

Free

77.32.430

Puget Sound crab endorsement on 1-3 day temp.

$3.45

$3.45

$3.45

----

77.32.430

1-day charter stamp

$9.78

$9.78

$9.78

----

77.32.470

1-day guide stamp

$9.78

$9.78

$9.78

----

77.32.470

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

Hunting fee table

LICENSE TYPES

RESIDENT

NONRESIDENT

RESIDENT SENIOR

YOUTH

RCW

Big game

Sportsperson license

$245.20

----

$245.20

----

Section 16 of this act

Hunt Washington license

$172.64

----

$172.64

----

77.32.450

Deer+elk+bear+cougar license

$97.75

$897.00

$97.75

$46.00

77.32.450

Deer+elk+bear+cougar license w/discounted small game license

$118.64

$998.20

$118.64

$55.20

77.32.450/ 77.32.460

Deer+elk license

$86.25

$770.50

$86.25

$40.25

77.32.450

Deer+elk license w/discounted small game license

$108.64

$871.70

$108.64

$49.45

77.32.450/ 77.32.460

Deer license

$44.85

$451.95

$44.85

$20.70

77.32.450

Deer license w/discounted small game license

$67.85

$553.15

$67.85

$29.90

77.32.450/ 77.32.460

Elk license

$50.60

$517.50

$50.60

$20.70

77.32.450

Elk license w/discounted small game license

$73.60

$618.70

$73.60

$29.90

77.32.450/ 77.32.460

Bear license

$23.00

$230.00

$23.00

$11.50

77.32.450

Bear license w/discounted small game license

$46.00

$331.20

$46.00

$20.70

77.32.450/ 77.32.460

Cougar license

$23.00

$230.00

$23.00

$11.50

77.32.450

Cougar license w/discounted small game license

$46.00

$331.20

$46.00

$20.70

77.32.450/ 77.32.460

Moose license (random drawing)

$345.00

$1,725.00

$345.00

$57.50

77.32.450

Mountain goat license (random drawing)

$345.00

$1,725.00

$345.00

$57.50

77.32.450

Bighorn sheep license (random drawing)

$345.00

$1,725.00

$345.00

$57.50

77.32.450

Multiple season deer tag

$144.90

$144.90

$144.90

$144.90

77.32.450

Multiple season elk tag

$189.75

$189.75

$189.75

$189.75

77.32.450

2nd deer license

$69.00

$287.50

$69.00

$23.00

77.32.450

2nd elk license

$69.00

$402.50

$69.00

$23.00

77.32.450

Nonreporting administrative penalty

$10.00

$10.00

$10.00

$10.00

77.32.070

Special hunt permit applications

$6.90

$115.00

$6.90

$3.45

77.32.370

Special hunt permit application - quality

$13.80

$115.00

$13.80

$3.45

77.32.370

Special hunt permit application - multiple season

$6.90

$115.00

$6.90

$3.45

77.32.370/ 77.32.450

Hunter deferral card

$20.00

$20.00

$20.00

$20.00

77.32.155

Master hunter permit initial

$50.00

----

$50.00

----

77.32.570

Master hunter permit renew

$25.00

----

$25.00

----

77.32.570

Small game

Hunt Washington birds license

$96.25

----

$96.25

----

77.32.460

Small game license

$40.25

$189.75

$40.25

$17.25

77.32.460

3-day small game license

----

$69.00

----

----

77.32.460

Turkey tag #1

$16.10

$46.00

$16.10

Free

77.32.460

Additional turkey tags

$16.10

$69.00

$16.10

$11.50

77.32.460

Migratory bird permit

$17.25

$17.25

$17.25

Free

77.32.350

Western Washington pheasant license

$86.25

$172.50

$40.25

$40.25

77.32.575

Western Washington pheasant-3 day license

$40.25

$80.50

----

----

77.32.575

Migratory bird authorization

$12.65

$12.65

$12.65

$3.45

77.32.350

Special hunt permit applications-turkey

$6.90

$115.00

$6.90

$3.45

77.32.370

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission may establish by rule a surcharge on all fees authorized under chapters 77.32, 77.65, and 77.70 RCW by November 1st of each odd-numbered year if the commission determines that the surcharge is necessary to fund inflationary and other increased costs approved by the legislature in the biennial budget.

(2) The surcharge may not exceed the percentage increase needed to generate revenue to offset the costs described in subsection (1) of this section, and must apply equally to all fees, except the surcharge does not apply to transaction fees, commercial application fees, and dealer fees authorized under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal to the total cost of the individual license contained within any combination. Combination licenses may span one or more license years.

(2) The director may offer temporary discounted promotional pricing to increase angler, hunting, or wildlife viewing participation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall create and administer a Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead endorsement program. The program must facilitate continued and, to the maximum extent possible, improved recreational salmon and steelhead selective fishing opportunities on the Columbia river and its tributaries by supplementing the resources available to the department to carry out the scientific monitoring and evaluation, data collection, permitting, reporting, enforcement, and other activities necessary to provide such opportunities. Program funds may not be used to acquire land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead endorsement program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from Columbia river salmon and steelhead endorsement purchases under section 25 of this act and gifts made for purposes of the Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead endorsement program must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of the program created in section 21 of this act. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall administer the Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead endorsement program in consultation with a Columbia river salmon and steelhead recreational anglers board. The board shall serve in an advisory capacity to the department.

(2) The department shall solicit recommendations for membership on the Columbia river salmon and steelhead recreational anglers board from recognized recreational fishing organizations of the Columbia river, and the director or director's designee shall give deference to such recommendations when selecting board members. In making these selections, the director or director's designee shall seek to provide equitable representation from the various geographic areas of the Columbia river. The board must consist of no fewer than six and no more than ten members at any one time.

(3) The Columbia river salmon and steelhead recreational anglers board shall make annual recommendations to the department regarding program expenditures. To the maximum extent possible, the board and department shall seek to reach consensus regarding program activities and expenditures. The director or the director's designee shall provide the board with a written explanation when the department expends funds from the Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead endorsement program account created in section 22 of this act in a manner that differs substantially from board recommendations.

(4) Columbia river salmon and steelhead recreational anglers board members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall maintain updated information about Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead endorsement program revenue and expenditures on its internet site. The information may include project summaries, analysis and figures similar to the 2014 report to the legislature on the program, and other information deemed appropriate by the department and the Columbia river salmon and steelhead recreational anglers board.

(2) By December 1, 2014, the department and the Columbia river salmon and steelhead recreational anglers board shall review the Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead endorsement program, prepare a brief summary of the activities conducted under the program, and provide this summary and a recommendation whether the program should be continued to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25. A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to a recreational license required under this chapter, a Columbia river salmon and steelhead endorsement is required in order for any person sixteen years of age or older to fish recreationally for salmon or steelhead in the Columbia river and its tributaries where these fisheries have been authorized by the department. The department shall deposit all receipts from endorsement purchases into the Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead endorsement program account created in section 22 of this act.

(2) For the purposes of this section and sections 21 through 24 of this act, the term "Columbia river" means the Columbia river from a line across the Columbia river between Rocky Point in Washington and Tongue Point in Oregon to the Chief Joseph dam.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. Section 19 of this act takes effect September 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27. Except for section 19 of this act, this act takes effect July 1, 2020.

--- END ---