BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 101. 2019 c 415 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($40,202,000))

$40,238,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($43,039,000))

$44,012,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,266,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($87,507,000))

$88,516,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2018 (harassment/legislature). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the joint legislative task force created in section 915 to develop a business plan for the establishment of a publicly owned depository/state bank in Washington state.

Sec. 102. 2019 c 415 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SENATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($28,693,000))

$28,736,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($32,675,000))

$33,651,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,932,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($64,300,000))

$65,319,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2018 (harassment/legislature). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a human resource officer consistent with the implementation of the senate's appropriate workplace conduct policy.

(3) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the joint legislative task force created in section 915 to develop a business plan for the establishment of a publicly owned depository/state bank in Washington state.

Sec. 103. 2019 c 415 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$280,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,867,000))

$9,837,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($9,867,000))

$10,117,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's 2019-2021 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(((3)))(2) $266,000 of the performance audit of governments account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (school safety & well-being). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((4)))(3) $17,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025 (self-help housing development and taxes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((5)))(4)(a) $342,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct a performance audit of the department of health's ambulatory surgical facility regulatory program. The study must explore:

(i) A comparison of state survey requirements and process and the centers for medicare and medicaid services survey requirements and process;

(ii) The licensing fees required of ambulatory surgical facilities as they relate to actual department of health costs for regulating the facilities;

(iii) Payments received by the department of health from the centers for medicare and medicaid services for surveys conducted on behalf of the centers for medicare and medicaid services; and

(iv) Staffing for the survey program, including any need for an increase or reduction of staff.

(b) The audit must be completed and provided to the legislature by January 1, 2021.

(5) $280,000 of general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and review committee to contract with an independent consultant to conduct an evaluation of the department of natural resources forest inventory system of state trust lands. The evaluation will include a validation of the department's inventory with ground samples and develop recommendations for greater certainty in volume estimates. The consultant will consult with beneficiaries, the forest products industry, the environmental community, and other stakeholders on the results of the study and will solicit ideas on next steps for improving the department's state trust forest inventory and the department's use of the inventory. Additionally, the consultant will analyze and review the methodology, assumptions, and data utilized in the department's sustainable harvest calculation process for forested state trust lands in western Washington, including the associated discount rate, forest inventory, forest growth, harvest and yield data, and modeling. The committee must issue a preliminary report by July 1, 2021, with a final report by December 1, 2021.

(6) $100,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct a performance audit of the health care authority's budget structure, including its chart of accounts. The study must:

(a) Include a comparison of other state medicaid agency budget structures of similar size; and

(b) Be completed and provided to the legislature by September 1, 2021.

Sec. 104. 2019 c 415 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,573,000))

$4,582,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,573,000))

$4,582,000

Sec. 105. 2019 c 415 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($12,081,000))

$12,089,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($12,233,000))

$13,930,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$822,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($25,136,000))

$26,841,000

Sec. 106. 2019 c 415 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$333,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$347,000

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$471,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,700,000))

$5,698,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($6,879,000))

$6,877,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for a benchmark analysis of the value of public employee benefits and how those benefits compare to other employers.

Sec. 107. 2019 c 415 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($5,002,000))

$5,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($5,503,000))

$5,501,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$566,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,071,000))

$11,067,000

Sec. 108. 2019 c 415 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($4,212,000))

$4,213,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($4,681,000))

$4,682,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$436,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($9,329,000))

$9,331,000

Sec. 109. 2019 c 415 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($8,989,000))

$9,016,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($9,397,000))

$9,396,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$674,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($19,060,000))

$19,086,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $163,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for salary increases for staff attorneys and law clerks based on a 2014 salary survey.

Sec. 110. 2019 c 415 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LAW LIBRARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,707,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,728,000))

$1,725,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$128,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,563,000))

$3,560,000

Sec. 111. 2019 c 415 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($1,217,000))

$1,280,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,280,000))

$1,594,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$130,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,627,000))

$3,004,000

Sec. 112. 2019 c 415 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($20,390,000))

$20,575,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$21,313,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,492,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($43,195,000))

$43,380,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $229,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for salary step increases for eligible employees.

(2) $606,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $606,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for salary increases for court of appeals law clerks based on a 2014 salary survey.

Sec. 113. 2019 c 415 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($64,569,000))

$64,287,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($66,736,000))

$69,603,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,203,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$681,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,692,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,572,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$63,220,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($208,673,000))

$211,258,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(2) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. The administrator for the courts shall develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.

(3)(a) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula must neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(b) Each fiscal year during the 2019-21 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than forty-five days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than sixty days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(4) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1517 (domestic violence). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse

(5) $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for DNA testing for alleged fathers in dependency and termination of parental rights cases.

(6) $237,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,923,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the expansion of the state interpreter reimbursement program.

(7) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of public guardianship for guardianship fees, initial assessments, average annual legal fees, and for less restrictive options to support decision-making.

(8) $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the statewide fiscal impact on Thurston county courts. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(9) $25,808,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for judicial branch information technology projects. Expenditures from the judicial information systems account shall not exceed available resources. Judicial branch information technology project prioritization shall be determined by the judicial information system committee.

(10) (($1,027,000))$750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($377,000))$2,077,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5604 (uniform guardianship, etc.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5149 (monitoring w/victim notif.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $298,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5450 (adding superior court judges). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5720 (involuntary treatment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $207,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the development and implementation of a statewide online training system for court staff and judicial officers.

(15) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6268 (abusive litigation/partners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6641 (sex offender treatment avail). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $333,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a statewide text-based notification system to provide automated court date reminders.

(18) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5984 (dissolution/doc. language). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 114. 2019 c 415 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($46,538,000))

$47,200,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($46,394,000))

$47,642,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,805,000))

$3,804,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$278,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($97,015,000))

$98,924,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The amounts provided include funding for expert and investigative services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.

(2) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the purpose of improving the quality of trial court public defense services. The department must allocate these amounts so that $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to counties, and $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to cities, for grants under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(3) The office of public defense shall enter into an interagency agreement with the department of children, youth, and families to facilitate the use of federal title IV-E reimbursement for parent representation services.

(4) $288,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($244,000))$444,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the parents for parents program. Funds must be used to expand services in new sites and maintain and improve service models for the current programs. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for continuing services in Grant, Cowlitz, Jefferson, Okanogan, and Chelan counties and for providing oversight, coordination, start-up training, technical assistance, and quality monitoring for all sites across the state.

(5)(a) $305,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $305,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office to contract with a nonprofit organization for:

(i) Continuing legal education and case-specific resources for public defense attorneys; and

(ii) The incarcerated parents project to support incarcerated parents and their families, and public defenders representing incarcerated parents in the child welfare, juvenile, and criminal systems.

(b) The nonprofit organization must have experience providing statewide training and services to state-funded public defense attorneys for indigent clients.

(6) $4,532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,532,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for salary increases for state-contracted public defense attorneys representing indigent persons on appeal and indigent parents involved in dependency and termination cases.

(7) $1,389,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,388,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for additional attorneys, social workers, and staff support, for the parents' representation program.

(8) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a cost-of-living increase for contracted social workers.

(9) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to compensate parents representation program attorneys to prepare parenting plans at the culmination of dependency cases.

Sec. 115. 2019 c 415 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($20,348,000))

$20,923,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($22,142,000))

$22,913,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,464,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$44,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($43,998,000))

$45,344,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

(2) $759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office to continue implementation of the civil justice reinvestment plan.

(3) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the children's representation study authorized in chapter 20, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. The report of initial findings to the legislature must be submitted by December 31, 2020.

(4) The office of civil legal aid shall enter into an interagency agreement with the department of children, youth, and families to facilitate the use of federal title IV-E reimbursement for child representation services.

(5) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with the international families justice coalition to expand private capacity to provide legal services for indigent foreign nationals in contested domestic relations and family law cases. Amounts provided in this section may not be expended for direct private legal representation of clients in domestic relations and family law cases.

(6)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($100,000))$125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5651 (kinship care legal aid). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the King county bar association in partnership with a nonprofit legal rights organization to train kinship caregivers and update the legal options guide relating to kinship care.

(7) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for closing compensation differentials between volunteer legal aid programs and the northwest justice project.

(8) $1,205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,881,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a vendor rate increase resulting from a collective bargaining agreement between the northwest justice project and its staff union.

(9) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a research-based controlled comparative study of the differences in outcomes for tenants facing eviction who receive legal representation and tenants facing eviction without legal representation in unlawful detainer cases filed under the residential landlord tenant act. Funding must be used to underwrite both the research and the costs of legal representation provided to tenants associated with the study. Researchers will identify four counties to study. A preliminary report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 31, 2021, and a final report on the study, which includes findings on demographics and outcomes, must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by March 31, 2021.

(10) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for expenditures made to address fiscal year 2019 caseload driven shortfalls in the children's representation program and the children's representation study.

(11) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $193,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to wind down the children's representation study authorized in section 28, chapter 20, Laws of 2017 3rd sp.s.

(12) $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to establish a statewide reentry legal aid project. The office of civil legal aid shall enlist support from the statewide reentry council to identify an appropriate nonprofit entity to establish and operate the statewide reentry legal aid project, establish initial priority areas of focus, and determine client service objectives, benchmarks, and intended outcomes. The office of civil legal aid and the statewide reentry council shall provide the relevant legislative committees with an initial status report by December 2021.

(13) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the automation, deployment, and hosting of an automated family law document assembly system provided for in chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

Sec. 116. 2019 c 415 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($10,871,000))

$10,046,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($8,900,000))

$9,685,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$7,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$674,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($22,445,000))

$27,405,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($703,000))$803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.

(2) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1130 (pub. school language access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $301,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5356 (LGBTQ commission). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) (($375,000))$397,000 of the general fund state—appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($375,000))$353,000 of the general fund state—appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office to contract with a neutral third party to establish a process for local, state, tribal, and federal leaders and stakeholders to address issues associated with the possible breaching or removal of the four lower Snake river dams in order to recover the Chinook salmon populations that serve as a vital food source for southern resident orcas. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(5) $110,000 of the general fund—stateappropriation in fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the office of regulatory innovations and assistance to convene agencies and stakeholders to develop a small business bill of rights. Of this amount, a report must be submitted to appropriate legislative policy and fiscal committees by November 1, 2019, to include:

(a) Recommendations of rights and protections for small business owners when interacting with state agencies, boards, commissions, or other entities with regulatory authority over small businesses; and

(b) Recommendations on communication plans that state regulators should consider when communicating these rights and protections to small business owners in advance or at the time of any audit, inspection, interview, site visit, or similar oversight or enforcement activity.

(6) (($2,003,000))$1,155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for executive protection unit costs.

(7) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the clemency and pardons board to expedite the review of applications where the petitioner indicates an urgent need for the pardon or commutation, including, but not limited to, a pending deportation order or deportation proceeding.

(8) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the education ombuds, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington state office of equity, to develop a plan to implement a program to promote skills, knowledge, and awareness concerning issues of diversity, equity, and inclusion among families with school-age children. The office of education ombuds shall submit a report with recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees in the legislature by September 1, 2020.

(9) $654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of the Washington state office of equity. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $131,000 is provided solely for staff to provide training and branding of diversity, equity, and inclusion. The staff will work to develop a training module to be added to the department of enterprise services learning management system, and will work collaboratively with the department so that the module can be added to the learning management system by June 30, 2021.

Sec. 117. 2019 c 415 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($1,276,000))

$1,313,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,312,000))

$1,543,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$90,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,732,000))

$3,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the continuation of the complete Washington program and to add new pathways, such as the healthcare industry, to the program.

(2) $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the Washington world fellows program.

Sec. 118. 2019 c 415 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($5,229,000))

$5,279,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($5,109,000))

$5,161,000

Public Disclosure Transparency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($574,000))

$714,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$260,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,172,000))

$11,414,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) $45,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5861 (legislature/code of conduct). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to develop a training course for individuals acting as treasurers or deputy treasurers for candidates pursuant to RCW 42.17A.210. Out of this amount:

(a) The course must provide, at a minimum, a comprehensive overview of:

(i) The responsibilities of treasurers and deputy treasurers;

(ii) The reporting requirements necessary for candidate compliance with chapter 42.17A RCW, including triggers and deadlines for reporting;

(iii) Candidate campaign contribution limits and restrictions under chapter 42.17A RCW;

(iv) The use of the commission's electronic filing system;

(v) The consequences for violation of chapter 42.17A RCW; and

(vi) Any other subjects or topics the commission deems necessary for encouraging effective compliance with chapter 42.17A RCW.

(b) The commission must make the course available to all interested individuals no later than September 1, 2019. The course must be provided in a format able to be used both in person and remotely via the internet.

(3) $140,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff for business analysis and project management of information technology projects.

Sec. 119. 2019 c 415 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($33,449,000))

$34,995,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($18,313,000))

$21,259,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,097,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,363,000))

$9,666,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$900,000

Washington State ((Heritage Center))Library

Operations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,498,000))

$11,500,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,019,000))

$11,020,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$960,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,887,000))

$13,687,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($98,486,000))

$112,084,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,801,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $2,932,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,011,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of statewide significance during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) $13,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for operation of the presidential primary election, including reimbursement to ((reimburse)) counties for the state's share of presidential primary election costs.

(5) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations to expand programming in underserved areas of the state.

(6) $2,295,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,526,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5063 (ballots, prepaid postage). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $1,227,000 of the local government archives account—state appropriation and $28,000 of the public records efficiency, preservation, and access account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1667 (public records request administration). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $114,000 public records efficiency, preservation, and access account—state appropriation and $114,000 local government archives account—state appropriation are provided solely for digital archives functionality and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(9) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $500,000 of the election account—federal appropriation are provided solely for election security improvements.

(10) $82,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for election reconciliation reporting. Funding provides for one staff to compile county reconciliation reports, analyze the data, and to complete an annual statewide election reconciliation report for every state primary and general election. The report must be submitted annually on July 31, beginning July 31, 2020, to legislative policy and fiscal committees. The annual report must include reasons for ballot rejection and an analysis of the ways ballots are received, counted, and rejected that can be used by policymakers to better understand election administration.

(11) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for civic engagement. The secretary of state and county auditors will collaborate to increase voter participation and educate voters about improvements to state election laws that will impact the 2019 and 2020 elections.

(12) $1,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $8,800,000 of the election account—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to enhance election technology and make election security improvements. The office of the secretary of state will provide one-time grant funding to county auditors for election security improvements. Election security improvements may include but are not limited to installation of multi-factor authentication, emergency generators, vulnerability scanners, facility access control enhancements, and alarm systems. Funding will be prioritized based on demonstrated need.

(13) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $520,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for dedicated staffing for maintenance and operations of the voter registration and election management system. These staff will manage database upgrades, database maintenance, system training and support to counties, and the triage and customer service to system users.

(14) $300,000 of the public records efficiency, preservation, and access account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional project staffing to pack, catalog, and move the states archival collection in preparation for the move to the new library archives building that will be located in Tumwater.

(15) $674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6313 (young voters). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for general election costs for Substitute Senate Joint Resolution No. 8212 (investment of LTC funds). If the resolution is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 120. 2019 c 415 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$365,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($352,000))

$404,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($745,000))

$797,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

(2) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1713 (Native American women). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the governor's office of Indian affairs for a task force to evaluate and propose a plan for tribal extradition in Washington.

Sec. 121. 2019 c 415 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($318,000))

$317,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($330,000))

$409,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($674,000))

$752,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5023 (ethnic studies). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 122. 2019 c 415 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($19,982,000))

$19,976,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($19,982,000))

$19,976,000

Sec. 123. 2019 c 415 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$28,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$32,000

State Auditing Services Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,650,000))

$13,200,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,679,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($14,389,000))

$14,939,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,585,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state-funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.

(2) Within existing resources of the performance audits of government account, the state auditor's office shall conduct a performance audit or accountability audit of Washington charter public schools to satisfy the requirement to contract for an independent performance audit pursuant to RCW 28A.710.030(2).

(3) The state auditor must conduct a performance and accountability audit of practices related to awarding, tracking, and reporting contracts with outside entities and contracts between the University of Washington and affiliated entities. Utilizing the information gathered under section 606(1)(z) of this act, similar provisions from prior biennia, and best practices in contract management and oversight, the auditor must recommend a plan to make contract information, including those for contracted services and consulting, available in a centralized and searchable form. The recommendations of the auditor must be reported to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial management no later than December 30, 2020.

(4) $550,000 of the state auditing services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for accountability and risk based audits.

Sec. 124. 2019 c 415 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$226,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($243,000))

$247,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($499,000))

$503,000

Sec. 125. 2019 c 415 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($14,972,000))

$15,564,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($14,940,000))

$16,656,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($15,992,000))

$17,799,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,195,000))

$4,225,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,693,000))

$1,692,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,556,000))

$5,583,000

Child Rescue Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($276,544,000))

$290,749,000

Local Government Archives Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($348,000))

$356,000

Local Government Archives Account—Local
. . . .
$330,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,602,000

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$273,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($336,945,000))

$355,329,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

(4) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1166 (sexual assault kits). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $63,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1399 (paid family and medical leave). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $44,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1224 (rx drug cost transparency). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $79,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2052 (marijuana product testing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $330,000 of the local government archives account—local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1667 (public records request admin). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the civil rights unit to provide additional services in defense and protection of civil and constitutional rights for people in Washington.

(10) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $344,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5297 (assistant AG bargaining). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(11) $700,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $592,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation and $47,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14)))(13) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for a work group to study and institute a statewide program for receiving reports and other information for the public regarding potential self-harm, potential harm, or criminal acts including but not limited to sexual abuse, assault, or rape. Out of this amount:

(a) The work group must review the aspects of similar programs in Arizona, Michigan, Colorado, Idaho, Nevada, Oregon, Utah, Wisconsin, and Wyoming; and must incorporate the most applicable aspects of those programs to the program proposal;

(b) The program proposal must include a plan to implement a twenty-four hour hotline or app for receiving such reports and information; and

(c) The program proposal and recommendations must be submitted to legislative fiscal committees by July 31, 2020.

(((15)))(14) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the attorney general to develop an implementation plan to collect and disseminate data on the use of force by public law enforcement agencies and private security services.

(a) The plan must identify how to effectively collect data on the occasions of justifiable homicide or uses of deadly force by a public officer, peace officer, or person aiding under RCW 9A.16.040 by all general authority Washington law enforcement agencies and the department of corrections. The plan must address any necessary statutory changes, possible methods of collection, and any other needs that must be addressed to collect the following information:

(i) The number of tort claims filed and moneys paid in use of force cases;

(ii) The number of incidents in which peace officers discharged firearms at citizens;

(iii) The demographic characteristics of the officers and citizens involved in each incident, including sex, age, race, and ethnicity;

(iv) The agency or agencies employing the involved officers and location of each incident;

(v) The particular weapon or weapons used by peace officers and citizens; and

(vi) The injuries, if any, suffered by officers and citizens.

(b) The implementation plan must also identify how to effectively collect data on the occasions of the use of force requiring the discharge of a firearm by any private security guard employed by any private security company licensed under chapter 18.170 RCW. The plan must address any necessary statutory changes, possible methods of collection, and any other needs that must be addressed to collect the following information:

(i) The number of incidents in which security guards discharged firearms at citizens;

(ii) The demographic characteristics of the security guards and citizens involved in each incident, including sex, age, race, and ethnicity;

(iii) The company employing the involved security guards and the location of each incident;

(iv) The particular weapon or weapons used by security guards and citizens; and

(v) The injuries, if any, suffered by security guards and citizens.

(c) The attorney general must compile reports received pursuant to this subsection and make public the data collected.

(d) The department of licensing, department of corrections, Washington state patrol, and criminal justice training commission must assist the attorney general as necessary to complete the implementation plan.

(((16)))(15) $4,220,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $1,407,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation are provided solely for additional staffing and program operations in the medicaid fraud control division.

(((17)))(16) $4,292,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for child welfare and permanency staff.

(((18)))(17) $141,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5035 (prevailing wage laws). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(18) $751,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $82,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $32,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation, $27,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation, $4,529,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation, and $8,000 of the local government archives account—state appropriation are provided solely for the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 902 of this act.

(19) $4,100,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for hiring additional staff to reduce child welfare and child dependency caseloads.

(20) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $616,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for multi-year arbitrations of the state's diligent enforcement of its obligations to receive amounts withheld from tobacco master settlement agreement payments.

(21) $647,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a statewide cold case unit to provide investigative and prosecution resources to local law enforcement on cold cases generated from new information entered into the homicide investigation tracking system (HITS), including results from the testing of the backlog of sexual assault kits. The office must report by December 1st of each year the following information on the performance of the cold cases unit:

(a) Number of requests for assistance from law enforcement or prosecutors disaggregated by jurisdiction;

(b) Number of cases where the unit provided assistance categorized by type of case, including the number of cases reopened as a result of the assistance or as a result of testing the backlog of sexual assault kits;

(c) The number of cases where the unit's assistance resulted in new arrests, case filings, and convictions.

(22) $910,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for defending challenges to chapter 354, Laws of 2019 that set vapor pressure limits for in-state receipt of crude oil by rail.

(23) $1,069,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the office to compel the United States department of energy to meet Hanford cleanup deadlines.

(24) $1,563,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to defend the state in the Wolf vs State Board for Community and Technical Colleges case.

(25) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6158 (model sexual assault protocols). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $52,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5740 (retirement savings program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 126. 2019 c 415 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($1,907,000))

$1,922,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,922,000))

$1,942,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$168,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,997,000))

$4,032,000

The appropriations ((within))in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $43,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the caseload forecast council to provide information, data analysis, and other necessary assistance upon the request of the task force established in section 952 of this act.

Sec. 127. 2019 c 415 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($94,046,000))

$114,888,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($92,285,000))

$200,030,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($327,876,000))

$327,870,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,107,000))

$9,103,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,207,000))

$8,206,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$251,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,291,000

((Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000))

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($60,422,000))

$60,420,000

Energy Freedom Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,895,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation

and Prosecution Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,975,000))

$3,341,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural Rehabilitation

Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,399,000

Statewide Tourism Marketing Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,028,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,200,000))

$4,199,000

Growth Management Planning and Environmental Review

Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,800,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,616,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,918,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,944,000))

$12,941,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($903,000))

$902,000

Andy Hill Cancer Research Endowment Fund Match

Transfer Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,454,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($650,210,000))

$782,599,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.

(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(3) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(4) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(5) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(6) (($804,000))$3,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($804,000))$3,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 ((and $5,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account—state appropriation)) are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2019-2021 biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086.

(7) $5,907,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(8) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(9) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(10) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.

(11) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the regulatory roadmap program for the construction industry and to identify and coordinate with businesses in key industry sectors to develop additional regulatory roadmap tools.

(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.

(13) $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.

(14) $1,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation, $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation, and $1,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.

(15) $2,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the administration of the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.

(16) $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for community beds for individuals with a history of mental illness. Currently, there is little to no housing specific to populations with these co-occurring disorders; therefore, the department must consider how best to develop new bed capacity in combination with individualized support services, such as intensive case management and care coordination, clinical supervision, mental health, substance abuse treatment, and vocational and employment services. Case-management and care coordination services must be provided. Increased case-managed housing will help to reduce the use of jails and emergency services and will help to reduce admissions to the state psychiatric hospitals. The department must coordinate with the health care authority and the department of social and health services in establishing conditions for the awarding of these funds. The department must contract with local entities to provide a mix of (a) shared permanent supportive housing; (b) independent permanent supportive housing; and (c) low and no-barrier housing beds for people with a criminal history, substance abuse disorder, and/or mental illness.

Priority for permanent supportive housing must be given to individuals on the discharge list at the state psychiatric hospitals or in community psychiatric inpatient beds whose conditions present significant barriers to timely discharge.

(17) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.

(18) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.

(19) $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the small business export assistance program. The department must ensure that at least one employee is located outside the city of Seattle for purposes of assisting rural businesses with export strategies.

(20) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.

(21) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide either legal representation or referral services for legal representation, or both, to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(22)(a) $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to support the building operation, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing projects or units within housing projects that have or will receive funding from the housing trust fund—state account or other public capital funding that:

(i) Is dedicated as permanent supportive housing units;

(ii) Is occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below thirty percent of the area median income; and

(iii) Requires a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operating, maintenance, and service expenses.

(b) Permanent supportive housing projects receiving federal operating subsidies that do not fully cover the operation, maintenance, and service costs of the projects are eligible to receive grants as described in this subsection.

(c) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.

(23)(a) (($2,735,000))$2,225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($2,265,000))$3,525,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $7,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:

(i) Expand outreach, services, and housing for homeless youth and young adults including but not limited to secure crisis residential centers, crisis residential centers, and HOPE beds, so that resources are equitably distributed across the state;

(ii) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and

(iii) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and enable providers to have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($2,000,000))$2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to build infrastructure and services to support a continuum of interventions including but not limited to prevention, crisis response, and long-term housing in reducing youth homelessness in four identified communities as part of the anchor community initiative; and

(ii) (($625,000))$91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($625,000))$1,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to provide youth services and young adult housing on a multi-acre youth campus located in the city of Tacoma. Youth services include, but are not limited to, HOPE beds and crisis residential centers to provide temporary shelter and permanency planning for youth under the age of eighteen. Young adult housing includes, but is not limited to, rental assistance and case management for young adults ages eighteen to twenty-four.

(24) (($36,650,000))$41,870,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($36,650,000))$57,530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the essential needs and housing support program.

(25) $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Aerospace; (b) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy; (c) wood products and other natural resource industries; (d) information and communication technology; (e) life sciences and global health; (f) maritime; and (g) military and defense. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.

(26) $1,237,000 of the liquor excise tax account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide fiscal note assistance to local governments, including increasing staff expertise in multiple subject matter areas, including but not limited to criminal justice, taxes, election impacts, transportation and land use, and providing training and staff preparation prior to legislative session.

(27) The department must develop a model ordinance for cities and counties to utilize for siting community based behavioral health facilities.

(28) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to retain a behavioral health facilities siting administrator within the department to coordinate development of effective behavioral health housing options and provide technical assistance in siting of behavioral health treatment facilities statewide to aide in the governor's plan to discharge individuals from the state psychiatric hospitals into community settings. This position must work closely with the local government legislative authorities, planning departments, behavioral health providers, health care authority, department of social and health services, and other entities to facilitate linkages among disparate behavioral health community bed capacity-building efforts. This position must work to integrate building behavioral health treatment and infrastructure capacity in addition to ongoing supportive housing benefits.

(29)(a) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must revise its agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(i) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(ii) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(A) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(B) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(C) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(b) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the department or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(c) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(30)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with a consultant to study the current and ongoing impacts of the SeaTac international airport. The general fund—state funding provided in this subsection serves as a state match and may not be spent unless $150,000 of local matching funds is transferred to the department. The department must seek feedback on project scoping and consultant selection from the cities listed in (b) of this subsection.

(b) The study must include, but not be limited to:

(i) The impacts that the current and ongoing airport operations have on quality of life associated with air traffic noise, public health, traffic, congestion, and parking in residential areas, pedestrian access to and around the airport, public safety and crime within the cities, effects on residential and nonresidential property values, and economic development opportunities, in the cities of SeaTac, Burien, Des Moines, Tukwila, Federal Way, Normandy Park, and other impacted neighborhoods; and

(ii) Options and recommendations for mitigating any negative impacts identified through the analysis.

(c) The department must collect data and relevant information from various sources including the port of Seattle, listed cities and communities, and other studies.

(d) The study must be delivered to the legislature by June 1, 2020.

(31) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection must make recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2019, regarding rights that all unaccompanied homeless youth and young adults should have for appropriate care and treatment in licensed and unlicensed residential runaway and homeless youth programs.

(32) $787,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1344 (child care access work group). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(33) $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization with offices located in the cities of Maple Valley, Enumclaw, and Auburn to provide street outreach and connect homeless young adults ages eighteen through twenty-four to services in south King county.

(34) $218,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1444 (appliance efficiency). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(35) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1114 (food waste reduction). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(36) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with the city of Federal Way to support after-school recreational and educational programs.

(((38)))(37) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department to convene a work group regarding the development of Washington's green economy based on the state's competitive advantages. The work group must focus on developing economic, education, business, and investment opportunities in energy, water, and agriculture. The work group must consist of at least one representative from the department, the department of natural resources, the department of agriculture, the Washington state department of transportation, a four-year research university, a technical college, the private sector, an economic development council, a city government, a county government, a tribal government, a non-government organization, a statewide environmental advocacy organization, and up to two energy utility providers. The work group must:

(a) Develop an inventory of higher education resources including research, development, and workforce training to foster green economic development in energy, water, and agriculture;

(b) Identify investment opportunities in higher education research, development, and workforce training to enhance and accelerate green economic development;

(c) Make recommendations for green economic development investment opportunities and how state government may serve as a clearing house, or economic center, to support private investments and build the green economy in Washington to serve national and global markets;

(d) Identify opportunities for integrating technology in energy, water, natural resources, and agriculture, and create resource efficiencies including water and energy conservation and smart grid technologies;

(e) Recommend policies at the state and local government level to promote and accelerate development of the green economy in Washington state;

(f) Submit an interim report with the work group recommendations to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2019; and

(g) Submit a final report with the work group recommendations to the appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2020.

(((39)))(38) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization focused on supporting pregnant women and single mothers who are homeless or at risk of being homeless throughout Pierce county. The grant must be used for providing classes relating to financial literacy, renter rights and responsibilities, parenting, and physical and behavioral health.

(((40)))(39) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide capacity-building grants through the Latino community fund for educational programs and human services support for children and families in rural and underserved communities.

(((41)))(40) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the city of Bothell to complete the canyon park regional growth center subarea plan.

(((42)))(41) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington statewide reentry council for operational staff support, travel, and administrative costs.

(((44)))(42) $964,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,045,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1257 (energy efficiency). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(45)))(43) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 16, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (E2SSB 5254).

(((46)))(44) General fund—federal appropriations provided in this section assume continued receipt of the federal Byrne justice assistance grant for state and local government drug and gang task forces.

(((47)))(45) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for an initiative to advance affordable housing projects and education centers on public or tax-exempt land in Washington state. The department must award the grant to an organization with an office located in a city with a population of more than six hundred thousand that partners in equitable, transit-oriented development. The grant must be used to:

(a) Produce an inventory of potentially developable public or tax-exempt properties;

(b) Analyze the suitability of properties for affordable housing, early learning centers, or community space;

(c) Organize community partners and build capacity to develop sites, as well as coordinate negotiations among partners and public owners;

(d) Facilitate collaboration and co-development between affordable housing, early learning centers, or community space;

(e) Catalyze the redevelopment of ten sites to create approximately fifteen hundred affordable homes; and

(f) Subcontract with the University of Washington to facilitate public, private, and non-profit partnerships to create a regional vision and strategy for building affordable housing at a scale to meet the need.

(((48)))(46) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal 2021 is provided solely for the department to contract with an entity located in the Beacon hill/Chinatown international district area of Seattle to provide low income housing, low income housing support services, or both. To the extent practicable, the chosen location must be colocated with other programs supporting the needs of children, the elderly, or persons with disabilities.

(((49)))(47) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant for a criminal justice diversion center pilot program in Spokane county. Spokane county must report collected data from the pilot program to the department. The department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2020. The report must contain, at a minimum:

(a) An analysis of the arrests and bookings for individuals served in the pilot program;

(b) An analysis of the connections to behavioral health services made for individuals who were served by the pilot program;

(c) An analysis of the impacts on housing stability for individuals served by the pilot program; and

(d) The number of individuals served by the pilot program who were connected to a detoxification program, completed a detoxification program, completed a chemical dependency assessment, completed chemical dependency treatment, or were connected to housing.

(((50)))(48)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for one or more better health through housing pilot project. The department must contract with one or more accountable communities of health to work with hospitals and permanent supportive housing providers in their respective accountable community of health regions to plan for and implement the better health through housing pilot project. The accountable communities of health must have established partnerships with permanent supportive housing providers, hospitals, and community health centers.

(b) The pilot project must prioritize providing permanent supportive housing assistance to people who:

(i) Are homeless or are at imminent risk of homelessness;

(ii) Have complex physical health or behavioral health conditions; and

(iii) Have a medically necessary condition, risk of death, negative health outcomes, avoidable emergency department utilization, or avoidable hospitalization without the provision of permanent supportive housing, as determined by a vulnerability assessment tool.

(c) Permanent supportive housing assistance may include rental assistance, permanent supportive housing service funding, or permanent supportive housing operations and maintenance funding. The pilot program shall work with permanent supportive housing providers to determine the best permanent supportive housing assistance local investment strategy to expedite the availability of permanent supportive housing for people eligible to receive assistance through the pilot project.

(d) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must contract with the Washington state department of social and health services division of research and data analysis to design and conduct a study to evaluate the impact of the better health through housing pilot project or projects. The division shall submit a final study report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021. The study objectives must include:

(i) Baseline data collection of the physical health conditions, behavioral health conditions, housing status, and health care utilization of people who receive permanent supportive housing assistance through the pilot project;

(ii) The impact on physical health and behavioral health outcomes of people who receive permanent supportive housing assistance through the pilot project as compared to people with similar backgrounds who did not receive permanent supportive housing assistance; and

(iii) The impact on health care costs and health care utilization of people who receive permanent supportive housing assistance through the pilot project as compared to people with similar backgrounds who did not receive permanent supportive housing assistance.

(e) A reasonable amount of the amounts provided in this subsection may be used to pay for costs to administer the pilot contracts and housing assistance.

(f) Amounts provided in this subsection do not include funding provided under title XIX or title XXI of the federal social security act, funding from the general fund—federal appropriation, or funding from the general fund—local appropriation for transformation through accountable communities of health, as described in initiative one of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington.

(g) The accountable communities of health must annually report the progress and impact of the better health through housing pilot project or projects to the joint select committee on health care oversight by December 1st of each year.

(((51)))(49) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract for the promotion of leadership development, community building, and other services for the Native American community in south King county.

(((52)))(50)(a) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department to provide to Chelan county to collaborate with the department of fish and wildlife and the Stemilt partnership on the following activities:

(i) Identifying and evaluating possible land exchanges in the Stemilt basin that provide mutual benefits to outdoor recreation and the mission of a public agency; and

(ii) Completing independent appraisals of all properties that may be included in a possible land exchange by June 30, 2020.

(b) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to provide to the department of fish and wildlife to complete technical studies, assessments, environmental review, and due diligence for lands included in any potential exchange and for project review for near-and long-term facility replacement and expansion of the mission ridge ski and board resort.

(c) The department must require the department of fish and wildlife, in collaboration with Chelan county, to submit recommendations for potential land exchange and supporting appraisals and environmental analysis to the Chelan county board of commissioners and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(((53)))(51) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($500,000))$1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant program.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing targeted at those families who are chronically homeless and where at least one member of the family has a disability. The department will also connect these families to medicaid supportive services.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for diversion services for those families and individuals who are at substantial risk of losing stable housing or who have recently become homeless and are determined to have a high probability of returning to stable housing.

(((54)))(52) $1,275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(55)))(53) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5223 (electrical net metering). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(56)))(54) $81,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5324 (homeless student support). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(57)))(55) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(58)))(56) $264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($264,000))$676,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511 (broadband service). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(59)))(57) $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the lead based paint enforcement activities within the department.

(((60)))(58) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for a one-time grant to the port of Port Angeles for a stormwater management project to protect ancient tribal burial sites and to maintain water quality.

(((61)))(59) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to municipalities using a labor program model designed for providing jobs to individuals experiencing homelessness to lead to full-time employment and stable housing.

(((62)))(60) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of the recommendations by the joint transportation committee's Washington state air cargo movement study to support an air cargo marketing program and assistance program. The department must coordinate promotion activities at domestic and international trade shows, air cargo events, and other activities that support the promotion, marketing, and sales efforts of the air cargo industry.

(((63)))(61) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit for a smart buildings education program to educate building owners and operators on smart building practices and technologies, including the development of onsite and digital trainings that detail how to operate residential and commercial facilities in an energy efficient manner. The grant recipient must be located in a city with a population of more than seven hundred thousand and serve anyone within Washington with an interest in better understanding energy efficiency in commercial and institutional buildings.

(((64)(a)))(62) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization to assist fathers transitioning from incarceration to family reunification. The grant recipient must have experience contracting with:

(((i)))(a) The department of corrections to support offender betterment projects; and

(((ii)))(b) The department of social and health services to provide access and visitation services.

(((65)))(63) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to promote public education around wildfires to public school students of all ages and to expand outreach on issues related to forest health and fire suppression. The grant recipient shall sponsor projects including, but not limited to, a multi-media traveling presentation.

(((66)))(64) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to help reduce crime and violence in neighborhoods and school communities. The grant recipient must promote safe streets and community engagement in the city of Tacoma through neighborhood organizing, law enforcement-community partnerships, neighborhood watch programs, youth mobilization, and business engagement.

(((67)))(65) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to increase the financial stability of low income Washingtonians through participation in children's education savings accounts, earned income tax credits, and the Washington retirement marketplace. The grant recipient must be a statewide association of local asset building coalitions that promotes policies and programs in Washington to assist low-and-moderate income residents build, maintain, and preserve assets through investments in education, homeownership, personal savings and entrepreneurship.

(((68)))(66) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to catalyze a market for mass timber and promote forest health, workforce development, and updates to building codes. The grant recipient must have at least twenty-five years of experience in land acquisition and program management to conserve farmland, create jobs, revitalize small towns, reduce wildfires, and reduce greenhouse emissions.

(((69)))(67) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($250,000))$350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to assist people with limited incomes in nonmetro areas of the state start and sustain small businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization involving a network of microenterprise organizations and professionals to support micro entrepreneurship and access to economic development resources.

(((70)))(68) $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization within the city of Tacoma for social services and educational programming to assist Latino and indigenous communities in honoring heritage and culture through the arts, and overcoming barriers to social, political, economic, and cultural community development.

(((71)))(69) $5,800,000 of the growth management planning and environmental review fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1923 (urban residential building). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants to cities for costs associated with the bill;

(b) $500,000 is provided solely for administration costs to the department; and

(c) $300,000 is provided solely for a grant to the Washington real estate research center.

(((72)))(70) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department to produce a proposal and recommendations for establishing an industrial waste coordination program by December 1, 2019.

(71) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to develop a comprehensive analysis of statewide emissions reduction strategies. This technical analysis must: (a) Identify specific strategies that are likely to be most effective in achieving necessary emissions reductions for key energy uses and customer segments; and (b) be performed by one or more expert consultants, with administrative and policy support provided by the department.

(72)$7,454,000 of the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program.

(73) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to law enforcement agencies to implement group violence intervention strategies in areas with high rates of gun violence. Grant funding will be awarded to two sites, with priority given to Yakima county and south King county. The sites must be located in areas with high rates of gun violence, include collaboration with the local leaders and community members, use data to identify the individuals most at risk to perpetrate gun violence for interventions, and include a component that connects individuals to services. Priority is given to sites meeting these criteria who also can demonstrate leveraging existing local or federal resources.

(74) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to facilitate research on nontraditional workers across the regulatory continuum, including convening cross-agency partners. The purpose of the research is to recommend policies and practices regarding the state's worker and small business programs, address changes in the labor market, and continue work initiated by the independent contractor employment study funded in section 127(47), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The department must submit a report of its findings to the governor by November 1, 2020.

(75) $1,366,000 of the financial fraud and identity theft crimes investigation and prosecution account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6074 (financial fraud/theft crimes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(76) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the operations of the long-term care ombudsman program.

(77) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to convene a work group to address airport impact mitigation. The work group must include representatives of the port of Seattle; the cities of SeaTac, Des Moines, Burien, Normandy Park, and Tukwila; and the city of Seattle representing the Beacon Hill, Georgetown, and South Park neighborhoods collectively. Designated cities will appoint two members, including one member of the community with direct knowledge of failed port packages. The department must extend a request for a representative of public health - Seattle & King county to participate in this work group. The purpose of the work group will be to study and make recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2020, on the following issues:

(a) Recommend a means for inspecting mitigation impact equipment installed under chapter 53.54 RCW near SeaTac international airport;

(b) Assess the need for additional mitigation impact equipment, including affected areas not previously mitigated; and

(c) Assess the need for physical repairs to homes caused by the failure of past mitigation impact equipment.

(78) $607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to a statewide nonprofit resource center to assist current and prospective homeowners, and homeowners at risk of foreclosure. Funding must be used for activities to prevent mortgage or tax lien foreclosure, housing counselors, foreclosure prevention hotlines, low-income legal services, mediation, and other activities that promote homeownership.

(79) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to Clallam county to conduct an assessment of the needs of its homeless population, including an analysis of the impact substance abuse treatment facility outcomes in the county has on its homeless population. The assessment must provide recommendations for improvements. Funds may also be used to provide shelter, services, and relocation assistance to the homeless, and to implement recommendations from the assessment.

(80) $360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to provide an economic development grant to a nongovernment organization whose primary focus is the economic development of Federal Way in order to create sustainable economic growth through the expansion, retention, and attraction of business, job creation, and workforce development in south Puget Sound.

(81) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations that primarily serve communities of color and poor rural communities in community planning, technical assistance, and predevelopment as part of the development of capital assets and programs that help reduce poverty and build stronger and more sustainable communities. The funds will be used to further the goal of equitable development of all Washington communities.

(82) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide legal representation and/or referral services for legal representation to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under this contract must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(83) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization in King county to provide adult culinary skills training, housing, and other services to students who are experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness.

(84) $391,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Pacific county to operate or participate in a drug task force to enhance coordination and intelligence while facilitating multijurisdictional criminal investigations.

(85) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to convene a work group to review and make recommendations for legislation to update the growth management act in light of the road map to Washington's future report produced by the Ruckelshaus center. The task force must involve stakeholders from diverse perspectives in the process, including but not limited to representatives of counties, cities, the forestry and agricultural industries, the environmental community, Native American tribes, and state agencies. The work group must report on its activities and recommendations by December 1, 2020.

(86) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to produce the biennial report identifying a list of projects to address incompatible developments near military installations as provided in RCW 43.330.520.

(87) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the formation of a healthy energy workers board. The board must conduct an unmet health care needs assessment for Hanford workers and develop recommendations on how these health care needs can be met. The board must also review studies on how to prevent worker exposure, summarize existing results and recommendations, develop key indicators of progress in meeting unmet health care needs, and catalogue the health surveillance systems in use at the Hanford site. The workers board must submit a report to the legislature by June 1, 2021, documenting recommendations on meeting health care needs, progress on meeting key indicators, and, if necessary, recommendations for the establishment of new health surveillance systems at Hanford.

(88) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for curriculum development and training sessions for a veteran's certified peer counseling pilot program in Lewis county delivered in partnership with a Lewis county veterans museum.

(89) $13,279,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $53,117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for increasing local temporary shelter capacity. The amount provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) A city or county applying for grant funding shall submit a sheltering proposal that aligns with its local homeless housing plan under RCW 43.185C.050. This proposal must include at a minimum:

(i) A strategy for outreach to bring currently unsheltered individuals into shelter;

(ii) Strategies for connecting sheltered individuals to services including but not limited to: Behavioral health, chemical dependency, education or workforce training, employment services, and permanent supportive housing services;

(iii) An estimate on average length of stay;

(iv) An estimate of the percentage of persons sheltered who will exit to permanent housing destinations and an estimate of those that are expected to return to homelessness;

(v) An assessment of existing shelter capacity in the jurisdiction, and the net increase in shelter capacity that will be funded with the state grant; and

(vi) Other appropriate measures as determined by the department.

(b) The department shall not reimburse more than $56 per day per net additional person sheltered above the baseline of shelter occupancy prior to award of the funding. Eligible uses of funds include shelter operations, shelter maintenance, shelter rent, loan repayment, case management, navigation to other services, efforts to address potential impacts of shelters on surrounding neighborhoods, and outreach directly related to bringing unsheltered people into shelter. The department shall coordinate with local governments to encourage cost-sharing through local matching funds.

(c) The department shall not reimburse more than $10,000 per shelter bed prior to occupancy, for costs associated with creating additional shelter capacity or improving existing shelters to improve occupancy rates and successful outcomes. Eligible costs prior to occupancy include acquisition, construction, equipment, staff costs, and other costs directly related to creating additional shelter capacity.

(d) For the purposes of this subsection "shelter" means any facility, the primary purpose of which is to provide space for homeless in general or for specific populations of homeless. The shelter must: Be structurally sound to protect occupants from the elements and not pose any threat to health or safety, have means of natural or mechanical ventilation, and be accessible to persons with disabilities, and the site must have hygiene facilities, which must be accessible but do not need to be in the structure.

(90) $923,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6430 (industrial waste program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for industrial waste coordination grants.

(91)(a) $924,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to continue and expand the el nuevo camino pilot project for the purpose of addressing serious youth gang problems in counties in eastern Washington. The department shall adopt policies and procedures as necessary to administer the pilot project, including the application process, disbursement of the grant award to the selected applicants, and tracking compliance and measuring outcomes. Partners, grant recipients, prosecutors, mental health practitioners, schools, and other members of the el nuevo camino pilot project, shall ensure that programs, trainings, recruiting, and other operations for el nuevo camino pilot project prohibit discriminatory practices, including biased treatment and profiling of youth or their communities. For the purposes of this subsection, antidiscriminatory practices prohibit grant recipients or their partners from using factors such as race, ethnicity, national origin, immigration or citizenship status, age, religion, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, and disability in guiding or identifying affected populations.

(b) An eligible applicant:

(i) Is a county located in Washington or its designee;

(ii) Is located east of the Cascade mountain range;

(iii) Has an identified gang problem;

(iv) Pledges and provides a minimum of sixty percent of matching funds over the same time period of the grant;

(v) Has established a coordinated effort with committed partners, including law enforcement, prosecutors, mental health practitioners, and schools;

(vi) Has established goals, priorities, and policies in compliance with the requirements of (c) of this subsection; and

(vii) Demonstrates a clear plan to engage in long-term antigang efforts after the conclusion of the pilot project.

(c) The grant recipients must:

(i) Work to reduce youth gang crime and violence by implementing the comprehensive gang model of the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974;

(ii) Increase mental health services to unserved and underserved youth by implementing the best practice youth mental health model of the national center for mental health and juvenile justice;

(iii) Work to keep high-risk youth in school, reenroll dropouts, and improve academic performance and behavior by engaging in a grass roots team approach in schools with the most serious youth violence and mental health problems, which must include a unique and identified team in each district participating in the project;

(iv) Hire a project manager and quality assurance coordinator;

(v) Adhere to recommended quality control standards for Washington state research-based juvenile offender programs as set forth by the Washington state institute for public policy; and

(vi) Report to the department by April 1, 2021, with the following:

(A) The number of youth and adults served through the project and the types of services accessed and received;

(B) The number of youth satisfactorily completing chemical dependency treatment in the county;

(C) The estimated change in domestic violence rates;

(D) The estimated change in gang participation and gang violence;

(E) The estimated change in dropout and graduation rates;

(F) The estimated change in overall crime rates and crimes typical of gang activity;

(G) The estimated change in recidivism for youth offenders in the county; and

(H) Other information required by the department or otherwise pertinent to the pilot project.

(d) The department shall report the information from (c)(vi) of this subsection and other relevant data to the legislature and the governor by June 1, 2021.

(92) $421,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6288 (office of firearm violence). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(93) $15,444,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to provide permanent supportive housing assistance grants.

(94) $1,007,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to administer a transitional housing pilot program for nondependent homeless youth. In developing the pilot program, the department will work with the adolescent unit within the department of children, youth, and families, which is focused on cross-system challenges impacting youth, including homelessness.

(95) $420,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6495 (housing & essential needs). The amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for essential needs and housing support assistance to individuals newly eligible for housing and essential needs support under Substitute Senate Bill No. 6495. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(96) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to make recommendations on a sustainable, transparent, and reactive funding model for the operation of the long-term care ombuds program.

(a) The department must recommend a plan that:

(i) Serves all residents in long term care equally;

(ii) Is reactive to changes in service costs; and

(iii) Is reactive to changes in number of residents and types of facilities served.

(b) The department shall convene not more than three stakeholder meetings that includes representatives from the department of social and health services, the department of commerce, the department of health, the office of financial management, the office of the governor, the long-term care ombuds program, representatives of long term care facilities, representatives for the area agencies on aging, and other stakeholders as appropriate. The department must submit a report with recommendations to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(97) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to establish representation in key international markets that will provide the greatest opportunities for increased trade and investment for small businesses in the state of Washington. Prior to entering into any contract for representation, the department must consult with associate development organizations and other organizations and associations that represent small business, rural industries, and disadvantaged business enterprises. By June 1, 2021, the department must transmit a report to the economic development committees of the legislature providing the following information, metrics, and private investment resulting from the department's engagement with international markets:

(a) An overview of the international markets in which the department has established representation and activities and contracts funded with amounts provided in this subsection;

(b) Additional funding invested in Washington companies;

(c) The number of jobs created in Washington; and

(d) The number of partnerships established and maintained by the department with international governments, businesses, and organizations.

(98) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to establish an identification assistance and support program to assist homeless persons in collecting documentation and procuring an identicard issued by the department of licensing. This program may be operated through a contract for services. The program shall operate in one county west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of one million or more and one county east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of five hundred thousand or more.

(99) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of homeless youth to administer a competitive grant process to award funding to licensed youth shelters, HOPE centers, and crisis residential centers to provide behavioral health support services for youth in crisis.

(100) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department of commerce to co-lead a prevention workgroup with the department of children, youth, and families. The workgroup shall focus on preventing youth and young adult homelessness and other related negative outcomes. The workgroup shall consist of members representing the department of social and health services, the employment security department, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the interagency workgroup on youth homelessness, community-based organizations, and young people and families with lived experience of housing instability, child welfare involvement or justice system involvement.

(a) The workgroup must develop a preliminary strategic plan to be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2020 that details:

(i) How existing efforts in this area are coordinated;

(ii) The demographics of youth involved in homelessness and other related negative outcomes;

(iii) Recommendations on promising interventions and policy improvements; and

(iv) Detail and descriptions of current prevention funding streams.

(b) The department of commerce shall solicit private funding to support this workgroup. It is the intent of the legislature that this study be supported by a minimum of a one-to-one match with private funds.

(101) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to the pacific science center for a maker and innovation lab. Grant funds are to be used to develop and operate new experiential learning opportunities.

(102) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants and associated technical assistance and administrative costs to foster collaborative partnerships that expand child care capacity in communities. Eligible applicants include nonprofit organizations, school districts, educational service districts, and local governments. These funds may be expended only after the approval of the director of the department of commerce and must be used to support activities and planning that helps communities address the shortage of child care, prioritizing partnerships serving in whole or in part areas identified as child care access deserts.

(103) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to a regional museum that is working with a national museum of American history and a regional theater to provide educational tools and experiences to students statewide relating to the democratic system in the state of Washington.

Sec. 128. 2019 c 415 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($860,000))

$874,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($888,000))

$912,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,900,000))

$1,938,000

Sec. 129. 2019 c 415 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($28,833,000))

$28,949,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($12,303,000))

$13,681,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($32,512,000))

$33,012,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,526,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$330,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($35,133,000))

$35,478,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Statewide Information Technology System Development

Maintenance and Operations Revolving

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,298,000))

$32,921,000

Office of Financial Management Central Service Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,710,000))

$21,277,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,446,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$678,000

Foundational Public Health Services—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$22,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($153,266,000))

$197,795,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of state need grant and college bound recipients;

(ii) The number of students on the unserved waiting list of the state need grant;

(iii) Persistence and completion rates of state need grant recipients and college bound recipients as well as students on the state need grant unserved waiting list, disaggregated by institution of higher education;

(iv) State need grant recipients and students on the state need grant unserved waiting list grade point averages; and

(v) State need grant and college bound scholarship program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

(c) The education data center shall enter data sharing agreements with the joint legislative audit and review committee and the Washington state institute for public policy to ensure that legislatively directed research assignments regarding state financial aid programs may be completed in a timely manner.

(2)(a) (($10,000,000))$29,623,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for ((continuation of readiness activities for)) the one Washington program agency financial reporting system replacement, phase 1A core financials. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) (($7,082,000))$7,082,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for organizational enterprise resource planning, organizational change management, and procurement contracts in fiscal year 2020.

(ii) $459,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff in fiscal year 2020.

(iii) $1,000,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for other contractual services or project staffing in fiscal year 2020.

(iv) (($459,000))$1,366,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for program staff in fiscal year 2021.

(v) $442,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for dedicated integration development staffing in fiscal year 2021. This staff will work to expand the states integration layer.

(vi) $140,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated statewide accounting consultant in fiscal year 2021. This staff will work with state agencies to standardize workflow and work with the systems integrator to configure the agency financial reporting system replacement. The staff will also update applicable state administrative and accounting manual chapters to document new standardized workflows.

(vii)(($1,000,000))$19,576,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for other contractual services or project staffing in fiscal year 2021.

(b) Beginning September 30, 2019, the office of financial management shall provide written quarterly reports on the one Washington program to the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee to include how ((funding was spent for the prior quarter))funding was spent for the prior quarter and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. The written report must also include:

(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables accomplished and the expenditures by deliverable by fiscal month;

(ii) A report on the contract full time equivalent charged and paid to each vendor by fiscal month; and

(iii) A report identifying each state agency that received change management vendor work from the information technology pool by fiscal month.

(c) Prior to spending any funds, the director of the office of financial management must agree to the spending and sign off on the spending.

(d) This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(e) Financial reporting for the agency change management funding must be coded and charged discretely in the agency financial reporting system each fiscal month so that it can be differentiated from the noninformation technology pool change management budget and costs.

(3) Within existing resources, the labor relations section shall produce a report annually on workforce data and trends for the previous fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include a workforce profile; information on employee compensation, including salaries and cost of overtime; and information on retention, including average length of service and workforce turnover.

(4) $12,741,000 of the personnel service account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for administration of orca pass benefits included in the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreements and provided to nonrepresented employees as identified in section 996 of this act. The office of financial management must bill each agency for that agency's proportionate share of the cost of orca passes. The payment from each agency must be deposited in to the personnel service account and used to purchase orca passes. The office of financial management may consult with the Washington state department of transportation in the administration of these benefits.

(5) $12,485,000 of the personnel service fund appropriation is provided solely for the administration of a flexible spending arrangement (FSA) plan. Agencies shall pay their proportional cost for the program as determined by the office of financial management. Total amounts billed by the office of financial management for this purpose may not exceed the amount provided in this subsection. The office of financial management may, through interagency agreement, delegate administration of the program to the health care authority.

(6) $1,536,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5741 (all payer claims database), and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1949 (firearm background checks). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1497 (foundational public health).

(9) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the office of financial management to determine annual primary care medical expenditures in Washington, by insurance carrier, in total and as a percentage of total medical expenditure. Where feasible, this determination must also be broken down by relevant characteristics such as whether expenditures were for in-patient or out-patient care, physical or mental health, by type of provider, and by payment mechanism.

(a) The determination must be made in consultation with statewide primary care provider organizations using the state's all payer claims database and other existing data.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(i) "Primary care" means family medicine, general internal medicine, and general pediatrics.

(ii) "Primary care provider" means a physician, naturopath, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or other health professional licensed or certified in Washington state whose clinical practice is in the area of primary care.

(iii) "Primary care medical expenditures" means payments to reimburse the cost of physical and mental health care provided by a primary care provider, excluding prescription drugs, vision care, and dental care, whether paid on a fee-for-service basis or as a part of a capitated rate or other type of payment mechanism.

(iv) "Total medical expenditure" means payments to reimburse the cost of all health care and prescription drugs, excluding vision care and dental care, whether paid on a fee-for-service basis or as part of a capitated rate or other type of payment mechanism.

(c) By December 1, 2019, the office of financial management shall report its findings to the legislature, including an explanation of its methodology and any limits or gaps in existing data which affected its determination.

(10) $1,200,000 of the office of financial management central services—state appropriation is provided solely for the education research and data center to set up a data enclave and to work on complex data sets. This is subject to the conditions, limitations and review requirements of ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act. The data enclave for customer access must include twenty-five users, to include one user from each of the following entities:

(a) The house;

(b) The senate;

(c) The legislative evaluation and accountability program committee;

(d) The joint legislative audit and review committee; and

(e) The Washington state institute for public policy.

(11) $345,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for modifications to the facilities portfolio management tool to expand the ability to track leases of land, buildings, equipment, and vehicles. This is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(((14)))(12) $250,000 of the office of financial management central service—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated budget staff for the work associated with the information technology cost pool projects. The staff will be responsible for providing a monthly financial report after each fiscal month close to fiscal staff of the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees to reflect at least:

(a) Fund balance of the information technology pool account;

(b) Amount by project of funding approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(c) Amount by agency of funding approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(d) Total amount approved to date and for the last fiscal month; ((and))

(e) Amount of expenditure on each project by the agency to date and for the last fiscal month;

(f) A projection for the information technology pool account by fiscal month through the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium close, and as a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total appropriation;

(g) A projection of each project by fiscal month through the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium close, and a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total project cost; and

(h) A list of agencies and projects that have not yet been approved for funding by the office of financial management.

(((15)))(13) $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $5,000,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the office of financial management to prepare for the 2020 census. No funds provided under this subsection may be used for political purposes. The office must:

(a) Complete outreach and a communication campaign that reaches the state's hardest to count residents;

(b) Perform frequent outreach to the hard-to-count population both in person through community messengers and through various media avenues;

(c) Establish deliverable-based outreach contracts with nonprofit organizations and local and tribal contracts;

(d) Consider the recommendations of the statewide complete count committee;

(e) Prepare documents in multiple languages to promote census participation;

(f) Provide technical assistance with the electronic census forms; and

(g) Hold in reserve $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, until January 1, 2020, for contracting with community based organizations with historical access to and credibility with hard-to-count people to support outreach to the hardest to count and last-mile efforts.

(14) Within existing resources and in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial management shall review and report on the pupil transportation funding system for K-12 education. The report shall include findings and recommendations and shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2020. This report shall include review of the following:

(a) The formula components and modeling approach in RCW 28A.160.192;

(b) The data used in the analysis for completeness, validity, and appropriateness;

(c) The timing requirements and whether they could be changed;

(d) The STARS model for appropriateness, functionality, and alignment with statute; and

(e) The capacity and resources of the office of the superintendent of public instruction to produce the transportation analysis.

(15) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of financial management to contract for project management and fiscal modeling to support collaborations with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and department of children, youth, and families to complete a report with options and recommendations for administrative efficiencies and long-term strategies which align and integrate high-quality early learning programs administered by both agencies. The report is due to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2020.

(16) When determining financial feasibility and submitting a request for funds necessary to implement collective bargaining agreements for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the office of financial management should request funds from the state general fund rather than the state wildlife account for the department of fish and wildlife cost. The legislature intends that requests for funds not be made from accounts with insufficient fund balances and where the administering agency lacks the statutory authority to generate additional revenue to the account.

(17) The office shall consult with natural resource agencies of the state, including but not limited to the department of natural resources, state parks and recreation commission, department of fish and wildlife, conservation commission, Puget Sound partnership, recreation and conservation office, and department of ecology, to prioritize actions and investments that mitigate the effects of climate change and strengthen the resiliency of communities and the natural environment. The recommended prioritization list shall be submitted to the governor and the legislature by November 1, 2020, to be considered for funding from the climate resiliency account created in section 914 of this act.

(18) The joint legislative audit and review committee and the Washington state institute for public policy shall be considered authorized representatives of relevant state education authorities for the purpose of accessing records for evaluations. The education research and data center must provide data requested by the joint committee or the institute within six months from the date of the initial formal request. The education research and data center and data contributors must notify the joint committee or the institute in writing if they determine the data request does not comply with the federal educational rights and privacy act, no later than twenty-one days after the initial formal request.

(19) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of financial management to review and report on vendor rates for services provided to low-income individuals at the department of children, youth, and families, the department of corrections, and the department of social and health services. The report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2020, and must include review of, at least:

(a) The current rates for services by vendor;

(b) A history of increases to the rates since fiscal year 2010 by vendor;

(c) A comparison of how the vendor increases and rates compare to inflation; and

(d) A summary of the billing methodology for the vendor rates.

(20) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $150,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the office to seek an independent audit of the health care authority's administrative costs and expenditures. The audit must be provided to the legislature no later than September 1, 2021, and must include all administrative costs associated with the medicaid program, including, but not limited to costs expended by the authority for:

(a) Staff necessary to operate the program;

(b) Administrative costs associated with managed care plan operation;

(c) Other administrative costs incurred through additional third party administrators or administrators of medicaid or medicaid-related programs; and

(d) Fiscal intermediaries and third party administrators engaged on behalf of the authority.

(21) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $350,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to contract with one or more research or actuarial entities to examine the delivery of behavioral and physical health care services for which the health care authority contracts with a risk-bearing fiscal intermediary, excluding any contracts for employee benefit programs. A report must be provided to the legislature no later than September 1, 2021, and must include:

(a) A description of the types of payment methods currently used by risk-bearing fiscal intermediaries to establish provider payments. The report must identify, and, to the extent practicable, quantify, instances of case payment rates, broad encounter rates, value-based purchasing, subcapitation, or similar methodologies;

(b) Options available to the legislature and the governor to ensure that risk-bearing fiscal intermediaries meet standards for quality and access to care; and

(c) Options available to the legislature and the governor to modify payment rates to providers that offer services under medicaid managed care. To the extent practicable, for each option the report must discuss the potential implications to federal funding and client access to care for both state-funded and private pay patients and identify whether the option could be restricted to particular types of service, provider specializations, client characteristics, care settings, geographic areas, or other relevant, identified demographic criteria.

Sec. 130. 2019 c 415 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($45,688,000))

$47,502,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($45,688,000))

$47,502,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $173,000 of the administrative hearing revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 13, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1399).

(2) $46,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Fourth Substitute Senate Bill No. 5533 (parental improvement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 131. 2019 c 415 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,854,000))

$29,819,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($29,854,000))

$29,819,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of gaming system capabilities that violate state law.

(2) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040, the commission shall take such action necessary to reduce retail commissions to an average of 5.1 percent of sales.

Sec. 132. 2019 c 415 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($401,000))

$415,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($413,000))

$441,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($840,000))

$882,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5023 (ethnic studies). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 133. 2019 c 415 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($318,000))

$306,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($301,000))

$392,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($645,000))

$724,000

Sec. 134. 2019 c 415 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—OPERATIONS

Department of Retirement Systems Expense

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($60,059,000))

$61,649,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($60,059,000))

$61,649,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $160,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1661 (higher education retirement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $106,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with implementation of Senate Bill No. 5350 (optional life annuity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $139,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1308 or Senate Bill No. 5360 (retirement system defaults). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $44,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with implementation of House Bill No. 1408 (survivorship benefit options). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $53,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6417 (survivor option change). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $48,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5400 (plan 1 pension benefit increase). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 135. 2019 c 415 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($150,681,000))

$151,272,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($144,287,000))

$152,048,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,289,000))

$7,357,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,606,000))

$20,685,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$168,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,486,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($341,636,000))

$350,135,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1059 (B&O return filing due date). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2)(a) $4,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($1,921,000))$2,575,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to implement 2019 revenue legislation.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, sufficient funding is provided for the department to implement section 11 of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5183 (manufactured/mobile homes).

(c)(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,061,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $977,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to facilitate a tax structure work group, initially created within chapter 1, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (SSB 5883) and hereby reauthorized.

(ii) In addition to the membership as set forth in chapter 1, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess., the tax structure work group is expanded to include nonvoting members as follows:

(A) The president of the senate must appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(B) The speaker of the house of representatives must appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and

(C) The governor must appoint one member who represents the office of the governor.

(iii) The work group must include the following nonvoting members:

(A) One representative of the department;

(B) One representative of the association of Washington cities; and

(C) One representative of the Washington state association of counties.

(iv) All voting members of the work group must indicate, in writing, their interest in serving on the tax structure work group and provide a statement of understanding that the commitment to serve on the tax structure work group is through December 31, 2024. Elected officials not reelected to their respective offices may be relieved of their responsibilities on the tax structure work group. Vacancies on the tax structure work group must be filled within sixty days of notice of the vacancy. The work group must choose a chair or cochairs from among its legislative membership. The chair is, or cochairs are, responsible for convening the meetings of the work group no less than quarterly each year. Recommendations and other decisions of the work group may be approved by a simple majority vote. All work group members may have a representative attend meetings of the tax structure work group in lieu of the member, but voting by proxy is not permitted. Staff support for the work group must be provided by the department. The department may engage one or more outside consultants to assist in providing support for the work group. Members of the work group must serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120, 43.03.050, and 43.03.060.

(v) The duties of the work group are to:

(A) By December 1, 2019, convene no less than one meeting to elect a chair, or cochairs, and conduct other business of the work group;

(B) By December 1, 2020, the department and technical advisory group must prepare a summary report of their preliminary findings and alternatives described in (c)(vii) of this subsection;

(C) By May 1, 2021, the work group must:

(I) Hold no less than one meeting in Olympia to review the preliminary findings described in (c)(vii) of this subsection. At least one meeting must engage stakeholder groups, as described in (c)(vi)(A) of this subsection;

(II) Begin to plan strategies to engage taxpayers and key stakeholder groups to encourage participation in the public meetings described in (c)(vii) of this subsection;

(III) Present the summary report described in (c)(vii) of this subsection in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 to the appropriate committees of the legislature;

(IV) Be available to deliver a presentation to the appropriate committees of the legislature including the elements described in (c)(vi)(B) of this subsection; and

(V) Finalize the logistics of the engagement strategies described in (c)(v)(D) of this subsection; and

(D) After the conclusion of the 2021 legislative session, the work group must:

(I) Hold no less than five public meetings in geographically dispersed areas of the state;

(II) Present the findings described in (c)(vii) of this subsection and alternatives to the state's current tax structure at the public meetings;

(III) Provide an opportunity at the public meetings for taxpayers to engage in a conversation about the state tax structure including, but not limited to, providing feedback on possible recommendations for changes to the state tax structure and asking questions about the report and findings and alternatives to the state's current tax structure presented by the work group;

(IV) Utilize methods to collect taxpayer feedback before, during, or after the public meetings that may include, but is not limited to: Small group discussions, in-person written surveys, in-person visual surveys, online surveys, written testimony, and public testimony;

(V) Encourage legislators to inform their constituents about the public meetings that occur within and near their legislative districts;

(VI) Inform local elected officials about the public meetings that occur within and near their communities; and

(VII) Summarize the feedback that taxpayers and other stakeholders communicated during the public meetings and other public engagement methods, and submit a final summary report, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature. This report may be submitted as an appendix or update to the summary report described in (c)(vii) of this subsection.

(vi)(A) The stakeholder groups referenced by (c)(v)(C)(I) of this subsection must include, at a minimum, organizations and individuals representing the following:

(I) Small, start-up, or low-margin business owners and employees or associations expressly dedicated to representing these businesses, or both; and

(II) Individual taxpayers with income at or below one hundred percent of area median income in their county of residence or organizations expressly dedicated to representing low-income and middle-income taxpayers, or both;

(B) The presentation referenced in (c)(v)(C)(IV) of this subsection must include the following elements:

(I) The findings and alternatives included in the summary report described in (c)(vii) of this subsection; and

(II) The preliminary plan to engage taxpayers directly in a robust conversation about the state's tax structure including, presenting the findings described in (c)(vii) of this subsection and alternatives to the state's current tax structure, and collecting feedback to inform development of recommendations.

(vii) The duties of the department, with assistance of one or more technical advisory groups, are to:

(A) With respect to the final report of findings and alternatives submitted by the Washington state tax structure study committee to the legislature under section 138, chapter 7, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.:

(I) Update the data and research that informed the recommendations and other analysis contained in the final report;

(II) Estimate how much revenue all the revenue replacement alternatives recommended in the final report would have generated for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium if the state had implemented the alternatives on January 1, 2003;

(III) Estimate the tax rates necessary to implement all recommended revenue replacement alternatives in order to achieve the revenues generated during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as reported by the economic and revenue forecast council;

(IV) Estimate the impact on taxpayers, including tax paid as a share of household income for various income levels, and tax paid as a share of total business revenue for various business activities, for (c)(vii)(A)(II) and (III) of this subsection; and

(V) Estimate how much revenue would have been generated in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, if the incremental revenue alternatives recommended in the final report would have been implemented on January 1, 2003, excluding any recommendations implemented before the effective date of this section;

(B) With respect to the recommendations in the final report of the 2018 tax structure work group:

(I) Conduct economic modeling or comparable analysis of replacing the business and occupation tax with an alternative, such as corporate income tax or margins tax, and estimate the impact on taxpayers, such as tax paid as a share of total business revenue for various business activities, assuming the same revenues generated by business and occupation taxes during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as reported by the economic and revenue forecast council; and

(II) Estimate how much revenue would have been generated for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium if the one percent revenue growth limit on regular property taxes was replaced with a limit based on population growth and inflation if the state had implemented this policy on January 1, 2003;

(C) To analyze our economic competitiveness with border states:

(I) Estimate the revenues that would have been generated during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, had Washington adopted the tax structure of those states, assuming the economic tax base for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as reported by the economic and revenue forecast council; and

(II) Estimate the impact on taxpayers, including tax paid as a share of household income for various income levels, and tax paid as a share of total business revenue for various business activities for (c)(vii)(C)(I) of this subsection;

(D) To analyze our economic competitiveness in the context of a national and global economy, provide comparisons of the effective state and local tax rate of the tax structure during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and various alternatives under consideration, as they compare to other states and the federal government, as well as consider implications of recent changes to federal tax law;

(E) To the degree it is practicable, conduct tax incidence analysis of the various alternatives under consideration to account for the impacts of tax shifting, such as business taxes passed along to consumers and property taxes passed along to renters;

(F) To the degree it is practicable, present findings and alternatives by geographic area, in addition to statewide; and

(G) Conduct other analysis as directed by the work group.

(3) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) Within existing resources, the department must compile a report on the annual amount of state retail sales tax collected under chapter 82.08 RCW on sales occurring at area fairs and county fairs as described in RCW 15.76.120. The report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(5) $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6072 (state wildlife account). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $42,000 of the business license account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6392 (local wine industry license). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $468,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $313,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 2, Laws of 2020 (ESSB 6492) (B&O tax and workforce education).

(8) $2,981,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6601 (Indian tribes compact and taxes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5402 (tax and licensing laws). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6115 (off-road vehicle registrations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6212 (affordable housing/prop. tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6319 (senior property tax administration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $34,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6592 (tourism authorities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $47,000 of the business license account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6632 (business licensing services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) By January 1, 2021, and by January 1st of each year thereafter, the department must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the amount of taxes collected on qualified transactions and paid to each compacting tribe in the prior fiscal year under Substitute Senate Bill No. 6601 or Substitute House Bill No. 2803 (Indian tribes compact/taxes).

(16) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6312 (nonprofit fund-raising and taxes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $166,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1457 (aircraft fuel tax distributions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 136. 2019 c 415 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,382,000))

$2,412,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,421,000))

$2,452,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$162,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,965,000))

$5,026,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the board to continue maintaining its legacy case management software and conduct a feasibility study to determine how best to update or replace the case management software.

Sec. 137. 2019 c 415 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$109,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($101,000))

$760,000

Minority and Women's Business Enterprises

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,347,000))

$5,343,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,557,000))

$6,212,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of minority and women's business enterprises to enter into an interagency agreement with the Washington state department of transportation for the department to write a surety bonding program report. This report is due to the governor by December 1, 2020.

Sec. 138. 2019 c 415 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,661,000

Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($69,673,000))

$68,688,000

Insurance Commissioner's Fraud Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,784,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($74,334,000))

$75,133,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $536,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5526 (individual health insurance market). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) $45,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1879 (Rx drug utilization management). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $397,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1075 (consumer competitive group insurance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $1,015,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1065 (out-of-network health). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $60,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 16, Laws of 2019 (HB 1001) (service contract providers).

(6) $84,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 56, Laws of 2019 (SSB 5889) (insurance communications confidentiality).

(7) $125,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5602 (reproductive health care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $125,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for staffing and supporting the work of the natural disaster and resiliency workgroup for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5106 (natural disaster mitigation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the commissioner shall review how pharmacy benefit managers are regulated in other states and report the findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 15, 2019.

(10) $333,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5601 (health care benefit managers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $1,784,000 of the insurance commissioners fraud account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6049 (insurance fraud account). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $10,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6050 (insurance guaranty fund). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $61,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6051 (medicare part D supplement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $30,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6052 (life insurance/behavior). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $46,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6087 (insulin cost-sharing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $323,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6331 (captive insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $15,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6404 (health plans/prior authorization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $10,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5887 (prior authorization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19)(a) The joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability issues shall convene a work group to determine next steps for insurance coverage of specialty palliative care as defined in the Bree collaborative's 2019 palliative care report.

(b) The office of the insurance commissioner and the health care authority shall cochair the work group. The work group shall consist of the executive director of the Bree collaborative; commercial health insurance companies regulated by the office of the insurance commissioner; managed care organizations; the Washington state hospital association; an organization representing palliative care providers; an organization representing home health agencies; an organization representing hospice services; and a pediatric palliative care provider.

(c) The work group shall report its recommendations to the full joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability issues by November 1, 2020.

Sec. 139. 2019 c 415 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board Expense Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($60,028,000))

$60,048,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($60,028,000))

$60,048,000

Sec. 140. 2019 c 415 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($356,000))

$493,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($392,000))

$473,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,034,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
(($11,662,000))

$11,649,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
(($11,625,000))

$11,689,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($74,514,000))

$74,724,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($101,738,000))

$102,217,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The liquor and cannabis board may require electronic payment of the marijuana excise tax levied by RCW 69.50.535. The liquor and cannabis board may allow a waiver to the electronic payment requirement for good cause as provided by rule.

(2) The traceability system is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(3) $70,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 61, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1034) (restaurant/soju endorsement).

(4) $23,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $23,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1794 (marijuana business agreements). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $722,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $591,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5318 (marijuana license compliance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $350,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $350,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the board to hire additional staff for cannabis enforcement and licensing activities.

(7) $100,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the board to convene a work group to determine the feasibility of and make recommendations for varying the marijuana excise tax rate based on product potency. The work group must submit a report of its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(8) $71,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5006 (sale of wine by microbrewery). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $149,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5549 (distillery marketing and sales). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $56,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6392 (local wine industry license). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $42,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6206 (marijuana compliance certification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) The board must provide the economic revenue forecast council access to cannabis data. The data must include price and quantity of product type information. Product type includes at least extracts, smokable cannabis, and edibles. Cannabis tax and revenue is forecasted by the economic revenue forecast council and the board must provide information to them in accordance with RCW 82.33.020(3). The board must:

(a) Meet with the economic revenue forecast council to identify, discuss, and share cannabis data, from as early as November 2017, to identify the data to be included in the data sharing agreement. These meetings must occur by April 30, 2020;

(b) Execute a data sharing agreement with the economic revenue forecast council that ensures the council receives at least the same level of information that was provided to them from the board each calendar month until October 2017. This agreement must be executed by all parties by May 31, 2020;

(c) Begin providing the economic revenue forecast council with the information the council needs by June 30, 2020, to include monthly price and quantity of product type information; and

(d) Provide the economic revenue forecast council with monthly price and quantity of product type information each month, beginning July 1, 2020.

(13) $30,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the board to convene a task force on marijuana odor with members as provided in this subsection.

(a) The governor shall appoint seven members, who must include a representative from the following:

(i) The state liquor and cannabis board;

(ii) The department of ecology;

(iii) The department of health;

(iv) The Washington state department of agriculture;

(v) A state association of counties;

(vi) A state association of cities; and

(vii) A representative from the recreational marijuana community or a marijuana producer, processor, or retailer licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board.

(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its membership. The state liquor and cannabis board shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.

(c) The task force shall review the following issues: The available and most appropriate ways or methods to mitigate, mask, conceal, or otherwise address marijuana odors and emissions and the potentially harmful impact of marijuana odors and emissions on people who live, work, or are located in close proximity to a marijuana production or processing facility, including but not limited to: (a) Filtering systems; (b) natural odor masking mechanisms or odor concealing mechanisms; (c) zoning and land use controls and regulations; and (d) changes to state laws and regulations including, but not limited to, laws and regulations related to nuisance and public health.

(d) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the board.

(e) Members of the task force are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(f) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the majority and minority leaders of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives and the senate by December 31, 2020.

Sec. 141. 2019 c 415 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$173,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$123,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,725,000))

$16,634,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($41,545,000))

$41,375,000

Public Service Revolving Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$230,000

Pipeline Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,506,000))

$2,548,000

Pipeline Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,202,000))

$4,162,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($65,274,000))

$65,245,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $800,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation in this section is for the utilities and transportation commission to supplement funds committed by a telecommunications company to expand rural broadband service on behalf of an eligible governmental entity. The amount in this subsection represents payments collected by the utilities and transportation commission pursuant to the Qwest performance assurance plan.

(2) $330,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1257 (energy efficiency). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4)))(3) $95,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1512 (transportation electrification). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)))(4) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the commission to convene a work group on preventing underground utility damage. The work group is subject to the following requirements:

(a) The utilities and transportation commission shall contract with an independent facilitator for the work group to facilitate and moderate meetings, provide objective facilitation and negotiation between work group members, ensure participants receive information and guidance so that they respond in a timely manner, and synthesize agreements and points under negotiation.

(b) The work group shall discuss topics such as, but not limited to: How facility operators and excavators schedule meeting times and places; new requirements for marking locatable underground facilities; a definition of "noninvasive methods"; the procedures that must take place when an excavator discovers (and may or may not damage) an underground facility; positive response procedures; utility identification procedures for newly constructed and replacement underground facilities; the membership composition of the dig law safety committee; liability for damage occurring from an excavation when either the excavator or the facility operator fails to comply with the statutory requirements relating to notice requirements or utility marking requirements; and ensuring consistency with the pipeline and hazardous materials safety administration towards a uniform national standard.

(c) The work group shall include, but is not limited to, members representing cities, counties, public and private utility companies, construction and excavator communities, water-sewer districts, and other government entities with underground facilities.

(d) The work group shall meet a minimum of four times and produce a report with recommendations to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2019.

(((7)))(5) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $814,000 of the public services revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)))(6) $14,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1112 (hydrofluorocarbons emissions). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9)))(7) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511 (broadband service).

(8) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6135 (system reliability/energy).

Sec. 142. 2019 c 415 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($9,900,000))

$11,593,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($10,269,000))

$10,334,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($118,165,000))

$119,219,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$43,745,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($28,774,000))

$49,996,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($97,048,000))

$134,058,000

Military Department Rent and Lease Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($615,000))

$1,066,000

Military Department Active State Service Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,040,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,848,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,244,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($313,048,000))

$374,543,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees ((on))by February 1st and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2019-2021 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $40,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.

(3) $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.

(4) $11,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.

(5) $784,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.

(6) $100,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with a representative group of counties, public service answering points, and first responder organizations, to submit a report on the 911 system to the appropriate legislative committees by October 1, 2020. The report must include:

(a) The actual cost per fiscal year for the state, including all political subdivisions, to operate and maintain the 911 system including, but not limited to, the ESInet, call handling equipment, personnel costs, facility costs, contractual costs, administrative costs, and legal fees.

(b) The difference between the actual state and local costs and current state and local 911 funding.

(c) Potential cost-savings and efficiencies through the consolidation of equipment, regionalization of services or merging of facilities, positive and negative impacts on the public, legal or contractual restrictions, and appropriate actions to alleviate these constraints.

(7) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5012 (governmental continuity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) (($464,000))$2,151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($464,000))$656,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to procure and install ((sixteen))thirty-nine all-hazard alert broadcast sirens to increase inundation zone coverage to alert individuals of an impending tsunami or other disaster.

(9) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to procure and install seismic monitoring stations and global navigation satellite systems that integrate with the early warning system known as ShakeAlert.

(10) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to support an education and public outreach program in advance of the new early earthquake warning system known as ShakeAlert.

(11) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing Substitute Senate Bill No. 5106 (natural disaster mitigation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $451,000 of the military department rental and lease account—state appropriation is provided for maintenance and operation, including equipment replacement, of the communications infrastructure on Camp Murray.

(13) $496,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5247 (catastrophic incidents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 143. 2019 c 415 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,238,000))

$2,240,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,283,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,282,000))

$4,283,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,410,000))

$1,412,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$228,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($10,441,000))

$10,446,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1575 (collective bargaining/dues). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5022 (granting interest arbitration to certain higher education uniformed personnel).

Sec. 144. 2019 c 415 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified Public Accountants' Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,631,000))

$3,624,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,631,000))

$3,624,000

Sec. 145. 2019 c 415 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($692,000))

$735,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($692,000))

$735,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.

(2) $210,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.

Sec. 146. 2019 c 415 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($4,732,000))

$4,741,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($4,795,000))

$5,841,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,519,000))

$1,966,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,148,000))

$12,650,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($4,371,000))$4,340,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($4,371,000))$4,347,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges to include campus rent, utilities, parking, and contracts, public and historic facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, legislative support services, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.

(2) In accordance with RCW 46.08.172 and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase parking fees in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 as necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business.

(3) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written approval from the director of the department of enterprise services. Agencies that are exempted from the requirement are the Washington state patrol, Washington state department of transportation, and the department of natural resources.

(4) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2021.

(5) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the agency to procure cyber incident insurance on behalf of forty-three small to medium sized agencies that are currently without this coverage.

(6)(a) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must revise its master contracts with vendors, including cooperative purchasing agreements under RCW 39.26.060, to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(i) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(ii) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(A) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(B) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(C) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(b) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the public entity using the contract or agreement of the department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(c) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(d) Any cost for the implementation of this section must be recouped from the fees charged to master contract vendors.

(7) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department to query and inventory all state agency use and amounts of glyphosate. Within amounts provided, the department must offer to pay to state agencies the difference in costs for using alternatives for vegetation control. A report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the findings of the query and inventory must be made by December 31, 2019.

(8)(a) (($5,000))$45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((is))and $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a legislative work group to study and make recommendations on a monument on the capital campus to honor residents who died in the global war in terror. The department of enterprise services must staff the work group, which shall be composed of:

(i) One member from each of the four major caucuses of the legislature;

(ii) The director of the department of veterans affairs or his or her designee;

(iii) The director of the Washington state parks and recreation commission or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the department of enterprise services or his or her designee;

(v) The director of the Washington state military department or his or her designee;

(vi) The secretary of state or his or her designee;

(vii) The state archivist or his or her designee;

(viii) A representative of the capitol campus design advisory committee that is not the secretary of state or a legislative member already designated to be part of the work group; and

(ix) Two representatives from veterans organizations appointed by the governor.

(b) The work group shall choose two cochairs from among its legislative membership. The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the work group before November 1, 2019.

(c) The work group shall:

(i) Conduct a study of the feasibility of establishing a new memorial on the capitol campus to honor fallen service members from the global war on terrorism;

(ii) Provide the names of the recommended individuals to be honored at the memorial;

(iii) Recommend locations where the memorial could be constructed on the capitol campus and provide any permit requirements or other restrictions that may exist for each location;

(iv) Provide potential draft designs that could be used for the memorial;

(v) Provide information regarding the anticipated funding needed for:

(A) The design, construction, and placement of the memorial;

(B) Any permits that may be required;

(C) Anticipated ongoing maintenance cost for the memorial based on potential materials used and historical maintenance of other memorials on campus; and

(D) An unveiling ceremony or other expenses that may be necessary for the memorial;

(vi) Make recommendations regarding the funding sources that may be available, which may include solicitation of private funds or a method for obtaining the necessary funds; and

(vii) Make recommendations regarding an agency, committee, or commission to coordinate the design, construction, and placement of a memorial on the capitol campus.

(d) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.

(e) The work group shall submit a report of its recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by ((November 1, 2020))June 30, 2021.

(9) ((The department may expend private local funds for new signage designating the Joan Benoit Samuelson marathon park if the private local funds are received for that specific purpose.

(10)))(a) Within existing resources, beginning October 31, 2019, the department, in collaboration with consolidated technology services, must provide a report to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31st of each calendar year that reflects information technology contract information based on a contract snapshot from June 30 of that calendar year. The department will coordinate to receive contract information for all contracts to include those where the department has delegated authority so that the report includes statewide contract information. The report must contain a list of all information technology contracts to include the agency name, contract number, vendor name, the contract term start and end dates, the contract dollar amount in total, contract dollar amount by state fiscal year to include contract spending projections for each ensuing state fiscal year through the contract term, and type of service delivered. The list of contracts must be provided electronically in excel and sortable by all fields.

(b) In determining the type of service delivered, groupings must include agreed upon items by the department, the office of the chief information officer, senate fiscal staff, and house fiscal staff. This grouping criteria must be agreed upon by August 31, 2019.

(((11)))(10) The department must use any new resources provided for civic education solely for the free-to-schools civic education program.

(11) Within existing resources, the department must study the increase in tort claims filed generally and with a specific focus on the increase in tort claims filed and payouts made against the department of children, youth, and families. The study must include an assessment of the source of the payouts, such as jury awards, court judgments, mediation, and arbitration awards. The department should determine the root cause for these increases and develop recommendations on how to reduce the number of tort claims filed and payouts made. The department must coordinate its work with the department of children, youth, and families and the office of the attorney general. A report must be provided to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2020.

(12) In collaboration with the office of the governor, the department will add a diversity, equity, and inclusion training module to the learning management system by June 30, 2021.

(13) $447,000 of the building code council account—state appropriation is provided solely for an economic study, additional staffing for the council, and to upgrade the web site. Upgrading the web site is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

Sec. 147. 2019 c 415 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($1,926,000))

$1,978,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,979,000))

$2,165,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,150,000))

$2,300,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$136,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($6,205,000))

$6,593,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for archaeological determinations and excavations of inadvertently discovered skeletal human remains, and removal and reinterment of such remains when necessary.

Sec. 148. 2019 c 415 s 152 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$188,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$188,000

Consolidated Technology Services Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($25,048,000))

$27,203,000

((Consolidated Technology Services Revolving

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$244,176,000))

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($269,600,000))

$27,579,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($12,297,000))$11,960,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of the chief information officer. Of this amount:

(a) (($2,000,000))$1,663,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for experienced information technology project managers to provide critical support to agency IT projects that are subject to the provisions of ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act. The staff will:

(i) Provide master level project management guidance to agency IT stakeholders;

(ii) Consider statewide best practices from the public and private sectors, independent review and analysis, vendor management, budget and timing quality assurance and other support of current or past IT projects in at least Washington state and share these with agency IT stakeholders and legislative fiscal staff at least quarterly, beginning July 1, 2020; and

(iii) Beginning December 31, 2019, provide independent recommendations to legislative fiscal committees by December of each calendar year on oversight of IT projects.

(b)(i) $250,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely to ensure that the state has a more nimble, extensible information technology dashboard. Dashboard elements must include at the minimum:

(A) Start date of the project;

(B) End date of the project when the project will close out and implementation will occur;

(C) Term of the project in fiscal years across all biennia to reflect the start of the project through the end of the project;

(D) Total project cost from start date through end date in total dollars, and a subtotal of near general fund outlook;

(E) Estimated annual fiscal year cost for maintenance and operations after implementation and close out;

(F) Actual spend by fiscal year and in total for fiscal years that are closed; and

(G) Date a feasibility study was completed.

(ii) The office of the chief information officer may recommend additional elements be included but must have agreement with legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management prior to including the additional elements.

(c) The agency must ensure timely posting of project data on the information technology dashboard for at least each project funded in the budget to include, at a minimum, posting on the new dashboard:

(i) The budget funded level by project for each project within thirty calendar days of the budget being signed into law;

(ii) The project historical expenditures through fiscal year 2019, by June 30, 2020, for all projects that started prior to July 1, 2019; and

(iii) Whether each project has completed a feasibility study, by June 30, 2020.

(2) $12,751,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security. Of this amount:

(a) $800,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the computer emergency readiness to review security designs of computer systems and to complete security evaluations of state agency systems and applications to identify vulnerabilities and opportunities for system hardening.

(b) $768,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security to decrypt network traffic to identify and evaluate network traffic for malicious activity and threats, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(c) $608,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security to complete cyber security designs for new platforms, databases, and applications.

(3) The consolidated technology services agency shall work with customer agencies using the Washington state electronic records vault (WASERV) to identify opportunities to:

(a) Reduce storage volumes and costs associated with vault records stored beyond the agencies' record retention schedules; and

(b) Assess a customized service charge as defined in chapter 304, Laws of 2017 for costs of using WASERV to prepare data compilations in response to public records requests.

(4)(a) In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures must include the following:

(i) The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request;

(ii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the current biennium;

(iii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the ensuing biennium;

(iv) The estimated total cost for the current and ensuing biennium;

(v) The total cost by fiscal year, by fund, and in total, of the information technology project since it began;

(vi) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund over all biennia through implementation and close out and into maintenance and operations;

(vii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for service level agreements once the project is implemented;

(viii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for agency staffing for maintenance and operations once the project is implemented; and

(ix) The expected fiscal year when the agency expects to complete the request.

(b) The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

(5) The consolidated technology services agency must not increase fees charged for existing services without prior approval by the office of financial management. The agency may develop fees to recover the actual cost of new infrastructure to support increased use of cloud technologies.

(6) Within existing resources, the agency must provide oversight of state procurement and contracting for information technology goods and services by the department of enterprise services.

(7) Within existing resources, the agency must host, administer, and support the state employee directory in an online format to provide public employee contact information.

(8) (($1,524,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—non-appropriated is provided solely to the))The logging and monitoring project ((and)) is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(9) $750,000 of the ((general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020))consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided for the office to conduct a statewide cloud computing readiness assessment to prepare for the migration of core services to cloud services, including ways it can leverage cloud computing to reduce costs. The assessment must:

(a) Inventory state agency assets, associated service contracts, and other relevant information;

(b) Identify impacts to state agency staffing resulting from the migration to cloud computing including:

(i) Skill gaps between current on-premises computing practices and how cloud services are procured, secured, administered, maintained, and developed; and

(ii) Necessary retraining and ongoing training and development to ensure state agency staff maintain the skills necessary to effectively maintain information security and understand changes to enterprise architectures;

(c) Identify additional resources needed by the agency to enable sufficient cloud migration support to state agencies; and

(d) Be submitted as a report, by June 30, 2020, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that summarizes statewide cloud migration readiness and makes recommendations for migration goals.

(10) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the coalition's plan for projects affecting the coalition organizations. The report must include any information technology projects impacting coalition organizations and, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, provide: (a) The status of any information technology projects currently being developed or implemented that affect the coalition; (b) funding needs of these current and future information technology projects; and (c) next steps for the coalition's information technology projects. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(11) $1,997,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for delivery of information technology services tailored to the needs of small agencies.

Sec. 149. 2019 c 415 s 153 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF REGISTRATION OF PROFESSIONAL ENGINEERS AND LAND SURVEYORS

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,863,000))

$5,528,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,863,000))

$5,528,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $4,172,000 of the professional engineers' account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1176 (businesses and professions). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 150. 2019 c 415 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS' AND FIREFIGHTERS' PLAN 2 RETIREMENT BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$50,000

Law Enforcement Officers' and Firefighters' Plan 2

Expense Nonappropriated Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$100,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The $50,000 general fund—state appropriation in this section is for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board to study the tax, legal, fiscal, policy, and administrative issues related to allowing tribal law enforcement officers to become members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement system. This funding is in addition to other expenditures in the nonappropriated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 expense account. In preparing this study, the department of retirement systems, the attorney general's office, and the office of the state actuary shall provide the board with any information or assistance the board requests. The board shall also receive stakeholder input as part of its deliberation. The board shall submit a report of the results of this study to the legislature by January 1, 2020.

(2) $50,000 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense nonappropriated fund—state appropriation is provided solely for a study of the pension benefits provided to emergency medical technicians providing services in King county between October 1, 1978 and January 1, 2003. The board shall examine the legal and fiscal implications of extending membership in the plan for these periods, including King county employers that might be included, the benefits that would be paid to members on a prospective and retroactive basis, and the contribution requirements and plan liability that would be created for employers, employees, and the state.

(End of part)

PART II

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 201. 2019 c 415 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.

(7) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the coalition's plan for projects affecting the coalition organizations. The report must include any information technology projects impacting coalition organizations and, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, provide: (a) The status of any information technology projects currently being developed or implemented that affect the coalition; (b) funding needs of these current and future information technology projects; and (c) next steps for the coalition's information technology projects. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(8)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2020, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2020 from sections 202 and 204 through 209 of this act to the developmental disability programs and subprograms in section 203 of this act after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

Sec. 202. 2019 c 415 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($400,740,000))

$422,276,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($417,578,000))

$470,876,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($117,745,000))

$91,421,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,800,000))

$26,965,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$33,300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($997,163,000))

$1,044,838,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b) are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community service officer at the city of Lakewood. The department must collect data from the city of Lakewood on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.

(c) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(d) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas. The city must submit a proposal to the department for a community policing program for eastern state hospital and adjacent areas by September 30, 2019.

(e) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to hire an on-site safety compliance officer, stationed at Western State Hospital, to provide oversight and accountability of the hospital's response to safety concerns regarding the hospital's work environment.

(f) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to track compliance with RCW 71.05.365 requirements for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within fourteen days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must use these funds to track the following elements related to this requirement: (i) The date on which an individual is determined to no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (ii) the date on which the behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services for the person is notified of this determination; and (iii) the date on which either the individual is transitioned to the community or has been re-evaluated and determined to again require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must provide this information in regular intervals to behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services. The department must summarize the information and provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress toward meeting the fourteen day standard by December 1, 2019 and December 1, 2020.

(g) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.

(i) The predictive modeling tool must be developed to leverage data from a variety of sources and identify factors that are strongly associated with future criminal justice involvement. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which describes the following: (A) The proposed data sources to be used in the predictive model and how privacy issues will be addressed; (B) modeling results including a description of measurable factors most strongly predictive of risk of future criminal justice involvement; (C) an assessment of the accuracy, timeliness, and potential effectiveness of the tool; (D) identification of interventions and strategies that can be effective in reducing future criminal justice involvement of high risk patients; and (E) the timeline for implementing processes to provide monthly lists of high-risk client to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health entities.

(ii) The model for civil and forensic state hospital bed need must be developed and updated in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities, which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for predicting the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. Factors should include identification of need for the services and analysis of the effect of community investments in behavioral health services and other types of beds that may reduce the need for long-term civil commitment needs. The department must submit a report to the legislature by October 1, 2019, with an update of the model and the estimated civil and forensic state hospital bed need by November 1, 2020, and each November 1st thereafter through the end of fiscal year 2027. The department must continue to update the model on a calendar quarterly basis and provide updates to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature accordingly.

(h) (($2,982,000))$2,097,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($2,199,000))3,084,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(i) $6,450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to maintain and further increase implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5889) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to maintain increases in the number of competency evaluators that began in fiscal year 2016 and further increase the number of staff providing competency evaluation services. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must use a portion of these amounts to increase the number of forensic evaluators pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(j) $56,441,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $63,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $2,127,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5889) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). These amounts must be used to maintain increases that began in fiscal year 2016 and further increase the number of forensic beds at western state hospital and eastern state hospital. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (2E2SSB 5177) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must use a portion of these amounts to increase forensic bed capacity at the state hospitals pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(k) (($67,463,000))$86,601,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($67,463,000))$86,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to continue to implement an acuity based staffing tool at western state hospital and eastern state hospital in collaboration with the hospital staffing committees. ((Of the amounts provided in each fiscal year, $33,102,000 is provided on a one-time basis.))

(i) The staffing tool must be designed and implemented to identify, on a daily basis, the clinical acuity on each patient ward and determine the minimum level of direct care staff by profession to be deployed to meet the needs of the patients on each ward. The department must also continue to update, in collaboration with the office of financial management's labor relations office, the staffing committees, and state labor unions, an overall state hospital staffing plan that looks at all positions and functions of the facilities and that is informed by a review of the Oregon state hospital staffing model.

(ii) Within these amounts, the department must establish, monitor, track, and report monthly staffing and expenditures at the state hospitals, including overtime and use of locums, to the functional categories identified in the recommended staffing plan. The allotments and tracking of staffing and expenditures must include all areas of the state hospitals, must be done at the ward level, and must include contracted facilities providing forensic restoration services as well as the office of forensic mental health services. By December 1, 2019, the department and hospital staffing committees must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes the following: (A) Progress in implementing the acuity based staffing tool; (B) a comparison of average monthly staffing expenditures to budgeted staffing levels and to the recommended state hospital staffing plan by function and at the ward level; and (C) metrics and facility performance for the use of overtime and extra duty pay, patient length of stay, discharge management, active treatment planning, medication administration, patient and staff aggression, and staff recruitment and retention. The department must use information gathered from implementation of the clinical staffing tool and the hospital-wide staffing model to provide budget oversight and accountability and inform and prioritize future budget requests for staffing at the state hospitals.

(iii) The department must submit calendar quarterly reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that include monitoring of monthly spending, staffing levels, overtime and use of locums compared to allotments and to the recommended state hospital staffing model. The format for these reports must be developed in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The reports must include an update from the hospital staffing committees.

(iv) Monthly staffing levels and related expenditures at the state hospitals must not exceed official allotments without prior written approval from the director of the office of financial management. In the event the director of the office of financial management approves an increase in monthly staffing levels and expenditures beyond what is budgeted, notice must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature within thirty days of such approval. The notice must identify the reason for the authorization to exceed budgeted staffing levels and the time frame for the authorization. Extensions of authorizations under this subsection must also be submitted to the director of the office of financial management for written approval in advance of the expiration of an authorization. The office of financial management must notify the appropriate committees of the legislature of any extensions of authorizations granted under this subsection within thirty days of granting such authorizations and identify the reason and time frame for the extension.

(l) $11,285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,581,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to implement strategies to improve patient and staff safety at eastern and western state hospitals. These amounts must be used for implementing a new intensive care model program at western state hospital. Remaining amounts may be used for enclosure of nursing stations, increasing the number of security guards, and provision of training on patient and staff safety. The department must provide implementation reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature as follows:

(i) A report must be submitted by December 1, 2019, which includes a description of the intensive care model being implemented, a profile of the types of patients being served at the program, the staffing model being used for the program, and preliminary information on outcomes associated with the program. The outcomes section should include tracking data on facility wide metrics related to patient and staff safety as well as individual outcomes related to the patients served on the unit.

(ii) A report must be submitted by December 1, 2020, which provides an update on the implementation of the intensive care model, any changes that have occurred, and updated information on the outcomes associated with implementation of the program.

(m) $4,262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $2,144,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to open a new unit at the child study treatment center which shall serve up to eighteen children.

(n) $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to increase services to patients found not guilty by reason of insanity under the Ross v. Laswhay settlement agreement.

(o) $870,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to hire four ward psychologists and one director of psychology for eastern state hospital.

(p) $1,660,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to repair, replace, or upgrade failing infrastructure at western and eastern state hospitals.

(q) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a cost of living adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

(r) $2,888,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,888,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to continue implementing an electronic health record (EHR) system that meets federal criteria for electronic sharing of records at the state psychiatric hospitals. The department shall review its current implementation status and provide a report to the legislature no later than October 20, 2020, detailing its plan and timeline to complete the electronic health record project.

(2) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($5,884,000))

$5,812,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($5,763,000))

$5,656,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$315,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,962,000))

$11,783,000

Sec. 203. 2019 c 415 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this section. However, after May 1, 2020, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2020 among programs and subprograms of this section after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2020 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the developmental disabilities program, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(((1)))(2) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($737,825,000))

$732,559,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($803,041,000))

$813,777,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,591,789,000))

$1,583,260,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$4,024,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,364,000

Developmental Disability Community Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,143,043,000))

$3,140,984,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 must be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(c) $7,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $16,092,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $29,989,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(d) $1,058,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,203,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(e) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(f) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.

(g) $1,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,688,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,465,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and implementation of thirteen enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her family home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report in January of each year that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(h) $2,025,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,006,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the development and implementation of thirteen community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January of each year that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(i) $4,005,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $6,084,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $9,826,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(i) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.

(ii) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (i)(i) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(iii) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (i)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(iv) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(j) $1,029,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for state-operated behavioral health group training homes for clients with developmental disabilities who require a short-term placement for crisis stabilization following a hospital stay. The developmental disabilities administration shall research and assess options to claim federal medicaid funds for state-operated behavioral health group training homes and report its findings to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2019.

(k) $605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,797,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for expanding the number of clients receiving services under the basic plus medicaid waiver. Approximately three hundred fifty additional clients are anticipated to graduate from high school during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium and will receive employment services under this expansion.

(l) $20,243,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($41,933,000))$46,803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and (($60,976,000))$65,719,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for community residential service providers offering supported living, group home, and licensed staff residential services to individuals with development disabilities. The amounts in this subsection (1)(l) include funding to increase the rate by 13.5 percent effective January 1, 2020 and by 3.0 percent effective January 1, 2021.

The amounts provided in this subsection must be used to improve the recruitment and retention of quality direct care staff to better protect the health and safety of clients with developmental disabilities.

(((n)))(m) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to establish parent-to-parent programs for parents of children with developmental disabilities in Ferry, Pend Oreille, Stevens, San Juan, and Wahkiakum counties.

(((o)))(n) $401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $424,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,043,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to assist home care agencies with implementing electronic visit verification systems that are compliant with the federal 21st century cures act no later than January 1, 2020.

(((p)))(o) $3,626,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $4,757,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $10,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(((q)))(p) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $62,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to begin implementing an asset verification system that is compliant with the federal medicaid extenders act by January 1, 2021 and is subject to the conditions, limitation, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(((r)))(q) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $23,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 70, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1199).

(((s)))(r) $153,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $643,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for assisted living facility providers consistent with chapter 225, Laws of 2018 (SHB 2515) and for a rate add-on to providers that serve sixty percent or more medicaid clients.

(((t)))(s) $193,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $654,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a ten percent rate increase, effective January 1, 2020, for nurse delegation, private duty nursing, and supported living nursing services.

(((u)))(t) $3,490,000 of the general fund—local appropriation and $3,490,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5359 (residential services and supports). The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $847 per client in fiscal year 2020 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2021. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(w)))(u) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5672 (adult family hopes specialty services).

(((y)))(v) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $195,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(((z)))(w) $4,886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $7,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $11,894,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to complete the three-year phase in of forty-seven clients from residential habilitation centers to state operated living alternatives.

(((aa)))(x) $2,279,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,279,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,558,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for additional staffing resources for the transition of clients living in the intermediate care facilities at Rainier school, Fircrest school, and Lakeland village to state operated living alternatives to address deficiencies identified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(((bb)))(y) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $54,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $134,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by five cents per hour effective July 1, 2019.

(((cc)))(z) $1,798,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,422,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,219,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for state-operated living alternative homes.

(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $480,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $646,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,125,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to place residents in transition from the Rainier PAT A intermediate care facility.

(ii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $420,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $565,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $985,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to place developmental disability administration clients upon discharge from a hospital stay when the clients' previous providers are unable to manage the clients' care needs.

(aa) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $120,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6419 (habilitation center clients). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(bb) $145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,210,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6040 (developmental disability budgeting). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(cc) $4,228,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $4,294,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6275 (postacute care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(dd) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $4,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a cost of living adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

(((2)))(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($119,201,000))

$119,274,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($120,511,000))

$120,936,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($233,122,000))

$233,584,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$27,041,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,396,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($511,271,000))

$512,231,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(c) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(d) $830,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $135,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the loss of federal revenue and the transition of residents due to the decertification of the Rainier school PAT A intermediate care facility by the centers for medicare and medicaid services in calendar year 2019. It is the intent of the legislature that the developmental disabilities administration complete the transitions of Rainier PAT A residents by September 2019.

(e) $3,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $3,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $6,910,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for additional staffing resources for clients living in the intermediate care facilities at Rainier school, Fircrest school, and Lakeland village to address deficiencies identified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and to gather information for the 2020 legislative session that will support appropriate levels of care for residential habilitation center clients.

(i) The department of social and health services must contract with the William D. Ruckelshaus center or other neutral third party to continue the facilitation of meetings and discussions about how to support appropriate levels of care for residential habilitation center clients based on the clients' needs and ages. The options explored in the meetings and discussions must include, but are not limited to, the longer-term issues identified in the January 2019 report to the legislature, including shifting care and staffing needs, crisis stabilization, alternative uses of residential habilitation center campus, and transforming adult family homes. An agreed-upon preferred longer term vision must be included within a report to the office of financial management and appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature before December 1, 2019. The report must describe the policy rationale, implementation plan, timeline, and recommended statutory changes for the preferred long-term vision.

(ii) The parties invited to participate in the meetings and discussions must include:

(A) One member from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate, who shall be appointed by the majority leader and minority leader of the senate;

(B) One member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives, who shall be appointed by the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives;

(C) One member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(D) One member from the developmental disabilities council;

(E) One member from the ARC of Washington;

(F) One member from the Washington federation of state employees;

(G) One member from the service employees international union 1199;

(H) One member from the developmental disabilities administration within the department of social and health services;

(I) One member from the aging and long term support administration within the department of social and health services; and

(J) Two members who are family members or guardians of current residential habilitation center residents.

(K) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the department of social and health services.

(((3)))(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,558,000))

$2,536,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,660,000))

$2,638,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,080,000))

$3,202,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$270,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,568,000))

$8,646,000

(((4)))(5) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$62,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$62,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,092,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,220,000

Sec. 204. 2019 c 415 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($1,313,688,000))

$1,321,003,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,454,323,000))

$1,485,096,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,465,113,000))

$3,483,803,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($37,765,000))

$37,687,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,558,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$133,360,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,392,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,437,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($6,423,636,000))

$6,480,336,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate may not exceed $220.37 for fiscal year 2020 and may not exceed (($251.49))$241.78 for fiscal year 2021.

(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(2) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(3) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state-only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(4) $1,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding must be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.

(5) $15,748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $33,024,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $62,298,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(6) $6,320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $13,142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $24,768,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(7) $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.

(8) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(9) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $900 for each facility.

(10) $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the kinship navigator program in the Colville Indian reservation, Yakama Nation, and other tribal areas.

(11) Within available funds, the aging and long term support administration must maintain a unit within adult protective services that specializes in the investigation of financial abuse allegations and self-neglect allegations.

(12) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department shall assist the legislature to continue the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues.

(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is continued, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, and four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;

(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;

(v) A member from disability rights Washington and a member from the office of long-term care ombuds;

(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and

(vii) Other agency directors or designees as necessary.

(b) The committee must make recommendations and continue to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington, including state budget and policy options, and may conduct, but are not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities to promote healthy living and palliative care planning;

(ii) Identify strategies and policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term service and supports that allow individuals and families to meet their needs for service;

(iii) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans;

(iv) Identify ways to promote advance planning and advance care directives and implementation strategies for the Bree collaborative palliative care and related guidelines;

(v) Identify ways to meet the needs of the aging demographic impacted by reduced federal support;

(vi) Identify ways to protect the rights of vulnerable adults through assisted decision-making and guardianship and other relevant vulnerable adult protections;

(vii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation; and

(viii) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation.

(c) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.

(d) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. Meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the rules of both the senate and the house of representatives. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(13) $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $630,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(14) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $270,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for financial service specialists stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Financial service specialists will help to transition clients ready for hospital discharge into alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state hospitals.

(15)(a) No more than $102,880,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care described in initiative 2 of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures on this initiative. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the health care authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) No more than $2,525,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the department and the health care authority shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its providers third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes.

The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(16) $13,303,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $15,891,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $36,390,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(17) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $80,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department, in partnership with the department of health and the health care authority, to assist a collaborative public-private entity with implementation of recommendations in the state plan to address alzheimer's disease and other dementias.

(18) $428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($446,000))$1,902,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and (($896,000))$2,379,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for case managers at the area agencies on aging to coordinate care for medicaid clients with mental illness who are living in their own homes. Work shall be accomplished within existing standards for case management and no requirements will be added or modified unless by mutual agreement between the department of social and health services and area agencies on aging.

(19) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $116,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with an organization to provide educational materials, legal services, and attorney training to support persons with dementia. The funding provided in this subsection must be used for:

(a) An advance care and legal planning toolkit for persons and families living with dementia, designed and made available online and in print. The toolkit should include educational topics including, but not limited to:

(i) The importance of early advance care, legal, and financial planning;

(ii) The purpose and application of various advance care, legal, and financial documents;

(iii) Dementia and capacity;

(iv) Long-term care financing considerations;

(v) Elder and vulnerable adult abuse and exploitation;

(vi) Checklists such as "legal tips for caregivers," "meeting with an attorney," and "life and death planning;"

(vii) Standardized forms such as general durable power of attorney forms and advance health care directives; and

(viii) A selected list of additional resources.

(b) Webinars about the dementia legal and advance care planning toolkit and related issues and topics with subject area experts. The subject area expert presenters must provide their services in-kind, on a volunteer basis.

(c) Continuing legal education programs for attorneys to advise and assist persons with dementia. The continuing education programs must be offered at no cost to attorneys who make a commitment to participate in the pro bono program.

(d) Administrative support costs to develop intake forms and protocols, perform client intake, match participating attorneys with eligible clients statewide, maintain records and data, and produce reports as needed.

(20) $18,000 of the traumatic brain injury account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1532 (domestic violence TBIs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(21) $543,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $543,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to begin implementing an asset verification system that is compliant with the federal medicaid extenders act by January 1, 2021 and is subject to the conditions, limitation, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a feasibility study of information technology solutions for an asset verification system. The feasibility study shall consider the department's existing case management systems that may be required to interface with the asset verification system. The department shall work with the health care authority to develop a long-term strategy for an asset verification system that complies with federal requirements, maximizes efficient use of staff time, supports accurate client financial eligibility determinations, and incorporates relevant findings from the feasibility study, and shall report its findings and recommendation to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than December 1, 2019.

(22) $2,437,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1087 (long-term services and support). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $217,000 is provided solely for a contract with the state actuary. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(23) $2,373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,459,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $6,215,000 of the general fund-federal appropriation are provided solely to assist home care agencies with implementing electronic visit verification systems that are compliant with the federal 21st century cures act no later than January 1, 2020.

(24) $727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $2,469,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a ten percent rate increase, effective January 1, 2020, for in-home skilled nursing services, nurse delegation, in-home private duty nursing, and adult family home private duty nursing.

(25) $3,353,000 of the general fund—local appropriation and $1,055,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5359 (residential services and supports). The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $847 per client in fiscal year 2020 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2021. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(26) $17,481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $28,471,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $41,031,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(a) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, assisted living facility beds, and specialized dementia beds.

(b) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(c) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(d) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(27) $1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the kinship care support program.

(28) $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $794,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by five cents per hour effective July 1, 2019.

(29) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to establish a pilot project to provide personal care services to homeless seniors and persons with disabilities from the time the person presents at a shelter to the time the person becomes eligible for medicaid personal care services.

(a) The department shall contract with a single nonprofit organization that provides personal care services to homeless persons and operates a twenty-four hour homeless shelter, and that is currently partnering with the department to bring medicaid personal care services to homeless seniors and persons with disabilities.

(b) The department shall submit a report by December 1, 2020, to the governor and appropriate legislative committees. The report shall address findings and outcomes of the pilot and recommendations.

(((31)))(30) $3,669,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $8,543,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $15,434,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for assisted living facility providers consistent with chapter 225, Laws of 2018 (SHB 2515) and to provide a rate add-on to providers that serve sixty percent or more ((medicare))medicaid clients.

(((32)))(31) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $750,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for adult day health and adult day care providers effective July 1, 2019.

(((33)))(32) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5672 (adult family homes specialty services).

(33) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $76,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6205 (long-term care workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(34) $4,253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $4,253,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6275 (postacute care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(35) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $12,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a cost of living adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

(36) $2,509,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $21,654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $24,163,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for inflationary adjustments to the direct care and indirect care components of the medicaid daily rates for skilled nursing facilities. These rates shall be adjusted for inflation from the midpoint of the base year to the beginning of the rate year using the most recent calendar year twelve-month average consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) in the medical expenditure category of nursing homes and adult day services as published by the United States bureau of labor statistics. The department shall review the calendar year cost reports from 2018 through 2021 and compare medicaid allowable costs in direct care and indirect care to rates paid to determine the impacts of these inflationary adjustments. Based on its findings, the department shall make recommendations for ongoing inflation to the legislature. This report is due to appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

Sec. 205. 2019 c 415 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($362,649,000))

$353,983,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($365,538,000))

$362,815,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,453,819,000))

$1,460,078,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,416,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,404,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,754,000))

$26,349,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,220,580,000))

$2,215,045,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) (($77,346,000))$67,875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($74,058,000))$69,011,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, (($808,761,000))$835,701,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $4,000,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation, and (($5,662,000))$5,585,000 of the pension funding stabilization account—state appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.

(b)(i) (($266,668,000))$266,825,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, ((and)) additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210, and eliminating the supplied shelter grant standard for the temporary assistance for needy families and state family assistance programs. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance.

(ii) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $1,213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $989,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1603 (economic assistance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(iii) Of the amount in (b) of this subsection, $845,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6478 (economic assistance programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(c)(i) (($158,316,000))$155,738,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures. Within amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), the department shall implement the working family support program.

(ii) $2,430,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c) is for enhanced transportation assistance. The department must prioritize the use of these funds for the recipients most in need of financial assistance to facilitate their return to work. The department must not utilize these funds to supplant repayment arrangements that are currently in place to facilitate the reinstatement of drivers' licenses.

(iii) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $649,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1603 (economic assistance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(iv) Of the amount in (b) of this subsection, $116,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6478 (economic assistance programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d)(((i))) $353,402,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020 within the department of children, youth, and families. The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal temporary assistance for needy families grant. A portion of this grant must be used to fund child care subsidies expenditures at the department of children, youth, and families. The department shall work in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type including the child care development fund, general fund—state, and the temporary assistance for needy families grant for the purpose of estimating the monthly temporary assistance for needy families grant reimbursement.

(e) $68,496,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families.

(f)(i) (($122,945,000))$137,710,000 of the amounts in (1)(a) of this section is for WorkFirst administration and overhead.

(ii) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $218,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1603 (economic assistance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(iii) Of the amount in (b) of this subsection, $562,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6478 (economic assistance programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g) The amounts in subsections (1)(b) through (e) of this section shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified. However, the department may transfer up to ten percent of funding between subsections (1)(b) through (f) of this section. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.

(h) Each calendar quarter, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:

(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;

(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;

(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;

(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;

(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort;

(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements; and

(vii) Proposed and enacted federal law changes affecting maintenance of effort or the participation rate, what impact these changes have on Washington's temporary assistance for needy families program, and the department's plan to comply with these changes.

(j) In the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to provide appropriations from the state general fund for the purposes of (b) through (f) of this subsection if the department does not receive additional federal temporary assistance for needy families contingency funds in each fiscal year as assumed in the budget outlook.

(2) $2,545,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On January 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be one hundred percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(7) $3,682,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $10,333,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the continuation of the ESAR project and ((are))implementation of a disaster recovery plan. The funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(8) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

(9) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.

(10) (($996,000))$748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($775,000))$277,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to ((begin implementing))implement an asset verification system that is compliant with the federal medicaid extenders act by January 1, 2021 and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(11) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department must conduct a comprehensive study of the WorkFirst transportation pilot. The department must submit a report by November 1, 2020, to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees that includes a cost benefit analysis of the transportation pilot. At a minimum, the report must include the total annual cost of the pilot since implementation, total annual number of clients accessing transportation services through the pilot, impacts to sanctions and the participation rate, employment outcomes, caseload impacts, department recommendations, and lessons learned.

(12) $2,506,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $44,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to eliminate the supplied shelter grant standard for the pregnant women assistance, refugee cash assistance, and the aged, blind, or disabled assistance programs.

(13) $211,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute Senate Bill No. 5164 (trafficking victims assist.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $23,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6128 (postpartum period/medicaid). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $1,121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,107,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5144 (child support pass-through). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a cost of living adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

Sec. 206. 2019 c 415 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($16,656,000))

$16,663,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($17,605,000))

$17,613,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($109,571,000))

$109,595,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,024,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($145,856,000))

$145,895,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of social and health services vocational rehabilitation program shall participate in the development of an implementation plan to build statewide capacity among school districts to improve transition planning for students in special education who meet criteria for services from the developmental disabilities administration, pursuant to section 501(3)(c) of this act.

(2) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for supported employment services for additional eligible clients with the most significant disabilities who would otherwise be placed on the federally required order of selection waiting list.

Sec. 207. 2019 c 415 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($53,965,000))

$52,711,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($54,800,000))

$53,947,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,580,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($113,345,000))

$111,238,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(2) $705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $784,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to expand its King county secure transition facility from six beds to twelve beds beginning January 1, 2020.

(3) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $210,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to hire staff to provide medical transportation and hospital watch services for individuals in need of medical care outside the main facility.

(4) $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to hire an administrator to coordinate siting efforts for new secure community transition facilities to house individuals transitioning to the community from the main facility.

Sec. 208. 2019 c 415 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($31,403,000))

$31,806,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($32,427,000))

$36,873,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($44,592,000))

$48,143,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,044,000))

$6,449,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($114,466,000))

$123,271,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2020, and February 1, 2021. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(2) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $142,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(3) $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $9,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Fourth Substitute Senate Bill No. 5533 (parental improvement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 209. 2019 c 415 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($36,426,000))

$36,465,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($38,154,000))

$38,236,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($41,143,000))

$41,199,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($115,723,000))

$115,900,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must extend master property insurance to all buildings owned by the department valued over $250,000 and to all locations leased by the department with contents valued over $250,000.

(2) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 210. 2019 c 415 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.

Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the coalition's plan for projects affecting the coalition organizations. The report must include any information technology projects impacting coalition organizations and, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, provide: (1) The status of any information technology projects currently being developed or implemented that affect the coalition; (2) funding needs of these current and future information technology projects; and (3) next steps for the coalition's information technology projects. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

Sec. 211. 2019 c 415 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,281,076,000))

$2,377,737,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,325,882,000))

$2,534,104,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,597,642,000))

$12,444,701,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($285,918,000))

$280,764,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,086,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($721,718,000))

$715,909,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,364,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($18,951,000))

$20,902,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($19,341,000))

$21,084,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,544,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$538,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($17,281,060,000))

$18,425,733,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The authority shall not accept or expend any federal funds received under a medicaid transformation waiver under healthier Washington except as described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section until specifically approved and appropriated by the legislature. To ensure compliance with legislative directive budget requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the innovation waiver requires better analytic capability, transparency, consistency, timeliness, accuracy, and lack of redundancy with other established measures and that the patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. In order to effectuate these goals, the authority shall: (a) Require the Dr. Robert Bree collaborative and the health technology assessment program to reduce the administrative burden upon providers by only requiring performance measures that are nonduplicative of other nationally established measures. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen by the collaborative and the health technology assessment program for effectiveness and appropriateness; (b) develop a patient satisfaction survey with the goal to gather information about whether it was beneficial for the patient to use the center of excellence location in exchange for additional out-of-pocket savings; (c) ensure patients and health care providers have significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver, in order to ensure improved patient health outcomes; and (d) in cooperation with the department of social and health services, consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget, to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting waivers for federal approval. By federal standard, the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver shall not exceed the duration originally granted by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement. Beginning May 15, 2019, and continuing through December 15, 2019, by the 15th of each month, the director in consultation with the secretary shall report to the fiscal chair of the appropriate committees of the legislature in the manner and form requested the status of the medicaid transformation waiver, including any anticipated or proposed changes to accruals or expenditures.

(2) No more than (($305,659,000))$236,792,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than (($157,284,000))$169,627,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for transformation through accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the medicaid transformation demonstration wavier under healthier Washington, including preventing youth drug use, opioid prevention and treatment, and physical and behavioral health integration. Under this initiative, the authority shall take into account local input regarding community needs. In order to ensure transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees. By December 15, 2019, the authority in collaboration with each accountable community of health shall demonstrate how it will be self-sustaining by the end of the demonstration waiver period, including sources of outside funding, and provide this reporting to the joint select committee on health care oversight. If by the third year of the demonstration waiver there are not measurable, improved patient outcomes and financial returns, the Washington state institute for public policy will conduct an audit of the accountable communities of health, in addition to the process set in place through the independent evaluation required by the agreement with centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(3)(a) No more than $79,829,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third party administrator. The authority and the department in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) No more than $68,867,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for the medicaid quality improvement program. Under federal regulations, the medicaid quality improvement program is authorized and allows states to design quality improvement programs for the medicaid population in ways that support the state's quality goals. Medicaid quality improvement program payments will not count against initiative 1 of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver spending limit and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation. Apple health managed care organizations and their partnering providers will receive medicaid quality improvement program payments as they meet designated milestones. Partnering providers and apple health managed care organizations will work together to achieve medicaid quality improvement program goals according to the performance period timelines and reporting deadlines as set forth by the authority. The authority shall only utilize the medicaid quality improvement program to support the transformation waiver and shall not pursue its use for other purposes. Any programs created or funded by the medicaid quality improvement program do not create an entitlement. The authority shall not increase general fund—state, federal, or local expenditures under this program. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight not less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(4) Annually, no later than November 1st, the authority shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature: (a) Savings attributed to behavioral and physical integration in areas that are scheduled to integrate in the following calendar year, and (b) savings attributed to behavioral and physical health integration and the level of savings achieved in areas that have integrated behavioral and physical health.

(5) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).

(6) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(7) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(8) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(9) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(10) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(11) $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $8,522,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(13) (($6,000,000))(a) $7,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(b) The authority, in consultation with the department of social and health services and the nursing homes operated by public hospitals in subsection (a), must develop a plan with recommendations for an upper payment limit calculation and the supplemental payment model for nursing homes operated by a public hospital district. The group must consider how to restructure payments under subsection (a), taking into consideration alternate upper payment limit calculation. If upon completion of the plan, the authority determines it can implement the recommendations of the group within the amounts provided in subsection (a), the authority must submit a state plan amendment, if necessary, and submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than September 30, 2020.

(14) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2020, and by November 1, 2021, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2020 and fiscal year 2021, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2019-2021 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. (($537,000))$759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($522,000))$38,121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.

(15) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(16) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(17) The authority shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2020, and no later than September 15, 2021, that delineate the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The reports should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.

(18) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(19) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.

(20) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(21) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.

(22) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.

(23) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(25) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.

(26) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated marijuana fund for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fund—state payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(27) Beginning no later than January 1, 2018, for any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority.

(28) Sufficient funds are provided for the authority to remove payment and billing limitations identified during the review process required for implementation of chapter 226, Laws of 2017 (behavioral health care – primary care integration) for health and behavior codes, psychotherapy codes, and to continue to offer face-to-face tobacco cessation counseling only for pregnant individuals. Additional funding is provided to increase the rates for the health and behavior codes and psychotherapy codes identified through the stakeholder work group process required under chapter 226, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5779) by ten percent.

(29)(a) $34,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $5,898,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the compromise of claims in the reconciliation process for rural health clinics for the calendar years 2014-2017. The authority may not recover the state portion of rural health clinic reconciliations for calendar years 2014-2017 for which no state accrual was made. If the authority determines there are unliquidated prior period accrual balances available to refund the federal government for these years, these amounts must be used prior to the amounts provided in this subsection.

(b) By October 15, 2019, the authority shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature the status of rural health clinic reconciliations for calendar years 2011-2013, including any use of available unliquidated prior period accrual balances to refund the federal government for those calendar years. Additionally, the report shall include the status of rural health clinic reconciliations for calendar years 2014-2017, including anticipated amounts owed to or from rural health clinics from the reconciliation process for those fiscal years. The authority shall not recover the state portion of rural health reconciliations for calendar years 2011-2013 for which no general fund state accrual was made. The authority shall not pursue recoveries for calendar years 2014-2017 until after the legislature has an opportunity to take action during the 2020 legislative session. If the legislature does not take any action on rural health clinic reconciliations for calendar years 2014-2017, recoveries shall commence per administrative rule.

(c) Beginning with fiscal year 2020, and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with rural health centers.

(d) Beginning with fiscal year 2020, and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with rural health centers during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.

(30) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide a medicaid equivalent adult dental benefit to clients enrolled in the medical care service program.

(31) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Bree collaborative to support collaborative learning and targeted technical assistance for quality improvement initiatives. The collaborative must use these amounts to hire one full-time staff person to promote the adoption of Bree collaborative recommendations and to hold two conferences focused on the sharing of best implementation practices.

(32) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for maternity ((support)) services provided by doulas.

(33) The authority shall facilitate a home health work group consisting of home health provider associations, hospital associations, managed care organizations, the department of social and health services, and the department of health to develop a new medicaid payment methodology for home health services. The authority must submit a report with final recommendations and a proposed implementation timeline to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 30, 2019. The work group must consider the following when developing the new payment methodology:

(a) Reimbursement for telemedicine;

(b) Reimbursement for social work for clients with behavioral health needs;

(c) An additional add-on for services in rural or underserved areas;

(d) Quality metrics for home health providers serving medical assistance clients including reducing hospital readmission;

(e) The role of home health in caring for individuals with complex, physical, and behavioral health needs who are able to receive care in their own home, but are unable to be discharged from hospital settings; and

(f) Partnerships between home health and other community resources that enable individuals to be served in a cost-effective setting that also meets the individual's needs and preferences.

(34) $969,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,268,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to create and operate a tele-behavioral health video call center staffed by the University of Washington's department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences. The center must provide emergency department providers, primary care providers, and county and municipal correctional facility providers with on-demand access to psychiatric and substance use disorder clinical consultation. When clinically appropriate and technically feasible, the clinical consultation may also involve direct assessment of patients using tele-video technology. The center must be available from 8 a.m. to 5 p.m. in fiscal year 2020 and twenty-four hours a day in fiscal year 2021. Of the federal amounts provided in this subsection, $700,000 is from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant and is to support addiction medicine services through the call center.

(35) $300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant amount, is provided solely for medication interaction services through the Washington state poison center.

(36) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall review the current diagnosis-related group high outlier claim policies and examine the impact of increasing the current high outlier threshold. To the extent necessary, the authority shall seek actuarial support for this work. The authority must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2019, that:

(a) Outlines several options for increasing the threshold;

(b) Describes the impact of these options on hospitals, the state, and medicaid managed care organizations; and

(c) Identifies any technical challenge or limitations of changes to the threshold.

(37) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority to include allergen control bed and pillow covers as part of the durable medical equipment benefit for children with an asthma diagnosis enrolled in medical assistance programs.

(38) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to increase the hourly rate by ten percent for registered nurses and licensed practical nurses providing skilled nursing services for children who require medically intensive care in a home setting. This rate increase begins on January 1, 2020.

(39) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to increase the daily rate by ten percent for registered nurses and licensed practical nurses providing skilled nursing services to medically intensive children's program clients who reside in a group home setting. This rate increase begins on January 1, 2020.

(40) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5526 (individual health insurance market). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(41) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $181,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1199 (health care/disability). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(42) (($290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to))Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1224 (Rx drug cost transparency) with up to an additional year for initial reporting due within the 2019-2021 biennium. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(43) $1,053,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,222,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5741 (all payer claims database). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(44) $2,374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the kidney disease program.

(45) The authority shall work with the department of health, other state agencies, and other hepatitis C virus medication purchasers to establish a comprehensive procurement strategy. As part of this work, the authority shall estimate, by program, any savings that will result from lower medication costs. It is the intent of the legislature to evaluate reinvesting any savings to expand treatment for individuals enrolled in state covered groups and to further the public health elimination effort during the 2020 legislative session. By October 31, 2019, the authority and department shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature on:

(a) The progress of the procurement;

(b) The estimated savings resulting from lower medication costs;

(c) Funding needed for public health interventions to eliminate the hepatitis C virus;

(d) The current status of treatment; and

(e) A plan to implement the elimination effort.

(46) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $533,000 for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5274 (pacific islanders dental). Open enrollment periods and special enrollment periods must be consistent with the enrollment periods for the COFA medical program, through the health benefit exchange, and program administration must be consistent with the pacific islander medical program. The first open-enrollment period for the COFA dental program must begin no later than November 1, 2020. The dental services must be consistent with the adult medicaid dental coverage, including state payment of premiums, out-of-pocket costs for covered benefits under the qualified dental plan, and costs for noncovered qualified dental plan benefits consistent with, but not to exceed, the medicaid adult dental coverage. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(47) During the 2019-2021 biennium, sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to provide services identical to those services covered by the Washington state family planning waiver program as of August 2018 to individuals who:

(a) Are over nineteen years of age;

(b) Are at or below two hundred and sixty percent of the federal poverty level as established in WAC 182-505-0100;

(c) Are not covered by other public or private insurance; and

(d) Need family planning services and are not currently covered by or eligible for another medical assistance program for family planning.

(48) $282,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $754,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5415 (Indian health improvement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(49) $3,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to reimburse dental health aid therapists for services performed in tribal facilities for medicaid clients. The authority must leverage any federal funding that may become available as a result of appeal decisions from the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(50) Sufficient amounts are appropriated within this section for the authority to incorporate the expected outcomes and criteria to measure the performance of service coordination organizations as provided in chapter 70.320 RCW into contracts with managed care organizations that provide services to clients. The authority is directed to:

(a) Contract with an external quality improvement organization to annually analyze the performance of managed care organizations providing services to clients under this chapter based on seven performance measures. The analysis required under this subsection must:

(i) Measure managed care performance in four common measures across each managed care organization, including:

(A) At least one common measure must be weighted towards having the potential to impact managed care costs; and

(B) At least one common measure must be weighted towards population health management, as defined by the measure; and

(ii) Measure managed care performance in an additional three quality focus performance measures specific to a managed care organization. Quality focus performance measures chosen by the authority must:

(A) Be chosen from the statewide common measure set;

(B) Reflect specific measures where a managed care organization has poor performance; and

(C) Be substantive and clinically meaningful in promoting health status.

(b) By September 1, 2019, the authority shall set the four common measures to be analyzed across all managed care organizations.

(c) By September 1, 2019, the authority shall set three quality focus performance measures specific to each managed care organization. The authority must determine performance measures for each managed care organization based on the criteria established in (a)(ii) of this subsection.

(d) By September 15, 2019, and annually thereafter, the authority shall notify each managed care organization of the performance measures for the organization for the subsequent plan year.

(e) Beginning in plan year 2020, two percent of the total plan year funding appropriated to each managed care organization that provides services to clients under chapter 70.320 RCW shall be withheld. At least seventy-five percent of the withhold shall be held contingent on each managed care organization's performance on the seven performance measures identified in this section. Each managed care organization may earn back the annual withhold if the external quality improvement organization finds that the managed care organization:

(i) Made statistically significant improvement in the seven performance measures as compared to the preceding plan year; or

(ii) Scored in the top national medicaid quartile of the performance measures.

(f) The amount of withhold annually paid to each managed care organization shall be proportional to findings of statistically significant improvement or top national medicaid quartile scoring by a managed care organization.

(g) For no more than two of the four quality focus performance measures, the authority may use an alternate methodology to approximate top national medicaid quartile performance where top quartile performance data is unavailable.

(h) For the purposes of this subsection, "external quality improvement organization" means an organization that meets the competence and independence requirements under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.354, as it existed on the effective date of this section.

(51) $1,805,727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,876,135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the authority to implement the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report. The authority is directed to:

(a) Organize all program integrity activities into a centralized unit or under a common protocol addressing provider enrollment, fraud and abuse detection, investigations, and law enforcement referrals that is more reflective of industry standards;

(b) Ensure appropriate resources are dedicated to prevention, detection, investigation, and suspected provider fraud at both the authority and at contracted managed care organizations;

(c) Ensure all required federal regulations are being followed and are incorporated into managed care contracts;

(d) Directly audit managed care encounter data to identify fraud, waste, and abuse issues with managed care organization providers;

(e) Initiate data mining activities in order to identify fraud, waste, and abuse issues with manage care organization providers;

(f) Implement proactive data mining and routine audits of validated managed care encounter data;

(g) Assess liquidated damages to managed care organizations when fraud, waste, or abuse with managed care organization providers is identified;

(h) Require managed care organizations submit accurate reports on overpayments, including the prompt reporting of overpayments identified or recovered, specifying overpayments due to fraud, waste, or abuse;

(i) Implement processes to ensure integrity of data used for rate setting purposes;

(j) Refine payment suspension policies; and

(k) Ensure all federal database exclusion checks are performed at the appropriate intervals. The authority shall update managed care contracts as appropriate to reflect these requirements.

(52) $96,130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,476,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for fee-for-service dental services. The authority must provide these services through fee-for-service and may not proceed with either a carved-out or carved-in managed care dental option. Any contracts that have been procured or that are in the process of being procured shall not be entered into or implemented. By November 15, 2019, the authority shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature a plan to improve access to dental services for medicaid clients. This plan should address options for carve-in, carve-out, fee-for-service, and other models that would improve access and outcomes for adults and children. The plan should also include the cost for any options provided.

(53) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the authority must revise its agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(a) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(b) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(i) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(ii) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(iii) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(c) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the authority or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(d) The authority must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(54) The authority is prohibited to direct any funds to safe-injection sites for the illicit use of drugs.

(55) $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $7,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid to rural hospitals that meet the criteria in (a) through (d) of this subsection. Payments for state and federal medical assistance programs for services provided by such a hospital, regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, must be increased to one hundred fifty percent of the hospital's fee-for-service rates. The authority must discontinue this rate increase after June 30, 2021, and return to the payment levels and methodology for these hospitals that were in place as of January 1, 2018. Hospitals participating in the certified public expenditures program may not receive increased reimbursement for inpatient services. Hospitals qualifying for this rate increase must:

(a) Be certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013;

(b) Have had less than one hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011;

(c) Have a level III adult trauma service designation from the department of health as of January 1, 2014; and

(d) Be owned and operated by the state or a political subdivision.

(56) Within the amounts appropriated within this section the authority shall conduct an evaluation of purchasing arrangements and paid claims or encounter data for prescription drugs under managed care contracts for plan years 2017 and 2018 and compare these to contract purchasing agreements under the same years for the prescription drug consortium and identify any cost differences. The authority shall report its findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2019.

(57) The health care authority is directed to convene a work group on establishing a universal health care system in Washington. (($500,000))$338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((is))and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the health care authority to contract with one or more consultants to perform any actuarial and financial analyses necessary to develop options under (b)(vi) of this subsection.

(a) The work group must consist of a broad range of stakeholders with expertise in the health care financing and delivery system, including but not limited to:

(i) Consumers, patients, and the general public;

(ii) Patient advocates and community health advocates;

(iii) Large and small businesses with experience with large and small group insurance and self-insured models;

(iv) Labor, including experience with Taft-Hartley coverage;

(v) Health care providers that are self-employed and health care providers that are otherwise employed;

(vi) Health care facilities such as hospitals and clinics;

(vii) Health insurance carriers;

(viii) The Washington health benefit exchange and state agencies, including the office of financial management, the office of the insurance commissioner, the department of revenue, and the office of the state treasurer; and

(ix) Legislators from each caucus of the house of representatives and senate.

(b) The work group must study and make recommendations to the legislature on how to create, implement, maintain, and fund a universal health care system that may include publicly funded, publicly administered, and publicly and privately delivered health care that is sustainable and affordable to all Washington residents including, but not limited to:

(i) Options for increasing coverage and access for uninsured and underinsured populations;

(ii) Transparency measures across major health system actors, including carriers, hospitals, and other health care facilities, pharmaceutical companies, and provider groups that promote understanding and analyses to best manage and lower costs;

(iii) Innovations that will promote quality, evidence-based practices leading to sustainability, and affordability in a universal health care system. When studying innovations under this subsection, the work group must develop recommendations on issues related to covered benefits and quality assurance and consider expanding and supplementing the work of the Robert Bree collaborative and the health technology assessment program;

(iv) Options for ensuring a just transition to a universal health care system for all stakeholders including, but not limited to, consumers, businesses, health care providers and facilities, hospitals, health carriers, state agencies, and entities representing both management and labor for these stakeholders;

(v) Options to expand or establish health care purchasing in collaboration with neighboring states; and

(vi) Options for revenue and financing mechanisms to fund the universal health care system. The work group shall contract with one or more consultants to perform any actuarial and financial analyses necessary to develop options under this subsection.

(c) The work group must report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2020. Preliminary reports with findings and preliminary recommendations shall be made public and open for public comment by November 15, 2019, and May 15, 2020.

(58) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $36,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(59) $1,667,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $855,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,867,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the Washington rural health access preservation pilot program.

(60) The health care authority shall submit a state plan amendment to the centers for medicare and medicaid services to maintain children's health insurance program coverage as secondary payer for eligible child dependents of employees eligible for school employee or public employee benefit coverage. The intent of the legislature for this option is to provide children the best access to health care coverage while prioritizing efficient use of state funds. No later than October 15, 2020, the authority shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on the status of the state plan amendment and the impact to the state. The health care authority shall implement the amendment in calendar year 2020, once approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(61) The health care authority shall work with the department of social and health services to assess a Katie Beckett waiver and a tax equity and fiscal responsibility act (TEFRA) waiver to expand coverage for children with significant disabilities who meet federal requirements for such services. No later than October 15, 2020, the authority shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial management the number of children who would be eligible if such waivers were approved, the services for which they would be eligible, and the potential impact to the state budget.

(62) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid to provide education and clinical training for dental professionals and students in the care of persons with development and/or acquired disabilities.

(63) $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $417,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6088 (Rx drug affordability board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(64) $259,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6113 (central insulin purchasing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(65) $3,686,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6128 (postpartum period/medicaid). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(66) $612,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,088,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the non-emergency medical transportation broker administrative rate to ensure access to health care services for medicaid patients.

(67) $511,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $76,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to collaborate with the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and Seattle children's hospital to extend the partnership access line for moms and partnership access line for kids referral assistance service programs, as described in RCW 71.24.061(3)(a), until June 30, 2021.

(68) $770,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $800,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase home health rates in three annual, equal increments beginning January 1, 2021, to ramp up to seventy-five percent of medicare costs consistent with the audited, most recently accepted or submitted medicare cost reports. The authority shall request medicare cost reports from home health agencies with a due date sufficient to calculate the rates for a January 1, 2021, implementation date.

(69) $9,922,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $19,072,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6676 (medicaid primary care reimbursement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(70) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6404 (health plans/prior authorization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(71) $1,181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $2,066,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6354 (small rural hospital payment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(72)(a) $1,192,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,970,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for reconciliation of payment under alternate payment methodology four (APM4) for federally qualified health centers (FQHC) for state fiscal year 2020. The authority shall use unliquidated prior accrual balances to reconcile state fiscal years 2018 and 2019.

(b) By August 1, 2020, the authority shall convene representatives from FQHCs participating in the APM4 methodology, the FQHC association, the office of financial management, and fiscal committees of the legislature to evaluate and amend the APM4 model and memorandum of understanding.

(c) The authority in collaboration with the representatives in (b) of this subsection must develop an updated APM4 model and memorandum of understanding that:

(i) Complies with budget neutrality requirements and spending limits as required under the omnibus appropriations act;

(ii) Identifies predictable spending targets;

(iii) Clearly defines quality performance standards for participating FQHCs;

(iv) Requires progressively increasing standards of quality performance for participating FQHCs;

(v) Clearly defines financial performance expectations for participating FQHCs;

(vi) Requires progressively increasing standards of financial performance for participating FQHCs; and

(vii) Requires that reconciliation payments made under APM4 may not fall below the payment level required by the federal law for qualifying face-to-face encounters.

(d) The authority in collaboration with the office of financial management and representatives from fiscal committees of the legislature shall conduct an evaluation of the APM4 model to determine its cost effectiveness and impact on patient outcomes and report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2022.

(e) The authority shall not enter into any future value-based arrangements with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics prior to receiving approval from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(f) The authority shall require all managed care organizations to provide information to the authority to account for all payments to FQHCs to include how payments are made, including any additional payments and whether there is a sub-capitation arrangement or value-based purchasing arrangement.

(g) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with FQHCs contracting under APM4.

(h) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with FQHCs contracting under APM4 during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.

(73) $193,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the authority to provide a one-time grant to a standalone skilled nursing facility operated by a public hospital district in Grant county. This grant is provided as a one-time offset to address the impact of the recoupment requirements of subsection (13) of this section.

(74) Within the amounts appropriated within this section, the authority shall implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6534 (ambulance quality assurance fee). The authority is directed to submit a state plan amendment (SPA) pursuant to the terms of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6534 without delay once the bill becomes effective. Upon approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services (CMS) of the state plan amendment, the authority is directed to implement a fifteen percent increase to ground emergency medical transportation base rates. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, or if the state plan amendment is not approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 212. 2019 c 415 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS PROGRAM

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($35,274,000))

$37,464,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($35,274,000))

$37,464,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Any savings resulting from reduced claims costs or other factors identified after March 1, 2019, must be reserved for funding employee benefits in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan resulting from rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys received as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits.

(2) Any changes to benefits must be approved by the public employees' benefits board. The board shall not make any changes to benefits without considering a comprehensive analysis of the cost of those changes, and shall not increase benefits unless savings achieved under subsection (3) of this section or offsetting cost reductions from other benefit revisions are sufficient to fund the changes. However, the funding provided anticipates that the public employees' benefits board may increase the availability of nutritional counseling in the uniform medical plan by allowing a lifetime limit of up to twelve nutritional counseling visits, and may increase hearing aid benefits to reflect the provisions of chapter 159, Laws of 2018, for the plan year beginning January 1, 2021. Provided further, that within the amount provided, the health care authority may update the public employees benefits board benefits enrollment process. The board may also, within the amounts provided, use cost savings to enhance the basic long-term disability benefit.

(3) Except as may be provided in a health care bargaining agreement, to provide benefits within the level of funding provided in part IX of this bill, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases increase in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.

(4) The board shall collect a surcharge payment of not less than twenty-five dollars per month from members who use tobacco products, and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(5) $7,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $149,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for a full-time equivalent employee dedicated to work on retiree health care. The authority will provide any necessary information to the office of the state actuary to support an analysis of medicare eligible health care benefits. The authority will convene a stakeholder work group to discuss the plans available to medicare eligible retirees. The stakeholder work group, at a minimum, must include representatives of the office of financial management and representatives of the largest association representing retirees receiving benefits under the public employees' benefits board. The work group shall identify priorities and preferences that should be considered if changes were made to the medicare eligible retiree plans. A summary of the work group's feedback must be provided to the office of the state actuary by September 1, 2020.

(7) $1,705,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6189 (SEBB eligibility). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 213. 2019 c 415 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD

School Employees' Insurance Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($25,343,000))

$27,071,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($25,343,000))

$27,071,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By February 5, 2020, the health care authority shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the total amount by school district, educational service district, and charter school billed for January benefits and a detailed list of school districts, educational service districts, and charter schools that have not remitted payment for January coverage as of January 31, 2020.

(2) $2,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) The health care authority must study the potential cost savings and improved efficiency in providing insurance benefits to the employers and employees participating in the public employees' and school employees' benefits board systems that could be gained by consolidating the systems. The consolidation options studied must maintain separate risk pools for medicare-eligible and non-medicare eligible employees and retirees, assume a consolidation date of January 1, 2022, and incorporate the experiences gained by health care authority during the initial implementation and operation of the school employees' benefits board program. The study must be submitted to the committees of the house of representatives and the senate overseeing health care and the omnibus operating budget by November 15, 2020.

(4) $1,705,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6189 (SEBB eligibility). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 214. 2019 c 415 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$6,407,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($5,234,000))

$5,393,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($52,128,000))

$50,055,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($57,720,000))

$59,793,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($121,489,000))

$121,648,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.

(2)(a) By July 15th and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of one-half the general fund—state appropriation and one-half the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation to the exchange.

(b) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.

(c) Payments made from general fund—state appropriation and health benefit exchange account—state appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.

(3) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,048,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5526 (individual health insurance market). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $1,173,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided for the exchange to enhance Washington healthplanfinder so eligible COFA citizens can obtain dental coverage. Open enrollment periods and special enrollment periods for the COFA dental program shall be consistent with the enrollment periods for the COFA medical program. The first open-enrollment period for the COFA dental program must begin no later than November 1, 2020.

(5) $426,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $874,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for cloud platform costs and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(6) $968,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $1,978,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for system integrator reprocurement and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(7) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6128 (postpartum period/medicaid). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal 2021 is provided solely for the exchange to contract with an independent actuarial consultant to conduct an assessment of the impact of a state requirement that individuals enroll in health coverage. The assessment shall consider the effects of this requirement on revenue, individual market enrollment, individual market premiums, and the uninsured rate. The exchange shall submit assessment findings to the chairs of the health committees of the legislature no later than December 15, 2020.

Sec. 215. 2019 c 415 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($556,003,000))

$579,371,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($604,424,000))

$672,322,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,966,699,000))

$2,130,428,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$36,513,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,986,000))

$17,486,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,461,000))

$1,961,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$51,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$28,490,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
$28,493,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,714,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,236,834,000))

$3,496,829,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For the purposes of this section, "behavioral health entities" means managed care organizations and administrative services organizations in regions where the authority is purchasing medical and behavioral health services through fully integrated contracts pursuant to RCW 71.24.380, and behavioral health organizations in regions that have not yet transitioned to fully integrated managed care.

(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for implementation of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. In addition to amounts provided solely for implementation of the settlement agreement, class members must have access to supports and services funded throughout this section for which they meet eligibility and medical necessity requirements. The authority must include language in contracts that requires regional behavioral health entities to develop and implement plans for improving access to timely and appropriate treatment for individuals with behavioral health needs and current or prior criminal justice involvement who are eligible for services under these contracts.

(3) $15,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $15,754,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,789,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(4) (($8,777,000))$7,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($10,424,000))$11,544,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $20,197,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health entities to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health entities with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health entities in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health entities which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under subsection (7) of this section. The authority and behavioral health entities shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(5) From the general fund—state appropriations in this section, the authority shall assure that behavioral health entities reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long term support administration for the general fund—state cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled behavioral health entity consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(6) $3,520,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain a pilot project to incorporate peer bridging staff into behavioral health regional teams that provide transitional services to individuals returning to their communities.

(7)(a) $81,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $81,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health entity spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health entities proportionate to the fiscal year 2019 allocation of flexible nonmedicaid funds. The authority must include the following language in medicaid contracts with behavioral health entities unless they are provided formal notification from the center for medicaid and medicare services that the language will result in the loss of federal medicaid participation: "The contractor may voluntarily provide services that are in addition to those covered under the state plan, although the cost of these services cannot be included when determining payment rates unless including these costs are specifically allowed under federal law or an approved waiver."

(b) The authority must review the nonmedicaid funds going to the behavioral health administrative service organizations (BH-ASOs) and the managed care organizations (MCOs) and update its disbursement formula taking into account the coverage of (1) involuntary treatment act court costs; (2) crisis services; (3) nonmedicaid services for medicaid clients of the MCOs; and (4) any nonmedicaid services for nonmedicaid clients through the BH-ASOs. The authority shall adjust its disbursement formula to optimize the use of these funds for the purposes listed above no later than July 1, 2020.

(8) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health entities for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(9) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting one hundred eighty-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(10) Behavioral health entities may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health entities may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with subsection (7) of this section to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(11) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health entities on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(13) The authority must establish minimum and maximum funding levels for all reserves allowed under behavioral health organization and administrative services organization contracts and include contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The authority must monitor and ensure that behavioral health organization and administrative services organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The authority must monitor revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health organization or administrative services organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health organization or administrative services organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the entity in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the entity has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan.

(14) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, any amounts provided in this section that are used for case management services for pregnant and parenting women must be contracted directly between the authority and providers rather than through contracts with behavioral health organizations.

(15) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the authority by request; and (b) indirect charges for administering the program must not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.

(16) $3,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.

(17) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health entities must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health entities must require that behavioral health entities include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.

(18) The criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with behavioral health entities to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b). The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which identifies the distribution of criminal justice treatment account funds by September 30, 2019.

(19) No more than $27,844,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(20) $6,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $6,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $8,046,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain new crisis triage or stabilization centers. Services in these facilities may include crisis stabilization and intervention, individual counseling, peer support, medication management, education, and referral assistance. The authority shall monitor each center's effectiveness at lowering the rate of state psychiatric hospital admissions.

(21) $1,125,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to develop a memorandum of understanding with the department of health for implementation of chapter 297, Laws of 2017 (opioid treatment programs). The authority must use these amounts to reimburse the department of health for costs incurred through the implementation of the bill.

(22) $6,655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $10,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $12,965,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operation of secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities. The authority may not use any of these amounts for services in facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions for mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities. Within these amounts, funding is provided to increase the fee for service rate for these facilities up to $650 per day. The authority must require in contracts with behavioral health entities that, beginning in calendar year 2020, they pay no lower than the fee for service rate. The authority must coordinate with regional behavioral health entities to identify and implement purchasing strategies or regulatory changes that increase access to services for individuals with complex behavioral health needs at secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(23) $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $92,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain the enhancement of community-based behavioral health services that was funded in fiscal year 2019. Twenty percent of the general fund—state appropriation amounts for each regional service area must be contracted to the behavioral health administrative organizations and used to increase their nonmedicaid funding and the remainder must be used to increase medicaid rates above FY 2018 levels. Effective January 2020, the medicaid funding is intended to increase rates for behavioral health services provided by licensed and certified community behavioral health agencies as defined by the department of health. Any new medicaid rate enhancements created under this subsection after January 1, 2020, shall be developed utilizing the process outlined in subsection (24) of this section. This funding must be allocated to the managed care organizations proportionate to their medicaid enrollees. The authority must require the managed care organizations to provide a report on their implementation of this funding. The authority must submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2020, summarizing how this funding was used and provide information for future options of increasing behavioral health provider rates through directed payments. The report must identify different mechanisms for implementing directed payment for behavioral health providers including but not limited to minimum fee schedules, across the board percentage increases, and value-based payments. The report must provide a description of each of the mechanisms considered, the timeline that would be required for implementing the mechanism, and whether and how the mechanism is expected to have a differential impact on different providers. The report must also summarize the information provided by managed care organizations in implementing the funding provided under this section.

(24)(a) In establishing, re-basing, enhancing, or otherwise updating medicaid rates for behavioral health services, the authority and contracted actuaries shall use a transparent process that provides an opportunity for medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and behavioral health provider agencies, and their representatives, to review and provide data and feedback on proposed rate changes within their region or regions of service operation. The authority and contracted actuaries shall consider the information gained from this process and make adjustments allowable under federal law when appropriate.

(b) The authority shall seek input from representatives of the managed care organizations (MCOs), licensed community behavioral health agencies, and behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop the format of a report which addresses revenues and expenditures for the community behavioral health programs. The report shall include, but not be limited to (i) revenues and expenditures for community behavioral health programs, including medicaid and nonmedicaid funding; (ii) access to services, service denials, and utilization by state plan modality; (iii) claims denials and record of timely payment to providers; (iv) client demographics; and (v) social and recovery measures and managed care organization performance measures. The authority shall submit the report for the preceding calendar year to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on or before July 1st of each year.

(25)(a) $27,917,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $36,095,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $60,644,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. Within these amounts, the authority must meet the requirements for reimbursing counties for the judicial services for patients being served in these settings in accordance with RCW 71.05.730. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in developing the contract requirements, selecting contractors, and establishing processes for identifying patients that will be admitted to these facilities. Sufficient amounts are provided in fiscal year 2020 for the authority to reimburse community hospitals serving medicaid clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 at a rate of $1,171 per day, or the hospital's current psychiatric inpatient per diem rate, whichever is higher. The rate paid to hospitals in this subsection cannot exceed one-hundred percent of the hospitals eligible costs based on their most recently completed medicare cost report. Sufficient amounts are provided in fiscal year 2021 for the authority to reimburse community hospitals serving medicaid clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025, at rates established under the recommended methodology outlined in the report to the legislature on December 1, 2019, entitled "Rate Methodology for 90- and 180-Day Civil Commitment Beds," beginning January 1, 2021. Rates paid to acute care community hospitals must reflect one hundred percent of the hospital's eligible costs as reflected in the most recently completed medicare cost report. The authority shall reimburse free standing psychiatric hospitals at a rate of $995 per day. The authority shall provide a final implementation plan that identifies the predicted costs beyond June 30, 2021, to the legislature no later than December 31, 2020.

(b) The authority in collaboration with the Washington state hospital association must convene a work group to develop a methodology for reimbursing community hospitals serving these clients. In developing this methodology, the authority must account for cost structure differences between teaching hospitals and other hospital types. The authority must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019. The report must:

(((a)))(i) Describe the methodology developed by the work group;

(((b)))(ii) Identify cost differences between teaching hospitals and other hospital types;

(((c)))(iii) Provide options for incentivizing community hospitals to offer long-term inpatient care beds day beds including a rate recommendation;

(((d)))(iv) Identify the cost associated with any recommended changes in rates or rate setting methodology; and

(((e)))(v) Outline an implementation plan.

(((25)))(26) $1,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $3,210,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of intensive behavioral health treatment facilities within the community behavioral health service system pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1394 (behavioral health facilities).

(((26)))(27) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $173,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 70, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1199) (health care/disability).

(((27)))(28)(a) $12,878,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $12,878,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for:

(i) A memorandum of understanding with the department of children, youth, and families to provide substance abuse treatment programs;

(ii) A contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit evaluation of the implementations of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502);

(iii) Designing and administering the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey;

(iv) Maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program;

(v) Grants to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for life skills training to children and youth;

(vi) Maintaining increased prevention and treatment service provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organization to children and youth;

(vii) Maintaining increased residential treatment services for children and youth;

(viii) Training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence-based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorder;

(ix) Expenditures into the home visiting services account; and

(x) Grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth.

(b) The authority must allocate the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection amongst the specific activities proportionate to the fiscal year 2019 allocation.

(((28)))(29)(a) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Spokane behavioral health entities to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services must include:

(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

(b) At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health entities shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(((29)))(30) $24,819,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to assist behavioral health entities with the costs of providing services to medicaid clients receiving services in psychiatric facilities classified as institutions of mental diseases. The authority must distribute these amounts proportionate to the number of bed days for medicaid clients in institutions for mental diseases that were excluded from behavioral health organization calendar year 2019 capitation rates because they exceeded the amounts allowed under federal regulations. The authority must also use these amounts to directly pay for costs that are ineligible for medicaid reimbursement in institutions of mental disease facilities for American Indian and Alaska Natives who opt to receive behavioral health services on a fee-for-service basis. The amounts used for these individuals must be reduced from the allocation of the behavioral health organization where the individual resides. If a behavioral health organization receives more funding through this subsection than is needed to pay for the cost of their medicaid clients in institutions for mental diseases, they must use the remainder of the amounts to provide other services not covered under the medicaid program. The authority must submit an application for a waiver to allow, by July 1, 2020, for full federal participation for medicaid clients in mental health facilities classified as institutions of mental diseases. The authority must submit a report on the status of the waiver to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(((30)))(31) The authority must require all behavioral health organizations transitioning to full integration to either spend down or return all reserves in accordance with contract requirements and federal and state law. Behavioral health organization reserves may not be used to pay for services to be provided beyond the end of a behavioral health organization's contract or for startup costs in full integration regions except as provided in this subsection. The authority must ensure that any increases in expenditures in behavioral health reserve spend-down plans are required for the operation of services during the contract period and do not result in overpayment to providers. If the nonfederal share of reserves returned during fiscal year 2020 exceeds $35,000,000, the authority shall use some of the amounts in excess of $35,000,000 to support the final regions transitioning to full integration of physical and behavioral health care. These amounts must be distributed proportionate to the population of each regional area covered. The maximum amount allowed per region is $3,175 per 1,000 residents. These amounts must be used to provide a reserve for nonmedicaid services in the region to stabilize the new crisis services system.

(((31)))(32) $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $13,312,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement a medicaid state plan amendment which provides for substance use disorder peer support services to be included in behavioral health capitation rates beginning in fiscal year 2020 in accordance with section 213(5)(ss), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The authority shall require managed care organizations to provide access to peer support services for individuals with substance use disorders transitioning from emergency departments, inpatient facilities, or receiving treatment as part of hub and spoke networks.

(((32)))(33) $1,256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,686,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the number of residential beds for pregnant and parenting women. These amounts may be used for startup funds and ongoing costs associated with two new sixteen bed pregnant and parenting women residential treatment programs.

(((33)))(34) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority must maintain a rate increase for community hospitals that provide a minimum of 200 medicaid psychiatric inpatient days pursuant to the methodology adopted to implement section 213(5)(n), chapter 299, Laws of 2018 (ESSB 6032) (partial veto).

(((34)))(35) $1,393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $5,938,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement discharge wraparound services for individuals with complex behavioral health conditions transitioning or being diverted from admission to psychiatric inpatient programs. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in establishing the standards for these programs.

(((35)))(36) $850,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to contract with a nationally recognized recovery residence organization and to create a revolving fund for loans to operators of recovery residences seeking certification in accordance with Second Substitute House Bill No. 1528 (recovery support services). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.))

(((36)))(37) $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $124,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1874 (adolescent behavioral health). Funding is provided specifically for the authority to provide an online training to behavioral health providers related to state law and best practices in family-initiated treatment, adolescent-initiated treatment, and other services and to conduct an annual survey to measure the impacts of implementing policies resulting from the bill. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.))

(((37)))(38) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement a memorandum of understanding with the criminal justice training commission to provide funding for community grants pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1767 (alternatives to arrest). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(((38)))(39) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for provision of crisis stabilization services to individuals who are not eligible for medicaid in Whatcom county. The authority must coordinate with crisis stabilization providers, managed care organizations, and behavioral health administrative services organizations throughout the state to identify payment models that reflect the unique needs of crisis stabilization and crisis triage providers. The report must also include an analysis of the estimated gap in nonmedicaid funding for crisis stabilization and triage facilities throughout the state. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the estimated nonmedicaid funding gap and payment models by December 1, 2019.

(((39)))(40) The authority must conduct an analysis to determine whether there is a gap in fiscal year 2020 behavioral health entity funding for services in institutions for mental diseases and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2019. The report must be developed in consultation with the office of financial management and staff from the fiscal committees of the legislature and must include the following elements: (a) The increase in the number of nonmedicaid bed days in institutions for mental diseases from fiscal year 2017 to fiscal year 2019 by facility and the estimated annual cost associated with these increased bed days in FY 2020; (b) the increase in the number of medicaid bed days in institutions for mental diseases from fiscal year 2017 to fiscal year 2019 by facility and the estimated annual cost associated with these increased bed days in FY 2020; (c) the amount of funding assumed in current behavioral health entity medicaid capitation rates for institutions for mental diseases bed days that are currently allowable under medicaid regulation or waivers; (d) the amounts provided in subsection (29) of this section to assist with costs in institutions for mental diseases not covered in medicaid capitation rates; and (e) any remaining gap in behavioral health entity funding for institutions for mental diseases for medicaid or nonmedicaid clients.

(((40)))(41) $1,968,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $3,396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $12,150,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for support of and to increase clubhouse facilities across the state. The authority shall work with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to review opportunities to include clubhouse services as an optional "in lieu of" service in managed care organization contracts in order to maximize federal participation. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of efforts to implement clubhouse programs and receive federal approval for including these services in managed care organization contracts as an optional "in lieu of" service.

(((41)))(42) $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the University of Washington behavioral health institute to develop and disseminate model programs and curricula for inpatient and outpatient treatment for individuals with substance use disorder and co-occurring disorders. The behavioral health institute will provide individualized consultation to behavioral health agencies in order to improve the delivery of evidence-based and promising practices and overall quality of care. The behavioral health institute will provide training to staff of behavioral health agencies to enhance the quality of substance use disorder and co-occurring treatment delivered.

(((42)))(43) The number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health entities at eastern state hospital shall be one hundred ninety two per day. The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by behavioral health entities at western state hospital shall be five hundred twenty-seven per day. During fiscal year 2020, the authority must reduce the number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health entities at western state hospital by sixty beds to allow for the repurposing of two civil wards at western state hospital to provide forensic services. Contracted community beds provided under subsection (24) of this section shall be allocated to the behavioral health entities in lieu of beds at western state hospital and be incorporated in their allocation of state hospital patient days of care for the purposes of calculating reimbursements pursuant to RCW 71.24.310. It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of expanding community based alternatives for long-term civil commitment services that allow for state hospital beds to be prioritized for forensic patients.

(((43)))(44) $190,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $947,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal ((yar))year 2021, and $1,023,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to develop a statewide plan to implement evidence-based coordinated specialty care programs that provide early identification and intervention for psychosis in behavioral health agencies in accordance with Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5903 (children's mental health). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.))

(((44)))(45) $708,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $799,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing mental health peer respite centers and a pilot project to implement a mental health drop-in center beginning ((January))July 1, 2020, in accordance with Second Substitute House Bill No. 1394 (behavioral health facilities).

(((45) $250,000))(46) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided on a one-time basis solely for a licensed youth residential psychiatric substance abuse and mental health agency located in Clark county to invest in staff training and increasing client census. Moneys shall be allocated subject to a contract with the authority concerning staffing levels, critical action plans, and client services.

(((46)))(47) $509,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,823,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for diversion grants to establish new law enforcement assisted diversion programs outside of King county consistent with the provisions of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5380 (opioid use disorder).

(((47)))(48) The authority must compile all previous reports and collaborate with any work groups created during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium for the purpose of establishing the implementation plan for transferring the full risk of long-term inpatient care for mental illness into the behavioral health entity contracts by January 1, 2020.

(((48)))(49) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to continue funding one pilot project in Pierce county to promote increased utilization of assisted outpatient treatment programs. The authority shall provide a report to the legislature by October 15, 2020, which must include the number of individuals served, outcomes to include changes in use of inpatient treatment and hospital stays, and recommendations for further implementation based on lessons learned from the pilot project.

(((49)))(50) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $36,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5181 (involuntary treatment procedures). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.))

(((50)))(51) $814,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,466,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement the recommendations of the state action alliance for suicide prevention, to include suicide assessments, treatment, and grant management.

(((51)))(52) Within existing appropriations, the authority shall prioritize the prevention and treatment of intravenous opiate-based drug use.

(((52)))(53) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The authority must collect information from the institute on the use of these funds and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(54) $1,308,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $2,764,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5720 (involuntary treatment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(55) $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6191 (adverse childhood experience). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(56) Within existing resources, the authority shall implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6259 (Indian behavioral health sys).

(57) Within existing resources, the authority shall implement Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5389 (telehealth program/youth).

(58) $1,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $3,294,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for intensive outpatient treatment services within the community behavioral health service system for youth. The authority must develop a service model and submit a state plan amendment or a medicaid waiver to implement these services beginning January 1, 2021.

(59) $1,260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $840,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase rates to parent-child assistance program providers in an effort to stabilize the workforce and increase training and evaluation.

(60) $215,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to cover the start-up costs of a crisis stabilization center in Island county.

(61) $2,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to ensure a smooth transition to integrated managed care for behavioral health regions and to maintain the existing level of regional behavioral health crisis and diversion programs, and other required behavioral health administrative service organization services. These amounts must be used to support the regions transitioning to full integration of physical and behavioral health care beginning January 1, 2020. These amounts must be distributed proportionate to the population of each regional area covered. The maximum amount allowed per region is $2,494 per one thousand residents. These amounts must be used to provide a reserve for nonmedicaid services in the region and to stabilize the new crisis services system.

(62) $846,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to implement a statewide pilot project to provide increased access to emergent and nonemergent transportation to secure withdrawal management and stabilization services facilities under the involuntary treatment act for individuals detained with substance use disorders. The authority shall review the implementation of the statewide pilot and provide a report to the legislature no later than December 15, 2020, to include data on costs and the increased number of trips.

(63) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6591 (mental health directives). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(64) $185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $523,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6638 (reentry services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(65) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $259,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,285,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to submit the 1115 mental health institutions for mental diseases waiver application to the centers for medicare and medicaid services with a start date of July 1, 2020, and to begin any statewide infrastructure building necessary.

(66) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $15,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to develop a value-based case rate payment model for comprehensive community behavioral health services. It is the intent of the legislature to strengthen the community behavioral health system in order to promote recovery and whole person care, avoid unnecessary institutionalization and ensure access to care in the least restrictive setting possible, and incentivize value-based alternative payment models. Therefore, the authority in collaboration with the Washington council for behavioral health must convene a work group to develop a case rate payment model for comprehensive community behavioral health services. The authority must submit a report to the legislature by October 31, 2020. The report must: (a) Identify a comprehensive package of services to be provided by community behavioral health agencies that are licensed and certified by the department of health as defined in RCW 71.24.025; (b) describe the methodology used to develop an actuarially sound case rate model for this comprehensive package of services, and propose a medicaid case rate or range of rates; and (c) identify key quality performance metrics focused on health and recovery as well as quality incentive payment mechanisms that reinforce value over volume.

(67) $500,000 of the problem gambling account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract for a problem gambling adult prevalence study. The prevalence study must review both statewide and regional results about beliefs and attitudes toward gambling, gambling behavior and preferences, and awareness of treatment services. The study should also estimate the level of risk for problem gambling and examine correlations with broader behavioral and mental health measures. The health care authority shall submit results of the prevalence study to the problem gambling task force and the legislature by June 30, 2021.

(68) $4,500,000 of the criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the authority to provide funding for the setting up of new therapeutic courts for cities or counties or for the expansion of services being provided to an already existing therapeutic court that engages in evidence based practices, to include medication assisted treatment in jail settings pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. Funding provided under this subsection shall not supplant existing funds utilized for this purpose.

(69) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the authority to contract with to a statewide mental health non-profit serving consumers and families that provides free community and school-based mental health education and support programs. Funding shall be used to provide access to programs tailored to peers living with mental illness, family members of people with mental illness, and the community.

Sec. 216. 2019 c 415 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,510,000))

$2,629,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,543,000))

$2,996,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,613,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$190,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($7,856,000))

$8,428,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5602 (reproductive health care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6034 (pregnancy discrim. complaints). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 217. 2019 c 415 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,326,000))

$24,298,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,327,000))

$24,299,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($48,663,000))

$48,607,000

Sec. 218. 2019 c 415 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($25,649,000))

$26,354,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($25,697,000))

$26,754,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,630,000))

$7,082,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$682,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,167,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($67,765,000))

$69,979,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.

(2) (($2,248,000))$2,768,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($2,269,000))$2,789,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for seventy-five percent of the costs of providing ((nine))eleven additional statewide basic law enforcement trainings in each fiscal year. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. At least two classes must be held in Spokane each year.

(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(4) $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for expenditure into the nonappropriated Washington internet crimes against children account for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.

(5) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the mental health field response team program administered by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The association must distribute $3,000,000 in grants to the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The association must submit an annual report to the Governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year of the biennium. The report shall include best practice recommendations on law enforcement and behavioral health field response and include outcome measures on all grants awarded.

(6) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $449,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(7) $534,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to update and expand the medicolegal forensic investigation training currently provided to coroners and medical examiners from eighty hours to two-hundred forty hours to meet the recommendations of the national commission on forensic science for certification and accreditation. Funding is contingent on the death investigation account receiving three dollars of the five dollar increase in vital records fees from the passage of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5332 (vital statistics). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $10,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for an increase in vendor rates on the daily meals provided to basic law enforcement academy recruits during their training.

(9) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1767 (alternatives to arrest/jail). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(10) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a vendor rate increase of seven tenths of one percent for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(11) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6570 (law enforce. mental health). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $241,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to establish pilot projects. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 219. 2019 c 415 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($13,107,000))

$14,426,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($11,696,000))

$11,453,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,876,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$590,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($58,068,000))

$58,089,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,039,000

Construction Registration Inspection Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($23,888,000))

$25,403,000

Public Works Administration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,988,000))

$10,990,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$412,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,434,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($392,548,000))

$395,378,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($15,674,000))

$16,439,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($397,545,000))

$399,013,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,515,000))

$3,650,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,004,000))

$3,398,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,667,000))

$4,669,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($949,079,000))

$958,287,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $40,988,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $40,986,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the labor and industries workers' compensation information system replacement project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(2) $250,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $250,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must issue an initial report to the legislature, by June 30, 2020, assessing the physical capacity of workers in the context of the industry's economic environment and ascertain usable support tools for employers and workers to decrease risk of injury. After the initial report, the department must produce annual progress reports, beginning in 2021 through the year 2022 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress reports must be submitted to the legislature by December 1st of each year such reports are due.

(3) $1,700,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $300,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for a contract with a permanently registered Washington sector intermediary to provide supplemental instruction for information technology apprentices. Funds spent for this purpose must be matched by an equal amount of funding from the information technology industry members, except small and mid-sized employers. Up to $1,000,000 may be spent to provide supplemental instruction for apprentices at small and mid-sized businesses. "Small and mid-sized businesses" means those that have fewer than one hundred employees or have less than five percent annual net profitability. The sector intermediary will collaborate with the state board for community and technical colleges to integrate and offer related supplemental instruction through one or more Washington state community or technical colleges by the 2020-21 academic year.

(4) $1,360,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $240,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries to establish a health care apprenticeship program.

(5) $273,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $273,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment research for prevention program to conduct research to prevent the types of work-related injuries that require immediate hospitalization. The department will develop and maintain a tracking system to identify and respond to all immediate in-patient hospitalizations and will examine incidents in defined high-priority areas, as determined from historical data and public priorities. The research must identify and characterize hazardous situations and contributing factors using epidemiological, safety-engineering, and human factors/ergonomics methods. The research must also identify common factors in certain types of workplace injuries that lead to hospitalization. The department must submit an initial report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by August 30, 2020, and annually thereafter, summarizing work-related immediate hospitalizations and prevention opportunities, actions that employers and workers can take to make workplaces safer, and ways to avoid severe injuries.

(6) $666,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $243,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5175 (firefighter safety). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $2,257,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5035 (prevailing wage laws). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $464,100 is provided solely for information technology changes to the complaint activity tracking system, public works suite, accounts receivable collections, and the pay accounts receivable collections systems, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $37,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $33,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $52,000 of the accident account—state appropriation is provided solely for the complaint activity tracking system adjustment project, which will add functionality related to conducting company-wide wage investigations. This funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(10) $850,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $850,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for issuing and managing contracts with customer-trusted groups to develop and deliver information to small businesses and their workers about workplace rights, regulations and services administered by the agency.

(11) (($4,676,000))$5,721,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($2,092,000))$504,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for increasing rates for medical and health care service providers treating persons in the crime victim compensation program.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the crime victims compensation program to pay for medical exams related to victims of suspected child abuse. No later than September 30, 2020, the department shall report to the legislature the following information, for each fiscal year from fiscal year 2016 through fiscal year 2020:

(i) The type of claims received by victims of suspected child abuse;

(ii) The total number of claims received by victims of suspected child abuse;

(iii) The type of claims paid to victims of suspected child abuse;

(iv) The total number of claims paid to victims of suspected child abuse; and

(v) The total amounts of claims paid to victims of suspected child abuse.

(12) $744,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $744,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for customer service staffing at field offices.

(13) $3,432,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $606,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the division of occupational safety and health to add workplace safety and health consultants, inspectors, and investigators.

(14) $788,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $140,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for apprenticeship staffing to respond to inquiries and process registrations.

(15) $2,608,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $3,541,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for claims management staffing to reduce caseloads.

(16) $1,072,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1295 (public works contracting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(17) $695,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $124,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1817 (high hazard facilities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(18) $67,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $66,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1909 (industrial ins. claim records). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19) (($313,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $312,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation))$273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(20) $1,507,000 of the construction registration inspection account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional staff to conduct and facilitate additional elevator inspections.

(21) $298,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $53,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 296, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1155).

(22) $429,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $76,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for department implementation of chapter 345, Laws of 2019 (ESHB 1696).

(23) $1,393,000 of the plumbing certificate account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6170 (plumbing registration and licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $150,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $26,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6421 (farm internship program extension). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $625,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $625,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6440 (workers' compensation medical exams). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $255,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $45,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for two additional crane inspectors to work in King county.

(27) $750,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $750,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with a southeastern Washington city's chamber of commerce to conduct the Latino workforce project for a research study to identify psychosocial issues impacting Latinos in the state funded workers' compensation system. The chamber of commerce shall partner with the Pacific Northwest center for mestizo and indigenous research and engagement at Washington State University to conduct the study. The study must identify barriers that impede injured Latino workers from returning to work. The study must also identify linguistically and culturally appropriate safety and return to work initiatives and other tools to minimize industrial injuries and facilitate timely return to work among the Latino workforce. The chamber of commerce shall submit a report on the study's findings to the legislature by June 30, 2021.

(28) $280,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $50,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6473 (asbestos building materials). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29) $918,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6181 (crime victim compensation program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The department shall report to the legislature no later than July 31, 2021, the following information for fiscal year 2021 regarding the benefits available under Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6181:

(a) The number of claims received by month;

(b) The number of claims rejected by month;

(c) The number and amounts of claims paid by month; and

(d) The average processing time for claims.

(30) $122,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $21,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6081 (noncompetition/med. schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 220. 2019 c 415 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. ((By December 31, 2019, the department must: (i) Develop and implement a sustainable staffing model for the institutional services program to keep expenditures commensurate with the program revenue; and (ii) report to the legislature regarding its expenditures.)) In response to any request by the department for general fund—state appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.

(2) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($4,088,000))

$3,369,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($4,119,000))

$3,398,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$185,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,402,000))

$6,962,000

(3) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$6,602,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($6,770,000))

$7,026,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,435,000))

$5,253,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,958,000))

$5,323,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$708,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$444,000

Veterans Stewardship Nonappropriated Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Veterans Innovation Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($24,317,000))

$25,756,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $1,338,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $120,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for the expansion of the transitional housing program at the Washington soldiers home.

(b) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $100,000 of the veterans innovation account—state appropriation are provided solely for veterans innovation program grants.

(c) $300,000 of the veterans stewardship nonappropriated account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's traumatic brain injury program.

(d) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1448 (veterans service officers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(e)(i) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to develop a statewide plan to reduce suicide among service members, veterans, and their families. In developing the plan, the department shall:

(A) Collaborate with government and nongovernment agencies and organizations to establish promising best practices for suicide awareness and prevention materials, training, and outreach programs targeted to service members, veterans, and their families;

(B) Cultivate peer-led organizations serving veterans in transition and recovery;

(C) Create statewide suicide awareness and prevention training programs with content specific to service members, veterans, and their families; and

(D) Provide safer homes materials and distribute safe firearms storage devices, to the Washington national guard, the Washington state patrol, allied veteran groups, and other organizations serving or employing veterans, following the recommendations of the suicide-safer homes task force.

(ii) The department must report to the legislature regarding the development of the plan no later than December 1, 2020.

(f) $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5900 (LGBTQ coordinator/veterans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g) $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6626 (military spouse liaison). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($13,379,000))

$13,155,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($14,565,000))

$14,419,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($85,479,000))

$101,679,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($28,737,000))

$20,737,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,464,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($143,624,000))

$151,454,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The amounts provided in this subsection include a general fund—state backfill for a revenue shortfall at the Washington soldiers home in Orting and the Walla Walla veterans home.

(b) $16,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for ongoing maintenance and operations of the state veteran homes contingent upon the department managing expenditures so that general fund—state resources are preserved to the maximum extent possible. If the department receives additional unanticipated federal resources at any point during the remainder of the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, an equal amount of general fund—state must be placed in unallotted status so as not to exceed the total appropriation level specified in this subsection. The department may submit as part of the policy level budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 a request to maintain the general fund—state resources that were unallotted as required by this subsection.

(5) CEMETERY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$100,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$100,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$688,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$888,000

Sec. 221. 2019 c 415 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($75,208,000))

$89,489,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($72,760,000))

$83,309,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($581,269,000))

$581,256,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($184,174,000))

$192,538,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$362,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($144,746,000))

$147,138,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$633,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,091,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,050,000))

$6,052,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,974,000))

$16,983,000

Waterworks Operator Certification Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,990,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,228,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$183,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,693,000))

$1,694,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,465,000))

$4,467,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,326,000))

$1,374,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,703,000))

$3,233,000

Secure Drug Take-Back Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,008,000

Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,373,000))

$4,237,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$10,786,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
$10,616,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,668,000))

$5,236,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,816,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$362,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,139,530,000))

$1,178,135,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(2) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(3) In accordance with RCW 43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.20B.110 and 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.

(5) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090, 71.24.035, 43.20B.110, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(6) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the coalition's plan for projects affecting the coalition organizations. The report must include any information technology projects impacting coalition organizations and, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, provide: (a) The status of any information technology projects currently being developed or implemented that affect the coalition; (b) funding needs of these current and future information technology projects; and (c) next steps for the coalition's information technology projects. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(7)(a) $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the governor's interagency coordinating council on health disparities to establish a task force to develop a proposal for the creation of an office of equity. The purpose of the office of equity is to promote access to equitable opportunities and resources that reduce disparities, including racial and ethnic disparities, and improve outcomes statewide across all sectors of government. The council must provide staff support and coordinate community and stakeholder outreach for the task force.

(b) The task force shall include:

(i) The chair of the interagency coordinating council on health disparities, or the chair's designee, who shall serve as the chair of the task force;

(ii) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(iii) Two members from the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(iv) A representative from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(v) A representative from the office of financial management's diversity, equity, and inclusion council, appointed by the governor;

(vi) A representative from the office of minority and women's business enterprises, appointed by the director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises;

(vii) A representative from each ethnic commission, appointed by the director of each respective commission;

(viii) A representative from the women's commission, appointed by the director of the commission;

(ix) A representative from the human rights commission, appointed by the director of the commission;

(x) The director of the governor's office of Indian affairs, or the director's designee;

(xi) A member of the disability community, appointed by the chair of the governor's committee on disability issues and employment; and

(xii) A member of the lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer community, appointed by the office of the governor.

(c) The task force must submit a preliminary report to the governor and legislature by December 15, 2019. The task force must submit a final proposal to the governor and the legislature by July 1, 2020. The final proposal must include the following recommendations:

(i) A mission statement and vision statement for the office;

(ii) A definition of "equity," which must be used by the office to guide its work;

(iii) The organizational structure of the office, which must include a community liaison for the office;

(iv) A plan to engage executive level management from all agencies;

(v) Mechanisms for facilitating state policy and systems change to promote equity, promoting community outreach and engagement, and establishing standards for the collection, analysis, and reporting of disaggregated data regarding race and ethnicity;

(vi) Mechanisms for accountability to ensure that performance measures around equity are met across all agencies, including recommendations on audits of agencies and other accountability tools as deemed appropriate; and

(vii) A budget proposal including estimates for costs and staffing.

(d) Nonlegislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative members must be reimbursed for expenses incurred in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.

(8) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with a community-based nonprofit organization located in Yakima valley to develop a Spanish-language public radio media campaign aimed at preventing opioid use disorders through education outreach programs. The goal of the radio media campaign is reaching underserved populations, who may have limited literacy and who may experience cultural and informational isolation, to address prevention, education, and treatment for opioid users or those at risk for opioid use. The nonprofit organization must coordinate with stakeholders who are engaged in promoting healthy and educated choices about drug use and abuse to host four workshops and two conferences that present the latest research and best practices. The department, in coordination with the nonprofit, must provide a preliminary report to the legislature no later than December 31, 2020. A final report must be submitted to the legislature no later than June 30, 2021. Both reports must include: (a) A description of the outreach programs and their implementation; (b) a description of the workshops and conferences held; (c) the number of individuals who participated in or received services in relation to the outreach programs; and (d) any relevant demographic data regarding those individuals.

(9)(a) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the nursing care quality assurance commission to continue the work group on nurses in long-term care settings.

(b) The work group must base its work on the assessment of long-term care workforce needs required by chapter 299, Laws of 2018, and included in the long-term care workforce development report to the governor and the legislature submitted in December 2018. The commission shall maintain existing membership of the work group, may add additional stakeholder representation, and may create such technical advisory committees as may be necessary to accomplish its purposes.

(c) Work group priorities for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium include:

(i) Identifying data sources necessary to ensure workers are achieving timely training, testing, and certification;

(ii) Working with regional workforce development councils to project worker shortages and on-going demands;

(iii) Establishing revised nursing assistant training that aligns directly with the learning outcomes of the competency-based common curriculum, and improves access, reduces costs, increases consistency across evaluators, increases pass rates, and provides support for languages other than English;

(iv) Recommending requirements to improve skilled nursing facility staffing models and address deficiencies in resident care; and

(v) Creating a competency-based common curriculum for nursing assistant training that includes knowledge and skills relevant to current nursing assistant practices; integrated specialty training on mental health, developmental disabilities, and dementia; and removing or revising outdated content. The curriculum must not unnecessarily add additional training hours, and must meet all applicable federal and state laws. The curriculum must be designed with seamless progression from or toward any point on the educational continuum.

(d) The commission must provide an interim report on the activities of the work group and its findings and recommendations for statutory and regulatory changes to the governor and legislature by November 15, 2019, ((and a final report to the governor and legislature by November 15, 2020))and by November 15, 2020, with a final report to the governor and legislature by June 30, 2021.

(10) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5425 (maternal mortality reviews). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(11) $399,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5332 (vital statistics). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $11,000 of the general fund—local appropriation, and $107,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5380 (opioid use disorder). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(13) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $32,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(14) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5550 (pesticide application safety). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(15) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5846 (international medical graduates). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(16) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than five hundred twenty-five dollars annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.

(17)(a) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the King county local health jurisdiction, as part of the foundational public health services, to conduct a study on the population health impact of the SeaTac airport communities.

(b) By December 1, 2020, the King county local health jurisdiction shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that must include:

(i) An analysis of existing data sources and an oversample of the best start for kids child health survey to produce airport community health profiles within a one mile, five mile, and ten mile radius of the airport;

(ii) A comprehensive literature review concerning the community health effects of airport operations, including a strength of evidence analysis;

(iii) The findings of the University of Washington school of public health study on ultrafine particulate matter at the airport and surrounding areas; and

(iv) Any recommendations to address health issues related to the impact of the airport on the community.

(18) $1,000,000 of the youth tobacco and vapor products prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely, as part of foundational public health services, for the department to support local health jurisdictions to provide youth tobacco and vapor prevention programs, including the necessary outreach and education for Engrossed House Bill No. 1074 (tobacco and vapor/age).

(19) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(20) The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019, and December 1, 2020, if it anticipates that the amounts raised by ambulatory surgical facility licensing fees will not be sufficient to defray the cost of regulating ambulatory surgical facilities. The report shall identify the amount of state general fund money necessary to compensate for the insufficiency.

(21) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $2,007,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to create a statewide data system to provide early intervention services for all children appropriately screened for developmental delays, to track developmental screenings and delays identified in children, and to assist with care coordination and early intervention; and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(22) $420,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for a work group to develop policy and practice recommendations to increase access to clinical training and supervised practice for the behavioral health workforce. The work group shall include representatives from the department, the workforce training and education coordinating board, and other appropriate stakeholders. The recommendations of the work group must address the following potential barriers: (a) reimbursement and incentives for supervision of interns and trainees; (b) supervision requirements; (c) competency-based training; (d) licensing reciprocity or the feasibility of an interstate licensing compact, or both; and (e) background checks, including barriers to work related to an applicant's criminal history or substance use disorder. The board must convene and facilitate the work group, and recommendations may be presented in two phases. Recommendations presented in the first phase must be provided by December 1, 2019. Recommendations presented in the second phase must be provided by December 1, 2020.

(23) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington poison center. This funding is provided in addition to funding provided pursuant to RCW 69.50.540.

(24) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the development of a palliative care road map to provide information and guidance to providers, patients, families, and caregivers of individuals living with a serious or life-threatening illness. The department must work in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, including but not limited to, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and hospital-based, outpatient, and community-based palliative care providers. The department must complete the document and make hard copies available for distribution no later than September 30, 2020.

(25) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided to continue the collaboration between local public health, accountable communities of health, and health care providers to reduce potentially preventable hospitalizations in Pierce county. This collaboration will build from year one planning to align care coordination efforts across health care systems and support the accountable communities of health initiatives, including innovative, collaborative models of care. Strategies include the following, to reduce costly hospitalizations: (a) Increasing immunizations for bacterial pneumonia and influenza; (b) screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment for alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs, and for depression; and (c) the sharing of health system-wide data regarding usage and access patterns. By December 15, 2019, the collaborative shall provide a report to the legislature that illustrates the successes and challenges of the project.

(26) $55,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1768 (substance use disorder professionals). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(27) $14,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1865 (acupuncture and Eastern medicine). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(28)(a) $257,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the suicide-safer homes task force defined in RCW 43.70.445 to:

(i) Expand support to industries, professions, and workplaces impacted by high rates of suicide, develop and provide online resources to disseminate best practices in workplace mental health and suicide prevention, and provide trainings for industries with the highest suicide rates and who are unable to pay for trainings;

(ii) Conduct a workplace suicide summit;

(iii) Deliver the task force's SAFER intervention and firearms and medication locking devices in partnership with nongovernment organizations in twelve rural communities across Washington; and

(iv) Develop and distribute a tool kit for suicide prevention and curriculum for firearms safety instructors for their inclusion in firearms safety courses.

(b) The task force shall distribute to all firearms dealers in the state suicide awareness and prevention materials tailored to firearms owners that are developed. Firearms dealers are strongly encouraged to post on the premises and make available to firearms purchasers and transferees the suicide awareness and prevention materials.

(c) The task force shall provide a report to the legislature regarding the directives of this subsection, and the report shall be included in the task force's final report to the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(29) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $8,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the pharmacy quality assurance commission to:

(a) Distribute or make available through electronic means to all licensed pharmacies suicide awareness and prevention materials developed by the suicide-safer homes task force, and each licensed pharmacy shall, when deemed appropriate through patient evaluation, make available to patients at the point of care the suicide awareness and prevention materials distributed by the commission; and

(b) Survey each pharmacist licensed under this chapter on methods to bridge the gap between practice and suicide awareness and prevention training, including identifying barriers that exist in putting the training into practice. The commission shall consult with the suicide-safer homes task force in developing the survey. The commission may distribute the survey as part of each pharmacist's license renewal. The commission shall compile and analyze the survey data and report the results to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2020.

(30) $1,310,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington medical commission for clinical health care investigators.

(31) $3,210,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the nursing care quality assurance commission to address increased complaints.

(32) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.12.470, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 71.12.485.

(33) $18,000,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide core medical services, case management, and support services for individuals living with human immunodeficiency virus.

(34) $1,606,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for staff, equipment, testing supplies, and materials necessary to add Pompe disease and MPS-I to the mandatory newborn screening panel. The department is authorized to increase the newborn screening fee by $10.50.

(35) $332,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for testing supplies necessary to perform x-linked adrenoleukodystrophy newborn screening panel testing. The department is authorized to increase the newborn screening fee by $1.90.

(36) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to conduct formative research and development regarding dementia and the value and importance of early detection, diagnosis, and planning for the public, including racial and ethnic groups who are at increased risk. Qualified department staff or contracted experts must: (a) Investigate existing evidence-based messages and public awareness campaign strategies; and (b) develop, place, and evaluate messages through a short-term digital awareness campaign in at least two, but no more than four, targeted areas of the state.

(37) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization that provides support and education for adults, children, and families impacted by cancer. The nonprofit must provide programs and services that include, but are not limited to, adult support groups, camps for children impacted by cancer, education programs for teens to reduce future risk of cancer, and emotional and social support to families dealing with cancer.

(38) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the state producing generic prescription drugs, with a priority on insulin. By December 1, 2019, the department shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the legislature.

(39) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1587 (increasing access to fruits and vegetables). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(40) The department must submit an application for an extension or renewal of its current grant pursuant to the federal food insecurity incentives program. If an extension or renewal of the current grant is not permitted, the department must apply for a new grant under the same program, which was reauthorized in December 2018.

(41) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 1638 (vaccine preventable diseases). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(42) $207,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 69, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1198) (sexual misconduct notification).

(43) $203,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $66,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1394 (behavioral health facilities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(44) $36,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1554 (dental hygienists). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(45) $189,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1094 (medical marijuana renewals). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(46) $200,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 68, Laws of 2019 (HB 1177) (dental laboratory registry).

(47) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for an online tutorial and link to web-based, continuing education funded by the centers for disease control for training for the primary care health workforce regarding the protocols for perinatal monitoring, birth-dose immunization, early diagnosis, linkage to care, and treatment for persons diagnosed with chronic hepatitis B or hepatitis using the project ECHO telehealth model operated by the University of Washington. Training shall focus on increased provider proficiency and increased number of trained providers in areas with high rates of reported cases of hepatitis B or hepatitis, including regions with high incidence of drug use or upward trend of children who have not received hepatitis B virus vaccinations according to centers for disease control recommendations. All digital and hardcopy training, educational, and outreach materials for this program must be culturally relevant and linguistically diverse.

(48) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to the department of health for a task force established to recommend strategies for incorporating environmental justice principles into how state agencies discharge their responsibilities.

(a) The membership of the task force established under this section is as follows:

(i) The director of the department of commerce, or the director's designee;

(ii) The director of the department of ecology, or the director's designee;

(iii) The executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, or the executive director's designee;

(iv) The secretary of the department of transportation, or the secretary's designee;

(v) The secretary of the department of health, or the secretary's designee;

(vi) The chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, or the chair's designee;

(vii) The chair of the governor's interagency council on health disparities, or the chair's designee;

(viii) The commissioner of public lands, or the commissioner's designee;

(ix) A member from an organization representing statewide environmental justice issues, appointed by the governor;

(x) Three members from community-based organizations, appointed by the cochairs specified under (b) of this subsection, the nominations of which are based upon maintaining a balanced and diverse distribution, of representation from census tracts that are ranked at an eight or higher on the cumulative impact analysis and of ethnic, geographic, gender, sexual orientation, age, socioeconomic status, and occupational representation, where practicable;

(xi) A tribal leader, invited by the governor;

(xii) One member from an association representing business interests, appointed by the governor;

(xiii) One member from a union or other organized labor association representing worker interests, appointed by the governor;

(xiv) The director of the department of agriculture, or the director's designee; and

(xv) One member from an organization representing statewide agricultural interests, appointed by the governor.

(b) The representative of statewide environmental justice interests, and the chair of the governor's interagency council on health disparities, or the chair's designee, must cochair the task force.

(c) The governor's interagency council on health disparities shall provide staff support to the task force. The interagency council may work with other agencies, departments, or offices as necessary to provide staff support to the task force.

(d) The task force must submit a final report of its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by October 31, 2020, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036. The goal of the final report is to provide guidance to agencies, the legislature, and the governor, and at a minimum must include the following:

(i) Guidance for state agencies regarding how to use a cumulative impact analysis tool developed by the department of health. Guidance must cover how agencies identify highly impacted communities and must be based on best practices and current demographic data;

(ii) Best practices for increasing public participation and engagement by providing meaningful opportunities for involvement for all people, taking into account barriers to participation that may arise due to race, color, ethnicity, religion, income, or education level;

(iii) Recommendations for establishing measurable goals for reducing environmental health disparities for each community in Washington state and ways in which state agencies may focus their work towards meeting those goals;

(iv) Model policies for prioritizing highly impacted communities and vulnerable populations for the purpose of reducing environmental health disparities and advancing a healthy environment for all residents.

(e) If time and resources permit, the task force may also include in its final report:

(i) Recommendations for creating and implementing equity analysis into all significant planning, programmatic and policy decision making, and investments. The equity analysis methods may include a process for describing potential risks to, benefits to, and opportunities for highly impacted communities and vulnerable populations;

(ii) Best practices and needed resources for cataloging and cross-referencing current research and data collection for programs within all state agencies relating to the health and environment of people of all races, cultures, and income levels, including minority populations and low-income populations of the state.

(f) Members of the task force who are not state employees must be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and are entitled to reimbursement individually for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the task force in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The expenses of the task force must be paid by the governor's interagency council on health disparities.

(g) The task force must hold four regional meetings to seek input from, present their work plan and proposals to, and receive feedback from communities throughout the state. The following locations must be considered for these meetings: Northwest Washington, central Puget Sound region, south Puget Sound region, southwest Washington, central Washington, and eastern Washington.

(h) Reports submitted under this section must be available for public inspection and copying through the governor's interagency council on health disparities and must be posted on its web site.

(49) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for testing of lead in public schools. The department must determine which school districts have the highest priority and test those districts first. The department and the school districts for which tests are conducted must provide to parents, educators, school staff, and the public clear communications regarding the test results, the consequences of even low levels of exposure or ingestion, such as cognitive deficits, reduction in IQ, and neurological development, and the information that no level of lead in drinking water is safe. The communications must include a comparison of the results to the recommendation of the American academy of pediatrics (August 2017) and the national toxicology program of the national institutes of health and the center for disease control, regardless of whether the level exceeds the standard for action pursuant to the federal lead and copper rule. Communications regarding test results where levels exceed the level recommended by the American academy of pediatricians must be accompanied by examples of actions districts may take to prevent exposure, including automated flushing of water fountains and sinks, and installation of certified water filters or bottle filling stations.

(50) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $360,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for staff, equipment, testing supplies, and materials necessary to add spinal muscular atrophy to the mandatory newborn screening panel. The department is authorized to increase the newborn screening fee by $4.30 for this purpose. The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020, if it anticipates that the amounts raised by the screening fee will not be sufficient to cover the costs of administering the program. The report shall identify the amount of any fee increase necessary to cover such costs.

(51) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to cover increased costs for the child profile health promotion notification system. The department shall review its processes for efficiencies and possible technological advances to reduce costs in future biennia. The department should review at least the following: (a) Use of technology; (b) frequency of communication; (c) available alternative funding sources; and (d) use of the system for other public awareness campaigns that might create new funding streams. The department shall report its findings and any recommendations to the legislature by December 15, 2020.

(52) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to improve behavioral health and suicide prevention through implementation of the recommendations of the agricultural industry task force, to include statewide agricultural industry specific suicide prevention education and training, and increased crisis hotline capacity.

(53) $1,674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6254 (vapor products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(54) $746,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2426 (psychiatric patient safety). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(55) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of:

(a) Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6309 (WIC fruit & veg. benefit);

(b) Substitute Senate Bill No. 6086 (opioid use/medications);

(c) Substitute Senate Bill No. 6526 (prescription drug reuse);

(d) Senate Bill No. 6038 (acupuncture and eastern med.); and

(e) Substitute Senate Bill No. 6663 (eating disorders & diabetes).

(56) $1,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to increase incentives for individuals with limited incomes on the supplemental nutrition assistance program to purchase fruits and vegetables.

(57) $4,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to replace the loss of federal funding to maintain family planning services across the state.

(58) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to convene a work group of relevant stakeholders to propose funding and policy initiatives to address the spread of sexually transmitted infections in Washington. The work group should focus on the prevention of infections and expanding access to pre- and post-exposure prophylaxis treatments. The department must provide a report of the work group recommendations to the legislature by December 15, 2020.

(59) $35,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6143 (podiatric medical board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(60) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6342 (drinking water/chemicals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(61) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6570 (law enforce. mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(62) $83,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6551 (international medical grads). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(63) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,995,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to support incident management activities to prepare for a potential outbreak of the 2019 novel coronavirus and to limit the spread of the contagion among the state's population.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,386,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,995,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department of health for its nonbudgeted costs. To the fullest extent possible, the department shall maximize the use of available federal funding for this purpose.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $8,614,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to support the incident management activities of local health jurisdictions. Local health jurisdictions must submit requests for reimbursement to the department for disbursement of these funds.

(64) $20,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6641 (sex offender treatment avail). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(65) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6580 (organ transport vehicles). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(66) $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to coordinate with local health jurisdictions to establish and maintain comprehensive group B programs to ensure safe drinking water. These funds shall be used to support the costs of the development and adoption of rules, policies, and procedures, and for technical assistance, training, and other program-related costs.

Sec. 222. 2019 c 415 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($68,636,000))

$68,273,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($69,672,000))

$72,313,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,616,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($146,324,000))

$148,602,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((b)))(a) Within the funds appropriated in the subsection the department shall review and update the necessary business requirements for implementation of a comprehensive electronic health records system. The department will utilize its feasibility study from 2013 and the health informatics roadmap completed in 2017 to update its business requirements and complete a request for information process by May 31, 2021. The department shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature outlining the system specifications and a cost model for implementation no later than June 30, 2021. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(((c)))(b) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1517 (domestic violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d)))(c)(i) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must revise its agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(A) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(B) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(I) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(II) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(III) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(ii) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the department or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(iii) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(((e)))(d) The appropriations in this subsection include sufficient funding for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5021 (DOC/interest arbitration).

(e) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($563,549,000))

$558,288,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($582,774,000))

$595,611,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$818,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,680,000))

$4,679,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$62,920,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,214,741,000))

$1,222,316,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may contract for local jail beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender excluding the costs of department of corrections provided services, including evidence-based substance abuse programming, dedicated department of corrections classification staff on-site for individualized case management, transportation of offenders to and from department of corrections facilities, and gender responsive training for Yakima jail staff assigned to the unit. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as close medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for offenders held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meet standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.

(b) $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester.

(c) The appropriations in this subsection include sufficient funding for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5492 (motor vehicle felonies).

(d) $1,861,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,861,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract for the costs associated with use of offender bed capacity in lieu of prison beds for a therapeutic community program in Yakima county. The department shall provide a report to the legislature by December 15, 2019, outlining the program, its outcomes, and any improvements made over the previous contracted beds.

(e) $3,314,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,014,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to increase custody staffing in its prison facilities to provide watch staff for hospital stays, mental health needs, and suicide watches to reduce overtime hours. The department shall track and report to the legislature on the changes in working conditions and overtime usage for nursing services by November 15, 2019.

(f) (($1,774,000))$1,071,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,567,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement the settlement agreement in Disability Rights Washington v. Inslee, et al., U.S. District Court for the Western District of Washington, cause No. 18-5071, for the portions of the agreement that require additional staff necessary to supervise individuals with greater out-of-cell time and to facilitate access to programming, treatment, and other required activities. If the settlement agreement is not fully executed and approved by the court before September 1, 2019, this appropriation shall lapse.

(g) (($764,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and)) $663,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 ((are))is provided solely for the department for payment of debt service associated with a certificate of participation for the equipment at the coyote ridge corrections center and its security electronics network project.

(h) $1,013,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(i) $927,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6064 (body scanners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(j) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476 (correctional services access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($220,368,000))

$227,299,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($240,790,000))

$237,151,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,632,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,800,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($477,590,000))

$480,882,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $1,320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department of corrections to negotiate annual contract rate increases with local and tribal governments for jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision and must include increases for a regional jail serving the south King county area for providing enhanced medical services. A contract rate increase may not exceed five percent each year. The department may negotiate to include medical care of offenders in the contract rate if medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff. If medical care of offender is included in the contract rate, the contract rate may exceed five percent to include the cost of that service.

(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.

(((d)))(c) $984,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $8,066,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to create two hundred work release beds in the community by the end of fiscal year 2021. The department shall create an implementation plan and provide a report to the legislature by September 1, 2019, that outlines when and where the work release facilities will be implemented.

(((e)))(d) $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1517 (domestic violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(e) $245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(f) Funding in this subsection is sufficient for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6370 (individuals in DOC custody).

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($6,448,000))

$6,471,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($6,590,000))

$6,577,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$510,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($13,548,000))

$13,558,000

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($46,625,000))

$47,645,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($45,238,000))

$46,354,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($91,863,000))

$93,999,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6064 (body scanners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(c) Funding in this subsection is sufficient for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6370 (individuals in DOC custody).

(6) OFFENDER CHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($59,538,000))

$59,452,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($61,135,000))

$61,761,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,430,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($125,103,000))

$125,643,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for offender programming. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(b) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for additional rental vouchers for individuals released from prison facilities.

(c) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5441 (rental vouchers/offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d) $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5433 (DOC/post secondary education). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) HEALTH CARE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($160,657,000))

$163,697,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($164,466,000))

$172,973,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($325,123,000))

$338,070,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

(b) $895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to increase on call nursing and overtime staff in order to cover required nursing posts in its prison facilities. The department shall track and report to the legislature on the changes in working conditions and overtime usage for nursing services by December 21, 2019.

(c) (($174,000))$108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $164,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement the settlement agreement in Disability Rights Washington v. Inslee, et. al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 18-5071, for the portions of the agreement that require additional staff necessary to supervise individuals with greater out-of-cell time and to facilitate access to programming, treatment and other required activities. If the settlement agreement is not fully executed and approved by the court before September 1, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d) $307,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e) $483,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6064 (body scanners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(f) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476 (correctional services access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 223. 2019 c 415 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($3,653,000))

$3,611,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($3,971,000))

$3,930,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$25,492,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$172,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($33,348,000))

$33,265,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for vocational rehabilitation supported employment services for additional eligible clients with visual disabilities who would otherwise be placed on the federally required order of selection waiting list.

(2) $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the independent living program.

Sec. 224. 2019 c 415 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$35,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$35,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($224,813,000))

$252,142,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,401,000))

$36,402,000

Unemployment Compensation Administration

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($299,413,000))

$277,404,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,248,000))

$26,249,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($54,315,000))

$65,527,000

Family and Medical Leave Insurance Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($78,290,000))

$114,749,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$14,103,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($733,653,000))

$786,646,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.

(2) $70,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $3,516,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5438 (ag & seasonal workforce srv). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $4,636,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the statewide reentry initiative to connect incarcerated individuals to employment resources prior to and after release.

(5) $14,103,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1087 (long-term services and support). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $162,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1399 (paid family and medical leave). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $36,428,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase staffing levels and funding for the paid family medical leave program in order to align with projected business needs. The department must reassess its ongoing staffing and funding needs for the paid family medical leave program and submit documentation of the updated need to the office of financial management by September 1, 2020.

(8) $11,019,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for increased compensation and other administrative costs that federal grant dollars are insufficient to cover.

(a) The department shall report the following information to the appropriate staff in senate committee services, the office of program research, the legislative evaluation and accountability program, and the office of financial management by June 30, 2020:

(i) A full accounting of federal grants received by the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for each fiscal year from fiscal year 2008 through fiscal year 2020;

(ii) A full accounting of state funding available to the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for each fiscal year from fiscal year 2008 through fiscal year 2020;

(iii) A history of staffing levels by line of business or activity, identifying sources of state or federal funding, for each fiscal year from fiscal year 2008 through fiscal year 2020; and

(iv) An inventory of the department's programs, services, and activities, identifying funding sources used for each.

(b) The department shall report the following to the legislature and the governor by September 30, 2020:

(i) A staffing model that is based on historical data regarding staffing levels in times of recession and full employment; and

(ii) A spending plan to ensure the financial solvency of the accounts supporting the unemployment insurance and employment services programs, including federal funding, the employment services administrative account and the administrative contingency account.

(9) $190,000 of the employment services administrative account— state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5473 (unemployment benefits/cause). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10)(a) Within existing resources, the department shall coordinate outreach and education to paid family and medical leave benefit recipients with a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system that connects families with children prenatal through age five and residing in Washington state to appropriate services and community resources. This coordination shall include but is not limited to placing information about the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system on the paid family and medical leave program web site and in printed materials, and conducting joint events.

(b) Within existing resources, by December 1, 2020, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the ability for the paid family and medical leave program and a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system to provide integrated services to eligible beneficiaries. The report shall include an analysis of any statutory changes needed to allow information and data to be shared between the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system and the paid family and medical leave program.

Sec. 225. 2019 c 415 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

(1) CHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($399,796,000))

$401,235,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($412,306,000))

$410,770,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($542,242,000))

$459,028,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,824,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,892,000))

$24,916,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,385,060,000))

$1,298,773,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(b) $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the costs of hub home foster families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a licensed hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.

(c) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $110,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(d) $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for an expansion to child advocacy center services.

(e) $1,884,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($1,884,000))$2,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $533,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($533,000))$1,049,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to expand performance-based contracts through network administrators.

(f) (($3,291,000))$2,799,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($5,998,000))$1,754,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and (($5,876,000))$5,444,000 of the general fund-federal appropriation are provided solely for social worker and related staff to receive, refer, and respond to screened-in reports of child abuse and neglect pursuant to chapter 208, Laws of 2018.

(g) Beginning October 1, 2019, and each calendar quarter thereafter, the department shall provide a tracking report for social service specialists and corresponding social services support staff to the office of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. ((The))To the extent to which the information is available, the report shall include the following information identified separately for social service specialists doing case management work, supervisory work, and administrative support staff, and identified separately by job duty or program, including but not limited to intake, child protective services investigations, child protective services family assessment response, and child and family welfare services:

(i) Total full time equivalent employee authority, allotments and expenditures by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program;

(ii) Vacancy rates by region, office, and classification and band; and

(iii) Average length of employment with the department, and when applicable, the date of exit for staff exiting employment with the department by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program.

(h) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.

(i) $3,910,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,910,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $2,336,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to reduce the caseload ratios of social workers serving children in foster care, to promote decreased lengths of stay and to make progress towards achievement of the Braam settlement caseload outcomes.

(j)(A) $539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $656,000 of the general fund private/local appropriation, and $252,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, or regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(B) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.

(k) The department shall continue to implement policies to reduce the percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation, including clarification of the threshold for transition from supervised to unsupervised visitation prior to reunification.

(l) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $112,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, implement, and expand strategies to improve the capacity, reliability, and effectiveness of contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care and their parents and siblings. Strategies may include, but are not limited to, increasing mileage reimbursement for providers, offering transportation-only contract options, and mechanisms to reduce the level of parent-child supervision when doing so is in the best interest of the child.

(m) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.

(n) $1,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $156,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the travel reimbursement for in-home service providers.

(o) The department is encouraged to control exceptional reimbursement decisions so that the child's needs are met without excessive costs.

(p) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.

(q) (($1,740,000))$5,040,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $1,741,000))$7,088,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 ((is)), and $961,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement contracts. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(q), $2,074,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $230,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracts with enhanced therapeutic services and greater staff-to-child ratios. The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments and shall submit as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 any costs associated with increases in the number of emergent placement contract beds after the effective date of this section that cannot be sustained within existing appropriations.

(r) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for continued implementation of Chapter 80, Laws of 2018 (2SSB 6453) (kinship caregiver legal support).

(s)(i) (($10,828,000))$8,173,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($10,993,000))$13,138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and (($13,365,000))$3,891,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for rate increases for behavioral rehabilitation services providers. The department shall modify the rate structure to one that is based on placement setting rather than acuity level pursuant to the rate study submitted in December 2018.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2020, and continuing through the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must provide semi-annual reports to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of in-state behavioral rehabilitation services providers and licensed beds, the number of out-of-state behavioral rehabilitation services placements, the number of hotel or office stays, and a comparison of these numbers to the same metrics expressed as an average over the first six months of calendar year 2019. Beginning in state fiscal year 2021, the report shall identify beds with the enhanced behavioral health services rate identified in (t) of this subsection.

(t) $3,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $2,117,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to establish behavioral rehabilitation services-plus contracts to serve dependent youth whose needs cannot be met with basic behavioral rehabilitation services, and who are transitioning from a hospital or other inpatient treatment, emergent placement services, a hotel stay, or an out-of-state placement. Contracts for behavioral rehabilitation services-plus services must offer enhanced rates that support therapeutic services, increased staff-to-child ratios, and placement stabilization.

(u) $1,080,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $720,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to engage with a behavioral rehabilitation services or behavioral rehabilitation services-plus provider or providers who previously provided behavioral rehabilitation services to the state but who do not have a contract with the department on the effective date of this section, and who can serve dependent youth whose needs require a staff-to-child ratio that is higher than one staff to three children. The funding in this subsection is provided on a one-time basis for fiscal year 2021 only.

(v) Within existing resources, the department shall implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (confinement alts./children).

(((u)))(w) $530,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $106,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to contract with a community organization with expertise in the yvlifeset case management model to serve youth and young adults currently being served or exiting the foster care, juvenile justice, and mental health systems to successfully transition into self-reliant adults.

(($767,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and))(x) $766,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 ((are))is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5718 (child welfare housing assistance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(v)))(y) $413,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $413,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $826,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase family reconciliation services.

(((w)))(z) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing the supportive visitation model that utilizes trained visit navigators to provide a structured and positive visitation experience for children and their parents.

(((x)))(aa) The department of children, youth, and families shall enter into interagency agreements with the office of public defense and office of civil legal aid to facilitate the use of federal Title IV-E reimbursement for parent representation and child representation services.

(((y)))(bb) $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5955 (DCYF/statewide system). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(z) $7,586,000))(cc) $15,046,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to leverage federal title IV-E funds available under the family first prevention services act for qualifying services and families.

(i) In fiscal year 2020, the department shall work with the department of social and health services to complete an evaluation of kinship navigator services that would enable establishment of a well-supported, supported, or promising practice model.

(ii) No later than December 1, 2019, the department shall report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on the feasibility of claiming federal title IV-E reimbursement in fiscal year 2021 for home visiting services and kinship navigator services. The report shall include the estimated share of the current population receiving home visiting services whom the department would consider candidates for foster care for the purposes of title IV-E reimbursement under the family first prevention services act, and the estimated workload impacts for the department to identify and document the candidacy of populations receiving home visiting services.

(((aa)))(dd) $443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $818,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for ten child and family welfare services case workers.

(((bb) $379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to contract with a county-wide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a pilot project to prevent child abuse and neglect using nationally recognized models. Of the amounts provided:

(i) $323,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $333,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the nonprofit organization to convene stakeholders to implement a countywide resource and referral linkage system for families of children who are prenatal through age five.

(ii) $56,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the nonprofit organization to offer a voluntary brief newborn home visiting program. The program must meet the diverse needs of Pierce county residents and, therefore, it must be flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive. The department, in collaboration with the nonprofit organization, must examine the feasibility of leveraging federal and other fund sources, including federal Title IV-E and medicaid funds, for home visiting provided through the pilot. The department must report its findings to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2019.))

(ee) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a contract with a national nonprofit organization to, in partnership with private matching funds, subcontract with a community organization for specialized, enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody. The contract must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children with high needs.

(ff) $21,700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $11,970,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to backfill for title iv-e federal funding that is not available for the state's family assessment response demonstration program.

(gg) $5,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,870,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase basic foster care maintenance payments by approximately $110 per child per month beginning July 1, 2020.

(hh) $360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $140,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to assist relative and kin caregivers in becoming licensed foster parents. The department shall report to the legislature and the office of financial management no later than September 30, 2020, the following information:

(i) The total number of relative and kin caregivers;

(ii) The number of relative and kin caregivers who are licensed; and

(iii) The estimated annual costs to the state of issuing foster care licenses to currently unlicensed relative and kin caregivers. The estimate must include operational costs to the department and the cost of additional foster care maintenance payments based on current rates.

(ii) $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to screen foster children ages zero to three for developmental delays, and to make referrals for early intervention services through the early start for infants and toddlers program.

(jj) $499,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $155,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6422 (family connections program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(kk) $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $26,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (confinement alts./children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(ll) $1,001,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $282,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the monthly child placing agency case management service fee rate. Funding in this subsection is sufficient to increase the rate by 18 percent.

(mm) $666,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $74,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Fourth Substitute Senate Bill No. 5533 (parental improvement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(nn) $696,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to contract with an entity or entities who can provide opportunities for youth in out-of-home placements to participate in extracurricular activities.

(oo) $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to expand the department's capacity to perform background checks for individuals seeking employment with facilities and providers serving dependent children and youth, child care providers, and other children-related and youth-related programs.

(2) JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($100,860,000))

$100,883,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($101,604,000))

$110,745,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,464,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,985,000))

$1,790,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$196,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,362,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($216,471,000))

$225,440,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(b) $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for the juvenile justice programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding for program-specific participation and the department shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.

(c) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for expansion of the juvenile justice treatments and therapies in department of children, youth, and families programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." The department may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(d)(i) $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority.

(ii) The department of children, youth, and families shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service (CJS) funds, community juvenile accountability act (CJAA) grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative (CDDA), and suspended disposition alternative (SDA). The department of children, youth, and families shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (A) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (B) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (C) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (D) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (E) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (F) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the department of children, youth, and families and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(iii) The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (d)(ii) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(iv) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the department of children, youth, and families and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(e) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(f) $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the juvenile detention alternatives initiative.

(g) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The department of children, youth, and families may award grants under this subsection. The department of children, youth, and families shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the department of children, youth, and families on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(h) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(i) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts to establish alternative detention facilities similar to the proctor house model in Jefferson county, Washington, that will provide less restrictive confinement alternatives to youth in their local communities. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding and each entity receiving funds must report to the department on the number and types of youth serviced, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(j) $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide housing services to clients releasing from incarceration into the community.

(k) $2,063,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,606,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1646 (juvenile rehabilitation confinement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(l) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for a contract with a non-governmental entity to research youth violence prevention strategies and explore new and existing resources to implement evidence-based youth prevention strategies in the city of Federal Way.

(m) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided for the department to measure the fidelity of the evidence-based interventions incorporated into the integrated treatment model. By July 1, 2020, the department must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the results of the assessment of the integrated treatment model.

(n) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for community-based violence prevention and intervention services to individuals identified through the King county shots fired social network analysis. The department must complete an evaluation of the program and provide a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by September 15, 2021.

(o) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of juvenile justice to establish a grant program for evidence-based services to youth who are at high risk to perpetrate gun violence and who reside in areas with high rates of gun violence.

(i) Priority shall be given to one site serving in south King county and one site in Yakima county.

(ii) Priority for funding shall be given to sites who partner with the University of Washington to deliver family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger advocates.

(p) $1,059,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6112 (youth solitary confinement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(q) $1,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for increased staffing to facilitate the transfer of individuals from the department of corrections.

(3) EARLY LEARNING PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($232,310,000))

$209,214,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($246,369,000))

$237,246,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($444,984,000))

$412,831,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($100,000))

$1,115,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($28,336,000))

$28,156,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,798,000))

$14,926,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,677,000))

$28,522,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,900,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,078,474,000))

$1,015,910,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a)(((i) $81,236,000))$80,273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($89,410,000))$93,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, (($24,250,000))$24,070,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 14,000 slots in fiscal year 2020 and 14,662 slots in fiscal year 2021. Of the 14,662 slots in fiscal year 2021, 50 slots must be reserved for foster children to receive school-year-round enrollment.

(((ii) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.))

(i) Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection (4)(a), $2,833,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a two percent rate increase for early childhood education and assistance program providers.

(ii) Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection (4)(a), $2,220,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a rate enhancement for early childhood education and assistance program providers providing services to children with special needs and different abilities, including behavioral challenges.

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to develop and provide culturally relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.

(c) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies.

(d) (($76,453,000))$54,947,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020, (($82,736,000))$67,284,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021, and $283,375,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the working connections child care program under ((RCW 43.215.135))RCW 43.216.135. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $78,101,000 of the general fund—state appropriation shall be claimed toward the state's temporary assistance for needy families federal maintenance of effort requirement. The department shall work in collaboration with the department of social and health services to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the monthly temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement.

(ii) $44,103,000 is for the compensation components of the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as provided in section 943 of this act.

(iii) $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1303 (child care/higher education) ((or Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2158 (workforce education investment). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection (d)(iii) shall lapse)).

(iv) $526,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1603 (economic assistance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection (d)(iv) shall lapse.))

(v) (($101,414,000))$118,635,000 is for subsidy rate increases for child care center providers. Funding in this subsection is sufficient to achieve the 55th percentile of market at a level 3 standard of quality in fiscal year 2020 and the 67th percentile of market at a level 3 standard of quality in fiscal year 2021.

(vi) $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $925,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to extend the working connections child care homeless grace period to six months. The department shall implement rules to extend the homeless grace period to six months.

(vii) $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $645,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to allow eligible parents aged twenty-one or younger who are attending high school or pursuing a high school equivalency degree to access working connections child care, without a minimum number of hours of employment. The department shall implement rules to waive the copay for this population.

(viii) In order to not exceed the appropriated amount, the department shall manage the program so that the average monthly caseload does not exceed 33,000 households and the department shall give prioritized access into the program according to the following order:

(A) Families applying for or receiving temporary assistance for needy families (TANF);

(B) TANF families curing sanction;

(C) Foster children;

(D) Families that include a child with special needs;

(E) Families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center;

(F) Families with a child residing with a biological parent or guardian who have received child protective services, child welfare services, or a family assessment response from the department in the past six months, and have received a referral for child care as part of the family's case management;

(G) Families that received subsidies within the last thirty days and:

(I) Have reapplied for subsidies; and

(II) Have household income of two hundred percent of the federal poverty level or below; and

(H) All other eligible families.

(((vii)))(ix) The department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must submit a follow-up report by December 1, 2019, to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on quality control measures for the working connections child care program. The report must include:

(A) An updated narrative of the procurement and implementation of an improved time and attendance system, including an updated and detailed accounting of the final costs of procurement and implementation;

(B) An updated and comprehensive description of all processes, including computer algorithms and additional rule development, that the department and the department of social and health services have implemented and that are planned to be implemented to avoid overpayments. The updated report must include an itemized description of the processes implemented or planned to be implemented to address each of the following:

(I) Ensure the department's auditing efforts are informed by regular and continuous alerts of the potential for overpayments;

(II) Avoid overpayments, including the billing of more regular business days than are in a month, to the maximum extent possible and expediently recover overpayments that have occurred;

(III) Withhold payment from providers when necessary to incentivize receipt of the necessary documentation to complete an audit;

(IV) Establish methods for reducing future payments or establishing repayment plans in order to recover any overpayments;

(V) Sanction providers, including termination of eligibility, who commit intentional program violations or fail to comply with program requirements, including compliance with any established repayment plans;

(VI) Consider pursuit of prosecution in cases with fraudulent activity; and

(VII) Ensure two half-day rates totaling more than one hundred percent of the daily rate are not paid to providers; and

(C) A description of the process by which fraud is identified and how fraud investigations are prioritized and expedited.

(((viii)))(x) Beginning July 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program.

(A) The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(((A)))(I) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;

(((B)))(II) The reason for each overpayment;

(((C)))(III) The total cost of overpayments;

(((D)))(IV) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and

(((E)))(V) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.

(B) The annual report due July 1, 2020, shall include options and recommendations for a new methodology for calculating savings projections from the implementation of the child care time and attendance system.

(e) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(f) $1,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $13,424,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program. If federal sequestration cuts are realized, cuts to the seasonal child care program must be proportional to other federal reductions made within the department.

(g) $379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to contract with a countywide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a pilot project to prevent child abuse and neglect using nationally recognized models. Of the amounts provided:

(i) $323,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $333,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the nonprofit organization to convene stakeholders to implement a countywide resource and referral linkage system for families of children who are prenatal through age five.

(ii) $56,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the nonprofit organization to offer a voluntary brief newborn home visiting program. The program must meet the diverse needs of Pierce county residents and, therefore, it must be flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive. The department, in collaboration with the nonprofit organization, must examine the feasibility of leveraging federal and other fund sources, including federal Title IV-E and medicaid funds, for home visiting provided through the pilot. The department must report its findings to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2019.

(h)(($4,674,000))$4,653,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($3,598,000))$3,587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,076,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall ensure that contracted providers pursue receipt of federal funding associated with the early support for infants and toddlers program. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.

(((h)))(i) $38,622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $38,095,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $33,908,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain the requirements set forth in chapter 7, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess. The department shall place a ten percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. In a bi-annual report to the governor and the legislature, the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.

(ii) $17,955,000 is for quality improvement awards, of which $1,650,000 is to provide a $500 increase for awards for select providers rated level three to five in accordance with the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as set forth in section 943 of this act.

(iii) $1,283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $417,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1391 (early achievers program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection (h)(iii) shall lapse.

(i)))(j) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(((j)))(k) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.

(((k)))(l) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(((l)))(m)(i)(A) The department is required to provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.

(B) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry starting in the 2015-16 school year, and every school year thereafter. By October 2017, and every October thereafter, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.

(C) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.

(D) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data every March for the previous school year.

(ii) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

(((m)))(n) The department shall work with state and local law enforcement, federally recognized tribal governments, and tribal law enforcement to develop a process for expediting fingerprinting and data collection necessary to conduct background checks for tribal early learning and child care providers.

(((n)))(o) $5,157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,938,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for components of the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as set forth in section 943 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $1,302,000 is for the family child care provider 501(c)(3) organization for board-approved training;

(ii) $230,000 is for increasing training reimbursement up to $250 per person;

(iii) $115,000 is for training on the electronic child care time and attendance system;

(iv) $3,000,000 is to maintain the career development fund;

(v) $5,223,000 is for up to five days of substitute coverage per provider per year through the state-administered substitute pool.

(vi) $226,000 is to provide an increase to monthly health care premiums.

(((o)))(p) $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 236, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1445) (dual language in early learning & K-12).

(((p)))(q) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(((q)))(r) $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to continue a four year pilot for implementation of chapter 162, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5357) (outdoor early learning programs).

(((r)))(s) Within existing resources, the department shall implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5089 (early learning access).

(((s)))(t) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for additional facilitated play groups offered statewide to family, friend, and neighbor child care providers.

(((t)))(u)(i) The department of children, youth, and families, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial management, and the caseload forecast council must develop a proposal to transfer the annual allocations appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act for early intervention services for children with disabilities from birth through two years of age, from the superintendent of public instruction to the department of children, youth, and families beginning July 1, 2020. The department must submit a model detailing how allocations for this program will be determined and identifying the necessary statutory changes to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than September 1, 2019.

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2019, there shall be an administrative limit of five percent on all state funds allocated to school districts for early intervention services for children with disabilities from birth through two years of age.

(((u)))(v) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the expanded learning opportunity quality initiative pursuant to RCW 43.216.085(3)(d). No later than December 1, 2020, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the outcomes of this pilot program and recommendations for future implementation that includes phasing-out the need for ongoing state support.

(((v)))(w) $3,779,000 of the home visiting services—state appropriation and $3,779,000 of the home visiting services—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract for additional home visiting slots. To maximize the use of available federal funding, to the greatest extent possible, the department shall use these additional slots to serve families where one or more children are candidates for foster care. The federal amount in this subsection is contingent on the services and children being eligible under the federal family first prevention services act, P.L. 115-123. The department may not allocate the federal funds to contractors unless the federal funding requirements are met.

(((w)))(x) $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1344 (child care access work group). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(x)))(y) $773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5903 (children's mental health). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(z) $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to complete a report with options and recommendations for administrative efficiencies and long-term strategies that align and integrate high-quality early learning programs administered by both agencies. The report shall address capital needs, data collection and data sharing, licensing changes, quality standards, options for community-based and school-based settings, fiscal modeling, and any statutory changes needed to achieve administrative efficiencies. The report is due to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2020.

(aa) $3,523,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for scholarships for students seeking educational opportunities to meet licensing requirements or early achievers milestones. Of the amount in this subsection, $1,669,000 is one-time funding for scholarships for students on a waiting list.

(bb) $246,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5607 (dual language learning). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(cc) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6297 (early learning provider exp.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((4)))(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($75,435,000))

$118,365,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($76,908,000))

$200,356,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($55,824,000))

$160,320,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$195,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$180,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$472,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$354,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,000))

$2,990,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($208,181,000))

$483,232,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the coalition's plan for projects affecting the coalition organizations. The report must include any information technology projects impacting coalition organizations and, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, provide: (i) The status of any information technology projects currently being developed or implemented that affect the coalition; (ii) funding needs of these current and future information technology projects; and (iii) next steps for the coalition's information technology projects. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(b)(i) $963,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $963,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $180,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 14,000 slots in fiscal year 2020 and 14,662 slots in fiscal year 2021. Of the 14,662 in fiscal year 2021, 50 slots must be reserved for foster children to receive school-year-round enrollment.

(ii) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(c) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall ensure that contracted providers pursue receipt of federal funding associated with the early support for infants and toddlers program. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.

(($300,000))(d) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($300,000))$350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships providing technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

(((c)))(e) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $16,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(((d)))(f) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e)))(g) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a full-time employee to coordinate policies and programs to support pregnant and parenting individuals receiving chemical dependency or substance use disorder treatment.

(((f)))(h)(i) All agreements and contracts with vendors must include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(A) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(B) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(I) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(II) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(III) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(ii) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the department or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(iii) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(((g)))(i) The department must submit an agency budget request for the 2020 supplemental budget that identifies the amount of administrative funding to be transferred from appropriations in subsections (((1), (2), and (3)))(2), (3), and (4) of this section to this subsection (((4) of this section))(5).

(j) Beginning September 1, 2020, $85,380,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is transferred from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2787 (infants and toddlers).

(k) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $65,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6556 (mandated reporter options). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART III

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 301. 2019 c 415 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($544,000))

$605,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($570,000))

$667,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,138,000))

$1,157,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$46,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,330,000))

$2,507,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a land use planner to conduct compliance monitoring on approved development projects and develop and track measures on the commission's effectiveness in implementing the national scenic area management plan.

(2) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a land use planner to provide land use planning services dedicated to Klickitat county. Because the activities of the land use planner are solely for the benefit of Washington state, Oregon is not required to provide matching funds for this activity.

Sec. 302. 2019 c 415 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($30,725,000))

$31,041,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($29,342,000))

$33,535,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$110,053,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($23,406,000))

$27,064,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,906,000))

$4,912,000

Flood Control Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,174,000))

$4,180,000

State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,951,000))

$24,737,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$204,000

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account—Water

Supply Facilities—State Appropriation
. . . .
$183,000

Aquatic Algae Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$528,000

Water Rights Tracking System Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$48,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$582,000

Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$577,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,995,000

Water Rights Processing Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($237,148,000))

$253,896,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$499,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($47,872,000))

$47,984,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,963,000))

$3,968,000

Biosolids Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,703,000))

$2,706,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,150,000))

$7,159,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($19,626,000))

$21,196,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,452,000))

$4,458,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,351,000))

$9,165,000

Air Operating Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,679,000))

$4,686,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Oil Spill Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,076,000))

$8,576,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$465,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$464,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,920,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,858,000))

$4,214,000

Paint Product Stewardship Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$182,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($587,658,000))

$613,753,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(2) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Executive Order No. 12-07, Washington's response to ocean acidification.

(3) $726,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($1,432,000))$1,742,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,600,000 of the flood control assistance account—state appropriation are provided solely for the continued implementation of the streamflow restoration program provided in chapter 90.94 RCW. Funding must be used to develop watershed plans, oversee consultants, adopt rules, and develop or oversee capital grant-funded projects that will improve instream flows statewide.

(4) $1,259,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the increased costs for Washington conservation corp member living allowances, vehicles used to transport crews to worksites, and costs unsupported by static federal AmeriCorps grant reimbursement.

(5) $3,482,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement recommendations that come from chemical action plans (CAP), such as the interim recommendations addressing PFAS (per- and polyfluorinated alkyl substances) contamination in drinking water and sources of that contamination, to monitor results, and to develop new CAPs.

(6) $592,000 of the reclamation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to assess and explore opportunities to resolve water rights uncertainties and disputes through adjudications in selected basins where tribal senior water rights, unquantified claims, and similar uncertainties about the seniority, quantity, and validity of water rights exist.

(7) $2,147,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to address litter prevention and recycling programs, and in response to new China-imposed restrictions on the import of recyclable materials. Activities funded from this increased appropriation include litter pickup by ecology youth crews, local governments, and other state agencies, and litter prevention public education campaigns.

(8) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($67,000))$192,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) (($807,000))$1,286,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5135 (toxic pollution). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11)))(10) $392,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5397 (plastic packaging). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12)))(11) $1,450,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1543 (concerning sustainable recycling). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13)))(12) $342,000 of the air pollution control account—state appropriation and $619,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1112 (hydrofluorocarbons emissions). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14)))(13) $1,374,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1578 (oil transportation safety). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15)))(14) $264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with the Walla Walla watershed management partnership board of directors to develop a thirty-year integrated water resource management strategic plan and to provide partnership staffing, reporting, and operating budget costs associated with new activities as described in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5352 (Walla Walla watershed pilot). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)))(15) $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to grant to the northwest straits commission to distribute equally among the seven Puget Sound marine resource committees.

(((17)))(16) $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for rule making to change standards to allow for a higher volume of water to be spilled over Columbia river and Snake river dams to increase total dissolved gas for the benefit of Chinook salmon and other salmonids.

(((18)))(17) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the agency to convene a stakeholder work group to identify actions to decrease loading of priority pharmaceuticals into Puget Sound, contract for technical experts to provide literature review, conduct an analysis and determine best practices for addressing pharmaceutical discharges, and carry out laboratory testing and analysis.

(((19)))(18) $319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to increase coordination in reviewing shoreline armoring proposals to better protect forage fish.

(((20)))(19) $247,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $435,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for monitoring nutrient cycling and ocean acidification parameters at twenty marine stations in Puget Sound and Hood canal.

(((21)))(20) $250,000 of the flood control assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington conservation corps to carry out emergency activities to respond to flooding by repairing levees, preventing or mitigating an impending flood hazard, or filling and stacking sandbags. This appropriation is also for grants to local governments for emergency response needs, including the removal of structures and repair of small-scale levees and tidegates.

(((22)))(21) $500,000 of the model toxics control operating account—((local))state appropriation is provided solely for the Spokane river regional toxics task force to address elevated levels of polychlorinated biphenyls in the Spokane river.

(((23)))(22) $244,000 of the model toxics control operating—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5579 (crude oil volatility/rail). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24)))(23) $432,000 of the model toxics control operating—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1290 (voluntary cleanups/has waste). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25)))(24) $10,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to local governments for the purpose of supporting local solid waste and financial assistance programs.

(((26)))(25) $100,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to produce a synopsis of current maritime vessel activity, navigation lanes, and anchorages in the northern Puget Sound and the strait of Juan de Fuca, including vessel transit in Canadian portions of transboundary waters. Consistent with RCW 43.372.030, the synopsis must compile key findings and baseline information on the spatial and temporal distribution of and intensity of current maritime vessel activity. The department may collect new information on vessel activity, including information on commercial and recreational fishing, where relevant to the synopsis. In producing the synopsis, the department must invite the participation of Canadian agencies and first nations, and must coordinate with federal agencies, other state agencies, federally recognized Indian tribes, commercial and recreational vessel operators and organizations representing such operators, and other stakeholders. The department must provide a draft of the synopsis to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021.

(((27)))(26) $500,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1114 (food waste reduction). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(28)))(27) $465,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $464,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2052 (marijuana product testing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29)))(28) $182,000 of the paint product stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1652 (paint stewardship). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(29) $535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to develop a Puget Sound nutrients general permit for wastewater treatment plants in Puget Sound to reduce nutrients in wastewater discharges to Puget Sound.

(30) $9,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for local solid waste financial assistance which support local government services for keeping household hazardous substances from polluting the environment.

(31) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to San Juan county for a study to build on the existing knowledge of the islands' water resources to gain a current understanding of the state of groundwater in the county, including hydrologic data evaluation, completing recharge estimates, and updating the water balance.

(32) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to offer a grant to Clark county for the purpose of designing the process for developing a long-term plan to restore and maintain the health of Vancouver lake, a category 5 303(d) status impaired body of water, as well as designing an institutional structure to take responsibility for the plan's implementation in a financially sustainable manner. The plan will build on existing work completed by the county, state agencies, and nonprofit organizations. The department will support the work of the county to include involvement by property owners around the lake and within the watersheds that drain to the lake, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, other state agencies and local governments with proprietary or regulatory jurisdiction, tribes, and nonprofit organizations advocating for the lake's health. The design should address timelines for plan development, roles and responsibilities of governmental and nonprofit entities, potential funding sources and options for plan implementation, including formation of a potential lake management district under chapter 36.61 RCW, and the management objectives to be included in the plan.

(33) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to support the Pierce county health department and the friends of Spanaway lake to treat and clean up elevated phosphorus and algae levels in Spanaway lake.

(34) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to work with the Guemes island planning advisory committee to follow on to a United States geologic survey study of the island's aquifer recharge areas, quantify an updated water budget, and provide an accurate water-level analysis and water-table map of the two aquifers on the island.

(35) $75,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department and the recycling development center, created in RCW 70.370.030, to provide financial and technical assistance to women and minority-owned businesses and small businesses which manufacture or process single-use plastic packaging products in order to help transform these businesses to processors and producers of sustainable packaging.

(36) $283,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5323 (plastic bags). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(37) $21,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6213 (polystyrene products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(38) $25,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to engage organizations that employ homeless and under-housed individuals to conduct cleanup activities, especially at sites of unauthorized homeless camps. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on recommendations to expand opportunities for this type of community-based cleanup work, by December 1, 2020.

(39) $149,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5811 (clean car standards & prog.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(40)(a) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to convene a work group of affected entities to study the design and use of the state water trust, water banking, and water transfers, and present its findings, including a summary of discussions and any recommendations on policy improvements, to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate. The department of ecology shall invite representatives to serve on the work group from organizations including, but not limited to:

(i) Federally recognized Indian tribes;

(ii) Local governments including cities, counties, and special purpose districts;

(iii) Environmental advocacy organizations;

(iv) The farming industry in Washington;

(v) Business interests; and

(vi) Entities that have been directly involved with the establishment of water banks.

(b) In addition to an invitation to participate in the work group, the department shall also consult with affected federally recognized tribal governments upon request.

(c) By December 1, 2020, the department of ecology must present its findings, including a summary of discussions and any recommendations on policy improvements, to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate and to the governor's office.

Sec. 303. 2019 c 415 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($16,013,000))

$16,270,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($16,501,000))

$21,729,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,079,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,310,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$403,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,657,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$367,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($125,438,000))

$126,701,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$420,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,496,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($176,684,000))

$183,432,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(2) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to pay assessments charged by local improvement districts.

(3) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5918 (whale watching guidelines). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4) $916,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $915,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $169,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for the commission to replace major equipment with an emphasis on fire response equipment and law enforcement vehicles that have over fifteen years of useful life.

(5) (($252,000))$312,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($216,000))$281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $322,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects funded in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(6) $154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for hiring new park rangers and park aides.

(7) $3,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $3,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $2,500,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for maintaining current service levels for core functions such as customer service, facility maintenance, and law enforcement.

(8) $382,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $567,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to conduct forest health treatments on 500 acres of forestland each year, add stewardship staff capacity in the northwest region, and conduct vegetation surveys to identify rare and sensitive plants. One-time funding is also provided to replace a fire truck in the eastern region.

(9) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to hire construction and maintenance staff to address the backlog of preventive maintenance at state parks.

(10) $428,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for increased technology costs associated with providing field staff with access to the state government network, providing law enforcement personnel remote access to law enforcement records, and providing public wi-fi services at dry falls, pacific beach, and potholes state parks.

(11) $204,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintaining the state parks' central reservation system, the law enforcement records management system, and discover pass automated pay stations.

(12) $3,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the commission to carry out operation and maintenance of the state parks system.

(13) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the commission to supply each public library in the state with two Discover passes, to be made available to the public to check out through the library system.

(14) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to collaborate with the city of Issaquah to prepare an environmental impact statement at Lake Sammamish state park to identify impacts of the next phase of park development and assist with obtaining regulatory permits.

Sec. 304. 2019 c 415 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($1,193,000))

$1,168,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,166,000))

$1,857,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,779,000))

$3,777,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$333,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,143,000))

$4,064,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,107,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,862,000))

$12,447,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $109,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the aquatics lands enhancement account grant program as described in RCW 79.105.150.

(2) $37,000 of the firearms range account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the firearms range grant program as described in RCW 79A.25.210.

(3) (($4,150,000))$4,074,000 of the recreation resources account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administrative and coordinating costs of the recreation and conservation office and the board as described in RCW 79A.25.080(1).

(4) $1,107,000 of the NOVA program account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program as described in chapter 46.09 RCW.

(5) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to contract for implementation of the Nisqually watershed stewardship plan.

(6) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization with a mission for salmon and steelhead restoration to continue mortality assessment work and to design solutions to mitigate steelhead mortality at the Hood Canal bridge.

(7) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office to develop a standardized method to measure and report stewardship needs and costs on lands purchased by the state parks and recreation commission, department of fish and wildlife, and the department of natural resources with grants from the Washington wildlife and recreation program. The office shall contract with a facilitator to work with the agencies on developing a shared method. The method will be used to identify, assess, and report both the stewardship needs and performance outcomes of the grant funded land acquisitions. Assessments should be based on both the current condition and the desired future condition of ecosystems and will be used to: Develop a multi-agency approach to assess the health of ecosystems on state lands, develop a consistent approach to prioritizing management and restoration actions, and determine the cost to achieve desired standards.

Sec. 305. 2019 c 415 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,533,000))

$2,636,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,440,000))

$2,513,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$254,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,227,000))

$5,403,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($170,000))$140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((is))and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of ((Substitute Senate Bill No. 5151))chapter 452, Laws of 2019 (growth management board/indexing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 306. 2019 c 415 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($7,936,000))

$7,845,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($7,973,000))

$8,453,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,301,000))

$2,482,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,456,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$254,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($27,920,000))

$28,490,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission and conservation districts to increase landowner participation in voluntary actions that protect habitat to benefit salmon and southern resident orcas.

(2) $8,456,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(3) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to continue to convene and facilitate a food policy forum and to implement recommendations identified through the previous work of the food policy forum.

(a) The commission shall coordinate implementation of the forum with the department of agriculture and the office of farmland preservation.

(b) The director of the commission and the director of the department of agriculture shall jointly appoint members of the forum, and no appointment may be made unless each director concurs in the appointment.

(c) In addition to members appointed by the directors, four legislators may serve on the food policy forum in an ex officio capacity. Legislative participants may be reimbursed for travel expenses by the senate or house of representatives as provided in RCW 44.04.120. Legislative participants must be appointed as follows:

(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and

(ii) The majority leader and minority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(d) Meetings of the forum may be scheduled by either the director of the commission or the director of the department of agriculture.

(e) Staffing for the forum must be provided by the commission working jointly with staff from the department of agriculture.

(f) The commission and the department of agriculture shall jointly develop the agenda for each forum meeting as well as a report from the food policy forum. The report must contain recommendations and a workplan to implement the recommendations and must be delivered to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by June 30, 2021.

(((5)))(4) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the following activities:

(a) The commission and the department of agriculture must produce a gap analysis reviewing existing conservation grant programs and completed voluntary stewardship program plans to identify what technical assistance and cost-share resources are needed to meet the requirements placed on those activities by the legislature.

(b)(i) The commission, in collaboration with the department of agriculture, must develop recommendations for legislation or additional work that may be needed to implement a sustainable farms and fields grant program that prioritizes funding based on net reduction of greenhouse gas emissions on farm, aquatic, or ranch lands, including carbon sequestration.

(ii) The recommendations must incorporate the gap analysis required by this section. The recommendations must include information about how the grant program can complement and avoid competing with existing conservation programs, and provide cost share benefits to existing and new programs designed to improve water quality, critical habitats, and soil health and soil-health research on farm, aquatic or timber lands.

(iii) The recommendations must be developed with input from stakeholder meetings with representatives from the environmental and agricultural communities.

(c) The commission and the department of agriculture must provide an update to the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2019, and final recommendations by November 1, 2019.

(5) $332,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the commission to increase the capacity of conservation districts to assist landowners in environmental stewardship and achieving agricultural sustainability.

(6) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6091 (WA food policy forum). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6306 (soil health initiative). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5947 (sustainable farms and fields). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 307. 2019 c 415 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($74,521,000))

$76,145,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($63,849,000))

$83,908,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($141,326,000))

$139,670,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($69,360,000))

$69,490,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$701,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,871,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,332,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,824,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$675,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($115,447,000))

$111,353,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,904,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$517,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,653,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$361,000

Ballast Water and Biofouling Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,946,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,199,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,906,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,186,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$524,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($508,113,000))

$524,176,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $415,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $415,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $440,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for county assessments.

(3)(a) A legislative task force is established to recommend a group or entity to review the department's budget requests in place of the hatchery scientific review group. The task force is comprised of two members from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, and two members from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house. The task force shall be staffed by the office of program research and senate committee services. The task force must consult with tribes.

(b) The task force must review the purpose and activities of the hatchery scientific review group and develop recommendations for the legislature to establish a replacement group or entity that will analyze state spending and projects related to hatcheries that are proposed in state operating and capital budgets. Among other things, the task force shall recommend a process by which the replacement organization or entity, starting with the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, contracts with the department to review the department's proposed agency biennial operating and capital budget requests related to state fish hatcheries prior to submission to the office of financial management. This review shall: (i) Examine if the proposed requests are consistent with independent scientific review standards using best available science; (ii) evaluate the components of the request based on the independent needs of each particular watershed and the return of salmonids including naturally spawning, endangered, and hatchery stocks; and (iii) evaluate whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost-effective manner. This process must require the department to provide a copy of the review to the office of financial management and the legislature with its agency budget proposal.

(c) The task force shall report to the legislature on its findings and recommendations by December 1, 2019.

(4) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers.

(5) $762,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $24,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5577 (orca whales/vessels). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $156,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects funded in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(7) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to develop a pinto abalone recovery plan, expand field work, conduct genetics and disease assessments, and establish three satellite grow-out facilities. $150,000 of the appropriation per fiscal year is for competitive grants to nonprofit organizations to assist in recovery and restoration work of native shellfish.

(8) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, are provided solely for the department to increase the work of regional fisheries enhancement groups.

(9) $457,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $457,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $110,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to pay for costs to maintain upgraded network infrastructure and pay the debt service on purchased equipment.

(10) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $166,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $495,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation are provided solely for new service or vendor costs, including PC leases, mobile devices, a remote management system, IT issue tracking technology, and virtual private network services.

(11) $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are appropriated for the department to increase hatchery production of salmon throughout the Puget Sound, coast, and Columbia river. Increases in hatchery production must be prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas. The department shall work with federal partners, tribal co-managers, and other interested parties when developing annual hatchery production plans. These increases shall be done consistent with best available science, most recent hatchery standards, and endangered species act requirements, and include adaptive management provisions to ensure the conservation and enhancement of wild stocks. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 in fiscal year 2020 is for wells and generators at the Samish hatchery.

(12) $2,257,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,785,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to grant to the northwest Indian fisheries commission to grant to tribes for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,535,000 in each fiscal year is for additional hatchery production in the following amounts per fiscal year: $150,000 for the Quinault Indian Nation, $169,000 for the Tulalip Tribes, $268,000 for the Quileute Tribe, $186,000 for the Puyallup Tribe, $112,000 for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, $23,000 for the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, $207,000 for the Squaxin Island Tribe, $142,000 for the Skokomish Indian Tribe, and $278,000 for the Lummi Nation.

(b) $472,000 in fiscal year 2020 is for improvements to hatchery facilities that support additional hatchery production in the following amounts: $98,000 for the Tulalip Tribes, $38,000 for the Puyallup Tribe, $14,000 for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, $25,000 for the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, $200,000 for the Squaxin Island Tribe, $24,000 for the Skokomish Indian Tribe, and $73,000 for the Lummi Nation.

(13) $771,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide to tribes for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $76,000 in each fiscal year is for the Yakama Nation for additional hatchery production, $195,000 in fiscal year 2020 is for the Yakama Nation for improvements to hatchery facilities, and $500,000 in fiscal year 2020 is for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation for improvements to hatchery facilities.

(14) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to grant to public utility districts for additional hatchery production that is prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas and other species that are critical to the marine food web. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $250,000 in fiscal year 2020 is for Puget Sound energy for wells and generators at the Baker river fish hatchery.

(15) $1,361,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the following activities to increase the availability of salmon for southern resident orcas: Surveying forage fish populations, conducting rulemaking for fish screens, reducing salmon predation by nonnative fish, prioritizing fish barrier removal, developing a strategy to reestablish salmon runs above dams, and increasing review of shoreline armoring proposals to protect forage fish.

(16) $710,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to migrate to the state data center and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(17) $278,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $278,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to the Lummi Nation to increase salmon production at the Skookum creek hatchery and the Lummi bay hatchery.

(18) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2097 (statewide wolf recovery). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department for elk management in the Skagit valley in cooperation with affected tribes and landowners. Authorized expenditures include, but are not limited to, elk fencing and replacement hay to mitigate the impacts of elk on agricultural crop production.

(20) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $37,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1579 (chinook abundance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(21) $357,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for suppression, eradication, and monitoring of northern pike in the Columbia river. The department must work with the Spokane Tribe of Indians, the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation, and the Kalispel Tribe of Indians on identifying appropriate actions to reduce threats to anadromous salmon from invasive northern pike.

(22) $573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the first phase of a voluntary buyback of Columbia river commercial gill net licenses related to restrictions on mainstem gill netting under the Washington-Oregon Columbia river fishery reforms. The first phase of the voluntary buyback program shall be limited to commercial gill net license holders that have landed Columbia river salmon in Washington in at least two of the last five years. The department shall solicit offers from gill net license holders who wish to participate in the buyback program, rank the offers in ascending order from lowest to the highest offer price based on their average annual landings, and purchase gill net licenses starting with the lowest bid price per average annual landings. The buyback is limited to Columbia river gill net licenses only and license holders shall be prohibited from any future participation in Columbia river gill net fisheries. By December 31, 2020, the department shall submit a report to the legislature including the number of license holders who participated in the buyback and an estimate of the funding needed to buyback any remaining voluntary buyback offers that exceeded the available funds.

(23) $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely as matching funds for a federal grant to purchase two law enforcement vessels and equip them with optic system equipment to conduct marine patrols including vessel enforcement patrols related to southern resident orcas.

(24) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to increase enforcement of commercial and recreational vessel regulations for the protection of southern resident orcas in central and southern Puget Sound.

(25) $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to the Woodland park zoo to conduct research relating to shell disease prevention in native western pond turtles.

(26) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to build elk fencing, with priority given to fencing the Concrete school playfields to exclude elk and conduct other measures for solving conflicts with elk in Skagit county in cooperation with tribes and landowners.

(27) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to research and assess the feasibility of a pilot program that models state of Alaska fish hatchery policies to increase production of salmon.

(28) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to manage Washington Columbia river basin recreational salmon and steelhead fisheries, including monitoring and enforcement activities.

(29) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to convene an independent science review council to advise the comanagers on critical anadromous fish management decisions. The nine member council shall include two members chosen by the tribal community, two members chosen by the department, one member from the United States fish and wildlife service, one member from the national oceanic and atmospheric administration, and three members chosen by the Washington academy of sciences. The Washington academy of sciences shall have final review of nominees to confirm their subject matter expertise.

(30) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6147 (shoreline armoring).

(31) $1,684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to create a statewide permittee assistance program as part of hydraulic project approvals, in which department staff collaborate with landowners during construction to help resolve risks for permit noncompliance.

(32) $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5481 (collective bargaining/WDFW). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(33) $12,853,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the operating support of existing department programs. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $1,262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the ongoing costs to maintain shellfish sanitation activities necessary to implement the memorandum of understanding with the department of health to ensure Washington state is compliant with its federal obligations under the model ordinance of the national shellfish sanitation program.

(34) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to conduct a master planning process, to result in a plan, to assess and prioritize hatchery improvements based on the recommendations of the southern resident killer whale task force, including prioritization given for a new Cowlitz river salmon hatchery. The plan must include prioritized capital budget projects. The plan shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 15, 2021.

Sec. 308. 2019 c 415 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($74,086,000))

$94,618,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($62,093,000))

$68,759,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$34,977,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,534,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($54,165,000))

$54,157,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,166,000))

$8,165,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,595,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($18,537,000))

$13,856,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($128,255,000))

$128,326,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,103,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,063,000

Park Land Trust Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$750,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$16,354,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$402,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

Forest Fire Protection Assessment Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,896,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,995,000))

$5,992,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,015,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$901,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$780,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,240,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,001,000

Community Forest Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$52,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,179,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$325,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($454,178,000))

$477,079,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,583,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,515,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(2) (($16,546,000))$37,172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $16,546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $16,050,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression. The appropriations provided in this subsection may not be used to fund the department's indirect and administrative expenses. The department's indirect and administrative costs shall be allocated among its remaining accounts and appropriations. The department shall provide a monthly report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature with an update of fire suppression costs incurred and the number and type of wildfires suppressed.

(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $500,000 is contingent upon receipts under RCW 82.04.261 exceeding eight million dollars per biennium. If receipts under RCW 82.04.261 are more than eight million dollars but less than eight million five hundred thousand dollars for the biennium, an amount equivalent to the difference between actual receipts and eight million five hundred thousand dollars shall lapse.

(4) $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board. The forest practices board shall submit a report to the legislature following review, approval, and solicitation of public comment on the cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research master project schedule, to include: Cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science and related adaptive management expenditure details, accomplishments, the use of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science in decision-making, and funding needs for the coming biennium. The report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2020.

(5) Consistent with the recommendations of the Wildfire Suppression Funding and Costs (18-02) report of the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2019, and December 1, 2020, describing the previous fire season. At a minimum, the report shall provide information for each wildfire in the state, including its location, impact by type of land ownership, the extent it involved timber or range lands, cause, size, costs, and cost-share with federal agencies and nonstate partners. The report must also be posted on the agency's web site.

(6) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5550 (pesticide application safety). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5330 (small forestland).

(9) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5106 (natural disaster mitigation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(10) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5597 (aerial herbicide application). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(11) $4,486,000 of the aquatic land enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the removal of creosote pilings and debris from the marine environment and to continue monitoring zooplankton and eelgrass beds on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department. Actions will address recommendations to recover the southern resident orca population and to monitor ocean acidification as well as help implement the Puget Sound action agenda.

(12) $304,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the cleanup of the Fairview avenue site near Lake Union in Seattle. The aquatic site is contaminated with lead, chromium, and arsenic. This will be the department's final payment toward remediation costs.

(13) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to identify priority kelp restoration locations in central Puget Sound, based on historic locations, and monitor the role of natural kelp beds in moderating pH conditions in Puget Sound.

(14) $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $187,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with the Olympic natural resources center to study emerging ecosystem threats such as Swiss needlecast disease, conduct field trials for long-term ecosystem productivity and T3 watershed experiments, and engage stakeholders. The department must contract with the Olympic natural resources center for at least $187,000 per fiscal year. The department may retain up to $30,000 per fiscal year to conduct Swiss needlecast surveys and research. Administrative costs may be taken and are limited to twenty-seven percent of the amount of appropriation retained by the department.

(15) $22,843,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($11,364,000))$12,337,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,000,000 of the forest fire protection assessment nonappropriated account—state appropriation are provided solely for wildfire response, to include funding full time fire engine leaders, increasing the number of correctional camp fire crews in western Washington, purchasing two helicopters, providing dedicated staff to conduct fire response training, creating a fire prevention outreach program, forest health administration, landowner technical assistance, conducting forest health treatments on federal lands and implementing the department's twenty-year forest health strategic plan, post-wildfire landslide assessments, and other measures necessary for wildfire suppression and prevention. Funding is adjusted for increased compensation costs that were not previously covered.

(16) $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for compensation to the trust beneficiaries and department for lost revenue from leases to amateur radio operators who use space on the department managed radio towers for their equipment. The department is authorized to lease sites at the rate of up to one hundred dollars per year, per site, per lessee. The legislature makes this appropriation to fulfill the remaining costs of the leases at market rate per RCW 79.13.510.

(17) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to conduct post wildfire landslide hazard assessments and reports.

(18) (($162,000))$59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($163,000))$266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for paving the road access to Leader lake in northeast Washington.

(19) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to conduct an analysis of revenue impacts to the state forestlands taxing district beneficiaries as a result of the proposed long-term conservation strategy for the marbled murrelet. The department shall consult with state forestlands taxing district beneficiary representatives on the analysis. The department shall make the analysis available to state forestlands taxing districts and submit it to the board of natural resources by September 30, 2019.

(20) $150,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for continued facilitation and support services for the marine resources advisory council.

(21) $217,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the state marine management plan and ongoing costs of the Washington coastal marine advisory council to serve as a forum and provide recommendations on coastal management issues.

(((23)))(22) $485,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $485,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1784 (wildfire prevention). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24)))(23)(a) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the following activities:

(i) Conducting carbon inventories to build on existing efforts to understand carbon stocks, flux, trends, emissions, and sequestration across Washington's natural and working lands, including harvested wood products, wildfire emissions, land management activities, and sawmill energy use and emissions. Where feasible, the department shall use available existing data and information to conduct this inventory and analysis. For the purposes of this section, natural and working land types include forests, croplands, rangelands, wetlands, grasslands, aquatic lands, and urban green space.

(ii) Compiling and providing access to information on existing opportunities for carbon compensation services and other incentive-based carbon reducing programs to assist owners of private and other nonstate owned or managed forestland interested in voluntarily engaging in carbon markets.

(b) By December 1, 2020, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the results of the inventories required under this section, and assessing actions that may improve the efficiency and effectiveness of carbon inventory activities on natural and working lands, including carbon sequestration in harvested forest products. The department must also describe any barriers, including costs, to the use of voluntary, incentive-based carbon reducing or sequestering programs. The department may also include recommendations for additional work or legislation that may be advisable resulting from the advisory group created in this subsection as part of this report.

(c) The department must form a natural and working lands carbon sequestration advisory group to help guide the activities provided in this section. The advisory group must be composed of a balance of representatives reflecting the diverse interests and expertise involved on the subject of carbon sequestration on natural and working lands.

(24) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to increase technical assistance to small forestland owners.

(25) $420,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6488 (aerial herbicides/forestland). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6027 (floating residences).

(27) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to conduct land transactions in a manner that only natural resource-based lands are considered in any land exchanges or purchases, with exception to any actions that may be necessary relating to the Fircrest site in the city of Shoreline.

(28) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6528 (derelict vessel prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29) $325,000 of the performance audit of state government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in cooperation with the wildland fire advisory committee established under RCW 76.04.179 and the office of financial management, to conduct a zero-based budget and performance review of its resource protection program. The review shall be specifically focused on the wildfire program operating budget and activities. Throughout the review process the department shall submit monthly updates of actual and estimated fire expenditures, and obligated cost related to fire suppression to the fiscal committees of the legislature. A report of the review shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020. The report shall contain a description of findings, list of changes made, and recommendations and options for accounting structure changes. The review under this subsection shall include:

(a) A statement of the statutory basis or other basis for the creation of each subprogram within the resource protection program and the history of each subprogram that is being reviewed;

(b) A description of how each subprogram fits within the strategic plan and goals of the agency and an analysis of the quantified objectives of each subprogram within the agency;

(c) Any available performance measures indicating the effectiveness and efficiency of each subprogram program;

(d) A description with supporting cost and staffing data of each program and the populations served by each program, and the level of funding and staff required to accomplish the goals of the subprogram program if different than the actual maintenance level;

(e) An analysis of the major costs and benefits of operating each subprogram and the rationale for specific expenditure and staffing levels;

(f) An analysis estimating each subprogram's administrative and other overhead costs;

(g) An analysis of the levels of services provided;

(h) An analysis estimating the amount of funds or benefits that actually reach the intended recipients;

(i) An analysis of terminology used to describe wildfire suppression, prevention, preparedness, forest health, pre-suppression, and any other term used to describe program activities and provide definitions for each. This should include cross reference to federal definitions and federal funding;

(j) An analysis of inconsistencies and increased costs associated with the decentralized nature of organizational authority and operations, including recommendations for the creation of policy and procedures and subsequent oversight for dispersed operations;

(k) An analysis of the department's budgeting and accounting processes, including work done at the central, program, and region levels, with specific focus on efficiencies to be gained by centralized budget control; and

(l) A review of the progress and findings of the ongoing internal department fire business transformation team related to current practices in wildfire business and the development of an organizational structure governing fire business practices across the department which complies with all state and federal statutes and agreements and which meets the needs of the department as a whole.

Sec. 309. 2019 c 415 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($18,858,000))

$18,974,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($18,925,000))

$20,820,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($32,078,000))

$32,613,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$193,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,527,000))

$2,530,000

Northeast Washington Wolf-Livestock Management

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$320,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,808,000))

$6,273,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$73,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$635,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$635,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,036,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($80,768,000))

$84,102,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,108,445 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $6,102,905 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing the food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(2) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5550 (pesticide application safety). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) The appropriations in this section includes sufficient funding for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5959 (livestock identification).

(4) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5597 (aerial herbicide application). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5447 (dairy milk assessment fee).

(6) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department's regional markets program, which includes the small farm direct marketing program under RCW 15.64.050 and the farm-to-school program under RCW 15.64.060.

(7) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the northwest Washington fair youth education programs.

(8) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $202,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5552 (pollinators). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(9) $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $52,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to migrate to the state data center and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(10) $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to continue to convene and facilitate a food policy forum and to implement recommendations identified through the previous work of the food policy forum.

(a) The department shall coordinate implementation of the forum with the conservation commission and the office of farmland preservation.

(b) The director of the department and the director of the conservation commission shall jointly appoint members of the forum, and no appointment may be made unless each director concurs in the appointment.

(c) In addition to members appointed by the directors, four legislators may serve on the food policy forum in an ex officio capacity. Legislative participants must be appointed as follows:

(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and

(ii) The majority leader and minority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(d) Meetings of the forum may be scheduled by either the director of the department or the director of the conservation commission.

(e) Staffing for the forum must be provided by the department working jointly with staff from the conservation commission.

(f) The department and conservation commission shall jointly develop the agenda for each forum meeting as well as a report from the food policy forum. The report must contain recommendations and a workplan to implement the recommendations and must be delivered to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by June 30, 2021.

(11) $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5276 (hemp production). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to review and assist with agricultural economic development in southwest Washington. Funding is provided for the department to perform or contract for agricultural economic development services, including but not limited to grant application assistance, permitting assistance and coordination, and development of a food hub.

(13) $250,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue a shellfish coordinator position. The shellfish coordinator assists the industry with complying with regulatory requirements and will work with regulatory agencies to identify ways to streamline and make more transparent the permit process for establishing and maintaining shellfish operations.

(14) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the following activities:

(a) The department and the conservation commission must produce a gap analysis reviewing existing conservation grant programs and completed voluntary stewardship program plans to identify what technical assistance and cost-share resources are needed to meet the requirements placed on those activities by the legislature.

(b)(i) The department, in collaboration with the conservation commission, must develop recommendations for legislation or additional work that may be needed to implement a sustainable farms and fields grant program that prioritizes funding based on net reduction of greenhouse gas emissions on farm, aquatic, or ranch lands, including carbon sequestration.

(ii) The recommendations must incorporate the gap analysis required by this section. The recommendations must include information about how the program can complement and avoid competing with existing conservation programs, and provide cost share benefits to existing and new programs designed to improve water quality, critical habitats, and soil health and soil-health research on farm, aquatic, or timber lands.

(iii) The recommendations must be developed with input from stakeholder meetings with representatives from the environmental and agricultural communities.

(c) The department and the conservation commission must provide an update to the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2019, and final recommendations by November 1, 2019.

(15) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to support the food bank network. Any baby food that is purchased with the amounts provided in this subsection must be certified organic.

(16) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for research grants to assist with development of an integrated pest management plan to address burrowing shrimp in Willapa bay and Grays harbor and facilitate continued shellfish cultivation on tidelands. In selecting research grant recipients for this purpose, the department must incorporate the advice of the Willapa-Grays harbor working group formed from the settlement agreement with the department of ecology signed on October 15, 2019.

(17) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6091 (WA food policy forum). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $87,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6488 (aerial herbicides/forestland). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $299,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6518 (pesticide, chlorpryifos). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5947 (sustainable farms and fields). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $299,000 of model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6518 (pesticide, chlorpyrifos). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6306 (soil health initiative). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6382 (meat and poultry processing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $320,000 of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to distribute to an organization with the proven ability to hire and deploy range riders. The range riders hired with this appropriation will conduct proactive deterrence activities with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves on United States forest service grazing allotments and adjoining private lands in the Kettle mountains in Ferry county north of United States highway 20. The organization that employs range riders through this amount shall share all relevant information with the department of fish and wildlife in a timely manner to aid in wolf management decisions. For the purpose of accountability, the range riders will document their activities with geo-referenced photo points and provide written description of their efforts and report these to the department of agriculture by December 31, 2020.

Sec. 310. 2019 c 415 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground Storage

Tank Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($170,000))

$881,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,655,000))

$1,746,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,825,000))

$2,627,000

Sec. 311. 2019 c 415 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($4,696,000))

$4,718,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($4,758,000))

$4,791,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,708,000))

$12,725,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,441,000))

$1,444,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($752,000))

$755,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$276,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($24,631,000))

$24,709,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By October 15, 2020, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor and appropriate legislative fiscal committees a single, prioritized list of state agency 2021-2023 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound restoration.

(2) $1,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the partnership to implement a competitive, peer-reviewed process for soliciting, prioritizing, and funding research projects designed to advance scientific understanding of Puget Sound recovery. Solicitations and project selection for effectiveness monitoring will be organized and overseen by the Puget Sound ecosystem monitoring program. Initial projects will focus on implementation and effectiveness of Chinook recovery efforts, effectiveness of actions to restore shellfish beds, and implementation of priority studies of the Salish Sea marine survival project. Monitoring reports must be provided in context to the overall success and progress of Puget Sound recovery efforts.

(3) $237,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $263,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for coordinating updates to the outdated Puget Sound chinook salmon recovery plan, provide support for adaptive management of local watershed chapters, and advance regional work on salmon and ecosystem recovery through local integrating organizations.

(4) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for additional monitoring and accountability actions in response to recommendations from the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(End of part)

PART IV

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 401. 2019 c 415 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($5,424,000))

$3,733,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($3,770,000))

$5,504,000

Architects' License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,454,000))

$1,479,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,263,000))

$13,424,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,922,000))

$2,975,000

Real Estate Education Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$276,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,743,000))

$1,614,000

Business and Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,752,000))

$25,713,000

Real Estate Research Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$415,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$74,000

Landscape Architects' License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$58,000

Concealed Pistol License Renewal Notification

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$140,000

Geologists' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($53,000))

$30,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$96,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($54,473,000))

$55,564,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Appropriations provided for the business and technology modernization project in this section are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(2) $72,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5480 (real estate appraisers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4)))(3) $144,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5641 (uniform law on notarial acts). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)))(4) $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to mail vessel registration renewal reminders.

(((6) $2,716,000))(5) $1,003,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($1,337,000))$3,050,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to procure a commercial off-the-shelf solution to replace the legacy firearms system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(6) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6074 (financial fraud/theft crimes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $526,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6605 (security guard licensing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6528 (derelict vessel prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 402. 2019 c 415 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($56,301,000))

$57,155,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($55,374,000))

$54,455,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,699,000))

$16,689,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,091,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,365,000))

$9,096,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,546,000))

$4,548,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,641,000))

$1,643,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,000,000

Washington Internet Crimes Against Children

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,764,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$588,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,405,000))

$16,615,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,723,000))

$2,453,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,523,000))

$2,793,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($194,124,000))

$193,994,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(2) $2,878,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for the completion of the state patrol's plan to upgrade the criminal history system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(3) $2,723,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,523,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state patrol's drug enforcement task force. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for the following:

(a) $2,423,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,423,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state patrol to partner with multi-jurisdictional drug and gang task forces to detect, deter, and dismantle criminal organizations involved in criminal activity including diversion of marijuana from the legalized market and the illicit production and distribution of marijuana and marijuana-related products in Washington state.

(b) (($300,000))$30,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($100,000))$370,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a case management system to serve as a repository for all information regarding criminal cases. This system must allow state patrol investigators to enter information and to search to provide patterns, trends, and links which will allow the state patrol to identify connections on criminal investigations including efforts to dismantle marijuana and other drug trafficking organizations by identifying their established networks, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(4) $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5181 (invol. treatment procedures). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(6) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5605 (marijuana misdemeanors). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $679,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for addressing a backlog of toxicology tests in the toxicology laboratory.

(8) $1,500,000 of the Washington internet crimes against children account—state appropriation is provided solely for the missing and exploited children's task force within the patrol to help prevent possible abuse to children and other vulnerable citizens from sexual abuse.

(9) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $298,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriations are provided solely for increased supply and maintenance costs for the crime laboratory division and toxicology laboratory division.

(10) $5,770,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $3,243,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,277,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1166 (sexual assault). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(11) $282,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $263,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1713 (Native American women). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $510,000 of the county criminal justice assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to support local police, sheriffs' departments, and multiagency task forces in the prosecution of criminals. However, the office of financial management must reduce the allotment of the amount provided in this subsection if allotment of the full appropriation will put the account into deficit.

(13) $1,000,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(14) $167,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6605 (security guard licensing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $4,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6100 (background checks/education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART V

EDUCATION

Sec. 501. 2019 c 415 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($30,861,000))

$31,435,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($27,751,000))

$27,603,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$99,348,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,060,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$265,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$522,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
$530,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,126,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$213,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($169,676,000))

$170,102,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) BASE OPERATIONS AND EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE

(a) (($11,090,000))$11,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($11,087,000))$11,238,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(i) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(ii) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school, using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the superintendent.

(iii) By October 31st of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in ((sections 501, 515, and 522 of this act))section 501, chapter 415, Laws of 2019 and sections 513 and 520 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(iv) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the secretary of state, shall update the program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.

(v) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (A) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (B) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(vi) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide statewide oversight and coordination to the regional nursing corps program supported through the educational service districts.

(b) $857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($857,000))$1,217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for maintenance of the apportionment system, including technical staff and the data governance working group.

(c) $2,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for activities associated with the implementation of chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education) within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), up to $300,000 is for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to review the use of local revenues for compliance with enrichment requirements, including the preballot approval of enrichment levy spending plans approved by the superintendent of public instruction, and any supplemental contracts entered into under RCW 28A.400.200.

(d) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(e)(i) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($61,000))$76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(ii) Within amounts provided in this subsection, the committee must review the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills, including professional development available to educators and assessment materials and tools, and make recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction and the education committees of the legislature on opportunities to reduce bias in the assessment process and barriers to implementing the inventory. The committee must seek feedback from the following relevant stakeholders:

(A) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(B) The department of children, youth, and families;

(C) Kindergarten teachers that teach in diverse school districts;

(D) A tribal school representative that currently uses the inventory;

(E) Principals who are currently using the inventory;

(F) District assessment coordinators;

(G) Parents who are representative of student populations that have historically scored low on the inventory, and who are recommended by an organization that serves parents of color; and

(H) Early childhood providers.

(f) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(g) $265,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(h) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education shall adopt a rule that the minimum number of students to be used for public reporting and federal accountability purposes is ten.

(i) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(j) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178, Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).

(k) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 242, Laws of 2013 (state-tribal education compacts).

(l) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $213,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform on-going program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(m) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (computer science).

(n) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators).

(o) $235,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $235,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government.

(p) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.

(q) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state.

(r) $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(s) The superintendent of public instruction must study and make recommendations for how Washington can make dual credit enrollment cost-free to students who are enrolled in running start, college in the high school, advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or other qualifying dual credit programs within existing basic education apportionments. While developing recommendations, the superintendent must collaborate and consult with K-12 and higher education stakeholders with expertise in dual credit instruction, transcription, and costs. The superintendent shall report the recommendations to the education policy and operating budget committees of the legislature by November 1, 2019. The recommendations must, at a minimum, consider:

(i) How to increase dual credit offerings and access for students that aligns with the student's high school and beyond plan and provides a pathway to education and training after high school, including careers, professional-technical education, apprenticeship, a college degree, or military service, among others.

(ii) How to ensure transfer of college credits earned by dual credit students to/among institutions of higher education.

(iii) How basic education funding will be used to provide for fees, books, and other direct costs charged by institutions of higher education and K-12 districts.

(iv) How K-12 and postsecondary institutions will equitably expand dual credit opportunities for students.

(v) How K-12 and postsecondary institutions will ensure coordinated advising and support services for students enrolled in, or considering enrollment in, dual credit programs.

(t) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to pay for services for space in the state data center and networking charges.

(u) $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a new server and backup application due to the move to the state data center.

(v) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the consolidated technology services to host the office's web site and for web site maintenance and support services.

(w) Districts shall report to the office the results of each collective bargaining agreement for certificated staff within their district using a uniform template as required by the superintendent, within thirty days of finalizing contracts. The data must include but is not limited to: Minimum and maximum base salaries, supplemental salary information, and average percent increase for all certificated instructional staff. Within existing resources by December 1st of each year, the office shall produce a report for the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee summarizing the district level collective bargaining agreement data.

(x) The office shall review and update the guidelines "prohibiting discrimination in Washington public schools," which must include religious accommodations. Students' sincerely held religious beliefs and practices must be reasonably accommodated with respect to all examinations and other requirements to successfully complete coursework.

(y) In section 116(8) of this act, the office of the education ombuds is directed to develop a plan to implement a program to promote skills, knowledge, and awareness concerning issues of diversity, equity, and inclusion among families with school-age children, with a report due to the governor and the appropriate committees in the legislature by September 1, 2020. Within amounts provided in this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate on the plan and report.

(z) In section 129(14) of this act, the office of financial management is directed to review and report on the pupil transportation funding system for K-12 education, the report is due to the governor and the appropriate committees in the legislature by August 1, 2020. Within amounts provided in this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate on this review.

(aa) $176,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to collaborate with the office of the department of children, youth, and families to complete a report with options and recommendations for administrative efficiencies and long-term strategies that align and integrate high-quality early learning programs administered by both agencies. The report shall address capital needs, data collection and sharing, licensing changes, quality standards, options for community-based and school-based settings, fiscal modeling, and any statutory changes needed to achieve administrative efficiencies. The report is due to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2020.

(bb) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the four-year institutions as defined in RCW 28B.76.020, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training and education coordinating board, to review and report on potential adjustments or alterations to the standardized high school transcript created under RCW 28A.230.125, including, but not limited to, granting the option of using a weighted grade point average to recognize accelerated coursework. The report shall include findings and recommendations and shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2021.

(2) DATA SYSTEMS

(a) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(b) $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($1,221,000))$281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(c) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.

(3) WORK GROUPS

(a) $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 206, Laws of 2018 (career and college readiness).

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act).

(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration and division of vocational rehabilitation, shall explore the development of an implementation plan to build statewide capacity among school districts to improve transition planning for students in special education who meet criteria for services from the developmental disabilities administration, and shall provide all school districts with an opportunity to participate. The plan shall be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 by November 1, 2018, and the final report must be submitted by November 1, 2020, to the governor and appropriate legislative committees. The final report must include the following:

(i) An examination of whether a data share agreement between the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration, division of vocational rehabilitation, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction would improve coordination among the three agencies;

(ii) Defined roles for the associated stakeholders involved with the transition of students potentially eligible for services from the developmental disabilities administration, including but not limited to:

(A) The department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration;

(B) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(C) The division of vocational rehabilitation at the department of social and health services;

(D) School districts across the state of Washington; and

(E) Counties coordinating employment and day services.

(iii) An examination of the feasibility of a statewide developmental disabilities transition council including representative positions' roles and responsibilities, costs, and data collection; and

(iv) Recommendations for supporting seamless transition from school to post-school life, up to and including potential legislation and funding, regional interagency transition networks, and coordination between counties, schools, and other partners for transition supports.

(d) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the legislative youth advisory council. The council of statewide members advises legislators on issues of importance to youth.

(e) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 75, Laws of 2018 (dyslexia).

(f) $183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1130 (pub. school language access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(g) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5082 (social emotional learning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(h)(i)(A) Within amounts provided in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a work group to:

(I) Review provisions related to sexual health education in the health and physical education learning standards adopted in 2016;

(II) Review existing sexual health education curricula in use in the state for the purpose of identifying gaps or potential inconsistencies with the health and physical education learning standards;

(III) Consider revisions to sexual health education provisions in statute; and

(IV) Consider the merits and challenges associated with requiring all public schools offer comprehensive sexual health education to students in all grades by September 1, 2022. For purposes of this subsection (h), "comprehensive sexual health education" means instruction in sexual health that, at a minimum, is evidence-informed, medically and scientifically accurate, age appropriate, and inclusive for all students.

(B) In meeting the requirements of this subsection (h), the work group shall consult with a broad array of stakeholders representing diverse opinions.

(ii) The work group shall consist of the following members:

(A) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee;

(B) Three representatives of school districts recommended by the Washington state school directors' association. To the extent possible, the school district representatives must reflect a diversity of student enrollment, geographic location, and urban, suburban, and rural locations;

(C) Three school principals recommended by an association of Washington school principals, one each representing an elementary school, a middle school, and a high school. The three principals must represent the geographic diversity of urban, suburban, and rural locations;

(D) Three public school health educators recommended by an association of Washington educators, one each representing grades kindergarten through five, grades six through eight, and grades nine through twelve. The three public school health educators must represent the geographic diversity of urban, suburban, and rural locations;

(E) Three public health officials, at least two of whom are local public health officials with expertise in developing or presenting comprehensive sexual health education materials and resources, as recommended by the Washington state department of health. The three public health officials must represent the geographic diversity of urban, suburban, and rural locations; and

(F) Three parents recommended in accordance with this subsection (3)(h)(ii)(F), one with a child enrolled in a public school west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range, one with a child enrolled in a public school east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range, and one with a child enrolled in a public school who is also receiving special education services. The recommendation for a parent of a public school student receiving special education services must be made by an association of parents, teachers, and students that focuses on the needs of students receiving special education services. The recommendation for the other parents under this subsection must be made by an association of parents, teachers, and students.

(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit findings and recommendations required by this section to the state board of education, the department of health, and, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2019.

(iv)(A) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington state school directors' association, shall collaborate with department of health to conduct a data survey of the availability of sexual health education in public schools and relevant health measures in those schools. All school districts shall submit to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, through the Washington school health profiles survey, or other reporting mechanisms, the curricula used in the district to teach sexual health education. The data survey must include a list of the schools within the boundaries of each school district that offer sexual health education and in which grade levels, and the curricula used to teach sexual health education, as reported according to RCW 28A.300.475(7). In addition, the data shall include, for each school district and inclusive of any charter schools that may be within the boundaries of the school district, the rate of teen pregnancy, sexually transmitted infections, suicide, depression, and adverse childhood experiences in each of the previous five years for which data is available. To the extent that the data allows, the information shall be collected by school district, inclusive of any charter schools that may be within the boundaries of the school district. To the extent allowed by existing data sources, the information must be disaggregated by age, race, ethnicity, free and reduced lunch eligibility, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, and geography, including school district population density, and conveyed, to the maximum extent possible, in a manner that complies with WAC 392-117-060. The data survey may combine multiple years of data if necessary to comply with student privacy requirements.

(B) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the information collected from the data survey to inform the work group established in (f) of this subsection. The office, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, shall submit the data survey to the committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over matters related to education and health care and the governor by December 1, 2019.

(4) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS

(a) $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080.

(b) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (educational opportunity gap).

(c) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) $909,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $909,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement chapter 18, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. (strengthening student educational outcomes).

(e) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (biliteracy seal).

(f)(i) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for school bullying and harassment prevention activities.

(ii) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2016 (school safety).

(iii) $1,268,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $1,268,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely to educational service districts for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (school safety and well-being). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(iv) $570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide support and coordination for the regional network of behavioral health, school safety, and threat assessment established in chapter 333, Laws of 2019 (school safety and well-being). Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(f)(iv), $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to schools or school districts for planning and integrating tiered suicide prevention and behavioral health supports. Grants must be awarded first to districts demonstrating the greatest need and readiness. Grants may be used for intensive technical assistance and training, professional development, and evidence-based suicide prevention training.

(v) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(A) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(f)(((iv)))(v), $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a school safety program to provide school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety.

(B) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(f)(((iv)))(v), $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for administration of the school safety center. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training, and maintain a school safety information web site.

(g)(i) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for youth suicide prevention activities.

(ii) $204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (children's mental health).

(iii) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 175, Laws of 2018 (children's mental health services).

(iv) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 64, Laws of 2018 (sexual abuse of students).

(h)(i) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,052,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. Students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, $522,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, and $530,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the building bridges statewide program.

(ii) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090.

(iii) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2017 (truancy reduction efforts).

(i) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a process and provide assistance to school districts in planning for future implementation of the summer knowledge improvement program grants.

(j) $369,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1424 (CTE course equivalencies). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(k) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1599 (high school graduation reqs.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(l) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1139 (educator workforce supply). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for title II SEA state-level activities to implement section 103 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1139 relating to the regional recruiters program. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(m) $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to evaluate and implement best practices and procedures for ensuring that student lunch periods include a seated lunch duration of at least twenty minutes. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall, through an application-based process, select six public schools to serve as demonstration sites. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual grant awards of $5,000 each provided to the six school districts selected to serve as school demonstration sites;

(ii) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to hire a consultant with expertise in nutrition programs to oversee the demonstration projects and provide technical support;

(iii) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide technical support to the demonstration sites and report its findings and recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by June 30, 2021; and

(iv) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the Washington state school directors' association, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to adopt and make publicly available by February 14, 2020, a model policy and procedure that school districts may use to ensure that student lunch periods include a seated lunch duration of at least twenty minutes. In developing the model policy and procedure, the Washington state school directors' association shall, to the extent appropriate and feasible, incorporate pertinent recommendations from the office of the state auditor.

(n) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to publish a list of schools and districts that are not complying with RCW 28A.325.010 and 28A.325.050. The office must publish the list no later than December 30, 2020. Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must:

(i) Collaborate with associated student body executive boards statewide regarding district policies to reduce the extracurricular opportunity gap.

(ii) Require school districts to collect and report to the associated student body executive board the 2018-19 school year data related to students in possession of associated student body cards and student participation in school-based athletic programs by January 15, 2020. School districts with more than one high school must provide each high school's associated student body executive board only the data from each associated student body executive board's respective high school.

(A) Each school district with a high school must collect and publish on its website the following school-level data from each high school for the 2018-19 school year by January 15, 2020, for the 2019-20 school year by April 15, 2020, and for the 2020-21 school year by April 15, 2021:

(I) The number of high school students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program;

(II) The purchase amount of an associated student body card for high school students;

(III) The discounted purchase amount of an associated student body card for high school students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program;

(IV) Athletic program participation fees and any discounted fees for high school students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program;

(V) The number of high school students who possess an associated student body card;

(VI) The number of high school students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program and possess an associated student body card;

(VII) The number of high school students participating in an athletic program; and

(VIII) The number of high school students participating in an athletic program who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program.

(B) The data for the April 2020 and April 2021 reports must include at least two weeks of data from the beginning of spring athletics season.

(C) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide support to ensure that all districts comply with the data reporting requirements in this subsection.

(D) No later than January 15, 2020, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must publish a list of schools and districts that are not complying with RCW 28A.325.050.

(o) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to collect and monitor restraint and isolation data pursuant to chapter 206, Laws of 2015, and to provide training, technical assistance, and other support to schools and districts to reduce the use of restraint and isolation.

(p) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop or expand a mentoring program for persons employed as educational interpreters in public schools. Funds provided under this section may only be used for recruiting, hiring, and training persons to be employed by Washington sensory disability services who must provide mentoring services in different geographic regions of the state, with the dual goals of: Providing services, beginning with the 2019-20 school year, to any requesting school district; and assisting persons in the timely and successful achievement of performance standards for educational interpreters.

(q) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a series of articles, videos, and educational curriculum on the history of agriculture in Washington state, including the role and impact of indigenous and immigrant farmers. The materials must be made available for free to schools, educators, and students. The office may collaborate with other agencies or entities in order to create the educational materials.

(r) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5023 (ethnic studies). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(s) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(t) Within existing resources, the office shall consult with the Washington student achievement council to adopt rules pursuant to Senate Bill No. 5088 (computer science).

(u) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct a pilot program in five school districts of a dropout early warning and intervention data system as defined in RCW 28A.175.074, to identify students beginning in grade eight who are at risk of not graduating from high school and require additional supports. The system at a minimum must measure attendance, behavior, and course performance. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature the progress of all participating schools by December 15, 2020.

(v) Within existing resources, the office shall implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5324 (homeless student support).

(w) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a tribal liaison at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to facilitate access to and support enrollment in career connected learning opportunities for tribal students, including career awareness and exploration, career preparation, and career launch programs, as defined in RCW 28C.30.020, so that tribal students may receive high school or college credit to the maximum extent possible.

(x) $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5247 (catastrophic incidents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(y) Funding in this subsection is sufficient for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5834 (immigration status of students).

(z) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6066 (ethnic studies materials). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(aa) $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $349,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6521 (innovative learning pilot). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(bb) $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6262 (teaching tribal history, etc.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(cc) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6263 (data sharing/schools, tribes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(dd) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office, the Washington state school directors' association government-to-government task force, and the association of educational service districts to collaborate with the tribal leaders congress on education to develop a tribal consultation training and schedule. The tribal consultation training and schedule must be developed by January 1, 2022.

(ee) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office to begin developing African American history, racism, and civil rights instructional materials for grades 7-12. The office must coordinate with two teachers of ethnic studies or comparable course at the middle and high school level and with a national organization dedicated to the advancement of African American civil rights and culture that has previously partnered with Washington educators to produce African American centered material to the office of the education ombuds. Completed instructional materials must be posted to the office's open educational resources webpage on the Washington commons website.

(ff) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office to develop a model civics curriculum, including resources and teacher materials designed to prepare students for lifelong civic engagement. Development of materials must include feedback from diverse communities, including those groups typically underrepresented in voter turnout. All materials must be openly licensed and posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site.

Sec. 502. 2019 c 415 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($3,839,000))

$3,884,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($15,771,000))

$28,617,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($19,610,000))

$32,501,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,834,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,887,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to the professional educator standards board for the following:

(a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), $1,612,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,665,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board including implementation of chapter 172, Laws of 2017 (educator prep. data/PESB).

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to improve preservice teacher training and funding of alternate routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board.

Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b), up to $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and up to $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs.

(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), $622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the recruiting Washington teachers program with priority given to programs that support bilingual teachers, teachers from populations that are underrepresented, and English language learners. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation and expansion of the bilingual educator initiative pilot project established under RCW 28A.180.120.

(2) $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1139 (educator workforce supply). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $662,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($12,663,000))$25,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators).

(a) Of the amount in this subsection, $12,001,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to districts to provide two days of training in the fundamental course of study to all paraeducators. Funds in this subsection are provided solely for reimbursement to school districts that provide two days of training in the fundamental course of study to paraeducators during the 2019-20 school year.

(b) Of the amounts in this subsection, $12,587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for reimbursement to school districts that provide two days of training in the fundamental course of study to paraeducators during the 2020-21 school year, and to the extent funds are available, the board may reimburse districts for up to two additional training days needed to complete the course of study.

(c) No later than December 1, 2020, the professional educator standards board must submit a report to the legislature including the following:

(i) The total number of trainings that districts provided;

(ii) The number of paraeducators that completed the training, by district; and

(iii) The total expenditures reimbursed to school districts, by district.

(4) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $259,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5389 (telehealth program/youth). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 503. 2019 c 415 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($8,752,402,000))

$8,480,996,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($9,137,269,000))

$9,176,713,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,345,730,000))

$1,664,730,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($19,235,401,000))

$19,322,439,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 504 and 505 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.

(c) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 502 and 503, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(e)(i) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the agency rules defining a full-time equivalent student with the increase in the minimum instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220, as amended by the legislature in 2014.

(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.

(g) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, school districts must report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the monthly actual average district-wide class size across each grade level of kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade classes. The superintendent of public instruction shall report this information to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30th of each year.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school, including those at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Grade K

17.00

17.00

Grade 1

17.00

17.00

Grade 2

17.00

17.00

Grade 3

17.00

17.00

Grade 4

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 20.0.

(ii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(iii) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii)(A) For the twenty schools with the lowest overall school score for all students in the 2018-19 school year, as determined by the Washington school improvement framework among elementary schools, middle schools, and other schools not serving students up to twelfth grade, having enrollments greater than one hundred fifty students, in addition to the allocation under (d)(i) of this subsection the superintendent shall allocate additional funding for guidance counselors for each level of prototypical school as follows:

Elementary

Middle

Guidance counselors

0.307

0.512

To receive additional allocations under this subsection, a school eligible to receive the allocation must have demonstrated actual staffing for guidance counselors for its prototypical school level that meets or exceeds the staffing for guidance counselors in (d)(i) of this subsection and this subsection (2)(d)(ii)(A) for its prototypical school level. School districts must distribute the additional guidance counselors allocation in this subsection to the schools that generate the allocation. The enhancement within this subsection is not part of the state's program of basic education.

(B) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Career and Technical Education

3.07

3.07

Skill Center

3.41

3.41

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

1.253

Middle School

1.353

High School

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors: Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by ((12.51))12.50 percent in the 2019-20 school year and ((12.53))12.52 percent in the 2020-21 school year for career and technical education students, and ((17.84))17.83 percent in the 2019-20 school year and ((17.86))17.85 percent in the 2020-21 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 23.80 percent in the 2019-20 school year and ((23.80))24.03 percent in the 2020-21 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 24.33 percent in the 2019-20 school year and ((24.33))24.44 percent in the 2020-21 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the rates specified in section 506 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) Until December 31, 2019 and for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts for the 2020-21 school year:

(i) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and

(ii) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2020, and except for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts for the 2020-21 school year, the number of calculated benefit units determined below. Calculated benefit units are staff units multiplied by the benefit allocation factors established in the collective bargaining agreement referenced in ((section 938 of this act))section 908 of this act. These factors are intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent employees may be calculated on the basis of 630 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent. The number of benefit units is determined as follows:

(i) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.02; and

(ii) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.43.

(c) For health benefits payments to the health care authority for benefits provided to school employees in January 2020, school districts must provide payment to the health care authority within three business days of receiving the January 2020 allocation for insurance benefits. The health care authority and office of the superintendent of public instruction must coordinate with school districts to enable timely payment to the health care authority consistent with this subsection.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a)(i) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Technology

$135.91

(($138.75))$138.08

Utilities and Insurance

$369.29

(($377.04))$375.20

Curriculum and Textbooks

$145.92

(($148.99))$148.26

Other Supplies

$289.00

(($295.07))$293.62

Library Materials

$20.79

(($21.23))$21.12

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$22.57

(($23.04))$22.93

Facilities Maintenance

$182.94

(($186.79))$185.87

Security and Central Office

$126.74

(($129.41))$128.77

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$1,293.16

(($1,320.32))$1,313.85

(ii) For the 2019-20 school year and 2020-21 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (A) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii) exceeds (B) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,529.98 for the 2019-20 school year and (($1,562.11))$1,554.46 for the 2020-21 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,529.98 for the 2019-20 school year and (($1,562.11))$1,554.46 for the 2020-21 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at the following rate:

MSOC Component

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Technology

$39.08

(($39.90))$39.70

Curriculum and Textbooks

$42.63

(($43.53))$43.32

Other Supplies

$83.04

(($84.79))$84.37

Library Materials

$5.78

(($5.90))$5.87

Instructional Professional Development for Certified

and Classified Staff

$7.11

(($7.25))$7.22

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$177.64

(($181.37))$180.48

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 299, Laws of 2018 (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

Funding in this section is sufficient to fund all day kindergarten programs in all schools in the 2019-20 school year and 2020-21 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315.

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (13) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2020 and 2021 as follows:

(a) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.2 FTE enrollment for career launch students pursuant to RCW 28A.700.130. Expenditures for this purpose must come first from the appropriations provided in section 521 of this act; funding for career launch enrollment exceeding those appropriations is provided in this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022. The report must include the total FTE enrollment for career launch students, the FTE enrollment for career launch students that exceeded the appropriations provided in section 521, and the amount expended from this section for those students.

(18) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.

(((18)))(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (13) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(((19)))(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(((20)))(21) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. For the 2019-2021 biennium, general apportionment payments are not reduced for school districts receiving federal forest revenues.

Sec. 504. 2019 c 415 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and under ((section 504 of this act))section 503 of this act: For the 2019-20 school year and the 2020-21 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.

Statewide Minimum Salary Allocation

Staff Type

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Certificated Instructional

$66,520

(($67,917))$67,585

Certificated Administrative

$98,741

(($100,815))$100,321

Classified

$47,720

(($48,722))$48,483

(2) For the purposes of this section, "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on ((December 10, 2018, at 8:24 hours))February 22, 2020, at 05:23 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 23.16 percent for school year 2019-20 and ((23.16))23.39 percent for school year 2020-21 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 20.83 percent for school year 2019-20 and ((20.83))20.94 percent for the 2020-21 school year for classified staff.

(4) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education).

Sec. 505. 2019 c 415 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($379,041,000))

$387,359,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($726,648,000))

$659,171,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,105,689,000))

$1,046,530,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The salary increases provided in this section are 2.0 percent for the 2019-20 school year, and ((2.1))1.6 percent for the 2020-21 school year, the annual inflationary adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.

(2)(a) In addition to salary allocations ((specified in this subsection (1) funding)), the appropriations in this ((subsection includes two days of))section include funding for professional learning as defined in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434. Funding for this purpose is calculated as the equivalent of two days of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in school year 2019-20, and three days ((of professional learning))of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in school year 2020-21. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(b) Of the funding provided for professional learning in this section, the equivalent of one day of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in school year 2020-21 must be used to train school district staff on racial literacy, cultural responsiveness, and stereotype threat for purposes of closing persistent opportunity gaps.

(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 23.16 percent for the 2019-20 school year and ((23.16))23.39 percent for the 2020-21 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 20.83 percent for the 2019-20 school year and ((20.83))20.94 percent for the 2020-21 school year for classified staff.

(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in ((sections 504 and 505 of this act))sections 503 and 504 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in ((sections 504 and 505 of this act))sections 503 and 504 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 504, 505, and 506 of this act.

(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(4) The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund the collective bargaining agreement referenced in ((section 938 of this act))section 908 of this act and reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates as follows:

(a) For the 2019-20 school year, $973.00 per month from September 1, 2019, to December 31, 2019, $994 per month from January 1, 2020, to June 30, 2020, and $1,056 per month from July 1, 2020, to August 31, 2020; and

(b) For the 2020-21 school year, (($1,056))$1,014 per month.

(5) When bargaining for funding for school employees health benefits for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, any proposal agreed upon must assume the imposition of a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(6) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

(7) $1,226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $2,763,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5091 (special education funding).

(8) $509,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6117 (special education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 506. 2019 c 415 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($614,906,000))

$625,037,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($615,788,000))

$626,529,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$29,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,230,694,000))

$1,281,066,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 505, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.

(4) A maximum of $939,000 of this fiscal year 2020 appropriation and a maximum of $939,000 of the fiscal year 2021 appropriation may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(5) Subject to available funds under this section, school districts may provide student transportation for summer skills center programs.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(8) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW 28A.305.141.

(9) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

(10) $29,500,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for a one-time backfill funding for excess allocations to school districts in fiscal year 2019 that resulted from an erroneous methodology used by the office of superintendent of public instruction. The amount provided in this subsection must not be included in the methodology used to calculate the 2020-21 school year pupil transportation operations allocation. The amount in this subsection must remain unexpended and in unallotted status until the report required in section 129(14) of this act must be completed and the superintendent and the office of financial management agree that the methodology used to allocate the funds in this section accurately reflect the components and modeling approach in RCW 28A.160.192 and will not result in the need for additional backfill funding.

Sec. 507. 2019 c 415 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($1,402,262,000))

$1,411,567,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,501,646,000))

$1,472,978,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($499,428,000))

$514,008,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,694,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,458,050,000))

$3,453,267,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through ((sections 504 and 506 of this act))sections 503 and 505 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390 as amended by chapter 266, Laws of 2018 (basic education), except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under ((section 504 (2) and (4) of this act))section 503 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 507, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 13.5 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) (($71,253,000))$63,609,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($87,253,000))$100,655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $29,574,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (education).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $931,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(12)(a) $30,746,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $46,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5091 (special education funding).

(b) Within amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for fiscal year 2021 for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in chapter 387, Laws of 2019 (special education funding).

(13) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support professional development in inclusionary practices for classroom teachers. The primary form of support to public school classroom teachers must be for mentors who are experts in best practices for inclusive education, differentiated instruction, and individualized instruction. Funding for mentors must be prioritized to the public schools with the highest percentage of students with individualized education programs aged six through twenty-one who spend the least amount of time in general education classrooms.

(14) Beginning September 1, 2020, funding for payments to providers for the early support for infants and toddler program is transferred to the department of children, youth, and families to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2787 (infants and toddlers program).

(15) $9,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6117 (special education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 508. 2019 c 415 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$12,869,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($12,948,000))

$18,930,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($25,817,000))

$31,799,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding ((within))in this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) Funding in this section is provided for regional professional development related to English language arts curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(4) For fiscal year 2021, funding in this section is provided for regional technical support for the K-20 telecommunications network to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(5) For fiscal year 2021, funding in this section is provided for a corps of nurses located at the educational service districts, to be dispatched in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(6) For fiscal year 2021, funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide a network of support for school districts to develop and implement comprehensive suicide prevention and behavioral health supports for students.

(7) For fiscal year 2021, funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide assistance to school districts with comprehensive safe schools planning, conducting needs assessments, school safety and security trainings, coordinating appropriate crisis and emergency response and recovery, and developing threat assessment and crisis intervention teams.

(8) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 509. 2019 c 415 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($365,560,000))

$353,213,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($389,331,000))

$332,158,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($754,891,000))

$685,371,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(($17,010,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $44,586,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for changes to the levy and levy equalization system as specified in either Substitute House Bill No. 2140 or Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5313 (K-12 education funding). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2019, these amounts shall lapse. Included in these amounts are hold harmless local effort assistance payments. In calendar years 2020 and 2021, in each calendar year a school district will receive an amount equal to number A minus number B if number A is greater than number B. For purposes of this section:

(1) "Number A" is the sum of the local effort assistance and enrichment levy a district would have received under law as it existed on January 1, 2019.

(2) "Number B" is the sum of the local effort assistance and enrichment levy a district receives under Substitute House Bill No. 2140 (K-12 education funding), if the district's levy collections were the lesser of the maximum dollar amount that may be levied at twenty percent of the district's levy base or its voter approved levy amount in calendar year 2018.))$25,170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $20,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a one-time hold harmless for local effort assistance in calendar year 2020.

Sec. 510. 2019 c 415 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($15,886,000))

$15,501,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($16,461,000))

$16,704,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($32,347,000))

$32,205,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) (($1,066,000))$999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($1,661,000))$2,110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to increase the capacity of institutional education programs to differentiate instruction to meet students' unique educational needs. Those needs may include but are not limited to one-on-one instruction, enhanced access to counseling for social emotional needs of the student, and services to identify the proper level of instruction at the time of student entry into the facility.

(7) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 ((and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely to support one student records coordinator in the Issaquah school district to manage the transmission of academic records with the Echo Glen children's center.

(8) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to support three student records coordinators to manage the transmission of academic records for each of the long-term juvenile institutions. One coordinator is provided for each of the following: The Issaquah school district for the Echo Glen children's center, the Chehalis school district for Green Hill academic school, and the Naselle-Grays River Valley school district for Naselle youth camp school.

(9) Ten percent of the funds allocated for the institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 511. 2019 c 415 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($30,490,000))

$30,504,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($31,551,000))

$31,696,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($62,041,000))

$62,200,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 511, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

Sec. 512. 2019 c 415 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR MISCELLANEOUS—EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,802,000))

$6,802,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,802,000))

$6,802,000

Sec. 513. 2019 c 415 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($134,185,000))

$131,298,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($135,807,000))

$135,955,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$96,576,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,450,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,636,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$765,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($370,419,000))

$367,680,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ACCOUNTABILITY

(a) $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.

(b) $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013 (K-12 education - failing schools).

(c) Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall obtain an existing student assessment inventory tool that is free and openly licensed and distribute the tool to every school district. Each school district shall use the student assessment inventory tool to identify all state-level and district-level assessments that are required of students. The state-required assessments should include: Reading proficiency assessments used for compliance with RCW 28A.320.202; the required statewide assessments under chapter 28A.655 RCW in grades three through eight and at the high school level in English language arts, mathematics, and science, as well as the practice and training tests used to prepare for them; and the high school end-of-course exams in mathematics under RCW 28A.655.066. District-required assessments should include: The second grade reading assessment used to comply with RCW 28A.300.320; interim smarter balanced assessments, if required; the measures of academic progress assessment, if required; and other required interim, benchmark, or summative standardized assessments, including assessments used in social studies, the arts, health, and physical education in accordance with RCW 28A.230.095, and for educational technology in accordance with RCW 28A.655.075. The assessments identified should not include assessments used to determine eligibility for any categorical program including the transitional bilingual instruction program, learning assistance program, highly capable program, special education program, or any formative or diagnostic assessments used solely to inform teacher instructional practices, other than those already identified. By October 15th of each year, each district shall report to the superintendent the amount of student time in the previous school year that is spent taking each assessment identified. By December 15th of each even numbered calendar year, the superintendent shall summarize the information reported by the school districts and report to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

(2) EDUCATOR CONTINUUM

(a) (($72,124,000))$69,237,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($73,619,000))$73,767,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,505 per teacher in the 2019-20 school year and a bonus of (($5,621))$5,593 per teacher in the 2020-21 school year;

(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;

(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(iv) During the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after fully exhausting all years of candidacy as set by the national board for professional teaching standards are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(b) $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(c) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(d) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(e) $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program. The program shall prioritize first year educators in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning educator aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new educators to work together; and educator observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

(f) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.

Sec. 514. 2019 c 415 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($201,330,000))

$205,270,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($210,659,000))

$216,650,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$102,242,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($514,235,000))

$524,166,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2019-20 and 2020-21; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2019-20 and 2020-21 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: ((1.97))1.93 percent for school year 2019-20 and ((1.95))1.89 percent for school year 2020-21.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

(6) $1,023,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $1,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 515. 2019 c 415 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($438,940,000))

$416,973,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($450,681,000))

$430,591,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$533,481,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,423,102,000))

$1,381,045,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 515, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the prior school year. The prior school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(5) Within existing resources, during the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.

Sec. 516. 2019 c 415 s 518 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—PER PUPIL ALLOCATIONS

Statewide Average Allocations

Per Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent Student

Basic Education Program

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

General Apportionment

(($9,173))$9,176

(($9,450))$9,380

Pupil Transportation

(($519))$586

(($521))$587

Special Education Programs

(($9,696))$9,641

(($10,158))$10,197

Institutional Education Programs

(($18,562))$19,186

(($19,030))$20,557

Programs for Highly Capable Students

$598

(($615))$610

Transitional Bilingual Programs

(($1,346))$1,365

(($1,380))$1,392

Learning Assistance Program

(($969))$932

(($997))$951

Sec. 517. 2019 c 415 s 519 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocations purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.

(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative approval through the budget request process.

(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.

(4) Appropriations in ((sections 504 and 506 of this act))sections 503 and 505 of this act for insurance benefits under chapter 41.05 RCW are provided solely for the superintendent to allocate to districts for employee health benefits as provided in ((section 938 of this act))section 908 of this act. The superintendent may not allocate, and districts may not expend, these amounts for any other purpose beyond those authorized in ((section 938 of this act))section 908 of this act.

(((5)))(6) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.

Sec. 518. 2019 c 415 s 520 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR CHARTER SCHOOLS

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($99,810,000))

$94,007,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($99,810,000))

$94,007,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

Sec. 519. 2019 c 415 s 521 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($250,000))

$289,000

Charter Schools Oversight Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,210,000))

$2,454,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,460,000))

$2,743,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation in this section is provided to the superintendent of public instruction solely for the operations of the Washington state charter school commission under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

Sec. 520. 2019 c 415 s 522 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GRANTS AND PASS THROUGH FUNDING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($35,516,000))

$35,466,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($35,621,000))

$36,399,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($71,137,000))

$71,865,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants for implementation of dual credit programs and subsidized advanced placement exam fees, international baccalaureate class fees, and exam and course fees for low-income students.

For expenditures related to subsidized exam fees, the superintendent of public instruction shall report: The number of students served; the demographics of the students served; and how the students perform on the exams.

(2)(a) $2,052,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($2,052,000))$2,752,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008, including parts of programs receiving grants that serve students in grades four through six. If equally matched by private donations, $1,075,000 of the 2020 appropriation and $1,075,000 of the 2021 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs in grades four through twelve. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $100,000 of the fiscal year 2020 appropriation and (($100,000))$800,000 of the fiscal year 2021 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(b) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(c) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for ((advanced)) project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding ((in 2020)), a high school must have offered ((a foundational))at least one project lead the way course during the ((2018-19))prior school year. The ((2020 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2019-20 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2021, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2019-20 school year. The 2020)) funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for ((an advanced))a new project lead the way course((, to be offered to students beginning in the 2020-21 school year)). The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(d) $2,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in maritime, construction, aerospace, and advanced manufacturing programs. To be eligible for funding, the skills center and high schools must agree to engage in developing local business and industry partnerships for oversight and input regarding program components. Program instructors must also agree to participate in professional development leading to student employment or certification in maritime, construction, aerospace, or advanced manufacturing industries, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center shall report annually student participation and long-term outcome data. Within the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs.

(ii) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in construction programs.

(iii) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in maritime programs.

(iv) (($350,000))$777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($350,000))$777,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit entity to expand the current employer engagement program to support schools, teachers, and students and to provide management, assessment, and outreach of the manufacturing programs.

(3)(a) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for project citizen and we the people: The citizen and the constitution programs sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle and high school students. Of the amounts provided, $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for awarding a travel grant to the winner of the we the people: The citizen and the constitution state competition.

(b) $384,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 127, Laws of 2018 (civics education). Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(b), $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grant programs to school districts to help cover travel costs associated with civics education competitions.

(c) (($55,000))$30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((is))and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop civics education materials for grades K-5. The office must contract for the production of the materials with an experienced Washington state organization that produces civics education materials currently posted as an open education resource at the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(4)(a) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation of career and technical education course equivalency frameworks authorized under RCW 28A.700.070 for math and science. This may include development of additional equivalency course frameworks, course performance assessments, and professional development for districts implementing the new frameworks.

(b) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure career and technical education courses are aligned with high-demand, high-wage jobs. The superintendent shall verify that the current list of career and technical education courses meets the criteria established in RCW 28A.700.020(2). The superintendent shall remove from the list any career and technical education course that no longer meets such criteria.

(c) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide grants to school districts and educational service districts for science teacher training in the next generation science standards including training in the climate science standards. At a minimum, school districts shall ensure that teachers in one grade level in each elementary, middle, and high school participate in this science training. Of the amount appropriated $1,000,000 is provided solely for community based nonprofits including tribal education organizations to partner with public schools for next generation science standards.

(5) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The superintendent of public instruction shall award grants consistent with RCW 28A.300.410.

(6) $3,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($3,145,000))$3,395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for demonstration sites to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to chapter 71, Laws of 2016 (foster youth edu. outcomes). The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(a) Of the amount provided in this subsection (6), $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, section 202(10), chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection (6), $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act, section 501(43)(b), chapter 4, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (6), $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the demonstration site established with funding provided in the 2017-2019 omnibus appropriations act, chapter 1, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(7) $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(8)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($1,000,000))$1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (homeless students).

(b) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for chapter 212, Laws of 2014 (homeless student educational outcomes).

(9) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a nonviolence and ethical leadership training and professional development program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(10) $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($1,425,000))$960,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 236, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1445) (dual language/early learning & K-12). In selecting recipients of the K-12 dual language grant, the superintendent of public instruction must prioritize districts that received grants under section 501(33), chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(11)(a) $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship and Washington higher education readiness program. The funds shall be used to: Support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars; and to identify and reduce barriers to college for low-income and underserved middle and high school students. Of the amounts provided: $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the college success foundation to establish programming in new regions throughout the state. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(b) $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(c) $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 180, Laws of 2017 (Washington Aim program).

(12)(a) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($356,000))$500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(b) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a statewide information technology academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as information technology certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools. The office must require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework. The report must include the number of students served disaggregated by gender, race, ethnicity, and free-and-reduced lunch eligibility as well as the number of industry certificates attained by type of certificate.

(c) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(d) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the computer science and education grant program to support the following three purposes: Train and credential teachers in computer sciences; provide and upgrade technology needed to learn computer science; and, for computer science frontiers grants to introduce students to and engage them in computer science. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use the computer science learning standards adopted pursuant to chapter 3, Laws of 2015 (computer science) in implementing the grant, to the extent possible. Additionally, grants provided for the purpose of introducing students to computer science are intended to support innovative ways to introduce and engage students from historically underrepresented groups, including girls, low-income students, and minority students, to computer science and to inspire them to enter computer science careers.

((Funds may be expended as grant funding only to the extent that they are equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.))The office of the superintendent of public instruction may award up to $500,000 each year, without a matching requirement, to districts with greater than fifty percent of students eligible for free and reduced-price meals. All other awards must be equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.

(e) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization to integrate the state learning standards in English language arts, mathematics, and science with FieldSTEM outdoor field studies and project-based and work-based learning opportunities aligned with the environmental, natural resource, and agricultural sectors. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(f) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(i) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(ii) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(g) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(13) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

(14) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide learning experiences for student-athletes in the science, technology, engineering, and math sectors. The office must contract with a nonprofit to offer student-athlete classes, programs, and scholarships to improve school performance and advancement across diverse communities.

(15) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create and administer a grant program for districts to reduce associated student body fees for students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program. The office must distribute grants for the 2020-21 school year to school districts by August 10, 2020.

(a) Grant awards must be prioritized in the following order:

(i) High schools implementing the United States department of agriculture community eligibility provision;

(ii) High schools with the highest percentage of students in grades nine through twelve eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price means program; and

(iii) High schools located in school districts enrolling five thousand or fewer students.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award grants of up to five thousand dollars per high school per year. The office may award additional funding if:

(i) The appropriations provided are greater than the total amount of funding requested at the end of the application cycle; and

(ii) The applicant shows a demonstrated need for additional support.

(16) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for contracts with state-based nonprofit organizations that provide direct services to military- connected students exclusively through one-to-one volunteer mentoring. The goal of the mentoring is to build resiliency in military connected students and increase their ability to cope with the stress of parental deployment and frequent moves, which will help promote good decision-making by youth, help increase attachment and a positive attitude toward school, and develop positive peer relationships. An applicant requesting funding for these dollars must successfully demonstrate to the department that it currently provides direct one-to-one volunteer mentoring services to military connected elementary students in the state and has been providing military mentoring to students in the state for at least twenty-four months prior to application.

(17) $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5612 (holocaust education). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(18) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to the pacific science center to continue providing science on wheels activities in schools and other community settings. Funding is provided to develop a new computer science program and outfit a van with program resources in order to expand statewide outreach.

(19) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for contracts with Washington state based nonprofit organizations that provide a career-integrated one-to-one mentoring program for disadvantaged high school students facing academic and personal challenges with the goal of keeping them on track for graduation and post-high school success. The mentoring must include a focus on college readiness, career exploration and social-emotional learning. An applicant requesting funding for these dollars must successfully demonstrate to the department that it currently provides a career-integrated one-to-one volunteer mentoring program and has been mentoring high school youth for at least twenty years in the state prior to application.

(20) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to school districts to provide school resource officer training, as required in Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (student mental health and well-being).

(21) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Bethel school district to expand post-secondary education opportunities at Graham-Kapowsin high school.

(22) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the south Kitsap school district to develop pathways for high school diplomas and post-secondary credentials through controls programmer apprenticeships.

(23) $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a math improvement pilot program for school districts to improve math scores. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Spokane school district to improve math scores.

(b) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Chehalis school district to improve math scores.

(c) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Bremerton school district to improve math scores.

(24) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($150,000))$220,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office to establish the media literacy grant program.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for speaker costs, per diem and travel, and other expenses for five media literacy pre-conferences that coincide with the office's regional conferences in social studies, English language arts, health and technology.

(b) The office shall develop a plan for identifying and supporting a group of one hundred media literacy champions across the state that are K-12 professionals that promote, support, and provide media literacy education in their school districts and report to the legislature by December 31, 2020.

(25) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Seattle education access program to ensure students on nontraditional educational pathways have the mentorship and technical assistance needed to navigate higher education and financial aid. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(26) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the south Kitsap school district to co-develop a pilot strategy to increase completion rates for the free application for federal student aid (FAFSA).

(27) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for school districts to utilize data analytics tools to visualize data from internal and external sources.

(28) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to the Renton school district to expand early learning opportunities with the Somali parent's education board.

(29) $1,385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5607 (dual language learning). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to establish a new dual language program.

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to expand an existing dual language program.

(c) $187,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to create heritage language programs for immigrant and refugee students.

(d) $187,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to create indigenous language programs for native students.

(30) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the expansion of the southwest Washington career connected learning network.

(31) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to school districts to create systems, policies, and practices to address racial discipline gaps consistent with RCW 28A.415.410. The office of superintendent of public instruction, in coordination with a state association representing both certificated and classified staff, an association representing principals, an association representing school superintendents, the Washington state school directors association, and an association representing parents, will guide grant recipients using existing training materials and resources. Grant recipients must develop systems that provide tiered supports for intervention, restorative approaches to behavior, and eliminate zero-tolerance policies that contribute to racial disparities.

Sec. 521. 2019 c 406 s 13 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to the office of the superintendent of public instruction and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($425,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $425,000))$850,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for expanding career connected learning as defined in section 57 of this act.

(2) (($158,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $480,000))$638,000, or as much ((the)) thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for increasing the funding per full-time equivalent for career launch programs as described in ((section 60 of this act))RCW 28A.700.130. In the 2019-21 fiscal biennium, for career launch enrollment exceeding the funding provided in this subsection, funding is provided in section 503 of this act.

(3) (($750,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $750,000))$1,500,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for Marysville school district to collaborate with Arlington school district, Everett Community College, other local school districts, local labor unions, local Washington state apprenticeship and training council registered apprenticeship programs, and local industry groups to develop a regional apprenticeship pathways pilot program. The pilot program must seek to:

(a) Establish an education-based apprenticeship preparation program recognized by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council that prepares individuals for registered apprenticeships within the building and construction trades;

(b) Provide dual credit for participants by meeting high school graduation requirements and providing opportunities for credit leading to a college credential; and

(c) Provide participants with preferred or direct entry into a state registered apprenticeship program in the building and construction trades.

(End of part)

PART VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

Sec. 601. 2019 c 415 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($677,935,000))

$678,329,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($703,459,000))

$706,521,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,505,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$158,528,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$67,784,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,631,211,000))

$1,634,667,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2020 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2021.

(2) $2,443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation ((is))are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.

(3) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Seattle central college's expansion of allied health programs.

(4) $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.

(5) $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, and $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.

(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.

(7) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:

(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;

(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and

(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.

(8) $19,759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($20,174,000))$20,194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(9) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.

(10) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(11) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Wenatchee Valley college wildfire prevention program.

(12) The state board for community and technical colleges shall collaborate with a permanently registered Washington sector intermediary to integrate and offer related supplemental instruction for information technology apprentices by the 2020-21 academic year.

(13) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Puget Sound welcome back center at Highline College to create a grant program for internationally trained individuals seeking employment in the behavioral health field in Washington state.

(14) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for increased enrollments in the integrated basic education and skills training program. Funding will support approximately 120 additional full-time equivalent enrollments annually.

(15)(a) The state board must provide quality assurance reports on the ctcLink project at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(b) The state board must develop a technology budget using a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, funding sources, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project initiation to implementation. The budget must be updated at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(c) The office of the chief information officer may suspend the ctcLink project at any time if the office of the chief information officer determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated performance measures, implementation timelines, or budget estimates. Once suspension or termination occurs, the state board shall not make additional expenditures on the ctcLink project without approval of the chief information officer. The ctcLink project funded through the community and technical college innovation account created in RCW 28B.50.515 is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

(16) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education at North Seattle College.

(17) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Highline College to implement the Federal Way higher education initiative in partnership with the city of Federal Way and the University of Washington Tacoma campus.

(18) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Peninsula College to maintain the annual cohorts of the specified programs as follows:

(a) Medical assisting, 40 students;

(b) Nursing assistant, 60 students; and

(c) Registered nursing, 32 students.

(19) $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state labor education and research center at South Seattle College.

(20) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Washington family and community and engagement trust and Everett Community College to continue and expand a civic education and leadership program for underserved adults and youth.

(21) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the aerospace and advanced manufacturing center of excellence hosted by Everett Community College to develop a semiconductor and electronics manufacturing branch in Vancouver.

(22) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1893 (student assistance grants). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(23) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $348,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5800 (homeless college students). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(24) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of guided pathways or similar programs designed to improve student success, including, but not limited to, academic program redesign, student advising, and other student supports.

(25) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the state board to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(26) $784,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $779,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for legal costs related to the Wolf vs state board for community and technical college litigation.

(27) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to develop plans to increase the ratio of full-time tenure-track faculty to adjunct faculty, expand opportunities for adjunct faculty to participate in the college community, and achieve pay equity between full-time and adjunct faculty. Each community and technical college district must develop, in consultation with academic employee bargaining representatives at the college, a plan to achieve these goals and provide the plan to the state board for community and technical colleges by November 1, 2020. The state board must develop, in consultation with academic employee collective bargaining representatives, a plan to accomplish these goals, as well as a plan to achieve a system-wide ratio of full-time tenure-track faculty to adjunct faculty of at least sixty percent. The state board must submit the plans to the fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2020.

(28) The state board must submit state-funded full-time equivalent student enrollment data for the community and technical college system to the education research and data center for the state-funded public higher education enrollment report by November 1st of each year.

(29) Within existing resources, by December 1, 2020, the state board for community and technical colleges shall submit to the office of financial management, the fiscal committees of the legislature, and to the office of superintendent of public instruction the following running start data for fiscal year 2018, fiscal year 2019, and fiscal year 2020, for each community and technical college:

(a) The total number of running start students served by headcount and full-time equivalent.

(b) The total amount of running start revenue received through apportionment as allocated with the running start rate by the office of superintendent of public instruction through local school districts;

(c) The total amount of revenue received directly from local school districts that is not provided through the running start allocation described in subsection (b);

(d) The total amount of fee revenue generated directly from running start students and families, broken out by fee name, fee type, or both;

(e) Expenditures by object, sub-object, program, and fund for all running start revenues from state apportionment and fees;

(f) Any transfers of running start revenue between funds;

(g) Course completion rates for running start students;

(h) A list of courses by two-digit classification of instructional program code and the number of running start students in each course;

(i) A list of career and technical education area courses and the number of running start students in each course;

(j) The number of students at each community or technical college receiving complete fee waivers as required by RCW 28A.600.310(3)(a);

(k) The total dollar value of fee waivers provided to running start students;

(l) A total allocation of additional funds provided to cover fee waivers; and

(m) The method used by each college to determine running start fee waiver eligibility, including any policies adopted by the college or its program.

Sec. 602. 2019 c 415 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

(1) GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($341,498,000))

$340,775,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($347,067,000))

$355,338,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,590,000))

$1,606,000

University of Washington Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,546,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,530,000))

$36,731,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,075,000))

$3,087,000

Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$800,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($609,000))

$612,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$256,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
(($263,000))

$272,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$50,906,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,814,000))

$7,906,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,419,000))

$7,506,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($799,373,000))

$807,341,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $41,010,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($41,872,000))$41,913,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for labor archives of Washington. The university shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(c) $8,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to maintain the number of residency slots available in Washington.

(d) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(e) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,550,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation are provided solely for ocean acidification monitoring, forecasting, and research and for operation of the Washington ocean acidification center. The center must continue to make quarterly progress reports to the Washington marine resources advisory council created under RCW 43.06.338.

(f) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.

(g) (($3,000,000))$1,549,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.

(h) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(i) $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the continued operations and expansion of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.

(j) $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the institute for stem cell and regenerative medicine. Funds appropriated in this subsection must be dedicated to research utilizing pluripotent stem cells and related research methods.

(k) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided to the University of Washington to support youth and young adults experiencing homelessness in the university district of Seattle. Funding is provided for the university to work with community service providers and university colleges and departments to plan for and implement a comprehensive one-stop center with navigation services for homeless youth; the university may contract with the department of commerce to expand services that serve homeless youth in the university district.

(l) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the psychiatry residency program at the University of Washington to offer additional residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education.

(m)(i) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a University of Washington study in the south Cascades to determine current wolf use and density, and to gather baseline data to understand the effects of wolf recolonization on predator-prey dynamics of species that currently have established populations in the area. The study objectives shall include:

(A) Determination of whether wolves have started to recolonize a 5,000 square kilometer study area in the south Cascades of Washington, and if so, an assessment of their distribution over the landscape as well as their health and pregnancy rates;

(B) Baseline data collection, if wolves have not yet established pack territories in this portion of the state, that will allow for the assessment of how the functional densities and diets of wolves across the landscape will affect the densities and diets in the following predators and prey: Coyote, cougar, black bear, bobcat, red fox, wolverine, elk, white tailed deer, mule deer, moose, caribou, and snowshoe hare;

(C) Examination of whether the microbiome of each species changes as wolves start to occupy suitable habitat; and

(D) An assessment of the use of alternative wildlife monitoring tools to cost-effectively monitor size of the wolf population over the long-term.

(ii) A report on the findings of the study shall be shared with the Washington department of fish and wildlife.

(n) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to support the operations and teaching mission of the Harborview Medical Center and the University of Washington Medical Center.

(o) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the University of Washington's psychiatry integrated care training program.

(p) $400,000 of the geoduck aquaculture research account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington sea grant program at the University of Washington to complete a three-year study to identify best management practices related to shellfish production. The University of Washington must submit an annual report detailing any findings and outline the progress of the study, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, to the office of the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by December 1st of each year.

(q) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the University of Washington School of Dentistry to support its role as a major oral health provider to individuals covered by medicaid and the uninsured.

(r) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the pre-law pipeline and social justice program at the University of Washington Tacoma.

(s) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Bothell branch to develop series of online courses for school district staff related to behavioral health. The standards for the online courses must be consistent with any knowledge, skill, and performance standards related to mental health and well-being of public school students. Among other things, the online courses must:

(i) Teach participants relevant laws, including laws around physical restraint and isolation;

(ii) Provide foundational knowledge in behavioral health, mental health, and mental illness;

(iii) Describe how to assess, intervene upon, and refer behavioral health and substance use issues; and

(iv) Teach approaches to promote health and positively influence student health behaviors.

(t) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for core operations at forefront to achieve its mission of reducing suicide.

(u) $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to collaborate with the northwest Parkinson's foundation and the state department of veterans affairs to study Parkinson's diagnoses treatment and specialist care across ethnic and racial groups and to develop a pilot program that helps people with Parkinson's better access specialist care and community services.

(v) $256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university's neurology department to create a telemedicine program to disseminate dementia care best practices to primary care practitioners using the project ECHO model. The program shall provide a virtual connection for providers and content experts and include didactics, case conferences, and an emphasis on practice transformation and systems-level issues that affect care delivery. The initial users of this program shall include referral sources in health care systems and clinics, such as the university's neighborhood clinics and Virginia Mason Memorial in Yakima with a goal of adding fifteen to twenty providers from smaller clinics and practices per year.

(w) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university's center for international trade in forest products.

(x) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Latino center for health.

(y) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the Latino center for health to:

(i) Estimate the number of practicing Latino physicians in Washington including age and gender distributions;

(ii) Create a profile of Latino physicians that includes their geographic distribution, medical and surgical specialties, training and certifications, and language access;

(iii) Develop a set of policy recommendations to meet the growing needs of Latino communities in urban and rural communities throughout Washington. The center must provide the report to the university and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2020.

(z) To ensure transparency and accountability, in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium the University of Washington shall comply with any and all financial and accountability audits by the Washington state auditor including any and all audits of university services offered to the general public, including those offered through any public-private partnership, business venture, affiliation, or joint venture with a public or private entity, except the government of the United States. The university shall comply with all state auditor requests for the university's financial and business information including the university's governance and financial participation in these public-private partnerships, business ventures, affiliations, or joint ventures with a public or private entity. In any instance in which the university declines to produce the information to the state auditor, the university will provide the state auditor a brief summary of the documents withheld and a citation of the legal or contractual provision that prevents disclosure. The summaries must be compiled into a report by the state auditor and provided on a quarterly basis to the legislature.

(aa) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university's school of public health to study home-sharing for privately-owned residential properties. The study must include:

(i) An analysis of home-sharing programs across the country, including population served, costs, duration of stays, and size of programs;

(ii) An analysis of similar initiatives in Washington state and potential barriers to expansion;

(iii) A review of best practices and policies; and

(iv) Recommendations for the establishment and continuation of home-sharing programs.

(bb) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to expand the project extension for community health care outcomes (ECHO) to include training related to people with autism and developmental disabilities. Project ECHO for autism and developmental disabilities must focus on supporting existing autism centers of excellence. The project will disseminate evidence-based diagnoses and treatments to increase access to medical services for people across the state.

(cc) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to partner with the University of Washington and the Washington State University to provide staff support and facilitation services to the task force established in part 9 of this act.

(dd) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and Seattle children's hospital in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to plan for and implement a two-year pilot program of school mental health education and consultations for students at middle schools, junior high, and high schools in one school district on east side of Cascades and one school district on west side of Cascades. The pilot program must:

(i) Develop and provide behavioral health trainings for school counselors, social workers, psychologists, nurses, teachers, administrators, and classified staff by January 1, 2020; and

(ii) Beginning with the 2020-21 school year:

(A) Provide school counselors access to teleconsultations with psychologists and psychiatrists at Seattle children's hospital or the University of Washington department of psychiatry to support school staff in managing children with challenging behavior; and

(B) Provide students access to teleconsultations with psychologists and psychiatrists at Seattle children's hospital or the University of Washington department of psychiatry to provide crisis management services when assessed as clinically appropriate.

(ee) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5903 (children's mental health). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(ff) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1517 (domestic violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(gg)(i) $463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.

(ii) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 in (gg)(i) of this subsection is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(gg)(ii) shall lapse.))

(hh) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(ii) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a firearm policy research program. The program will:

(i) Support investigations of firearm death and injury risk factors;

(ii) Evaluate the effectiveness of state firearm laws and policies;

(iii) Assess the consequences of firearm violence; and

(iv) Develop strategies to reduce the toll of firearm violence to citizens of the state.

(jj) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the Evans school of public affairs to complete the business plan for a publicly owned Washington state depository bank as directed by section 129, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(kk) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5330 (small forestland owners). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(ll) (($250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the dental education in the care of persons with disabilities program.

(mm) $190,000))$95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((is))and $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the college of education to partner with school districts on a pilot program to improve the math scores of K-12 students.

(((nn) $300,000))(mm) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((is))and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for matching nonstate funding contributions for a study of the feasibility of constructing of a biorefinery in southwest Washington. No state moneys may be expended until nonstate funding contributions are received. The study must:

(i) Assess the supply of biomass, including poplar feedstock grown on low-value lands and hardwood sawmill residuals;

(ii) Assess the potential for using poplar simultaneously for water treatment and as a biorefinery feedstock;

(iii) Assess southwest Washington landowner interest in growing poplar feedstock;

(iv) Evaluate options for locating a biorefinery in southwest Washington that considers potential for integration of future biorefineries with existing facilities such as power plants and pulp mills; and

(v) Result in a comprehensive technical and economic evaluation for southwest Washington biorefineries that will be used by biorefinery technology companies to develop their business plans and to attract potential investors.

(((oo)))(nn) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Harry Bridges center for labor studies. The center shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(((pp)))(oo) $400,000 of the geoduck aquaculture research account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington sea grant program crab team to continue work to protect against the impacts of invasive European green crab.

(pp) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to the University of Washington school of medicine for the development of simulation training devices at the Harborview medical center's paramedic training program.

(qq) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Washington MESA to continue the first nations MESA program in the Yakima valley.

(rr) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6061 (telemedicine training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(ss) $1,549,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6139 (aerospace tech. innovation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(tt) $320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6142 (higher ed common application). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(uu) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the university's center for human rights. The appropriation must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the center for human rights.

(vv) The university must submit state-funded full-time equivalent student enrollment data to the education research and data center for the state-funded public higher education enrollment report by November 1st of each year.

(ww) $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(xx) $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to the University of Washington for the establishment and operation of the state forensic anthropologist. The university shall work in conjunction with and provide the full funding directly to the King county medical examiner's office to support the statewide work of the state forensic anthropologist.

(yy) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the Burke museum of natural history and culture to make education programs offered by the museum accessible to more students across Washington, especially students in underserved schools and locations. The funding shall be used for:

(i) Increasing the number of students who participate in Burke education programs at reduced or no cost;

(ii) Providing bus reimbursement for students visiting the museum on field trips and to support travel to bring museum programs across the state; and

(iii) Staff who will form partnerships with school districts to serve statewide communities more efficiently and equitably through the Burkemobile program.

(2) ((CONDITIONAL GENERAL WAGE INCREASES))COMPENSATION

((General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,320,000))

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($4,664,000))

$6,984,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$201,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000

((Institutions of Higher Education - Grant and

Contracts Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,587,000

Institutions of Higher Education - Dedicated Local

Account Appropriation
. . . .
$12,184,000

Institutions of Higher Education - Operating Fees

Account—Local Appropriation
. . . .
$13,786,000))

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000

((Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,000))

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
(($6,000))

($9,000)

((University of Washington Hospital Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$16,375,000))

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$92,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$87,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($69,336,000))

$7,386,000

The appropriations in this subsection (2) are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for ((conditional general wage increases to all University of Washington employees of one percent on July 1, 2019, and one percent on July 1, 2020, subject to the conclusion of impacts bargaining over the application of the increases to represented employees covered by sections 921 through 925 of this act. If agreements to implement the one percent increases are not reached with the represented employees covered by sections 921 through 925 of this act by July 1, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection (2) shall lapse. Funding for the conditional increases is provided from appropriated and nonappropriated accounts as authorized in this subsection (2)))the collective bargaining agreements in sections 903, 904, and 905 of this act, and lump sum payments to nonrepresented, classified employees, who earn less than $54,264 in salary annually as set forth in section 910(2) of this act.

Sec. 603. 2019 c 415 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($222,455,000))

$222,514,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($230,453,000))

$232,169,000

Washington State University Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$792,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,995,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$138,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
$138,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$30,954,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($518,925,000))

$520,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a rural economic development and outreach coordinator.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(4) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

(5) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the continued development and operations of a medical school program in Spokane.

(6) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.

(7) $29,152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($29,764,000))$29,793,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(8) $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(9) $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the development of an organic agriculture systems degree program located at the university center in Everett.

(10) Within the funds appropriated in this section, Washington State University shall:

(a) Review the scholarly literature on the short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use to assess if other states or private entities are conducting marijuana research in areas that may be useful to the state.

(b) Provide as part of its budget request for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium:

(i) A list of intended state, federal, and privately funded marijuana research, including cost, duration, and scope;

(ii) Plans for partnerships with other universities, state agencies, or private entities, including entities outside the state, for purposes related to researching short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use.

(11) $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2017 (2SSB 5474) (elk hoof disease).

(12) $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the creation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(13) $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the creation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(14) General fund—state appropriations in this section are reduced to reflect a reduction in state-supported tuition waivers for graduate students. When reducing tuition waivers, the university will not change its practices and procedures for providing eligible veterans with tuition waivers.

(15) $1,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 36, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (renewable energy, tax incentives).

(16) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials.

(17) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of clean technology at Washington State University to convene a sustainable aviation biofuels work group to further the development of sustainable aviation fuel as a productive industry in Washington. The work group must include members from the legislature and sectors involved in sustainable aviation biofuels research, development, production, and utilization. The work group must provide recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(18) $113,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1517 (domestic violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to partner with the University of Washington and the Washington State University to provide staff support and facilitation services to the task force established in section 9 of this act.

(20) $264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5903 (children's mental health). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(21) $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(22) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to coordinate a work group and process to develop options and recommendations to improve consistency, simplicity, transparency, and accountability in higher education data systems. The work group and process must be collaborative and include representatives from relevant agencies and stakeholders, including but not limited to: The Washington student achievement council, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the employment security department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher education, the education data center, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington state institute for public policy, the joint legislative audit and review committee, and at least one representative from a nongovernmental organization that uses longitudinal data for research and decision making. The William D. Ruckelshaus center must facilitate meetings and discussions with stakeholders and provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019. The process must analyze and make recommendations on:

(a) Opportunities to increase postsecondary transparency and accountability across all institutions of higher education that receive state financial aid dollars while minimizing duplication of existing data reporting requirements;

(b) Opportunities to link labor market data with postsecondary data including degree production and postsecondary opportunities to help prospective postsecondary students navigate potential career and degree pathways;

(c) Opportunities to leverage existing data collection efforts across agencies and postsecondary sectors to minimize duplication, centralize data reporting, and create administrative efficiencies;

(d) Opportunities to develop a single, easy to navigate, postsecondary data system and dashboard to meet multiple state goals including transparency in postsecondary outcomes, clear linkages between data on postsecondary degrees and programs and labor market data, and linkages with P-20 data where appropriate. This includes a review of the efficacy, purpose, and cost of potential options for service and management of a statewide postsecondary dashboard; and

(e) Opportunities to increase state agency, legislative, and external researcher access to P-20 data systems in service to state educational goals.

(23) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university's soil health initiative and its network of long-term agroecological research and extension (LTARE) sites. The network must include a Mount Vernon REC site.

(24) $299,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6142 (higher ed common application). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) The university must submit state-funded full-time equivalent student enrollment data to the education research and data center for the state-funded public higher education enrollment report by November 1st of each year.

(27) $788,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6306 (soil health initiative). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(28) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Washington State University's energy program to launch a least-conflict priority solar siting pilot project in the Columbia basin of eastern and central Washington. This program shall engage all relevant stakeholders to identify priority areas where there is the least amount of potential conflict in the siting of utility scale pv solar and to develop a map highlighting these areas. The program shall also compile the latest information on opportunities for dual-use and colocation of pv solar with other land values. The appropriation is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(29) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

Sec. 604. 2019 c 415 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($54,894,000))

$55,126,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($57,331,000))

$57,530,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,794,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($129,019,000))

$129,450,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and at least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(4) $10,472,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($10,692,000))$10,702,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(6) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for gathering and archiving time-sensitive histories and materials and planning for a Lucy Covington center.

(7) (($146,000))$73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((is))and $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a comprehensive analysis of the deep lake watershed involving land owners, ranchers, lake owners, one or more conservation districts, the department of ecology, and the department of natural resources.

(8) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(9) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6142 (higher ed common application). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) The university must submit state-funded full-time equivalent student enrollment data to the education research and data center for the state-funded public higher education enrollment report by November 1st of each year.

(11) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

Sec. 605. 2019 c 415 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($54,390,000))

$54,415,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($56,517,000))

$56,942,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,076,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,924,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($133,983,000))

$134,433,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $11,803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($12,051,000))$12,063,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(5) $221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the game on! program, which provides underserved middle and high school students with training in leadership and science, technology, engineering, and math. The program is expected to serve approximately five hundred students per year.

(6) $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(7) $254,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6142 (higher ed common application). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) The university must submit state-funded full-time equivalent student enrollment data to the education research and data center for the state-funded public higher education enrollment report by November 1st of each year.

(9) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

Sec. 606. 2019 c 415 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($29,766,000))

$30,259,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($30,305,000))

$31,938,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,450,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($65,603,000))

$67,729,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($3,665,000))$3,669,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the college is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, The Evergreen State College must provide the funding necessary to enable employees of the Washington state institute for public policy to receive the salary increases provided in part 9 of this act.

(5) (($2,079,000))$2,489,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($2,054,000))$3,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to initiate, sponsor, conduct, and publish research that is directly useful to policymakers and manage reviews and evaluations of technical and scientific topics as they relate to major long-term issues facing the state. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5):

(a) (($999,000))$1,053,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2020 and (($879,000))$1,294,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided for administration and core operations.

(b) (($1,030,000))$1,334,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2020 and (($1,002,000))$1,177,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for ongoing and continuing studies on the Washington state institute for public policy's work plan.

(c) $50,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2020 and $25,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to evaluate the outcomes of resource and assessment centers licensed under RCW 74.15.311 and contracted with the department of children, youth, and families. By December 1, 2020, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the institute shall report the results of its evaluation to the appropriate legislative committees; the governor; the department of children, youth, and families; and the oversight board for children, youth, and families. For the evaluation, the institute shall collect data regarding:

(i) The type of placement children experience following placement at a resource and assessment center;

(ii) The number of placement changes that children experience following placement in a resource and assessment center compared with other foster children;

(iii) The length of stay in foster care that children experience following placement in a resource and assessment center compared with other foster children;

(iv) The likelihood that children placed in a resource and assessment center will be placed with siblings; and

(v) The length of time that licensed foster families accepting children placed in resource and assessment centers maintain their licensure compared to licensed foster families receiving children directly from child protective services.

(d) $115,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1391 (early achievers recommendations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection (5)(d) shall lapse.))

(e) $33,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1646 (juvenile rehab. confinement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection (5)(e) shall lapse.))

(f) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to study special education services in public K-12 education systems. Since fiscal year 2018, Washington has made large investments in special education programs both through increases in the education system as a whole and through targeted increases in the special education funding formula. These investments were spread across the education system rather than directed to meet specific student and district needs. An appropriation is provided for this study in the interest of addressing ongoing concerns about funding and service gaps with future investments. The institute will review the available research literature with a focus on evidence from rigorous research regarding impacts of specific special education services on student outcomes. Where available, the study will focus on student success outcomes including successful transitions to life post-high school, student engagement, disciplinary action, and academic outcomes. To the extent possible, the institute will study the cost effectiveness of various successful approaches to service delivery, including both broad strategies and specific services. The institute shall submit an interim report summarizing preliminary findings on special education strategies to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by June 30, 2021, with the intent that a final report be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by June 30, 2022.

(g) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5504 (peer-reviewed journal access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(h) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6275 (postacute care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(i) $263,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6638 (reentry services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(j) Notwithstanding other provisions in this subsection, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2019-21 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(6) $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6313 (young voters). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) The university must submit state-funded full-time equivalent student enrollment data to the education research and data center for the state-funded public higher education enrollment report by November 1st of each year.

(8) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

Sec. 607. 2019 c 415 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($78,694,000))

$78,666,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($81,478,000))

$82,440,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,424,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,831,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($175,427,000))

$176,361,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $16,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($16,633,000))$16,649,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the creation and implementation of an early childhood education degree program at the western on the peninsulas campus. The university must collaborate with Olympic college. At full implementation, the university is expected to grant approximately 75 bachelor's degrees in early childhood education per year at the western on the peninsulas campus.

(5) $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Western Washington University to develop a new program in marine, coastal, and watershed sciences.

(6) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(7) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for campus connect to develop a student civic leaders initiative that will provide opportunities for students to gain work experience focused on addressing the following critical issues facing communities and campuses: Housing and food insecurities, mental health, civic education (higher education and K-12), breaking the prison pipeline, and the opioid epidemic. Students will:

(a) Participate in civic internships and receive wages to work on one or more of these critical issues on their campus and or in their community, or both;

(b) Receive training on civic education, civil discourse, and learn how to analyze policies that impact community issues; and

(c) Research issues and develop and implement strategies in teams to address them.

(8) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(9) $886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the university to reduce tuition rates for four-year degree programs offered in partnership with Olympic college—Bremerton, Olympic college—Poulsbo, and Peninsula college—Port Angeles that are currently above state-funded resident undergraduate tuition rates. Tuition reductions resulting from this section must go into effect beginning in the 2020-21 academic year.

(10) The university must submit state-funded full-time equivalent student enrollment data to the education research and data center for the state-funded public higher education enrollment report by November 1st of each year.

(11) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6142 (higher ed common application). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

Sec. 608. 2019 c 415 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($6,431,000))

$6,458,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($6,533,000))

$7,026,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,927,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$534,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($18,425,000))

$18,945,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the consumer protection unit.

(2) $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $174,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5800 (homeless college students). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to implement a marketing and communications agenda as required in RCW 28C.30.040(1)(c).

(4) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to implement chapter 298, Laws of 2019 (college bound scholarship – ninth grade pledge and state need grant eligibility).

(5) The student achievement council must ensure that all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW provide the data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs. This data must be promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible.

(6) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6127 (student ach. council/graduate). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the student achievement council to complete a study examining design options for a statewide child savings account program in Washington and creating an implementation plan. Child savings accounts are long-term savings or investment accounts to help children, especially low-income children and children of color, build dedicated savings for postsecondary education. The child savings account program's goals are to foster a higher education and career-readiness culture and boost college savings among Washington state residents, particularly low-income families; promote the financial security, financial literacy, and economic stability of Washington state families; and increase their ability to save for college. The program's purpose is to establish college savings accounts at birth for every child born in Washington state.

(a) At a minimum, the study must include the following elements:

(i) Program account options and mechanisms for automatic enrollment in the child savings account program at birth unless parents opt out;

(ii) The program structure and the initial seed deposit as well as progressive incentives to help reduce inequities in account accumulation between children from lower-income families and higher-income families;

(iii) Incentive structures so that families that participate and contribute, regardless of amount, can receive bonus deposits;

(iv) Plans for how relevant state agencies and programs would conduct outreach and provide information for families and children about their child savings accounts, opportunities to interact and/or save in the account, and other resources for families to build their financial capabilities in order to save for their future;

(v) Options for potential state funding sources to create and sustain the program and the feasibility of making the program self-sustaining or partially off-setting seed deposits through administrative fees charged in the Washington college savings program established in RCW 28B.95.032 or other college savings programs;

(vi) Possible ways for the state to collaborate with the philanthropic and private sectors; and

(vii) Possible ways for the accounts of foster children and youth to grow.

(b) In developing the implementation plan, the council may consult with the following entities:

(i) The economic services administration;

(ii) The department of health;

(iii) The department of children, youth, and families;

(iv) The department of financial institutions;

(v) The office of the state treasurer;

(vi) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(vii) Nonprofit and community-based organizations or coalitions focused on strategies to help families build financial assets or support families with children to thrive;

(viii) Institutions of higher education or research or policy organizations with expertise in asset building and child savings accounts;

(ix) Not-for-profit foundations, organizations, or agencies in Washington who are already operating child savings account programs in their communities;

(x) Philanthropic organizations and foundations with an interest in providing philanthropic support for child savings accounts in Washington state; and

(xi) Organizations and state commissions and offices representing communities of color and economically disadvantaged communities that would be most impacted by the creation of a child savings account program.

(c) The council shall convene stakeholders to review preliminary recommendations by November 30, 2020. The council shall submit preliminary findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 30, 2020, and a final report by June 30, 2021.

(8) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to convene and coordinate a task force by May 1, 2020 to propose strategies to eliminate financial and non-financial barriers to low-income students participating in running start, college in the high school, advanced placement, international baccalaureate, cambridge and career and technical education dual credit programs.

The task force shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020. The report shall include:

(a) Strategies to address the following financial and non-financial barriers to students:

(i) Per credit tuition fees and any other fees charged for college in the high school and career and technical education dual credit courses;

(ii) Books, fees, and any other direct costs charged to running start students when enrolling in college courses; and

(iii) Exam fees and other charges to students enrolling in exam-based dual credit courses.

(b) An analysis of efficiency and effectiveness of student use of dual credit toward higher education program, degree completion or both;

(c) Recommendations on student supports to close equity gaps in dual credit access, participation and success;

(d) Recommendations to improve and increase communication with students and families regarding the awareness, access and completion of dual credit; and

(e) Expanding access to dual credit opportunities for students in career and technical education pathways.

Sec. 609. 2019 c 415 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($278,418,000))

$273,935,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($281,669,000))

$287,801,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,035,000))

$12,036,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$93,488,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$114,229,000

Aerospace Training Student Loan Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$216,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,824,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$18,000

Health Professionals Loan Repayment and Scholarship

Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,720,000

State Educational Trust Fund Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000,000

State Financial Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($788,093,000))

$812,067,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2158 (workforce education) is enacted by June 30, 2019, all references made in this section to the state need grant program are deemed made to the Washington college grant program.

(2) $255,327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($266,528,000))$7,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, (($77,639,000))$45,527,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, $6,000,000 of the state educational trust fund nonappropriated account—state appropriation, and (($80,000,000))$38,350,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state need grant and state work study programs, including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.

(3) $258,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $20,824,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation, $32,112,000 of the education legacy trust fund—state appropriation, and $56,950,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington college grant program as provided in RCW 28B.92.200.

(4) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.

(5) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for the state need grant includes students with family incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits. Awards for students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent for students with family incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65 percent for students with family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI; 60 percent for students with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent MFI; and 50 percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI. If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2158 (workforce education) is enacted by June 30, 2019, then the eligibility and proration provisions of that bill supersede the provisions of this subsection.

(6) Of the amounts provided in subsection (((1)))(2) of this section, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the council to process an alternative financial aid application system pursuant to RCW 28B.92.010.

(7) Students who are eligible for the college bound scholarship shall be given priority for the state need grant program. These eligible college bound students whose family incomes are in the 0-65 percent median family income ranges must be awarded the maximum state need grant for which they are eligible under state policies and may not be denied maximum state need grant funding due to institutional policies or delayed awarding of college bound scholarship students. The council shall provide directions to institutions to maximize the number of college bound scholarship students receiving the maximum state need grant for which they are eligible with a goal of 100 percent coordination. Institutions shall identify all college bound scholarship students to receive state need grant priority. If an institution is unable to identify all college bound scholarship students at the time of initial state aid packaging, the institution should reserve state need grant funding sufficient to cover the projected enrollments of college bound scholarship students.

(8) (($1,023,000))$972,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($855,000))$1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $15,849,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and (($34,229,000))$18,929,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education shall not consider awards made by the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award amount under RCW 28B.118.010. ((If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2158 (workforce education) is enacted by June 30, 2019, then the amount that is provided solely for purposes of this subsection from the Washington opportunity pathways account is provided for the Washington college grant in the amount of $15,300,000.))

(9) $2,759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The council shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 for this purpose.

(10) (($7,468,000))$3,036,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((is))and $4,432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to meet state match requirements associated with the opportunity scholarship program and rural jobs program. Of the $4,432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $500,000 is for the rural jobs match transfer account to meet state match requirements associated with the rural jobs program. The legislature will evaluate subsequent appropriations to the opportunity scholarship program and the rural jobs program based on the extent that additional private contributions are made, program spending patterns, and fund balance.

(11) $3,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for expenditure into the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account. These amounts must be used to increase the number of licensed primary care health professionals to serve in licensed primary care health professional critical shortage areas. Contracts between the office and program recipients must guarantee at least three years of conditional loan repayments. The office of student financial assistance and the department of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the health professional loan repayment and scholarship fund for conditional loan repayment contracts with psychiatrists and with advanced registered nurse practitioners for work at one of the state-operated psychiatric hospitals. The office and department shall designate the state hospitals as health professional shortage areas if necessary for this purpose. The office shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to effectively incorporate three conditional loan repayments into the department's advanced psychiatric professional recruitment and retention strategies. The office may use these targeted amounts for other program participants should there be any remaining amounts after eligible psychiatrists and advanced registered nurse practitioners have been served. The office shall also work to prioritize loan repayments to professionals working at health care delivery sites that demonstrate a commitment to serving uninsured clients. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to maintain the current number and amount of awards for the program in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium on the basis of these contractual obligations.

(12) $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1973 (dual enrollment scholarship). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(13) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1668 (Washington health corps). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Within amounts provided in this subsection, the student achievement council, in consultation with the department of health, shall study the need, feasibility, and potential design of a grant program to provide funding to behavioral health students completing unpaid pregraduation internships and postgraduation supervised hours for licensure.

(14) Sufficient amounts are appropriated within this section to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1311 (college bound).

(15) $1,896,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,673,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1139 (educator workforce supply). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, $1,650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for funding of the student teaching grant program, the teacher endorsement and certification help program, and the educator conditional scholarship and loan repayment programs under chapter 28B.102 RCW, including the pipeline for paraeducators program, the retooling to teach conditional loan programs, the teacher shortage conditional scholarship program, the career and technical education conditional scholarship program, and the federal student loan repayment in exchange for teaching service program.

(16) $833,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5197 (national guard ed. grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $1,500,000 of the state financial aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for passport to career program scholarship awards.

(18) $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6141 (higher education access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6561 (undocumented student support). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 610. 2019 c 415 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,270,000))

$2,271,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,998,000))

$2,296,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($55,509,000))

$55,508,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$211,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$176,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($60,164,000))

$60,462,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium the board shall not designate recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence or recognize them at award ceremonies as provided in RCW 28C.04.535.

(2) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the health workforce council of the state workforce training and education coordinating board. In partnership with the office of the governor, the health workforce council shall continue to assess workforce shortages across behavioral health disciplines. The board shall create a recommended action plan to address behavioral health workforce shortages and to meet the increased demand for services now, and with the integration of behavioral health and primary care in 2020. The analysis and recommended action plan shall align with the recommendations of the adult behavioral health system task force and related work of the healthier Washington initiative. The board shall consider workforce data, gaps, distribution, pipeline, development, and infrastructure, including innovative high school, postsecondary, and postgraduate programs to evolve, align, and respond accordingly to our state's behavioral health and related and integrated primary care workforce needs.

(3) $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 294, Laws of 2018 (future of work task force).

(4) $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5166 (postsecondary religious acc.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(5) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the board to provide a one-time grant to an accredited university offering a doctorate in osteopathic medicine. The grant must be used to purchase up to twelve fully-equipped VSee telemedicine kits for student training purposes in rural and underserved communities.

Sec. 611. 2019 c 415 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($8,951,000))

$9,001,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($9,153,000))

$9,248,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$590,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($18,728,000))

$18,873,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

(2) $149,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for migration to the state data center, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

Sec. 612. 2019 c 415 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($14,326,000))

$14,554,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($14,554,000))

$14,543,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$728,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($29,608,000))

$29,825,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

(2) $12,319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $12,319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operations, expenses, and direct service to students at the state school for the deaf referenced in RCW 72.40.015(2)(a).

Sec. 613. 2019 c 415 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,108,000))

$2,091,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,307,000))

$2,370,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,160,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$122,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($6,747,000))

$6,793,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the folk and traditional arts apprenticeship and jobs stimulation program.

(2) $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the completion and maintenance of the my public art portal project.

(4) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $324,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for an arts-integration program that encourages kindergarten readiness in partnership with educational service districts, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the department of children, youth, and families.

Sec. 614. 2019 c 415 s 618 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($3,733,000))

$3,684,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($3,654,000))

$3,832,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$230,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($7,617,000))

$7,746,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for general support and operations of the Washington state historical society.

(2) (($52,000))$109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($42,000))$94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for supporting migration ((to the state data center))of the agency's servers to the cloud environment and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

Sec. 615. 2019 c 415 s 619 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,855,000))

$2,750,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,885,000))

$2,833,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$214,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,954,000))

$5,797,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for general support and operations of the eastern Washington state historical society.

(2) $67,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for supporting migration to the state data center and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in ((section 719 of this act))section 701 of this act.

Sec. 616. 2019 c 406 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to the Washington student achievement council and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($39,735,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $99,377,000))$139,112,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for the Washington college grant program under chapter 28B.92 RCW to fund:

(a) The backlog of students eligible for a grant, but who did not receive a grant due to funding limitations in previous years, with one-third of the backlog funded in fiscal year 2020;

(b) The maximum Washington college grant, as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, increase to full tuition and fees; and

(c) Grants for apprenticeship programs.

(2) $21,218,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for expanding the income eligibility threshold for the Washington college grant program as described in RCW 28B.92.205.

(3) (($580,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $575,000))$1,155,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for the student achievement council to increase the number of high school seniors and college bound scholars that complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid through digital engagement tools, expanded training, and increased events at high schools. The student achievement council must report back to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020, on the effectiveness of the tools and increased events on increasing the number of financial aid applications completed.

(4) (($1,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $1,000,000))$2,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for the future teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program established in chapter 28B.102 RCW.

(5) (($1,098,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $1,097,000))$2,195,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for the Washington student loan refinancing program created in RCW 28B.94.020.

Sec. 617. 2019 c 406 s 5 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to the state board for community and technical colleges and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($6,220,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $7,610,000))$13,830,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for college operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) (($6,220,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $7,610,000))$13,830,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.

(3)(a) (($2,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $30,124,000))$14,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to implement guided pathways at each of the state's community and technical colleges by academic year 2020-21. Guided pathways is a research-based approach that provides clear, structured, educational experiences for students with four elements: Clarify paths to students' end goals, help students choose and enter a pathway, help students stay on path, and ensure that students are learning.

(b) Guided pathways implementation includes:

(i) Increased student support services, including advising and counseling;

(ii) Faculty teaching and planning time to redesign curriculum, develop meta-majors, and engage in interdepartmental planning on pathways;

(iii) Data analytics and student tracking technology to help advisors and students address challenges that may impede a student's progress; and

(iv) Research and evaluation to ensure reforms lead to improvements for all students.

(c) The state board for community and technical colleges shall report to the legislature on an annual basis beginning December 1, 2020, on the impacts of guided pathways on postsecondary outcomes, including credential completion, transfer pathways, credit accumulation, grade point averages, and persistence.

(4) (($20,400,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $20,400,000))$36,650,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to increase nurse educator salaries.

(5) $20,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for increasing high-demand program faculty salaries, including but not limited to nursing educators, other health-related professions, information technology, computer science, and trades, including welding. Contract negotiations relating to salary increases must consider, and to the extent practicable establish, salaries that are comparable to industry professionals, and no less than the average salary identified by the college and university professional association for human resources or a similar organization.

(6) (($1,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $2,000,000))$3,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for enrollments in new career launch programs as defined in RCW 28C.30.020.

(7) $500,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, ((2020))2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for purchase of equipment for a regional training facility in Bothell to offer a simulated good manufacturing practice experience in partnership with a community college. The regional training facility must be located on the campus of a manufacturer of protein-based therapeutics. The state board for community and technical colleges must use a written agreement to ensure the equipment is used in a way that provides adequate public benefit.

Sec. 618. 2019 c 406 s 6 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to the University of Washington and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($7,008,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $11,415,000))$18,423,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) (($2,577,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $4,000,000))$6,577,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.

(3) (($2,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $4,000,000))$6,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to increase degree production in the college of engineering at the Seattle campus.

(4) (($500,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $500,000))$1,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to maintain the Washington state academic redshirt program.

(5) (($150,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $1,350,000))$1,500,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to add degree capacity and increase undergraduate enrollments per year by two hundred ten in the engineering, mathematics, and science programs to support the biomedical innovation partnership zone at the Bothell campus.

(6) (($177,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $1,634,000))$1,811,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to establish bachelor of science programs in mechanical and civil engineering, enrolling one hundred eighty students per year by fiscal year 2025, to support increased student and local employer demand for graduates in these fields at the Tacoma campus.

Sec. 619. 2019 c 406 s 7 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to Washington State University and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($1,913,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $3,440,000))$5,353,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) (($3,600,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $7,200,000))$10,800,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to complete funding for four classes of sixty students each at the Elson S. Floyd college of medicine, allowing previously funded cohorts of first and second year students to complete their education.

(3) (($1,200,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $2,400,000))$3,600,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to increase the cohort size by twenty students for the Elson S. Floyd college of medicine in fall 2019 and fall 2020 for a total of eighty students per cohort, thereby increasing the number of physicians trained and serving in Washington's workforce.

Sec. 620. 2019 c 406 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to Central Washington University and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($701,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $1,118,000))$1,819,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) (($525,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $525,000))$1,050,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to increase the number of certified K-12 teachers. Of this, per year, $400,000 must be used towards the grow-your-own high school teacher academies in communities that face chronic teacher shortages and $125,000 must be used to:

(a) Expand alternative routes to certification options by targeting conditional or emergency teachers, as well as paraeducators, and encourage those individuals to gain Washington state certification; and

(b) Target high-demand endorsement areas, such as special education and elementary education.

(3) (($368,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $368,000))$736,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for increasing mental health counseling at Central Washington University.

Sec. 621. 2019 c 406 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to Western Washington University and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($689,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $1,128,000))$1,817,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) (($1,713,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $1,713,000))$3,426,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to increase access to science, technology, engineering, and mathematic degrees, which may include expanding prehealth care capacity, creating an energy science and technology bachelor of science degree, and expanding electrical engineering degrees.

Sec. 622. 2019 c 406 s 10 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to The Evergreen State College and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($757,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $1,318,000))$2,075,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) (($335,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $335,000))$670,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to increase enrollment capacity by seventy-five students in the psychology program by hiring additional psychology faculty.

(3) (($280,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $300,000))$580,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to increase student success by establishing a new student precollege immersion program and The Evergreen first-year experience program.

Sec. 623. 2019 c 406 s 11 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to Eastern Washington University and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($677,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $1,137,000))$1,814,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) (($1,318,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $1,318,000))$2,636,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely to create a computer engineering degree in the college of science, technology, engineering, and math with an average enrollment per year of one hundred thirty-three students at full implementation.

Sec. 624. 2019 c 406 s 12 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(($2,450,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the employment security department for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $2,950,000))$5,400,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the employment security department for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for the career connected learning grant program established in RCW 28C.30.050.

Sec. 625. 2019 c 406 s 14 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(($50,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the office of financial management for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $50,000))$100,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the office of financial management for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for implementing career connected learning.

Sec. 626. 2019 c 406 s 15 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

$4,241,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the department of children, youth, and families for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for eliminating the work requirement under the working connections child care program for single parents who are pursuing a vocational education full-time at a community, technical, or tribal college as set forth under RCW 43.216.135.

Sec. 627. 2019 c 406 s 16 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in this section are provided to the workforce training and education coordinating board and are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($75,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $75,000))$150,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for staffing costs for the workforce education investment accountability and oversight board established in RCW 28C.18.200.

Sec. 628. 2019 c 406 s 17 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(($166,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the caseload forecast council for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the workforce education investment account and $166,000))$332,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the caseload forecast council for the fiscal ((year))biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the workforce education investment account provided solely for forecasting the caseload for the Washington college grant program.

(End of part)

PART VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 701. 2019 c 415 s 719 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT POOL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($7,628,000))

$8,560,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($5,191,000))

$17,004,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,608,000))

$10,526,000

General Fund—Private/local Appropriation
. . . .
$213,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
(($56,530,000))

$70,472,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($74,170,000))

$106,775,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the information technology investment revolving account created in RCW 43.41.433. Funds in the account are provided solely for the information technology projects shown in LEAP omnibus document IT-2019, dated April 25, 2019, which is hereby incorporated by reference. To facilitate the transfer of moneys from other funds and accounts that are associated with projects contained in LEAP omnibus document IT-2019, dated April 25, 2019, the state treasurer is directed to transfer moneys from other funds and accounts to the information technology investment revolving account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management. However, restricted federal funds and qualified employee benefit and pension funds may be transferred only to the extent permitted by law, and will otherwise remain outside the information technology investment account. The projects affected remain subject to the other provisions of this section.

(2) Agencies must apply to the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer to receive funding from the information technology investment revolving account. The office of financial management must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the receipt of each application and may not approve a funding request for ten business days from the date of notification.

(3) Allocations and allotments of information technology investment revolving account must be made for discrete stages of projects as determined by the technology budget approved by the office of the state chief information officer and office of financial management. Fifteen percent of total funding allocated by the office of financial management, or another amount as defined jointly by the office of financial management and the office of the state chief information officer, will be retained in the account, but remain allocated to that project. The retained funding will be released to the agency only after successful completion of that stage of the project. For the military department enhanced 911 next generation project and the one Washington project, the amount retained is increased to at least twenty percent of total funding allocated for any stage of that project.

(4)(a) Each project must have a technology budget. The technology budget must use a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, each fund source, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the entire project investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project onset through implementation and close out.

(b) As part of the development of a technology budget and at each request for funding, the agency shall submit detailed financial information to the office of financial management and the office of the state chief information officer. The technology budget must describe the total cost of the project by fiscal month to include and identify:

(i) Fund sources;

(ii) Full time equivalent staffing level to include job classification assumptions;

(iii) A discreet appropriation index and program index;

(iv) Object and subobject codes of expenditures; and

(v) Anticipated deliverables.

(c) If a project technology budget changes and a revised technology budget is completed, a comparison of the revised technology budget to the last approved technology budget must be posted to the dashboard, to include a narrative rationale on what changed, why, and how that impacts the project in scope, budget, and schedule.

(5)(a) Each project must have an investment plan that includes:

(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities;

(ii) The office of the state chief information officer staff assigned to the project;

(iii) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project;

(iv) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product;

(v) Ongoing maintenance and operations cost of the project post implementation and close out delineated by agency staffing, contracted staffing, and service level agreements; and

(vi) Financial budget coding to include at least discreet program index and subobject codes.

(6) Projects with estimated costs greater than one hundred million dollars from initiation to completion and implementation may be divided into discrete subprojects as determined by the office of the state chief information officer, except for the one Washington project which must be divided into the following discrete subprojects: Core financials, expanding financials and procurement, budget, and human resources. Each subproject must have a technology budget and investment plan as provided in this section.

(7)(a) The office of the state chief information officer shall maintain an information technology project dashboard that provides updated information each fiscal month on projects subject to this section. This includes, at least:

(i) Project changes each fiscal month;

(ii) Noting if the project has a completed market requirements document;

(iii) Financial status of information technology projects under oversight; ((and))

(iv) Coordination with agencies;

(v) Monthly quality assurance reports, if applicable;

(vi) Monthly office of the state chief information officer status reports;

(vii) Historical project budget and expenditures through fiscal year 2019;

(viii) Budget and expenditures each fiscal month; and

(ix) Estimated annual maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year.

(b) The dashboard must retain a roll up of the entire project cost, including all subprojects, that can be displayed the subproject detail.

(8) If the project affects more than one agency:

(a) A separate technology budget and investment plan must be prepared for each agency; and

(b) The dashboard must contain a statewide project technology budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.

(9) For any project that exceeds two million dollars in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:

(a) Quality assurance for the project must report independently to the office of the chief information officer;

(b) The office of the chief information officer must review, and, if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;

(c) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;

(d) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed; and

(e) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements.

(10) The office of the state chief information officer must evaluate the project at each stage and certify whether the project is planned, managed, and meeting deliverable targets as defined in the project's approved technology budget and investment plan.

(11) The office of the state chief information officer may suspend or terminate a project at any time if it determines that the project is not meeting or not expected to meet anticipated performance and technology outcomes. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall unallot any unused funding and shall not make any expenditure for the project without the approval of the office of financial management. The office of the state chief information officer must report on July 1 and December 1 each calendar year, beginning July 1, 2020, any suspension or termination of a project in the previous six month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(12) The office of the state chief information officer, in consultation with the office of financial management, may identify additional projects to be subject to this section, including projects that are not separately identified within an agency budget. The office of the state chief information officer must report on July 1 and December 1 each calendar year, beginning July 1, 2020, any additional projects to be subjected to this section that were identified in the previous six month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(13) Any cost to administer or implement this section for projects listed in subsection (1) of this section, must be paid from the information technology investment revolving account. For any other information technology project made subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section, the cost to implement this section must be paid from the funds for that project.

(14) The information technology feasibility study of the Washington state gambling commission is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review in this section.

(15) The learning management system project of the department of enterprise services is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review in this section.

(16) The gambling self-exclusion program project of the Washington state gambling commission is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review in this section.

Sec. 702. 2019 c 415 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($1,191,069,000))

$1,179,076,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,268,197,000))

$1,240,339,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,273,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$46,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($213,000))

$277,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$566,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,466,394,000))

$2,426,607,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 703. 2019 c 415 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,052,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,000))

$2,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,000))

$55,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,904,000))

$3,924,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS

The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2020, unless otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.

These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:

(1) Gerardo Rodarte Gonzalez, claim number 99970260. . . .$24,385

(2) Edward Bushnell, claim number 99970261. . . .$153,357

(3) Shaun Beveridge, claim number 99970262. . . .$56,514

(4) Brandon Wheeler, claim number 9991001053. . . .$123,464

(5) Johnathan Paine, claim number 9991001583. . . .$22,246

(6) Michael Welsh, claim number 9991001600. . . .$5,000

(7) Douglas Bartlett, claim number 9991001646. . . .$5,500

(8) Brian Minniear, claim number 9991001941. . . .$111,956

(9) Thomas Carey, claim number 9991001917. . . .$122,431

Sec. 705. 2019 c 415 s 712 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ANDY HILL CANCER RESEARCH ENDOWMENT FUND MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNT

((Foundational Public Health Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000,000))

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$6,022,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($6,000,000))

$6,022,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account per RCW 43.348.080 to fund the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Matching funds using the amounts appropriated in this section may not be used to fund new grants that exceed two years in duration.

Sec. 706. 2019 c 415 s 720 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(2) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$73,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$75,800,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$148,800,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,545,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,855,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$15,400,000

(4) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$800,000

(((5) There is appropriated for state contributions to the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund:

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,532,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$15,532,000))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS AND RESERVE OFFICERS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

There is appropriated for state contributions to the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund:

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,532,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$15,532,000

Sec. 708. 2019 c 415 s 725 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—HEALTH PROFESSIONS ACCOUNT

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
(($701,000))

$1,415,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($701,000))

$1,415,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the health professions account to reimburse the account for costs incurred by the department of health for the development and administration of the marijuana authorization database.

Sec. 709. 2019 c 415 s 728 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—FOUNDATIONAL PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$10,503,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$10,065,000

((Foundational Public Health Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000,000))

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($22,000,000))

$20,568,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for ((distribution as provided in section 2, chapter 14, Laws of 2019 (foundational public health services)))expenditure into the foundational public health services account created in RCW 82.25.015.

Sec. 710. 2019 c 415 s 730 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OUTDOOR EDUCATION AND RECREATION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$750,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($750,000))

$1,250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,500,000))

$2,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the outdoor education and recreation account for the state parks and recreation commission's outdoor education and recreation program purposes identified in RCW 79A.05.351.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WORKFORCE EDUCATION INVESTMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$22,956,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$22,956,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the workforce education investment account to ensure the account is not in deficit within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$13,720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$13,720,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the disaster response account to ensure the account is not in deficit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COMMUNITY TRUST ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the developmental disabilities community trust account (Dan Thompson memorial trust account) for the purposes identified in RCW 71A.20.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$4,531,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$2,329,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,860,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, for increases to the public employees benefits board funding rate in part 9 of this act and for increased pension contribution rates under section 911 of this act, as shown in LEAP omnibus document COMP-2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SECRETARY OF STATE ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$5,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$130,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$27,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$55,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$220,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the secretary of state's billing authority for archives and records management. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92C-2020, dated February 23, 2020, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE AUDITOR AUDIT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$245,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$87,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$108,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$448,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the state auditor's billing authority for state agency auditing services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92D-2020, dated February 23, 2020, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF ATTORNEY GENERAL LEGAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$86,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$4,732,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,158,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$85,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$3,424,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,485,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of attorney general's billing authority for legal services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92E-2020, dated February 23, 2020, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
($289,000)

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$10,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
($28,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
($305,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the central technology services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92J-2020, dated February 23, 2020, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$14,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$33,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$64,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the department of enterprise services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92K-2020, dated February 23, 2020, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$7,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$10,295,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,280,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$2,382,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$14,083,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to new billing authority for central service functions performed by the office of financial management. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92R-2020, dated February 23, 2020, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$851,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$851,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall distribute $406,000 to Clallam county and $445,000 to Yakima county for extraordinary criminal justice costs pursuant to RCW 43.330.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$39,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$566,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$1,130,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,795,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of administrative hearing's billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified in LEAP omnibus document 92G-2020, dated February 23, 2020, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

Sec. 723. 2019 c 415 s 721 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—LEASE COST POOL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($3,788,000))

$4,409,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($4,082,000))

$4,092,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,488,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
(($1,740,000))

$1,956,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($14,098,000))

$14,945,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the state agency office relocation pool account created in RCW 43.41.455.

(2) Costs are as shown in LEAP omnibus document LEAS-((2019))2020, dated ((April 25, 2019))February 23, 2020, which is hereby incorporated by reference.

(3) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from other funds and accounts that are associated with office relocations contained in LEAP omnibus document LEAS-((2019))2020, dated ((April 25, 2019))February 23, 2020, the state treasurer is directed to transfer moneys from other funds and accounts in an amount not to exceed (($1,740,000))$1,956,000 to the lease cost pool in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

(4) Agencies may apply to the office of financial management to receive funds from the state agency office relocation pool account, in an amount not to exceed the amount identified in the LEAP omnibus document LEAS-((2019))2020, dated ((April 25, 2019))February 23, 2020. Prior to applying, agencies must submit to the office of financial management statewide oversight office a relocation plan that identifies estimated project costs, including how the lease aligns to the agency's six year leased facility plan. The office of financial management must copy legislative fiscal staff on the approval notice of funds from the state agency office relocation pool to the agency.

Sec. 724. 2019 c 415 s 722 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUE DISTRIBUTIONS TO CITIES FOR TEMPORARY STREAMLINED SALES TAX MITIGATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($7,100,000))

$5,362,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($9,300,000))

$7,079,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($16,400,000))

$12,441,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) In order to mitigate local sales tax revenue net losses as a result of the sourcing provisions of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement under Title 82 RCW, the state treasurer, on October 1, 2019, and each calendar quarter thereafter through June 30, 2021, must distribute the appropriations in this section to qualified local taxing districts to mitigate actual net losses as determined under this section by the department of revenue.

(2) In determining net losses under this section, the department must use each qualified local taxing district's annual loss as most recently determined pursuant to RCW 82.14.500 prior to January 1, 2019. The department is not required to determine annual losses on a recurring basis, but may make any adjustments to annual losses as it deems proper as a result of the annual reviews. Each calendar quarter, distributions must be made by the state treasurer on the last working day of the calendar quarter, as directed by the department, to each qualified local taxing district in an amount representing one-fourth of the district's annual loss reduced by voluntary compliance revenue reported during the previous calendar quarter and marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue reported during the previous calendar quarter.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Loss" or "losses" means the local sales and use tax revenue reduction to a qualified local taxing district resulting from the sourcing provisions in RCW 82.14.490 and section 502, chapter 6, Laws of 2007, as most recently determined by the department under RCW 82.14.500 prior to January 1, 2019, including any adjustments made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(b) "Marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue" means the local sales and use tax revenue gain, including taxes voluntarily remitted and taxes collected from consumers, to each qualified local taxing district from part II of chapter 28, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and from chapter 8, Laws of 2019 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581), as estimated by the department in RCW 82.14.500(6). "Marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue" includes the local sales tax revenue gain reported to the department from remote sellers as defined in RCW 82.08.010 that have registered through the central registration system authorized under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

(c) "Net loss" or "net losses" means a loss offset by any voluntary compliance revenue and marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue.

(d) "Qualified local taxing district" means a city:

(i) That was eligible for streamlined sales tax mitigation payments of at least fifty thousand dollars under RCW 82.14.500 in calendar year 2018, based on the calculation and analysis required under RCW 82.14.500(3)(a); and

(ii) That has a continued local sales tax revenue loss as a result of the sourcing provision of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement under Title 82 RCW, as determined by the department.

(e) "Voluntary compliance revenue" means the local sales tax revenue gain to each qualified local taxing district reported to the department from persons registering through the central registration system authorized under the agreement.

Sec. 725. 2019 c 415 s 724 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE—NORTHEAST WASHINGTON WOLF-LIVESTOCK MANAGEMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$432,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$320,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($432,000))

$752,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account for the deployment of nonlethal wolf deterrence resources as provided in chapter 16.76 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—IMPAIRED DRIVING SAFETY ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$259,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$259,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the impaired driving safety account created in RCW 46.68.260 for local government costs related to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount appropriated in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CLIMATE RESILIENCY ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$100,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the climate resiliency account created in section 914 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON BEHAVIORAL HEALTH HOSPITAL ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$100,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the University of Washington behavioral health hospital account created in section 913 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—LANDLORD MITIGATION PROGRAM ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the landlord mitigation program account created in RCW 43.31.615.

(End of part)

PART VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 801. 2019 c 415 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premium distributions
. . . .
(($10,528,000))

$10,883,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorney

distributions
. . . .
(($7,014,000))

$7,618,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and

education distributions
. . . .
$4,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for public utility

district excise tax distributions
. . . .
(($65,216,000))

$65,249,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution to counties for publicly funded

autopsies
. . . .
$3,464,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for

harbor improvement revenue distributions
. . . .
$140,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for

distribution to "timber" counties
. . . .
(($84,366,000))

$79,337,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($106,123,000))

$103,457,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($42,084,000))

$40,310,000

City-County Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,218,000))

$35,507,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise tax distribution
. . . .
(($64,079,000))

$67,362,000

Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account

Appropriation for distribution to local taxing

jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue

redistributions effect of sourcing law changes
. . . .
(($2,220,000))

$1,937,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville

Reservation
. . . .
(($8,379,000))

$8,364,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians
. . . .
(($5,737,000))

$5,728,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor

profits distribution
. . . .
$98,876,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax

distributions
. . . .
$80,000

General Fund Appropriation for Marijuana Excise

Tax distributions
. . . .
$30,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for Habitat Conservation

Program distributions
. . . .
$5,754,000

General Fund Appropriation for payment in-lieu of

taxes to counties under Department of Fish and

Wildlife program
. . . .
(($3,993,000))

$4,040,000

Puget Sound Taxpayer Accountability Account

Appropriation for distribution to counties

in amounts not to exceed actual deposits into

the account and attributable to those counties'

share pursuant to RCW 43.79.520. If a county

eligible for distributions under RCW 43.79.520

has not adopted a sales and use tax under RCW

82.14.460 before July 1, 2019, then to prevent

these distributions from supplanting existing

local funding for vulnerable populations, the

distributions are subject to the procedural

requirements in this section. Before the county

may receive distributions, it must provide a

final budget for the distributions, submit the

final budget to the department of commerce, and

publish the final budget on its web site. To

develop this final budget, under RCW 36.40.040

the county must develop and hold hearings on a

preliminary budget that is separate from other

appropriations ordinances or resolutions, and

it must consult stakeholders, including

community service organizations, and must

consider input received during this process.

Before holding a hearing on the preliminary

budget, the county must notify local

governments in the county that are within the

borders of the regional transit authority, and

legislators whose districts are within those

borders. The county must then adopt a final

budget under RCW 36.40.080 for the distributions

that is separate from other appropriations

ordinances or resolutions. After the county

submits its final budget for the distributions

to the department of commerce, the department

must notify the state treasurer, who may then

make the distributions to the county.
. . . .
$28,683,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($603,954,000))

$600,789,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802. 2019 c 415 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,933,000))

$2,297,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); ((and)) chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

(2) $156,000 of the amount appropriated in this section is provided solely for local government costs related to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 803. 2019 c 415 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,289,000))

$1,531,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); ((and)) chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

(2) $103,000 of the amount appropriated in this section is provided solely for local government costs related to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 804. 2019 c 415 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to

the basic health plan trust account, the lesser

of the amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540

or this amount for fiscal year 2020, (($195,000,000))

$209,016,000 and this amount for fiscal year 2021,

(($199,000,000))$210,845,000
. . . .
(($394,000,000))

$410,000,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, the lesser of the amount

determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or this amount

for fiscal year 2020, (($136,000,000))$150,940,000

and this amount for fiscal year 2021, (($138,000,000))

$152,214,000
. . . .
(($274,000,000))

$303,154,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to

the clean up settlement account as repayment of

the loan provided in section 3022(2), chapter 2,

Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess. (ESB 6074, 2012

supplemental capital budget), in an amount not to

exceed the actual amount of the total remaining

principal and interest of the loan, $620,000 for

fiscal year 2020 and (($620,000))$640,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
(($1,240,000))

$1,260,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed the

actual amount of the annual base payment to the

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$90,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed the

actual amount of the annual base payment to the

tobacco settlement account for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$90,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the statewide tourism

marketing account, $1,500,000 for fiscal year

2020 and $1,500,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$3,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined

sales and use tax account, (($2,220,000))

$1,937,000 for fiscal year 2020
. . . .
(($2,220,000))

$1,937,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account: For transfer to

the home security fund, $4,500,000 for fiscal

year 2020 ((and $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2021))
. . . .
(($9,000,000))

$4,500,000

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, $8,000,000

for fiscal year 2020 and $8,000,000

for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$16,000,000

Disaster Response Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, $28,000,000 for fiscal

year 2021
. . . .
$28,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the fair fund under

RCW 15.76.115, $2,000,000 for fiscal year

2020 and $2,000,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$4,000,000

Energy Freedom Account: For transfer to the general

fund, $1,000,000 or as much thereof that

represents the balance in the account for

fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$1,000,000

Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer

to the state general fund, $3,500,000

for fiscal year 2020 and $3,500,000

for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$7,000,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer

to the geoduck aquaculture research account,

$400,000 for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$800,000

Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to

the education legacy trust account, $80,000,000

for fiscal year 2020 and $80,000,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$160,000,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account: For transfer

to the clean up settlement account as repayment

of the loan provided in section 3022(2),

chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess. (ESB

6074, 2012 supplemental capital budget), in an

amount not to exceed the actual amount of the

total remaining principal and interest of the

loan, $620,000 for fiscal year 2020 and

(($620,000))$640,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
(($1,240,000))

$1,260,000

Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account: For

transfer to the aquatic lands enhancement

account, $160,000 for fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$160,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account: For transfer to the water pollution

control revolving account, $4,500,000 for

fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$4,500,000

Oil Spill Response Account: For transfer to the oil

spill prevention account for the military

department to continue assisting local

emergency planning committees statewide with

hazardous materials plans that meet minimum

federal requirements, $520,000 for fiscal

year 2020 and $520,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$1,040,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account: For transfer to the

oil spill response account, $2,200,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$2,200,000

General Fund: For transfer to the home security fund,

$4,500,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$4,500,000

General Fund: For transfer to the multimodal

transportation account, $25,000,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$25,000,000

Child Care Facility Revolving Account: For

transfer to the general fund, $1,500,000

for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$1,500,000

General Fund: For transfer to the economic

development strategic reserve account, $1,000,000

for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$1,000,000

(End of part)

PART IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS

Sections 902 through 905 of this act represent the results of the negotiations for fiscal year 2021 collective bargaining agreement changes, permitted under chapter 41.80 RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 902 through 905 of this act are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements. The collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 502 and 503 of this act may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—ASSOCIATION OF WASHINGTON ASSISTANT ATTORNEYS GENERAL/WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the association of Washington assistant attorneys general/Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021 fiscal year. Funding is provided to transition the represented employees into the newly established and agreed upon wage schedule, effective July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON/WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021 fiscal year. Funding is provided for a lump sum payment for all WFSE represented, permanent employees in the amount of $700 for an FTE greater than .6 and $125 for all WFSE represented, permanent employees holding an FTE of .6 or less, as of July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—SEIU 925

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the service employees international union local 925 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021 fiscal year. Funding is provided for a lump sum payment for all SEIU 925 represented, permanent employees in the amount of $650 for an FTE greater than .6 and $325 for all SEIU 925 represented, permanent employees holding an FTE of .6 or less, as of July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—SEIU 1199 RESEARCH/HALL HEALTH

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the service employees international union local 1199 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021 fiscal year. Funding is provided for a lump sum payment for all SEIU 1199NW represented, permanent employees in the amount of $650 for an FTE of .5 or greater and $325 for all SEIU 1199NW represented, permanent employees holding an FTE of less than .5 as of July 1, 2020.

Sec. 906. 2019 c 415 s 936 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—HEALTH CARE COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2019-2021 biennium between the governor and the health care coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement, including health flexible spending accounts for eligible employees under the agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $939 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2020. For fiscal year 2021, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed (($976))$980 per eligible employee.

Sec. 907. 2019 c 415 s 937 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE HEALTH CARE COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the coalition for health benefits, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, may not exceed $939 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2020. For fiscal year 2021, the monthly employer funding rate may not exceed (($976))$980 per eligible employee.

Sec. 908. 2019 c 415 s 938 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

COMPENSATION—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2019-2021 biennium between the governor and the school employee coalition under the provisions of chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW. Appropriations in this act for allocations to school districts are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement, and for procurement of a benefit package that is materially similar to benefits provided by the public employee benefits program as outlined in policies adopted by the school employees' benefits board, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, school employees' benefits board administration, retiree remittance, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $994 per eligible employee beginning January 1, 2020. For ((fiscal year 2021))July and August 2020, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1,056 per eligible employee. Beginning September 1, 2020, through June 30, 2021, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1,014 per eligible employee. Employers will contribute one hundred percent of the retiree remittance defined in section 939 of this act.

(2) For the purposes of distributing insurance benefits, certificated staff units as determined in section 504 of this act will be multiplied by 1.02 and classified staff units as determined in section 504 of this act will be multiplied by 1.43.

(3) Except as provided by the parties' health care agreement, in order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the school employees' benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.740. The board shall collect a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(4) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the school employees' medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the school employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts may not be used for administrative expenditures.

Sec. 909. 2019 c 415 s 939 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

COMPENSATION—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The employer monthly funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $939 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2020. For fiscal year 2021, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed (($976))$980 per eligible employee. ((These rates assume the use of approximately $59 million of plan reserves in fiscal year 2020 and $97 million in fiscal year 2021.))

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2020 and 2021, the subsidy shall be up to $183 per month. Funds from reserves accumulated for future adverse claims experience, from past favorable claims experience, or otherwise, may not be used to increase this retiree subsidy beyond what is authorized by the legislature in this subsection.

(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a) For each full-time employee, $69.56 per month beginning September 1, 2019, and $76.13 beginning September 1, 2020;

(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $69.56 each month beginning September 1, 2019, and $76.13 beginning September 1, 2020, prorated by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in this subsection do not apply to employees of a technical college, school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

Sec. 910. 2019 c 415 s 946 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

CONDITIONAL AND GENERAL WAGE INCREASES—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

(1) Appropriations for the University of Washington in this act are sufficient to provide a general wage increase to employees who are not represented or who bargain under a statutory authority other than chapters 41.80 or 47.64 RCW or RCW 41.56.473. Funding is provided for a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2019, and a two percent increase July 1, 2020, for all employees described by this subsection.

(2) Appropriations for the University of Washington in this act are also sufficient to provide ((an additional wage increase))a lump sum payment for all nonrepresented, classified employees, ((both represented and not represented, of one percent effective July 1, 2019, and one percent))who earn less than $54,264 in salary annually, in the amount of $650 for an FTE greater than 0.6 and $325 for an FTE of 0.6 or less, effective July 1, 2020. ((This additional wage increase, funded in section 606 of this act, is conditioned upon the University of Washington concluding changes to the bargaining agreements with represented employees, including those whose agreements are approved in sections 921, 922, 923, 924, and 925 of this act, to provide the same one percent increases to represented employees.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911. A new section is added to 2019 c 415 (uncodified) to read as follows:

COMPENSATION—PENSION CONTRIBUTIONS

Appropriations to state agencies include funding for an increase in pension contribution rates for several state pension systems. An increase of 0.12 percent is funded for state employer contributions to the public employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement systems. An increase of 0.28 percent for school employer contributions to the teachers' retirement system and an increase of 0.12 percent for employer contributions to the school employees' retirement system are funded. These increases are provided for the purpose of a one-time, ongoing pension increase for retirees in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and teachers' retirement system plan 1, as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5400. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5400 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, this section is null and void.

Sec. 912. 2019 c 324 s 12 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) The health care authority shall establish a pilot program to provide mental health drop-in center services. The mental health drop-in center services shall provide a peer-focused recovery model during daytime hours through a community-based, therapeutic, less restrictive alternative to hospitalization for acute psychiatric needs. The program shall assist clients in need of voluntary, short-term, noncrisis services that focus on recovery and wellness. Clients may refer themselves, be brought to the center by law enforcement, be brought to the center by family members, or be referred by an emergency department.

(2) The pilot program shall be conducted in the largest city in a regional service area that has at least nine counties. Funds to support the pilot program shall be distributed through the behavioral health administrative service organization that serves the pilot program.

(3) The pilot program shall begin on ((January))July 1, 2020, and conclude July 1, 2022.

(4) By December 1, 2020, the health care authority shall submit a preliminary report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The preliminary report shall include a survey of peer mental health programs that are operating in the state, including the location, type of services offered, and number of clients served. By December 1, 2021, the health care authority shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the pilot program. The report shall include information about the number of clients served, the needs of the clients, the method of referral for the clients, and recommendations on how to expand the program statewide, including any recommendations to account for different needs in urban and rural areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913. A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW to read as follows:

The University of Washington behavioral health hospital account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other funding directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for (1) the construction of new University of Washington health care facilities, including a hospital, whose primary purpose is providing behavioral health services and (2) capital improvements to existing University of Washington health care facilities that currently provide or are being renovated or rehabilitated to provide behavioral health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The climate resiliency account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other funding directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account are dedicated to activities that increase climate resiliency and include, but are not limited to:

(1) Response to climate driven stressors;

(2) Prevention of environmental and natural resources degradation;

(3) Activities that restore or improve ecosystem resiliency and sustainability; and

(4) Measures that anticipate, adapt, or minimize the effects climate change has on communities and the natural environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915. A joint legislative task force is created to develop a business plan for the establishment of a publicly owned depository/state bank in Washington state.

(1) The task force membership must consist of:

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives;

(c) Two members from local government who have expressed an interest in the formation of or participation in a publicly owned depository/state bank with one member appointed by the association of Washington cities and one member appointed by the Washington association of counties; and

(d) Two citizen members with a background in finance appointed by the governor.

(2) Appointments to the task force must be made by April 15, 2020, and its first meeting must take place by May 1, 2020. The task force may have a total of four meetings and may conduct meetings by video or telephonic means. The task force shall conduct business by consensus. However, if consensus cannot be reached, action shall be taken by a majority vote of members.

(3) The purpose of the task force is to engage in a contract for services to develop a business plan for the establishment of a publicly owned depository/state bank.

(a) The business plan must include the following elements:

(i) Overall business concept;

(ii) Governance and management policies;

(iii) The business and powers of the bank;

(iv) Identification of products and services to be offered by the bank;

(v) A financial plan identifying both operating and capitalization needs;

(vi) Ethical, transparency, and reporting policies;

(vii) Draft enabling legislation and other necessary statutory changes to implement the business plan; and

(viii) An overall road map of actions and activities to establish a publicly owned depository/state bank.

(b) The task force must solicit from the public banking institute recommendations of persons and organizations to contract for developing the business plan. The task force must select the contractor from this list unless sixty percent of the task force determines that broader solicitation of potential contractors is necessary.

(c) The contract may be entered into as a sole source contract to facilitate receipt of the business plan by its due date to the legislature.

(4) The task force shall assist with scoping the content of the contract, contractor selection, and reviewing contract deliverables.

(5) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the house of representatives office of program research and the senate committee services.

(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(8) The task force shall present the business plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2020. The task force may extend the date for submitting the plan if the task force determines that an extension will improve the quality and content of the plan.

(9) This section expires on June 30, 2021.

Sec. 916. RCW 28B.76.525 and 2019 c 406 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state financial aid account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The primary purpose of the account is to ensure that all appropriations designated for financial aid through statewide student financial aid programs are made available to eligible students. The account shall be a nontreasury account.

(2) The office shall deposit in the account all money received for the Washington college grant program established under chapter 28B.92 RCW, the state work-study program established under chapter 28B.12 RCW, the Washington scholars program established under RCW 28A.600.110, the Washington award for vocational excellence program established under RCW 28C.04.525, and the educational opportunity grant program established under chapter 28B.101 RCW. The account shall consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the programs listed in this subsection and private contributions to the programs. Moneys deposited in the account do not lapse at the close of the fiscal period for which they were appropriated. Both during and after the fiscal period in which moneys were deposited in the account, the office may expend moneys in the account only for the purposes for which they were appropriated, and the expenditures are subject to any other conditions or limitations placed on the appropriations.

(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to students eligible for the programs according to program rules and policies. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, expenditures may also be used for scholarship awards in the passport to careers program established under chapter 28B.117 RCW.

(4) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.

(5) Only the director of the office or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.

Sec. 917. RCW 28B.145.050 and 2014 c 208 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The opportunity scholarship match transfer account is created in the custody of the state treasurer as a nonappropriated account to be used solely and exclusively for the opportunity scholarship program created in RCW 28B.145.040. The purpose of the account is to provide matching funds for the opportunity scholarship program.

(2) Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations by the legislature into the account and any gifts, grants, or donations received by the executive director of the council for this purpose.

(3) No expenditures from the account may be made except upon receipt of proof, by the executive director of the council from the program administrator, of private contributions to the opportunity scholarship program. Expenditures, in the form of matching funds, may not exceed the total amount of private contributions.

(4) Only the executive director of the council or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the opportunity scholarship match transfer account. Such authorization must be made as soon as practicable following receipt of proof as required under subsection (3) of this section.

(5) The council shall enter into an appropriate agreement with the program administrator to demonstrate exchange of consideration for the matching funds.

(6) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the opportunity scholarship match transfer account may be used for payment to the program administrator for administrative duties carried out under this chapter in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year.

Sec. 918. RCW 71.24.580 and 2019 c 415 s 980, 2019 c 325 s 1040, and 2019 c 314 s 27 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a) Substance use disorder treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder that, if not treated, would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of substance use disorder treatment services and treatment support services for nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; and (c) the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court. Amounts provided in this subsection must be used for treatment and recovery support services for criminally involved offenders and authorization of these services shall not be subject to determinations of medical necessity. During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account to the state general fund. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account to the home security fund account created in RCW 43.185C.060. ((It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of transferring moneys from the criminal justice treatment account to the home security fund account in subsequent biennia.)) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's successful completion of his or her substance use disorder treatment program, including but not limited to the recovery support and other programmatic elements outlined in RCW 2.30.030 authorizing therapeutic courts; and

(b) "Treatment support" includes transportation to or from inpatient or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.

(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(4)(a) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a) of this subsection to the department for the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.

(5) Moneys appropriated to the authority from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The authority may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.

(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the authority from the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The authority, in consultation with the department of corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives of substance use disorder treatment providers, and any other person deemed by the authority to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the authority from the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting attorney. The authority shall appoint a panel of representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges' association, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, and substance use disorder treatment providers. The panel shall review county or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.

(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority, and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b) of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account within that county. The submitted plan should incorporate current evidence-based practices in substance use disorder treatment. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance use disorder treatment pursuant to RCW 71.24.560 and treatment support services. No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment support services.

(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under this section.

(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.

(9) If a region or county uses criminal justice treatment account funds to support a therapeutic court, the therapeutic court must allow the use of all medications approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder as deemed medically appropriate for a participant by a medical professional. If appropriate medication-assisted treatment resources are not available or accessible within the jurisdiction, the health care authority's designee for assistance must assist the court with acquiring the resource.

(10) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW 2.30.030(3).

(11) The authority shall annually review and monitor the expenditures made by any county or group of counties that receives appropriated funds distributed under this section. Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with the requirements of its contract with the authority.

Sec. 919. RCW 71A.20.170 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 30 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The developmental disabilities community trust account is created in the state treasury. All net proceeds from the use of excess property identified in the 2002 joint legislative audit and review committee capital study or other studies of the division of developmental disabilities residential habilitation centers that would not impact current residential habilitation center operations must be deposited into the account.

(2) Proceeds may come from the lease of the land, conservation easements, sale of timber, or other activities short of sale of the property, except as permitted under section 7 of this act.

(3) "Excess property" includes that portion of the property at Rainier school previously under the cognizance and control of Washington State University for use as a dairy/forage research facility.

(4) Only investment income from the principal of the proceeds deposited into the trust account may be spent from the account. For purposes of this section, "investment income" includes lease payments, rent payments, or other periodic payments deposited into the trust account. For purposes of this section, "principal" is the actual excess land from which proceeds are assigned to the trust account.

(5) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively to provide family support and/or employment/day services to eligible persons with developmental disabilities who can be served by community-based developmental disability services. It is the intent of the legislature that the account should not be used to replace, supplant, or reduce existing appropriations.

(6) The account shall be known as the Dan Thompson memorial developmental disabilities community trust account.

(7) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, moneys appropriated from the general fund for expenditure into the Dan Thompson memorial developmental disabilities community trust account may be spent from the account for the purposes specified in subsection (5) of this section. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will continue in subsequent biennia.

Sec. 920. RCW 82.19.040 and 2019 c 415 s 989 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent applicable, all of the definitions of chapter 82.04 RCW and all of the provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the tax imposed in this chapter.

(2) Beginning June 30, 2019, taxes collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account under RCW 70.93.180, except that until June 30, ((2021))2020, one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ((per fiscal year)) must be deposited in equal monthly amounts in the state parks renewal and stewardship account, with the remainder deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account. ((It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in the ensuing biennium.))

Sec. 921. RCW 82.33.060 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 8 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To facilitate compliance with, and subject to the terms of, RCW 43.88.055, the state budget outlook work group shall prepare, subject to the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council under RCW 82.33.010, an official state budget outlook for state revenues and expenditures for the general fund and related funds. In odd-numbered years, the period covered by the November state budget outlook shall be the current fiscal biennium and the next ensuing fiscal biennium. In even-numbered years, the period covered by the November state budget outlook shall be the next two ensuing fiscal biennia. The revenue and caseload projections used in the outlook must reflect the most recent official forecasts adopted by the economic and revenue forecast council and the caseload forecast council for the years for which those forecasts are available.

(2) The outlook must:

(a) Estimate revenues to and expenditures from the state general fund and related funds. The estimate of ensuing biennium expenditures must include maintenance items including, but not limited to, continuation of current programs, forecasted growth of current entitlement programs, and actions required by law, including legislation with a future implementation date. Estimates of ensuing biennium expenditures must exclude policy items including, but not limited to, legislation not yet enacted by the legislature, collective bargaining agreements not yet approved by the legislature, and changes to levels of funding for employee salaries and benefits unless those changes are required by statute. Estimated maintenance level expenditures must also exclude costs of court rulings issued during or within fewer than ninety days before the beginning of the current legislative session;

(b) Address major budget and revenue drivers, including trends and variability in these drivers;

(c) Clearly state the assumptions used in the estimates of baseline and projected expenditures and any adjustments made to those estimates;

(d) Clearly state the assumptions used in the baseline revenue estimates and any adjustments to those estimates; ((and))

(e) Include the impact of previously enacted legislation with a future implementation date; and

(f) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, include an adjustment to pension rates for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium that is based on the actuary's recommended changes to the economic assumption to lower the assumed rate of return from 7.5 percent to 7.4 percent.

(3) The outlook must also separately include projections based on the revenues and expenditures proposed in the governor's budget documents submitted to the legislature under RCW 43.88.030.

(4) The economic and revenue forecast council shall submit state budget outlooks prepared under this section to the governor and the members of the committees on ways and means of the senate and house of representatives, including one copy to the staff of each of the committees, as required by this section.

(5) Each January, the state budget outlook work group shall also prepare, subject to the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council, a state budget outlook for state revenues and expenditures that reflects the governor's proposed budget document submitted to the legislature under chapter 43.88 RCW. Within thirty days following enactment of an operating budget by the legislature, the work group shall prepare, subject to the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council, a state budget outlook for state revenues and expenditures that reflects the enacted budget.

(6) All agencies of state government shall provide to the supervisor immediate access to all information relating to state budget outlooks.

(7) The state budget outlook work group must publish its proposed methodology on the economic and revenue forecast council web site. The state budget outlook work group, in consultation with the economic and revenue forecast work group and outside experts if necessary, must analyze the extent to which the proposed methodology for projecting expenditures for the ensuing fiscal biennia may be reliably used to determine the future impact of appropriations and make recommendations to change the outlook process to increase reliability and accuracy. The recommendations are due by December 1, 2013, and every five years thereafter.

Sec. 922. RCW 90.56.510 and 2019 c 415 s 994 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The oil spill prevention account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.23B.020(2) shall be deposited in the account. Moneys from the account may be spent only after appropriation. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. If, on the first day of any calendar month, the balance of the oil spill response account is greater than nine million dollars and the balance of the oil spill prevention account exceeds the unexpended appropriation for the current biennium, then the tax under RCW 82.23B.020(2) shall be suspended on the first day of the next calendar month until the beginning of the following biennium, provided that the tax shall not be suspended during the last six months of the biennium. If the tax imposed under RCW 82.23B.020(2) is suspended during two consecutive biennia, the department shall by November 1st after the end of the second biennium, recommend to the appropriate standing committees an adjustment in the tax rate. For the biennium ending June 30, 1999, and the biennium ending June 30, 2001, the state treasurer may transfer a total of up to one million dollars from the oil spill response account to the oil spill prevention account to support appropriations made from the oil spill prevention account in the omnibus appropriations act adopted not later than June 30, 1999.

(2) Expenditures from the oil spill prevention account shall be used exclusively for the administrative costs related to the purposes of this chapter, and chapters 90.48, 88.40, and 88.46 RCW. In addition, until June 30, 2021, expenditures from the oil spill prevention account may be used, subject to amounts appropriated specifically for this purpose, for the development and annual review of local emergency planning committee emergency response plans in RCW 38.52.040(3). Starting with the 1995-1997 biennium, the legislature shall give activities of state agencies related to prevention of oil spills priority in funding from the oil spill prevention account. Costs of prevention include the costs of:

(a) Routine responses not covered under RCW 90.56.500;

(b) Management and staff development activities;

(c) Development of rules and policies and the statewide plan provided for in RCW 90.56.060;

(d) Facility and vessel plan review and approval, drills, inspections, investigations, enforcement, and litigation;

(e) Interagency coordination and public outreach and education;

(f) Collection and administration of the tax provided for in chapter 82.23B RCW; and

(g) Appropriate travel, goods and services, contracts, and equipment.

(3) Before expending moneys from the account for a response under subsection (2)(a) of this section, but without delaying response activities, the director shall make reasonable efforts to obtain funding for response costs under this section from the person responsible for the spill and from other sources, including the federal government.

(4) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the oil spill prevention account to the oil spill response account.

Sec. 923. RCW 82.08.170 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 976 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, during the months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer must make the transfers required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section from the liquor excise tax fund and then the apportionment and distribution of all remaining moneys in the liquor excise tax fund to the counties, cities, and towns in the following proportions: (a) Twenty percent of the moneys in the liquor excise tax fund must be divided among and distributed to the counties of the state in accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.200; and (b) eighty percent of the moneys in the liquor excise tax fund must be divided among and distributed to the cities and towns of the state in accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.210.

(2) Each fiscal quarter and prior to making the twenty percent distribution to counties under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the treasurer shall transfer to the liquor revolving fund created in RCW 66.08.170 sufficient moneys to fund the allotments from any legislative appropriations for county research and services as provided under chapter 43.110 RCW.

(3) During the months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer must transfer two million five hundred thousand dollars from the liquor excise tax fund to the state general fund.

(4) During calendar year 2012, the October distribution under subsection (1) of this section and the July and October transfers under subsections (2) and (3) of this section must not be made. During calendar year 2013, the January, April, and July distributions under subsection (1) of this section and transfers under subsections (2) and (3) of this section must not be made.

(5) During the 2015-2017 and 2019-2021 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the liquor excise tax fund may be appropriated for the local government fiscal note program in the department of commerce. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in the ((2017-2019))subsequent fiscal biennium.

Sec. 924. RCW 43.31.502 and 1991 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A child care facility revolving fund is created. Money in the fund shall be used solely for the purpose of starting or improving a child care facility pursuant to RCW 43.31.085 and 43.31.502 through 43.31.514. Only moneys from private or federal sources may be deposited into this fund.

(2) Funds provided under this section shall not be subject to reappropriation. The child care facility fund committee may use loan and grant repayments and income for the revolving fund program.

(3) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the child care facility revolving fund to the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 925. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 926. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---