BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By July 1, 2021, the department must create a voluntary registration to qualify professional trainers and peer trainers on the prevention of harassment, discrimination, and retaliation, including harassment based on gender, gender expression, and sexual orientation. The voluntary registration is for trainers providing trainings in person, not online.

(2) In qualifying trainers, the department must consider whether the trainer has significant experience explaining:

(a) Federal and state discrimination and sexual harassment law and definitions;

(b) What constitutes sexual harassment using practical examples specific to an industry and work environment, and providing examples showing how sexual harassment can take place between members of the same and different genders, including harassment on the basis of gender, gender expression, or sexual orientation;

(c) A harassed person's rights and remedies, including the legal complaint process under state and federal law;

(d) How retaliation against a person who makes a complaint of harassment or a survivor of harassment is illegal; and

(e) Prevention methods of harassment and discrimination at a workplace, including supervisor best practices.

(3) The department's considerations for the qualification for the voluntary registration of peer trainers shall be generally consistent with the criteria set forth in subsection (2) of this section. Peer trainers are employees trained to train their peer employees and competent in the language or languages understood by their peers. At a minimum, peer trainers must also have all the following qualifications to be voluntarily registered:

(a) Completion of a minimum of a cumulative eight hours of sexual violence advocate training that includes survivor-centered and trauma-informed principles and techniques, and interactive teaching strategies that engage across multiple literacy levels; and

(b) Possession of one year of nonsupervisory work experience in the same industry as the peer workers they will train.

(4) The director may adopt and enforce rules to carry out this section. The department must consult with the office of financial management, human resources division, in developing these rules.

(5) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(b) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and industries.

(c) "Employer" has the same meaning as and shall be interpreted consistent with how that term is defined in RCW 49.17.020.

--- END ---