BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No tower crane may be disassembled in this state without the department present to ensure approved tower crane disassembly procedures are followed by the employers and workers on the worksite.

(2) Any additional inspection personnel hired by the department to meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section must be assigned to the county in which the most tower cranes are assembled.

(3) A violation of subsection (1) of this section by an employer is a willful violation of this chapter and subject to the penalties established under RCW 49.17.180 and 49.17.190.

--- END ---