BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.400 and 2019 c 169 s 3 and 2019 c 61 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a retailer's license, to be known and designated as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, to sell spirituous liquor by the individual glass, beer, and wine, at retail, for consumption on the premises, including mixed drinks and cocktails compounded or mixed on the premises only. A club licensed under chapter 70.62 RCW with overnight sleeping accommodations, that is licensed under this section may sell liquor by the bottle to registered guests of the club for consumption in guest rooms, hospitality rooms, or at banquets in the club. A patron of a bona fide restaurant or club licensed under this section may remove from the premises recorked or recapped in its original container any portion of wine or sake which was purchased for consumption with a meal, and registered guests who have purchased liquor from the club by the bottle may remove from the premises any unused portion of such liquor in its original container. Such license may be issued only to bona fide restaurants and clubs, and to dining, club and buffet cars on passenger trains, and to dining places on passenger boats and airplanes, and to dining places at civic centers with facilities for sports, entertainment, and conventions, and to such other establishments operated and maintained primarily for the benefit of tourists, vacationers and travelers as the board shall determine are qualified to have, and in the discretion of the board should have, a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license under the provisions and limitations of this title.

(2) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to sell bottled wine for off-premises consumption. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this subsection is one hundred twenty dollars.

(3) The holder of a spirits, beer, and wine license or its manager may furnish beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to the licensee's employees free of charge as may be required for use in connection with instruction on beer, wine, or spirituous liquor. The instruction may include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting, serving, storing, and handling beer, wine, and spirituous liquor. The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee must use the beer, wine, or spirituous liquor it obtains under its license for the sampling as part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on the premises of the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee.

(4)(a) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption malt liquor in kegs or other containers that are capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid and are registered in accordance with RCW 66.28.200. Beer may also be sold under the endorsement to a purchaser in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the retailer at the time of sale.

(b) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee that allows the holder to sell beer in original sealed packages of the manufacturer or bottler, if the licensee is located in a county with only one city.

(c) The annual fee for the endorsement under this subsection is one hundred twenty dollars.

(5)(a) The board shall create a soju endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to serve soju for on-premises consumption by the bottle to tables of two or more patrons twenty-one years of age or older. Cost of the endorsement is fifty dollars.

(b) The holder of a soju endorsement may serve soju in bottles that are three hundred seventy-five milliliters or less. Empty bottles of soju must remain on the patron's table until the patron has left the premises of the licensee.

(c) The patron of a holder of a soju endorsement may remove from the premises recapped in its original container any unused portion of soju that was purchased for consumption with a meal.

(d) The board must develop additional responsible sale and service of soju training curriculum related to the provisions of the soju endorsement under this subsection (5) that includes but is not limited to certification procedures and enforcement policies. This information must be provided in both Korean and English languages to licensees holding the soju endorsement. Soju endorsement holders must ensure servers providing soju to patrons are trained in the soju curriculum developed under this subsection (5).

--- END ---