BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.68.060 and 2011 c 346 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for applications received pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, no compensation of any kind shall be available under this chapter if:

(a) An application for benefits is not received by the department within ((two))three years after the date the criminal act was reported to a local police department or sheriff's office or the date the rights of beneficiaries accrued, unless the director has determined that "good cause" exists to expand the time permitted to receive the application. "Good cause" shall be determined by the department on a case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in which an application can be received for up to five years after the date the criminal act was reported to a local police department or sheriff's office or the date the rights of beneficiaries accrued; or

(b) The criminal act is not reported by the victim or someone on his or her behalf to a local police department or sheriff's office within twelve months of its occurrence or, if it could not reasonably have been reported within that period, within twelve months of the time when a report could reasonably have been made. In making determinations as to reasonable time limits, the department shall give greatest weight to the needs of the victims.

(2) No person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is eligible for benefits under this chapter when the injury for which benefits are sought((,)) was:

(a) The result of consent, provocation, or incitement by the victim, unless an injury resulting from a criminal act caused the death of the victim;

(b) Sustained while the crime victim was engaged in the attempt to commit, or the commission of, a felony; or

(c) Sustained while the victim was confined in any county or city jail, federal jail or prison or in any other federal institution, or any state correctional institution maintained and operated by the department of social and health services or the department of corrections, prior to release from lawful custody; or confined or living in any other institution maintained and operated by the department of social and health services or the department of corrections.

(3) No person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is eligible for benefits under this chapter where the person making a claim for such benefits has refused to give reasonable cooperation to state or local law enforcement agencies in their efforts to apprehend and convict the perpetrator of the criminal act which gave rise to the claim.

(4) A victim is not eligible for benefits under this chapter if ((he or she))the victim:

(a) Has been convicted of a felony offense within five years preceding the criminal act for which ((they are))the victim is applying where the felony offense is a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030 or a crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411, or is convicted of such a felony offense after the criminal act for which ((they are))the victim is applying; and

(b) Has not completely satisfied all legal financial obligations owed.

(5) Because victims of childhood criminal acts may repress conscious memory of such criminal acts far beyond the age of eighteen, the rights of adult victims of childhood criminal acts shall accrue at the time the victim discovers or reasonably should have discovered the elements of the crime. In making determinations as to reasonable time limits, the department shall give greatest weight to the needs of the victim.

(6)(a) Benefits under this chapter are available to any victim of a person against whom the state initiates proceedings under chapter 71.09 RCW. The right created under this subsection shall accrue when the victim is notified of proceedings under chapter 71.09 RCW or the victim is interviewed, deposed, or testifies as a witness in connection with the proceedings. An application for benefits under this subsection must be received by the department within two years after the date the victim's right accrued unless the director determines that good cause exists to expand the time to receive the application. The director shall determine "good cause" on a case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in which an application can be received for up to five years after the date the right of the victim accrued. Benefits under this subsection shall be limited to compensation for costs or losses incurred on or after the date the victim's right accrues for a claim allowed under this subsection.

(b) A person identified as the "minor" in the charge of commercial sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.100, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.101, or promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.102 is considered a victim of a criminal act for the purpose of the right to benefits under this chapter even if the person is also charged with prostitution under RCW 9A.88.030.

Sec. 2. RCW 7.68.061 and 2011 c 346 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

If injury or death results to a victim from the deliberate intention of the victim himself or herself to produce such injury or death, or while the victim is engaged in the attempt to commit, or the commission of, a felony, neither the victim nor the widow, widower, child, or dependent of the victim shall receive any payment under this chapter.

If injury or death results to a victim from the deliberate intention of a beneficiary of that victim to produce the injury or death, or if injury or death results to a victim as a consequence of a beneficiary of that victim engaging in the attempt to commit, or the commission of, a felony, the beneficiary shall not receive any payment under this chapter.

If injury or death results to a minor victim from the deliberate intention of a legal guardian or custodian of the minor victim to produce the injury or death, or if injury or death results to a minor victim as a consequence of a legal guardian or custodian of the minor victim engaging in an attempt to commit, or the commission of, a felony, the legal guardian or custodian shall not receive any payment under this chapter.

An invalid child, while being supported and cared for in a state institution, shall not receive compensation under this chapter.

No payment shall be made to or for a natural child of a deceased victim and, at the same time, as the stepchild of a deceased victim.

Sec. 3. RCW 7.68.070 and 2017 c 235 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The eligibility for benefits under this chapter and the amount thereof will be governed insofar as is applicable by the provisions contained in this chapter.

(1) Each victim injured as a result of a criminal act, including criminal acts committed between July 1, 1981, and January 1, 1983, or the victim's family or beneficiary in case of death of the victim, are eligible for benefits in accordance with this chapter, subject to the limitations under RCW 7.68.015. Except for medical benefits authorized under RCW 7.68.080, no more than forty thousand dollars shall be granted as a result of a single injury or death.

(a) Benefits payable for temporary total disability that results in financial support for lost wages shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars.

(b) Benefits payable for a permanent total disability or fatality that results in financial support for lost wages shall not exceed forty thousand dollars. After at least twelve monthly payments have been paid, the department shall have the sole discretion to make a final lump sum payment of the balance remaining.

(2) If the victim was not gainfully employed at the time of the criminal act, no financial support for lost wages will be paid to the victim or any beneficiaries, unless the victim was gainfully employed for a total of at least twelve weeks in the six months preceding the date of the criminal act.

(3) No victim or beneficiary shall receive compensation for or during the day on which the injury was received.

(4) If a victim's employer continues to pay the victim's wages that he or she was earning at the time of the crime, the victim shall not receive any financial support for lost wages.

(5) When the director determines that a temporary total disability results in a loss of wages, the victim shall receive monthly subject to subsection (1) of this section, during the period of disability, sixty percent of the victim's monthly wage but no more than one hundred percent of the state's average monthly wage as defined in RCW 7.68.020. The minimum monthly payment shall be no less than five hundred dollars. Monthly wages shall be based upon employer wage statements, employment security records, or documents reported to and certified by the internal revenue service. Monthly wages must be determined using the actual documented monthly wage or averaging the total wages earned for up to twelve successive calendar months preceding the injury. In cases where the victim's wages and hours are fixed, they shall be determined by multiplying the daily wage the victim was receiving at the time of the injury:

(a) By five, if the victim was normally employed one day a week;

(b) By nine, if the victim was normally employed two days a week;

(c) By thirteen, if the victim was normally employed three days a week;

(d) By eighteen, if the victim was normally employed four days a week;

(e) By twenty-two, if the victim was normally employed five days a week;

(f) By twenty-six, if the victim was normally employed six days a week; or

(g) By thirty, if the victim was normally employed seven days a week.

(6) When the director determines that a permanent total disability or death results in a loss of wages, the victim or eligible spouse shall receive the monthly payments established in this subsection, not to exceed forty thousand dollars or the limits established in this chapter.

(7)(a) The legal guardian or custodian of a minor victim shall receive up to thirty days of the legal guardian's or custodian's lost wages if the director determines that the legal guardian or custodian has lost wages due to any one or more of the following:

(i) The time where the legal guardian or custodian of a minor victim accompanies the minor victim to medical or counseling services related to the crime; or

(ii) The time where the legal guardian or custodian of a minor victim accompanies the minor victim to criminal justice proceedings related to the crime.

(b) Wages under this subsection shall be based on employer wage statements, employment security records, or documents reported to and certified by the internal revenue service.

(8) If the director determines that the victim is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the workforce, benefits shall not be paid under this section.

(((8)))(9) In the case of death, if there is no eligible spouse, benefits shall be paid to the child or children of the deceased victim. If there is no spouse or children, no payments shall be made under this section. If the spouse remarries before this benefit is paid in full benefits shall be paid to the victim's child or children and the spouse shall not receive further payment. If there is no child or children no further payments will be made.

(((9)))(10) The benefits for disposition of remains or burial expenses shall not exceed six thousand one hundred seventy dollars per claim. Beginning July 1, 2020, the department shall adjust the amount in this subsection (((9)))(10) for inflation every three years based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. To receive reimbursement for expenses related to the disposition of remains or burial, the department must receive an itemized statement from a provider of services within twenty-four months of the date of the claim allowance. If there is a delay in the recovery of remains or the release of remains for disposition or burial, an itemized statement from a provider of services must be received within twenty-four months of the date of the release of the remains or of the date of the claim allowance, whichever is later.

(((10)))(11) Any person who is responsible for the victim's injuries, or who would otherwise be unjustly enriched as a result of the victim's injuries, shall not be a beneficiary under this chapter.

(((11)))(12) Crime victims' compensation is not available to pay for services covered under chapter 74.09 RCW or Title XIX of the federal social security act.

(((12)))(13) A victim whose crime occurred in another state who qualifies for benefits under RCW 7.68.060(6) may receive appropriate mental health counseling to address distress arising from participation in the civil commitment proceedings. Fees for counseling shall be determined by the department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080.

(((13)))(14) If the provisions of this title relative to compensation for injuries to or death of victims become invalid because of any adjudication, or are repealed, the period intervening between the occurrence of an injury or death, not previously compensated for under this title by lump payment or completed monthly payments, and such repeal or the rendition of the final adjudication of invalidity shall not be computed as a part of the time limited by law for the commencement of any action relating to such injury or death.

(((14)))(15) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.080 for permanent partial disability will not be provided to any crime victim or for any claim submitted on or after July 1, 2011.

--- END ---