BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.22.179 and 2019 c 136 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the surcharge authorized in RCW 36.22.178, and except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an additional surcharge of sixty-two dollars shall be charged by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge allowed by law. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the funds collected pursuant to this section are to be distributed and used as follows:

(a) The auditor shall retain two percent for collection of the fee, and of the remainder shall remit sixty percent to the county to be deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its cities and towns to accomplish the purposes of chapter 484, Laws of 2005, six percent of which may be used by the county for the collection and local distribution of these funds and administrative costs related to its homeless housing plan, and the remainder for programs which directly accomplish the goals of the county's local homeless housing plan, except that for each city in the county which elects as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080 to operate its own local homeless housing program, a percentage of the surcharge assessed under this section equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the real estate excise tax collected by the county shall be transmitted at least quarterly to the city treasurer, without any deduction for county administrative costs, for use by the city for program costs which directly contribute to the goals of the city's local homeless housing plan; of the funds received by the city, it may use six percent for administrative costs for its homeless housing program.

(b) The auditor shall remit the remaining funds to the state treasurer for deposit in the home security fund account to be used as follows:

(i) The department may use twelve and one-half percent of this amount for administration of the program established in RCW 43.185C.020, including the costs of creating the statewide homeless housing strategic plan, measuring performance, providing technical assistance to local governments, and managing the homeless housing grant program.

(ii) The remaining eighty-seven and one-half percent of this amount must be used as follows:

(A) At least forty-five percent must be set aside for the use of private rental housing payments; ((and))

(B) At least twenty-five percent must be set aside for the department to establish and administer a competitive grant program for local governments to provide diversion services for those families and individuals who are at substantial risk of losing stable housing or became recently homeless and are determined to have a high probability of returning to stable housing. For the purposes of this subsection (1)(b)(ii)(B):

(I) "Diversion services" means the employment or contracting of at least one diversion specialist to assist persons and families to find housing options using their own available resources or, if none exist, providing such persons and families with short-term services or one-time financial assistance, or both; and

(II) "Substantial risk" means the person or family has provided documentation that they will lose their housing within the next thirty days or that services will be discontinued within the next thirty days; and

(C) All remaining funds are to be used by the department to:

(I) Provide housing and shelter for homeless people including, but not limited to: Grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters; grants to operate transitional housing; partial payments for rental assistance; consolidated emergency assistance; overnight youth shelters; grants and vouchers designated for victims of human trafficking and their families; and emergency shelter assistance; and

(II) Fund the homeless housing grant program.

(2) A county issuing general obligation bonds pursuant to RCW 36.67.010, to carry out the purposes of subsection (1)(a) of this section, may provide that such bonds be made payable from any surcharge provided for in subsection (1)(a) of this section and may pledge such surcharges to the repayment of the bonds.

(3) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to (a) assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust, (b) documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death, (c) any recorded documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee or additional surcharges under state law, (d) marriage licenses issued by the county auditor, or (e) documents recording a federal, state, county, or city lien or satisfaction of lien.

(4) Ten dollars of the surcharge imposed under subsection (1) of this section must be distributed to the counties to carry out the purposes of subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(5) For purposes of this section, "private rental housing" means housing owned by a private landlord and includes housing owned by a nonprofit housing entity.

--- END ---