BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.380 and 2016 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There is a retailer's license to be designated as a special occasion license to be issued to a not-for-profit society or organization to sell spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified event, such as at picnics or other special occasions, at a specified date and place; fee sixty dollars per day.

(1) The not-for-profit society or organization is limited to sales of no more than twelve calendar days per year. For the purposes of this subsection, special occasion licensees that are (("))agricultural "area fairs," ((or "agricultural))"county((,))and district((, and area)) fairs," or "community fairs," as defined by RCW 15.76.120, that receive a special occasion license may, once per calendar year, count as one event fairs that last multiple days, so long as alcohol sales are at set dates, times, and locations, and the board receives prior notification of the dates, times, and locations. The special occasion license applicant will pay the sixty dollars per day for this event.

(2) The licensee may sell spirits, beer, and/or wine in original, unopened containers for off-premises consumption if permission is obtained from the board prior to the event.

(3) In addition to offering the sale of wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption, the licensee may sell wine in original, unopened containers for on-premises consumption if permission is obtained from the board prior to the event.

(4) Sale, service, and consumption of spirits, beer, and wine is to be confined to specified premises or designated areas only.

(5)(a) For the purposes of subsection (4) of this section, the specified premises or designated areas for events that primarily cater to adult patrons, and are held on the fairgrounds of agricultural "area fairs," "county and district fairs," or "community fairs," may include the entire fair venue or a designated area of the venue, if the licensee has obtained a fairground endorsement.

(b)(i) The board may issue a fairground endorsement upon application of a licensee, at least forty-five days before the event, that includes an approved event plan that allows for the carrying of open, unfinished servings of alcohol between buildings on the venue. The endorsement may not be issued to events that are state fairs or agricultural fairs under RCW 15.76.120.

(ii) If persons under the age of twenty-one are allowed at the event, the plan must ensure that any youth-oriented or family-oriented activities at the event are located in buildings where alcohol is not allowed.

(iii) The event plan must include an acceptable plan for the control and management of individuals who are carrying alcohol, including demarcated or defined pathways between buildings with barriers approved by the board. The board may work with the applicants to develop an acceptable plan for each event.

(iv) The board may limit the number of the fairground endorsements authorized to be held at each fairground to fifty percent of the special occasion licenses issued for that fairground in the previous calendar year.

(v) The fairground endorsement fee for each event is three hundred dollars.

(vi) The board must adopt rules setting the criteria and conditions that must be met in order to issue a fairground endorsement.

(vii) This subsection (5) does not limit any existing right or benefit currently authorized or provided to special events or special occasion license holders.

(6) Liquor sold under this special occasion license must be purchased from a licensee of the board.

(((6)))(7) Any violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction having a maximum penalty of two hundred fifty dollars as provided for in chapter 7.80 RCW.

--- END ---