BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that when elective or appointive officials or employees of the state travel by vehicle away from their designated posts of duty while engaged on official business, the reimbursement of private motor use should not exceed the average cost of operation of state-owned motor vehicles. The legislature finds that this policy will be advantageous to the state by ensuring the most economical option be used for state employee travel, which will also likely result in less fossil fuel consumption and carbon emission production.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.03.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever it becomes necessary for elective or appointive officials or employees of the state to travel away from their designated posts of duty while engaged on official business, and it is found to be more advantageous or economical to the state that travel be by a privately-owned vehicle rather than a common carrier or a state-owned or operated vehicle, a mileage rate established by the director of financial management shall be allowed. ((The))If an official or employee chooses to use a privately-owned motor vehicle and the request is approved by the agency head or authorized designee, the mileage rate established by the director shall not exceed ((any rate set by the United States treasury department above which the substantiation requirements specified in Treasury Department Regulations section 1.274-5T(a)(1), as now law or hereafter amended, will apply))the average cost per mile of operation of state-owned motor vehicles, as determined by the department of enterprise services.

(2) The director of financial management may prescribe and regulate the specific mileage rate or other allowance for the use of privately-owned vehicles or common carriers on official business and the conditions under which reimbursement of transportation costs may be allowed. The reimbursement or other payment for transportation expenses of any employee or appointive official of the state shall be based on the method deemed most advantageous or economical to the state.

(3) The mileage rate established by the director of financial management pursuant to this section and any subsequent changes thereto shall be reported to the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate at each regular session of the legislature.

(4) No person designated as a member of a class one through class three or class five board, commission, council, committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence, lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under RCW 43.03.049.

--- END ---