BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.09.010 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature to establish a comprehensive system of ((corrections))rehabilitation and reentry for ((convicted law violators))individuals involved in the criminal justice system within the state of Washington to accomplish the following objectives.

(1) The system should ((ensure the))improve public safety by focusing on positively changing lives. The system should be designed and managed to provide:((the))

(a) The maximum feasible safety for the persons and property of the general public, the staff, and the ((inmates))individuals involved in the criminal justice system; and

(b) The resources and guidance necessary to support an individual's success throughout the rehabilitation and reentry process.

(2) The system is responsible for the enforcement of sentences imposed for either incarceration or community supervision. This enforcement is generally limited to the denial of civil liberties. The system should ((punish the offender for violating the laws of the state of Washington. This punishment should generally be limited to the denial of liberty of the offender))cultivate an environment of integrity and trust; promote inclusion, equity, and respect for others; and provide opportunities for personal growth and change.

(3) The system should positively impact ((offenders))the physical, mental, and emotional security and well-being of individuals involved in the criminal justice system by ((stressing personal responsibility and accountability))understanding individuals, instilling hope, embracing change, and by discouraging recidivism.

(4) The system should ((treat all offenders))promote a respectful environment by treating all individuals involved in the criminal justice system fairly and equitably without regard to race, religion, sex, national origin, residence, or social condition.

(5) The system, as much as possible, should reflect the values of the community, including:

(a) ((Avoiding idleness. Idleness is not only wasteful but destructive to the individual and to the community))Focusing on positive growth and well-being. Individuals must use the rehabilitation and reentry process to embrace change, reflection, and transformation.

(b) Adoption of the work ethic. It is the community expectation that all individuals should work and, through their efforts, benefit both themselves and the community.

(c) Providing opportunities for self-improvement. All individuals should have opportunities to grow and expand their skills and abilities so as to fulfill their role in the community.

(d) Linking the receipt ((or denial)) of privileges to responsible behavior and accomplishments. The individual who works to improve himself or herself and the community should be rewarded for these efforts. ((As a corollary, there should be no rewards for no effort.))

(e) Sharing in the obligations of the community. All citizens, the public, and ((inmates))individuals involved in the criminal justice system alike, have a personal and fiscal obligation in the ((corrections))rehabilitation and reentry system. All communities must share in the responsibility and mission of the ((corrections))rehabilitation and reentry system.

(6) The system should provide for prudent management of resources. The avoidance of unnecessary or inefficient public expenditures ((on the part of offenders and the department)) is essential. ((Offenders))Individuals involved in the criminal justice system must be accountable to the department, and the department in turn must be accountable to the individuals involved in the criminal justice system and to the public and the legislature. The human and fiscal resources of the community are limited. The management and use of these resources can be enhanced by wise investment((,))in productive rehabilitation and reentry programs and responsive and ongoing staff training, the reduction of duplication and waste, and ((the joining together of all involved parties))by coordinating and partnering with stakeholders and communities in a common endeavor. ((Since most offenders return to the community, it is wise for the state and the communities to make an investment in effective rehabilitation programs for offenders and the wise use of resources))The system should be transparent and use outcome-based measurements to evaluate program effectiveness, manage process performance, improve efficiency, and reduce costs.

(7) To the extent possible, the state and communities should redirect, leverage, and maximize resources to:

(a) Focus on positive reentry transition services through partnerships with community-based organizations and government agencies;

(b) Reduce prison violence by using data-informed methods, cognitive behavioral interventions, and risk mitigation;

(c) Improve individual engagement and community supervision reporting by adopting alternatives to confinement and connecting individuals with transition and reentry resources;

(d) Adopt individualized and structured continuity of care plans to coordinate treatment between community and government agencies and continue care after release;

(e) Promote and sustain a culture of acceptance, respect, and inclusion for staff to increase productivity, job satisfaction, communication practices, and retention; and

(f) Manage capacity constraints through gender responsive classification tools and nonconfinement options for community supervision sanctions.

(8) The system should provide for restitution as part of the rehabilitation and reentry process for individuals involved in the criminal justice system. Those who have damaged others, persons or property, have a responsibility to make restitution for these damagesto move forward positively.

(((8)))(9) The system should be accountable to the citizens of the state. In return, the individual citizens and local units of government must meet their responsibilities to make the ((corrections))rehabilitation and reentry system effective.

(((9)))(10) The system should meet those national standards which the state determines to be appropriate.

--- END ---