BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act shall be known and cited as the interstate nurse licensure compact of 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The legislature finds that:

(a) The health and safety of the public are affected by the degree of compliance with and the effectiveness of enforcement activities related to state nurse licensure laws;

(b) Violations of nurse licensure and other laws regulating the practice of nursing may result in injury or harm to the public;

(c) The expanded mobility of nurses and the use of advanced communication technologies as part of our nation's health care delivery system require greater coordination and cooperation among states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation;

(d) New practice modalities and technology make compliance with individual state nurse licensure laws difficult and complex;

(e) The current system of duplicative licensure for nurses practicing in multiple states is cumbersome and redundant for both nurses and states; and

(f) Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements throughout the states promotes public safety and public health benefits.

(2) The general purposes of this compact are to:

(a) Facilitate the states' responsibility to protect the public's health and safety;

(b) Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation;

(c) Facilitate the exchange of information between party states in the areas of nurse regulation, investigation, and adverse actions;

(d) Promote compliance with the laws governing the practice of nursing in each jurisdiction;

(e) Invest all party states with the authority to hold a nurse accountable for meeting all state practice laws in the state in which the patient is located at the time care is rendered through the mutual recognition of party state licenses;

(f) Decrease redundancies in the consideration and issuance of nurse licenses; and

(g) Provide opportunities for interstate practice by nurses who meet uniform licensure requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action permitted by a state's laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against a nurse, including actions against an individual's license or multistate licensure privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee's practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse's authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action.

(2) "Alternative program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring program approved by a licensing board.

(3) "Coordinated licensure information system" means an integrated process for collecting, storing, and sharing information on nurse licensure and enforcement activities related to nurse licensure laws that is administered by a nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by licensing boards.

(4) "Current significant investigative information" means:

(a) Investigative information that a licensing board, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the nurse to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or

(b) Investigative information that indicates that the nurse represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the nurse has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.

(5) "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of nursing imposed by a licensing board.

(6) "Home state" means the party state which is the nurse's primary state of residence.

(7) "Interstate commission" means the interstate commission of nurse licensure compact administrators.

(8) "Licensing board" means a party state's regulatory body responsible for issuing nurse licenses.

(9) "Multistate license" means a license to practice as a registered or a licensed practical nurse or vocational nurse issued by a home state licensing board that authorizes the licensed nurse to practice in all party states under a multistate licensure privilege.

(10) "Multistate licensure privilege" means a legal authorization associated with a multistate license permitting the practice of nursing as either a registered nurse, or licensed practical or vocational nurse, in a remote state.

(11) "Nurse" means registered nurse, or licensed practical or vocational nurse, as those terms are defined by each party state's practice laws.

(12) "Party state" means any state that has adopted this compact.

(13) "Remote state" means a party state, other than the home state.

(14) "Single-state license" means a nurse license issued by a party state that authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not include a multistate licensure privilege to practice in any other party state.

(15) "State" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia.

(16) "State practice laws" means a party state's laws, rules, and regulations that govern the practice of nursing, define the scope of nursing practice, and create the methods and grounds for imposing discipline. State practice laws do not include requirements necessary to obtain and retain a license, except for qualifications or requirements of the home state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A multistate license to practice registered or licensed practical or vocational nursing issued by a home state to a resident in that state will be recognized by each party state as authorizing a nurse to practice as a registered nurse, or licensed practical or vocational nurse, under a multistate licensure privilege, in each party state.

(2) A state must implement procedures for considering the criminal history records of applicants for initial multistate license or licensure by endorsement. Such procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information from the federal bureau of investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal records.

(3) Each party state shall require the following for an applicant to obtain or retain a multistate license in the home state:

(a) Meets the home state's qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other applicable state laws;

(b)(i) Has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a licensing board-approved registered nurse, or licensed practical or vocational nurse, prelicensure education program; or

(ii) Has graduated from a foreign registered nurse, or licensed practical or vocational nurse, prelicensure education program that (A) has been approved by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable country and (B) has been verified by an independent credentials review agency to be comparable to a licensing board-approved prelicensure education program;

(c) Has, if a graduate of a foreign prelicensure education program not taught in English or if English is not the individual's native language, successfully passed an English proficiency examination that includes the components of reading, speaking, writing, and listening;

(d) Has successfully passed an NCLEX-RN® or NCLEX-PN® examination or recognized predecessor, as applicable;

(e) Is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered license;

(f) Has submitted, in connection with an application for initial licensure or licensure by endorsement, fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the federal bureau of investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal records;

(g) Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense under applicable state or federal criminal law;

(h) Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of nursing as determined on a case-by-case basis;

(i) Is not currently enrolled in an alternative program;

(j) Is subject to self-disclosure requirements regarding current participation in an alternative program; and

(k) Has a valid United States social security number.

(4) All party states shall be authorized, in accordance with existing state due process law, to take adverse action against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, or any other action that affects a nurse's authorization to practice under a multistate licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions. If a party state takes such action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the home state of any such actions by remote states.

(5) A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the state practice laws of the state in which the client is located at the time service is provided. The practice of nursing is not limited to patient care, but shall include all nursing practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party state in which the client is located. The practice of nursing in a party state under a multistate licensure privilege will subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts, and the laws of the party state in which the client is located at the time service is provided.

(6) Individuals not residing in a party state shall continue to be able to apply for a party state's single-state license as provided under the laws of each party state. However, the single-state license granted to these individuals will not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice nursing in any other party state. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a party state for the issuance of a single-state license.

(7) Any nurse holding a home state multistate license, on the effective date of this compact, may retain and renew the multistate license issued by the nurse's then-current home state, provided that:

(a) A nurse, who changes primary state of residence after the effective date of this compact, must meet all applicable requirements of subsection (3) of this section to obtain a multistate license from a new home state.

(b) A nurse who fails to satisfy the multistate licensure requirements in subsection (3) of this section due to a disqualifying event occurring after the effective date of this compact shall be ineligible to retain or renew a multistate license, and the nurse's multistate license shall be revoked or deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the interstate commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) Upon application for a multistate license, the licensing board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, through the coordinated licensure information system, whether the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of, a license issued by any other state, whether there are any encumbrances on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, and whether the applicant is currently participating in an alternative program.

(2) A nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the home state, in only one party state at a time.

(3) If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving between two party states, the nurse must apply for licensure in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by the prior home state will be deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the interstate commission.

(a) The nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of residence.

(b) A multistate license shall not be issued by the new home state until the nurse provides satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence to the new home state and satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain a multistate license from the new home state.

(4) If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving from a party state to a nonparty state, the multistate license issued by the prior home state will convert to a single-state license, valid only in the former home state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a licensing board shall have the authority to:

(a) Take adverse action against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice within that party state.

(i) Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a nurse's license issued by the home state.

(ii) For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state licensing board shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action;

(b) Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a nurse's authority to practice within that party state;

(c) Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who changes primary state of residence during the course of such investigations. The licensing board shall also have the authority to take appropriate action and shall promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the new home state of any such actions;

(d) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing board in a party state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another party state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located;

(e) Obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure applicant, fingerprint or other biometric-based information to the federal bureau of investigation for criminal background checks, receive the results of the federal bureau of investigation record search on criminal background checks, and use the results in making licensure decisions;

(f) If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected nurse the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that nurse;

(g) Take adverse action based on the factual findings of the remote state, provided that the licensing board follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action.

(2) If adverse action is taken by the home state against a nurse's multistate license, the nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice in all other party states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the multistate license. All home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against a nurse's multistate license shall include a statement that the nurse's multistate licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during the pendency of the order.

(3) Nothing in this compact shall override a party state's decision that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the multistate license of any nurse for the duration of the nurse's participation in an alternative program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) All party states shall participate in a coordinated licensure information system of all licensed registered nurses, and licensed practical or vocational nurses. This system will include information on the licensure and disciplinary history of each nurse, as submitted by party states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and enforcement efforts.

(2) The interstate commission, in consultation with the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system, shall formulate necessary and proper procedures for the identification, collection, and exchange of information under this compact.

(3) All licensing boards shall promptly report to the coordinated licensure information system any adverse action, any current significant investigative information, denials of applications, the reasons for such denials, and nurse participation in alternative programs known to the licensing board regardless of whether such participation is deemed nonpublic or confidential under state law.

(4) Current significant investigative information and participation in nonpublic or confidential alternative programs shall be transmitted through the coordinated licensure information system only to party state licensing boards.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party state licensing boards contributing information to the coordinated licensure information system may designate information that may not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other entities or individuals without the express permission of the contributing state.

(6) Any personally identifiable information obtained from the coordinated licensure information system by a party state licensing board shall not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the extent permitted by the laws of the party state contributing the information.

(7) Any information contributed to the coordinated licensure information system that is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that information shall also be expunged from the coordinated licensure information system.

(8) The compact administrator of each party state shall furnish a uniform data set to the compact administrator of each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum:

(a) Identifying information;

(b) Licensure data;

(c) Information related to alternative program participation; and

(d) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact, as determined by interstate commission rules.

(9) The compact administrator of a party state shall provide all investigative documents and information requested by another party state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. (1) The party states hereby create and establish a joint public entity known as the interstate commission of nurse licensure compact administrators.

(a) The interstate commission is an instrumentality of the party states.

(b) Venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or against the interstate commission shall be brought solely and exclusively, in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the interstate commission is located. The interstate commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.

(c) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.

(2)(a) Each party state shall have and be limited to one administrator. The head of the state licensing board or designee shall be the administrator of this compact for each party state. Any administrator may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the administrator is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the interstate commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy exists.

(b) Each administrator shall be entitled to one vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the interstate commission. An administrator shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for an administrator's participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication.

(c) The interstate commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws or rules of the interstate commission.

(d) All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rule-making provisions in section 9 of this act.

(e) The interstate commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the interstate commission must discuss:

(i) Noncompliance of a party state with its obligations under this compact;

(ii) The employment, compensation, discipline, or other personnel matters, practices, or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the interstate commission's internal personnel practices and procedures;

(iii) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;

(iv) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services, or real estate;

(v) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;

(vi) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential;

(vii) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

(viii) Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes;

(ix) Disclosure of information related to any reports prepared by or on behalf of the interstate commission for the purpose of investigation of compliance with this compact; or

(x) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state statute.

(f) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the interstate commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The interstate commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the interstate commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(3) The interstate commission shall, by a majority vote of the administrators, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of this compact, including but not limited to:

(a) Establishing the fiscal year of the interstate commission;

(b) Providing reasonable standards and procedures:

(i) For the establishment and meetings of other committees; and

(ii) Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the interstate commission;

(c) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the interstate commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings, and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public's interest, the privacy of individuals, and proprietary information, including trade secrets. The interstate commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the interstate commission must make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the vote of each administrator, with no proxy votes allowed;

(d) Establishing the titles, duties, and authority and reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of the interstate commission;

(e) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the interstate commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any party state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the interstate commission; and

(f) Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the interstate commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations.

(4) The interstate commission may not, through bylaw or rule, determine or alter:

(a) What is required by section 4(3) of this act by a party state for an applicant to obtain or retain a multistate license in the home state;

(b) Requirements to obtain or renew a single-state license;

(c) The scope of nursing practice in a state;

(d) The methods and grounds for disciplining a nurse in a state;

(e) State labor laws; or

(f) The obligation of any employer to comply with statutory requirements.

(5) The interstate commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and any amendments thereto, in a convenient form on the web site of the interstate commission.

(6) The interstate commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws.

(7) The interstate commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws.

(8) The interstate commission shall have the following powers:

(a) To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of this compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all party states;

(b) To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the interstate commission, provided that the standing of any licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;

(c) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;

(d) To borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel including, but not limited to, employees of a party state or nonprofit organizations;

(e) To cooperate with other organizations that administer state compacts related to the regulation of nursing, including but not limited to sharing administrative or staff expenses, office space, or other resources;

(f) To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this compact, and to establish the interstate commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;

(g) To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants, and gifts of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the interstate commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;

(h) To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve, or use, any property, whether real, personal, or mixed; provided that at all times the interstate commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety;

(i) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, whether real, personal, or mixed;

(j) To establish a budget and make expenditures;

(k) To borrow money;

(l) To appoint committees, including advisory committees comprised of administrators, state nursing regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and other such interested persons;

(m) To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;

(n) To adopt and use an official seal; and

(o) To perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse licensure and practice.

(9)(a) The interstate commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.

(b) The interstate commission may also levy on and collect an annual assessment from each party state to cover the cost of its operations, activities, and staff in its annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the interstate commission, which shall promulgate a rule that is binding upon all party states.

(c) The interstate commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the interstate commission pledge the credit of any of the party states, except by, and with the authority of, such party state.

(d) The interstate commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the interstate commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the interstate commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the interstate commission.

(10)(a) The administrators, officers, executive director, employees, and representatives of the interstate commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of interstate commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct of that person.

(b) The interstate commission shall defend any administrator, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the interstate commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of interstate commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of interstate commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel; and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct.

(c) The interstate commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any administrator, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the interstate commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of interstate commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of interstate commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct of that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. (1) The interstate commission shall exercise its rule-making powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment and shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this compact.

(2) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the interstate commission.

(3) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the interstate commission, and at least sixty days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the interstate commission shall file a notice of proposed rule making:

(a) On the web site of the interstate commission; and

(b) On the web site of each licensing board or the publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.

(4) The notice of proposed rule making shall include:

(a) The proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted upon;

(b) The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the reason for the proposed rule;

(c) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and

(d) The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the interstate commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.

(5) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the interstate commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.

(6) The interstate commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment.

(7) The interstate commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the scheduled public hearing.

(a) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings will be recorded, and a copy will be made available upon request.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the interstate commission at hearings required by this section.

(8) If no one appears at the public hearing, the interstate commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule.

(9) Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the interstate commission shall consider all written and oral comments received.

(10) The interstate commission shall, by majority vote of all administrators, take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rule-making record and the full text of the rule.

(11) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the interstate commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that the usual rule-making procedures provided in this compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:

(a) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;

(b) Prevent a loss of interstate commission or party state funds; or

(c) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is required by federal law or rule.

(12) The interstate commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the web site of the interstate commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the interstate commission, prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the interstate commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) Each party state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this compact's purposes and intent.

(2) The interstate commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the interstate commission, and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process in such proceeding to the interstate commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the interstate commission, this compact, or promulgated rules.

(a) If the interstate commission determines that a party state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the interstate commission shall:

(i) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other party states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default, or any other action to be taken by the interstate commission; and

(ii) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.

(b) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state's membership in this compact may be terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.

(c) Termination of membership in this compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the interstate commission to the governor of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of the defaulting state's licensing board and each of the party states.

(d) A state whose membership in this compact has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.

(e) The interstate commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or whose membership in this compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in writing between the interstate commission and the defaulting state.

(f) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the interstate commission by petitioning the United States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the interstate commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees.

(3)(a) Upon request by a party state, the interstate commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among party states and between party and nonparty states.

(b) The interstate commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate.

(c) In the event the interstate commission cannot resolve disputes among party states arising under this compact:

(i) The party states may submit the issues in dispute to an arbitration panel, which will be comprised of individuals appointed by the compact administrator in each of the affected party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the compact administrators of all the party states involved in the dispute.

(ii) The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be final and binding.

(4)(a) The interstate commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact.

(b) By majority vote, the interstate commission may initiate legal action in the United States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the interstate commission has its principal offices against a party state that is in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees.

(c) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the interstate commission. The interstate commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. (1) This compact shall become effective and binding on the earlier of the date of legislative enactment of this compact into law by no less than twenty-six states or December 31, 2018. All party states to this compact, that also were parties to the prior nurse licensure compact, superseded by this compact, shall be deemed to have withdrawn from the prior compact within six months after the effective date of this compact.

(2) Each party state to this compact shall continue to recognize a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice in that party state issued under the prior compact until such party state has withdrawn from the prior compact.

(3) Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same. A party state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six months after enactment of the repealing statute.

(4) A party state's withdrawal or termination shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state's licensing board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termination.

(5) Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a nonparty state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this compact.

(6) This compact may be amended by the party states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the laws of all party states.

(7) Representatives of nonparty states to this compact shall be invited to participate in the activities of the interstate commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this compact by all states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the Constitution of any party state or of the United States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held to be contrary to the Constitution of any party state, this compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

The commission may adopt rules to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In screening applicants to obtain or retain a multistate license under section 4 of this act, the commission shall:

(a) Obtain fingerprints from each applicant for a multistate license;

(b) Submit the fingerprints through the state patrol to the federal bureau of investigation for a national criminal history background check;

(c) Receive the results of the federal bureau of investigation national criminal history background check; and

(d) Use the results in making multistate licensure decisions.

(2) The results of the federal bureau of investigation national criminal history background check are confidential. The commission shall not release the results to the public, the interstate commission of nurse licensure compact administrators, or the licensing board of any other state.

(3) Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize the commission to participate in the federal bureau of investigation service, known as rap back, which identifies changes in criminal history record information against retained fingerprints.

(4) For purposes of this section, "multistate license" means the same as defined in section 3 of this act.

Sec. 15. RCW 18.79.030 and 1997 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for a person to practice or to offer to practice as a registered nurse in this state unless that person has been licensed under this chapter or holds a valid multistate license under chapter 18.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 24 of this act). A person who holds a license to practice as a registered nurse in this state may use the titles "registered nurse" and "nurse" and the abbreviation "R.N." No other person may assume those titles or use the abbreviation or any other words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person using them is a registered nurse.

(2) It is unlawful for a person to practice or to offer to practice as an advanced registered nurse practitioner or as a nurse practitioner in this state unless that person has been licensed under this chapter. A person who holds a license to practice as an advanced registered nurse practitioner in this state may use the titles "advanced registered nurse practitioner," "nurse practitioner," and "nurse" and the abbreviations "A.R.N.P." and "N.P." No other person may assume those titles or use those abbreviations or any other words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person using them is an advanced registered nurse practitioner or nurse practitioner.

(3) It is unlawful for a person to practice or to offer to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state unless that person has been licensed under this chapter or holds a valid multistate license under chapter 18.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 24 of this act). A person who holds a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state may use the titles "licensed practical nurse" and "nurse" and the abbreviation "L.P.N." No other person may assume those titles or use that abbreviation or any other words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person using them is a licensed practical nurse.

(4) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person listed as a Christian Science nurse in the Christian Science Journal published by the Christian Science Publishing Society, Boston, Massachusetts, from using the title "Christian Science nurse," so long as such person does not hold himself or herself out as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse, unless otherwise authorized by law to do so.

Sec. 16. RCW 18.130.040 and 2019 c 444 s 11, 2019 c 308 s 18, and 2019 c 55 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(iv) Massage therapists and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vi) Acupuncturists or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;

(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates—advanced, and social work associates—independent clinical under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified or medication assistants endorsed under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xiv) Substance use disorder professionals, substance use disorder professional trainees, or co-occurring disorder specialists certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xv) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvi) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xvii) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;

(xviii) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;

(xix) Recreational therapists under chapter 18.230 RCW;

(xx) Animal massage therapists certified under chapter 18.240 RCW;

(xxi) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;

(xxii) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW;

(xxiii) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290 RCW;

(xxiv) Reflexologists certified under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(xxv) Medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, forensic phlebotomist, and medical assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.360 RCW; and

(xxvi) Behavior analysts, assistant behavior analysts, and behavior technicians under chapter 18.380 RCW.

(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW, licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW, and certifications issued under chapter 18.350 RCW;

(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii) The pharmacy quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The Washington medical commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under that chapter and under chapter 18.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 24 of this act);

(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;

(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW;

(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW; and

(xvi) The board of denturists established in chapter 18.30 RCW.

(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses. The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to conditions.

(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent application of this chapter, the uniform disciplinary act, among the disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning September 1, 2020, and quarterly thereafter, hospitals licensed under this chapter must report the number of individuals employed or privileged by the hospital who hold a multistate nurse license issued by a state other than Washington to the nursing care quality assurance commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. A new section is added to chapter 71.12 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning September 1, 2020, and quarterly thereafter, establishments licensed under this chapter must report the number of individuals employed or privileged by the establishment who hold a multistate nurse license issued by a state other than Washington to the nursing care quality assurance commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. A new section is added to chapter 70.230 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning September 1, 2020, and quarterly thereafter, ambulatory surgical facilities licensed under this chapter must report the number of individuals employed or privileged by the facility who hold a multistate nurse license issued by a state other than Washington to the nursing care quality assurance commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning September 1, 2020, and quarterly thereafter, nursing homes licensed under this chapter must report the number of individuals employed or privileged by the home who hold a multistate nurse license issued by a state other than Washington to the nursing care quality assurance commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning September 1, 2020, and quarterly thereafter, assisted living facilities licensed under this chapter must report the number of individuals employed or privileged by the facility who hold a multistate nurse license issued by a state other than Washington to the nursing care quality assurance commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. A new section is added to chapter 70.127 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning September 1, 2020, and quarterly thereafter, hospice care centers licensed under this chapter must report the number of individuals employed or privileged by the center who hold a multistate nurse license issued by a state other than Washington to the nursing care quality assurance commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning September 1, 2020, and quarterly thereafter, adult family homes licensed under this chapter must report the number of individuals employed by the home who hold a multistate nurse license issued by a state other than Washington to the nursing care quality assurance commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24. Sections 1 through 12 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---