BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.560 and 2019 c 390 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The real and personal property owned or used by a nonprofit entity in providing rental housing for ((very low-income))qualifying households or used to provide space for the placement of a mobile home for a ((very low-income))qualifying household within a mobile home park is exempt from taxation if:

(a) The benefit of the exemption inures to the nonprofit entity;

(b) At least seventy-five percent of the occupied dwelling units in the rental housing or lots in a mobile home park are occupied by a ((very low-income))qualifying household; and

(c) The rental housing or lots in a mobile home park were insured, financed, or assisted in whole or in part through one or more of the following sources:

(i) A federal or state housing program administered by the department of commerce;

(ii) A federal housing program administered by a city or county government;

(iii) An affordable housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105;

(iv) The surcharges authorized by RCW 36.22.178 and 36.22.179 and any of the surcharges authorized in chapter 43.185C RCW; or

(v) The Washington state housing finance commission, provided that the financing is for a mobile home park cooperative or a manufactured housing cooperative, as defined in RCW 59.20.030.

(2) If less than seventy-five percent of the occupied dwelling units within the rental housing or lots in the mobile home park are occupied by ((very low-income))qualifying households, the rental housing or mobile home park is eligible for a partial exemption on the real property and a total exemption of the housing's or park's personal property as follows:

(a) A partial exemption is allowed for each dwelling unit in the rental housing or for each lot in a mobile home park occupied by a ((very low-income))qualifying household.

(b) The amount of exemption must be calculated by multiplying the assessed value of the property reasonably necessary to provide the rental housing or to operate the mobile home park by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number of dwelling units or lots occupied by ((very low-income))qualifying households as of December 31st of the first assessment year in which the rental housing or mobile home park becomes operational or on January 1st of each subsequent assessment year for which the exemption is claimed. The denominator of the fraction is the total number of dwelling units or lots occupied as of December 31st of the first assessment year the rental housing or mobile home park becomes operational and January 1st of each subsequent assessment year for which exemption is claimed.

(3) If a currently exempt rental housing unit ((in a facility with ten units or fewer)) or mobile home lot in a mobile home park ((with ten lots or fewer)) was occupied by a ((very low-income))qualifying household at the time the exemption was granted and the income of the household subsequently rises above ((fifty))sixty percent of the median income but remains at or below eighty percent of the median income, the exemption will continue as long as the housing continues to meet the certification requirements ((of a very low-income housing program)) listed in subsection (1) of this section. For purposes of this section, median income, as most recently determined by the federal department of housing and urban development for the county in which the rental housing or mobile home park is located, shall be adjusted for family size. However, if a dwelling unit or a lot becomes vacant and is subsequently rerented, the income of the new household must be at or below ((fifty))sixty percent of the median income adjusted for family size as most recently determined by the federal department of housing and urban development for the county in which the rental housing or mobile home park is located to remain exempt from property tax.

(4) If at the time of initial application the property is unoccupied, or subsequent to the initial application the property is unoccupied because of renovations, and the property is not currently being used for the exempt purpose authorized by this section but will be used for the exempt purpose within two assessment years, the property shall be eligible for a property tax exemption for the assessment year in which the claim for exemption is submitted under the following conditions:

(a) A commitment for financing to acquire, construct, renovate, or otherwise convert the property to provide housing for ((very low-income))qualifying households has been obtained, in whole or in part, by the nonprofit entity claiming the exemption from one or more of the sources listed in subsection (1)(c) of this section;

(b) The nonprofit entity has manifested its intent in writing to construct, remodel, or otherwise convert the property to housing for ((very low-income))qualifying households; and

(c) Only the portion of property that will be used to provide housing or lots for ((very low-income))qualifying households shall be exempt under this section.

(5) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used exclusively for the purposes for which the exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

(6) The nonprofit entity qualifying for a property tax exemption under this section may agree to make payments to the city, county, or other political subdivision for improvements, services, and facilities furnished by the city, county, or political subdivision for the benefit of the rental housing. However, these payments shall not exceed the amount last levied as the annual tax of the city, county, or political subdivision upon the property prior to exemption.

(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Group home" means a single-family dwelling financed, in whole or in part, by one or more of the sources listed in subsection (1)(c) of this section. The residents of a group home shall not be considered to jointly constitute a household, but each resident shall be considered to be a separate household occupying a separate dwelling unit. The individual incomes of the residents shall not be aggregated for purposes of this exemption;

(b) "Mobile home lot" or "mobile home park" means the same as these terms are defined in RCW 59.20.030;

(c) "Occupied dwelling unit" means a living unit that is occupied by an individual or household as of December 31st of the first assessment year the rental housing becomes operational or is occupied by an individual or household on January 1st of each subsequent assessment year in which the claim for exemption is submitted. If the housing facility is comprised of three or fewer dwelling units and there are any unoccupied units on January 1st, the department shall base the amount of the exemption upon the number of occupied dwelling units as of December 31st of the first assessment year the rental housing becomes operational and on May 1st of each subsequent assessment year in which the claim for exemption is submitted;

(d) "Rental housing" means a residential housing facility or group home that is occupied but not owned by ((very low-income))qualifying households;

(e) "((Very low-income))Qualifying household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below ((fifty))sixty percent of the median income adjusted for family size as most recently determined by the federal department of housing and urban development for the county in which the rental housing is located and in effect as of January 1st of the year the application for exemption is submitted; and

(f) "Nonprofit entity" means a:

(i) Nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code;

(ii) Limited partnership where a nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code, a public corporation established under RCW 35.21.660, 35.21.670, or 35.21.730, a housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030 or 35.82.300, or a housing authority meeting the definition in RCW 35.82.210(2)(a) is a general partner;

(iii) Limited liability company where a nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code, a public corporation established under RCW 35.21.660, 35.21.670, or 35.21.730, a housing authority established under RCW 35.82.030 or 35.82.300, or a housing authority meeting the definition in RCW 35.82.210(2)(a) is a managing member; or

(iv) Mobile home park cooperative or a manufactured housing cooperative, as defined in RCW 59.20.030.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.815 and 2016 c 217 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to qualify for exempt status for any real or personal property under this chapter except personal property under RCW 84.36.600, all foreign national governments; cemeteries; nongovernmental nonprofit corporations, organizations, and associations; hospitals owned and operated by a public hospital district for purposes of exemption under RCW 84.36.040(2); and soil and water conservation districts must file an initial application on or before March 31st with the state department of revenue. However, the initial application deadline for the exemption provided in RCW 84.36.049 is July 1st for 2016 and March 31st for 2017 and thereafter. All applications must be filed on forms prescribed by the department and must be signed by an authorized agent of the applicant.

(2)(a) In order to requalify for exempt status, all applicants except nonprofit cemeteries and nonprofits receiving the exemption under RCW 84.36.049 and nonprofits receiving the exemption under RCW 84.36.560 must file an annual renewal declaration on or before March 31st each year. The renewal declaration must be on forms prescribed by the department of revenue and must contain a statement certifying the exempt status of the real or personal property owned by the exempt organization. This renewal declaration may be submitted electronically in a format provided or approved by the department. Information may also be required with the renewal declaration to assist the department in determining whether the property tax exemption should continue.

(b) In order to requalify for exempt status, nonprofits receiving the exemption under RCW 84.36.560 must file a renewal declaration on or before March 31st of every third year following initial qualification for the exemption. Except for the annual renewal requirement, all other requirements of (a) of this subsection apply.

(3) When an organization acquires real property qualified for exemption or converts real property to exempt status, the organization must file an initial application for the property within sixty days following the acquisition or conversion in accordance with all applicable provisions of subsection (1) of this section. If the application is filed after the expiration of the sixty-day period, a late filing penalty is imposed under RCW 84.36.825.

(4) When organizations acquire real property qualified for exemption or convert real property to an exempt use, the property, upon approval of the application for exemption, is entitled to a property tax exemption for property taxes due and payable the following year. If the owner has paid taxes for the year following the year the property qualified for exemption, the owner is entitled to a refund of the amount paid on the property so acquired or converted.

(5) The department must share approved initial applications for the tax preference provided in RCW 84.36.049 with the joint legislative audit and review committee, upon request by the committee, in order for the committee to complete its review of the tax preference provided in RCW 84.36.049.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---