BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.050 and 2011 c 339 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All recreational and commercial licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle tickets shall be issued under the authority of the commission. The commission shall adopt rules for the issuance of licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle tickets, and for the collection, payment, and handling of license fees, including terms and conditions to govern dealers, and dealer fees. The commission must require a person selling a recreational fishing license to post the uniform resource locator describing where the person purchasing the license may access recreational fishing rules. A transaction fee on commercial and recreational documents issued through an automated licensing system may be set by the commission and collected from licensees. The department may authorize all or part of such fee to be paid directly to a contractor providing automated licensing system services. The department and dealers shall collect and retain dealer fees of at least two dollars for purchase of a standard hunting or fishing recreational license document or commercial license document, except that the commission may set a lower dealer fee for issuance of tags or when a licensee buys a license that involves a stamp or display card format rather than a standard department licensing document form. Dealer fees must be uniform throughout the state.

(2) Until September 1, 2011, the department shall charge an additional transaction fee of ten percent on all recreational licenses, permits, tags, stamps, or raffle tickets. These transaction fees must be deposited into the state wildlife account, created in RCW 77.12.170, for funding fishing and hunting opportunities for recreational license holders.

(3) The application fee is waived for all commercial license documents that are issued through the automated licensing system.

--- END ---