BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2021, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 1001. 2019 c 413 s 1009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Program (30000803)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,455,000 of the amount reappropriated in this section is provided solely for the Byrd Barr place, formerly known as Centerstone, building renovation project.

(2) $220,000 of the amount reappropriated in this section is provided solely for El Centro de la Raza boiler fan and master plan for rehabilitation. This amount is not subject to the match requirements, pursuant to RCW 43.63A.125.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($19,184,000))

$17,990,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,859,000))

$19,665,000

Sec. 1002. 2019 c 413 s 1029 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Housing Trust Fund Program (40000036)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $129,050,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation and (($45,950,000))$42,950,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for production and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $35,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with ((behavioral or)) chronic mental illness. When evaluating applications for this population, the department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that show:

(i) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more health care entities that provide behavioral health care services to individuals eligible for the housing provided under this subsection;

(ii) A commitment by the applicant to provide, directly or through a formal partnership, necessary treatment and supportive services to the tenants and maintain the beds or housing units for at least a forty-year period;

(iii) Readiness to begin structural modifications or construction resulting in a fast project completion;

(iv) Program requirements that adhere to the key elements of permanent supportive housing programs including choice in housing and living arrangements, functional separation of housing and services, community integration, rights of tenancy, and voluntary recovery-focused services; and

(v) To achieve geographic distribution, the department must prioritize projects in rural areas as defined by the department per RCW 43.185.050 and unserved communities with the goal of maximizing the investment and increasing the number of supportive housing units in rural, unserved communities.

(b) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grant awards for modular housing which includes high quality affordable housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. These funds must be awarded to projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $125,000, excluding the value of land, off-site infrastructure costs, and any capitalized reserves, compliant with the Americans with disabilities act, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a fifty year period.

(c) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a state match or state matches on private contributions that fund the production and preservation of affordable housing. Awards must be made using a competitive process. If any funding remains unallocated after the first fiscal year during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department may allocate the remaining funding through its annual competitive process for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations in need of housing.

(d)(i) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively.

(ii) The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment to be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property.

(iii) To allocate preservation funds, the department must review applications and evaluate projects based on the following criteria:

(A) The age of the property, with priority given to buildings that are more than fifteen years old;

(B) The population served, with priority given to projects with at least 50 percent of the housing units being occupied by families and individuals at or below 50 percent area median income;

(C) The degree to which the applicant demonstrates that the improvements will result in a reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both;

(D) The potential for additional years added to the affordability period of the property; and

(E) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(e)(i) $7,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for loans or grants to design and construct ultra-high energy efficient affordable housing projects.

(ii) To receive funding, a project must provide a life-cycle cost analysis report to the department and must demonstrate energy-saving and renewable energy systems either designed to reach net-zero energy use after housing is fully occupied or designed to achieve the most recent building standard of the passive house institute US as of the effective date of this section.

(iii) The department must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following factors in assigning a numerical ranking to a project:

(A) Whether the proposed design has demonstrated that the project will achieve either net-zero energy use when fully occupied or will achieve the most recent building standard of the passive house institute US as of the effective date of this section;

(B) The life-cycle cost of the project;

(C) That the project demonstrates a design, use of materials, and construction process that can be replicated by the Washington building industry;

(D) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds;

(E) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to construction;

(F) Whether the project promotes sustainable use of resources and environmental quality;

(G) Whether the project is being well managed to fund maintenance and capital depreciation;

(H) Reduction of housing and utilities carbon footprint; and

(I) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(iv) The department must monitor and track the results of the housing projects that receive ultra-high energy efficiency funding under this section.

(f) (($45,950,000))$42,950,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

Bellwether Housing (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

Capitol Hill Housing Broadway (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

Crosswalk Teen Shelter and Transitional Housing

Project (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Housing (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

FUSION Emergency Housing for Homeless Families

(Federal Way). . . .$3,000,000

Highland Village (Airway Heights). . . .$5,500,000

Home At Last (Tacoma). . . .(($1,500,000))

$2,500,000

Interfaith Works Shelter (Olympia). . . .$3,000,000

((NorthHaven Affordable Senior Housing Campus

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000))

Pateros Gardens (Pateros). . . .$1,400,000

((Roslyn Housing Project (Roslyn). . . .$2,000,000))

SCIDpda North Lot (Seattle). . . .$9,000,000

((Seattle Indian Health Board - Low Income Housing

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000))

Tenny Creek Assisted Living (Vancouver). . . .$1,750,000

THA Arlington Drive (Tacoma). . . .$800,000

(g) $6,000,000 of the appropriation for Capitol Hill Housing Broadway (Seattle) in (f) of this subsection is provided solely for the purchase of the three south annex properties. The state board for community and technical colleges must transfer the three south annex properties located at 1530 Broadway, 1534 Broadway, and 909 East Pine street in Seattle to Capitol Hill Housing to provide services and housing for homeless youth or young adults for a minimum of fifty years. The transfer agreement between the state board for community and technical colleges and Capitol Hill Housing must specify a mutually agreed transfer date and require Capitol Hill Housing to cover any closing costs with a total purchase price of nine million dollars for all three properties. The contract between the department and Capitol Hill Housing must provide that Capitol Hill Housing will be responsible for maintaining and securing the property until it is developed. The contract must also specify that, if Capitol Hill Housing does not construct at least seventy affordable housing units on the site by 2028, this funding must be fully repaid to the state or the land must revert back to the state.

(h) $57,050,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations in need of housing. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(i) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing for veterans;

(ii) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing that serves people with developmental disabilities;

(iii) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing that serves people who are employed as farmworkers; and

(iv)(A) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership.

(B) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must use a separate application form for applications to provide homeownership opportunities and evaluate homeownership project applications as allowed under chapter 43.185A RCW.

(C) In addition to the definition of "first-time home buyer" in RCW 43.185A.010, for the purposes of awarding homeownership projects during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium "first time home buyer" also includes:

(I) A single parent who has only owned a home with a former spouse while married;

(II) An individual who is a displaced homemaker as defined in 24 C.F.R. Sec. 93.2 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and has only owned a home with a spouse;

(III) An individual who has only owned a principal residence not permanently affixed to a permanent foundation in accordance with applicable regulations; or

(IV) An individual who has only owned a property that is discerned by a licensed building inspector as being uninhabitable.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3)(a) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

(b) By June 30, 2021, the department must report on its web site the following for every previous funding cycle: The number of homeownership and multifamily rental projects funded by housing trust fund moneys; the percentage of housing trust fund investments made to homeownership and multifamily rental projects; and the total number of households being served at up to eighty percent of the area median income, up to fifty percent of the area median income, and up to thirty percent of the area median income, for both homeownership and multifamily rental projects.

(4)(a) The department, in cooperation with the housing finance commission, must develop and implement a process for the collection of certified final development cost data from each grant or loan recipient under this section. The department must use this data as part of its cost containment policy.

(b) Beginning December 1, 2019, and continuing annually, the department must provide the legislature with a report of its final cost data for each project under this section. Such cost data must, at a minimum, include total development cost per unit for each project completed within the past year, descriptive statistics such as average and median per unit costs, regional cost variation, and other costs that the department deems necessary to improve cost controls and enhance understanding of development costs. The department must coordinate with the housing finance commission to identify relevant development costs data and ensure that the measures are consistent across relevant agencies.

(5) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the preservation of affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability, including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing.

(a) Within the amount provided in this subsection (5), the department must implement necessary procedures no later than July 1, 2020, to enable rapid commitment of funds on a first-come, first-served basis to qualifying project proposals that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state.

(b) The department must adhere to the following award terms and procedures for the rapid response program created with this appropriation:

(i) The department shall evaluate applications for funding based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(ii) The funding is not subject to the ninety-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.

(iii) Awards must be in the form of a recoverable grant with a forty-year low income housing covenant on the land.

(iv) If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.

(v) Awards may be used for acquisition, or for acquisition and rehabilitation of, properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond existing use restrictions and keep them in Washington's housing portfolio.

(vi) No single award may exceed $2,500,000, although the department must consider waivers of this award cap if an applicant demonstrates sufficient need. If the department receives simultaneous applications for funding under this program, proposals that reach the greatest public benefit, as defined by the department, must be prioritized. For purposes of this subsection (5), "greatest public benefit" includes, but is not limited to:

(A) The greatest number of units that will be preserved;

(B) Whether the project has federally funded rental assistance tied to it;

(C) The scarcity of the affordable housing applied for compared to the number of available affordable housing units in the same geographic location; and

(D) The program's established funding priorities under RCW 43.185.070(5).

(vii) The award limit in (vi) of this subsection (5) may only be applied to the awards provided under this subsection (5). The amount awarded from this subsection (5) may not be calculated in award limitations for other housing trust fund awards.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($45,950,000))

$52,950,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$129,050,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($175,000,000))

$182,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$480,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($655,000,000))

$662,000,000

Sec. 1003. 2019 c 413 s 1030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Tower Capital Improvements (40000037)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,020,000))

$1,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,311,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($6,331,000))

$6,687,000

Sec. 1004. 2019 c 413 s 1035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Transition 4 (40000042)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burden.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring, and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) $6,107,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grid modernization grants for projects that: Advance clean and renewable energy technologies and transmission and distribution control systems; support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources, and sustainable microgrids; and increase utility customer options for energy sources, energy efficiency, energy equipment, and utility services.

(a) Projects must be implemented by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Priority must be given to: (i) Projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burden; and (ii) projects that have a partner that is a tribe or nonprofit organization that serves community eligible entities. Utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations, businesses, tribes, and nonprofit organizations in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(d) $4,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing shore power electrification at terminal five for the northwest seaport alliance. In order to receive this grant, the northwest seaport alliance must demonstrate that they applied to the VW settlement for this project and were denied.

(6)(a) $8,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies. These grants will be used to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult and coordinate with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the grant program. Clean energy organizations who compete for grants from the program may not participate in the design of the grant program. Criteria for the grant program must include life cycle cost analysis for projects that are part of the competitive process.

(c) The program may include, but is not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, battery components recycling, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(d) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants that enhance the viability of dairy digester bioenergy projects, energy efficiency, and resource recovery to demonstrate advanced nutrient recovery systems that produce value added biofertilizers, reduce trucking of lagoon water, and improve soil health and air and water quality. Grants shall include at least one project east of the Cascades and one project west of the Cascades. State agencies must promote and demonstrate the use of such recovered biofertilizers through state procurement and contracts.

(7)(a) $3,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely as grants to nonprofit lenders to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies by households with high energy burden or environmental health risk now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that will provide matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The department must select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(8) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington Maritime Innovation Center. The center must be used to support technology acceleration and incubation, and act as a focal point for maritime sustainability, including, but not limited to, supporting technology development for maritime decarbonization and electrification.

(9) $8,300,000 of the state taxable construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for scientific instruments to help accelerate research in grid-scale energy storage at the proposed grid-scale energy storage research, development, and testing facility at the Pacific Northwest national laboratory. The state funds are contingent on securing federal funds for the new facility, and are provided as a match to the federal funding. The instruments will support collaborations with the University of Washington and the Washington State University.

(10) $593,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to the port of Grays Harbor for an offshore ocean wave renewable energy demonstration project.

(11) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to the ((Port of)) Skagit county public works department for the Guemes ferry dock shore power charging infrastructure.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,300,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,300,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$192,600,000

Sec. 1005. 2019 c 413 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Behavioral Health Capacity Grants (40000114)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department of commerce must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. The department of commerce may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility or land if the project results in increased capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a fifteen-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.

(5) $47,000,000 is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section:

(a) $4,000,000 is provided solely for at least two enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of patients discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for enhanced adult residential care facilities for long-term placements of dementia discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $4,000,000 is provided solely for at least two facilities with secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) $2,000,000 is provided solely for one or more crisis diversion or stabilization facilities to add sixteen beds in the Spokane region that will address both urban and rural needs, consistent with the settlement agreement in A.B, by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al. and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(e) $5,000,000 is provided solely for at least four mental health peer respite centers that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. No more than one mental health peer respite center should be funded in each of the nine regions;

(f) $8,000,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals, freestanding evaluation and treatment providers, or freestanding psychiatric hospitals to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on ninety-day or one hundred eighty-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the omnibus operating appropriations act for these purposes.

(g) $4,000,000 is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs;

(h) $8,000,000 is provided solely for at least four intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and

(i) $2,000,000 is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions. Consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues.

(6) $1,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state is provided solely for deposit into the revolving fund established in Second Substitute House Bill No. 1528 (recovery support services) for capital improvements. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) (($49,543,000))(a) $47,935,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

CHAS Spokane Behavioral Health. . . .$400,000

((Chelan SUD Design. . . .$206,000

Columbia Valley Community Health Remodel. . . .$31,000))

Colville SUD Facility. . . .$4,523,000

((Community Health of Snohomish County Edmonds. . . .$1,000,000))

DESC Health Clinic. . . .$6,000,000

Detox/Inpatient SUD Building (Centralia). . . .$750,000

Evergreen RC Addiction Treatment Facility for

Mothers (Everett). . . .$2,000,000

HealthPoint Behavioral Health Expansion (Auburn). . . .$1,030,000

Issaquah Opportunity Center (Issaquah). . . .$3,000,000

Jamestown S'Klallam Behavioral Health. . . .$7,200,000

Lynnwood Sea Mar Behavioral Health Expansion. . . .$1,000,000

Nexus Youth and Families. . . .$535,000

North Sound SUD Treatment Facility (Everett). . . .$1,500,000

Oak Harbor Tri-County Behavioral Health. . . .$1,000,000

Peninsula Community Health Services Behavioral

Health Expansion (Bremerton). . . .$1,700,000

Providence Regional Medical Center. . . .$4,700,000

((Sea Mar Community Health Centers Seattle BH

(Seattle). . . .$371,000))

Sedro-Woolley North Sound E&T. . . .$6,600,000

Spokane Crisis Stabilization. . . .$2,000,000

Virginia Mason Acute Stabilization. . . .$2,200,000

Yakima Neighborhood Health Services. . . .$488,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic. . . .$309,000

YVFWC Children's Village. . . .$1,000,000

(b) $3,577,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, except that the following projects are not required to establish new capacity:

Chelan SUD Design. . . .$206,000

Community Health of Snohomish County Edmonds. . . .$1,000,000

The Parkside Place Project (Wenatchee). . . .$2,000,000

Sea Mar Community Health Centers Seattle BH (Seattle). . . .$371,000

(8)(((a) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a contract with MultiCare to provide a mixed-use psychiatric care facility in Auburn. The facility must include twelve to eighteen crisis stabilization beds, sixty commitment beds for short-term stays, and sixty long-term involuntary commitment beds for persons on a ninety-day or one hundred eighty-day civil commitment.

(b) The funding in this subsection is subject to the recipient maintaining and operating the beds for at least thirty years to serve (i) persons who are publicly funded and (ii) persons who are detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(9))) $408,000 is provided solely for the department for the purpose of providing technical assistance for the community behavioral health grants.

(((10)))(9) The department of commerce must notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(((11)))(10) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(((12)))(11) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated within subsection (5) of this section in the manner prescribed. However, if upon review of applications, the department determines, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other behavioral health capacity project categories within subsection (5) of this section, prioritizing projects in unserved areas of the state.

(((13)))(12) The department must provide a progress report by November 1, 2020. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date; and

(c) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($117,951,000))

$98,920,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$99,920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$360,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($477,951,000))

$459,920,000

Sec. 1006. 2019 c 413 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

?al?al "Home" in Lushootseed (Seattle). . . .$947,000

4th Ave. Street Enhancement (White Center). . . .$670,000

Abigail Stuart House (Olympia). . . .$250,000

Aging in PACE Washington (AiPACE) (Preconstruction

activities) (Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Airport Utility Extension (Pullman). . . .$1,626,000

Aquatic and Recreation Center (King County). . . .$1,050,000

Arivva Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Arlington B&G Club Parking Safety (Arlington). . . .$530,000

Asotin Masonic Lodge (Asotin). . . .$62,000

Auburn Arts & Culture Center (Auburn). . . .$500,000

Audubon Center (Sequim). . . .$1,000,000

B&GC of Olympic Peninsula (Port Angeles). . . .$500,000

B&GC of Thurston County (Lacey). . . .$98,000

Ballard Food Bank (Seattle). . . .$750,000

((Battle Ground YMCA (Battle Ground). . . .$500,000))

Beacon Center Renovation (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Bellevue HERO House (Bellevue). . . .$46,000

Benton Co. Museum Building Improvements (Prosser). . . .$103,000

Big Brothers Big Sisters Learning Lab (Olympia). . . .$56,000

Blue Mountain Action Council Comm. Services Center

(Walla Walla). . . .$1,000,000

Bothell Downtown Revitalization (Bothell). . . .$1,500,000

Bowers Field Airport (Ellensburg). . . .$275,000

Boys & Girls Club of Thurston Co. Upgrades (Rochester). . . .$31,000

Boys & Girls Club Roof and Flooring Repairs (Federal Way). . . .$319,000

Brezee Creek Culvert Replacement/East 4th St. Widening

(La Center). . . .$1,500,000

Browns Park Project (Spokane Valley). . . .$536,000

Buffalo Soldiers' Museum (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Camas Washougal Nature Play Area (Washougal). . . .$103,000

Campus Towers (Longview). . . .$228,000

Carbonado Water Source Protection Acquisition

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Carl Maxey Center (Spokane). . . .$350,000

Carlisle Lake Park Improvements (Onalaska). . . .$213,000

Carlyle Housing Facility Upgrades (Spokane). . . .$400,000

Cathlamet Pioneer Center Restoration (Cathlamet). . . .$165,000

Centerville Fire Dept. (Centerville). . . .$216,000

Centerville Grange (Centerville). . . .$90,000

Centralia Fox Theater (Centralia). . . .$1,000,000

Chehalis River Bridge Ped Safety Lighting Ph2 (Aberdeen). . . .$323,000

Cheney Reclaimed Water Project (Cheney). . . .$2,000,000

Chief Kitsap Education and Community Resource Center

(Poulsbo). . . .$1,000,000

Chief Leschi Schools Facilities & Safety Project

(Puyallup). . . .$250,000

Chief Leschi Schools Safety & Security (Puyallup). . . .$250,000

Children's Center Design & Feasibility Study (Vancouver). . . .$400,000

Clymer Museum Remodel Ph2 (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Colfax Pantry Building (Colfax). . . .$247,000

Community Services of Moses Lake Food Bank Facility

(Moses Lake). . . .$2,000,000

Conconully Community Services Complex (Conconully). . . .$515,000

Cosmopolis Elem. Energy & Safety (Cosmopolis). . . .$206,000

Coulee City Medical Clinic (Coulee City). . . .$150,000

Curran House Museum (University Place). . . .$43,000

Dakota Homestead (Seattle). . . .$155,000

Dawson Park Improvements (Tacoma). . . .$258,000

Dayton Pump Station (Edmonds). . . .$515,000

((Dock and Marine Terminal (Seattle). . . .$750,000))

Downtown Park Gateway (Bellevue). . . .$1,030,000

Dungeness River Audubon Center Expansion (Sequim). . . .$500,000

East Blaine Infrastructure (Blaine). . . .$500,000

Ejido Community Farm (Whatcom). . . .$250,000

El Centro de la Raza Federal Way Office (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Enumclaw Aquatic Center (Enumclaw). . . .$258,000

Enumclaw Expo Center Roof (Enumclaw). . . .$250,000

Everett TOD Study (Everett). . . .$200,000

Everett YMCA (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

Evergreen High School Health Center (Vancouver). . . .$388,000

Evergreen Speedway Capital Improvement (Monroe). . . .$150,000

Excelsior Integrated Care Ctr. Sports Court (Spokane). . . .$266,000

Excelsior Roof & Gym Repair (Spokane). . . .$263,000

Excelsior Vocational Education Space (Spokane). . . .$164,000

Expanding on Excellence Capital Campaign (White Salmon). . . .$500,000

Family Education and Support Services (Tumwater). . . .$500,000

Felts Field Gateway Improvement Phase 1 (Spokane). . . .$100,000

Fennel Creek Trailhead (Bonney Lake). . . .$258,000

Filipino Hall Renovation (Wapato). . . .$63,000

Fircrest Pool (Fircrest). . . .$1,000,000

FISH Food Bank (Ellensburg). . . .$772,000

Fishtrap Creek Habitat Improvement (Lynden). . . .$258,000

Flood Plain Stabilization, Habitat Enhancement (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Food Lifeline (Seattle). . . .$1,004,000

Foothills Trail Extension (Wilkeson). . . .$500,000

Fort Steilacoom Park Artificial Turf Infields

(Lakewood). . . .$1,015,000

Fourth Plain Community Commons (Vancouver). . . .$800,000

Garfield Co. Hospital HVAC (Pomeroy). . . .$250,000

Gateway Center (Grays Harbor). . . .$500,000

Gene Coulon Memorial Beach Park Play Equipment

Upgrade (Renton). . . .$618,000

George Community Hall Roof (George). . . .$201,000

George Davis Creek Fish Passage Project (Sammamish). . . .$515,000

Gig Harbor Food Bank (Gig Harbor). . . .$180,000

Goldendale Airport (Goldendale). . . .$550,000

((Grand Connection Downtown Park Gateway (Bellevue). . . .$1,000,000))

Granger Historical Museum Construction (Granger). . . .$150,000

Granite Falls Police Dept. Renovation Project

(Granite Falls). . . .$412,000

Grays Harbor and Willapa Bay Sedimentation (Grays Harbor). . . .$464,000

Grays Harbor YMCA (Grays Harbor). . . .$293,000

Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial (Maple Valley). . . .$102,000

Green Bridges, Healthy Communities; Aurora Bridge I-5

(Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Greenwood Cemetery Restoration (Centralia). . . .$402,000

Greenwood Cemetery Safety Upgrades (Centralia). . . .$91,000

HealthPoint (Tukwila). . . .$1,000,000

HealthPoint Dental Expansion (SeaTac). . . .$1,545,000

Heritage Senior Housing (Chelan). . . .$52,000

High Dune Trail & Conservation Project (Ocean Shores). . . .$140,000

Historic Downtown Chelan Revitalization (Chelan). . . .$52,000

Historic Olympic Stadium Preservation Project (Hoquiam). . . .$515,000

Historical Museum & Community Center Roof Replacement

(Washtucna). . . .$24,000

Historical Society Energy Upgrades (Anderson Island). . . .$14,000

Hoh Tribe Broadband (Grays Harbor). . . .$129,000

Horseshoe Lake ADA Upgrades (Woodland). . . .$82,000

Housing Needs Study (Statewide). . . .$200,000

Howard Bowen Event Complex (Sumas). . . .$1,712,000

Howe Farm Water Service (Port Orchard). . . .$52,000

ICHS Bellevue Clinic Renovation Project (Bellevue). . . .$1,600,000

Illahee Preserve's Lost Continent Acquisition (Bremerton). . . .$335,000

((Ilwaco Boatyard Modernization (Ilwaco). . . .$458,000))

Imagine Children's Museum Expansion and Renovation

(Everett). . . .$2,000,000

Index Water System Design (Index). . . .$23,000

Infrastructure for Economic Development (Port Townsend). . . .$675,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center Phase 1 (Yakima). . . .$500,000

Interactive Educ. Enh./Friends Issaquah Hatchery

(Issaquah). . . .$113,000

Intersection Improvements Juanita Dr. (Kirkland). . . .$750,000

Japanese American Exclusion Memorial (Bainbridge Island). . . .$155,000

Japanese Gulch Daylight Project (Mukilteo). . . .$400,000

Keller House and Carriage House Paint Restoration

(Colville). . . .$45,000

Key Kirkland Sidewalk Repairs (Kirkland). . . .$537,000

Key Peninsula Elder Community (Gig Harbor). . . .$1,000,000

Ki-Be School Parking Lot Improvements (Benton City). . . .$268,000

Kitsap Conservation Study (Kitsap). . . .$51,000

Kittitas Valley Event Center (Ellensburg). . . .$206,000

Klickitat Co. Sheriff Office Training Bldg. (Goldendale). . . .$335,000

KNKX Radio Studio (Tacoma). . . .$824,000

Lacey Veterans Services Hub Facility Renovation (Lacey). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Chelan Community Center (Lake Chelan). . . .$250,000

Lake Chelan Water Supply (Wenatchee). . . .$464,000

Lake City Community Center Replacement (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center Phase II (Lake Stevens). . . .$1,000,000

Lake Sylvia State Park Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$250,000

Lake Wilderness Park Improvements (Maple Valley). . . .$200,000

Land Use & Infrastructure Subarea Plan (Mill Creek). . . .$300,000

Larson Gallery Renovation (Yakima). . . .$875,000

Leffler Park (Manson). . . .$265,000

Legacy in Motion (Puyallup). . . .$1,750,000

Legacy Site Utility Infrastructure (Maple Valley). . . .$154,000

Lewis Co. CHS Pediatric Clinic (Centralia). . . .$84,000

Little Badger Mountain Trailhead (Richland). . . .$464,000

Little Mountain Road Pipeline and Booster Station

(Mount Vernon). . . .$1,300,000

Long Beach Police Department (Long Beach). . . .$705,000

Lopez Island Swim Center (Lopez Island). . . .$1,000,000

Lummi Hatchery Project (San Juan). . . .$1,000,000

Mabton City Park (Mabton). . . .$54,000

Main Street Redevelopment Project - Phase 2

(University Place). . . .$985,000

Mariner Community Campus (Everett). . . .$2,250,000

Mary's Place (Burien). . . .$2,050,000

Marymount Museum/Spana-Park Senior Center (Spanaway). . . .$1,000,000

McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$500,000

McCormick Woods Sewer Lift #2 Improvements (Port Orchard). . . .$800,000

Melanie Dressel Park (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Mercer Is/Aubrey Davis Park Trail Upgrade (Mercer Island). . . .$500,000

Missing & Murdered Indigenous Women Memorial (Toppenish). . . .$49,000

Monroe B&G Club ADA Improvements (Monroe). . . .$464,000

Mountlake Terrace Main Street (Mountlake Terrace). . . .$750,000

Mt. Adams Comm. Forest, Klickitat Canyon Rim Purchase

(Glenwood). . . .$400,000

Mt. Adams School District Athletic Fields (Harrah). . . .$242,000

Mt. Peak Fire Lookout Tower (Enumclaw). . . .$381,000

Mt. Spokane SP Ski Lift (Mead). . . .$750,000

Mukilteo Promenade (Mukilteo). . . .$500,000

Museum Storage Building (Steilacoom). . . .$72,000

Naches Fire/Rescue, Yakima Co. #3 (Naches). . . .$200,000

Naselle HS Music/Vocational Wing (Naselle). . . .$258,000

Naselle Primary Care Clinic (Naselle). . . .$216,000

Naselle SD Flooring (Naselle). . . .$237,000

NCRA Maint. Bldg., Parking Lot, Event Space (Castle Rock). . . .$283,000

NEW Health Programs, Colville Dental Clinic (Colville). . . .$1,250,000

Newman Lake Flood Control Zone District (Newman Lake). . . .$415,000

North Elliott Bay Public Dock; Marine Transit Terminal

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

NorthHaven Affordable Senior Housing Campus (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Northshore Senior Center Rehabilitation Project (Bothell). . . .$500,000

Northwest African American Museum (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Northwest Native Canoe Center (Seattle). . . .$986,000

NW School of Wooden Boatbuilding (Port Hadlock). . . .$464,000

Oak Harbor Marina (Oak Harbor). . . .$400,000

Oakville SD Kitchen Renovation (Oakville). . . .$517,000

Oddfellows Ellensburg Bldg. Restoration (Ellensburg). . . .$267,000

Opening Doors - Permanent Supportive Housing Facility

(Bremerton). . . .$750,000

Orting City Hall and Police Station (Orting). . . .$600,000

Orting Ped Evac Crossing (Orting). . . .$103,000

Othello Regional Water (Othello). . . .$425,000

Outdoors for All (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Pacific Co. Fairgrounds Roof (Menlo). . . .$210,000

Packwood FEMA Floodplain Study (Packwood). . . .$637,000

Pasco Farmers Market & Park (Pasco). . . .$154,000

Pendergast Regional Park Phase II (Bremerton). . . .$50,000

Peninsula Community Health Service Dental Mobile

(Bremerton). . . .$340,000

PenMet - Cushman Trail Enhancements (Gig Harbor). . . .$52,000

PenMet Community Rec Center (Gig Harbor). . . .$173,000

Pet Overpopulation Prevention Vet Clinic Building

(West Richland). . . .$300,000

Pine Garden Apartment Roof (Shelton). . . .$46,000

Pioneer Park Fountain (Walla Walla). . . .$9,000

Pomeroy Booster Pumping Station (Pomeroy). . . .$96,000

Port of Everett (Everett). . . .$300,000

Port of Ilwaco Boatyard Modernization (Ilwaco). . . .$545,000

Port of Willapa Harbor Dredging Support Boat (Tokeland). . . .$180,000

Poulsbo Historical Society (Poulsbo). . . .$400,000

Prairie View Schoolhouse Community Center (Waverly). . . .$57,000

Protect Sewer Plant from Erosion (Ocean Shores). . . .$155,000

Puyallup Culvert Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$515,000

Puyallup Street Frontage Improvement (Puyallup). . . .$258,000

Puyallup VFW Kitchen Renovation (Puyallup). . . .$52,000

Quincy Hospital (Quincy). . . .$300,000

Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$206,000

Recreation Park Renovation (Chehalis). . . .$258,000

Redmond Pool (Redmond). . . .$1,000,000

Renton Trail Connector (Renton). . . .$500,000

Richmond Highland Recreation Center Repairs (Shoreline). . . .$500,000

Rise Together White Center Project (King County). . . .$1,000,000

Ritzville Business & Entrepreneurship Center (Ritzville). . . .$350,000

Rosalia Sewer Improvements (Rosalia). . . .$500,000

Roslyn Downtown Assoc. (Roslyn). . . .$480,000

Roslyn Housing Project (Roslyn). . . .$2,000,000

Royal Park & Rec Ctr. (Royal City). . . .$250,000

Sargent Oyster House Maritime Museum (Allyn). . . .$218,000

Schmid Ballfields Ph3 (Washougal). . . .$584,000

Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex (Woodland). . . .$500,000

Sea Mar Community Health Centers Tumwater Dental

(Olympia). . . .$170,000

Seaport Landing (Aberdeen). . . .$349,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Seattle Goodwill (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Sewage Lagoon Decommissioning (Concrete). . . .$255,000

Shelton Civic Center Parking Lot (Shelton). . . .$283,000

Shoreline Maintenance Facility - Brightwater Site

(Shoreline). . . .$500,000

Skabob House Cultural Center (Shelton). . . .$350,000

Skagit County Sheriff Radios (Skagit). . . .$1,000,000

Skamania Courthouse Plaza (Stevenson). . . .$150,000

Snohomish Carnegie Project (Snohomish). . . .$500,000

Snohomish County Sheriff's Office South Precinct

(Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Snohomish Fire District #26 Communications Project

(Gold Bar). . . .$27,000

Snoqualmie Early Learning Center (Snoqualmie). . . .$500,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Activities Center (North Bend). . . .$412,000

South Fork Snoqualmie Levee Setback Project (North Bend). . . .$250,000

SOZO Sports Indoor Arena (Yakima). . . .$600,000

Spokane Sportsplex (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Springbrook Park Expansion & Clover Creek Restoration

(Lakewood). . . .$773,000

SR 503 Ped/Bike Ph1&2 (Woodland). . . .$235,000

SR 530 "Oso" Slide Memorial (Arlington). . . .$300,000

Stan and Joan Cross Park (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Starfire Sports STEM (Tukwila). . . .$250,000

((Step by Step (Puyallup). . . .$500,000))

Stevens Co. Disaster Response Communications (Colville). . . .$500,000

Sultan Water Treatment Plant Design (Sultan). . . .$246,000

Sumas History Themed Playground and Water Park (Sumas). . . .$288,000

Sunnyside Airport Hangar Maintenance Facility

(Sunnyside). . . .(($500,000))

$750,000

Sunnyside Yakima Valley-TEC Welding Program (Yakima). . . .$26,000

Sunset Multi-Service & Career Development Center

(Renton). . . .$1,000,000

SW WA Dance Center (Chehalis). . . .$62,000

SW WA Fairgrounds (Chehalis). . . .$103,000

SW Washington Regional Agriculture & Innovation Park

(Tenino). . . .$1,500,000

Swede Hall Renovation (Rochester). . . .$196,000

((Tacoma Beacon Center Renovation (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000))

Tacoma Community House (Tacoma). . . .$413,000

Tam O'Shanter Park Circulation & Parking Phase 2

(Kelso). . . .$1,030,000

Tehaleh Slopes Bike Trail (Bonney Lake). . . .$309,000

((Telford Helipad (Creston). . . .$52,000))

Tenino City Hall Renovation (Tenino). . . .$515,000

Terminal 1 Waterfront Development (Vancouver). . . .$4,700,000

The AMP: Aids Memorial Pathway (Seattle). . . .$600,000

The Morck Hotel (Aberdeen). . . .$500,000

Toledo Sewer & Water (Toledo). . . .$469,000

Tonasket Senior Citizen Ctr. (Tonasket). . . .$33,000

Town Center to Burke Gilman Trail Connector

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$500,000

Tukwila Village Food Hall (Tukwila). . . .$400,000

Twin Springs Park (Kenmore). . . .$155,000

Twisp Civic Building & EOC (Twisp). . . .$1,288,000

United Way of Pierce County HVAC (Tacoma). . . .$206,000

University Place Arts (University Place). . . .$34,000

Vertical Evacuation (Ocean Shores). . . .$500,000

Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$123,000

Veterans Supportive Housing (Yakima). . . .$2,500,000

VOA Lynnwood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$1,000,000

Volunteer Park Amphitheater (Seattle). . . .$500,000

West Kelso Affordable Housing & Community Facility Study

(Kelso). . . .$258,000

WA Poison Control IT (Seattle). . . .$151,000

Waitsburg Taggart Road Waterline (Waitsburg). . . .$456,000

Wallula Dodd Water System Improvement (Walla Walla). . . .$1,000,000

Wapato Creek Restoration (Fife). . . .$258,000

Warren Ave. Playfield (Bremerton). . . .$206,000

Washington Park Boat Launch Storm Damage (Anacortes). . . .$200,000

Wesley Homes (Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Westport Dredge Material Use (Westport). . . .$250,000

Whidbey Is. B&G Coupeville (Coupeville). . . .$849,000

Whidbey Is. B&G Oak Harbor (Oak Harbor). . . .$743,000

((White Center Community HUB (Seattle). . . .$500,000))

Wilkeson Water Protection (Wilkeson). . . .$36,000

Willapa BH - Long Beach Safety Improvement Project

(Long Beach). . . .$225,000

William Shore Memorial Pool (Port Angeles). . . .$840,000

Wing Luke Museum Homestead Home (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Wisdom Ridge Business Park (Ridgefield). . . .$2,000,000

Yakima Co. Veterans Dental Facility (Yakima). . . .$469,000

Yakima Valley Fair & Rodeo Multi-Use Facility

(Grandview). . . .$200,000

Yelm Business Incubator Serving Thurston/Pierce

Counties (Yelm). . . .$200,000

Yelm Water Tower (Yelm). . . .$303,000

YMCA Childcare Center Tenant Improvements (Woodinville). . . .$1,000,000

(8) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Oak Harbor to enhance the fiscal sustainability and revenue generation of the city-owned marina through feasibility work, planning, development, and acquisition.

(9) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract for a study regarding both available and needed affordable housing for farmworkers and Native Americans in Washington state. The study must include data to inform policies related to affordable housing for farmworkers and Native Americans and supplement the housing assessment conducted by the affordable housing advisory board created in chapter 43.185B RCW.

(10) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Tacoma buffalo soldiers' museum to conduct a feasibility study for the rehabilitation of building 734, the band barracks at Fort Lawton in Discovery park. The study will provide an assessment of general conditions of building 734 and cost estimates for a comprehensive rehabilitation of the building to meet current building codes including, but not limited to heating, ventilation, air conditioning, and mechanical systems, seismic retrofits, and compliance with the Americans with disabilities act.

(11) $1,300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Skagit public utility district for the Little Mountain Road pipeline and booster station. $1,000,000 of these funds are provided solely for the design phase of the project; $150,000 of these funds are provided solely for land acquisition; and $150,000 of these funds are provided solely to the district for a public outreach effort to solicit input on the project from residents and rate payers.

(12) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section for Roslyn Housing Project is provided solely for a grant to enable Forterra NW, or a wholly-owned subsidiary of Forterra NW, to begin work on a community development project in the city of Roslyn that includes housing, commercial, retail, or governmental uses. The work must include phased preacquisition due diligence, land acquisition or predevelopment engineering, design, testing, and permitting activities, including work done by both the appropriation recipient and third parties retained by the recipient.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($162,793,000))

$162,283,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($162,793,000))

$162,283,000

Sec. 1007. 2019 c 413 s 1043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Washington Broadband Program (40000117)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511 (broadband service). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.))

(2) The funding in this section is provided solely for grants, loans, and administrative expenses related to implementation of the broadband program. Of the total funds:

(a) (($14,440,000))$10,775,000 is provided solely for loans. Moneys attributable to appropriations of state bond proceeds may not be expended for loans to nongovernmental entities.

(b) (($7,110,000))$10,775,000 is provided solely for grants.

(((4)))(3) By January 1, 2021, in the first report to the legislature required under section 6 of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511 (broadband service), the governor's statewide broadband office must include a list of potential regional projects that will accelerate broadband access by providing connections to local jurisdictions, with recommendations for how to fund such larger scale projects. This list must be developed within existing resources.

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$21,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$101,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021 Local and Community Projects (40000130)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

?a?al Chief Seattle Club (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Academy Smokestack Preservation (Vancouver). . . .$103,000

African Refugee & Immigrant Housing (Tukwila). . . .$200,000

AG Tour Train Ride (Reardan). . . .$125,000

ASUW Shell House (WWI Hanger/Canoe House) (Seattle). . . .$100,000

Ballinger Park - Hall Creek Restoration

(Mountlake Terrace). . . .$200,000

Bethel High School Pierce College Annex Campus (Graham). . . .$300,000

Brewing Malting & Distilling System (Tumwater). . . .$112,000

Cathlamet Pioneer Center Restoration (Cathlamet). . . .$55,000

Centro Cultural Mexicano (Redmond). . . .$80,000

City of Fircrest Meter Replacement (Fircrest). . . .$200,000

Columbia Dance Down Payment for Building

Purchase (Vancouver). . . .$100,000

Columbia Heritage Museum Repairs (Ilwaco). . . .$150,000

Community Hub Public Safety Initiative (Walla Walla). . . .$200,000

Community Pedestrian Safety (SeaTac). . . .$100,000

Conconully Fire & Rescue (Riverside). . . .$179,000

Creative Districts (Statewide). . . .$200,000

EL 79.2 Distribution System Design (Othello). . . .$175,000

El Centro de la Raza (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Emergency Lockdown Shelter for Outdoor

Preschool (Various). . . .$24,000

Emergency Shelter Project (Skykomish). . . .$20,000

Emergency Structural Repairs 1902 Van Marter

Building (Lind). . . .$25,000

Everett Recovery Cafe Renovation Project (Everett). . . .$200,000

Filipino Community Center (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

George Schmid Ball Field #3 and Lighting

Phase 3 (Washougal). . . .$200,000

Harlequin State Theater (Olympia). . . .$88,000

Home At Last (Tacoma). . . .$200,000

If You Could Save Just One (Spokane). . . .$100,000

Index Water Line Replacement and Repair (Index). . . .$105,000

Institute for Community Leadership (Kent). . . .$46,000

Islands' Oil Spill Association (Friday Harbor). . . .$232,000

Issaquah School District Early Learning Center (Issaquah). . . .$155,000

King County Emergency Training Facility (Fall City). . . .$1,000,000

Kingston Coffee Oasis (Kingston). . . .$150,000

Kitsap Filipino American Community Center (Bremerton). . . .$93,000

Lacey Food Bank (Lacey). . . .$193,000

Lake Washington Loop Trail Bicycle Safety

Improvements (Kenmore). . . .$200,000

Magnuson Park Center for Excellence Building 2

(Seattle). . . .$78,000

Morrow Manor (Poulsbo). . . .$250,000

Mount Zion Housing (Seattle). . . .$250,000

Mukilteo Solar Panels (Mukilteo). . . .$40,000

New Arcadia (Auburn). . . .$100,000

New Beginnings House (Puyallup). . . .$150,000

Non-motorized Bridge at Bothell Landing (Bothell). . . .$155,000

Port of Quincy Intermodal Terminal Infrastructure

(Quincy). . . .$100,000

Port Susan Trail (Stanwood). . . .$200,000

Puyallup Food Bank Facility Expansion (Puyallup). . . .$217,000

Puyallup VFW Orting Civil War Medal of Honor

Monument (Orting). . . .$7,000

Ramstead Regional Park (Everson). . . .$200,000

Redondo Fishing Pier (Des Moines). . . .$275,000

Replacement Hospice House (Richland). . . .$200,000

Restroom Renovation (Ilwaco). . . .$35,000

Ridgefield Library Building Project (Ridgefield). . . .$500,000

Safety Driven Replacement (Lake Stevens). . . .$125,000

Salvation Army Community Resource Center (Yakima). . . .$200,000

School and Transit Connector Sidewalk (Kirkland). . . .$120,000

School District & Comm. Emergency Preparedness Center

(Carbonado). . . .$200,000

Shelton-Mason County YMCA (Shelton). . . .$200,000

Shore Aquatic Center Expansion (Port Angeles). . . .$200,000

Sign Reinstallation at Maplewood Elementary (Puyallup). . . .$5,000

Sky Valley Emergency Generators (Sultan). . . .$75,000

Sno Valley Kiosk (North Bend). . . .$20,000

Snohomish Boys and Girls Club (Snohomish). . . .$125,000

Snoqualmie Valley Shelter Service Resource

(Snoqualmie). . . .$200,000

South Yakima Conservation District Groundwater

Mgmt. (Yakima). . . .$45,000

Spokane Sportsplex (Spokane). . . .$200,000

Spokane Valley Museum (Spokane Valley). . . .$70,000

Stevens Elementary Solar Panels (Seattle). . . .$120,000

Sullivan Park Waterline Installation (Spokane Valley). . . .$130,000

Trail Lighting - Cross Kirkland Corridor (Kirkland). . . .$200,000

Transitions TLC Transitional Housing Renovations

(Spokane). . . .$100,000

Triumph Treatment Child Care & Behavioral Health

Exp. (Yakima). . . .$180,000

Vashon Food Bank Site Relocation (Vashon). . . .$36,000

Vashon Youth and Family Services (Vashon). . . .$86,000

Washington State Horse Park and Covered Arena

(Ellensburg). . . .$375,000

Wenatchee Valley Museum and Cultural Center

(Wenatchee). . . .$200,000

Yakima County Care Campus Conversion Project (Yakima). . . .$275,000

(8) It is the intent of the legislature that future applications for state funding for the ASUW Shell House be made through competitive grant programs.

(9) The Creative Districts program funded in this section shall be administered by the Washington state arts commission. The commission is authorized to use up to three percent of the funds to administer the program.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,554,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Seattle Vocational Institute (40000136)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Enhanced Shelter Capacity Grants (92000939)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to eligible organizations under RCW 43.185.060 to rapidly shelter individuals experiencing homelessness through the construction of enhanced homeless shelter facilities and the conversion of existing homeless shelters to enhanced shelters. The department must allocate funding to eligible organizations based on the proportional share of chronically homeless individuals, based on the most recent homeless census, in the county primarily served by the eligible organization.

(2) Of the amount appropriated in this section, for the proportional share of funding allocated to a county with a population over one million five hundred thousand, an amount proportional to the share of chronically homeless individuals in the largest city in the county must be provided to eligible organizations primarily serving homeless individuals in the largest city in the county to construct enhanced homeless shelter facilities or convert existing homeless shelters to enhanced shelters.

(3) For purposes of this section, "enhanced shelters" means shelters that offer extended service hours and provide common areas necessary to the intended population.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

Sec. 1011. 2019 c 413 s 1051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Stormwater Pilot Project (91001099)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($200,000))

$171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($250,000))

$221,000

Sec. 1012. 2019 c 413 s 1059 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Youth & Families (92000227)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1079, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($19,377,000))

$18,165,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($19,677,000))

$18,465,000

Sec. 1013. 2019 c 413 s 1065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Landlord Mitigation Account (92000722)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5600 (residential tenants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

(2) $1,000,000))$1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section shall be deposited in the landlord mitigation program account.

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$1,500,000

Sec. 1014. 2019 c 413 s 1033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Community Economic Revitalization Board (40000040)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
(($8,600,000))

$18,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$34,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($43,000,000))

$53,000,000

Sec. 1015. 2019 c 413 s 1073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-Term Management Planning (30000740)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for an environmental impact statement that includes the following alternatives, at a minimum:

(a) Managed lake;

(b) Hybrid lake; and

(c) Estuary.

(2) A draft environmental impact statement with at least the three options in subsection (1) of this section must be submitted to legislative fiscal committees by June 30, 2021. It is the intent of the legislature that a final environmental impact statement that includes identification of a preferred alternative for Capitol Lake management must be submitted to legislative fiscal committees by June 30, 2022.

(3) The ((reappropriation is))appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1034, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,369,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,165,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$284,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,449,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$881,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,250,000))

$6,699,000

Sec. 1016. 2019 c 413 s 1078 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

((Enterprise Services Account—State
. . . .
$207,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,246,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State
. . . .
$79,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($3,532,000))

$3,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($368,000))

$261,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,900,000))

$3,586,000

Sec. 1017. 2019 c 413 s 1090 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Newhouse Replacement (92000020)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The final predesign for the Irv Newhouse building replacement must be submitted to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by September 30, 2020, and the department must consult with the leadership of the senate or their designee(s).

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for schematic design and construction of the Irv Newhouse building replacement for the senate, located on the west block of opportunity site six. The schematic design must assume:

(a) Necessary program space required to support senate offices and support functions;

(b) An evaluation of an additional floor to be included for legislative support services;

(c) A building with a façade similar to the American neoclassical style of existing legislative buildings on capitol campus;

(d) Member offices of similar size as member offices in the John A. Cherberg building;

(e) Design and construction of a high performance building that meets net-zero-ready standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than thirty-five;

(f) Building construction that must be procured using a performance-based method, such as design-build, and must include an energy performance guarantee comparing actual performance data with the energy design target;

(g) Temporary office space on Capitol Campus, modular space is an option, to be used during the construction of the building;

(h) At least bi-monthly consultation with the leadership of the senate, or their designee(s), and Irv Newhouse tenants;

(i) A draft schematic draft design for the Irv Newhouse building replacement must be submitted to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by January 31, 2021; and

(j) The final schematic design for the Irv Newhouse building replacement must be submitted to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by June 30, 2021.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature that construction documents for the Irv Newhouse building replacement must be submitted to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by November 1, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$256,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$30,330,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($450,000))

$34,150,000

Sec. 1018. 2019 c 413 s 1092 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Insurance Commissioner Office Building Predesign (92000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a predesign study to determine space needs and cost estimates to construct a building on the capitol campus to house the office of the insurance commissioner and the department of children, youth, and families.

(1) In determining the program space required, the predesign must consider:

(a) The necessary program space required to support the office of the insurance commissioner and the department of children, youth, and families, to include detail on current space usage in Thurston county by facility compared to proposed space usage; and

(b) Parking impacts of new office space construction.

(2) The study must consider, at a minimum:

(a) The potential to fund design and construction of the building from sources other than state general obligation bonds;

(b) The financial cost analysis of current facility leases compared to the cost of a financial contract for the new building, to include operating budget cost impacts by fund source by fiscal year; and

(c) The following opportunity sites for the building, detailed in the 2017 state capitol development site study:

(i) Site 1, the general administration building;

(ii) Site 12, the professional arts building; and

(iii) ((Site 7, the old IBM building; and

(iv))) Site 6B, the visitor center;

(3) The building must be a:

(a) High performance building and meet net-zero-ready standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than thirty-five;

(b) Building construction that must be procured using a performance-based method such as design-build and must include an energy performance guarantee comparing actual performance data with the energy design target; and

(c) Design that includes cross-laminated timber products.

(4) The predesign study must result in:

(a) A preliminary report being submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by February 28, 2020; and

(b) A final report being submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2020.

Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Chamber Skylights in the Legislative Building (92000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for schematic design for the restoration of the legislative skylight openings that are located above the house of representatives and senate chambers, to include work on the bronze ceiling laylight, skylight attic, roof and skylight system, and chamber acoustics. The schematic design must be submitted to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by January 1, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$73,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$573,000

Sec. 1020. 2019 c 413 s 1093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

King County Area Readiness Center (30000592)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to acquire land in King county for a readiness center and to complete a predesign. If the department has not signed a purchase and sale agreement by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse. The department must work to secure federal funding to cover a portion of the costs for design and construction.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,600,000))

$7,055,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($83,900,000))

$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($90,500,000))

$7,055,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 2001. 2019 c 413 s 2001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (40000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($470,000))

$938,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($470,000))

$938,000

Sec. 2002. 2019 c 413 s 2002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

L&I HQ Elevators (30000018)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
(($342,000))

$366,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
(($342,000))

$366,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($684,000))

$732,000

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($350,000))

$302,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,934,000

Sec. 2003. 2019 c 413 s 2010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide (30001859)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($600,000))

$612,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($855,000))

$843,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School - Multiple Buildings: Roofing Replacement & Repairs (30002752)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School - Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)

It is the intent of the legislature to further the recommendations of the December 2019 report from the William D. Ruckleshaus center to redesign the intermediate care facility of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center to function as short-term crisis stabilization and intervention. As a result, $2,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to relocate the adult training program to a different location on the fircrest rehabilitation center campus to facilitate construction of a one hundred bed nursing facility. The department of social and health services must review all alternatives for the permanent relocation of the adult training program, including repurposing the existing nursing facility buildings once residents have been relocated to the new nursing facility, and report their findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island - Main Dock: Float and Dolphin Replacement (30003234)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,085,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,085,000

Sec. 2007. 2019 c 413 s 2030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

(2) The department shall work with the city of Shoreline on the future siting of a nursing facility.

(3) The department may enter into a lease with the city of Shoreline for open space and other uses to generate revenue for the benefit of the persons served by the Dan Thompson memorial trust account consistent with the provisions of RCW 71A.20.170.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

Sec. 2008. 2019 c 413 s 2037 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000381)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,665,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($11,015,000))

$11,620,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,680,000))

$13,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$159,345,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($172,025,000))

$172,630,000

Sec. 2009. 2019 c 413 s 2038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000382)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$955,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($965,000))

$1,800,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,920,000))

$2,755,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($25,920,000))

$26,755,000

Sec. 2010. 2019 c 413 s 2039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DSHS & DCYF Fire Alarms (91000066)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects installing fire alarms at the following locations: (a) Fircrest School; (b) Lakeland Village; (c) Western State Hospital; (d) Rainier School; and (e) Echo Glen. The Echo Glen project may include duress alarms. ((The projects listed in this section must be designed under one contract, and installed under one contract.)) The department must consult with the department of children, youth, and families to prioritize the projects.

(2) When the ((bid is))bids are received, the department must report to the appropriate legislative committees the overall ((bid))bids for the projects.

(3) The department must report to the appropriate legislative committees any best practices on the process by December 31, 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,819,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,819,000

Sec. 2011. 2019 c 413 s 2041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital Elevators (91000068)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
(($2,700,000))

$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$700,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,700,000

Sec. 2012. 2019 c 413 s 2072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

A total of $200,000 of the model toxics control act account—state is provided solely for soil mitigation associated with removal of an underground storage tank and must be held in unallotted status until the following conditions are met:

(1) The department must pursue a grant for this project from the pollution liability insurance agency.

(2) If this project is deemed unqualified for the use of funds through the pollution liability insurance agency, the appropriation from the model toxics control act account—state shall be allotted to the department to complete this project.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($570,000))

$755,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,025,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,743,000))

$2,558,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,445,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($16,783,000))

$16,983,000

Sec. 2013. 2019 c 413 s 2075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Retsil Building 10 (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($125,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($750,000))

$625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSH - Life Safety Grant (40000013)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$325,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$175,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, & FAMILIES

Green Hill School: Baker Living Unit Renovation & Remodel (40000529)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,363,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,513,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, & FAMILIES

Naselle Youth Camp - Eagle Lodge: Medical, Dental & Social Services (30002758)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,519,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,719,000

Sec. 2017. 2019 c 413 s 2080 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School-Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($800,000))

$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$31,162,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($800,000))

$32,962,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, & FAMILIES

Naselle Youth Camp - Moolock Lodge: Remodel & Renovation (40000430)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,469,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,619,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, & FAMILIES

Echo Glen Cottage 4 Remodel & Renovation (40000526)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,187,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,337,000

Sec. 2020. 2019 c 413 s 2084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Implementation of JRA Capacity (91000062)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for ((a predesign for Echo Glen, a predesign for Green Hill, and)) a comprehensive strategic capital master plan. ((If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1646 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($750,000))

$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($750,000))

$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Perimeter Wall Renovation (30000117)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,135,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,135,000

Sec. 2022. 2019 c 413 s 2091 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: Bldg E Roof Replacement (30000810)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,674,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,022,000))

$586,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,696,000))

$2,260,000

Sec. 2023. 2019 c 413 s 2093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Program and Support Building (30001101)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($10,085,000))

$9,997,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,585,000))

$11,497,000

Sec. 2024. 2019 c 413 s 2094 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Prison Capacity Expansion (30001105)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2059, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,400,000))

$1,957,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,800,000))

$2,357,000

Sec. 2025. 2019 c 413 s 2096 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC ADA Compliance Retrofit (30001118)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($250,000))

$171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$921,000

Sec. 2026. 2019 c 413 s 2098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC Security Electronics Network Renovation (30001124)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($100,000))

$36,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($6,000,000))

$5,936,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Clinic Roof Replacement (40000180)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,439,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,439,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: SOU and TRU - Domestic Water and HVAC Piping System (40000246)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The predesign must compare the benefits of addressing each system as part of a single project with the benefits of addressing each system as a separate project in design and construction phases.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$19,731,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,131,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 3001. 2019 c 413 s 3008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($3,813,000))

$3,531,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($71,296,000))

$71,578,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,109,000

Sec. 3002. 2019 c 413 s 3009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and section 3002, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($324,000))

$318,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($38,710,000))

$38,716,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,034,000

Sec. 3003. 2019 c 413 s 3011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($19,152,000))

$18,603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($43,712,000))

$44,261,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,864,000

Sec. 3004. 2019 c 413 s 3016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($3,526,000))

$2,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($46,474,000))

$47,716,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

Sec. 3005. 2019 c 413 s 3022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($1,940,000))

$1,843,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($23,115,000))

$23,212,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,055,000

Sec. 3006. 2019 c 413 s 3023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($169,000))

$168,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($7,431,000))

$7,432,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,600,000

Sec. 3007. 2019 c 413 s 3026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($10,710,000))

$10,489,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($51,827,000))

$52,048,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,537,000

Sec. 3008. 2019 c 413 s 3028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The reappropriations and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations and appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,171,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($3,436,000))

$2,647,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($17,893,000))

$18,682,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,500,000

Sec. 3009. 2019 c 413 s 3030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($8,908,000))

$8,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($992,000))

$1,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,900,000

Sec. 3010. 2019 c 413 s 3031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The reappropriations and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations and appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,967,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($15,786,000))

$12,927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($19,994,000))

$22,853,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$52,747,000

Sec. 3011. 2019 c 413 s 3032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000490)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($672,000))

$519,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,328,000))

$1,481,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

Sec. 3012. 2019 c 413 s 3034 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
(($27,816,000))

$26,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,384,000))

$4,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,200,000

Sec. 3013. 2019 c 413 s 3036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($19,149,000))

$19,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($16,411,000))

$16,191,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,560,000

Sec. 3014. 2019 c 413 s 3038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($7,917,000))

$7,885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($6,464,000))

$6,496,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,381,000

Sec. 3015. 2019 c 413 s 3052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Remedial Action Grants (30000707)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($5,877,000))

$5,872,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($0))

$5,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,877,000

Sec. 3016. 2019 c 413 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
(($12,203,000))

$12,250,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,541,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($33,744,000))

$33,791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($56,000))

$9,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,800,000

Sec. 3017. 2019 c 413 s 3062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (30000749)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($2,099,000))

$1,310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($83,000))

$872,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,182,000

Sec. 3018. 2019 c 413 s 3064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000796)

The reappropriations and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation and appropriation are subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
(($11,400,000))

$11,334,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($0))

$66,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,400,000

Sec. 3019. 2019 c 413 s 3081 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000144)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Appropriations in this section are provided solely for competitive grants to local governments implementing projects that reduce the impacts of stormwater on Washington state's waters.

(2) $29,750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants directed to areas of Puget Sound that will benefit southern resident killer whales.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
(($44,000,000))

$47,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($204,000,000))

$207,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2020 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000286)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2020 Remedial Action Grants (40000288)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$23,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,700,000

Sec. 3022. 2019 c 413 s 3096 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$47,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,802,000))

$2,398,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,849,000))

$2,445,000

Sec. 3023. 2019 c 413 s 3097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($304,000))

$179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($8,966,000))

$9,091,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,270,000

Sec. 3024. 2019 c 413 s 3069 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reduce Air Pollution from Transit/Sch. Buses/State-Owned Vehicles (40000109)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3010, chapter 298, Laws of 2018, except funds directed to the Northwest seaport alliance for a clean truck fund, in subsection (6), may also be used for Northwest seaport alliance to provide shore power electrification to vessels in Tacoma.

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$26,483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,917,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (30000704)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2424 or Substitute Senate Bill No. 6256 (heating oil insurance program). If neither of these bills is enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,000,000

Sec. 3026. 2019 c 413 s 3115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - WW1 Historic Facilities Preservation (30000100)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,091,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,295,000))

$1,582,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,963,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,349,000))

$4,636,000

Sec. 3027. 2019 c 413 s 3119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Marine Facilities - Various Locations Moorage Float Replacement (30000496)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($458,000))

$349,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($569,000))

$460,000

Sec. 3028. 2019 c 413 s 3120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Willapa Hills Trail Develop Safe Multi-Use Trail Crossing at SR 6 (30000519)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($25,000))

$79,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,961,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($397,000))

$343,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,383,000

Sec. 3029. 2019 c 413 s 3123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Expansion (30000709)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($551,000))

$583,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,793,000))

$4,761,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,344,000

Sec. 3030. 2019 c 413 s 3129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Replace Failing Sewer Lines (30000860)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,493,000))

$1,668,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,061,000))

$886,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,554,000

Sec. 3031. 2019 c 413 s 3131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$959,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($141,000))

$121,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,100,000))

$1,080,000

Sec. 3032. 2019 c 413 s 3132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Birch Bay - Replace Failing Bridge (30000876)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($237,000))

$148,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($337,000))

$248,000

Sec. 3033. 2019 c 413 s 3135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way (30000959)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,921,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($587,000))

$520,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,508,000))

$2,441,000

Sec. 3034. 2019 c 413 s 3137 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Depression Era Structures Restoration Assessment (30000966)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,086,000))

$1,050,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,272,000))

$1,236,000

Sec. 3035. 2019 c 413 s 3141 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000977)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($402,000))

$537,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($647,000))

$512,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,049,000

Sec. 3036. 2019 c 413 s 3143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works—Program (30000979)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$646,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($845,000))

$620,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,491,000))

$1,266,000

Sec. 3037. 2019 c 413 s 3144 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Moran Summit Learning Center - Interpretive Facility (30000980)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($903,000))

$955,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($112,000))

$60,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,015,000

Sec. 3038. 2019 c 413 s 3145 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Penrose Point Sewer Improvements (30000981)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($320,000))

$367,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$289,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($130,000))

$83,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($450,000))

$739,000

Sec. 3039. 2019 c 413 s 3149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Septic System Renovation (30001017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($185,000))

$177,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($250,000))

$242,000

Sec. 3040. 2019 c 413 s 3150 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electrical System Renovation (30001018)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($288,000))

$267,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($750,000))

$729,000

Sec. 3041. 2019 c 413 s 3151 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - ADA Compliance (30000985)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($467,000))

$784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($533,000))

$216,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

Sec. 3042. 2019 c 413 s 3152 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide New Park (30001019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($267,000))

$313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($46,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,006,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,319,000

Sec. 3043. 2019 c 413 s 3153 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden Replace Failing Water Lines (30001022)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($214,000))

$339,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($163,000))

$38,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,013,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,390,000

Sec. 3044. 2019 c 413 s 3156 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Fish Barrier Removal (40000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($53,000))

$194,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($247,000))

$106,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse to Cascades Trail: Crab Creek Trestle Replacement (40000162)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

Sec. 3046. 2019 c 413 s 3204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Revisions to the recreation and conservation funding board approved list of projects for the 2019-2021 biennium, including the addition of projects and the transfer of funds between projects, are allowed but must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature for review and comment, and must include an explanation of variances from the proposed projects. Any project revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from this appropriation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,000,000

Sec. 3047. 2019 c 413 s 3223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Match for Federal RCPP (40000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a state match to the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership.

(2) The commission must, to the greatest extent possible, leverage other state and local projects in funding the match and development of the regional conservation partnership program grant applications.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$6,249,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,800,000))

$14,049,000

Sec. 3048. 2019 c 413 s 3232 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas 2017-19 (92000012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3052, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,200,000))

$3,199,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$3,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program 2017-19 (92000014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6019, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

Sec. 3050. 2019 c 413 s 3236 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,900,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for repair of the Wiley Slough dike.))

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$863,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,680,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$13,943,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$72,421,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$58,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$158,364,000

Sec. 3051. 2019 c 413 s 3242 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,800,000 of the new appropriation is provided solely for the installation of a water filtration system.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,555,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,710,000))

$3,510,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,144,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($3,031,000))

$1,136,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($16,440,000))

$16,345,000

Sec. 3052. 2019 c 413 s 3247 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Springs Production Shift (30000723)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,400,000))

$1,546,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,670,000))

$2,524,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,070,000

Sec. 3053. 2019 c 413 s 3252 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Snow Creek Reconstruct Facility (30000826)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: In constructing the project, the department must consider the firelight toilet technology.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($75,000))

$68,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,794,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,037,000))

$5,030,000

Sec. 3054. 2019 c 413 s 3253 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Forks Creek Hatchery - Renovate Intake and Diversion (30000827)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,423,000))

$2,577,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,086,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,000))

$198,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,511,000))

$5,861,000

Sec. 3055. 2019 c 413 s 3254 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($200,000))

$177,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($800,000))

$777,000

Sec. 3056. 2019 c 413 s 3255 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($315,000))

$276,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,445,000))

$5,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wiley Slough Dike Raising (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$972,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,183,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,155,000

Sec. 3058. 2019 c 413 s 3274 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forestry Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (30000279)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($400,000))

$520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,100,000))

$2,980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

Sec. 3059. 2019 c 413 s 3275 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway Working Forest (30000289)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($600,000))

$675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($881,000))

$663,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,481,000))

$1,338,000

Sec. 3060. 2019 c 413 s 3294 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (40000052)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,500,000))

$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($22,500,000))

$23,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Grouse Ridge Fish Barriers & RMAP Compliance (40000056)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,245,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,694,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,939,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Emergent Environmental Mitigation Projects (40000058)

Forest Development Account—State
. . . .
$92,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State
. . . .
$93,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$135,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Whitmarsh (March Point) Landfill Site Cleanup (40000069)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,063,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,063,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2019 c 413 s 3099 (uncodified); and

(2) 2019 c 413 s 3296 (uncodified).

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Telford Helipad (40000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

Sec. 5001. 2019 c 413 s 5012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance Level (40000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,005,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$879,021,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($160,032,000))

$211,883,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$3,840,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,042,053,000))

$1,094,744,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,870,192,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,912,245,000))

$5,964,936,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Seismic Safety Retrofit Program (92000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $13,200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for school seismic safety retrofit grants to school districts for seismic retrofits and seismic safety related improvements of school buildings used for the instruction of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade.

(a) The superintendent of public instruction must appoint an advisory committee, which must include at least one representative from the department of natural resources, whose members have experience in seismic engineering and construction to assist the office in designing the grant application process, developing the prioritization criteria, and evaluating the grant applications. Advisory committee members may not be involved in developing projects or applying for grants funded in this section.

(b) In addition to prioritization criteria developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the advisory committee pursuant to (a) of this subsection, the superintendent of public instruction and the advisory committee must also prioritize projects that: (i) Are located in areas of high seismic risk; (ii) have ten or more years of remaining useful life; and (iii) meet the criteria to participate in the school construction assistance program except in cases where low property values prevent a school district from generating sufficient local revenue.

(c) The superintendent of public instruction must submit a list of school seismic safety retrofit projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee, to the legislature by January 15, 2021. The list must include: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $4,000,000; (iii) estimated total project costs; and (iv) local funding resources. The appropriated funds in this subsection may be awarded only after the legislature approves the list.

(2) For projects in this section that are also eligible for funding through the school construction assistance program, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite and streamline the administrative requirements, timelines, and matching requirements for the funds provided in this section to be used promptly. Funds provided in this section plus state funds provided in the school construction assistance program grant may not exceed total project costs minus available local resources.

(3) $1,800,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants to school districts to perform rapid visual screening assessments of school buildings constructed prior to January 1, 1997, and used for the instruction of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must enter the collected assessment data into its information and condition of schools data system.

(4) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, if upon review of applications the superintendent of public instruction determines there are not adequate suitable projects under subsection (3) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction may use any remaining funds from subsection (3) of this section for seismic safety retrofit grants in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction must, by December 31, 2020, submit recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature, in the form of draft legislation, that specifies the eligibility criteria for awards.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$120,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$135,000,000

Sec. 5003. 2019 c 413 s 5028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Small District Modernization Grants (92000139)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature finds that small school districts with total enrollments of one thousand students or less may have school facilities with significant building systems deficiencies and low property values, and that raising enough funds to participate in the school construction assistance program to replace or modernize their school facilities would present an extraordinary tax burden on property owners or would exceed allowable debt.

(2) $200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer the grant program and provide technical assistance to small school districts seeking grants funded in this section.

(3) (($1,000,000))$957,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts interested in seeking modernization grants in subsection (4) of this section. The superintendent may prioritize planning grants for school districts with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district.

(4) The remaining portion of the appropriation is provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts with significant building system deficiencies and limited financial capacity with the following conditions:

(a) The superintendent of public instruction must appoint an advisory committee whose members have experience in financing and managing school facilities in small school districts to assist the office in designing the grant application process, developing the prioritization criteria, and evaluating the grant applications. Advisory committee members may not be involved in developing projects or applying for grants funded in this section.

(b) In addition to prioritization criteria developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the advisory committee pursuant to (4)(a) of this section, the office and the advisory committee must also prioritize projects that: (i) Improve student health, safety, and academic performance for the largest number of students; (ii) provide the most available school district resources, including in-kind resources; and (iii) make use of mass-timber products, including cross-laminated timber, or aggregates and concretes materials.

(c) The superintendent must submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee, to the legislature by January 15, 2020. The list must include: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $5,000,000; (iii) estimated total project costs; and (iv) local funding resources. The appropriated funds in this subsection may be awarded ((only after the legislature approves the list))to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. 2020-51, developed February 12, 2020.

(5) For projects in this section that are also eligible for funding through the school construction assistance program, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite and streamline the administrative requirements, timelines, and matching requirements for the funds provided in this section to be used promptly. Funds provided in this section plus state funds provided in the school construction assistance program grant must not exceed total project costs minus available local resources.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($20,000,000))

$23,340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,000,000))

$23,340,000

Sec. 5004. 2019 c 413 s 5030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Distressed Schools (92000142)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for classroom additions and other modernizations at Leschi elementary school in Seattle public schools.

(2) $10,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for classroom additions at Madison middle school in Seattle public schools.

(3) $3,100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for heating and ventilation upgrades at North Beach elementary school in Seattle public schools.

(4) $700,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a two-classroom preschool addition at John Muir Elementary School in Seattle.

(5) $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for conversion of two classrooms to a new health clinic at Lowell Elementary School in Seattle.

(6) $328,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for an agricultural resource center in Tacoma.

(7) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a schoolyard park in Tacoma.

(8) $309,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a school-based health center in Port Orchard.

(9) The remaining portion of the appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants for modular classrooms made with mass timber products, including cross-laminated timber, for the purpose of replacing portables in school districts with space challenges due to unavailable land for new school facilities to accommodate enrollment growth or with an overdependent use of portables to provide classroom space. The grants are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) School districts are responsible for the costs of site preparation; required permits; delivery and installation of the modular classrooms; furnishings, fixtures, and equipment; utility connections; and any other infrastructure costs related to the modular classrooms;

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must prioritize projects based on the following criteria in the following order:

(i) School districts with high ratios of portable classrooms to permanent classrooms;

(ii) School districts with low acreage of land available for new construction;

(iii) Projects that achieve lowest cost per classroom with highest percentage of mass timber products in the overall construction of the project; and

(iv) Projects that demonstrate multistory application of mass timber products.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($23,000,000))

$24,837,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($23,000,000))

$24,837,000

Sec. 5005. 2019 c 413 s 5035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON ((STATE)) CENTER FOR ((CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS))DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTH

Minor Works: Preservation 2019-21 (30000045)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Magnuson Health Sciences Phase II - Renovation/Replacement (40000049)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$59,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Vancouver - Life Sciences Building (30000840)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$52,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$57,100,000

Sec. 5008. 2019 c 413 s 5072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation: 2019-21 (40000041)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,283,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
(($7,000,000))

$3,717,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$28,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Campus Security Enhancements (40000074)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,283,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,283,000

Sec. 5010. 2019 c 413 s 5079 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Historic Lord Mansion (91000029)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((reappropriation is))appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5016, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($404,000))

$337,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($504,000))

$737,000

Sec. 5011. 2019 c 413 s 5093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$643,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($9,054,000))

$8,411,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,697,000))

$9,054,000

Sec. 5012. 2019 c 413 s 5098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (40000086)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,545,000))

$2,608,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,543,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,088,000))

$12,151,000

Sec. 5013. 2019 c 413 s 5101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (40000026)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($800,000))

$1,559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$4,759,000

Sec. 5014. 2019 c 413 s 5060 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Engineering Building (30000556)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
(($245,000))

$345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($100,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$56,695,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$57,040,000

Sec. 5015. 2019 c 413 s 5122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,902,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($36,642,000))

$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($40,234,000))

$3,592,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls: Fine and Applied Arts Replacement (30001458)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,616,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$211,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,140,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,967,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett: Baker Hall Replacement (40000190)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,954,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$29,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,554,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

Yakima Sun Dome Reflectors (92000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is provided solely to evaluate the replacement of the reflectors on the Yakima Sun Dome.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$97,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$97,000

(End of part)

PART 6

2017-2019 BIENNIUM PROVISIONS

Sec. 6001. 2019 c 413 s 6003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Aberdeen Gateway Center (Aberdeen). . . .$1,750,000

Adams County Industrial Wastewater and Treatment

Center (Othello). . . .$1,250,000

Adna Elementary Playshed (Chehalis). . . .$104,000

Airway Heights Recreation Complex (Airway Heights). . . .$515,000

Alder Creek Pioneer Museum Expansion (Bickelton). . . .$500,000

Anderson Island Historical Society (Anderson Island). . . .$26,000

Appleway Trail Amenities (Spokane Valley). . . .$556,000

ARC Community Center Renovation (Bremerton). . . .$81,000

Arlington Pocket Park Downtown Business District

(Arlington). . . .$46,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center Design and

Preconstruction (Tacoma). . . .$250,000

Belfair Sewer Extension to Puget Sound Industrial

Ctr (Belfair). . . .$515,000

Billy Frank Jr. Heritage Center (Olympia). . . .$206,000

Bloodworks NW Bloodmobiles. . . .$425,000

Bothell Parks Projects (Bothell). . . .$309,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center

(Vancouver). . . .$500,000

Brier ADA Ramp Updates Phase (Brier). . . .$115,000

Camp Schechter New Infrastructure and Dining Hall

(Tumwater). . . .$200,000

Capitol Campus E. WA Butte (Olympia). . . .$52,000

Captain Joseph House (Port Angeles). . . .$225,000

Carnation Central Business District Revitalization

(Carnation). . . .$1,545,000

Castle Rock Fair LED Lighting (Castle Rock). . . .$10,000

Centennial Connect Project (Marysville). . . .$642,000

Centennial Trail - Southern Extension #1 (Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Centerville Grange Renovation (Centerville). . . .$134,000

Centralia Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia). . . .$299,000

Chamber Economic Development Project (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Chelan County Emergency Operations Center (Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000

Chelatchie Prairie Railroad Maintenance Bldg.

Phase 2 (Yacolt). . . .$250,000

Cherry St. Fellowship (Seattle). . . .$360,000

Children's Playgarden (Seattle). . . .$315,000

Chimacum Ridge Forest Pilot (Port Townsend). . . .$3,400,000

City of Brewster Manganese Abatement (Brewster). . . .$752,000

Cityview Conversion to Residential Treatment

(Moses Lake). . . .$250,000

Clark County Historical Museum (Vancouver). . . .$300,000

Clymer Museum and Gallery Remodel (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Coastal Harvest Roof Replacement (Hoquiam). . . .$206,000

Cocoon House (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

College Place Well Consolidation and Replacement

(College Place). . . .$900,000

Columbia River Trail (Washougal). . . .$1,000,000

Confluence Park Improvements (P2&3) (Issaquah). . . .$206,000

Country Doctor Community Health Centers (Seattle). . . .$280,000

Covington Town Center Civic Plaza Development

(Covington). . . .$820,000

Cross Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,500,000

Daffodil Heritage Float Barn (Puyallup). . . .$103,000

Darrington Rodeo Grounds (Darrington). . . .$250,000

Des Moines Marina Bulkhead & Fishing Pier Renovation

(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Disaster Response Communications Project (Colville). . . .$1,000,000

District 5 Public Safety Center (Sultan). . . .$1,500,000

Downtown Pocket Park at Rockwell (Port Orchard). . . .$309,000

DuPont Historical Museum Renovation HVAC (DuPont). . . .$53,000

East Grays Harbor Fiber Project (Elma). . . .$463,000

East Hill YMCA/Park Renovation (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Eastside Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,550,000

Ebey Waterfront Trail and Shoreline Access

(Marysville). . . .$1,000,000

Emmanuel Life Center Kitchen (Spokane). . . .$155,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Senior Housing (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Evergreen Pool Resurfacing (White Center). . . .$247,000

Fall City Wastewater Infrastructure Planning & Design

(Fall City). . . .$1,000,000

Family Medicine Remodel (Goldendale). . . .$195,000

Federal Way Camera Replacement (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Federal Way Senior Center (Federal Way). . . .$175,000

Flood Protection Wall & Storage Building (Sultan). . . .$286,000

Food Lifeline Food Bank. . . .$1,250,000

Forestry Museum Building (Tenino). . . .$16,000

Fox Island Catastrophic Emergency Preparation

(Fox Island). . . .$17,000

Francis Anderson Center Roofing Project (Edmonds). . . .$391,000

Freeland Water and Sewer District Sewer Project

(Freeland). . . .$1,500,000

FUSION Transitional Hse Pgm/FUSION Decor Boutique

(Federal Way). . . .$500,000

Gig Harbor Sports Complex (Gig Harbor). . . .$206,000

Granger Historical Society Museum Acquisition

(Granger). . . .$255,000

Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial Foundation

(Maple Valley). . . .$258,000

GreenBridge/4th Ave Streetscaping (White Center). . . .$1,195,000

Harmony Sports Complex Infrastructure & Safety Imprve

(Vancouver). . . .$1,177,000

Harrington School District #204, Pool Renovation

(Harrington). . . .$97,000

Historic Mukai Farm and Garden Restoration (Vashon). . . .$250,000

Holly Ridge Center Building (Bremerton). . . .$475,000

Honor Point Military and Aerospace Museum (Spokane). . . .$100,000

HopeWorks TOD Center (Everett). . . .$2,760,000

Hoquiam Library (Hoquiam). . . .$250,000

HUB Sports Center (Liberty Lake). . . .$516,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Road Improvements (George). . . .$412,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Water System Improvements

(George). . . .$700,000

Inland Northwest Rail Museum (Reardan). . . .$170,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center (Yakima). . . .$1,000,000

Interbay PDAC (Seattle). . . .$900,000

Intrepid Spirit Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Islandwood Comm Dining Hall and Kitchen

(Bainbridge Island). . . .$200,000

Kenmore Public Boathouse (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Key Peninsula Civic Center Generator (Vaughn). . . .$60,000

Key Peninsula Elder Community (Lakebay). . . .$515,000

Kitchen Upgrade Belfair Senior Center Meals on Wheels

(Belfair). . . .$12,000

Kitsap Reg. Library Foundation, Silverdale Library

(Silverdale). . . .$250,000

Kona Kai Coffee Training Center (Tukwila). . . .$407,000

La Conner New Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$500,000

Lacey Boys and Girls Club (Lacey). . . .$30,000

Lake Chelan Community Hospital & Clinic Replacement

(Chelan). . . .$300,000

Lake City Comm Center, Renovate Magnuson Comm Center

(Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens). . . .$3,100,000

Lake Stevens Food Bank (Lake Stevens). . . .$300,000

Lake Sylvia State Park Legacy Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$696,000

Lake Tye All-Weather Fields (Monroe). . . .$800,000

Lakewood Playhouse Lighting System Upgrade (Lakewood). . . .$60,000

Lambert House Purchase (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Larson Playfield Lighting Renovation (Moses Lake). . . .$146,000

Lewis Co Fire Dist #1 Emergency Svcs Bldg & Resrce Ctr

(Onalaska). . . .$80,000

LIGO STEM Exploration Center (Richland). . . .$411,000

Longbranch Marina (Longbranch). . . .$248,000

Longview Police Department Range and Training

(Castle Rock). . . .$271,000

Lyon Creek, SR 104 Fish Barrier Removal

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,200,000

Maury Island Open Space Remediation (Maury Island). . . .$2,000,000

McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$2,000,000

Mill Creek Flood Control Project (Kent). . . .$2,000,000

Millionair Club Charity Kitchen (Seattle). . . .$167,000

Moorlands Park Improvements (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Morrow Manor (Poulsbo). . . .$773,000

Mount Baker Properties Cleanup Site (Seattle). . . .$1,100,000

Mount Rainier Early Warning System (Pierce County). . . .$1,751,000

Mukilteo Tank Farm Remediation (Mukilteo). . . .$257,000

Multicultural Community Center (Seattle). . . .$1,300,000

NE Snohomish County Community Services Campus

(Granite Falls). . . .$375,000

NeighborCare Health (Vashon). . . .$3,000,000

New Fire Station at Lake Lawrence (Yelm). . . .$252,000

North Cove Erosion Control (South Bend). . . .$650,000

Northshore Athletic Fields (Woodinville). . . .$400,000

Northwest Improvement Company Building (Roslyn). . . .$1,000,000

Olmstead-Smith Historical Gardens Replacement Well

(Ellensburg). . . .$17,000

Orting's Pedestrian Evacuation Crossing SR162 (Orting). . . .$500,000

Othello Regional Water Project (Othello). . . .$1,000,000

Paradise Point Water Supply System Phase IV

(Ridgefield). . . .$500,000

Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden). . . .$3,035,000

Performing Arts & Events Center (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Pioneer Village ADA Accessible Pathways (Ferndale). . . .$154,000

Port Ilwaco/Port Chinook Marina Mtce Drdg & Matl Disps

(Chinook). . . .$77,000

Port Orchard Marina Breakwater Refurbishment

(Port Orchard). . . .$1,019,000

Poulsbo Outdoor Salmon Observation Area (Poulsbo). . . .$475,000

((Puyallup Meeker Mansion Public Plaza (Puyallup). . . .$500,000))

Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$250,000

R.A. Long Park (Longview). . . .$296,000

Redondo Beach Rocky Reef (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

Ridgefield Outdoor Recreation Complex (Ridgefield). . . .$750,000

Rochester Boys & Girls Club upgrades (Rochester). . . .$26,000

Save the Old Tower (Pasco). . . .$300,000

Schilling Road Fire Station (Lyle). . . .$448,000

Scott Hill Park (Woodland). . . .$750,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Seattle Opera (Seattle). . . .$465,000

Shelton Basin 3 Sewer Rehabilitation Project (Shelton). . . .$1,500,000

Skagit Co Public Safety Emgcy Commun Ctr Exp/Remodel

(Mt. Vernon). . . .$525,000

Skagit County Veterans Community Park (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$500,000

Skagit Valley YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$400,000

Snohomish JROTC Program (Snohomish). . . .$189,000

South Gorge Trail (Spokane). . . .$250,000

South Snohomish County Community Resource Center

(Lynnwood). . . .$2,210,000

South Thurston County Meals on Wheels Kitchen

Upgrade (Yelm). . . .$30,000

Southwest WA Agricultural Business Park (Tenino). . . .$618,000

Southwest Washington Fair Grange Building Re-Roof

(Chehalis). . . .$54,000

Spanaway Lake Management Plan (Spanaway). . . .$26,000

Squalicum Waterway Maintenance Dredging (Bellingham). . . .$750,000

Steilacoom Historical Museum Storage Building

(Steilacoom). . . .$31,000

Sunnyside Community Hospital (Sunnyside). . . .$2,000,000

Sunset Career Center (Renton). . . .$412,000

Sunset Neighborhood Park (Renton). . . .$3,050,000

Tacoma's Historic Theater District (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Tam O'Shanter Athletic Arena (Kelso). . . .$1,000,000

Toledo Beautification (Toledo). . . .$52,000

Trout Lake School/Community Soccer & Track Facility

(Trout Lake). . . .$77,000

Tumwater Boys and Girls Club (Olympia). . . .$36,000

Turning Pointe Domestic Violence Svc: Shelter Imprv/Rep

(Shelton). . . .$27,000

Twisp Civic Building (Twisp). . . .$750,000

University YMCA (Seattle). . . .$600,000

Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$354,000

Washington Agricultural Education Center (Lynden). . . .$1,800,000

Washington Care Services (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Washington State Horse Park Covered Arena (Cle Elum). . . .$2,000,000

Waste Treatment and Sewer Collection System

(Toppenish). . . .$1,405,000

Wastewater Collection & Water Distribution Replacemnt

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Water Treatment for Kidney Dialysis. . . .$499,000

Wayne Golf Course Region Park (Bothell). . . .$1,000,000

Wesley Homes Bradley Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,380,000

Westport Marina (Westport). . . .$2,500,000

Weyerhaeuser Land Preservation

(Federal Way). . . .$1,250,000

Whidbey Island Youth Project (Oak Harbor

and Coupeville). . . .$300,000

White Pass Country Historical Museum (Packwood). . . .$283,000

Whitehouse Additional Capital Campaign (Pasco). . . .$1,500,000

Willows Road Regional Trail Connection (Kirkland). . . .$1,442,000

Winlock HS Track (Winlock). . . .$103,000

Winlock Industrial Infrastructure Development

(Winlock). . . .$1,500,000

Wishram School CTE Facility (Wishram). . . .$150,000

Yakima Valley SunDome Repairs (Yakima). . . .$206,000

Yelm City Park Playground Modernization (Yelm). . . .$247,000

Youth Eastside Services (Bellevue). . . .$26,000

YWCA Family Justice Center (Spokane). . . .$103,000

(8) $26,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of the Spanaway lake management plan.

(9) $1,250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the planning, development, acquisition, and other activities pursing open space conservation strategies for the historic Federal Way Weyerhaeuser campus. The grant recipient must be a regional nonprofit nature conservancy that works to conserve keystone properties selected by the city of Federal Way.

(10)(a) $900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for an Interbay public development advisory committee. It is the intent of the legislature to examine current and future needs of a state entity that performs an essential public function on state-owned property located in one of the state's designated manufacturing industrial centers. The legislature further intends to explore the potential future uses of this state-owned property in the event that the state entity determines that it must relocate in order to protect its ability to perform its essential public function.

(b) The Interbay public development advisory committee is created to make recommendations regarding the highest public benefit and future economic development uses for the Washington army national guard armory facility in the city of Seattle, pier 91 property, located at the descriptions referred to in the quit claim deeds for two parcels of land, 24.75 acres total, dated January 8, 1971, and December 22, 2009.

(c) The Interbay advisory committee consists of seven persons appointed as follows:

(i) One person appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(ii) One person appointed by the president of the senate; and

(iii) Five persons appointed by the governor, who must collectively have experience in forming public-private partnerships to develop workforce housing or affordable housing; knowledge of project financing options for public-private partnerships related to housing; architectural design and development experience related to industrial lands and mixed-use zoning to include housing; and experience leading public processes to engage communities and other stakeholders in public discussions regarding economic development decisions.

(d) The Interbay public development advisory committee must:

(i) Work in collaboration with the military department to determine the needs of the military department if it is relocated from the land described in subsection (1) of this section, including identifying:

(A) Current uses;

(B) Future needs of the units currently at this location;

(C) Potential suitable publicly owned sites in Washington for relocation of current units; and

(D) The costs associated with acquisition, construction, and relocation to another site or sites for these units;

(ii) Explore the future economic development opportunities if the land described in subsection (1) of this section is vacated by the military department, and make recommendations, including identifying:

(A) Suitable and unsuitable future uses for the land;

(B) Environmental issues and associated costs;

(C) Current public infrastructure availability, future public infrastructure plans by local or regional entities, and potential public infrastructure needs;

(D) Transportation corridors in the immediate area and any potential right-of-way needs; and

(E) Existing zoning regulations for the land and potential future zoning needs to evaluate workforce housing, affordable housing, and other commercial and industrial development compatible with the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center designation;

(iii) Explore the potential funding sources and partners as well as any needed transactions, and make recommendations, including:

(A) Any potential private partners or investors;

(B) Necessary real estate transactions;

(C) Federal funding opportunities; and

(D) State and local funding sources, including any tax-related programs; and

(iv) Conduct at least three public meetings at a location within the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center, where a quorum of the Interbay public development advisory committee members are present, at which members of the public are invited to present to the Interbay advisory committee regarding the future uses of the site and potential issues such as industrial land use, commercial development, residential zoning, and public infrastructure needs.

(e) Nothing in this section authorizes the solicitation of interest or bids for work related to the purposes of this section.

(f) The department of commerce shall provide staff support to the Interbay advisory committee. The department may contract with outside consultants to provide any needed expertise.

(g) Legislative members of the Interbay advisory committee are reimbursed for travel in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(11) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Lakewood for the purchase of property within the federally designated north clear zone at joint base Lewis-McChord. Once acquired, the property must be zoned for use compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. The city may lease or resell the acquired property for fair market value, but any such lease or sale must include restrictions or covenants ensuring that the use of the property is safely compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. If the city subsequently resells, rezones, develops, or leases the property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the north clear zone, the city must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of the property in its entirety within ten years.

(12) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Federal Way chamber of commerce for two economic development projects focused in the south Puget Sound area. The amounts in this section must be used for a business retention and expansion program to conduct economic research in collaboration with stakeholders, develop data-driven economic strategies, and produce a written evaluation; and a tourism enhancement program to develop and inventory the Federal Way area tourism sector, analyze data regarding visitation, and produce a written evaluation.

(13) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Northshore athletic field which shall be named "Andy Hill Sports Complex."

(14) $1,177,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Harmony sports complex infrastructure and safety improvements in Vancouver and is contingent upon the facility being open to the public.

(15) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma. It is the intent of the legislature that beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium no state funding is provided to the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($130,941,000))

$130,441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($130,941,000))

$130,441,000

Sec. 6002. 2019 c 413 s 6005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $83,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation, $19,631,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation, and $8,658,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $24,370,000 is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with chronic mental illness. The department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that provide services or include a partner community behavioral health treatment provider;

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively. The grants may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require that a capital needs assessment is performed to estimate the cost of the preservation project at contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. To receive grants, housing projects must meet the following requirements:

(i) The property is more than fifteen years old;

(ii) At least 50 percent of the housing units are occupied by families and individuals at or below 30 percent area median income.

(iii) The improvements will result in reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both; and

(iv) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(c) $5,000,000 is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people at or below 80 percent of the area median income who have been displaced by a natural disaster declared by the governor, including people who have been displaced within the last two biennia.

(d) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the communities of concern commission to focus on creating capital assets that will help reduce poverty and build stronger and more sustainable communities using the communities' cultural understanding and vision. The funding must be used for predevelopment costs for capital projects identified by the commission and for other activities to assist communities in developing capacity to create community-owned capital assets.

(e) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation and $1,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purchase of the three south annex properties. The state board for community and technical colleges must transfer the three south annex properties located at 1530 Broadway, 1534 Broadway, and 909 East Pine street to ((one or more nonprofits or public development authorities selected by the department, if the selected entities agree to use the properties))Capitol Hill Housing to provide services and housing for homeless youth or young adults for a minimum of ((twenty-five))fifty years. The transfer agreement between the state board for community and technical colleges and ((the selected entities))Capitol Hill Housing must specify a mutually agreed transfer date and require ((the selected entities))Capitol Hill Housing to cover any closing costs with a total purchase price of nine million dollars for all three properties. The contract between the department and Capitol Hill Housing must provide that Capitol Hill Housing will be responsible for maintaining and securing the property until it is developed. The contract must also specify that, if Capitol Hill Housing does not construct at least seventy affordable housing units on the site by 2028, this funding must be fully repaid to the state or the land must revert back to the state.

(f) $25,506,000 is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

(i) Spokane Housing Predesign. . . .$500,000

(ii) El Centro de la Raza. . . .$737,000

(iii) Highland Village Preservation. . . .$1,500,000

(iv) King County Modular Housing Project. . . .$1,500,000

(v) Nisqually Tribal Housing. . . .$1,250,000

(vi) Othello Homesight Community Center. . . .$3,000,000

(vii) Parkview Apartments Affordable Housing. . . .$100,000

(viii) Supported Housing and Employment (Longview). . . .$129,000

(ix) $2,000,000 is provided solely for homeownership assistance for low-income households displaced from their manufactured/mobile homes due the closure or conversion of a mobile home park or manufactured housing community in south King County. $1,500,000 of this amount in this subsection is provided solely for low-income residents displaced from the Firs Mobile Home Park located in SeaTac.

(x) $6,000,000 is provided solely for grants for high quality low-income housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing, and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. It is the intent of the legislature that these grants serve projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than (($125,000))$135,000, excluding the value of land, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a twenty-five year period. Amounts provided that are subject to this subsection must be used to plan, predesign, design, provide technical assistance and financial services, purchase land for, and build innovative low-income housing units. $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing in Shelton and $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing for veterans in Orting. Mental health and substance abuse counseling services must be offered to residents of housing projects supported by appropriations in this subsection. $500,000 of the appropriation for housing units in Shelton can be released for purchase of land, planning, or predesign services before the project is fully funded. $500,000 of the appropriation for housing units in Orting can be released for purchase of land, planning, or predesign services before the project is fully funded.

(xi) $7,290,000 is provided solely for grants to the following organizations using innovative methods to address homelessness: $4,290,000 for THA Arlington drive youth campus in Tacoma and $3,000,000 for a King county housing project.

(xii) $1,500,000 is provided solely for Valley Cities modular housing project in Auburn.

(g) Of the amounts appropriated remaining after (a) through (f) of this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(i) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit veterans;

(ii) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership;

(iii) 5 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people with developmental disabilities;

(iv) The remaining amount is provided solely for projects that serve low-income and special needs populations in need of housing, including, but not limited to, homeless families with children, homeless youth, farmworkers, and seniors.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,631,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$83,500,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$8,658,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$111,789,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$400,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$511,789,000

Sec. 6003. 2019 c 413 s 1024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6003 of this act.

(2) The Interbay public development advisory committee shall provide a report to the legislature and office of the governor with recommendations by November 15, 2019. The Interbay advisory committee's recommendations must include recommendations regarding the structure, composition, and scope of authority of any subsequent state public development authority that may be established to implement the recommendations of the Interbay advisory committee.

(3) The Interbay public development advisory committee terminates June 30, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($91,142,000))

$90,642,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$39,799,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($130,941,000))

$130,441,000

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 7001. 2019 c 413 s 7001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are ((forty-eight million six hundred eighteen thousand two hundred eighteen dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium, three hundred six million nine hundred two thousand nine hundred ninety-six dollars for the 2021-2023 biennium, and four hundred thirty-three million two hundred fifty-nine thousand five hundred seventy-three dollars for the 2023-2025 biennium))forty-three million three hundred fourteen thousand six hundred forty-two dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium, three hundred million four hundred twenty-two thousand three hundred forty-three dollars for the 2021-2023 biennium, and four hundred seventeen million four hundred fifty-five thousand six hundred sixty dollars for the 2023-2025 biennium.

Sec. 7002. 2019 c 413 s 7002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.
(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $103,143,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new library-archives building.

(4) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,450,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(5) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the King county secure community transition center.

(6) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $118,000,000 plus costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and construct a nursing facility on the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center campus on the existing adult training program site. The department may contract to lease develop or lease purchase the facility. Before entering into a contract, the department must consult with the office of financial management and the office of the state treasurer. Should the department of social and health services choose to use a financing contract that does not provide for the issuance of certificates of participation, the financing contract shall be subject to approval by the state finance committee as required by RCW 39.94.010. In approving a financing contract not providing for the use of certificates of participation, the state finance committee should be reasonably certain that the contract is excluded from the computation of indebtedness, particularly that the contract is not backed by the full faith and credit of the state and the legislature is expressly not obligated to appropriate funds to make payments. For purposes of this subsection, "financing contract" includes but is not limited to a certificate of participation and tax exempt financing similar to that authorized in RCW 47.79.140.

(7) Department of fish and wildlife: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,099,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase automated salmon marking trailers.

(((7)))(8) Department of natural resources: Enter into a financing contract for up to $1,800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to remodel spaces within agency-owned commercial buildings that will benefit the common school trust.

(((8)))(9) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $9,950,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a consolidated academic support services facility. Debt service for this facility may not be paid from additional student fees.

(((9)))(10) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin Community College for up to $27,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student recreation center.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College Puyallup for up to $2,831,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and construct parking.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student activity center on the Clarkston campus.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $6,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student recreation center.

(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College for up to $4,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Wells Hall replacement project.

(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Yakima Valley Community College for up to $22,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build additional instructional and lab classroom space.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase one or more properties adjacent to the campus.

(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Seattle College for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student wellness and fitness center.

(11) Eastern Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for roof replacement projects.

Sec. 7003. RCW 43.19.501 and 2018 c 2 s 7027 are each amended to read as follows:

The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by the department in Thurston county. ((For the 2015-2017 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for studies related to real estate.))

During the ((2017-2019))2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the Thurston county capital facilities account may be appropriated for costs associated with staffing to support capital budget and project activities and lease and facility oversight activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The department of natural resources, in coordination with the department of social and health services, may enter into long-term, revenue generating opportunities for underutilized portions of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center bounded by 15th Ave NE and NE 150th Street to benefit the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory trust. Long-term, revenue generating opportunities may include, but are not limited to, land leases, land sales, and land swaps. It is the intent of the legislature that any revenue obtained from these opportunities be utilized by the department of social and health services for community services benefiting those with developmental disabilities. The department of social and health services and the department of natural resources must amend their lease if necessary to conform with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

In order to accelerate the reduction of embodied carbon and improve the environmental performance of construction materials, agencies shall, whenever possible, review and consider embodied carbon reported in environmental product declarations when evaluating proposed structural materials for construction projects.

Sec. 7006. 2019 c 413 s 7021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of enterprise services, in consultation with the office of financial management, is granted the authority to sell the real property known as the Tacoma Rhodes complex. The property consists of the Broadway building, Market building, and parking garage.

(2) The department may negotiate a sale with the city of Tacoma for less than fair market value, but the purchase price must cover appraisal costs, all debt service, all closing costs, all financing contracts, and the cost of outstanding liabilities necessary to keep the department whole.

(3) If the department and the city of Tacoma are unable to negotiate agreed upon terms and execute a purchase and sale agreement by December 31, 2019, the department may sell the property to any purchaser for no less than fair market value.

(4) The terms and conditions of the sale must meet the business needs of the state tenants.

(5) Any sale proceeds remaining after the department has satisfied all of the obligations, including appraisal costs, all debt service, all closing costs, all financing contracts, and the cost of outstanding liabilities, must be deposited into the Thurston county capital facilities account. It is the intent of the legislature to use the sale proceeds for projects on the Capitol Campus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---