BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.604 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state school directors' association, in consultation and collaboration with tribes, shall develop a model policy and procedure to establish data sharing agreements between school districts and local tribes by January 1, 2021.

(2) In developing the model policy and procedure, the Washington state school directors' association must:

(a) Consult with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of native education, the tribal leaders congress on education, and local tribes;

(b) Consider model agreements developed by the bureau of Indian education and model data sharing agreements and procedures developed by national Native educational organizations; and

(c) Consider standards for the identification of Native students for data sharing purposes.

--- END ---