BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.46.010 and 2015 c 299 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Director" means the director of labor and industries;

(2) "Employ" includes to permit to work;

(3) "Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer but shall not include:

(a) Any individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid on a piece rate basis in an operation which has been, and is generally and customarily recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis in the region of employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her permanent residence to the farm on which he or she is employed; and (iii) who has been employed in agriculture less than thirteen weeks during the preceding calendar year;

(b) Any individual employed in casual labor in or about a private home, unless performed in the course of the employer's trade, business, or profession;

(c) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity or in the capacity of outside salesperson as those terms are defined and delimited by rules of the director. However, those terms shall be defined and delimited by the human resources director pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW for employees employed under the director of personnel's jurisdiction;

(d) Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational, charitable, religious, state or local governmental body or agency, or nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does not in fact exist or where the services are rendered to such organizations gratuitously. If the individual receives reimbursement in lieu of compensation for normally incurred out-of-pocket expenses or receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of voluntary service rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to exist for the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or qualification in any state, local government, or publicly supported retirement system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(e) Any individual employed full time by any state or local governmental body or agency who provides voluntary services but only with regard to the provision of the voluntary services. The voluntary services and any compensation therefor shall not affect or add to qualification, entitlement, or benefit rights under any state, local government, or publicly supported retirement system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(f) Any newspaper vendor, carrier, or delivery person selling or distributing newspapers on the street, to offices, to businesses, or from house to house and any freelance news correspondent or "stringer" who, using his or her own equipment, chooses to submit material for publication for free or a fee when such material is published;

(g) Any carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate Commerce Act;

(h) Any individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention activities;

(i) Any individual employed by any charitable institution charged with child care responsibilities engaged primarily in the development of character or citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or providing or sponsoring recreational opportunities or facilities for young people or members of the armed forces of the United States;

(j) Any individual whose duties require that he or she reside or sleep at the place of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a substantial portion of his or her work time subject to call, and not engaged in the performance of active duties;

(k) Any resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or municipal correctional, detention, treatment or rehabilitative institution;

(l) Any individual who holds a public elective or appointive office of the state, any county, city, town, municipal corporation or quasi municipal corporation, political subdivision, or any instrumentality thereof, or any employee of the state legislature;

(m) All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ferries operated by the department of transportation;

(n) Any individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an American vessel;

(o) An individual who is at least sixteen years old but under twenty-one years old, in his or her capacity as a player for a junior ice hockey team that is a member of a regional, national, or international league and that contracts with an arena owned, operated, or managed by a public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW;

(4) "Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association, corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee;

(5) "Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business, industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of employment in which employees are gainfully employed or freelancers are hired or retained;

(6) "Retail or service establishment" means an establishment seventy-five percent of whose annual dollar volume of sales of goods or services, or both, is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales or services in the particular industry;

(7) "Wage" means compensation due to an employee or freelancer by reason of employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to such deductions, charges, or allowances as may be permitted by rules of the director;

(8) "Freelancer" means any natural person or any organization composed of no more than one natural person, whether or not incorporated or employing a trade name, that is hired or retained by an employer as an independent contractor to provide services in exchange for compensation. "Freelancer" does not include an individual excluded under subsection (3)(a) through (o) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 49.46.020 and 2019 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning January 1, 2017, and until January 1, 2018, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than eleven dollars per hour.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2018, and until January 1, 2019, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than eleven dollars and fifty cents per hour.

(c) Beginning January 1, 2019, and until January 1, 2020, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than twelve dollars per hour.

(d) Beginning January 1, 2020, and until January 1, 2021, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees and freelancers who ((has))have reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than thirteen dollars and fifty cents per hour.

(2)(a) Beginning on January 1, 2021, and each following January 1st as set forth under (b) of this subsection, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees and freelancers who ((has))have reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than the amount established under (b) of this subsection.

(b) On September 30, 2020, and on each following September 30th, the department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted minimum wage rate to maintain employee and freelancer purchasing power by increasing the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this subsection (2)(b) takes effect on the following January 1st.

(3) An employer must pay to its employees and freelancers: (a) All tips and gratuities; and (b) all service charges as defined under RCW 49.46.160 except those that, pursuant to RCW 49.46.160, are itemized as not being payable to the employee or employees or freelancers servicing the customer. Tips and service charges paid to an employee or freelancer are in addition to, and may not count towards, the ((employee's))employee or freelancer's hourly minimum wage.

(4) Beginning January 1, 2018, except as provided in RCW 49.46.180, every employer must provide to each of its employees paid sick leave as provided in RCW 49.46.200 and 49.46.210.

(5) The director shall by regulation establish the minimum wage for employees under the age of eighteen years.

Sec. 3. RCW 49.46.040 and 2010 c 8 s 12041 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director or his or her designated representatives may investigate and gather data regarding the wages, hours, and other conditions and practices of employment in any industry subject to this chapter, and may enter and inspect such places and such records (and make such transcriptions thereof), question such employees or freelancers, and investigate such facts, conditions, practices, or matters as he or she may deem necessary or appropriate to determine whether any person has violated any provision of this chapter, or which may aid in the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

(2) With the consent and cooperation of federal agencies charged with the administration of federal labor laws, the director may, for the purpose of carrying out his or her functions and duties under this chapter, utilize the services of federal agencies and their employees and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, may reimburse such federal agencies and their employees for services rendered for such purposes.

(3) Every employer subject to any provision of this chapter or of any order issued under this chapter shall make, keep, and preserve such records of the persons employed by him or her and of the wages, hours, and other conditions and practices of employment maintained by him or her, and shall preserve such records for such periods of time, and shall make reports therefrom to the director as he or she shall prescribe by regulation as necessary or appropriate for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations thereunder.

(4) The director is authorized to make such regulations regulating, restricting, or prohibiting industrial homework as are necessary or appropriate to prevent the circumvention or evasion of and to safeguard the minimum wage rate prescribed in this chapter, and all existing regulations of the director relating to industrial homework are hereby continued in full force and effect.

Sec. 4. RCW 49.46.070 and 2010 c 8 s 12042 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every employer subject to any provision of this chapter or of any regulation issued under this chapter shall make, and keep in or about the premises wherein any employee is employed or freelancer is hired or retained, a record of the name, address, and occupation of each of his or her employees and freelancers, the rate of pay, and the amount paid each pay period to each such employee or freelancer, the hours worked each day and each workweek by such employee or freelancer, and such other information as the director shall prescribe by regulation as necessary or appropriate for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter or of the regulations thereunder. Such records shall be open for inspection or transcription by the director or his or her authorized representative at any reasonable time. Every such employer shall furnish to the director or to his or her authorized representative on demand a sworn statement of such records and information upon forms prescribed or approved by the director.

(2) Every employer that hires or retains a freelancer must furnish to each freelancer at the time wages are paid an itemized statement showing the pay basis in hours or days worked, the rate or rates of pay, the gross pay, and all deductions from the pay for the respective pay period.

(3) This section does not apply to employers that hire or retain freelance performers that are covered by a collective bargaining agreement that establishes a pay scale for the freelance performers.

Sec. 5. RCW 49.46.080 and 1983 c 3 s 157 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As new regulations or changes or modification of previously established regulations are proposed, the director shall call a public hearing for the purpose of the consideration and establishment of such regulations following the procedures used in the promulgation of standards of safety under chapter 49.17 RCW.

(2) Any interested party may obtain a review of the director's findings and order in the superior court of county of petitioners' residence by filing in such court within sixty days after the date of publication of such regulation a written petition praying that the regulation be modified or set aside. A copy of such petition shall be served upon the director. The finding of facts, if supported by evidence, shall be conclusive upon the court. The court shall determine whether the regulation is in accordance with law. If the court determines that such regulation is not in accordance with law, it shall remand the case to the director with directions to modify or revoke such regulation. If application is made to the court for leave to adduce additional evidence by any aggrieved party, such party shall show to the satisfaction of the court that such additional evidence is material, and that there were reasonable grounds for the failure to adduce such evidence before the director. If the court finds that such evidence is material and that reasonable grounds exist for failure of the aggrieved party to adduce such evidence in prior proceedings, the court may remand the case to the director with directions that such additional evidence be taken before the director. The director may modify the findings and conclusions, in whole or in part, by reason of such additional evidence.

(3) The judgment and decree of the court shall be final except that it shall be subject to review by the supreme court or the court of appeals as in other civil cases.

(4) The proceedings under this section shall not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of an administrative regulation issued under the provisions of this chapter. The court shall not grant any stay of an administrative regulation unless the person complaining of such regulation shall file in the court an undertaking with a surety or sureties satisfactory to the court for the payment to the employees or freelancers affected by the regulation, in the event such regulation is affirmed, of the amount by which the compensation such employees or freelancers are entitled to receive under the regulation exceeds the compensation they actually receive while such stay is in effect.

Sec. 6. RCW 49.46.090 and 2017 c 2 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any employer who pays any employee or freelancer less than the amounts to which such employee or freelancer is entitled under or by virtue of this chapter, shall be liable to such employee or freelancer affected for the full amount due to such employee or freelancer under this chapter, less any amount actually paid to such employee or freelancer by the employer, and for costs and such reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court. Any agreement between such employee or freelancer and the employer allowing the employee or freelancer to receive less than what is due under this chapter shall be no defense to such action.

(2) At the written request of any employee or freelancer paid less than the amounts to which he or she is entitled under or by virtue of this chapter, the director may take an assignment under this chapter or as provided in RCW 49.48.040 of such claim in trust for the assigning employee or freelancer and may bring any legal action necessary to collect such claim, and the employer shall be required to pay the costs and such reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court.

Sec. 7. RCW 49.46.100 and 2017 c 2 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any employer who hinders or delays the director or his or her authorized representatives in the performance of his or her duties in the enforcement of this chapter, or refuses to admit the director or his or her authorized representatives to any place of employment, or fails to make, keep, and preserve any records as required under the provisions of this chapter, or falsifies any such record, or refuses to make any record accessible to the director or his or her authorized representatives upon demand, or refuses to furnish a sworn statement of such record or any other information required for the proper enforcement of this chapter to the director or his or her authorized representatives upon demand, or pays or agrees to pay an employee or freelancer less than the employee or freelancer is entitled to under this chapter, or otherwise violates any provision of this chapter or of any regulation issued under this chapter shall be deemed in violation of this chapter and shall, upon conviction therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) Any employer who discharges or in any other manner discriminates against any employee or freelancer because such employee or freelancer has made any complaint to his or her employer, to the director, or his or her authorized representatives that he or she has not been paid wages in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or that the employer has violated any provision of this chapter, or because such employee or freelancer has caused to be instituted or is about to cause to be instituted any proceeding under or related to this chapter, or because such employee or freelancer has testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding shall be deemed in violation of this chapter and shall, upon conviction therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 8. RCW 49.46.110 and 1959 c 294 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the right of employees or freelancers to bargain collectively with their employers through representatives of their own choosing in order to establish wages or other conditions of work in excess of the applicable minimum under the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 9. RCW 49.48.060 and 2010 c 42 s 5 and 2010 c 8 s 12050 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If upon investigation by the director, after taking assignments of any wage claim under RCW 49.48.040 or after receiving a wage complaint as defined in RCW 49.48.082 from an employee or freelancer, it appears to the director that the employer is representing to his or her employees or freelancers that he or she is able to pay wages for their services and that the employees or freelancers are not being paid for their services, the director may require the employer to give a bond in such sum as the director deems reasonable and adequate in the circumstances, with sufficient surety, conditioned that the employer will for a definite future period not exceeding six months conduct his or her business and pay his or her employees and freelancers in accordance with the laws of the state of Washington.

(2) If within ten days after demand for such bond the employer fails to provide the same, the director may commence a suit against the employer in the superior court of appropriate jurisdiction to compel him or her to furnish such bond or cease doing business until he or she has done so. The employer shall have the burden of proving the amount thereof to be excessive.

(3) If the court finds that there is just cause for requiring such bond and that the same is reasonable, necessary, or appropriate to secure the prompt payment of the wages of the employees and freelancers of such employer and his or her compliance with one or more wage payment requirements as defined in RCW 49.48.082, the court shall enjoin such employer from doing business in this state until the requirement is met, or shall make other, and may make further, orders appropriate to compel compliance with the requirement.

(4) Upon being informed of a wage claim against an employer or former employer, the director shall, if such claim appears to be just, immediately notify the employer or former employer, of such claim by mail. If the employer or former employer fails to pay the claim or make satisfactory explanation to the director of his or her failure to do so, within thirty days thereafter, the employer or former employer shall be liable to a penalty of ten percent of that portion of the claim found to be justly due. The director shall have a cause of action against the employer or former employer for the recovery of such penalty, and the same may be included in any subsequent action by the director on said wage claim, or may be exercised separately after adjustment of such wage claim without court action. This subsection does not apply to wage complaints made under RCW 49.48.083.

Sec. 10. RCW 49.48.080 and 1935 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080 shall apply to the payment of wages or compensation of employees or freelancers directly employed by any county, incorporated city or town, or other municipal corporation. Nor shall anything herein apply to employees or freelancers, directly employed by the state, any department, bureau, office, board, commission or institution hereof.

Sec. 11. RCW 49.48.082 and 2010 c 42 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 49.48.083 through 49.48.086:

(1) "Citation" means a written determination by the department that a wage payment requirement has been violated.

(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(3) "Determination of compliance" means a written determination by the department that wage payment requirements have not been violated.

(4) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and industries, or the director's authorized representative.

(5) "Employee" has the meaning provided in: (a) RCW 49.46.010 for purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020 or 49.46.130; and (b) RCW 49.12.005 for purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060.

(6) "Employer" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010 for purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020, 49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060.

(7) "Notice of assessment" means a written notice by the department that, based on a citation, the employer shall pay the amounts assessed under RCW 49.48.083.

(8) "Repeat willful violator" means any employer that has been the subject of a final and binding citation and notice of assessment for a willful violation of a wage payment requirement within three years of the date of issue of the most recent citation and notice of assessment for a willful violation of a wage payment requirement.

(9) "Successor" means any person to whom an employer quitting, selling out, exchanging, or disposing of a business sells or otherwise conveys in bulk and not in the ordinary course of the employer's business, more than fifty percent of the property, whether real or personal, tangible or intangible, of the employer's business.

(10) "Wage" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010.

(11) "Wage complaint" means a complaint from an employee or freelancer to the department that asserts that an employer has violated one or more wage payment requirements and that is reduced to writing.

(12) "Wage payment requirement" means a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020, 49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060, and any related rules adopted by the department.

(13) "Willful" means a knowing and intentional action that is neither accidental nor the result of a bona fide dispute, as evaluated under the standards applicable to wage payment violations under RCW 49.52.050(2).

(14) "Freelancer" means any natural person or any organization composed of no more than one natural person, whether or not incorporated or employing a trade name, that is hired or retained by an employer as an independent contractor to provide services in exchange for compensation.

Sec. 12. RCW 49.48.083 and 2011 c 301 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an employee or freelancer files a wage complaint with the department, the department shall investigate the wage complaint. Unless otherwise resolved, the department shall issue either a citation and notice of assessment or a determination of compliance no later than sixty days after the date on which the department received the wage complaint. The department may extend the time period by providing advance written notice to the employee or freelancer and the employer setting forth good cause for an extension of the time period and specifying the duration of the extension. The department may not investigate any alleged violation of a wage payment requirement that occurred more than three years before the date that the employee or freelancer filed the wage complaint. The department shall send the citation and notice of assessment or the determination of compliance to both the employer and the employee or freelancer by service of process or using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to their last known addresses.

(2) If the department determines that an employer has violated a wage payment requirement and issues to the employer a citation and notice of assessment, the department may order the employer to pay employees and freelancers all wages owed, including interest of one percent per month on all wages owed, to the employee or freelancer. The wages and interest owed must be calculated from the first date wages were owed to the employee or freelancer, except that the department may not order the employer to pay any wages and interest that were owed more than three years before the date the wage complaint was filed with the department.

(3) If the department determines that the violation of the wage payment requirement was a willful violation, the department also may order the employer to pay the department a civil penalty as specified in (a) of this subsection.

(a) A civil penalty for a willful violation of a wage payment requirement shall be not less than one thousand dollars or an amount equal to ten percent of the total amount of unpaid wages, whichever is greater. The maximum civil penalty for a willful violation of a wage payment requirement shall be twenty thousand dollars.

(b) The department may not assess a civil penalty if the employer reasonably relied on: (i) A rule related to any wage payment requirement; (ii) a written order, ruling, approval, opinion, advice, determination, or interpretation of the director; or (iii) an interpretive or administrative policy issued by the department and filed with the office of the code reviser. In accordance with the department's retention schedule obligations under chapter 40.14 RCW, the department shall maintain a complete and accurate record of all written orders, rulings, approvals, opinions, advice, determinations, and interpretations for purposes of determining whether an employer is immune from civil penalties under (b)(ii) of this subsection.

(c) The department shall waive any civil penalty assessed against an employer under this section if the employer is not a repeat willful violator, and the director determines that the employer has provided payment to the employee or freelancer of all wages that the department determined that the employer owed to the employee or freelancer, including interest, within ten business days of the employer's receipt of the citation and notice of assessment from the department.

(d) The department may waive or reduce at any time a civil penalty assessed under this section if the director determines that the employer paid all wages and interest owed to an employee or freelancer.

(e) The department shall deposit civil penalties paid under this section in the supplemental pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.

(4) Upon payment by an employer, and acceptance by an employee or freelancer, of all wages and interest assessed by the department in a citation and notice of assessment issued to the employer, the fact of such payment by the employer, and of such acceptance by the employee or freelancer, shall: (a) Constitute a full and complete satisfaction by the employer of all specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and notice of assessment; and (b) bar the employee or freelancer from initiating or pursuing any court action or other judicial or administrative proceeding based on the specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and notice of assessment. The citation and notice of assessment shall include a notification and summary of the specific requirements of this subsection.

(5) The applicable statute of limitations for civil actions is tolled during the department's investigation of an ((employee's))employee or freelancer's wage complaint against an employer. For the purposes of this subsection, the department's investigation begins on the date the employee or freelancer files the wage complaint with the department and ends when: (a) The wage complaint is finally determined through a final and binding citation and notice of assessment or determination of compliance; or (b) the department notifies the employer and the employee or freelancer in writing that the wage complaint has been otherwise resolved or that the employee or freelancer has elected to terminate the department's administrative action under RCW 49.48.085.

Sec. 13. RCW 49.48.085 and 2006 c 89 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An employee or freelancer who has filed a wage complaint with the department may elect to terminate the department's administrative action, thereby preserving any private right of action, by providing written notice to the department within ten business days after the ((employee's))employee or freelancer's receipt of the department's citation and notice of assessment.

(2) If the employee or freelancer elects to terminate the department's administrative action: (a) The department shall immediately discontinue its action against the employer; (b) the department shall vacate a citation and notice of assessment already issued by the department to the employer; and (c) the citation and notice of assessment, and any related findings of fact or conclusions of law by the department, and any payment or offer of payment by the employer of the wages, including interest, assessed by the department in the citation and notice of assessment, shall not be admissible in any court action or other judicial or administrative proceeding.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or affect: (a) The right of any employee or freelancer to pursue any judicial, administrative, or other action available with respect to an employer; (b) the right of the department to pursue any judicial, administrative, or other action available with respect to an employee or freelancer that is identified as a result of a wage complaint; or (c) the right of the department to pursue any judicial, administrative, or other action available with respect to an employer in the absence of a wage complaint. For purposes of this subsection, "employee or freelancer" means an employee or freelancer other than an employee or freelancer who has filed a wage complaint with the department and who thereafter has elected to terminate the department's administrative action as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 14. RCW 49.48.086 and 2014 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After a final order is issued under RCW 49.48.084, if an employer defaults in the payment of: (a) Any wages determined by the department to be owed to an employee or freelancer, including interest; or (b) any civil penalty ordered by the department under RCW 49.48.083, the director may file with the clerk of any county within the state a warrant in the amount of the payment plus any filing fees. The clerk of the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of the employer mentioned in the warrant, the amount of payment due on it plus any filing fees, and the date when the warrant was filed. The aggregate amount of the warrant as docketed becomes a lien upon the title to, and interest in, all real and personal property of the employer against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case docketed in the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall proceed upon the warrant in all respects and with like effect as prescribed by law with respect to execution or other process issued against rights or property upon judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction. The warrant so docketed is sufficient to support the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the state in a manner provided by law in case of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied. The clerk of the court is entitled to a filing fee which will be added to the amount of the warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to the employer within three days of filing with the clerk.

(2)(a) The director may issue to any person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, a public corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and order to withhold and deliver property of any kind when he or she has reason to believe that there is in the possession of the person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, property that is or will become due, owing, or belonging to an employer upon whom a notice of assessment has been served by the department for payments or civil penalties due to the department. The effect of a notice and order is continuous from the date the notice and order is first made until the liability out of which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable by reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the notice and order was made that the notice and order has been released.

(b) The notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by the sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by the director. A person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state upon whom service has been made shall answer the notice within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired of in the notice and order. Upon service of the notice and order, if the party served possesses any property that may be subject to the claim of the department, the party shall promptly deliver the property to the director. The director shall hold the property in trust for application on the employer's indebtedness to the department, or for return without interest, in accordance with a final determination of a petition for review. In the alternative, the party shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond satisfactory to the director conditioned upon final determination of liability. If a party served and named in the notice fails to answer the notice within the time prescribed in this section, the court may render judgment by default against the party for the full amount claimed by the director in the notice, together with costs. If a notice is served upon an employer and the property subject to it is wages, the employer may assert in the answer all exemptions provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner is entitled.

(c) As an alternative to the methods of service described in this section, the department may electronically serve a financial institution with a notice and order to withhold and deliver by providing a list of its outstanding warrants, except those for which a payment agreement is in good standing, to the department of revenue. The department of revenue may include the warrants provided by the department in a notice and order to withhold and deliver served under RCW 82.32.235(3). A financial institution that is served with a notice and order to withhold and deliver under this subsection (2)(c) must answer the notice within the time period applicable to service under RCW 82.32.235(3). The department and the department of revenue may adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(c).

(3) In addition to the procedure for collection of wages owed, including interest, and civil penalties as set forth in this section, the department may recover wages owed, including interest, and civil penalties assessed under RCW 49.48.083 in a civil action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred.

(4) Whenever any employer quits business, sells out, exchanges, or otherwise disposes of the employer's business or stock of goods, any person who becomes a successor to the business becomes liable for the full amount of any outstanding citation and notice of assessment or penalty against the employer's business under this chapter if, at the time of the conveyance of the business, the successor has: (a) Actual knowledge of the fact and amount of the outstanding citation and notice of assessment or (b) a prompt, reasonable, and effective means of accessing and verifying the fact and amount of the outstanding citation and notice of assessment from the department. If the citation and notice of assessment or penalty is not paid in full by the employer within ten days of the date of the sale, exchange, or disposal, the successor is liable for the payment of the full amount of the citation and notice of assessment or penalty, and payment thereof by the successor must, to the extent thereof, be deemed a payment upon the purchase price. If the payment is greater in amount than the purchase price, the amount of the difference becomes a debt due the successor from the employer.

(5) This section does not affect other collection remedies that are otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 15. RCW 49.48.125 and 2010 c 42 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall assess a civil penalty against any repeat willful violator in an amount of not less than one thousand dollars or an amount equal to ten percent of the total amount of unpaid wages, whichever is greater. The maximum civil penalty for a repeat willful violator under this section is twenty thousand dollars.

(2) The department may waive or reduce a civil penalty assessed under this section if the director determines that the employer has paid all wages and interest owed to the employee or freelancer.

--- END ---