BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By January 1, 2021, the department shall develop and issue a waste discharge general permit designed to reduce pollution resulting from the unauthorized use of public streets by owners or occupants of recreational vehicles or campers. The permit shall apply in every city and town that abuts Puget Sound. The owner or occupant of a recreational vehicle or camper engaged in the unauthorized use of a public street must be covered by, and shall comply with, the permit authorized under this section. If the owner or occupant of a recreational vehicle or camper subject to this section is unknown or cannot be located, the city or town where the covered discharge is occurring shall contact the department and propose actions the city or town may take to mitigate the effects of pollution resulting from the unauthorized use of public streets by the owner or occupant of the recreational vehicle or camper.

(2) A person subject to the permit authorized in subsection (1) of this section is a point source discharger of pollution for the purposes of this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "general permit" means a permit that covers multiple dischargers of a point source category within a designated geographical area, in lieu of individual permits being issued to each discharger.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "point source" includes the entry of human waste into any type of public drainage or stormwater conveyance system that is not connected to a wastewater treatment plant, resulting from the direct depositing of human waste into such system, or as the result of the human waste entering such system as runoff from a public street or other public area.

--- END ---