BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

GUARDIANSHIP OF MINORS

Sec. 101. RCW 11.130.185 and 2019 c 437 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person becomes a guardian for a minor only on appointment by the court.

(2) The court may appoint a guardian for a minor who does not have a guardian if the court finds the appointment is in the minor's best interest and:

(a) Each parent of the minor, after being fully informed of the nature and consequences of guardianship, consents;

(b) All parental rights have been terminated; or

(c) There is clear and convincing evidence that no parent of the minor is willing or able to exercise ((the powers the court is granting the guardian))parenting functions as defined in RCW 26.09.004.

Sec. 102. RCW 11.130.190 and 2019 c 437 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person interested in the welfare of a minor, including the minor, may petition for appointment of a guardian for the minor.

(2) A petition under subsection (1) of this section must state the petitioner's name, principal residence, current street address, if different, relationship to the minor, interest in the appointment, the name and address of any attorney representing the petitioner, and, to the extent known, the following:

(a) The minor's name, age, principal residence, current street address, if different, and, if different, address of the dwelling in which it is proposed the minor will reside if the appointment is made;

(b) The name and current street address of the minor's parents;

(c) The name and address, if known, of each person that had primary care or custody of the minor for at least sixty days during the two years immediately before the filing of the petition or for at least seven hundred thirty days during the five years immediately before the filing of the petition;

(d) The name and address of any attorney for the minor and any attorney for each parent of the minor;

(e) ((The reason guardianship is sought and would be in the best interest of the minor))The legal basis for the guardianship. Factual reasons why the guardianship is sought and would be in the best interest of the minor shall be set out in a separate supplemental declaration;

(f) The name and address of any proposed guardian and the reason the proposed guardian should be selected;

(g) If the minor has property other than personal effects, a general statement of the minor's property with an estimate of its value;

(h) Whether the minor needs an interpreter, translator, or other form of support to communicate effectively with the court or understand court proceedings;

(i) Whether any parent of the minor needs an interpreter, translator, or other form of support to communicate effectively with the court or understand court proceedings; and

(j) Whether any other proceeding concerning the care or custody of the minor is pending in any court in this state or another jurisdiction.

(3) The court may, upon a showing of good cause, order that the information concerning the reasons for the guardianship contained in the supplemental declaration to the petition and all subsequently filed pleadings and evidence by any party not be served on the minor if the minor is unrepresented. A minor entitled to service under this subsection may request access to the court pleadings and evidence filed in the court record.

(4) Courts may develop forms for the purpose of filing petitions under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 103. RCW 11.130.195 and 2019 c 437 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a petition is filed under RCW 11.130.190, the court shall schedule a hearing and the petitioner shall:

(a) Serve notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing, together with a copy of the petition and supplemental declaration, personally on each of the following that is not the petitioner:

(i) The minor, if the minor ((will be))is twelve years of age or older ((at the time of the hearing)). The court may, upon a showing of good cause, order that information concerning the reasons for the guardianship contained in the petition, the supplemental declaration, and all subsequently filed pleadings and evidence by any party, not be served on the minor if the minor is unrepresented. A minor entitled to service under this subsection may request access to the court pleadings and evidence filed in the court record;

(ii) Each parent of the minor or, if there is none, the adult nearest in kinship who can be found with reasonable diligence;

(iii) ((Any adult with whom the minor resides;

(iv) Each person that had primary care or custody of the minor for at least sixty days during the two years immediately before the filing of the petition or for at least seven hundred thirty days during the five years immediately before the filing of the petition; and

(v)))Any guardian or person with nonparental custody of the minor issued under chapter 26.10 RCW; and

(iv) Any other person the court determines should receive personal service of notice; and

(b)(i) Give notice by mail or other action reasonably calculated to give notice under RCW 11.130.065 of the date, time, and place of the hearing, together with a copy of the petition, to:

(((i)))(A) Any adult with primary care and custody of the minor who is not a parent, guardian, or person with nonparental custody issued under chapter 26.10 RCW;

(B) Each person that had primary care or custody of the minor for at least sixty days during the two years immediately before the filing of the petition or for at least seven hundred thirty days during the five years immediately before the filing of the petition, if known;

(C) Any person nominated as guardian by the minor, if the minor is twelve years of age or older;

(((ii)))(D) Any nominee of a parent;

(((iii)))(E) Each grandparent and adult sibling of the minor, if known;

(((iv)))(F) Any ((guardian or)) conservator acting for the minor in any jurisdiction; and

(((v)))(G) Any other person the court determines.

(ii) The court may waive notice to persons listed under (b)(i) of this subsection for good cause. The court may waive any notice requirement under (b)(i) of this subsection when the minor who is the subject of the petition is an unaccompanied immigrant child.

(2) Notice required by subsection (1) of this section must include a statement of the right to request appointment of an attorney for the minor or object to appointment of a guardian and a description of the nature, purpose, and consequences of appointment of a guardian. Notice for the minor must specifically state all rights retained by the minor including the right to request counsel, the right to attend, and the right to participate.

(3) The court may not grant a petition for guardianship of a minor if notice substantially complying with subsection (1)(a) of this section is not served on:

(a) The minor, if the minor is twelve years of age or older; and

(b) Each parent of the minor, unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the parent cannot with due diligence be located and served or the parent waived, in a record, the right to notice.

(4) If a petitioner is unable to serve notice under subsection (1)(a) of this section on a parent of a minor or alleges that the parent waived, in a record, the right to notice under this section, the court shall appoint a court visitor who shall:

(a) Interview the petitioner and the minor;

(b) If the petitioner alleges the parent cannot be located, ascertain whether the parent cannot be located with due diligence;

(c) Investigate any other matter relating to the petition the court directs; and

(d) Ascertain whether the parent consents to the guardian for the minor.

Sec. 104. RCW 11.130.205 and 2019 c 437 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court shall allow a minor who is the subject of a hearing under RCW 11.130.195 to attend the hearing and allow the minor to participate in the hearing unless the court determines((, by clear and convincing evidence presented at the hearing or a separate hearing,)) that:

(a) The minor lacks the ability or maturity to participate meaningfully in the hearing; or

(b) Attendance would be harmful to the minor.

(2) Unless excused by the court for good cause, the person proposed to be appointed as guardian for a minor shall attend a hearing under RCW 11.130.195.

(3) Each parent of a minor who is the subject of a hearing under RCW 11.130.195 has the right to attend the hearing.

(4) A person may request permission to participate in a hearing under RCW 11.130.195. The court may grant the request, with or without hearing, on determining that it is in the best interest of the minor who is the subject of the hearing. The court may impose appropriate conditions on the person's participation.

Sec. 105. RCW 11.130.210 and 2019 c 437 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before granting any order ((regarding the custody of a child)) under this chapter, the court must consult the judicial information system, if available, to determine the existence of any information and proceedings that are relevant to the placement of the child.

(2) Before entering a final order, the court must:

(a) Direct the department of children, youth, and families to release information as provided under RCW 13.50.100; and

(b) Require the petitioner to provide the results of an examination of state and national criminal identification data provided by the Washington state patrol criminal identification system as described in chapter 43.43 RCW for the petitioner and adult members of the petitioner's household.

Sec. 106. RCW 11.130.215 and 2019 c 437 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After a hearing under RCW 11.130.195, the court may appoint a guardian for a minor, if appointment is proper under RCW 11.130.185, dismiss the proceeding, or take other appropriate action consistent with this chapter or law of this state other than this chapter.

(2) In appointing a guardian under subsection (1) of this section, the following rules apply:

(a) The court shall appoint a person nominated as guardian by a parent of the minor in a will or other record unless the court finds the appointment is contrary to the best interest of the minor.

(b) If multiple parents have nominated different persons to serve as guardian, the court shall appoint the nominee whose appointment is in the best interest of the minor, unless the court finds that appointment of none of the nominees is in the best interest of the minor.

(c) If a guardian is not appointed under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the court shall appoint the person nominated by the minor if the minor is twelve years of age or older unless the court finds that appointment is contrary to the best interest of the minor. In that case, the court shall appoint as guardian a person whose appointment is in the best interest of the minor.

(3) In the interest of maintaining or encouraging involvement by a minor's parent in the minor's life, developing self-reliance of the minor, or for other good cause, the court, at the time of appointment of a guardian for the minor or later, on its own or on motion of the minor or other interested person, may create a limited guardianship by limiting the powers otherwise granted by this article to the guardian. Following the same procedure, the court may grant additional powers or withdraw powers previously granted.

(4) The court, as part of an order appointing a guardian for a minor, shall state rights retained by any parent of the minor, which shall preserve the parent-child relationship through an order for parent-child visitation and other contact, unless the court finds the relationship should be limited or restricted under RCW 26.09.191; and which may include ((contact or visitation with the minor,)) decision making regarding the minor's health care, education, or other matter, or access to a record regarding the minor.

(5) An order granting a guardianship for a minor must state that each parent of the minor is entitled to notice that:

(a) The guardian has delegated custody of the minor subject to guardianship;

(b) The court has modified or limited the powers of the guardian; or

(c) The court has removed the guardian.

(6) An order granting a guardianship for a minor must identify any person in addition to a parent of the minor which is entitled to notice of the events listed in subsection (5) of this section.

(7) An order granting guardianship for a minor must direct the clerk of the court to issue letters of office to the guardian containing an expiration date which should be the minor's eighteenth birthday.

Sec. 107. RCW 11.130.220 and 2019 c 437 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A standby guardian appointed under this section may act as guardian, with all duties and powers of a guardian under RCW 11.130.230 and 11.130.235, when no parent of the minor is willing or able to exercise the duties and powers granted to the guardian.

(2) A parent of a minor, in a signed record, may nominate a person to be appointed by the court as standby guardian for the minor. The parent, in a signed record, may state desired limitations on the powers to be granted the standby guardian. The parent, in a signed record, may revoke or amend the nomination at any time before the court appoints a standby guardian.

(3) The court may appoint a standby guardian for a minor on:

(a) Petition by a parent of the minor or a person nominated under subsection (2) of this section; and

(b) Finding that, within two years after the appointment, no parent of the minor likely will be able or willing to ((care for or make decisions with respect to the minor not later than two years after the appointment))perform parenting functions as defined in RCW 26.09.004.

(4) A petition under subsection (3)(a) of this section must include the same information required under RCW 11.130.190 for the appointment of a guardian for a minor.

(5) On filing a petition under subsection (3)(a) of this section, the petitioner shall:

(a) Serve a copy of the petition personally on:

(i) The minor, if the minor is twelve years of age or older, and the minor's attorney, if any;

(ii) Each parent of the minor;

(iii) The person nominated as standby guardian; and

(iv) Any other person the court determines; and

(b) Include with the copy of the petition served under (a) of this subsection a statement of the right to request appointment of an attorney for the minor or to object to appointment of the standby guardian, and a description of the nature, purpose, and consequences of appointment of a standby guardian.

(6) The court may, upon a showing of good cause, order that the information concerning the reasons for the standby guardianship contained in the petition and all subsequently filed pleadings and evidence by any party not be served on the minor if the minor is unrepresented. A minor entitled to service under this subsection may request access to the court pleadings and evidence filed in the court record.

(7) A person entitled to notice under subsection (5) of this section, not later than sixty days after service of the petition and statement, may object to appointment of the standby guardian by filing an objection with the court and giving notice of the objection to each other person entitled to notice under subsection (5) of this section.

(((7)))(8) If an objection is filed under subsection (((6)))(7) of this section, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether a standby guardian should be appointed and, if so, the person that should be appointed. If no objection is filed, the court may make the appointment.

(((8)))(9) The court may not grant a petition for a standby guardian of the minor if notice substantially complying with subsection (5) of this section is not served on:

(a) The minor, if the minor is twelve years of age or older; and

(b) Each parent of the minor, unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the parent, in a record, waived the right to notice or cannot be located and served with due diligence.

(((9)))(10) If a petitioner is unable to serve notice under subsection (5) of this section on a parent of the minor or alleges that a parent of the minor waived the right to notice under this section, the court shall appoint a court visitor who shall:

(a) Interview the petitioner and the minor;

(b) If the petitioner alleges the parent cannot be located and served, ascertain whether the parent cannot be located with due diligence; and

(c) Investigate any other matter relating to the petition the court directs.

(((10)))(11) If the court finds under subsection (3) of this section that a standby guardian should be appointed, the following rules apply:

(a) The court shall appoint the person nominated under subsection (2) of this section unless the court finds the appointment is contrary to the best interest of the minor.

(b) If the parents have nominated different persons to serve as standby guardian, the court shall appoint the nominee whose appointment is in the best interest of the minor, unless the court finds that appointment of none of the nominees is in the best interest of the minor.

(((11)))(12) An order appointing a standby guardian under this section must state that each parent of the minor is entitled to notice, and identify any other person entitled to notice, if:

(a) The standby guardian assumes the duties and powers of the guardian;

(b) The guardian delegates custody of the minor;

(c) The court modifies or limits the powers of the guardian; or

(d) The court removes the guardian.

(((12)))(13) Before assuming the duties and powers of a guardian, a standby guardian must file with the court an acceptance of appointment as guardian and give notice of the acceptance to:

(a) Each parent of the minor, unless the parent, in a record, waived the right to notice or cannot be located and served with due diligence;

(b) The minor, if the minor is twelve years of age or older; and

(c) Any person, other than the parent, having care or custody of the minor.

(((13)))(14) A person that receives notice under subsection (((12)))(13) of this section or any other person interested in the welfare of the minor may file with the court an objection to the standby guardian's assumption of duties and powers of a guardian. The court shall hold a hearing if the objection supports a reasonable belief that the conditions for assumption of duties and powers have not been satisfied.

Sec. 108. RCW 11.130.225 and 2019 c 437 s 209 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On its own, or on petition by a person interested in a minor's welfare, the court may appoint an emergency guardian for the minor if the court finds:

(a) Appointment of an emergency guardian is likely to prevent substantial harm to the minor's health, safety, or welfare; and

(b) No other person appears to have authority and willingness to act in the circumstances.

(2) The duration of authority of an emergency guardian for a minor may not exceed sixty days and the emergency guardian may exercise only the powers specified in the order of appointment. The emergency guardian's authority may be extended once for not more than sixty days if the court finds that the conditions for appointment of an emergency guardian in subsection (1) of this section continue.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, reasonable notice of the date, time, and place of a hearing on a petition for appointment of an emergency guardian for a minor must be given to:

(a) The minor, if the minor is twelve years of age or older;

(b) Any attorney appointed under RCW 11.130.200;

(c) Each parent of the minor;

(d) Any person, other than a parent, having care or custody of the minor; and

(e) Any other person the court determines.

(4) The court may appoint an emergency guardian for a minor without notice under subsection (3) of this section and a hearing only if the court finds from an affidavit or testimony that the minor's health, safety, or welfare will be substantially harmed before a hearing with notice on the appointment can be held. If the court appoints an emergency guardian without notice to an unrepresented minor or the attorney for a represented minor, notice of the appointment must be given not later than forty-eight hours after the appointment to the individuals listed in subsection (3) of this section. Not later than five days after the appointment, the court shall hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment.

(5) Appointment of an emergency guardian under this section, with or without notice, is not a determination that a basis exists for appointment of a guardian under RCW 11.130.185.

(6) The court may remove an emergency guardian appointed under this section at any time. The emergency guardian shall make any report the court requires.

(7) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the court may extend an emergency guardianship pending the outcome of a full hearing under RCW 11.130.190 or 11.130.220.

(8) If a petition for guardianship under RCW 11.130.215 is pending, or is subsequently filed after a petition under this section, the cases shall be linked or consolidated.

Sec. 109. RCW 11.130.230 and 2019 c 437 s 210 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A guardian for a minor is a fiduciary. Except as otherwise limited by the court, a guardian for a minor has the duties and responsibilities of a parent regarding the minor's support, care, education, health, safety, and welfare. A guardian shall act in the minor's best interest and exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence.

(2) A guardian for a minor shall:

(a) Be personally acquainted with the minor and maintain sufficient contact with the minor to know the minor's abilities, limitations, needs, opportunities, and physical and mental health;

(b) Take reasonable care of the minor's personal effects and bring a proceeding for a conservatorship or protective arrangement instead of conservatorship if necessary to protect other property of the minor;

(c) Expend funds of the minor which have been received by the guardian for the minor's current needs for support, care, education, health, safety, and welfare;

(d) Conserve any funds of the minor not expended under (c) of this subsection for the minor's future needs, but if a conservator is appointed for the minor, pay the funds at least quarterly to the conservator to be conserved for the minor's future needs;

(e) Report the condition of the minor and account for funds and other property of the minor in the guardian's possession or subject to the guardian's control, ((as required by court rule or))if ordered by the court on its own motion or on application of a person interested in the minor's welfare;

(f) Inform the court of any change in the minor's dwelling or address; and

(g) In determining what is in the minor's best interest, take into account the minor's preferences to the extent actually known or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian.

Sec. 110. RCW 11.130.240 and 2019 c 437 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Guardianship under this chapter for a minor terminates:

(a) On the minor's death, adoption, emancipation, or attainment of majority; or

(b) When the court finds that the ((standard))basis in RCW 11.130.185 for appointment of a guardian ((is not satisfied))no longer exists, unless the court finds that:

(i) Termination of the guardianship would be harmful to the minor; and

(ii) The minor's interest in the continuation of the guardianship outweighs the interest of any parent of the minor in restoration of the parent's right to make decisions for the minor.

(2) A minor subject to guardianship or a person interested in the welfare of the minor, including a parent, may petition the court to terminate the guardianship, modify the guardianship, remove the guardian and appoint a successor guardian, or remove a standby guardian and appoint a different standby guardian.

(3) A petitioner under subsection (2) of this section shall give notice of the hearing on the petition to the minor, if the minor is twelve years of age or older and is not the petitioner, the guardian, each parent of the minor, and any other person the court determines.

(4) The court shall follow the priorities in RCW 11.130.215(2) when selecting a successor guardian for a minor.

(5) Not later than thirty days after appointment of a successor guardian for a minor, the court shall give notice of the appointment to the minor subject to guardianship, if the minor is twelve years of age or older, each parent of the minor, and any other person the court determines.

(6) When terminating a guardianship for a minor under this section, the court may issue an order providing for transitional arrangements that will assist the minor with a transition of custody and is in the best interest of the minor.

(7) A guardian for a minor that is removed shall cooperate with a successor guardian to facilitate transition of the guardian's responsibilities and protect the best interest of the minor.

Sec. 111. RCW 11.130.245 and 2019 c 437 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not affect the validity of any court order issued under chapter 26.10 RCW prior to January 1, 2021. Orders issued under chapter 26.10 RCW prior to January 1, 2021, remain in effect and do not need to be reissued in a new order under this chapter.

(2) All orders issued under chapter 26.10 RCW prior to the effective date of chapter 437, Laws of 2019 remain operative after the effective date of chapter 437, Laws of 2019. After the effective date of chapter 437, Laws of 2019, if an order issued under chapter 26.10 RCW is modified, the modification is subject to the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112. A new section is added to chapter 11.130 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In a proceeding under this chapter either party may file a motion for temporary support of children entitled to support. The motion shall be accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and the amount requested.

(2) In a proceeding under this chapter either party may file a motion for a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, providing relief proper in the circumstances, and restraining or enjoining another party from:

(a) Molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party or of any child;

(b) Entering the family home or the home of the other party upon a showing of the necessity therefor;

(c) Knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified location; and

(d) Removing a child from the jurisdiction of the court.

(3) Either party may request a domestic violence protection order under chapter 26.50 RCW or an antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW on a temporary basis by filing an appropriate separate civil cause of action. The petitioner shall inform the court of the existence of the action under this title. The court shall set all future protection hearings on the guardianship calendar to be heard concurrent with the action under this title and the clerk shall relate the cases in the case management system. The court may grant any of the relief provided in RCW 26.50.060 except relief pertaining to residential provisions for the children which provisions shall be provided for under this chapter, and any of the relief provided in RCW 10.14.080. Ex parte orders issued under this subsection shall be effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days, or upon court order, not to exceed twenty-four days if necessary to ensure that all temporary motions in the case can be heard at the same time.

(4) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800, and shall order the respondent to surrender, and prohibit the respondent from possessing, all firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license as required in RCW 9.41.800. Such orders may only be made in the civil protection case related to the action under this title.

(5) The court may issue a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to the other party only if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other evidence that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until the time for responding has elapsed.

(6) The court may issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction and an order for temporary support in such amounts and on such terms as are just and proper in the circumstances.

(7) A temporary order, temporary restraining order, or preliminary injunction:

(a) Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are to be adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;

(b) May be revoked or modified;

(c) Terminates when the final order is entered or when the motion is dismissed;

(d) May be entered in a proceeding for the modification of an existing order.

(8) A support debt owed to the state for public assistance expenditures which has been charged against a party pursuant to RCW 74.20A.040 and/or 74.20A.055 shall not be merged in, or otherwise extinguished by, the final decree or order, unless the office of support enforcement has been given notice of the final proceeding and an opportunity to present its claim for the support debt to the court and has failed to file an affidavit as provided in this subsection. Notice of the proceeding shall be served upon the office of support enforcement personally, or by certified mail, and shall be given no fewer than thirty days prior to the date of the final proceeding. An original copy of the notice shall be filed with the court either before service or within a reasonable time thereafter. The office of support enforcement may present its claim, and thereby preserve the support debt, by filing an affidavit setting forth the amount of the debt with the court, and by mailing a copy of the affidavit to the parties or their attorney prior to the date of the final proceeding.

Sec. 113. RCW 11.130.250 and 2019 c 437 s 214 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every petition filed in proceedings under this chapter shall contain a statement alleging whether the child is or may be an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040. If the child is an Indian child, chapter 13.38 RCW shall apply.

(2) Every order or decree entered in any proceeding under this chapter shall contain a finding that the federal Indian child welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW does or does not apply. Where there is a finding that the federal Indian child welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW does apply, the decree or order must also contain a finding that all notice ((and)), evidentiary requirements, and placement preferences under the federal Indian child welfare act and chapter 13.38 RCW have been satisfied.

Sec. 114. RCW 13.34.030 and 2019 c 172 s 2 and 2019 c 46 s 5016 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abandoned" means when the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian has expressed, either by statement or conduct, an intent to forego, for an extended period, parental rights or responsibilities despite an ability to exercise such rights and responsibilities. If the court finds that the petitioner has exercised due diligence in attempting to locate the parent, no contact between the child and the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian for a period of three months creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment, even if there is no expressed intent to abandon.

(2) "Child," "juvenile," and "youth" mean:

(a) Any individual under the age of eighteen years; or

(b) Any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to receive and who elects to receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031. A youth who remains dependent and who receives extended foster care services under RCW 74.13.031 shall not be considered a "child" under any other statute or for any other purpose.

(3) "Current placement episode" means the period of time that begins with the most recent date that the child was removed from the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of placement in out-of-home care and continues until: (a) The child returns home; (b) an adoption decree, a permanent custody order, or guardianship order is entered; or (c) the dependency is dismissed, whichever occurs first.

(4) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(5) "Dependency guardian" means the person, nonprofit corporation, or Indian tribe appointed by the court pursuant to this chapter for the limited purpose of assisting the court in the supervision of the dependency.

(6) "Dependent child" means any child who:

(a) Has been abandoned;

(b) Is abused or neglected as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW by a person legally responsible for the care of the child;

(c) Has no parent, guardian, or custodian capable of adequately caring for the child, such that the child is in circumstances which constitute a danger of substantial damage to the child's psychological or physical development; or

(d) Is receiving extended foster care services, as authorized by RCW 74.13.031.

(7) "Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another neurological or other condition of an individual found by the secretary of the department of social and health services to be closely related to an intellectual disability or to require treatment similar to that required for individuals with intellectual disabilities, which disability originates before the individual attains age eighteen, which has continued or can be expected to continue indefinitely, and which constitutes a substantial limitation to the individual.

(8) "Educational liaison" means a person who has been appointed by the court to fulfill responsibilities outlined in RCW 13.34.046.

(9) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other support services the department is authorized to provide under RCW 74.13.031. These services may include placement in licensed, relative, or otherwise approved care, or supervised independent living settings; assistance in meeting basic needs; independent living services; medical assistance; and counseling or treatment.

(10) "Guardian" means the person or agency that: (a) Has been appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding, including a guardian appointed pursuant to chapter 13.36 RCW; and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under this chapter.

(11) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, appointed by the court to represent the best interests of a child in a proceeding under this chapter, or in any matter which may be consolidated with a proceeding under this chapter. A "court-appointed special advocate" appointed by the court to be the guardian ad litem for the child, or to perform substantially the same duties and functions as a guardian ad litem, shall be deemed to be guardian ad litem for all purposes and uses of this chapter.

(12) "Guardian ad litem program" means a court-authorized volunteer program, which is or may be established by the superior court of the county in which such proceeding is filed, to manage all aspects of volunteer guardian ad litem representation for children alleged or found to be dependent. Such management shall include but is not limited to: Recruitment, screening, training, supervision, assignment, and discharge of volunteers.

(13) "Guardianship" means a guardianship pursuant to chapter 13.36 RCW or a limited guardianship of a minor pursuant to RCW 11.130.215 or equivalent laws of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(14) "Housing assistance" means appropriate referrals by the department or other agencies to federal, state, local, or private agencies or organizations, assistance with forms, applications, or financial subsidies or other monetary assistance for housing. For purposes of this chapter, "housing assistance" is not a remedial service or family reunification service as described in RCW 13.34.025(2).

(((14)))(15) "Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court proceeding, is:

(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance: Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, medical care services under RCW 74.09.035, pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or supplemental security income; or

(b) Involuntarily committed to a public mental health facility; or

(c) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less of the federally established poverty level; or

(d) Unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter before the court because his or her available funds are insufficient to pay any amount for the retention of counsel.

(((15)))(16) "Nonminor dependent" means any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is participating in extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

(((16)))(17) "Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(((17)))(18) "Parent" means the biological or adoptive parents of a child, or an individual who has established a parent-child relationship under RCW 26.26A.100, unless the legal rights of that person have been terminated by a judicial proceeding pursuant to this chapter, chapter 26.33 RCW, or the equivalent laws of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(((18)))(19) "Prevention and family services and programs" means specific mental health prevention and treatment services, substance abuse prevention and treatment services, and in-home parent skill-based programs that qualify for federal funding under the federal family first prevention services act, P.L. 115-123. For purposes of this chapter, prevention and family services and programs are not remedial services or family reunification services as described in RCW 13.34.025(2).

(((19)))(20) "Prevention services" means preservation services, as defined in chapter 74.14C RCW, and other reasonably available services, including housing assistance, capable of preventing the need for out-of-home placement while protecting the child. Prevention services include, but are not limited to, prevention and family services and programs as defined in this section.

(((20)))(21) "Qualified residential treatment program" means a program licensed as a group care facility under chapter 74.15 RCW that also qualifies for funding under the federal family first prevention services act under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 672(k) and meets the requirements provided in RCW 13.34.420.

(((21)))(22) "Relative" includes persons related to a child in the following ways:

(a) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;

(b) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;

(c) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law;

(d) Spouses of any persons named in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, even after the marriage is terminated;

(e) Relatives, as named in (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection, of any half sibling of the child; or

(f) Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four hour basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);

(((22)))(23) "Shelter care" means temporary physical care in a facility licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in a home not required to be licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030.

(((23)))(24) "Sibling" means a child's birth brother, birth sister, adoptive brother, adoptive sister, half-brother, or half-sister, or as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe for an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040.

(((24)))(25) "Social study" means a written evaluation of matters relevant to the disposition of the case that contains the information required by RCW 13.34.430.

(((25)))(26) "Supervised independent living" includes, but is not limited to, apartment living, room and board arrangements, college or university dormitories, and shared roommate settings. Supervised independent living settings must be approved by the department or the court.

(((26)))(27) "Voluntary placement agreement" means, for the purposes of extended foster care services, a written voluntary agreement between a nonminor dependent who agrees to submit to the care and authority of the department for the purposes of participating in the extended foster care program.

Sec. 115. RCW 13.34.062 and 2018 c 58 s 71 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Whenever a child is taken into custody by child protective services pursuant to a court order issued under RCW 13.34.050 or when child protective services is notified that a child has been taken into custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.050 or 26.44.056, child protective services shall make reasonable efforts to inform the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the fact that the child has been taken into custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody, and their legal rights under this title, including the right to a shelter care hearing, as soon as possible. Notice must be provided in an understandable manner and take into consideration the parent's, guardian's, or legal custodian's primary language, level of education, and cultural issues.

(b) In no event shall the notice required by this section be provided to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian more than twenty-four hours after the child has been taken into custody or twenty-four hours after child protective services has been notified that the child has been taken into custody.

(2)(a) The notice of custody and rights may be given by any means reasonably certain of notifying the parents including, but not limited to, written, telephone, or in person oral notification. If the initial notification is provided by a means other than writing, child protective services shall make reasonable efforts to also provide written notification.

(b) The written notice of custody and rights required by this section shall be in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

Your child has been placed in temporary custody under the supervision of Child Protective Services (or other person or agency). You have important legal rights and you must take steps to protect your interests.

1. A court hearing will be held before a judge within 72 hours of the time your child is taken into custody excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. You should call the court at (( (insert appropriate phone number here) )). . . (insert appropriate phone number here) for specific information about the date, time, and location of the court hearing.

2. You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the hearing. Your right to representation continues after the shelter care hearing. You have the right to records the department intends to rely upon. A lawyer can look at the files in your case, talk to child protective services and other agencies, tell you about the law, help you understand your rights, and help you at hearings. If you cannot afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To get a court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (( (explain local procedure) )). . . (explain local procedure).

3. At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own behalf, to introduce evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a decision based solely on the evidence presented to the judge.

4. If your hearing occurs before a court commissioner, you have the right to have the decision of the court commissioner reviewed by a superior court judge. To obtain that review, you must, within ten days after the entry of the decision of the court commissioner, file with the court a motion for revision of the decision, as provided in RCW 2.24.050.

You should be present at any shelter care hearing. If you do not come, the judge will not hear what you have to say.

You may call the Child Protective Services' caseworker for more information about your child. The caseworker's name and telephone number are: (( (insert name and telephone number) )). . . (insert name and telephone number).

5. You have a right to a case conference to develop a written service agreement following the shelter care hearing. The service agreement may not conflict with the court's order of shelter care. You may request that a multidisciplinary team, family group conference, or prognostic staffing be convened for your child's case. You may participate in these processes with your counsel present.

6. If your child is placed in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families or other supervising agency, immediately following the shelter care hearing, the court will enter an order granting the department or other supervising agency the right to inspect and copy all health, medical, mental health, and education records of the child, directing health care providers to release such information without your further consent, and granting the department or supervising agency or its designee the authority and responsibility, where applicable, to:

(1) Notify the child's school that the child is in out-of-home placement;

(2) Enroll the child in school;

(3) Request the school transfer records;

(4) Request and authorize evaluation of special needs;

(5) Attend parent or teacher conferences;

(6) Excuse absences;

(7) Grant permission for extracurricular activities;

(8) Authorize medications which need to be administered during school hours and sign for medical needs that arise during school hours; and

(9) Complete or update school emergency records.

7. If the court decides to place your child in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families or other supervising agency, the department or agency will create a permanency plan for your child, including a primary placement goal and secondary placement goal. The department or agency also will recommend that the court order services for your child and for you, if needed. The department or agency is required to make reasonable efforts to provide you with services to address your parenting problems, and to provide you with visitation with your child according to court orders. Failure to promptly engage in services or to maintain contact with your child may lead to the filing of a petition to terminate your parental rights.

8. Primary and secondary permanency plans are intended to run at the same time so that your child will have a permanent home as quickly as possible. Absent good cause, and when appropriate, the department or other supervising agency must follow the wishes of a natural parent regarding placement of a child. You should tell your lawyer and the court where you wish your child placed immediately, including whether you want your child placed with you, with a relative, or with another suitable person. You also should tell your lawyer and the court what services you feel are necessary and your wishes regarding visitation with your child. Even if you want another parent or person to be the primary placement choice for your child, you should tell your lawyer, the department or other supervising agency, and the court if you want to be a secondary placement option, and you should comply with court orders for services and participate in visitation with your child. Early and consistent involvement in your child's case plan is important for the well-being of your child.

9. A dependency petition begins a judicial process, which, if the court finds your child dependent, could result in substantial restrictions including, the entry or modification of a parenting plan or residential schedule, previously existing nonparental custody order or decree, guardianship order, or permanent loss of your parental rights."

Upon receipt of the written notice, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall acknowledge such notice by signing a receipt prepared by child protective services. If the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not sign the receipt, the reason for lack of a signature shall be written on the receipt. The receipt shall be made a part of the court's file in the dependency action.

If after making reasonable efforts to provide notification, child protective services is unable to determine the whereabouts of the parents, guardian, or legal custodian, the notice shall be delivered or sent to the last known address of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian.

(3) If child protective services is not required to give notice under this section, the juvenile court counselor assigned to the matter shall make all reasonable efforts to advise the parents, guardian, or legal custodian of the time and place of any shelter care hearing, request that they be present, and inform them of their basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090.

(4) Reasonable efforts to advise and to give notice, as required in this section, shall include, at a minimum, investigation of the whereabouts of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. If such reasonable efforts are not successful, or the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not appear at the shelter care hearing, the petitioner shall testify at the hearing or state in a declaration:

(a) The efforts made to investigate the whereabouts of, and to advise, the parent, guardian, or custodian; and

(b) Whether actual advice of rights was made, to whom it was made, and how it was made, including the substance of any oral communication or copies of written materials used.

Sec. 116. RCW 13.34.110 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court shall hold a fact-finding hearing on the petition and, unless the court dismisses the petition, shall make written findings of fact, stating the reasons therefor. The rules of evidence shall apply at the fact-finding hearing and the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child shall have all of the rights provided in RCW 13.34.090(1). The petitioner shall have the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030.

(2) The court in a fact-finding hearing may consider the history of past involvement of child protective services or law enforcement agencies with the family for the purpose of establishing a pattern of conduct, behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or welfare of the child on the part of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, or for the purpose of establishing that reasonable efforts have been made by the department to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been destroyed or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such purposes.

(3)(a) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child may waive his or her right to a fact-finding hearing by stipulating or agreeing to the entry of an order of dependency establishing that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030. The parent, guardian, or legal custodian may also stipulate or agree to an order of disposition pursuant to RCW 13.34.130 at the same time. Any stipulated or agreed order of dependency or disposition must be signed by the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and his or her attorney, unless the parent, guardian, or legal custodian has waived his or her right to an attorney in open court, and by the petitioner and the attorney, guardian ad litem, or court-appointed special advocate for the child, if any. If the department is not the petitioner and is required by the order to supervise the placement of the child or provide services to any party, the department must also agree to and sign the order.

(b) Entry of any stipulated or agreed order of dependency or disposition is subject to approval by the court. The court shall receive and review a social study before entering a stipulated or agreed order and shall consider whether the order is consistent with the allegations of the dependency petition and the problems that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care. No social file or social study may be considered by the court in connection with the fact-finding hearing or prior to factual determination, except as otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence.

(c) Prior to the entry of any stipulated or agreed order of dependency, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child and his or her attorney must appear before the court and the court within available resources must inquire and establish on the record that:

(i) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian understands the terms of the order or orders he or she has signed, including his or her responsibility to participate in remedial services as provided in any disposition order;

(ii) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian understands that entry of the order starts a process that could result in the filing of a petition to terminate his or her relationship with the child within the time frames required by state and federal law if he or she fails to comply with the terms of the dependency or disposition orders or fails to substantially remedy the problems that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care;

(iii) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian understands that the entry of the stipulated or agreed order of dependency is an admission that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030 and shall have the same legal effect as a finding by the court that the child is dependent by at least a preponderance of the evidence, and that the parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall not have the right in any subsequent proceeding for termination of parental rights ((or dependency guardianship)) pursuant to this chapter or ((nonparental custody))guardianship pursuant to ((chapter 26.10))chapters 13.36 or 11.130 RCW to challenge or dispute the fact that the child was found to be dependent; and

(iv) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian knowingly and willingly stipulated and agreed to and signed the order or orders, without duress, and without misrepresentation or fraud by any other party.

If a parent, guardian, or legal custodian fails to appear before the court after stipulating or agreeing to entry of an order of dependency, the court may enter the order upon a finding that the parent, guardian, or legal custodian had actual notice of the right to appear before the court and chose not to do so. The court may require other parties to the order, including the attorney for the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, to appear and advise the court of the parent's, guardian's, or legal custodian's notice of the right to appear and understanding of the factors specified in this subsection. A parent, guardian, or legal custodian may choose to waive his or her presence at the in-court hearing for entry of the stipulated or agreed order of dependency by submitting to the court through counsel a completed stipulated or agreed dependency fact-finding/disposition statement in a form determined by the Washington state supreme court pursuant to General Rule GR 9.

(4) Immediately after the entry of the findings of fact, the court shall hold a disposition hearing, unless there is good cause for continuing the matter for up to fourteen days. If good cause is shown, the case may be continued for longer than fourteen days. Notice of the time and place of the continued hearing may be given in open court. If notice in open court is not given to a party, that party shall be notified by certified mail of the time and place of any continued hearing. Unless there is reasonable cause to believe the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or efforts to reunite the parent and child would be hindered, the court shall direct the department to notify those adult persons who: (a) Are related by blood or marriage to the child in the following degrees: Parent, grandparent, brother, sister, stepparent, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, or aunt; (b) are known to the department as having been in contact with the family or child within the past twelve months; and (c) would be an appropriate placement for the child. Reasonable cause to dispense with notification to a parent under this section must be proved by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

The parties need not appear at the fact-finding or dispositional hearing if the parties, their attorneys, the guardian ad litem, and court-appointed special advocates, if any, are all in agreement.

Sec. 117. RCW 13.34.136 and 2018 c 284 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from the home, a permanency plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the department assumes responsibility for providing services, including placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW 13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency planning process continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved or dependency is dismissed. The planning process shall include reasonable efforts to return the child to the parent's home.

(2) The department shall submit a written permanency plan to all parties and the court not less than fourteen days prior to the scheduled hearing. Responsive reports of parties not in agreement with the department's proposed permanency plan must be provided to the department, all other parties, and the court at least seven days prior to the hearing.

The permanency plan shall include:

(a) A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the following outcomes as a primary goal and may identify additional outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption, including a tribal customary adoption as defined in RCW 13.38.040; guardianship pursuant to chapter 13.36 RCW; guardianship of a minor pursuant to RCW 11.130.215; ((permanent legal custody;)) long-term relative or foster care, if the child is between ages sixteen and eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and the care provider; successful completion of a responsible living skills program; or independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age sixteen or older. Although a permanency plan of care may only identify long-term relative or foster care for children between ages sixteen and eighteen, children under sixteen may remain placed with relatives or in foster care. The department shall not discharge a child to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW;

(b) Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(8), that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be placed, what steps will be taken to return the child home, what steps the department will take to promote existing appropriate sibling relationships and/or facilitate placement together or contact in accordance with the best interests of each child, and what actions the department will take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.

(i) The department's plan shall specify what services the parents will be offered to enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents must meet to resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and parental requirement.

(A) If the parent is incarcerated, the plan must address how the parent will participate in the case conference and permanency planning meetings and, where possible, must include treatment that reflects the resources available at the facility where the parent is confined. The plan must provide for visitation opportunities, unless visitation is not in the best interests of the child.

(B) If a parent has a developmental disability according to the definition provided in RCW 71A.10.020, and that individual is eligible for services provided by the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration, the department shall make reasonable efforts to consult with the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration to create an appropriate plan for services. For individuals who meet the definition of developmental disability provided in RCW 71A.10.020 and who are eligible for services through the developmental disabilities administration, the plan for services must be tailored to correct the parental deficiency taking into consideration the parent's disability and the department shall also determine an appropriate method to offer those services based on the parent's disability.

(ii)(A) Visitation is the right of the family, including the child and the parent, in cases in which visitation is in the best interest of the child. Early, consistent, and frequent visitation is crucial for maintaining parent-child relationships and making it possible for parents and children to safely reunify. The department shall encourage the maximum parent and child and sibling contact possible, when it is in the best interest of the child, including regular visitation and participation by the parents in the care of the child while the child is in placement.

(B) Visitation shall not be limited as a sanction for a parent's failure to comply with court orders or services where the health, safety, or welfare of the child is not at risk as a result of the visitation.

(C) Visitation may be limited or denied only if the court determines that such limitation or denial is necessary to protect the child's health, safety, or welfare. When a parent or sibling has been identified as a suspect in an active criminal investigation for a violent crime that, if the allegations are true, would impact the safety of the child, the department shall make a concerted effort to consult with the assigned law enforcement officer in the criminal case before recommending any changes in parent/child or child/sibling contact. In the event that the law enforcement officer has information pertaining to the criminal case that may have serious implications for child safety or well-being, the law enforcement officer shall provide this information to the department during the consultation. The department may only use the information provided by law enforcement during the consultation to inform family visitation plans and may not share or otherwise distribute the information to any person or entity. Any information provided to the department by law enforcement during the consultation is considered investigative information and is exempt from public inspection pursuant to RCW 42.56.240. The results of the consultation shall be communicated to the court.

(D) The court and the department should rely upon community resources, relatives, foster parents, and other appropriate persons to provide transportation and supervision for visitation to the extent that such resources are available, and appropriate, and the child's safety would not be compromised.

(iii)(A) The department, court, or caregiver in the out-of-home placement may not limit visitation or contact between a child and sibling as a sanction for a child's behavior or as an incentive to the child to change his or her behavior.

(B) Any exceptions, limitation, or denial of contacts or visitation must be approved by the supervisor of the department caseworker and documented. The child, parent, department, guardian ad litem, or court-appointed special advocate may challenge the denial of visits in court.

(iv) A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as possible, preferably in the child's own neighborhood, unless the court finds that placement at a greater distance is necessary to promote the child's or parents' well-being.

(v) The plan shall state whether both in-state and, where appropriate, out-of-state placement options have been considered by the department.

(vi) Unless it is not in the best interests of the child, whenever practical, the plan should ensure the child remains enrolled in the school the child was attending at the time the child entered foster care.

(vii) The department shall provide all reasonable services that are available within the department, or within the community, or those services which the department has existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to the court if it is unable to provide such services; and

(c) If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(((8)))(9), that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the child, services to be offered or provided to the child, and, if visitation would be in the best interests of the child, a recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent and child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The department shall not be required to develop a plan of services for the parents or provide services to the parents if the court orders a termination petition be filed. However, reasonable efforts to ensure visitation and contact between siblings shall be made unless there is reasonable cause to believe the best interests of the child or siblings would be jeopardized.

(3) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest possible date. If the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen of the most recent twenty-two months, and the court has not made a good cause exception, the court shall require the department to file a petition seeking termination of parental rights in accordance with RCW 13.34.145(4)(b)(vi). In cases where parental rights have been terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the termination order.

(4) If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from his or her home or to safely return the child home should not be part of the permanency plan of care for the child, reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

(5) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.

(6) The court shall consider the child's relationships with the child's siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(((6)))(7). Whenever the permanency plan for a child is adoption, the court shall encourage the prospective adoptive parents, birth parents, foster parents, kinship caregivers, and the department or other agency to seriously consider the long-term benefits to the child adoptee and his or her siblings of providing for and facilitating continuing postadoption contact between the siblings. To the extent that it is feasible, and when it is in the best interests of the child adoptee and his or her siblings, contact between the siblings should be frequent and of a similar nature as that which existed prior to the adoption. If the child adoptee or his or her siblings are represented by an attorney or guardian ad litem in a proceeding under this chapter or in any other child custody proceeding, the court shall inquire of each attorney and guardian ad litem regarding the potential benefits of continuing contact between the siblings and the potential detriments of severing contact. This section does not require the department or other agency to agree to any specific provisions in an open adoption agreement and does not create a new obligation for the department to provide supervision or transportation for visits between siblings separated by adoption from foster care.

(7) For purposes related to permanency planning((:

(a) "Guardianship")), "guardianship" means a ((dependency guardianship or a legal)) guardianship pursuant to chapter ((11.88))13.36 RCW or a guardianship of a minor pursuant to RCW 11.130.215, or equivalent laws of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(((b) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.

(c) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.))

Sec. 118. RCW 13.34.145 and 2019 c 172 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of a permanency planning hearing is to review the permanency plan for the child, inquire into the welfare of the child and progress of the case, and reach decisions regarding the permanent placement of the child.

(a) A permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and an adoption decree, guardianship order, or permanent custody order has not previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later than twelve months following commencement of the current placement episode.

(b) Whenever a child is removed from the home of a dependency guardian or long-term relative or foster care provider, and the child is not returned to the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian but is placed in out-of-home care, a permanency planning hearing shall take place no later than twelve months, as provided in this section, following the date of removal unless, prior to the hearing, the child returns to the home of the dependency guardian or long-term care provider, the child is placed in the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, an adoption decree, guardianship order, or a permanent custody order is entered, or the dependency is dismissed. Every effort shall be made to provide stability in long-term placement, and to avoid disruption of placement, unless the child is being returned home or it is in the best interest of the child.

(c) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest possible date, preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen months. In cases where parental rights have been terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the termination order.

(2) No later than ten working days prior to the permanency planning hearing, the agency having custody of the child shall submit a written permanency plan to the court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all parties and their legal counsel, if any.

(3) When the youth is at least age seventeen years but not older than seventeen years and six months, the department shall provide the youth with written documentation which explains the availability of extended foster care services and detailed instructions regarding how the youth may access such services after he or she reaches age eighteen years.

(4) At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall conduct the following inquiry:

(a) If a goal of long-term foster or relative care has been achieved prior to the permanency planning hearing, the court shall review the child's status to determine whether the placement and the plan for the child's care remain appropriate. The court shall find, as of the date of the hearing, that the child's placement and plan of care is the best permanency plan for the child and provide compelling reasons why it continues to not be in the child's best interest to (i) return home; (ii) be placed for adoption; (iii) be placed with a legal guardian; or (iv) be placed with a fit and willing relative. If the child is present at the hearing, the court should ask the child about his or her desired permanency outcome.

(b) In cases where the primary permanency planning goal has not been achieved, the court shall inquire regarding the reasons why the primary goal has not been achieved and determine what needs to be done to make it possible to achieve the primary goal. The court shall review the permanency plan prepared by the agency and make explicit findings regarding each of the following:

(i) The continuing necessity for, and the safety and appropriateness of, the placement;

(ii) The extent of compliance with the permanency plan by the department and any other service providers, the child's parents, the child, and the child's guardian, if any;

(iii) The extent of any efforts to involve appropriate service providers in addition to department staff in planning to meet the special needs of the child and the child's parents;

(iv) The progress toward eliminating the causes for the child's placement outside of his or her home and toward returning the child safely to his or her home or obtaining a permanent placement for the child;

(v) The date by which it is likely that the child will be returned to his or her home or placed for adoption, with a guardian or in some other alternative permanent placement; and

(vi) If the child has been placed outside of his or her home for fifteen of the most recent twenty-two months, not including any period during which the child was a runaway from the out-of-home placement or the first six months of any period during which the child was returned to his or her home for a trial home visit, the appropriateness of the permanency plan, whether reasonable efforts were made by the department to achieve the goal of the permanency plan, and the circumstances which prevent the child from any of the following:

(A) Being returned safely to his or her home;

(B) Having a petition for the involuntary termination of parental rights filed on behalf of the child;

(C) Being placed for adoption;

(D) Being placed with a guardian;

(E) Being placed in the home of a fit and willing relative of the child; or

(F) Being placed in some other alternative permanent placement, including independent living or long-term foster care.

(c) Regardless of whether the primary permanency planning goal has been achieved, for a child who remains placed in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in this chapter for at least sixty days, and remains placed there at subsequent permanency planning hearings, the court shall establish in writing:

(i) Whether ongoing assessment of the child's strengths and needs continues to support the determination that the child's needs cannot be met through placement in a foster family home;

(ii) Whether the child's placement provides the most effective and appropriate level of care in the least restrictive environment;

(iii) Whether the placement is consistent with the child's short and long-term goals as stated in the child's permanency plan;

(iv) What specific treatment or service needs will be met in the placement, and how long the child is expected to need the treatment or services; and

(v) What efforts the department has made to prepare the child to return home or be placed with a fit and willing relative as defined in RCW 13.34.030, a Title 13 RCW ((legal)) guardian, a guardian pursuant to RCW 11.130.215, an adoptive parent, or in a foster family home.

(5) Following this inquiry, at the permanency planning hearing, the court shall order the department to file a petition seeking termination of parental rights if the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen of the last twenty-two months since the date the dependency petition was filed unless the court makes a good cause exception as to why the filing of a termination of parental rights petition is not appropriate. Any good cause finding shall be reviewed at all subsequent hearings pertaining to the child.

(a) For purposes of this subsection, "good cause exception" includes but is not limited to the following:

(i) The child is being cared for by a relative;

(ii) The department has not provided to the child's family such services as the court and the department have deemed necessary for the child's safe return home;

(iii) The department has documented in the case plan a compelling reason for determining that filing a petition to terminate parental rights would not be in the child's best interests;

(iv) The parent is incarcerated, or the parent's prior incarceration is a significant factor in why the child has been in foster care for fifteen of the last twenty-two months, the parent maintains a meaningful role in the child's life, and the department has not documented another reason why it would be otherwise appropriate to file a petition pursuant to this section;

(v) Where a parent has been accepted into a dependency treatment court program or long-term substance abuse or dual diagnoses treatment program and is demonstrating compliance with treatment goals; or

(vi) Where a parent who has been court ordered to complete services necessary for the child's safe return home files a declaration under penalty of perjury stating the parent's financial inability to pay for the same court-ordered services, and also declares the department was unwilling or unable to pay for the same services necessary for the child's safe return home.

(b) The court's assessment of whether a parent who is incarcerated maintains a meaningful role in the child's life may include consideration of the following:

(i) The parent's expressions or acts of manifesting concern for the child, such as letters, telephone calls, visits, and other forms of communication with the child;

(ii) The parent's efforts to communicate and work with the department or other individuals for the purpose of complying with the service plan and repairing, maintaining, or building the parent-child relationship;

(iii) A positive response by the parent to the reasonable efforts of the department;

(iv) Information provided by individuals or agencies in a reasonable position to assist the court in making this assessment, including but not limited to the parent's attorney, correctional and mental health personnel, or other individuals providing services to the parent;

(v) Limitations in the parent's access to family support programs, therapeutic services, and visiting opportunities, restrictions to telephone and mail services, inability to participate in foster care planning meetings, and difficulty accessing lawyers and participating meaningfully in court proceedings; and

(vi) Whether the continued involvement of the parent in the child's life is in the child's best interest.

(c) The constraints of a parent's current or prior incarceration and associated delays or barriers to accessing court-mandated services may be considered in rebuttal to a claim of aggravated circumstances under RCW 13.34.132(4)(h) for a parent's failure to complete available treatment.

(6)(a) If the permanency plan identifies independent living as a goal, the court at the permanency planning hearing shall make a finding that the provision of services to assist the child in making a transition from foster care to independent living will allow the child to manage his or her financial, personal, social, educational, and nonfinancial affairs prior to approving independent living as a permanency plan of care. The court will inquire whether the child has been provided information about extended foster care services.

(b) The permanency plan shall also specifically identify the services, including extended foster care services, where appropriate, that will be provided to assist the child to make a successful transition from foster care to independent living.

(c) The department shall not discharge a child to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW.

(7) If the child has resided in the home of a foster parent or relative for more than six months prior to the permanency planning hearing, the court shall:

(a) Enter a finding regarding whether the foster parent or relative was informed of the hearing as required in RCW 74.13.280, 13.34.215(6), and 13.34.096; and

(b) If the department is recommending a placement other than the child's current placement with a foster parent, relative, or other suitable person, enter a finding as to the reasons for the recommendation for a change in placement.

(8) In all cases, at the permanency planning hearing, the court shall:

(a)(i) Order the permanency plan prepared by the department to be implemented; or

(ii) Modify the permanency plan, and order implementation of the modified plan; and

(b)(i) Order the child returned home only if the court finds that a reason for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists; or

(ii) Order the child to remain in out-of-home care for a limited specified time period while efforts are made to implement the permanency plan.

(9) Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court shall hold a further permanency planning hearing in accordance with this section at least once every twelve months until a permanency planning goal is achieved or the dependency is dismissed, whichever occurs first.

(10) Prior to the second permanency planning hearing, the agency that has custody of the child shall consider whether to file a petition for termination of parental rights.

(11) If the court orders the child returned home, casework supervision by the department shall continue for at least six months, at which time a review hearing shall be held pursuant to RCW 13.34.138, and the court shall determine the need for continued intervention.

(12) The juvenile court may hear a petition for permanent legal custody when: (a) The court has ordered implementation of a permanency plan that includes permanent legal custody; and (b) the party pursuing the permanent legal custody is the party identified in the permanency plan as the prospective legal custodian. During the pendency of such proceeding, the court shall conduct review hearings and further permanency planning hearings as provided in this chapter. At the conclusion of the legal guardianship or permanent legal custody proceeding, a juvenile court hearing shall be held for the purpose of determining whether dependency should be dismissed. If a guardianship or permanent custody order has been entered, the dependency shall be dismissed.

(13) Continued juvenile court jurisdiction under this chapter shall not be a barrier to the entry of an order establishing a legal guardianship or permanent legal custody when the requirements of subsection (12) of this section are met.

(14) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the ability of the agency that has custody of the child to file a petition for termination of parental rights or a guardianship petition at any time following the establishment of dependency. Upon the filing of such a petition, a fact-finding hearing shall be scheduled and held in accordance with this chapter unless the department requests dismissal of the petition prior to the hearing or unless the parties enter an agreed order terminating parental rights, establishing guardianship, or otherwise resolving the matter.

(15) The approval of a permanency plan that does not contemplate return of the child to the parent does not relieve the department of its obligation to provide reasonable services, under this chapter, intended to effectuate the return of the child to the parent, including but not limited to, visitation rights. The court shall consider the child's relationships with siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130.

(16) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the procedural due process rights of any party in a termination or guardianship proceeding filed under this chapter.

Sec. 119. RCW 13.34.155 and 2019 c 46 s 5017 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court hearing the dependency petition may hear and determine issues related to ((chapter 26.10 RCW))a guardianship of a minor under RCW 11.130.215 in a dependency proceeding as necessary to facilitate a permanency plan for the child or children as part of the dependency disposition order or a dependency review order or as otherwise necessary to implement a permanency plan of care for a child. Any modification or establishment of a guardianship of a minor must be made in conformity with the standards in chapter 11.130 RCW. The parents, guardians, or legal custodian of the child must agree, subject to court approval, to establish or modify a ((permanent custody order))guardianship of a minor, but the court may decide any contested issues implementing the guardianship. This agreed ((order))guardianship of a minor may have the concurrence of the other parties to the dependency, the guardian ad litem of the child, and the child if age twelve or older, and must also be in the best interests of the child. If the petitioner for a ((custody))guardianship of a minor order under ((chapter 26.10)) RCW 11.130.215 is not a party to the dependency proceeding, he or she must agree on the record or by the filing of a declaration to the entry of a ((custody order))guardianship of a minor. Once ((an))a guardianship of a minor order is entered under ((chapter 26.10)) RCW 11.130.215, and the dependency petition dismissed, the department shall not continue to supervise the placement.

(2)(a) The court hearing the dependency petition may establish or modify a parenting plan under chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW as part of a disposition order or at a review hearing when doing so will implement a permanent plan of care for the child and result in dismissal of the dependency.

(b) The dependency court shall adhere to procedural requirements under chapter 26.09 RCW and must make a written finding that the parenting plan established or modified by the dependency court under this section is in the child's best interests.

(c) Unless the whereabouts of one of the parents is unknown to either the department or the court, the parents must agree, subject to court approval, to establish the parenting plan or modify an existing parenting plan.

(d) Whenever the court is asked to establish or modify a parenting plan, the child's residential schedule, the allocation of decision-making authority, and dispute resolution under this section, the dependency court may:

(i) Appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of the child when the court believes the appointment is necessary to protect the best interests of the child; and

(ii) Appoint an attorney to represent the interests of the child with respect to provisions for the parenting plan.

(e) The dependency court must make a written finding that the parenting plan established or modified by the dependency court under this section is in the child's best interests.

(f) The dependency court may interview the child in chambers to ascertain the child's wishes as to the child's residential schedule in a proceeding for the entry or modification of a parenting plan under this section. The court may permit counsel to be present at the interview. The court shall cause a record of the interview to be made and to become part of the court record of the dependency case and the case under chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW.

(g) In the absence of agreement by a parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child to allow the juvenile court to hear and determine issues related to the establishment or modification of a parenting plan under chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW, a party may move the court to transfer such issues to the family law department of the superior court for further resolution. The court may only grant the motion upon entry of a written finding that it is in the best interests of the child.

(h) In any parenting plan agreed to by the parents and entered or modified in juvenile court under this section, all issues pertaining to child support and the division of marital property shall be referred to or retained by the family law department of the superior court.

(3) ((Any court order determining issues under chapter 26.10 RCW is subject to modification upon the same showing and standards as a court order determining Title 26 RCW issues.

(4))) Any order entered in the dependency court establishing or modifying a ((permanent legal custody order))guardianship of a minor under RCW 11.130.215, parenting plan, or residential schedule under chapter 26.09, ((26.10,)) 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW shall also be filed in the chapter 11.130, 26.09, ((26.10,)) 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW action by the moving or prevailing party. If the petitioning or moving party has been found indigent and appointed counsel at public expense in the dependency proceeding, no filing fees shall be imposed by the clerk. Once filed, any guardianship of a minor order, parenting plan, or residential schedule establishing or modifying permanent legal custody of a child shall survive dismissal of the dependency proceeding.

Sec. 120. RCW 13.34.210 and 2018 c 284 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

If, upon entering an order terminating the parental rights of a parent, there remains no parent having parental rights, the court shall commit the child to the custody of the department willing to accept custody for the purpose of placing the child for adoption. If an adoptive home has not been identified, the department shall place the child in a licensed foster home, or take other suitable measures for the care and welfare of the child. The custodian shall have authority to consent to the adoption of the child consistent with chapter 26.33 RCW, the marriage of the child, the enlistment of the child in the armed forces of the United States, necessary surgical and other medical treatment for the child, and to consent to such other matters as might normally be required of the parent of the child.

If a child has not been adopted within six months after the date of the order and a guardianship of the child under chapter 13.36 RCW or ((chapter 11.88 RCW, or a permanent custody order under chapter 26.10 RCW,))a guardianship of a minor under RCW 11.130.215 has not been entered by the court, the court shall review the case every six months until a decree of adoption is entered. The department shall take reasonable steps to ensure that the child maintains relationships with siblings as provided in RCW 13.34.130(((6)))(7) and shall report to the court the status and extent of such relationships.

Sec. 121. RCW 13.50.100 and 2019 c 470 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section governs records not covered by RCW 13.50.050, 13.50.260, and 13.50.270.

(2) Records covered by this section shall be confidential and shall be released only pursuant to this section and RCW 13.50.010.

(3) Records retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care agency may be released to other participants in the juvenile justice or care system only when an investigation or case involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by the other participant or when that other participant is assigned the responsibility of supervising the juvenile. Records covered under this section and maintained by the juvenile courts which relate to the official actions of the agency may be entered in the statewide judicial information system. However, truancy records associated with a juvenile who has no other case history, and records of a juvenile's parents who have no other case history, shall be removed from the judicial information system when the juvenile is no longer subject to the compulsory attendance laws in chapter 28A.225 RCW. A county clerk is not liable for unauthorized release of this data by persons or agencies not in his or her employ or otherwise subject to his or her control, nor is the county clerk liable for inaccurate or incomplete information collected from litigants or other persons required to provide identifying data pursuant to this section.

(4) Subject to (a) of this subsection, the department of children, youth, and families may release information retained in the course of conducting child protective services investigations to a family or juvenile court hearing a petition for custody of a minor under chapter ((26.10))11.130 RCW.

(a) Information that may be released shall be limited to information regarding investigations in which: (i) The juvenile was an alleged victim of abandonment or abuse or neglect; or (ii) the petitioner for custody of the juvenile, or any individual aged sixteen or older residing in the petitioner's household, is the subject of a founded or currently pending child protective services investigation made by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families subsequent to October 1, 1998.

(b) Additional information may only be released with the written consent of the subject of the investigation and the juvenile alleged to be the victim of abandonment or abuse and neglect, or the parent, custodian, guardian, or personal representative of the juvenile, or by court order obtained with notice to all interested parties.

(5) Any disclosure of records or information by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families, pursuant to this section shall not be deemed a waiver of any confidentiality or privilege attached to the records or information by operation of any state or federal statute or regulation, and any recipient of such records or information shall maintain it in such a manner as to comply with such state and federal statutes and regulations and to protect against unauthorized disclosure.

(6) A contracting agency or service provider of the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families, that provides counseling, psychological, psychiatric, or medical services may release to the office of the family and children's ombuds information or records relating to services provided to a juvenile who is dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW without the consent of the parent or guardian of the juvenile, or of the juvenile if the juvenile is under the age of thirteen years, unless such release is otherwise specifically prohibited by law.

(7) A juvenile, his or her parents, the juvenile's attorney, and the juvenile's parent's attorney, shall, upon request, be given access to all records and information collected or retained by a juvenile justice or care agency which pertain to the juvenile except:

(a) If it is determined by the agency that release of this information is likely to cause severe psychological or physical harm to the juvenile or his or her parents the agency may withhold the information subject to other order of the court: PROVIDED, That if the court determines that limited release of the information is appropriate, the court may specify terms and conditions for the release of the information; or

(b) If the information or record has been obtained by a juvenile justice or care agency in connection with the provision of counseling, psychological, psychiatric, or medical services to the juvenile, when the services have been sought voluntarily by the juvenile, and the juvenile has a legal right to receive those services without the consent of any person or agency, then the information or record may not be disclosed to the juvenile's parents without the informed consent of the juvenile unless otherwise authorized by law; or

(c) That the department of children, youth, and families or the department of social and health services may delete the name and identifying information regarding persons or organizations who have reported alleged child abuse or neglect.

(8) A juvenile or his or her parent denied access to any records following an agency determination under subsection (7) of this section may file a motion in juvenile court requesting access to the records. The court shall grant the motion unless it finds access may not be permitted according to the standards found in subsection (7)(a) and (b) of this section.

(9) The person making a motion under subsection (8) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by the motion.

(10) Subject to the rules of discovery in civil cases, any party to a proceeding seeking a declaration of dependency or a termination of the parent-child relationship and any party's counsel and the guardian ad litem of any party, shall have access to the records of any natural or adoptive child of the parent, subject to the limitations in subsection (7) of this section. A party denied access to records may request judicial review of the denial. If the party prevails, he or she shall be awarded attorneys' fees, costs, and an amount not less than five dollars and not more than one hundred dollars for each day the records were wrongfully denied.

(11) No unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020(1) may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other licensed provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122. A new section is added to chapter 11.130 RCW to read as follows:

Any order for the relocation of a minor under a guardianship must comply with the notice requirements of RCW 26.09.430 through 26.09.490.

PART II

GUARDIANSHIPS OF ADULTS

Sec. 201. RCW 11.130.275 and 2019 c 437 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All petitions filed under RCW 11.130.270 for appointment of a guardian for an adult shall be heard within sixty-days unless an extension of time is requested by a party or the visitor within such sixty-day period and granted for good cause shown. If an extension is granted, the court shall set a new hearing date.

(2)(a) A copy of a petition under RCW 11.130.270 and notice of a hearing on the petition must be served personally on the respondent and the court visitor appointed under RCW 11.130.280 not more than five court days after the petition under RCW 11.130.270 has been filed. ((The notice must inform the respondent of the respondent's rights at the hearing, including the right to an attorney and to attend the hearing. The notice must include a description of the nature, purpose, and consequences of granting the petition.))

(b) Notice under this subsection shall include a clear and easily readable statement of the legal rights of the respondent that could be restricted or transferred to a guardian by a guardianship order as well as the right to counsel of choice and to a jury trial on the issue of legal capacity. Such notice must be in substantially the same form as set forth in section 322 of this act and must be double-spaced and in a type size not smaller than sixteen point font. The court may not grant the petition if notice substantially complying with this subsection is not served on the respondent.

(3) In a proceeding on a petition under RCW 11.130.270, the notice required under subsection (2) of this section must be given to the persons required to be listed in the petition under RCW 11.130.270(2) (a) through (c) and any other person interested in the respondent's welfare the court determines. Failure to give notice under this subsection does not preclude the court from appointing a guardian.

(4) After the appointment of a guardian, notice of a hearing on a petition for an order under this article, together with a copy of the petition, must be given to:

(a) The adult subject to guardianship;

(b) The guardian; and

(c) Any other person the court determines.

Sec. 202. RCW 11.130.285 and 2019 c 437 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The respondent shall have the right to be represented by a willing attorney of their choosing at any stage in guardianship proceedings. Any attorney purporting to represent a respondent or person subject to guardianship shall petition the court to be appointed to represent the respondent or person subject to guardianship.

(b) Unless the respondent in a proceeding for appointment of a guardian for an adult is represented by an attorney, the court is not required, but may appoint an attorney to represent the respondent, regardless of the respondent's ability to pay, except as provided otherwise in (c) of this subsection.

(c)(i) The court must appoint an attorney to represent the respondent at public expense when either:

(A) The respondent is unable to afford an attorney;

(B) The expense of an attorney would result in substantial hardship to the respondent; or

(C) The respondent does not have practical access to funds with which to pay an attorney. If the respondent can afford an attorney but lacks practical access to funds, the court must provide an attorney and may impose a reimbursement requirement as part of a final order.

(ii) When, in the opinion of the court, the rights and interests of the respondent cannot otherwise be adequately protected and represented, the court on its own motion must appoint an attorney at any time to represent the respondent.

(iii) An attorney must be provided under this subsection (1)(c) as soon as practicable after a petition is filed and long enough before any final hearing to allow adequate time for consultation and preparation. Absent a convincing showing in the record to the contrary, a period of less than three weeks is presumed by a reviewing court to be inadequate time for consultation and preparation.

(2) An attorney representing the respondent in a proceeding for appointment of a guardian for an adult shall:

(a) Make reasonable efforts to ascertain the respondent's wishes;

(b) Advocate for the respondent's wishes to the extent reasonably ascertainable; and

(c) If the respondent's wishes are not reasonably ascertainable, advocate for the result that is the least restrictive in type, duration, and scope, consistent with the respondent's interests.

Sec. 203. RCW 11.130.290 and 2019 c 437 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((At or before a hearing on a petition for a guardianship for an adult, the court shall order a professional evaluation of the respondent:

(a) If the respondent requests the evaluation; or

(b) In other cases, unless the court finds that it has sufficient information to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the evaluation.))On receipt of a petition under RCW 11.130.270 and at the time the court appoints a court visitor under RCW 11.130.280, the court shall order a professional evaluation of the respondent.

(2) ((If the court orders an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section, the))The respondent must be examined by a physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, ((or)) advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, or physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW selected by the court visitor who is qualified to evaluate the respondent's alleged cognitive and functional abilities and limitations and will not be advantaged or disadvantaged by a decision to grant the petition or otherwise have a conflict of interest. ((The individual conducting the evaluation promptly shall file [a] report in a record with the court.))If the respondent opposes the professional selected by the court visitor, the court visitor shall obtain a professional evaluation from the professional selected by the respondent. The court visitor, after receiving a professional evaluation from the individual selected by the respondent, may obtain a supplemental evaluation from a different professional.

(3) The individual conducting the evaluation shall provide the completed evaluation report to the court visitor within thirty days of the examination of the respondent. The court visitor shall file the report in a sealed record with the court. Unless otherwise directed by the court, the report must contain:

(a) The professional's name, address, education, and experience;

(b) A description of the nature, type, and extent of the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities and limitations;

(((b)))(c) An evaluation of the respondent's mental and physical condition and, if appropriate, educational potential, adaptive behavior, and social skills;

(((c)))(d) A prognosis for improvement and recommendation for the appropriate treatment, support, or habilitation plan; ((and

(d)))(e) A description of the respondent's current medications, and the effect of the medications on the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities;

(f) Identification or persons with whom the professional has met or spoken with regarding the respondent; and

(g) The date of the examination on which the report is based.

(((3) The))(4) If the respondent ((may decline))declines to participate in an evaluation ordered under subsection (1) of this section, the court may proceed with the hearing under RCW 11.130.275 if the court finds that it has sufficient information to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the professional evaluation.

Sec. 204. RCW 11.130.320 and 2019 c 437 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person interested in an adult's welfare, including the adult for whom the order is sought, may petition for appointment of an emergency guardian for the adult.

(2) An emergency petition under subsection (1) of this section must state the petitioner's name, principal residence, and current street address, if different, and to the extent known, the following:

(a) The respondent's name, age, principal residence and current street address, if different;

(b) The name and address of the respondent's:

(i) Spouse or domestic partner or, if the respondent has none, an adult with whom the respondent has shared household responsibilities for more than six months in the twelve-month period immediately before the filing of the emergency petition;

(ii) Adult children or, if none, each parent and adult sibling of the respondent, or, if none, at least one adult nearest in kinship to the respondent who can be found with reasonable diligence; and

(iii) Adult stepchildren whom the respondent actively parented during the stepchildren's minor years and with whom the respondent had an ongoing relationship in the two-year period immediately before the filing of the emergency petition;

(c) The name and current address of each of the following, if applicable:

(i) A person responsible for care of the respondent;

(ii) Any attorney currently representing the respondent;

(iii) Any representative payee appointed by the social security administration for the respondent;

(iv) A guardian or conservator acting for the respondent in this state or in another jurisdiction;

(v) A trustee or custodian of a trust or custodianship of which the respondent is a beneficiary;

(vi) Any fiduciary for the respondent appointed by the department of veterans affairs;

(vii) An agent designated under a power of attorney for health care in which the respondent is identified as the principal;

(viii) An agent designated under a power of attorney for finances in which the respondent is identified as the principal;

(ix) A person nominated as guardian by the respondent;

(x) A person nominated as guardian by the respondent's parent or spouse or domestic partner in a will or other signed record;

(xi) A proposed emergency guardian, and the reason the proposed emergency guardian should be selected; and

(xii) A person known to have routinely assisted the respondent with decision making during the six months immediately before the filing of the emergency petition;

(d) The reason an emergency guardianship is necessary, including a specific description of:

(i) The nature and extent of the emergency situation;

(ii) The nature and extent of the respondent's alleged emergency need that arose because of the emergency situation;

(iii) The substantial and irreparable harm to the respondent's health, safety, welfare, or rights that is likely to be prevented by the appointment of an emergency guardian;

(iv) All protective arrangements or other less restrictive alternatives that have been considered or implemented to meet the respondent's alleged emergency need instead of emergency guardianship;

(v) If no protective arrangements or other less restrictive alternatives have been considered or implemented instead of emergency guardianship, the reason they have not been considered or implemented; and

(vi) The reason a protective arrangement or other less restrictive alternative instead of emergency guardianship is insufficient to meet the respondent's alleged emergency need;

(e) The reason the petitioner believes that a basis for appointment of a guardian under RCW 11.130.265 exists;

(f) Whether the petitioner intends to also seek guardianship for an adult under RCW 11.130.270;

(g) The reason the petitioner believes that no other person appears to have authority and willingness to act to address the respondent's identified needs caused by the emergency circumstances;

(h) The specific powers to be granted to the proposed emergency guardian and a description of how those powers will be used to meet the respondent's alleged emergency need;

(i) If the respondent has property other than personal effects, a general statement of the respondent's property, with an estimate of its value, including any insurance or pension, and the source and amount of other anticipated income or receipts; and

(j) Whether the respondent needs an interpreter, translator, or other form of support to communicate effectively with the court or understand court proceedings.

(3) The requirements of RCW 11.130.090 apply to an emergency guardian appointed for an adult with the following exceptions for any proposed emergency guardian required to complete the training under RCW 11.130.090:

(a) The proposed emergency guardian shall present evidence of the successful completion of the required training video or web cast to the court no later than the hearing on the petition for appointment of an emergency guardian for an adult; and

(b) The superior court may defer the completion of the training requirement to a date no later than fourteen days after appointment if the petitioner requests an extension of time to complete the training due to emergent circumstances beyond the control of petitioner.

(4) On its own after a petition has been filed under RCW 11.130.270, or on petition ((by a person interested in an adult's welfare))for appointment of an emergency guardian for an adult, the court may appoint an emergency guardian for the adult if the court ((finds))makes specific findings based on clear and convincing evidence that:

(a) ((Appointment))An emergency exists such that appointment of an emergency guardian is likely to prevent substantial and irreparable harm to the ((adult's physical))respondent's health, safety, ((or)) welfare, or rights;

(b) The respondent's identified needs caused by the emergency cannot be met by a protective arrangement or other less restrictive alternative instead of emergency guardianship;

(c) No other person appears to have authority and willingness to act ((in the))to address the respondent's identified needs caused by the emergency circumstances; and

(((c)))(d) There is reason to believe that a basis for appointment of a guardian under RCW 11.130.265 exists.

(((2)))(5) If the court acts on its own to appoint an emergency guardian after a petition has been filed under RCW 11.130.270, all requirements of this section shall be met.

(6) A court order appointing an emergency guardian for an adult shall:

(a) Grant only the specific powers necessary to meet the adult's identified emergency need and to prevent substantial and irreparable harm to the adult's health, safety, welfare, or rights;

(b) State that the emergency guardian is prohibited from delegating the powers granted to the emergency guardian in the order of appointment;

(c) Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established that an emergency exists such that appointment of an emergency guardian is likely to prevent substantial and irreparable harm to the respondent's health, safety, welfare, or rights;

(d) Include a specific finding that the identified emergency need of the respondent cannot be met by a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or other less restrictive alternative, including any relief available under chapter 74.34 RCW or use of appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making;

(e) Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established the respondent was given proper notice of the hearing on the petition;

(f) State that the adult subject to emergency guardianship retains all rights the adult enjoyed prior to the emergency guardianship with the exception of the rights not retained during the period of emergency guardianship;

(g) Include the date that the sixty-day period of emergency guardianship ends, and the date the emergency guardian's report, required by this section, is due to the court; and

(h) Identify any person or notice party that subsequently is entitled to:

(i) Notice of the rights of the adult;

(ii) Notice of a change in the primary dwelling of the adult;

(iii) Notice of the removal of the guardian;

(iv) A copy of the emergency guardian's plan and the emergency guardian's report under this section;

(v) Access to court records relating to the emergency guardianship;

(vi) Notice of the death or significant change in the condition of the adult;

(vii) Notice that the court has limited or modified the powers of the emergency guardian; and

(viii) Notice of the removal of the emergency guardian.

(7) A spouse, a domestic partner, and adult children of an adult subject to emergency guardianship are entitled to notice under this section unless the court orders otherwise based on good cause. Good cause includes the court's determination that notice would be contrary to the preferences or prior directions of the adult subject to emergency guardianship.

(8) The duration of authority of an emergency guardian for an adult ((may))shall not exceed sixty days, and the emergency guardian ((may))shall exercise only the powers specified in the order of appointment. ((The))Upon a motion by the emergency guardian, with notice served upon all applicable notice parties, the emergency guardian's authority may be extended once for not more than sixty days if the court finds that the conditions for appointment of an emergency guardian in subsection (((1)))(4) of this section continue.

(((3)))(9) Immediately on filing of a petition for appointment of an emergency guardian for an adult, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the respondent in the proceeding. ((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, reasonable))At least fourteen days' notice of the date, time, and place of a hearing on the petition must be given to the respondent, the respondent's attorney, and any other ((person the court determines))notice party. A copy of the emergency petition and notice of a hearing on the petition must be served personally on the respondent and the respondent's attorney not more than two court days after the petition has been filed. The notice must inform the respondent of the respondent's rights at the hearing, including the right to an attorney and to attend the hearing. The notice must include a description of the nature, purpose, and consequences of granting the emergency petition. The court shall not grant the emergency petition if notice substantially complying with this subsection is not served on the respondent.

(((4) The court may appoint an emergency guardian for an adult without notice to the adult and any attorney for the adult only if the court finds from an affidavit or testimony that the respondent's physical health, safety, or welfare will be substantially harmed before a hearing with notice on the appointment can be held. If the court appoints an emergency guardian without giving notice under subsection (3) of this section, the court must:

(a) Give notice of the appointment not later than forty-eight hours after the appointment to:

(i) The respondent;

(ii) The respondent's attorney; and

(iii) Any other person the court determines; and

(b) Hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment not later than five days after the appointment.

(5)))(10) On receipt of a petition for appointment of emergency guardian for an adult, the court shall appoint a court visitor. Notice of appointment of the court visitor must be served upon the court visitor within two days of appointment. The court visitor must be an individual with training or experience in the type of abilities, limitations, and needs alleged in the emergency petition. The court, in the order appointing a court visitor, shall specify the hourly rate the visitor may charge for his or her services, and shall specify the maximum amount the court visitor may charge without additional court review and approval.

(a) The court visitor shall within two days of service of notice of appointment file with the court and serve, either personally or by certified mail with return receipt, the respondent or the respondent's legal counsel, the petitioner or the petitioner's legal counsel, and any notice party with a statement including the court visitor's: Training relating to the duties as a court visitor; criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the appointment; hourly rate, if compensated; contact, if any, with a party to the proceeding prior to appointment; and apparent or actual conflicts of interest.

(b) A court visitor appointed under this section shall use due diligence to attempt to interview the respondent in person and, in a manner the respondent is best able to understand:

(i) Explain to the respondent the substance of the emergency petition, the nature, purpose, and effect of the proceeding, the respondent's rights at the hearing on the petition, and the proposed specific powers and duties of the proposed guardian as stated in the emergency petition;

(ii) Determine the respondent's views about the emergency appointment sought by the petitioner, including views about a proposed emergency guardian, the emergency guardian's proposed powers and duties, and the scope and duration of the proposed emergency guardianship; and

(iii) Inform the respondent that all costs and expenses of the proceeding, including but not limited to the respondent's attorneys' fees, the appointed guardian's fees, and the appointed guardian's attorneys' fees, will be paid from the respondent's assets upon approval by the court.

(c) The court visitor appointed under this section shall:

(i) Interview the petitioner and proposed emergency guardian;

(ii) Use due diligence to attempt to visit the respondent's present dwelling;

(iii) Use due diligence to attempt to obtain information from any physician or other person known to have treated, advised, or assessed the respondent's relevant physical or mental condition; and

(iv) Investigate the allegations in the emergency petition and any other matter relating to the emergency petition the court directs.

(d) A court visitor appointed under this section shall file a report in a record with the court and provide a copy of the report to the respondent, petitioner, and any notice party at least seven days prior to the hearing on the emergency petition, which must include:

(i) A summary of self-care and independent living tasks the respondent can manage without assistance or with existing supports, could manage with the assistance of appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making, and cannot manage;

(ii) A recommendation regarding the appropriateness of emergency guardianship, including whether a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or other less restrictive alternative for meeting the respondent's needs is available, and if an emergency guardianship is recommended;

(iii) A detailed summary of the alleged emergency and the substantial and irreparable harm to the respondent's health, safety, welfare, or rights that is likely to be prevented by the appointment of an emergency guardian;

(iv) A statement as to whether the alleged emergency and the respondent's alleged needs are likely to require an extension of sixty days as authorized under this section;

(v) The specific powers to be granted to the emergency guardian and how the specific powers will address the alleged emergency and the respondent's alleged need;

(vi) A recommendation regarding the appropriateness of an ongoing guardianship for an adult, including whether a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or other less restrictive alternative for meeting the respondent's needs is available;

(vii) A statement of the qualifications of the proposed emergency guardian and whether the respondent approves or disapproves of the proposed emergency guardian, and the reasons for such approval or disapproval;

(viii) A recommendation whether a professional evaluation under RCW 11.130.290 is necessary;

(ix) A statement whether the respondent is able to attend a hearing at the location court proceedings typically are held;

(x) A statement whether the respondent is able to participate in a hearing which identifies any technology or other form of support that would enhance the respondent's ability to participate;

(xi) A statement, as needed when the petition seeks emergency authority to change the respondent's place of dwelling, as to whether the proposed dwelling meets the respondent's needs and whether the respondent has expressed a preference as to residence; and

(xii) Any other matter the court directs.

(11) An emergency guardian shall:

(a) Comply with the requirements of RCW 11.130.325, the requirements regarding the adult's right to association under RCW 11.130.335, and the requirements of this chapter that pertain to the rights of an adult subject to guardianship;

(b) Not delegate any of the powers granted in the petition for appointment of an emergency guardian;

(c) Not have authority to make decisions or take actions that a guardian for an adult is prohibited by law from having; and

(d) Be subject to the same special limitations on a guardian's power that apply to a guardian for an adult.

(12) Appointment of an emergency guardian under this section is not a determination that a basis exists for appointment of a guardian under RCW 11.130.265.

(((6)))(13) The court may remove an emergency guardian appointed under this section at any time.

(14) The emergency guardian shall file a report in a record with the court and provide a copy of the report to the adult subject to emergency guardianship, and any notice party no later than forty-five days after appointment. The report shall include specific and updated information regarding the emergency alleged in the emergency petition, the adult's emergency needs, all actions and decisions by the emergency guardian, and a recommendation as to whether a guardian for an adult should be appointed. If the appointment of the emergency guardian is extended for an additional sixty days, the emergency guardian shall file a second report in a record with the court and provide a copy of the report to the adult subject to emergency guardianship, and any notice party no later than forty-five days after appointment, which shall include the same information required for the first report. The emergency guardian shall make any other report the court requires.

(15) The court shall issue letters of emergency guardianship to the emergency guardian in compliance with RCW 11.130.040. Such letters shall be issued on an expedited basis.

Sec. 205. RCW 11.130.330 and 2019 c 437 s 314 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as limited by court order, a guardian for an adult may:

(a) Apply for and receive funds and benefits as a representative payee or an authorized representative or protective payee for the support of the adult, unless a conservator is appointed for the adult and the application or receipt is within the powers of the conservator;

(b) Unless inconsistent with a court order, establish the adult's place of dwelling;

(c) Consent to health or other care, treatment, or service for the adult;

(d) If a conservator for the adult has not been appointed, commence a proceeding, including an administrative proceeding, or take other appropriate action to compel another person to support the adult or pay funds for the adult's benefit;

(e) To the extent reasonable, delegate to the adult responsibility for a decision affecting the adult's well-being; and

(f) Receive personally identifiable health care information regarding the adult.

(2) The court by specific order may authorize a guardian for an adult to consent to the adoption of the adult.

(3) The court by specific order may authorize a guardian for an adult to:

(a) Consent or withhold consent to the marriage of the adult if the adult's right to marry has been removed under RCW 11.130.310;

(b) Petition for divorce, dissolution, or annulment of marriage of the adult or a declaration of invalidity of the adult's marriage; or

(c) Support or oppose a petition for divorce, dissolution, or annulment of marriage of the adult or a declaration of invalidity of the adult's marriage.

(4) In determining whether to authorize a power under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the court shall consider whether the underlying act would be in accordance with the adult's preferences, values, and prior directions and whether the underlying act would be in the adult's best interest.

(5) In exercising a guardian's power under subsection (1)(b) of this section to establish the adult's place of dwelling, the guardian shall:

(a) Select a residential setting the guardian believes the adult would select if the adult were able, in accordance with the decision-making standard in RCW 11.130.325 (4) and (5). If the guardian does not know and cannot reasonably determine what setting the adult subject to guardianship probably would choose if able, or the guardian reasonably believes the decision the adult would make would unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the adult, the guardian shall choose in accordance with RCW 11.130.325(5) a residential setting that is consistent with the adult's best interest;

(b) In selecting among residential settings, give priority to a residential setting in a location that will allow the adult to interact with persons important to the adult and meet the adult's needs in the least restrictive manner reasonably feasible unless to do so would be inconsistent with the decision-making standard in RCW 11.130.325 (4) and (5);

(c) Not later than thirty days after a change in the dwelling of the adult:

(i) Give notice of the change to the court, the adult, and any ((person identified as entitled to the notice in the court order appointing the guardian or a subsequent order))other notice party; and

(ii) Include in the notice the address and nature of the new dwelling and state whether the adult received advance notice of the change and whether the adult objected to the change;

(d) Establish or move the permanent place of dwelling of the adult to a ((nursing home, mental health facility, or other facility))care setting that places restrictions on the adult's ability to leave or have visitors only if:

(i) The establishment or move is in the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.340;

(ii) The court authorizes the establishment or move; or

(iii) The guardian gives notice of the establishment or move at least fourteen days before the establishment or move to the adult and all persons entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5)(b) or a subsequent order, and no objection is filed;

(e) Establish or move the place of dwelling of the adult outside this state only if consistent with the guardian's plan and authorized by the court by specific order; and

(f) Take action that would result in the sale of or surrender of the lease to the primary dwelling of the adult only if:

(i) The action is specifically included in the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.340;

(ii) The court authorizes the action by specific order; or

(iii) Notice of the action was given at least fourteen days before the action to the adult and all persons entitled to the notice under RCW 11.130.310(5)(b) or a subsequent order and no objection has been filed.

(6) In exercising a guardian's power under subsection (1)(c) of this section to make health care decisions, the guardian shall:

(a) Involve the adult in decision making to the extent reasonably feasible, including, when practicable, by encouraging and supporting the adult in understanding the risks and benefits of health care options;

(b) Defer to a decision by an agent under a power of attorney for health care executed by the adult and cooperate to the extent feasible with the agent making the decision; and

(c) Take into account:

(i) The risks and benefits of treatment options; and

(ii) The current and previous wishes and values of the adult, if known or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian.

(7) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(b) of this section no ((residential treatment facility))care setting which provides nursing or other care may detain a person within such facility against their will. Any court order, other than an order issued in accordance with the involuntary treatment provisions of chapters 10.77, 71.05, and 72.23 RCW, which purports to authorize such involuntary detention or purports to authorize a guardian or limited guardian to consent to such involuntary detention on behalf of an individual subject to a guardianship shall be void and of no force or effect. ((This section does not apply to the detention of a minor as provided in chapter 71.34 RCW.))

(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a court order authorizing placement of an incapacitated person in a ((residential treatment facility))care setting if such order is not otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That notice of any residential placement of an individual subject to a guardianship shall be served, either before or after placement, by the guardian or limited guardian on such individual, any court visitor of record, any guardian ad litem of record, and any attorney of record.

Sec. 206. RCW 11.130.335 and 2019 c 437 s 315 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Unless authorized by the court by specific order, a))A guardian for an adult does not have the power to revoke or amend a power of attorney for health care or power of attorney for finances executed by the adult. If a power of attorney for health care is in effect, unless there is a court order to the contrary, a health care decision of an agent takes precedence over that of the guardian and the guardian shall cooperate with the agent to the extent feasible. If a power of attorney for finances is in effect, unless there is a court order to the contrary, a decision by the agent which the agent is authorized to make under the power of attorney for finances takes precedence over that of the guardian and the guardian shall cooperate with the agent to the extent feasible. The court has authority to revoke or amend any power of attorney executed by the adult.

(2) A guardian for an adult ((may))shall not initiate the commitment of the adult to an evaluation and treatment facility except in accordance with the ((state's procedure for involuntary civil commitment))provisions of chapter 10.77, 71.05, or 72.23 RCW.

(3) Unless authorized by the court in accordance with subsection (4) of this section within the past thirty days, a guardian for an adult may not consent to any of the following procedures for the adult:

(a) Therapy or other procedure to induce convulsion;

(b) Surgery solely for the purpose of psychosurgery; or

(c) Other psychiatric or mental health procedures that restrict physical freedom of movement or the rights set forth in RCW 71.05.217.

(4) The court may order a procedure listed in subsection (3) of this section only after giving notice to the adult's attorney and holding a hearing. If the adult does not have an attorney, the court must appoint an attorney for the adult prior to entering an order under this subsection.

(5) Persons under a guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective arrangements—Right to associate with persons of their choosing.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person under a guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective arrangement retains the right to associate with other persons of the ((person under a guardianship's))person's choosing. This right includes, but is not limited to, the right to freely communicate and interact with other persons, whether through in-person visits, telephone calls, electronic communication, personal mail, or other means. If the person under a guardianship is unable to express consent for communication, visitation, or interaction with another person, or is otherwise unable to make a decision regarding association with another person, a guardian of a person under a guardianship, whether full or limited, must:

(i) Personally inform the person under a guardianship of the decision under consideration, using plain language, in a manner calculated to maximize the understanding of the person under a guardianship;

(ii) Maximize the person under a guardianship's participation in the decision-making process to the greatest extent possible, consistent with the person under a guardianship's abilities; and

(iii) Give substantial weight to the person under a guardianship's preferences, both expressed and historical.

(b) A guardian or limited guardian may not restrict a person under a guardianship's right to communicate, visit, interact, or otherwise associate with persons of the person under a guardianship's choosing, unless:

(i) The restriction is specifically authorized by the guardianship court in the court order establishing or modifying the guardianship or limited guardianship under this chapter (( 11.130 RCW));

(ii) The restriction is pursuant to a protection order issued under chapter 74.34 ((RCW, chapter))or 26.50 RCW, or other law, that limits contact between the person under a guardianship and other persons;

(iii)(A) The guardian or limited guardian has good cause to believe that there is an immediate need to restrict a person under a guardianship's right to communicate, visit, interact, or otherwise associate with persons of the person under a guardianship's choosing in order to protect the person under a guardianship from abuse, neglect, abandonment, or financial exploitation, as those terms are defined in RCW 74.34.020, or to protect the person under a guardianship from activities that unnecessarily impose significant distress on the person under a guardianship; and

(B) Within fourteen calendar days of imposing the restriction under (b)(iii)(A) of this subsection, the guardian or limited guardian files a petition for a protection order under chapter 74.34 RCW. The immediate need restriction may remain in place until the court has heard and issued an order or decision on the petition; or

(iv) The restriction is pursuant to participation in the community protection program under chapter 71A.12 RCW.

(6) A protection order under chapter 74.34 RCW issued to protect the person under a guardianship as described in subsection (5)(b)(iii)(B) of this section:

(a) Must include written findings of fact and conclusions of law;

(b) May not be more restrictive than necessary to protect the person under a guardianship from abuse, neglect, abandonment, or financial exploitation as those terms are defined in RCW 74.34.020; and

(c) May not deny communication, visitation, interaction, or other association between the person under a guardianship and another person unless the court finds that placing reasonable time, place, or manner restrictions is unlikely to sufficiently protect the person under a guardianship from abuse, neglect, abandonment, or financial exploitation as those terms are defined in RCW 74.34.020.

Sec. 207. RCW 11.130.340 and 2019 c 437 s 317 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A guardian for an adult, not later than ninety days after appointment, shall file with the court a plan for the care of the adult and shall provide a copy of the plan to the adult subject to guardianship((, a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5) or a subsequent order,)) and any other ((person the court determines))notice party. The plan must be based on the needs of the adult and take into account the best interest of the adult as well as the adult's preferences, values, and prior directions, to the extent known to or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian. The guardian shall include in the plan:

(a) The living arrangement, services, and supports the guardian expects to arrange, facilitate, or continue for the adult;

(b) Social and educational activities the guardian expects to facilitate on behalf of the adult;

(c) Any person with whom the adult has a close personal relationship or relationship involving regular visitation and any plan the guardian has for facilitating visits with the person;

(d) The anticipated nature and frequency of the guardian's visits and communication with the adult;

(e) Goals for the adult, including any goal related to the restoration of the adult's rights, and how the guardian anticipates achieving the goals;

(f) Whether the adult has an existing plan and, if so, whether the guardian's plan is consistent with the adult's plan; and

(g) A statement or list of the amount the guardian proposes to charge for each service the guardian anticipates providing to the adult.

(2) A guardian shall give notice of the filing of the guardian's plan under subsection (1) of this section, together with a copy of the plan, to the adult subject to guardianship((, a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5) or a subsequent order,)) and any other ((person the court determines))notice party. The notice must include a statement of the right to object to the plan and be given not later than fourteen days after the filing.

(3) An adult subject to guardianship and any person entitled under subsection (2) of this section to receive notice and a copy of the guardian's plan may object to the plan.

(4) The court shall review the guardian's plan filed under subsection (1) of this section and determine whether to approve the plan or require a new plan. In deciding whether to approve the plan, the court shall consider an objection under subsection (3) of this section and whether the plan is consistent with the guardian's duties and powers under RCW 11.130.325 and 11.130.330. The court may not approve the plan until thirty days after its filing.

(5) After the guardian's plan filed under this section is approved by the court, the guardian shall provide a copy of the order approving the plan to the adult subject to guardianship((, a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5) or a subsequent order,)) and any other ((person the court determines))notice party.

Sec. 208. RCW 11.130.345 and 2019 c 437 s 318 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A guardian for an adult shall file with the court by the date established by the court a report in a record regarding the condition of the adult and accounting for funds and other property in the guardian's possession or subject to the guardian's control. The guardian shall provide a copy of the report to the adult subject to guardianship((, a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5) or a subsequent order,)) and any other ((person the court determines))notice party.

(2) A report under subsection (1) of this section must state or contain:

(a) The mental, physical, and social condition of the adult;

(b) The living arrangements of the adult during the reporting period;

(c) A summary of the supported decision making, technological assistance, medical services, educational and vocational services, and other supports and services provided to the adult and the guardian's opinion as to the adequacy of the adult's care;

(d) A summary of the guardian's visits with the adult, including the dates of the visits;

(e) Action taken on behalf of the adult;

(f) The extent to which the adult has participated in decision making;

(g) If the adult is living in ((an evaluation and treatment facility or living in a facility that provides the adult with health care or other personal services))a care setting, whether the guardian considers the facility's current plan for support, care, treatment, or habilitation consistent with the adult's preferences, values, prior directions, and best interests;

(h) Anything of more than de minimis value which the guardian, any individual who resides with the guardian, or the spouse, domestic partner, parent, child, or sibling of the guardian has received from an individual providing goods or services to the adult. A professional guardian must abide by the standards of practice regarding the acceptance of gifts;

(i) If the guardian delegated a power to an agent, the power delegated and the reason for the delegation;

(j) Any business relation the guardian has with a person the guardian has paid or that has benefited from the property of the adult;

(k) A copy of the guardian's most recently approved plan under RCW 11.130.340 and a statement whether the guardian has deviated from the plan and, if so, how the guardian has deviated and why;

(l) Plans for future care and support of the adult;

(m) A recommendation as to the need for continued guardianship and any recommended change in the scope of the guardianship; and

(n) Whether any co-guardian or successor guardian appointed to serve when a designated event occurs is alive and able to serve.

(3) The court may appoint a court visitor to review a report submitted under this section or a guardian's plan submitted under RCW 11.130.340, interview the guardian or adult subject to guardianship, or investigate any other matter involving the guardianship.

(4) Notice of the filing under this section of a guardian's report, together with a copy of the report, must be given to the adult subject to guardianship((, a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5) or a subsequent order,)) and any other ((person the court determines))notice party. The notice and report must be given not later than fourteen days after the filing.

(5) The court shall establish procedures for monitoring a report submitted under this section and review each report to determine whether:

(a) The report provides sufficient information to establish the guardian has complied with the guardian's duties;

(b) The guardianship should continue; and

(c) The guardian's requested fees, if any, should be approved.

(6) If the court determines there is reason to believe a guardian for an adult has not complied with the guardian's duties or the guardianship should be modified or terminated, the court:

(a) Shall notify the adult, the guardian, and any other person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5) or a subsequent order;

(b) May require additional information from the guardian;

(c) May appoint a court visitor to interview the adult or guardian or investigate any matter involving the guardianship; and

(d) Consistent with this section and RCW 11.130.350, may hold a hearing to consider removal of the guardian, termination of the guardianship, or a change in the powers granted to the guardian or terms of the guardianship.

(7) If the court has reason to believe fees requested by a guardian for an adult are not reasonable, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether to adjust the requested fees.

(8) A guardian for an adult must petition the court for approval of a report filed under this section. The court after review may approve the report. If the court approves the report, there is a rebuttable presumption the report is accurate as to a matter adequately disclosed in the report.

(9) If the court approves a report filed under this section, the order approving the report shall set the due date for the filing of the next report to be filed under this section. The court may set the review interval at annual, biennial, or triennial with the report due date to be within ninety days of the anniversary date of appointment. When determining the report interval, the court can consider: The length of time the guardian has been serving the person under guardianship; whether the guardian has timely filed all required reports with the court; whether the guardian is monitored by other state or local agencies; and whether there have been any allegations of abuse, neglect, or a breach of fiduciary duty against the guardian.

(10) If the court approves a report filed under this section, the order approving the report shall contain a guardianship summary or be accompanied by a guardianship summary in the form or substantially in the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.665.

(11) If the court approves a report filed under this section, the order approving the report shall direct the clerk of the court to reissue letters of office in the form or substantially in the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.660 to the guardian containing an expiration date which will be within one hundred twenty days after the date the court directs the guardian file its next report.

(12) Any requirement to establish a monitoring program under this section is subject to appropriation.

Sec. 209. RCW 11.130.355 and 2019 c 437 s 320 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An adult subject to guardianship, the guardian for the adult, or a person interested in the welfare of the adult may petition for:

(a) Termination of the guardianship on the ground that a basis for appointment under RCW 11.130.265 does not exist or termination would be in the best interest of the adult or for other good cause; or

(b) Modification of the guardianship on the ground that the extent of protection or assistance granted is not appropriate or for other good cause.

(2) The court shall hold a hearing to determine whether termination or modification of a guardianship for an adult is appropriate on:

(a) Petition under subsection (1) of this section that contains allegations that, if true, would support a reasonable belief that termination or modification of the guardianship may be appropriate, but the court may decline to hold a hearing if a petition based on the same or substantially similar facts was filed during the preceding six months;

(b) Communication from the adult, guardian, or person interested in the welfare of the adult which supports a reasonable belief that termination or modification of the guardianship may be appropriate, including because of change to the legal capacity or functional needs of the adult or the availability of supports or services ((available to))for the adult ((have changed));

(c) A report from a guardian or conservator which indicates that termination or modification may be appropriate because of change to the legal capacity or functional needs of the adult or the availability of supports or services ((available to))for the adult ((have changed)) or a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or other less restrictive alternative for meeting the adult's needs is available; or

(d) A determination by the court that a hearing would be in the best interest of the adult.

(3) Notice of a petition under subsection (2)(a) of this section must be given to the adult subject to guardianship, the guardian, and any other person the court determines.

(4) On presentation of prima facie evidence for termination of a guardianship for an adult, the court shall order termination unless it is proven that a basis for appointment of a guardian under RCW 11.130.265 exists.

(5) The court shall modify the powers granted to a guardian for an adult if the powers are excessive or inadequate ((due to a))because of change ((in))to the legal capacity, abilities ((or)), limitations, or functional needs of the adult, the adult's supports, or other circumstances.

(6) Unless the court otherwise orders for good cause, before terminating or modifying a guardianship for an adult, the court shall follow the same procedures to safeguard the rights of the adult which apply to a petition for guardianship.

(7) An adult subject to guardianship who seeks to terminate or modify the terms of the guardianship has the right to choose an attorney to represent the adult in the matter. The court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees to the attorney for the adult as provided in RCW 11.130.100.

Sec. 210. RCW 11.130.360 and 2019 c 437 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On petition and after notice and hearing, the court may appoint a conservator for the property or financial affairs of a minor if the court finds by a preponderance of evidence that appointment of a conservator is in the minor's best interest, and:

(a) If the minor has a parent, the court gives weight to any recommendation of the parent whether an appointment is in the minor's best interest; and

(b) Either:

(i) The minor owns funds or other property requiring management or protection that otherwise cannot be provided;

(ii) The minor has or may have financial affairs that may be put at unreasonable risk or hindered because of the minor's age; or

(iii) Appointment is necessary or desirable to obtain or provide funds or other property needed for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the minor.

(2) On petition and after notice and hearing, the court may appoint a conservator for the property or financial affairs of an adult if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

(a) The adult ((is unable to manage property or financial affairs because))respondent:

(i) ((Of a limitation in the adult's ability))lacks the legal capacity to receive and evaluate information or make or communicate decisions, even with the use of appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making, in order to adequately manage property or financial affairs; or

(ii) ((The))Is unable to adequately manage property or financial affairs because the adult respondent is missing, detained, or unable to return to the United States;

(b) Appointment is necessary to:

(i) ((Avoid))Prevent significant harm to the ((adult))adult's health, safety, welfare, or rights or significant dissipation of the property of the adult; or

(ii) Obtain or provide funds or other property needed for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the adult or of an individual entitled to the adult's support; and

(c) The adult respondent's identified needs cannot be met by a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternatives.

(3) The court shall grant a conservator only those powers necessitated by demonstrated limitations and needs of the adult respondent and issue orders that will encourage development of the adult respondent's maximum self-determination and independence. The court ((may))shall not establish a full conservatorship if a limited conservatorship, protective arrangement instead of conservatorship, or other less restrictive alternative would meet the needs of the adult respondent.

(4) A determination that the adult respondent lacks the legal capacity necessary to adequately manage property or financial affairs is a legal decision, not a medical decision. The determination must be based on a demonstration of management insufficiencies over time in the area of property or financial affairs. Age, eccentricity, poverty, or medical diagnosis alone are not sufficient to justify a determination that the adult respondent lacks legal capacity.

(5) For purposes of this section, an adult who resides in a long-term care facility, resides in another care setting, or is the subject of an involuntary commitment order is not considered missing or detained.

Sec. 211. RCW 11.130.365 and 2019 c 437 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following may petition for the appointment of a conservator:

(a) The individual for whom the order is sought;

(b) A person interested in the estate, financial affairs, or welfare of the individual, including a person that would be adversely affected by lack of effective management of property or financial affairs of the individual; or

(c) The guardian for the individual.

(2) A petition under subsection (1) of this section must state the petitioner's name, principal residence, current street address, if different, relationship to the respondent, interest in the appointment, the name and address of any attorney representing the petitioner, and, to the extent known, the following:

(a) The respondent's name, age, principal residence, and current street address((, if different, and, if different, address of the dwelling in which it is proposed the respondent will reside if the petition is granted));

(b) The name and address of the respondent's:

(i) Spouse or domestic partner or, if the respondent has none, an adult with whom the respondent has shared household responsibilities for more than six months in the twelve-month period before the filing of the petition;

(ii) Adult children or, if none, each parent and adult sibling of the respondent, or, if none, at least one adult nearest in kinship to the respondent who can be found with reasonable diligence; and

(iii) Adult stepchildren whom the respondent actively parented during the stepchildren's minor years and with whom the respondent had an ongoing relationship during the two years immediately before the filing of the petition;

(c) The name and current address of each of the following, if applicable:

(i) A person responsible for the care or custody of the respondent;

(ii) Any attorney currently representing the respondent;

(iii) The representative payee appointed by the social security administration for the respondent;

(iv) A guardian or conservator acting for the respondent in this state or another jurisdiction;

(v) A trustee or custodian of a trust or custodianship of which the respondent is a beneficiary;

(vi) The fiduciary appointed for the respondent by the department of veterans affairs;

(vii) An agent designated under a power of attorney for health care in which the respondent is identified as the principal;

(viii) An agent designated under a power of attorney for finances in which the respondent is identified as the principal;

(ix) A person known to have routinely assisted the respondent with decision making in the six-month period immediately before the filing of the petition;

(x) Any proposed conservator, including a person nominated by the respondent, if the respondent is twelve years of age or older; and

(xi) If the individual for whom a conservator is sought is a minor:

(A) An adult not otherwise listed with whom the minor resides; and

(B) Each person not otherwise listed that had primary care or custody of the minor for at least sixty days during the two years immediately before the filing of the petition or for at least seven hundred thirty days during the five years immediately before the filing of the petition;

(d) A general statement of the respondent's property with an estimate of its value, including any insurance or pension, and the source and amount of other anticipated income or receipts;

(e) The reason conservatorship is necessary, including a brief description of:

(i) The nature and extent of the respondent's alleged need;

(ii) If the petition alleges the respondent is missing, detained, or unable to return to the United States, the relevant circumstances, including the time and nature of the disappearance or detention and any search or inquiry concerning the respondent's whereabouts;

(iii) Any protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternative for meeting the respondent's alleged need which has been considered or implemented;

(iv) If no protective arrangement or other less restrictive alternatives have been considered or implemented, the reason it has not been considered or implemented; and

(v) The reason a protective arrangement or other less restrictive alternative is insufficient to meet the respondent's need;

(f) Whether the petitioner seeks a limited conservatorship or a full conservatorship;

(g) If the petitioner seeks a full conservatorship, the reason a limited conservatorship or protective arrangement instead of conservatorship is not appropriate;

(h) If the petition includes the name of a proposed conservator, the reason the proposed conservator should be appointed;

(i) If the petition is for a limited conservatorship, a description of the property to be placed under the conservator's control and any requested limitation on the authority of the conservator;

(j) Whether the respondent needs an interpreter, translator, or other form of support to communicate effectively with the court or understand court proceedings; and

(k) The name and address of an attorney representing the petitioner, if any.

Sec. 212. RCW 11.130.370 and 2019 c 437 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All petitions filed under RCW 11.130.365 for appointment of a conservator shall be heard within sixty days unless an extension of time is requested by a party or the court visitor within such sixty-day period and granted for good cause shown. If an extension is granted, the court shall set a new hearing date.

(2)(a) A copy of a petition under RCW 11.130.365 and notice of a hearing on the petition must be served personally on the respondent ((and)), the court visitor appointed under RCW 11.130.380, and the appointed or proposed guardian not more than five court days after the petition under RCW 11.130.365 has been filed. If the respondent's whereabouts are unknown or personal service cannot be made, service on the respondent must be made by publication. ((The notice must inform the respondent of the respondent's rights at the hearing, including the right to an attorney and to attend the hearing. The notice must include a description of the nature, purpose, and consequences of granting the petition.))

(b) Notice under this subsection shall include a clear and easily readable statement of the legal rights for an adult respondent that could be restricted or transferred to a conservator by a conservatorship order as well as the right to counsel of choice and to a jury trial on the issue of legal capacity. Such notice must be in substantially the same form as set forth in section 322 of this act and must be double-spaced and in a type size not smaller than sixteen point font. The court may not grant ((a))the petition ((for appointment of a conservator)) if notice substantially complying with this subsection is not served on the respondent.

(3) In a proceeding on a petition under RCW 11.130.365, the notice required under subsection (2) of this section must be ((given to))served upon the persons required to be listed in the petition under RCW 11.130.365(2) (a) through (c) and any other ((person interested in the respondent's welfare the court determines))notice party. Failure to give notice under this subsection does not preclude the court from appointing a conservator.

(4) After the appointment of a conservator, notice of a hearing on a petition for an order under this article, together with a copy of the petition, must be given to:

(a) The individual subject to conservatorship, if the individual is twelve years of age or older and not missing, detained, or unable to return to the United States;

(b) The conservator; and

(c) Any other notice party or person the court determines pursuant to RCW 11.130.420(6) or a subsequent court order.

Sec. 213. RCW 11.130.385 and 2019 c 437 s 406 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The respondent shall have the right to be represented by a willing attorney of their choosing at any stage in conservatorship proceedings. Any attorney purporting to represent a respondent or person subject to conservatorship shall petition the court to be appointed to represent the respondent or person subject to conservatorship.

(b) Unless the respondent in a proceeding for appointment of a conservator is represented by an attorney, the court is not required, but may appoint an attorney to represent the respondent, regardless of the respondent's ability to pay, except as provided otherwise in (c) of this subsection.

(c)(i) The court must appoint an attorney to represent the respondent at public expense when either:

(A) The respondent is unable to afford an attorney;

(B) The expense of an attorney would result in substantial hardship to the respondent; or

(C) The respondent does not have practical access to funds with which to pay an attorney. If the respondent can afford an attorney but lacks practical access to funds, the court must provide an attorney and may impose a reimbursement requirement as part of a final order.

(ii) When, in the opinion of the court, the rights and interests of the respondent cannot otherwise be adequately protected and represented, the court on its own motion must appoint an attorney at any time to represent the respondent.

(iii) An attorney must be provided under this subsection (1)(c) as soon as practicable after a petition is filed and long enough before any final hearing to allow adequate time for consultation and preparation. Absent a convincing showing in the record to the contrary, a period of less than three weeks is presumed by a reviewing court to be inadequate time for consultation and preparation.

(2) An attorney representing the respondent in a proceeding for appointment of a conservator shall:

(a) Make reasonable efforts to ascertain the respondent's wishes;

(b) Advocate for the respondent's wishes to the extent reasonably ascertainable; and

(c) If the respondent's wishes are not reasonably ascertainable, advocate for the result that is the least restrictive in type, duration, and scope, consistent with the respondent's interests.

(3) The court is not required, but may appoint an attorney to represent a parent of a minor who is the subject of a proceeding under RCW 11.130.365 if:

(a) The parent objects to appointment of a conservator;

(b) The court determines that counsel is needed to ensure that consent to appointment of a conservator is informed; or

(c) The court otherwise determines the parent needs representation.

Sec. 214. RCW 11.130.390 and 2019 c 437 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((At or before a hearing on a petition for conservatorship for an adult, the court shall order a professional evaluation of the respondent:

(a) If the respondent requests the evaluation; or

(b) In other cases, unless the court finds it has sufficient information to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the evaluation.))On receipt of a petition under RCW 11.130.360 and at the time the court appoints a court visitor under RCW 11.130.380, the court shall order a professional evaluation of the respondent.

(2) ((If the court orders an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section, the))The respondent must be examined by a physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, ((or)) advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, or physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, selected by the court visitor who is qualified to evaluate the respondent's alleged cognitive and functional abilities and limitations and will not be advantaged or disadvantaged by a decision to grant the petition or otherwise have a conflict of interest. If the respondent opposes the professional selected by the court visitor, the court visitor shall obtain a professional evaluation from the professional selected by the respondent. The court visitor, after receiving a professional evaluation from the individual selected by the respondent, may obtain a supplemental evaluation from a different professional.

(3) The individual conducting the evaluation ((promptly)) shall promptly provide the completed evaluation report to the court visitor who shall file ((a))the report in a sealed record with the court. Unless otherwise directed by the court, the report must contain:

(a) The professional's name, address, education, and experience;

(b) A description of the nature, type, and extent of the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities and limitations with regard to the management of the respondent's property and financial affairs;

(((b)))(c) An evaluation of the respondent's mental and physical condition and, if appropriate, educational potential, adaptive behavior, and social skills;

(((c)))(d) A prognosis for improvement with regard to the ability to manage the respondent's property and financial affairs; ((and

(d)))(e) A description of the respondent's current medications, and the effect of the medications on the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities;

(f) Identification or persons with whom the professional has met or spoken with regarding the respondent; and

(g) The date of the examination on which the report is based.

(((3) A))(4) If the respondent ((may decline))declines to participate in an evaluation ordered under subsection (1) of this section, the court may proceed with the hearing under RCW 11.130.370 if the court finds that it has sufficient information to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the professional evaluation.

(5) A professional evaluation is not required if a petition for appointment of a conservator under RCW 11.130.360 is for a conservator for the property or financial affairs of a minor or for an adult missing, detained, or unable to return to the United States.

Sec. 215. RCW 11.130.410 and 2019 c 437 s 409 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The existence of a proceeding for or the existence of conservatorship is a matter of public record unless the court seals the record after:

(a) The respondent, the individual subject to conservatorship, or the parent of a minor subject to conservatorship requests the record be sealed; and

(b) Either:

(i) The petition for conservatorship is dismissed; or

(ii) The conservatorship is terminated.

(2) An individual subject to a proceeding for a conservatorship, whether or not a conservator is appointed, an attorney designated by the individual, and a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.420(6) or a subsequent order may access court records of the proceeding and resulting conservatorship, including the conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510 and the conservator's report under RCW 11.130.530. A person not otherwise entitled access to court records under this section for good cause may petition the court for access to court records of the conservatorship, including the conservator's plan and report. The court shall grant access if access is in the best interest of the respondent or individual subject to conservatorship or furthers the public interest and does not endanger the welfare or financial interests of the respondent or individual.

(3) A report under RCW 11.130.380 of a court visitor or professional evaluation under RCW 11.130.390 is confidential and must be sealed on filing, but is available to:

(a) The court;

(b) The individual who is the subject of the report or evaluation, without limitation as to use;

(c) The petitioner, court visitor, ((and)) petitioner's and respondent's attorneys, and proposed guardians, for purposes of the proceeding;

(d) Unless the court directs otherwise, an agent appointed under a power of attorney for finances in which the respondent is identified as the principal; and

(e) Any other person if it is in the public interest or for a purpose the court orders for good cause.

Sec. 216. RCW 11.130.415 and 2019 c 437 s 410 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the court in appointing a conservator shall consider persons qualified to be a conservator in the following order of priority:

(a) A conservator, other than a temporary or emergency conservator, currently acting for the respondent in another jurisdiction;

(b) A person nominated as conservator by the respondent, including the respondent's most recent nomination made in a power of attorney for finances;

(c) An agent appointed by the respondent to manage the respondent's property under a power of attorney for finances;

(d) A spouse or domestic partner of the respondent;

(e) A relative or other individual who has shown special care and concern for the respondent; and

(f) A certified professional guardian or conservator or other entity the court determines is suitable.

(2) If two or more persons have equal priority under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall select as conservator the person the court considers best qualified. In determining the best qualified person, the court shall consider the person's relationship with the respondent, the person's skills, the expressed wishes of the respondent, the extent to which the person and the respondent have similar values and preferences, and the likelihood the person will be able to perform the duties of a conservator successfully.

(3) The court, acting in the best interest of the respondent, may decline to appoint as conservator a person having priority under subsection (1) of this section and appoint a person having a lower priority or no priority.

(4) A person that provides paid services to the respondent, or an individual who is employed by a person that provides paid services to the respondent or is the spouse, domestic partner, parent, or child of an individual who provides or is employed to provide paid services to the respondent, may not be appointed as conservator unless:

(a) The individual is related to the respondent by blood((, marriage, or adoption))or law; or

(b) The court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the person is the best qualified person available for appointment and the appointment is in the best interest of the respondent.

(5) An owner, operator, or employee of a long-term care facility at which the respondent is receiving care may not be appointed as conservator unless the owner, operator, or employee is related to the respondent by blood((, marriage, or adoption))or law.

Sec. 217. RCW 11.130.420 and 2019 c 437 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A court order appointing a conservator for a minor must include findings to support appointment of a conservator and, if a full conservatorship is granted, the reason a limited conservatorship would not meet the identified needs of the minor.

(2) A court order appointing a conservator for a minor may dispense with the requirement for the conservator to file reports with the court under RCW 11.130.530 if all the property of the minor subject to the conservatorship is protected by a verified receipt.

(3) A court order appointing a conservator for an adult must:

(a) Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence has established that the identified needs of the respondent cannot be met by a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternatives, including use of appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making; and

(b) Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established the respondent was given proper notice of the hearing on the petition.

(4) A court order establishing a full conservatorship for an adult must state the basis for granting a full conservatorship and include specific findings to support the conclusion that a limited conservatorship would not meet the functional needs of the adult.

(5) A court order establishing a limited conservatorship must state the specific property placed under the control of the conservator and the powers granted to the conservator.

(6) The court, as part of an order establishing a conservatorship, shall identify any person that subsequently is entitled to:

(a) Notice of the rights of the individual subject to conservatorship under RCW 11.130.425(2);

(b) Notice of a sale of or surrender of a lease to the primary dwelling of the individual;

(c) Notice that the conservator has delegated a power that requires court approval under RCW 11.130.435 or substantially all powers of the conservator;

(d) Notice that the conservator will be unavailable to perform the conservator's duties for more than one month;

(e) A copy of the conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510 and the conservator's report under RCW 11.130.530;

(f) Access to court records relating to the conservatorship;

(g) Notice of a transaction involving a substantial conflict between the conservator's fiduciary duties and personal interests;

(h) Notice of the death or significant change in the condition of the individual;

(i) Notice that the court has limited or modified the powers of the conservator; and

(j) Notice of the removal of the conservator.

(7) If an individual subject to conservatorship is an adult, the spouse, domestic partner, and adult children of the adult subject to conservatorship are entitled under subsection (6) of this section to notice unless the court ((determines))orders otherwise based on good cause. Good cause includes the court's determination that notice would be contrary to the preferences or prior directions of the adult subject to conservatorship ((or not in the best interest of the adult)).

(8) If an individual subject to conservatorship is a minor, each parent and adult sibling of the minor is entitled under subsection (6) of this section to notice unless the court determines notice would not be in the best interest of the minor.

(9) All orders establishing a conservatorship for an adult must contain:

(a) A conservatorship summary placed directly below the case caption or on a separate cover page in the form or substantially the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.665;

(b) The date which the limited conservator or conservator must file the conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510;

(c) The date which the limited conservator or conservator must file an inventory under RCW 11.130.515;

(d) The date by which the court will review the conservator's plan as required by RCW 11.130.510;

(e) The report interval which the conservator must file its report under RCW 11.130.530. The report interval may be annual, biennial, or triennial;

(f) The date the limited conservator or conservator must file its report under RCW 11.130.530. The due date of the filing of the report shall be within ninety days after the anniversary date of the appointment;

(g) The date for the court to review the report under RCW 11.130.530 and enter its order. The court shall conduct the review within one hundred twenty days after the anniversary date of the appointment.

Sec. 218. RCW 11.130.425 and 2019 c 437 s 412 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A conservator appointed under RCW 11.130.420 shall give to the individual subject to conservatorship and to all other persons ((given))entitled to notice pursuant to an order under RCW ((11.130.370))11.130.420(6) or a subsequent order a copy of the order of appointment, together with notice of the right to request termination or modification. The order and notice must be given not later than fourteen days after the appointment.

(2) Not later than thirty days after appointment of a conservator under RCW 11.130.420, the conservator shall give to the individual subject to conservatorship and any other person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.420(6) a statement of the rights of the individual subject to conservatorship and procedures to seek relief if the individual is denied those rights. The statement must be in plain language, in at least sixteen-point font, and to the extent feasible, in a language in which the individual subject to conservatorship is proficient. The statement must notify the individual subject to conservatorship of the right to:

(a) Seek termination or modification of the conservatorship, or removal of the conservator, and choose an attorney to represent the individual in these matters;

(b) Participate in decision making to the extent reasonably feasible;

(c) Receive a copy of the conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510, the conservator's inventory under RCW 11.130.515, and the conservator's report under RCW 11.130.530; and

(d) Object to the conservator's inventory, plan, or report.

(3) If a conservator is appointed for the reasons stated in RCW 11.130.360(2)(a)(ii) and the individual subject to conservatorship is missing, notice under this section to the individual is not required.

Sec. 219. RCW 11.130.430 and 2019 c 437 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person interested in an individual's welfare, including the individual for whom the order is sought, may petition for appointment of an emergency conservator for the individual.

(2) An emergency petition under subsection (1) of this section must state the petitioner's name, principal residence, and current street address, if different, and to the extent known, the following:

(a) The respondent's name, age, principal residence and current street address, if different;

(b) The name and address of the respondent's:

(i) Spouse or domestic partner or, if the respondent has none, an adult with whom the respondent has shared household responsibilities for more than six months in the twelve-month period immediately before the filing of the emergency petition;

(ii) Adult children or, if none, each parent and adult sibling of the respondent, or, if none, at least one adult nearest in kinship to the respondent who can be found with reasonable diligence; and

(iii) Adult stepchildren whom the respondent actively parented during the stepchildren's minor years and with whom the respondent had an ongoing relationship in the two-year period immediately before the filing of the emergency petition;

(c) The name and current address of each of the following, if applicable:

(i) A person responsible for care of the respondent;

(ii) Any attorney currently representing the respondent;

(iii) Any representative payee appointed by the social security administration for the respondent;

(iv) A guardian or conservator acting for the respondent in this state or in another jurisdiction;

(v) A trustee or custodian of a trust or custodianship of which the respondent is a beneficiary;

(vi) Any fiduciary for the respondent appointed by the department of veterans affairs;

(vii) An agent designated under a power of attorney for health care in which the respondent is identified as the principal;

(viii) An agent designated under a power of attorney for finances in which the respondent is identified as the principal;

(ix) A person nominated as conservator by the respondent;

(x) A person nominated as conservator by the respondent's parent or spouse or domestic partner in a will or other signed record;

(xi) A proposed emergency conservator, and the reason the proposed emergency conservator should be selected; and

(xii) A person known to have routinely assisted the respondent with decision making during the six months immediately before the filing of the emergency petition;

(d) The reason an emergency conservatorship is necessary, including a specific description of:

(i) The nature and extent of the emergency situation;

(ii) The nature and extent of the respondent's alleged emergency need that arose because of the emergency situation;

(iii) The substantial and irreparable harm to the respondent's health, safety, welfare, or rights that is likely to be prevented by the appointment of an emergency conservator;

(iv) All protective arrangements or other less restrictive alternatives that have been considered or implemented to meet the respondent's alleged emergency need instead of emergency conservatorship;

(v) If no protective arrangements or other less restrictive alternatives have been considered or implemented instead of emergency conservatorship, the reason they have not been considered or implemented; and

(vi) The reason a protective arrangement or other less restrictive alternative instead of emergency conservatorship is insufficient to meet the respondent's alleged emergency need;

(e) The reason the petitioner believes that a basis for appointment of a conservator under RCW 11.130.360 exists;

(f) Whether the petitioner intends to also seek conservatorship for an individual under RCW 11.130.365;

(g) The reason the petitioner believes that no other person appears to have authority and willingness to act to address the respondent's identified needs caused by the emergency circumstances;

(h) The specific powers to be granted to the proposed emergency conservator and a description of how those powers will be used to meet the respondent's alleged emergency need;

(i) If the respondent has property other than personal effects, a general statement of the respondent's property, with an estimate of its value, including any insurance or pension, and the source and amount of other anticipated income or receipts; and

(j) Whether the respondent needs an interpreter, translator, or other form of support to communicate effectively with the court or understand court proceedings.

(3) The requirements of RCW 11.130.090 apply to an emergency conservator appointed for an individual with the following exceptions for any proposed emergency conservator required to complete the training under RCW 11.130.090:

(a) The proposed emergency conservator shall present evidence of the successful completion of the required training video or web cast to the court no later than the hearing on the petition for appointment of an emergency conservator for an individual; and

(b) The superior court may defer the completion of the training requirement to a date no later than fourteen days after appointment if the petitioner requests an extension of time to complete the training due to emergent circumstances beyond the control of petitioner.

(4) On its own or on petition ((by a person interested in an individual's welfare))for appointment of an emergency conservator for an individual after a petition has been filed under RCW 11.130.365, the court may appoint an emergency conservator for the individual if the court ((finds))makes specific findings based on clear and convincing evidence that:

(a) ((Appointment))An emergency exists such that appointment of an emergency conservator is likely to prevent substantial and irreparable harm to the ((individual's))respondent's property or financial interests;

(b) The respondent's identified needs caused by the emergency cannot be met by a protective arrangement or other less restrictive alternative instead of emergency conservatorship;

(c) No other person appears to have authority and willingness to act ((in the))to address the respondent's identified needs caused by the emergency circumstances; and

(((c)))(d) There is reason to believe that a basis for appointment of a conservator under RCW 11.130.360 exists.

(((2)))(5) If the court acts on its own to appoint an emergency conservator after a petition has been filed under RCW 11.130.365, all requirements of this section shall be met.

(6) A court order appointing an emergency conservator for an individual shall:

(a) Grant only the specific powers necessary to meet the individual's identified emergency need and to prevent substantial and irreparable harm to the individual's property or financial interests;

(b) State that the emergency conservator is prohibited from delegating the powers granted to the emergency conservator in the order of appointment;

(c) Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established that an emergency exists such that appointment of an emergency conservator is likely to prevent substantial and irreparable harm to the respondent's property or financial interests;

(d) Include a specific finding that the identified emergency need of the respondent cannot be met by a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternative, including any relief available under chapter 74.34 RCW or use of appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making;

(e) Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established the respondent was given proper notice of the hearing on the petition;

(f) State that the individual subject to emergency conservatorship retains all rights the individual enjoyed prior to the emergency conservatorship with the exception of the rights not retained during the period of emergency conservatorship;

(g) Include the date that the sixty-day period of emergency conservatorship ends, and the date the emergency conservator's report, required by this section, is due to the court; and

(h) Identify any person or notice party that subsequently is entitled to:

(i) Notice of the rights of the individual;

(ii) Notice of a change in the primary dwelling of the individual;

(iii) Notice of the removal of the conservator;

(iv) A copy of the emergency conservator's plan and the emergency conservator's report under this section;

(v) Access to court records relating to the emergency conservatorship;

(vi) Notice of the death or significant change in the condition of the individual;

(vii) Notice that the court has limited or modified the powers of the emergency conservator; and

(viii) Notice of the removal of the emergency conservator.

(7) A spouse, a domestic partner, and adult children of an adult subject to emergency conservatorship are entitled to notice under this section unless the court orders otherwise based on good cause. Good cause includes the court's determination that notice would be contrary to the preferences or prior directions of the individual subject to emergency conservatorship.

(8) The duration of authority of an emergency conservator ((may))shall not exceed sixty days and the emergency conservator ((may))shall exercise only the powers specified in the order of appointment. ((The))Upon a motion by the emergency conservator, with notice served upon all applicable notice parties, the emergency conservator's authority may be extended once for not more than sixty days if the court finds that the conditions for appointment of an emergency conservator under subsection (((1)))(4) of this section continue.

(((3)))(9) Immediately on filing of a petition for an emergency conservator, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the respondent in the proceeding. ((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, reasonable))At least fourteen days' notice of the date, time, and place of a hearing on the petition must be given to the respondent, the respondent's attorney, and any other ((person the court determines))notice party. A copy of the emergency petition and notice of a hearing on the petition must be served personally on the respondent and the respondent's attorney not more than two court days after the petition has been filed. The notice must inform the respondent of the respondent's rights at the hearing, including the right to an attorney and to attend the hearing. The notice must include a description of the nature, purpose, and consequences of granting the emergency petition. The court shall not grant the emergency petition if notice substantially complying with this subsection is not served on the respondent.

(((4) The court may appoint an emergency conservator without notice to the respondent and any attorney for the respondent only if the court finds from an affidavit or testimony that the respondent's property or financial interests will be substantially and irreparably harmed before a hearing with notice on the appointment can be held. If the court appoints an emergency conservator without giving notice under subsection (3) of this section, the court must give notice of the appointment not later than forty-eight hours after the appointment to:

(a) The respondent;

(b) The respondent's attorney; and

(c) Any other person the court determines.

(5) Not later than five days after the appointment, the court shall hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment.

(6)))(10) On receipt of a petition for appointment of emergency conservator for an individual, the court shall appoint a court visitor. Notice of appointment of the court visitor must be served upon the court visitor within two days of appointment. The court visitor must be an individual with training or experience in the type of abilities, limitations, and needs alleged in the emergency petition. The court, in the order appointing a court visitor, shall specify the hourly rate the visitor may charge for his or her services, and shall specify the maximum amount the court visitor may charge without additional court review and approval.

(a) The court visitor shall within two days of service of notice of appointment file with the court and serve, either personally or by certified mail with return receipt, the respondent or the respondent's legal counsel, the petitioner or the petitioner's legal counsel, and any notice party with a statement including the court visitor's: Training relating to the duties as a court visitor; criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the appointment; hourly rate, if compensated; contact, if any, with a party to the proceeding prior to appointment; and apparent or actual conflicts of interest.

(b) A court visitor appointed under this section shall use due diligence to attempt to interview the respondent in person and, in a manner the respondent is best able to understand:

(i) Explain to the respondent the substance of the emergency petition, the nature, purpose, and effect of the proceeding, the respondent's rights at the hearing on the petition, and the proposed specific powers and duties of the proposed conservator as stated in the emergency petition;

(ii) Determine the respondent's views about the emergency appointment sought by the petitioner, including views about a proposed emergency conservator, the emergency conservator's proposed powers and duties, and the scope and duration of the proposed emergency conservatorship; and

(iii) Inform the respondent that all costs and expenses of the proceeding, including but not limited to the respondent's attorneys' fees, the appointed conservator's fees, and the appointed conservator's attorneys' fees, will be paid from the respondent's assets upon approval by the court.

(c) The court visitor appointed under this section shall:

(i) Interview the petitioner and proposed emergency conservator;

(ii) Use due diligence to attempt to visit the respondent's present dwelling;

(iii) Use due diligence to attempt to obtain information from any physician or other person known to have treated, advised, or assessed the respondent's relevant physical or mental condition; and

(iv) Investigate the allegations in the emergency petition and any other matter relating to the emergency petition the court directs.

(d) A court visitor appointed under this section shall file a report in a record with the court and provide a copy of the report to the respondent, petitioner, and any notice party at least seven days prior to the hearing on the emergency petition, which must include:

(i) A recommendation regarding the appropriateness of emergency conservatorship, including whether a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternative for meeting the respondent's needs is available, and if an emergency conservatorship is recommended;

(ii) A detailed summary of the alleged emergency and the substantial and irreparable harm to the respondent's health, safety, welfare, or rights that is likely to be prevented by the appointment of an emergency conservator;

(iii) A statement as to whether the alleged emergency and the respondent's alleged needs are likely to require an extension of sixty days as authorized under this section;

(iv) The specific powers to be granted to the emergency conservator and how the specific powers will address the alleged emergency and the respondent's alleged need;

(v) A recommendation regarding the appropriateness of an ongoing conservatorship for an individual, including whether a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternative for meeting the respondent's needs is available;

(vi) A statement of the qualifications of the proposed emergency conservator and whether the respondent approves or disapproves of the proposed emergency conservator, and the reasons for such approval or disapproval;

(vii) A recommendation whether a professional evaluation under RCW 11.130.390 is necessary;

(viii) A statement whether the respondent is able to attend a hearing at the location court proceedings typically are held;

(ix) A statement whether the respondent is able to participate in a hearing which identifies any technology or other form of support that would enhance the respondent's ability to participate; and

(x) Any other matter the court directs.

(11) An emergency conservator shall:

(a) Comply with the requirements of RCW 11.130.505 and the requirements of this chapter that pertain to the rights of an individual subject to conservatorship;

(b) Not delegate any of the powers granted in the petition for appointment of an emergency conservator;

(c) Not have authority to make decisions or take actions that a conservator for an individual is prohibited by law from having; and

(d) Be subject to the same special limitations on a conservator's power that apply to a conservator for an individual.

(12) Appointment of an emergency conservator under this section is not a determination that a basis exists for appointment of a conservator under RCW 11.130.360.

(((7)))(13) The court may remove an emergency conservator appointed under this section at any time.

(14) The emergency conservator shall file a report in a record with the court and provide a copy of the report to the individual subject to emergency conservatorship, and any notice party no later than forty-five days after appointment. The report shall include specific and updated information regarding the emergency alleged in the emergency petition, the individual's emergency needs, all actions and decisions by the emergency conservator, and a recommendation as to whether a conservator for an individual should be appointed. If the appointment of the emergency conservator is extended for an additional sixty days, the emergency conservator shall file a second report in a record with the court and provide a copy of the report to the individual subject to emergency conservatorship, and any notice party no later than forty-five days after appointment, which shall include the same information required for the first report. The emergency conservator shall make any other report the court requires.

(15) The court shall issue letters of emergency conservatorship to the emergency conservator in compliance with RCW 11.130.040.

Sec. 220. RCW 11.130.435 and 2019 c 437 s 414 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise ordered by the court, a conservator must give notice to persons entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.370(4) and receive specific authorization by the court before the conservator may exercise with respect to the conservatorship the power to:

(a) Make a gift, except a gift of de minimis value;

(b) Sell, encumber an interest in, or surrender a lease to the primary dwelling of the individual subject to conservatorship;

(c) Sell, or encumber an interest in, any other real estate;

(d) Convey, release, or disclaim a contingent or expectant interest in property, including marital property and any right of survivorship incident to joint tenancy or tenancy by the entireties;

(((d)))(e) Exercise or release a power of appointment;

(((e)))(f) Create a revocable or irrevocable trust of property of the conservatorship estate, whether or not the trust extends beyond the duration of the conservatorship, or revoke or amend a trust revocable by the individual subject to conservatorship;

(((f)))(g) Exercise a right to elect an option or change a beneficiary under an insurance policy or annuity or surrender the policy or annuity for its cash value;

(((g)))(h) Exercise a right to a quasi-community property share under RCW 26.16.230 or a right to an elective share under other law in the estate of a deceased spouse or domestic partner of the individual subject to conservatorship or renounce or disclaim a property interest;

(((h)))(i) Grant a creditor priority for payment over creditors of the same or higher class if the creditor is providing property or services used to meet the basic living and care needs of the individual subject to conservatorship and preferential treatment otherwise would be impermissible under RCW 11.130.555(5); ((and

(i)))(j) Make, modify, amend, or revoke the will of the individual subject to conservatorship in compliance with chapter 11.12 RCW;

(k) Acquire or dispose of property, including real property in another state, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale, and manage, develop, improve, exchange, partition, change the character of, or abandon property;

(l) Make ordinary or extraordinary repairs or alterations in a building or other structure, demolish any improvement, or raze an existing or erect a new party wall or building;

(m) Subdivide or develop land, dedicate land to public use, make or obtain the vacation of a plat and adjust a boundary, adjust a difference in valuation of land, exchange or partition land by giving or receiving consideration, and dedicate an easement to public use without consideration;

(n) Enter for any purpose into a lease of property as lessor or lessee, with or without an option to purchase or renew, for a term within or extending beyond the term of the conservatorship; and

(o) Structure the finances of the individual subject to conservatorship to establish eligibility for a public benefit including by making gifts consistent with the individual's preferences, values, and prior directions, if the conservator's action does not jeopardize the individual's welfare and otherwise is consistent with the conservator's duties.

(2) In approving a conservator's exercise of a power listed in subsection (1) of this section, the court shall consider primarily the decision the individual subject to conservatorship would make if able, to the extent the decision can be ascertained.

(3) To determine under subsection (2) of this section the decision the individual subject to conservatorship would make if able, the court shall consider the individual's prior or current directions, preferences, opinions, values, and actions, to the extent actually known or reasonably ascertainable by the conservator. The court also shall consider:

(a) The financial needs of the individual subject to conservatorship and individuals who are in fact dependent on the individual subject to conservatorship for support, and the interests of creditors of the individual;

(b) Possible reduction of income, estate, inheritance, or other tax liabilities;

(c) Eligibility for governmental assistance;

(d) The previous pattern of giving or level of support provided by the individual;

(e) Any existing estate plan or lack of estate plan of the individual;

(f) The life expectancy of the individual and the probability the conservatorship will terminate before the individual's death; and

(g) Any other relevant factor.

(4) A conservator may not revoke or amend a power of attorney for finances executed by the individual subject to conservatorship. If a power of attorney for finances is in effect, a decision of the agent within the scope of the agent's authority takes precedence over that of the conservator, unless the court orders otherwise. The court has authority to revoke or amend any power of attorney executed by the adult.

Sec. 221. RCW 11.130.505 and 2019 c 437 s 418 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A conservator is a fiduciary and has duties of prudence and loyalty to the individual subject to conservatorship.

(2) A conservator shall promote the self-determination of the individual subject to conservatorship and, to the extent feasible, encourage the individual to participate in decisions, act on the individual's own behalf, and develop or regain the capacity to manage the individual's personal affairs.

(3) In making a decision for an individual subject to conservatorship, the conservator shall make the decision the conservator reasonably believes the individual would make if able, unless doing so would fail to preserve the resources needed to maintain the individual's well-being and lifestyle or otherwise unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the individual. To determine the decision the individual would make if able, the conservator shall consider the individual's prior or current directions, preferences, opinions, values, and actions, to the extent actually known or reasonably ascertainable by the conservator.

(4) If a conservator cannot make a decision under subsection (3) of this section because the conservator does not know and cannot reasonably determine the decision the individual subject to conservatorship probably would make if able, or the conservator reasonably believes the decision the individual would make would fail to preserve resources needed to maintain the individual's well-being and lifestyle or otherwise unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the individual, the conservator shall act in accordance with the best interests of the individual. In determining the best interests of the individual, the conservator shall consider:

(a) Information received from professionals and persons that demonstrate sufficient interest in the welfare of the individual;

(b) Other information the conservator believes the individual would have considered if the individual were able to act; and

(c) Other factors a reasonable person in the circumstances of the individual would consider, including consequences for others.

(5) Except when inconsistent with the conservator's duties under subsections (1) through (4) of this section, a conservator shall invest and manage the conservatorship estate as a prudent investor would, by considering:

(a) The circumstances of the individual subject to conservatorship and the conservatorship estate;

(b) General economic conditions;

(c) The possible effect of inflation or deflation;

(d) The expected tax consequences of an investment decision or strategy;

(e) The role of each investment or course of action in relation to the conservatorship estate as a whole;

(f) The expected total return from income and appreciation of capital;

(g) The need for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation or appreciation of capital; and

(h) The special relationship or value, if any, of specific property to the individual subject to conservatorship.

(6) The propriety of a conservator's investment and management of the conservatorship estate is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing when the conservator decides or acts and not by hindsight.

(7) A conservator shall make a reasonable effort to verify facts relevant to the investment and management of the conservatorship estate.

(8) A conservator that has special skills or expertise, or is named conservator in reliance on the conservator's representation of special skills or expertise, has a duty to use the special skills or expertise in carrying out the conservator's duties.

(9) In investing, selecting specific property for distribution, and invoking a power of revocation or withdrawal for the use or benefit of the individual subject to conservatorship, a conservator shall consider any estate plan of the individual known or reasonably ascertainable to the conservator and may examine the will or other donative, nominative, or appointive instrument of the individual.

(10) A conservator shall maintain insurance on the insurable real and personal property of the individual subject to conservatorship, unless the conservatorship estate lacks sufficient funds to pay for insurance or the court finds:

(a) The property lacks sufficient equity; or

(b) Insuring the property would unreasonably dissipate the conservatorship estate or otherwise not be in the best interest of the individual.

(11) If a power of attorney for finances is in effect, a conservator shall cooperate with the agent to the extent feasible.

(12) A conservator has access to and authority over a digital asset of the individual subject to conservatorship to the extent provided by the revised uniform fiduciary access to digital assets act (chapter 11.120 RCW) or court order.

(13) A conservator for an adult shall notify the court if the condition of the adult has changed so that the adult is capable of exercising rights previously removed. The notice must be given immediately on learning of the change.

(14) A conservator shall notify the court within thirty days of any substantial change in the value of the property of the person subject to conservatorship and shall provide a copy of the notice to the person subject to guardianship, a person entitled to notice under RCW ((11.130.370))11.130.420(6) or a subsequent court order, and any other person the court has determined is entitled to notice and schedule a hearing for the court to review the adequacy of the bond or other verified receipt under RCW 11.130.445 and 11.130.500.

Sec. 222. RCW 11.130.515 and 2019 c 437 s 420 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Not later than ((sixty))ninety days after appointment, a conservator shall prepare and file with the appointing court a detailed inventory of the conservatorship estate, together with an oath or affirmation that the inventory is believed to be complete and accurate as far as information permits.

(2) A conservator shall give notice of the filing of an inventory to the individual subject to conservatorship, a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.420(6) or a subsequent order, and any other person the court determines. The notice must be given not later than fourteen days after the filing.

(3) A conservator shall keep records of the administration of the conservatorship estate and make them available for examination on reasonable request of the individual subject to conservatorship, a guardian for the individual, or any other person the conservator or the court determines.

Sec. 223. RCW 11.130.520 and 2019 c 437 s 421 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 11.130.435 or qualified or limited in the court's order of appointment and stated in the letters of office, a conservator has all powers granted in this section and any additional power granted to a trustee by law of this state other than this chapter.

(2) A conservator, acting reasonably and consistent with the fiduciary duties of the conservator to accomplish the purpose of the conservatorship, without specific court authorization or confirmation, may with respect to the conservatorship estate:

(a) Collect, hold, and retain property, including property in which the conservator has a personal interest and real property in another state, until the conservator determines disposition of the property should be made;

(b) Receive additions to the conservatorship estate;

(c) Continue or participate in the operation of a business or other enterprise;

(d) Acquire an undivided interest in property in which the conservator, in a fiduciary capacity, holds an undivided interest;

(e) Invest assets;

(f) Deposit funds or other property in a financial institution, including one operated by the conservator;

(g) ((Acquire or dispose of property, including real property in another state, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale, and manage, develop, improve, exchange, partition, change the character of, or abandon property;

(h) Make ordinary or extraordinary repairs or alterations in a building or other structure, demolish any improvement, or raze an existing or erect a new party wall or building;

(i) Subdivide or develop land, dedicate land to public use, make or obtain the vacation of a plat and adjust a boundary, adjust a difference in valuation of land, exchange or partition land by giving or receiving consideration, and dedicate an easement to public use without consideration;

(j) Enter for any purpose into a lease of property as lessor or lessee, with or without an option to purchase or renew, for a term within or extending beyond the term of the conservatorship;

(k))) Enter into a lease or arrangement for exploration and removal of minerals or other natural resources or a pooling or unitization agreement;

(((l)))(h) Grant an option involving disposition of property or accept or exercise an option for the acquisition of property;

(((m)))(i) Vote a security, in person or by general or limited proxy;

(((n)))(j) Pay a call, assessment, or other sum chargeable or accruing against or on account of a security;

(((o)))(k) Sell or exercise a stock subscription or conversion right;

(((p)))(l) Consent, directly or through a committee or agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation or other business enterprise;

(((q)))(m) Hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the conservatorship so that title to the security may pass by delivery;

(((r)))(n) Insure:

(i) The conservatorship estate, in whole or in part, against damage or loss in accordance with RCW 11.130.505(10); and

(ii) The conservator against liability with respect to a third person;

(((s)))(o) Borrow funds, with or without security, to be repaid from the conservatorship estate or otherwise;

(((t)))(p) Advance funds for the protection of the conservatorship estate or the individual subject to conservatorship and all expenses, losses, and liability sustained in the administration of the conservatorship estate or because of holding any property for which the conservator has a lien on the conservatorship estate;

(((u)))(q) Pay or contest a claim, settle a claim by or against the conservatorship estate or the individual subject to conservatorship by compromise, arbitration, or otherwise, or release, in whole or in part, a claim belonging to the conservatorship estate to the extent the claim is uncollectible;

(((v)))(r) Pay a tax, assessment, compensation of the conservator or any guardian, and other expense incurred in the collection, care, administration, and protection of the conservatorship estate;

(((w)))(s) Pay a sum distributable to the individual subject to conservatorship or an individual who is in fact dependent on the individual subject to conservatorship by paying the sum to the distributee or for the use of the distributee:

(i) To the guardian for the distributee;

(ii) To the custodian of the distributee under the uniform transfers to minors act (chapter 11.114 RCW); or

(iii) If there is no guardian, custodian, or custodial trustee, to a relative or other person having physical custody of the distributee;

(((x)))(t) Bring or defend an action, claim, or proceeding in any jurisdiction for the protection of the conservatorship estate or the conservator in the performance of the conservator's duties; and

(((y) Structure the finances of the individual subject to conservatorship to establish eligibility for a public benefit, including by making gifts consistent with the individual's preferences, values, and prior directions, if the conservator's action does not jeopardize the individual's welfare and otherwise is consistent with the conservator's duties; and

(z)))(u) Execute and deliver any instrument that will accomplish or facilitate the exercise of a power of the conservator.

Sec. 224. RCW 11.130.530 and 2019 c 437 s 423 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A conservator shall file with the court by the date established by the court a report in a record regarding the administration of the conservatorship estate unless the court otherwise directs, on resignation or removal, on termination of the conservatorship, and at any other time the court directs.

(2) A report under subsection (1) of this section must state or contain:

(a) An accounting that lists property included in the conservatorship estate and the receipts, disbursements, liabilities, and distributions during the period for which the report is made;

(b) A list of the services provided to the individual subject to conservatorship;

(c) A copy of the conservator's most recently approved plan and a statement whether the conservator has deviated from the plan and, if so, how the conservator has deviated and why;

(d) A recommendation as to the need for continued conservatorship and any recommended change in the scope of the conservatorship;

(e) To the extent feasible, a copy of the most recent reasonably available financial statements evidencing the status of bank accounts, investment accounts, and mortgages or other debts of the individual subject to conservatorship with all but the last four digits of the account numbers and social security number redacted;

(f) Anything of more than de minimis value which the conservator, any individual who resides with the conservator, or the spouse, domestic partner, parent, child, or sibling of the conservator has received from a person providing goods or services to the individual subject to conservatorship;

(g) Any business relation the conservator has with a person the conservator has paid or that has benefited from the property of the individual subject to conservatorship; and

(h) Whether any co-conservator or successor conservator appointed to serve when a designated event occurs is alive and able to serve.

(3) The court may appoint a court visitor to review a report under this section or conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510, interview the individual subject to conservatorship or conservator, or investigate any other matter involving the conservatorship. In connection with the report, the court may order the conservator to submit the conservatorship estate to appropriate examination in a manner the court directs.

(4) Notice of the filing under this section of a conservator's report, together with a copy of the report, must be provided to the individual subject to conservatorship, a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.420(6) or a subsequent order, and other persons the court determines. The notice and report must be given not later than fourteen days after filing.

(5) The court shall establish procedures for monitoring a report submitted under this section and review each report at least annually to determine whether:

(a) The reports provide sufficient information to establish the conservator has complied with the conservator's duties;

(b) The conservatorship should continue; and

(c) The conservator's requested fees, if any, should be approved.

(6) If the court determines there is reason to believe a conservator has not complied with the conservator's duties or the conservatorship should not continue, the court:

(a) Shall notify the individual subject to conservatorship, the conservator, and any other person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.420(6) or a subsequent order;

(b) May require additional information from the conservator;

(c) May appoint a court visitor to interview the individual subject to conservatorship or conservator or investigate any matter involving the conservatorship; and

(d) Consistent with RCW 11.130.565 and 11.130.570, may hold a hearing to consider removal of the conservator, termination of the conservatorship, or a change in the powers granted to the conservator or terms of the conservatorship.

(7) If the court has reason to believe fees requested by a conservator are not reasonable, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether to adjust the requested fees.

(8) A conservator must petition the court for approval of a report filed under this section. The court after review may approve the report. If the court approves the report, there is a rebuttable presumption the report is accurate as to a matter adequately disclosed in the report.

(9) An order, after notice and hearing, approving an interim report of a conservator filed under this section adjudicates liabilities concerning a matter adequately disclosed in the report, as to a person given notice of the report or accounting.

(10) If the court approves a report filed under this section, the order approving the report shall set the due date for the filing of the next report to be filed under this section. The court may set the review at annual, biennial, or triennial intervals with the report due date to be within ninety days of the anniversary date of appointment. When determining the report interval, the court can consider: The length of time the conservator has been serving the person under conservatorship; whether the conservator has timely filed all required reports with the court; whether the conservator is monitored by other state or local agencies; the income of the person subject to conservatorship; the value of the property of the person subject to conservatorship; the adequacy of the bond and other verified receipt; and whether there have been any allegations of abuse, neglect, or a breach of fiduciary duty against the conservator.

(11) If the court approves a report filed under this section, the order approving the report shall contain a conservatorship summary or accompanied by a conservatorship summary in the form or substantially in the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.665.

(12) If the court approves a report filed under this section, the order approving the report shall direct the clerk of the court to reissue letters of office in the form or substantially in the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.660 to the conservator containing an expiration date which will be within one hundred ((twenty))eighty days after the date the court directs the conservator file its next report.

(13) An order, after notice and hearing, approving a final report filed under this section discharges the conservator from all liabilities, claims, and causes of action by a person given notice of the report and the hearing as to a matter adequately disclosed in the report.

(14) Any requirement to establish a monitoring program under this section is subject to appropriation.

Sec. 225. RCW 11.130.550 and 2019 c 437 s 427 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((If an individual subject to conservatorship dies, the conservator shall deliver))Upon the death of an individual subject to conservatorship, a conservator shall:

(a) Have authority to disburse or commit those funds under the control of the conservator as are prudent and within the means of the estate for the disposition of the deceased individual subject to conservatorship's remains. Consent for such arrangement must be secured according to RCW 68.50.160. If no person authorized by RCW 68.50.160 accepts responsibility for giving consent, the conservator may consent, subject to the provisions of this section and to the known directives of the deceased individual subject to conservatorship. Reasonable financial commitments made by a conservator pursuant to this section are binding against the estate of the deceased individual subject to conservatorship;

(b) Deliver to the court for safekeeping any will of the individual in the conservator's possession and inform the personal representative named in the will if feasible, or if not feasible, a beneficiary named in the will, of the delivery.

(2) If forty days after the death of an individual subject to conservatorship no personal representative has been appointed and no application or petition for appointment is before the court, the conservator may apply to exercise the powers and duties of a personal representative to administer and distribute the decedent's estate. The conservator shall give notice of his or her appointment and the pendency of any probate proceedings as provided in RCW 11.28.237 and shall also give notice to a person nominated as personal representative by a will of the decedent of which the conservator is aware. The court may grant the application if there is no objection and endorse the letters of office to note that the individual formerly subject to conservatorship is deceased and the conservator has acquired the powers and duties of a personal representative.

(3) On the death of an individual subject to conservatorship, the conservator shall conclude the administration of the conservatorship estate as provided in RCW 11.130.570.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226. A new section is added to chapter 11.130 RCW to read as follows:
CONSERVATOR ACCESS TO CERTAIN HELD ASSETS.
(1) For purposes of this section, "institution" means all financial institutions as defined in RCW 30A.22.041, all insurance companies holding a certificate of authority under chapter 48.05 RCW, or any agent who constitutes a salesperson or broker-dealer of securities under the definitions of RCW 21.20.005, individually and collectively.

(2) Institutions shall provide the conservator access and control over the assets described in (a)(vii) of this subsection, including but not limited to delivery of the asset to the conservator, upon receipt of the following:

(a) An affidavit containing as an attachment a true and correct copy of the conservator's letters of conservatorship and stating:

(i) That as of the date of the affidavit, the affiant is a duly appointed conservator with authority over assets held by the institution but owned or subject to withdrawal or delivery to a client or depositor of the institution;

(ii) The cause number of the conservatorship;

(iii) The name of the person under conservatorship and the name of the client or depositor, which names must be the same;

(iv) The account or the safety deposit box number or numbers;

(v) The address of the client or depositor;

(vi) The name and address of the affiant-conservator being provided assets or access to assets;

(vii) A description of and the value of the asset or assets, or, where the value cannot be readily ascertained, a reasonable estimate thereof, and a statement that the conservator receives delivery or control of each asset solely in its capacity as conservator;

(viii) The date the conservator assumed control over the assets; and

(ix) That a true and correct copy of the letters of conservatorship duly issued by a court to the conservator is attached to the affidavit; and

(b) An envelope, with postage prepaid, addressed to the clerk of the court issuing the letters of conservatorship. The affidavit must be sent in the envelope by the institution to the clerk of the court together with a statement signed by an agent of the institution that the description of the asset set forth in the affidavit appears to be accurate, and confirming in the case of cash assets, the value of the asset.

(3) Any conservator provided with access to a safe deposit box pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall make an inventory of the contents of the box and attach this inventory to the affidavit before the affidavit is sent to the clerk of the court and before the contents of the box are released to the conservator. Any inventory must be prepared in the presence of an employee of the institution and the statement of the institution required under subsection (1) of this section must include a statement executed by the employee that the inventory appears to be accurate. The institution may require payment by the conservator of any fees or charges then due in connection with the asset or account and of a reasonable fee for witnessing preparation of the inventory and preparing the statement required by this subsection or subsection (1) of this section.

(4) Any institution to which an affidavit complying with subsection (1) of this section is submitted may rely on the affidavit without inquiry and is not subject to any liability of any nature whatsoever to any person whatsoever, including but not limited to the institution's client or depositor or any other person with an ownership or other interest in or right to the asset, for the reliance or for providing the conservator access and control over the asset, including but not limited to delivery of the asset to the conservator.

Sec. 227. RCW 11.130.670 and 2019 c 437 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The certified professional guardianship board must resolve grievances against professional guardians and/or conservators within a reasonable time for alleged violations of the certified professional guardianship board's standards of practice, statutes, regulations, or rules, that relate to the conduct of a certified professional guardian or conservator.

(a) All grievances must initially be reviewed within thirty days by certified professional guardianship board members, or a subset thereof, to determine if the grievance is complete, states facts that ((allege))describe a violation of the standards of practice, statutes, regulations, or rules, and relates to the conduct of a professional guardian and/or conservator, before ((any investigation or))investigating, requesting a response ((is requested)) from the professional guardian or conservator, or forwarding to the superior courts. ((Grievances))To be complete, grievances must provide sufficient details of the alleged conduct to demonstrate that a violation of the statute, regulation, standard of practice, or rule, relating to the conduct of a certified professional guardian or conservator could have occurred, the dates ((of)) the alleged ((violations))conduct occurred, and must be signed and dated by the person filing the grievance. Grievance investigations by the board are limited to the allegations contained in the grievance unless, after review by a majority of the members of the certified professional guardianship board, further investigation is justified.

(b) If the certified professional guardianship board determines the grievance is complete, states facts that allege a violation of the certified professional guardianship board's standards of practice, and relates to the conduct of a professional guardian and/or conservator, the certified professional guardianship board must forward that grievance within ten days to the superior court for that guardianship or conservatorship and to the professional guardian and/or conservator. The court must review the matter as set forth in RCW 11.130.140, and must direct the clerk of the court to send a copy of the order entered under this section to the certified professional guardianship board. The certified professional guardianship board must accept as facts any finding of fact contained in the order. The certified professional guardianship board must act consistently with any finding of fact issued in that order.

(2) Grievances received by the certified professional guardianship board must be ((resolved))investigated and the resolution determined and in process within one hundred eighty days of receipt. The one hundred eighty days is tolled during any period of time when:

(a) The certified professional guardianship board has provided a certified professional guardian or conservator an opportunity to respond to a grievance against the certified professional guardian or conservator and the certified professional guardianship board is awaiting the certified professional guardian or conservator's response;

(b) The certified professional guardianship board has forwarded a grievance to the superior court for review under subsection (1)(b) of this section and is awaiting receipt of the court's entered order with findings; or

(c) A certified professional guardianship board disciplinary hearing has been requested or is in process and during the time of posthearing board review of the hearing officer's recommendations through issuance of a final certified professional guardianship board's order on the matter.

(3) If the grievance cannot be resolved within one hundred eighty days, the certified professional guardianship board must notify the professional guardian and/or conservator. The professional guardian or conservator may propose a resolution of the grievance with facts and/or arguments. The certified professional guardianship board may accept the proposed resolution or determine that an additional ninety days are needed to review the grievance. If the certified professional guardianship board has not resolved the grievance within the additional ninety days the professional guardian or conservator may:

(a) File a motion for a court order to compel the certified professional guardianship board to resolve the grievance within a reasonable time; or

(b) Move for the superior court to resolve the grievance instead of being resolved by the certified professional guardianship board.

(4) The superior court has authority to enforce the certified professional guardianship board's standards of practice in this article to the extent those standards are related to statutory or fiduciary duties of guardians and conservators.

(5) Any unresolved grievances filed with the certified professional guardianship board ((at the time of))one year or more before January 1, 2021, must be forwarded to the superior court for that guardianship or conservatorship for review by the superior court as set forth in RCW 11.130.140 if the grievance is not in process of a hearing or final resolution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228. A new section is added to chapter 11.130 RCW to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter, an adult is presumed to have legal capacity.

PART III

OTHER PROVISIONS

Sec. 301. RCW 11.130.010 and 2019 c 437 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adult" means an individual at least eighteen years of age or an emancipated individual under eighteen years of age.

(2) "Adult subject to conservatorship" means an adult for whom a conservator has been appointed under this chapter.

(3) "Adult subject to guardianship" means an adult for whom a guardian has been appointed under this chapter.

(4) "Claim" includes a claim against an individual or conservatorship estate, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise.

(5) "Conservator" means a person appointed by a court to make decisions with respect to the property or financial affairs of an individual subject to conservatorship. The term includes a co-conservator.

(6) "Conservatorship estate" means the property subject to conservatorship under this chapter.

(7) "Court visitor" means the person appointed by the court pursuant to RCW 11.130.280(1) or 11.130.380(1).

(8) "Evaluation and treatment facility" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(((8)))(9) "Full conservatorship" means a conservatorship that grants the conservator all powers available under this chapter.

(((9)))(10) "Full guardianship" means a guardianship that grants the guardian all powers available under this chapter.

(((10)))(11) "Guardian" means a person appointed by the court to make decisions with respect to the personal affairs of an individual. The term includes a co-guardian but does not include a guardian ad litem.

(((11)))(12) "Guardian ad litem" means a person appointed to inform the court about, and to represent, the needs and best interests of ((an individual))a minor.

(((12)))(13) "Individual subject to conservatorship" means an adult or minor for whom a conservator has been appointed under this chapter.

(((13)))(14) "Individual subject to guardianship" means an adult or minor for whom a guardian has been appointed under this chapter.

(((14)))(15) "Less restrictive alternative" means an approach to meeting an individual's needs which restricts fewer rights of the individual than would the appointment of a guardian or conservator. The term includes supported decision making, appropriate technological assistance, appointment of a representative payee, and appointment of an agent by the individual, including appointment under a power of attorney for health care or power of attorney for finances.

(((15)))(16) "Letters of office" means a record issued by a court certifying a guardian's or conservator's authority to act.

(((16)))(17) "Limited conservatorship" means a conservatorship that grants the conservator less than all powers available under this chapter, grants powers over only certain property, or otherwise restricts the powers of the conservator.

(((17)))(18) "Limited guardianship" means a guardianship that grants the guardian less than all powers available under this chapter or otherwise restricts the powers of the guardian.

(((18)))(19) "Long-term care facility" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.129.010.

(((19)))(20) "Minor" means an unemancipated individual under eighteen years of age.

(((20)))(21) "Minor subject to conservatorship" means a minor for whom a conservator has been appointed under this chapter.

(((21)))(22) "Minor subject to guardianship" means a minor for whom a guardian has been appointed under this chapter.

(((22)))(23) "Notice party" means a person entitled to notice under this chapter or otherwise determined by the court to be entitled to notice.

(24) "Parent" does not include an individual whose parental rights have been terminated.

(((23)))(25) "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

(((24)))(26) "Professional guardian or conservator" means a guardian or conservator appointed under this chapter who is not a relative of the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship established under this chapter and who charges fees for carrying out the duties of court-appointed guardian or conservator for three or more persons.

(((25)))(27) "Property" includes tangible and intangible property.

(((26)))(28) "Protective arrangement instead of conservatorship" means a court order entered under RCW 11.130.590.

(((27)))(29) "Protective arrangement instead of guardianship" means a court order entered under RCW 11.130.585.

(((28)))(30) "Protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter" means a court order entered under RCW 11.130.585 or 11.130.590.

(((29)))(31) "Record," used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(((30)))(32) "Relative" means any person related by blood or by law to the person subject to guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective arrangements.

(((31)))(33) "Respondent" means an individual for whom appointment of a guardian or conservator or a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or conservatorship is sought.

(((32)))(34) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

(((33)))(35) "Special agent" means the person appointed by the court pursuant to RCW 11.130.375 or 11.130.635.

(((34)))(36) "Standby guardian" means a person appointed by the court under RCW 11.130.220.

(((35)))(37) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(((36)))(38) "Supported decision making" means assistance from one or more persons of an individual's choosing in understanding the nature and consequences of potential personal and financial decisions, which enables the individual to make the decisions, and in communicating a decision once made if consistent with the individual's wishes.

(((37)))(39) "Verified receipt" is a verified receipt signed by the custodian of funds stating that a savings and loan association or bank, trust company, escrow corporation, or other corporations approved by the court hold the cash or securities of the individual subject to conservatorship subject to withdrawal only by order of the court.

(((38)))(40) "Visitor" means ((the person appointed by the court pursuant to RCW 11.130.280(1) or 11.130.380(1)))a court visitor.

Sec. 302. RCW 11.130.035 and 2019 c 437 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the rules of evidence and civil procedure, including rules concerning appellate review, govern a proceeding under this chapter.

(2) If proceedings for a guardianship, conservatorship, or protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter for the same individual are commenced or pending in the same court, the proceedings may be consolidated.

(3) ((A))An adult respondent may demand a jury trial in a proceeding under this chapter on the issue ((whether a basis exists for appointment of a guardian or conservator))of legal capacity.

(4) Upon the motion of the respondent or the court visitor, prior to the appointment of a guardian or a conservator or the establishment of a protective arrangement for an adult, or upon the motion of the respondent, guardian, conservator, or any notice party subsequent to such appointment, whenever it appears that the respondent could benefit from mediation, the court may require the respondent, guardian, conservator, and any notice party to participate in mediation pursuant to RCW 11.96A.300.

Sec. 303. RCW 11.130.040 and 2019 c 437 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court shall issue letters of guardianship to a guardian on filing by the guardian of an acceptance of appointment.

(2) The court shall issue letters of conservatorship to a conservator on filing by the conservator of an acceptance of appointment and filing of any required bond or compliance with any other verified receipt required by the court.

(3) Limitations on the powers of a guardian or conservator or on the property subject to conservatorship must be ((stated on the letters of office))included on the form prescribed by RCW 11.130.660.

(4) The court at any time may limit the powers conferred on a guardian or conservator. The court shall issue new letters of office to reflect the limitation.

(5) A guardian or conservator may not act on behalf of a person under guardianship or conservatorship without valid letters of office.

(6) The clerk of the superior court shall issue letters of guardianship or conservatorship in or substantially in the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.660.

(7) Letters of office issued to a guardian or conservator who is a nonresident of this state must include the name and contact information for the resident agent of the guardian or conservator, appointed pursuant to RCW 11.130.090(1)(c).

(8) This chapter does not affect the validity of letters of office issued under chapter 11.88 RCW prior to January 1, 2021.

Sec. 304. RCW 11.130.100 and 2019 c 437 s 120 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless otherwise compensated or reimbursed, an attorney for a respondent in a proceeding under this chapter is entitled to reasonable compensation for services and reimbursement of reasonable expenses from the property of the respondent.

(2) Unless otherwise compensated or reimbursed, an attorney or other person whose services resulted in an order beneficial to an individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship or for whom a protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter was ordered is entitled to reasonable compensation for services and reimbursement of reasonable expenses from the property of the individual.

(3) ((The court must approve compensation and expenses payable under this section before payment. Approval is not required before a service is provided or an expense is incurred.

(4) If the court dismisses a petition under this chapter and determines the petition was filed in bad faith, the court may assess the cost of any court-ordered professional evaluation or visitor against the petitioner.

(5))) Where the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship is a department of social and health services client, or health care authority client, and is required to contribute a portion of their income towards the cost of long-term care services or room and board, the amount of compensation or reimbursement shall not exceed the amount allowed by the department of social and health services or health care authority by rule.

(((6)))(4) Where the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship receives guardianship, conservatorships, or other protective services from the office of public guardianship, the amount of compensation or reimbursement shall not exceed the amount allowed by the office of public guardianship.

(((7)))(5) The court must approve compensation and expenses payable under this section before payment. Approval is not required before a service is provided or an expense is incurred.

(((8)))(6) If the court dismisses a petition under this chapter and determines the petition was filed in bad faith, the court may assess the cost of any court-ordered professional evaluation or court visitor against the petitioner.

Sec. 305. RCW 11.130.105 and 2019 c 437 s 121 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to court approval, a guardian is entitled to reasonable compensation for services as guardian and to reimbursement for room, board, clothing, and other appropriate expenses advanced for the benefit of the individual subject to guardianship. ((If a conservator, other than the guardian or a person affiliated with the guardian, is appointed for the individual, reasonable compensation and reimbursement to the guardian may be approved and paid by the conservator without court approval.))The court shall determine if the fees charged by a guardian and conservator are just and reasonable.

(2) Subject to court approval, a conservator is entitled to reasonable compensation for services and reimbursement for appropriate expenses from the property of the individual subject to conservatorship.

(3) In determining reasonable compensation for a guardian or conservator, the court, or a conservator in determining reasonable compensation for a guardian as provided in subsection (1) of this section, shall approve compensation that shall not exceed the typical amounts paid for comparable services in the community, at a rate for which the service can be performed in the most efficient and cost-effective manner, considering:

(a) The necessity and quality of the services provided;

(b) The experience, training, professional standing, and skills of the guardian or conservator;

(c) The difficulty of the services performed, including the degree of skill and care required;

(d) The conditions and circumstances under which a service was performed, including whether the service was provided outside regular business hours or under dangerous or extraordinary conditions;

(e) The effect of the services on the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship;

(f) The extent to which the services provided were or were not consistent with the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.340 or conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510; and

(g) The fees customarily paid to a person that performs a like service in the community.

(4) A guardian or conservator need not use personal funds of the guardian or conservator for the expenses of the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

(5) Where the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship is a department of social and health services client, or health care authority client, and is required to contribute a portion of their income towards the cost of long-term care services or room and board, the amount of compensation or reimbursement shall not exceed the amount allowed by the department of social and health services or health care authority by rule.

(6) Where the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship receives guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective services from the office of public guardianship, the amount of compensation or reimbursement shall not exceed the amount allowed by the office of public guardianship.

(7) If an individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship seeks to modify or terminate the guardianship or conservatorship or remove the guardian or conservator, the court may order compensation to the guardian or conservator for time spent opposing modification, termination, or removal only to the extent the court determines the opposition was reasonably necessary to protect the interests of the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

Sec. 306. RCW 11.130.115 and 2019 c 437 s 123 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A guardian or conservator may petition the court for instruction concerning fiduciary responsibility or ratification of a particular act related to the guardianship or conservatorship.

(2) ((On reasonable notice and hearing on))Fourteen days after notice of a petition under subsection (1) of this section, the court may give an instruction and issue an appropriate order.

(3) The petitioner must provide reasonable notice of the petition and hearing to the individual subject to a guardianship or conservatorship.

Sec. 307. RCW 11.130.140 and 2019 c 437 s 128 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An individual who is subject to guardianship or conservatorship, or person interested in the welfare of an individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship, that reasonably believes the guardian or conservator is breaching the guardian's or conservator's fiduciary duty or otherwise acting in a manner inconsistent with this chapter may file a grievance in a record with the court. In addition, an unrepresented person or entity may submit a complaint to the court.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, after receiving a grievance under subsection (1) of this section, the court:

(a) Shall promptly review the grievance against a guardian and shall act to protect the autonomy, values, preferences, and independence of the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship;

(b) Shall schedule a hearing if the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship is an adult and the grievance supports a reasonable belief that:

(i) Removal of the guardian and appointment of a successor may be appropriate under RCW 11.130.350;

(ii) Termination or modification of the guardianship may be appropriate under RCW 11.130.355;

(iii) Removal of the conservator and appointment of a successor may be appropriate under RCW 11.130.565;

(iv) Termination or modification of the conservatorship may be appropriate under RCW 11.130.570; or

(v) A hearing is necessary to resolve the allegations set forth in the grievance; and

(c) May take any action supported by the evidence, including:

(i) Ordering the guardian or conservator to provide the court a report, accounting, inventory, updated plan, or other information;

(ii) Appointing a ((guardian ad litem))court visitor;

(iii) Appointing an attorney for the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship; or

(iv) Holding a hearing.

(3) The court may decline to act under subsection (2) of this section if a similar grievance was filed within the six months preceding the filing of the current grievance and the court followed the procedures of subsection (2) of this section in considering the earlier grievance; and may levy necessary sanctions, including but not limited to the imposition of reasonable attorney fees, costs, striking pleadings, or other appropriate relief, if after consideration the court finds that the grievance is made for reason to harass, delay, with malice, or other bad faith.

(4) In any court action under this section where the court finds the professional guardian or conservator breached a fiduciary duty, the court must direct the clerk of the court to send a copy of the order entered under this section to the certified professional guardianship board.

(5) A court shall not dismiss a grievance that has been filed against a guardian or conservator due to an inability to resolve the grievance in a timely manner.

Sec. 308. RCW 11.130.265 and 2019 c 437 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On petition and after notice and hearing, the court may:

(a) Appoint a guardian for an adult if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

(i) The respondent lacks the ((ability to meet essential requirements for physical health, safety, or self-care because the respondent is unable))legal capacity necessary to receive and evaluate information or make or communicate decisions, even with appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making, in order to meet essential requirements for physical health, safety, or self-care; ((and))

(ii) Appointment is necessary to prevent significant risk of harm to the adult respondent's health, safety, or personal affairs; and

(iii) The respondent's identified needs cannot be met by a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or other less restrictive alternative; or

(b) With appropriate findings, treat the petition as one for a conservatorship under Article 4 of this chapter or protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter, issue any appropriate order, or dismiss the proceeding.

(2) The court shall grant a guardian appointed under subsection (1) of this section only those powers necessitated by the ((demonstrated))identified needs and limitations of the respondent and issue orders that will encourage development of the respondent's maximum self-determination and independence. The court ((may))shall not establish a full guardianship if a limited guardianship, protective arrangement instead of guardianship, or other less restrictive alternative would meet the needs of the respondent.

(3) A determination by the court regarding the adult respondent's legal capacity is a legal decision, not a medical decision. The determination must be based on a demonstration of management insufficiencies over time in the area of physical or mental health, safety, or self-care. Age, eccentricity, poverty, or medical diagnosis alone are not sufficient to justify a determination that the respondent lacks legal capacity.

Sec. 309. RCW 11.130.280 and 2019 c 437 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On receipt of a petition under RCW 11.130.270 for appointment of a guardian for an adult, the court shall appoint a court visitor. The court visitor must be an individual with training or experience in the type of abilities, limitations, and needs alleged in the petition.

(2) The court, in the order appointing a court visitor, shall specify the hourly rate the court visitor may charge for his or her services, and shall specify the maximum amount the court visitor may charge without additional court review and approval. The fee shall be charged to the person subject to a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding unless the court finds that such payment would result in substantial hardship upon such person, in which case the county shall be responsible for such costs: PROVIDED, That the court may charge such fee to the petitioner, the person subject to a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding, or any person who has appeared in the action; or may allocate the fee, as it deems just. If the petition is found to be frivolous or not brought in good faith, the court visitor fee shall be charged to the petitioner. The court shall not be required to provide for the payment of a fee to any salaried employee of a public agency.

(3)(a) The court visitor appointed under subsection (1) of this section shall within five days of receipt of notice of appointment file with the court and serve, either personally or by certified mail with return receipt, the respondent or his or her legal counsel, the petitioner or his or her legal counsel, and any interested party entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.080 with a statement including: His or her training relating to the duties as a court visitor; his or her criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the appointment; his or her hourly rate, if compensated; whether the court visitor has had any contact with a party to the proceeding prior to his or her appointment; and whether he or she has an apparent conflict of interest. Within three days of the later of the actual service or filing of the court visitor's statement, any party may set a hearing and file and serve a motion for an order to show cause why the court visitor should not be removed for one of the following three reasons:

(i) Lack of expertise necessary for the proceeding;

(ii) An hourly rate higher than what is reasonable for the particular proceeding; or

(iii) A conflict of interest.

(b) Notice of the hearing shall be provided to the court visitor and all parties. If, after a hearing, the court enters an order replacing the court visitor, findings shall be included, expressly stating the reasons for the removal. If the court visitor is not removed, the court has the authority to assess to the moving party attorneys' fees and costs related to the motion. The court shall assess attorneys' fees and costs for frivolous motions.

(4) A court visitor appointed under subsection (1) of this section shall interview the respondent in person and, in a manner the respondent is best able to understand:

(a) Explain to the respondent the substance of the petition, the nature, purpose, and effect of the proceeding, the respondent's rights at the hearing on the petition, and the general powers and duties of a guardian;

(b) Determine the respondent's views about the appointment sought by the petitioner, including views about a proposed guardian, the guardian's proposed powers and duties, and the scope and duration of the proposed guardianship; and

(c) Inform the respondent that all costs and expenses of the proceeding, including the respondent's attorney's fees, may be paid from the respondent's assets.

(5) The court visitor appointed under subsection (1) of this section shall:

(a) Interview the petitioner and proposed guardian, if any;

(b) Visit the respondent's present dwelling and any dwelling in which it is reasonably believed the respondent will live if the appointment is made;

(c) Obtain information from any physician or other person known to have treated, advised, or assessed the respondent's relevant physical or mental condition; and

(d) Investigate the allegations in the petition and any other matter relating to the petition the court directs.

(6) A court visitor appointed under subsection (1) of this section shall file a report in a record with the court and provide a copy of the report to the respondent, petitioner, and any interested party entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.080 at least fifteen days prior to the hearing on the petition filed under RCW 11.130.270, which must include:

(a) A summary of self-care and independent living tasks the respondent can manage without assistance or with existing supports, could manage with the assistance of appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making, and cannot manage;

(b) A recommendation regarding the appropriateness of guardianship, including whether a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or other less restrictive alternative for meeting the respondent's needs is available and:

(i) If a guardianship is recommended, whether it should be full or limited; and

(ii) If a limited guardianship is recommended, the powers to be granted to the guardian;

(c) A statement of the qualifications of the proposed guardian and whether the respondent approves or disapproves of the proposed guardian;

(d) A statement whether the proposed dwelling meets the respondent's needs and whether the respondent has expressed a preference as to residence;

(e) A ((recommendation whether))statement whether the respondent declined a professional evaluation under RCW 11.130.290 ((is necessary))and what other information is available to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the professional evaluation;

(f) A statement whether the respondent is able to attend a hearing at the location court proceedings typically are held;

(g) A statement whether the respondent is able to participate in a hearing and which identifies any technology or other form of support that would enhance the respondent's ability to participate; and

(h) Any other matter the court directs.

(7) The appointment of a court visitor has no effect on the determination of the adult respondent's legal capacity and does not overcome the presumption of legal capacity or full legal and civil rights of the adult respondent.

Sec. 310. RCW 11.130.380 and 2019 c 437 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the respondent in a proceeding to appoint a conservator is a minor, the court may appoint a court visitor to investigate a matter related to the petition or inform the minor or a parent of the minor about the petition or a related matter.

(2) If the respondent in a proceeding to appoint a conservator is an adult, the court shall appoint a court visitor. The duties and reporting requirements of the court visitor are limited to the relief requested in the petition. The court visitor must be an individual with training or experience in the type of abilities, limitations, and needs alleged in the petition.

(3) The court, in the order appointing court visitor, shall specify the hourly rate the court visitor may charge for his or her services, and shall specify the maximum amount the court visitor may charge without additional court review and approval. The fee shall be charged to the person subject to a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding unless the court finds that such payment would result in substantial hardship upon such person, in which case the county shall be responsible for such costs: PROVIDED, That the court may charge such fee to the petitioner, the person subject to a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding, or any person who has appeared in the action; or may allocate the fee, as it deems just. If the petition is found to be frivolous or not brought in good faith, the court visitor fee shall be charged to the petitioner. The court shall not be required to provide for the payment of a fee to any salaried employee of a public agency.

(4)(a) The court visitor appointed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall within five days of receipt of notice of appointment file with the court and serve, either personally or by certified mail with return receipt, the respondent or his or her legal counsel, the petitioner or his or her legal counsel, and any interested party entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.080 with a statement including: His or her training relating to the duties as a court visitor; his or her criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the appointment; his or her hourly rate, if compensated; whether the ((guardian ad litem))court visitor has had any contact with a party to the proceeding prior to his or her appointment; and whether he or she has an apparent conflict of interest. Within three days of the later of the actual service or filing of the court visitor's statement, any party may set a hearing and file and serve a motion for an order to show cause why the court visitor should not be removed for one of the following three reasons:

(i) Lack of expertise necessary for the proceeding;

(ii) An hourly rate higher than what is reasonable for the particular proceeding; or

(iii) A conflict of interest.

(b) Notice of the hearing shall be provided to the court visitor and all parties. If, after a hearing, the court enters an order replacing the court visitor, findings shall be included, expressly stating the reasons for the removal. If the court visitor is not removed, the court has the authority to assess to the moving party attorneys' fees and costs related to the motion. The court shall assess attorneys' fees and costs for frivolous motions.

(5) A court visitor appointed under subsection (2) of this section for an adult shall interview the respondent in person and in a manner the respondent is best able to understand:

(a) Explain to the respondent the substance of the petition, the nature, purpose, and effect of the proceeding, the respondent's rights at the hearing on the petition, and the general powers and duties of a conservator;

(b) Determine the respondent's views about the appointment sought by the petitioner, including views about a proposed conservator, the conservator's proposed powers and duties, and the scope and duration of the proposed conservatorship; and

(c) Inform the respondent that all costs and expenses of the proceeding, including respondent's attorneys' fees, may be paid from the respondent's assets.

(6) A court visitor appointed under subsection (2) of this section for an adult shall:

(a) Interview the petitioner and proposed conservator, if any;

(b) Review financial records of the respondent, if relevant to the court visitor's recommendation under subsection (7)(b) of this section;

(c) Investigate whether the respondent's needs could be met by a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternative and, if so, identify the arrangement or other less restrictive alternative; and

(d) Investigate the allegations in the petition and any other matter relating to the petition the court directs.

(7) A court visitor appointed under subsection (2) of this section for an adult shall file a report in a record with the court and provide a copy of the report to the respondent, petitioner, and any interested party entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.080 at least fifteen days prior to the hearing on the petition filed under RCW 11.130.365, which must include:

(a) A recommendation:

(i) Regarding the appropriateness of conservatorship, or whether a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternative for meeting the respondent's needs is available;

(ii) If a conservatorship is recommended, whether it should be full or limited;

(iii) If a limited conservatorship is recommended, the powers to be granted to the conservator, and the property that should be placed under the conservator's control; and

(iv) If a conservatorship is recommended, the amount of the bond or other verified receipt needed under RCW 11.130.445 and 11.130.500;

(b) A statement of the qualifications of the proposed conservator and whether the respondent approves or disapproves of the proposed conservator;

(c) A ((recommendation whether))statement whether the respondent declined a professional evaluation under RCW 11.130.390 ((is necessary))and what other information is available to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the professional evaluation;

(d) A statement whether the respondent is able to attend a hearing at the location court proceedings typically are held;

(e) A statement whether the respondent is able to participate in a hearing and which identifies any technology or other form of support that would enhance the respondent's ability to participate; and

(f) Any other matter the court directs.

(8) The appointment of a court visitor has no effect on the determination of the adult respondent's legal capacity and does not overcome the presumption of legal capacity or full legal and civil rights of the adult respondent.

Sec. 311. RCW 11.130.605 and 2019 c 437 s 506 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On filing of a petition under RCW 11.130.580 for a protective arrangement instead of guardianship, the court shall appoint a court visitor. The court visitor must be an individual with training or experience in the type of abilities, limitations, and needs alleged in the petition.

(2) On filing of a petition under RCW 11.130.580 for a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship for a minor, the court may appoint a court visitor to investigate a matter related to the petition or inform the minor or a parent of the minor about the petition or a related matter.

(3) On filing of a petition under RCW 11.130.580 or a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship for an adult, the court shall appoint a court visitor unless the respondent is represented by an attorney appointed by the court. The court visitor must be an individual with training or experience in the types of abilities, limitations, and needs alleged in the petition.

(4) The court, in the order appointing a court visitor, shall specify the hourly rate the court visitor may charge for his or her services, and shall specify the maximum amount the court visitor may charge without additional court review and approval. The fee shall be charged to the person subject to a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding unless the court finds that such payment would result in substantial hardship upon such person, in which case the county shall be responsible for such costs: PROVIDED, That the court may charge such fee to the petitioner, the person subject to a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding, or any person who has appeared in the action; or may allocate the fee, as it deems just. If the petition is found to be frivolous or not brought in good faith, the court visitor fee shall be charged to the petitioner. The court shall not be required to provide for the payment of a fee to any salaried employee of a public agency.

(5)(a) The court visitor appointed under subsection (1) or (3) of this section shall within five days of receipt of notice of appointment file with the court and serve, either personally or by certified mail with return receipt, the respondent or his or her legal counsel, the petitioner or his or her legal counsel, and any interested party entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.080 with a statement including: His or her training relating to the duties as a court visitor; his or her criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the appointment; his or her hourly rate, if compensated; whether the ((guardian ad litem))court visitor has had any contact with a party to the proceeding prior to his or her appointment; and whether he or she has an apparent conflict of interest. Within three days of the later of the actual service or filing of the court visitor's statement, any party may set a hearing and file and serve a motion for an order to show cause why the court visitor should not be removed for one of the following three reasons:

(i) Lack of expertise necessary for the proceeding;

(ii) An hourly rate higher than what is reasonable for the particular proceeding; or

(iii) A conflict of interest.

(b) Notice of the hearing shall be provided to the court visitor and all parties. If, after a hearing, the court enters an order replacing the court visitor, findings shall be included, expressly stating the reasons for the removal. If the court visitor is not removed, the court has the authority to assess to the moving party attorneys' fees and costs related to the motion. The court shall assess attorneys' fees and costs for frivolous motions.

(6) A court visitor appointed under subsection (1) or (3) of this section shall interview the respondent in person and in a manner the respondent is best able to understand:

(a) Explain to the respondent the substance of the petition, the nature, purpose, and effect of the proceeding, and the respondent's rights at the hearing on the petition;

(b) Determine the respondent's views with respect to the order sought;

(c) Inform the respondent that all costs and expenses of the proceeding, including respondent's attorneys' fees, may be paid from the respondent's assets;

(d) If the petitioner seeks an order related to the dwelling of the respondent, visit the respondent's present dwelling and any dwelling in which it is reasonably believed the respondent will live if the order is granted;

(e) If a protective arrangement instead of guardianship is sought, obtain information from any physician or other person known to have treated, advised, or assessed the respondent's relevant physical or mental condition;

(f) If a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship is sought, review financial records of the respondent, if relevant to the court visitor's recommendation under subsection (7)(b) of this section; and

(g) Investigate the allegations in the petition and any other matter relating to the petition the court directs.

(7) A court visitor under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section promptly shall file a report in a record with the court and provide a copy of the report to the respondent, petitioner, and any interested party entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.580 (1) through (3), at least fifteen days prior to the hearing on the petition filed under RCW 11.130.585, 11.130.590, or 11.130.595, which must include:

(a) To the extent relevant to the order sought, a summary of self-care, independent living tasks, and financial management tasks the respondent:

(i) Can manage without assistance or with existing supports;

(ii) Could manage with the assistance of appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making; and

(iii) Cannot manage;

(b) A recommendation regarding the appropriateness of the protective arrangement sought and whether a less restrictive alternative for meeting the respondent's needs is available;

(c) If the petition seeks to change the physical location of the dwelling of the respondent, a statement whether the proposed dwelling meets the respondent's needs and whether the respondent has expressed a preference as to the respondent's dwelling;

(d) A ((recommendation whether))statement whether the respondent declined a professional evaluation under RCW 11.130.615 ((is necessary))and what other information is available to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the professional evaluation;

(e) A statement whether the respondent is able to attend a hearing at the location court proceedings typically are held;

(f) A statement whether the respondent is able to participate in a hearing and which identifies any technology or other form of support that would enhance the respondent's ability to participate; and

(g) Any other matter the court directs.

Sec. 312. RCW 11.130.080 and 2019 c 437 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may file with the court a request for notice under this chapter if the person is:

(a) Not otherwise entitled to notice; and

(b) Interested in the welfare of a respondent, individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship, or individual subject to a protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter.

(2) A request under subsection (1) of this section must include a statement showing the interest of the person making the request and the address of the person or an attorney for the person to whom notice is to be given.

(3) If the court approves a request under subsection (1) of this section, the ((court))approved individual shall give notice of the approval to the guardian or conservator, if one has been appointed, or the respondent if no guardian or conservator has been appointed.

Sec. 313. RCW 11.130.120 and 2019 c 437 s 124 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person must not recognize the authority of a guardian or conservator to act on behalf of an individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship if:

(a) The person has actual knowledge or a reasonable belief that the letters of office of the guardian or conservator are invalid or the conservator or guardian is exceeding or improperly exercising authority granted by the court; or

(b) The person has actual knowledge that the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship is subject to physical or financial abuse, neglect, exploitation, or abandonment by the guardian or conservator or a person acting for or with the guardian or conservator.

(2) A person may refuse to recognize the authority of a guardian or conservator to act on behalf of an individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship if:

(a) The guardian's or conservator's proposed action would be inconsistent with this chapter; or

(b) The person makes, or has actual knowledge that another person has made, a report to the department of children, youth, and families or the department of social and health services stating a good-faith belief that the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship is subject to physical or financial abuse, neglect, exploitation, or abandonment by the guardian or conservator or a person acting for or with the guardian or conservator.

(3) A person that refuses to accept the authority of a guardian or conservator in accordance with subsection (2) of this section may report the refusal and the reason for refusal to the court. The court on receiving the report shall consider whether removal of the guardian or conservator or other action is appropriate.

(4) A guardian or conservator may petition the court to require a third party to accept a decision made by the guardian or conservator on behalf of the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

(5) If the court determines that a third party has failed to recognize the legitimate authority of a guardian or conservator, or requires a third party to accept a decision made by the guardian on behalf of the individual subject to guardianship, the court may order that third party to compensate the guardian or conservator, for the time spent only to the extent the court determines the opposition was reasonably necessary to protect the interests of the individual subject to guardianship.

Sec. 314. RCW 11.130.295 and 2019 c 437 s 307 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a hearing under RCW 11.130.275 may not proceed unless the respondent attends the hearing. If it is not reasonably feasible for the respondent to attend a hearing at the location court proceedings typically are held, the court shall make reasonable efforts to hold the hearing at an alternative location convenient to the respondent or allow the respondent to attend the hearing using real-time audio-visual technology.

(2) A hearing under RCW 11.130.275 may proceed without the respondent in attendance if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

(a) The respondent ((consistently and repeatedly)) has refused to attend the hearing after having been fully informed of the right to attend and the potential consequences of failing to do so; or

(b) There is no practicable way for the respondent to attend and participate in the hearing even with appropriate supportive services and technological assistance.

(3) The respondent may be assisted in a hearing under RCW 11.130.275 by a person or persons of the respondent's choosing, assistive technology, or an interpreter or translator, or a combination of these supports. If assistance would facilitate the respondent's participation in the hearing, but is not otherwise available to the respondent, the court shall make reasonable efforts to provide it.

(4) The respondent has a right to choose an attorney to represent the respondent at a hearing under RCW 11.130.275.

(5) At a hearing held under RCW 11.130.275, the respondent may:

(a) Present evidence and subpoena witnesses and documents;

(b) Examine witnesses, including any court-appointed evaluator and the court visitor; and

(c) Otherwise participate in the hearing.

(6) Unless excused by the court for good cause, a proposed guardian shall attend a hearing under RCW 11.130.275.

(7) A hearing under RCW 11.130.275 must be closed on request of the respondent and a showing of good cause.

(8) Any person may request to participate in a hearing under RCW 11.130.275. The court may grant the request, with or without a hearing, on determining that the best interest of the respondent will be served. The court may impose appropriate conditions on the person's participation.

Sec. 315. RCW 11.130.570 and 2019 c 437 s 431 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A conservatorship for a minor terminates on the earliest of:

(a) A court order terminating the conservatorship;

(b) The minor becoming an adult or, if the minor consents or the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that substantial harm to the minor's interests is otherwise likely, attaining twenty-one years of age;

(c) Emancipation of the minor; or

(d) Death of the minor.

(2) A conservatorship for an adult terminates on order of the court or when the adult dies.

(3) An individual subject to conservatorship, the conservator, or a person interested in the welfare of the individual may petition for:

(a) Termination of the conservatorship on the ground that a basis for appointment under RCW 11.130.360 does not exist or termination would be in the best interest of the individual or for other good cause; or

(b) Modification of the conservatorship on the ground that the extent of protection or assistance granted is not appropriate or for other good cause.

(4) The court shall hold a hearing to determine whether termination or modification of a conservatorship is appropriate on:

(a) Petition under subsection (3) of this section that contains allegations that, if true, would support a reasonable belief that termination or modification of the conservatorship may be appropriate, but the court may decline to hold a hearing if a petition based on the same or substantially similar facts was filed within the preceding six months;

(b) A communication from the individual subject to conservatorship, conservator, or person interested in the welfare of the individual which supports a reasonable belief that termination or modification of the conservatorship may be appropriate, including because of change to the legal capacity or functional needs of the individual or the availability of supports or services ((available to))for the individual ((have changed));

(c) A report from a guardian or conservator which indicates that termination or modification may be appropriate because of change to the legal capacity or functional needs or supports or the availability of services ((available to))for the individual ((have changed)) or a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternative is available; or

(d) A determination by the court that a hearing would be in the best interest of the individual.

(5) Notice of a petition under subsection (3) of this section must be given to the individual subject to conservatorship, the conservator, and any such other person the court determines.

(6) On presentation of prima facie evidence for termination of a conservatorship, the court shall order termination unless it is proven that a basis for appointment of a conservator under RCW 11.130.360 exists.

(7) The court shall modify the powers granted to a conservator if the powers are excessive or inadequate ((due to a))because of change ((in))to the legal capacity, abilities ((or)), limitations, or functional needs of the individual subject to conservatorship, the individual's supports, or other circumstances.

(8) Unless the court otherwise orders for good cause, before terminating a conservatorship, the court shall follow the same procedures to safeguard the rights of the individual subject to conservatorship which apply to a petition for conservatorship.

(9) An individual subject to conservatorship who seeks to terminate or modify the terms of the conservatorship has the right to choose an attorney to represent the individual in this matter. The court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees to the attorney as provided in RCW 11.130.100.

(10) On termination of a conservatorship other than by reason of the death of the individual subject to conservatorship, property of the conservatorship estate passes to the individual. The order of termination must direct the conservator to file a final report and petition for discharge on approval by the court of the final report.

(11) On termination of a conservatorship by reason of the death of the individual subject to conservatorship, the conservator shall file a final report and petition for discharge on approval by the court of the final report within ninety days of death of the person subject to conservatorship. On approval of the final report, the conservator shall proceed expeditiously to distribute the conservatorship estate to the individual's estate or as otherwise ordered by the court. The conservator may take reasonable measures necessary to preserve the conservatorship estate until distribution can be made.

(12) The court shall issue a final order of discharge on the approval by the court of the final report and satisfaction by the conservator of any other condition the court imposed on the conservator's discharge.

Sec. 316. RCW 11.130.585 and 2019 c 437 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After the hearing on a petition under RCW 11.130.270 for a guardianship or under RCW 11.130.580(2) for a protective arrangement instead of guardianship, the court may issue an order under subsection (2) of this section for a protective arrangement instead of guardianship if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

(a) The respondent lacks the ability to meet essential requirements for physical health, safety, or self-care because the respondent is unable to receive and evaluate information or make or communicate decisions, even with appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making; and

(b) The respondent's identified needs cannot be met by a less restrictive alternative.

(2) If the court makes the findings under subsection (1) of this section, the court, instead of appointing a guardian, may:

(a) Authorize or direct a transaction necessary to meet the respondent's need for health, safety, or care, including:

(i) A particular medical treatment or refusal of a particular medical treatment; or

(ii) ((A move to a specified place of dwelling; or

(iii))) Visitation or supervised visitation between the respondent and another person;

(b) Restrict access to the respondent by a specified person whose access places the respondent at serious risk of physical, psychological, or financial harm; and

(c) Reorder other arrangements on a limited basis that are appropriate.

(3) In deciding whether to issue an order under this section, the court shall consider the factors under RCW 11.130.330 and 11.130.335 that a guardian must consider when making a decision on behalf of an adult subject to guardianship.

Sec. 317. RCW 11.130.600 and 2019 c 437 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All petitions filed under RCW 11.130.595 for ((appointment of a guardian for an adult))the establishment of a protective arrangement shall be heard within sixty days unless an extension of time is requested by a party or the court visitor within such sixty-day period and granted for good cause shown.

(2)(a) A copy of a petition under RCW 11.130.580 and notice of a hearing on the petition must be served personally on the respondent and the court visitor appointed under RCW 11.130.605 not more than five court days after the petition under RCW 11.130.595 has been filed.

(b) A copy of a petition under RCW 11.130.580 and notice of a hearing on the petition must be served personally on the respondent and the court visitor appointed under RCW 11.130.605 not more than five court days after the petition under RCW 11.130.595 has been filed. The notice must inform the respondent of the respondent's rights at the hearing, including the right to an attorney and to attend the hearing. The notice must include a description of the nature, purpose, and consequences of granting the petition for a protective arrangement. The court may not grant the petition if notice substantially complying with this subsection is not served on the respondent.

(3) In a proceeding on a petition under RCW 11.130.580, the notice required under subsection (2) of this section must be given to the persons required to be listed in the petition under RCW 11.130.595 (1) through (3) and any other person interested in the respondent's welfare the court determines. Failure to give notice under this subsection does not preclude the court from granting the petition.

(4) After the court has ordered a protective arrangement under this article, notice of a hearing on a petition filed under this chapter, together with a copy of the petition, must be given to the respondent and any other person the court determines.

Sec. 318. RCW 11.130.625 and 2019 c 437 s 510 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((court))petitioner shall give notice of an order under this article to the individual who is subject to the protective arrangement instead of guardianship or conservatorship, a person whose access to the individual is restricted by the order, and any other person the court determines.

Sec. 319. RCW 11.130.610 and 2019 c 437 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The respondent shall have the right to be represented by a willing attorney of their choosing at any stage in protective arrangement proceedings. Any attorney purporting to represent a respondent or person subject to a protective arrangement shall petition the court to be appointed to represent the respondent or person subject to a protective arrangement.

(b) Unless the respondent in a proceeding under this article is represented by an attorney, the court is not required, but may appoint an attorney to represent the respondent, regardless of the respondent's ability to pay, except as provided otherwise in (c) of this subsection.

(c)(i) The court must appoint an attorney to represent the respondent at public expense when either:

(A) The respondent is unable to afford an attorney;

(B) The expense of an attorney would result in substantial hardship to the respondent; or

(C) The respondent does not have practical access to funds with which to pay an attorney. If the respondent can afford an attorney but lacks practical access to funds, the court must provide an attorney and may impose a reimbursement requirement as part of a final order.

(ii) When, in the opinion of the court, the rights and interests of the respondent cannot otherwise be adequately protected and represented, the court on its own motion must appoint an attorney at any time to represent the respondent.

(iii) An attorney must be provided under this subsection (1)(c) as soon as practicable after a petition is filed and long enough before any final hearing to allow adequate time for consultation and preparation. Absent a convincing showing in the record to the contrary, a period of less than three weeks is presumed by a reviewing court to be inadequate time for consultation and preparation.

(2) An attorney representing the respondent in a proceeding under this article shall:

(a) Make reasonable efforts to ascertain the respondent's wishes;

(b) Advocate for the respondent's wishes to the extent reasonably ascertainable; and

(c) If the respondent's wishes are not reasonably ascertainable, advocate for the result that is the least restrictive alternative in type, duration, and scope, consistent with the respondent's interests.

(3) The court is not required, but may appoint an attorney to represent a parent of a minor who is the subject of a proceeding under this article if:

(a) The parent objects to the entry of an order for a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or conservatorship;

(b) The court determines that counsel is needed to ensure that consent to the entry of an order for a protective arrangement is informed; or

(c) The court otherwise determines the parent needs representation.

Sec. 320. RCW 11.130.615 and 2019 c 437 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((At or before a hearing on a petition under this article for a protective arrangement, the court shall order a professional evaluation of the respondent:

(a) If the respondent requests the evaluation; or

(b) In other cases, unless the court finds that it has sufficient information to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the evaluation.

(2) If the court orders an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section, the respondent must be examined by a licensed physician, psychologist, social worker, or other individual appointed by the court who is qualified to evaluate the respondent's alleged cognitive and functional abilities and limitations and will not be advantaged or disadvantaged by a decision to grant the petition or otherwise have a conflict of interest. The individual conducting the evaluation promptly shall file a report in a record with the court. Unless otherwise directed by the court, the report must contain:

(a) A description of the nature, type, and extent of the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities and limitations;

(b) An evaluation of the respondent's mental and physical condition and, if appropriate, educational potential, adaptive behavior, and social skills;

(c) A prognosis for improvement, including with regard to the ability to manage the respondent's property and financial affairs if a limitation in that ability is alleged, and recommendation for the appropriate treatment, support, or habilitation plan; and

(d) The date of the examination on which the report is based.

(3) The respondent may decline))On receipt of a petition under RCW 11.130.595 and at the time the court appoints a court visitor under RCW 11.130.605, the court shall order a professional evaluation of the respondent.

(2) The respondent must be examined by a physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, or physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW selected by the court visitor who is qualified to evaluate the respondent's alleged cognitive and functional abilities and limitations and will not be advantaged or disadvantaged by a decision to grant the petition or otherwise have a conflict of interest. If the respondent opposes the professional selected by the court visitor, the court visitor shall obtain a professional evaluation from the professional selected by the respondent. The court visitor, after receiving a professional evaluation from the individual selected by the respondent, may obtain a supplemental evaluation from a different professional.

(3) The individual conducting the evaluation shall provide the completed evaluation report to the court visitor within thirty days of the examination of the respondent. The court visitor shall file the report in a sealed record with the court. Unless otherwise directed by the court, the report must contain:

(a) The professional's name, address, education, and experience;

(b) A description of the nature, type, and extent of the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities and limitations;

(c) An evaluation of the respondent's mental and physical condition and, if appropriate, education potential, adaptive behavior, and social skills;

(d) A prognosis for improvement and recommendation for the appropriate treatment, support, or habilitation plan;

(e) A description of the respondent's current medications, and the effect of the medications on the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities;

(f) Identification or persons with whom the professional has met or spoken with regarding the respondent; and

(g) The date of the examination on which the report is based.

(4) If the respondent declines to participate in an evaluation ordered under subsection (1) of this section, the court may proceed with the hearing under RCW 11.130.600 if the court finds that it has sufficient information to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the professional evaluation.

Sec. 321. RCW 11.125.080 and 2019 c 437 s 316 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a power of attorney, a principal may nominate a ((guardian))conservator of the ((principal's)) estate or guardian of the ((principal's)) person for consideration by the court if protective proceedings for the principal's estate or person are begun after the principal executes the power of attorney. Except for good cause shown or disqualification, the court shall make its appointment in accordance with the principal's most recent nomination.

(2) If, after a principal executes a power of attorney, a court appoints a ((guardian of the principal's estate or other fiduciary charged with the management of all of the principal's property, the power of attorney remains in effect subject to the provisions of RCW 11.130.335(1).))conservator of the estate or other fiduciary charged with the management of some or all of the principal's property, the agent is accountable to the fiduciary as well as to the principal. The power of attorney is not terminated and the agent's authority continues, subject to the provisions of RCW 11.130.335(1) and 11.130.435(4), unless limited, suspended, or terminated by the court.

(3) If, after a principal executes a power of attorney((, a court appoints a guardian of the principal's estate or other fiduciary charged with the management of some but not all of the principal's property, the power of attorney shall not terminate or be modified, except to the extent ordered by the court.))that includes health care decisions, a court appoints a guardian of the person, the agent is accountable to the fiduciary as well as to the principal. The power of attorney is not terminated and the agent's authority continues, subject to the provisions of RCW 11.130.335(1) and 11.130.435(4), unless limited, suspended, or terminated by the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 322. A new section is added to chapter 11.130 RCW to read as follows:

This form must be used to notify an adult respondent of the respondent's rights that could be restricted if a guardianship petition under RCW 11.130.270 or a conservatorship petition under RCW 11.130.365 is granted.

IMPORTANT NOTICE

PLEASE READ CAREFULLY

A petition to have a guardian or conservator appointed for you has been filed in the . . . county superior court by . . .. If a guardian or conservator is appointed, you could lose one or more of the following rights:

(1) To marry, divorce, or enter into or end a state registered domestic partnership;

(2) To vote or hold an elected office;

(3) To enter into a contract or make or revoke a will;

(4) To appoint someone to act on your behalf;

(5) To sue and be sued other than through a guardian;

(6) To possess a license to drive;

(7) To buy, sell, own, mortgage, or lease property;

(8) To consent to or refuse medical treatment;

(9) To decide who shall provide care and assistance;

(10) To make decisions regarding social aspects of your life.

Under the law, you have certain rights.

You have the right to be represented by a lawyer of your own choosing. The court will appoint a lawyer to represent you if you are unable to pay or payment would result in a substantial hardship to you.

You have the right to ask for a jury trial on the issue of capacity.

You have the right to be present in court and testify when the hearing is held to decide whether or not you need a guardian or conservator. If a court visitor is appointed, you have the right to request the court to replace that person.

You have the right to ask the court to establish a protective arrangement instead of a guardianship or conservatorship.

PART IV

OFFICE OF PUBLIC GUARDIANSHIP

Sec. 401. RCW 2.72.005 and 2019 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In establishing an office of public guardianship and conservatorship, the legislature intends to promote the availability of guardianship, conservatorship, and alternate services that provide support for decision making for individuals who need them and for whom adequate services may otherwise be unavailable. The legislature reaffirms its commitment to treat liberty and autonomy as paramount values for all Washington residents and to authorize public guardianship and conservatorship only to the minimum extent necessary to provide for health or safety, or to manage financial affairs, when the legal conditions for appointment of a guardian or conservator are met. It does not intend to alter those legal conditions or to expand judicial authority to determine that any individual ((is incapacitated))may be subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

(2) The legislature further recognizes that ((services that support)) decision making assistance for people who have limited capacity can preserve individual liberty and provide effective support responsive to individual needs and wishes. The legislature also recognizes that these services may be less expensive than guardianship and conservatorship for the state, the courts, and for individuals with limited capacity and their families.

Sec. 402. RCW 2.72.010 and 2019 c 215 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) (("Attorney-in-fact" means an agent authorized by an individual to act on his or her behalf pursuant to a power of attorney.))"Agent" means a person granted authority to act for a principal under a power of attorney.

(2) "Contract service provider" means a public guardian or public conservator providing services under contract with the office of public guardianship and conservatorship. Any public guardian or public conservator providing such services must be certified by the certified professional guardian board established by the supreme court.

(3) "Estate administration" means services provided for a fee to the estate of an individual who died at age eighteen or older, in circumstances where a contract service provider is granted letters under RCW 11.28.120(7).

(4) "Long-term care services" means services provided through the department of social and health services either in a hospital or skilled nursing facility, or in another setting under a home and community-based waiver authorized under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n.

(((3)))(5) "Office" means the office of public guardianship and conservatorship.

(((4)))(6) "Public conservator" means an individual or entity appointed by a court to make decisions with respect to property or financial affairs of an individual subject to conservatorship, and who provides these services under contract with the office of public guardianship and conservatorship.

(7) "Public guardian" means an individual or entity ((providing public guardianship services))appointed by the court to make decisions with respect to the personal affairs of an individual, and who provides these services under contract with the office of public guardianship and conservatorship.

(((5) "Public guardianship services" means the services provided by a guardian or limited guardian appointed under chapters 11.88 and 11.92 RCW, who is compensated under a contract with the office of public guardianship.

(6)))(8) "Representative payee" means the designated agent for a recipient of government benefits whom a government agency has determined to be incapable of managing his or her benefits.

(((7) "Supported decision-making))(9) "Decision-making assistance" means support for an individual with diminished decision-making ability in making decisions affecting health or safety or to manage financial affairs. Assistance includes, without limitation, acting as a representative payee, an ((attorney-in-fact))agent, a trustee, ((or)) a public guardian, or a public conservator.

(((8)))(10) "Trustee" means a person or organization named in a trust agreement to handle trust property for the benefit of one or more beneficiaries in accordance with the terms of the agreement.

Sec. 403. RCW 2.72.020 and 2019 c 215 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created an office of public guardianship and conservatorship within the administrative office of the courts.

(2) The supreme court shall appoint a public guardianship and conservatorship administrator to establish and administer a public guardianship, public conservatorship, ((supported)) decision-making assistance, and estate administration program in the office of public guardianship and conservatorship. The public guardianship and conservatorship administrator serves at the pleasure of the supreme court.

Sec. 404. RCW 2.72.030 and 2019 c 215 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The public guardianship and conservatorship administrator is authorized to establish and administer a public guardianship, public conservatorship, ((supported)) decision-making assistance, and estate administration program as follows:

(1)(a) The office shall contract with ((public or private entities or individuals to provide:

(i) Public guardianship, supported decision-making assistance, and estate administration services to))certified professional guardians and conservators or certified professional guardian and conservator agencies to provide public guardianship, public conservatorship, decision-making assistance, and estate administration services to persons age eighteen or older whose income does not exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level determined annually by the United States department of health and human services or who are receiving long-term care services through the Washington state department of social and health services((;

(ii) Supported decision-making services for a fee to persons age eighteen or older)), when there is no one else qualified who is willing and able to serve((; and

(iii) Estate administration services for a fee to the estate of an individual who died at age eighteen or older, in circumstances where a service provider under contract with the office of public guardianship is granted letters under RCW 11.28.120(7))).

(b) Neither the public guardianship and conservatorship administrator nor the office may act as public guardian or ((limited guardian))conservator or act in any other representative capacity for any individual.

(c) The primary function of the office is to contract for public guardianship, public conservatorship, ((supported)) decision-making assistance, and estate administration services that are provided in a manner consistent with the requirements of this chapter. The office is subject to audit by the state auditor.

(d) Public guardianship, public conservatorship, ((supported)) decision-making assistance, and estate administration service contracts are dependent upon legislative appropriation. This chapter does not create an entitlement.

(2) The office shall adopt and maintain eligibility criteria to enable it to serve individuals with the greatest need when the number of cases in which courts propose to appoint a public guardian or conservator exceeds the number of cases in which ((public guardianship and supported decision-making assistance)) services can be provided. In adopting such criteria, the office may consider factors including, but not limited to, the following: Whether an individual with diminished decision-making ability is at significant risk of harm from abuse, exploitation, abandonment, neglect, or self-neglect; and whether an individual with diminished decision-making ability is in imminent danger of loss or significant reduction in public services that are necessary for the individual to live successfully in the most integrated and least restrictive environment that is appropriate in light of the individual's needs and values.

(3) The office shall adopt minimum standards of practice for public guardians, public conservators, and other contract service providers providing public guardianship, public conservatorship, ((supported)) decision-making assistance, and estate administration services. ((Any public guardian providing such public guardianship services must be certified by the certified professional guardian board established by the supreme court.))

(4) The office shall require a public guardian or conservator to visit each ((incapacitated person))individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship for which public guardianship or conservatorship services are provided no less than monthly to be eligible for compensation.

(5) The office shall not petition for appointment of a public guardian or conservator for any individual. It may develop a proposal for the legislature to make affordable legal assistance available to petition for guardianships or conservatorships.

(6) The office shall develop and adopt a case-weighting system designed to balance the increasing need for access to guardianship and conservatorship services, while effectively managing public guardian and conservator caseloads and providing appropriate supports for individuals on that caseload.

(a) The standard caseload limit for a contract service provider must be no more than twenty ((incapacitated)) persons placed under a guardianship per certified professional guardian or conservator. The office may authorize adjustments to the standard caseload limit on a case-by-case basis, and payment for services to a contract service provider that serves more than twenty ((incapacitated)) persons placed under a guardianship per professional guardian or conservator is subject to review by the office. In evaluating caseload size, the office shall consider the expected activities, time, and demands involved, as well as the available support for each case.

(b) ((Caseload))Adjusted caseload limits must not exceed thirty-six cases. The office shall not authorize payment for services for any contract service provider that fails to comply with the ((standard))adjusted caseload limit guidelines.

(c) The office shall develop case-weighting guidelines to include a process for adjusting caseload limits, relevant policies and procedures, and recommendations for changes in court rules which may be appropriate for the implementation of the system.

(d) By December 1, 2019, the office must submit to the legislature a report detailing the final case-weighting system and guidelines, and implementation progress and recommendations. The report must be made available to the public.

(e) The administrative office of the courts shall notify the superior courts of the policies contained in the final case-weighting system.

(7) The office shall monitor and oversee the use of state funding to ensure compliance with this chapter.

(8) The office shall collect uniform and consistent basic data elements regarding service delivery. This data shall be made available to the legislature and supreme court in a format that is not identifiable by individual ((incapacitated person))subject to guardianship or conservatorship to protect confidentiality.

(9) The office shall require contract service providers to seek reimbursement of fees from program clients who are receiving long-term care services through the department of social and health services to the extent, and only to the extent, that such reimbursement may be paid, consistent with an order of the superior court, from income that would otherwise be required by the department to be paid toward the cost of the client's care. Fees reimbursed shall be remitted by the contract service provider to the office unless a different disposition is directed by the public guardianship and conservatorship administrator.

(10) Fees may be collected from the estate when the ((decedant's))decedent's income prior to death exceeded two hundred percent of the federal poverty level, determined annually by the United States department of health and human services, based on a fee schedule established by the office that must be published annually.

(11) The office shall require public ((guardianship providers))guardians or conservators to certify annually that for each individual served they have reviewed the need for continued public guardianship ((services))or conservatorship and the appropriateness of limiting, or further limiting, the authority of the public guardian or conservator under the applicable ((guardianship)) order, and that where termination or modification of a guardianship or conservatorship order appears warranted, the superior court has been asked to take the corresponding action.

(12) The office shall adopt a process for receipt and consideration of and response to complaints against the office and ((contracted))contract service providers of public guardianship, public conservatorship, ((supported)) decision-making assistance, and estate administration ((services)). The process shall include investigation in cases in which investigation appears warranted in the judgment of the administrator.

(13) The office shall develop standardized forms and reporting instruments that may include, but are not limited to, intake, initial assessment, guardianship care plan, decisional accounting, staff time logs, changes in condition or abilities of an ((incapacitated person))individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship, and values history. The office shall collect and analyze the data gathered from these reports.

(14) The office shall identify training needs for contract service providers it contracts with, and shall make recommendations to the supreme court, the certified professional guardian board, and the legislature for improvements in training. The office may offer training to individuals providing services pursuant to this chapter, to individuals who, in the judgment of the administrator or the administrator's designee, are likely to provide such services in the future, to lay guardians or conservators, and to the family and friends of individuals subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

(15) The office shall establish a system for monitoring the performance of contract service providers, and office staff shall make in-home visits to a randomly selected sample of public guardianship, public conservatorship, and ((supported)) decision-making assistance clients. The office may conduct further monitoring, including in-home visits, as the administrator deems appropriate. For monitoring purposes, office staff shall have access to any information relating to a public guardianship, public conservatorship, ((supported)) decision-making assistance, and estate administration client that is available to the guardian or conservator.

Sec. 405. RCW 11.28.120 and 2019 c 215 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Administration of an estate if the decedent died intestate or if the personal representative or representatives named in the will declined or were unable to serve shall be granted to some one or more of the persons hereinafter mentioned, and they shall be respectively entitled in the following order:

(1) The surviving spouse or state registered domestic partner, or such person as he or she may request to have appointed.

(2) The next of kin in the following order: (a) Child or children; (b) father or mother; (c) brothers or sisters; (d) grandchildren; (e) nephews or nieces.

(3) The trustee named by the decedent in an inter vivos trust instrument, testamentary trustee named in the will, guardian ((of the person or estate)) of the decedent, conservator of the decedent, or ((attorney-in-fact))an agent named in a durable power of attorney appointed by the decedent, if any such a fiduciary controlled or potentially controlled substantially all of the decedent's probate and nonprobate assets.

(4) One or more of the beneficiaries or transferees of the decedent's probate or nonprobate assets.

(5)(a) The director of revenue, or the director's designee, for those estates having property subject to the provisions of chapter 11.08 RCW; however, the director may waive this right.

(b) The secretary of the department of social and health services for those estates owing debts for long-term care services as defined in RCW 74.39A.008; however the secretary may waive this right.

(6) One or more of the principal creditors.

(7) If the persons so entitled shall fail for more than forty days after the death of the decedent to present a petition for letters of administration, or if it appears to the satisfaction of the court that there is no next of kin, as above specified eligible to appointment, or they waive their right, and there are no principal creditor or creditors, or such creditor or creditors waive their right, then the court may appoint a contract service provider ((under contract)) with the office of public guardianship and conservatorship under chapter 2.72 RCW or any suitable person to administer such estate.

PART V

UNIFORM ADULT GUARDIANSHIP AND PROTECTIVE PROCEEDINGS ACT

Sec. 501. RCW 11.90.020 and 2009 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In this chapter:

(1) "Adult" means an individual who has attained eighteen years of age.

(2) (("Guardian of the estate"))"Conservator" means a person appointed by the court to administer the property of an adult, including a person appointed under chapter 11.130 RCW, and includes a conservator appointed by the court in another state.

(3) (("Guardian of the person" or "guardian"))"Guardian" means a person appointed by the court to make decisions regarding the person of an adult, including a person appointed under chapter 11.130 RCW, and includes a guardian appointed by the court in another state.

(4) "Guardianship order" means an order appointing a guardian ((of the person or guardian of the estate)).

(5) "Guardianship proceeding" means a judicial proceeding in which an order for the appointment of a guardian ((of the person or guardian of the estate)) is sought or has been issued.

(6) (("Incapacitated person" means an adult for whom a guardian of the person or guardian of the estate has been appointed.

(7))) "Party" means the respondent, petitioner, guardian ((of the person or guardian of the estate)), conservator, or any other person allowed by the court to participate in a guardianship or protective proceeding.

(((8)))(7) "Person," except in the term ((incapacitated)) person under a guardianship, person under a conservatorship, or protected person, means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(8) "Person subject to a guardianship" means an adult for whom a guardian has been appointed.

(9) "Protected person" means an adult for whom a protective order has been issued.

(10) "Protective order" means an order appointing a ((guardian of the estate))conservator or other order related to management of an adult's property((, including an order issued by a court in another state appointing a conservator)).

(11) "Protective proceeding" means a judicial proceeding in which a protective order is sought or has been issued.

(12) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(13) "Respondent" means an adult for whom a protective order or the appointment of a guardian ((of the person)) is sought.

(14) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

Sec. 502. RCW 11.90.230 and 2009 c 81 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A court of this state lacking jurisdiction under RCW 11.90.220 has special jurisdiction to do any of the following:

(a) ((In an emergency, process a petition under RCW 11.88.090 for appointment of a guardian for a respondent who is physically present in this state, for a term not exceeding ninety days;))Appoint a guardian in an emergency for a term not exceeding sixty days for a respondent who is physically present in this state;

(b) Issue a protective order with respect to ((a respondent's)) real or tangible personal property located in this state if a petition for appointment of a guardian or a conservator for the respondent is pending or has been approved in another state;

(c) Appoint a guardian ((of the person or guardian of the estate))or conservator for ((an incapacitated))a person under a guardianship, person under a conservatorship, or protected person for whom a provisional order to transfer the proceeding from another state has been issued under procedures similar to RCW 11.90.400.

(2) If a petition for the appointment of a guardian in an emergency is brought in this state and this state was not the respondent's home state on the date the petition was filed, the court shall dismiss the proceeding at the request of the court of the home state, if any, whether dismissal is requested before or after the emergency appointment.

Sec. 503. RCW 11.90.250 and 2009 c 81 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A court of this state having jurisdiction under RCW 11.90.220 to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order may decline to exercise its jurisdiction if it determines at any time that a court of another state is a more appropriate forum.

(2) If a court of this state declines to exercise its jurisdiction under subsection (1) of this section, it shall either dismiss or stay the proceeding. The court may impose any condition the court considers just and proper, including the condition that a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order be filed promptly in another state.

(3) In determining whether it is an appropriate forum, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including:

(a) Any expressed preference of the respondent;

(b) Whether abuse, neglect, or exploitation of the respondent has occurred or is likely to occur and which state could best protect the respondent from the abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

(c) The length of time the respondent was physically present in or was a legal resident of this or another state;

(d) The distance of the respondent from the court in each state;

(e) The financial circumstances of the respondent's estate;

(f) The nature and location of the evidence;

(g) The ability of the court in each state to decide the issue expeditiously and the procedures necessary to present evidence;

(h) The familiarity of the court of each state with the facts and issues in the proceeding; and

(i) If an appointment were made, the court's ability to monitor the conduct of the guardian ((of the person or guardian of the estate))or conservator.

Sec. 504. RCW 11.90.400 and 2009 c 81 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A guardian ((of the person or guardian of the estate))or conservator appointed in this state may petition the court to transfer the guardianship or conservatorship to another state.

(2) Notice of a petition under subsection (1) of this section must be given to the persons that would be entitled to notice of a petition in this state for the appointment of a guardian ((of the person or guardian of the estate))or conservator.

(3) On the court's own motion or on request of the guardian ((of the person or guardian of the estate))or conservator, the ((incapacitated))person under a guardianship, person under a conservatorship, or protected person, or other person required to be notified of the petition, the court shall hold a hearing on a petition filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(4) The court shall issue an order provisionally granting a petition to transfer a guardianship and shall direct the guardian ((of the person or guardian of the estate)) to petition for guardianship in the other state if the court is satisfied that the guardianship will be accepted by the court in the other state and the court finds that:

(a) The ((incapacitated)) person under a guardianship is physically present in or is reasonably expected to move permanently to the other state;

(b) An objection to the transfer has not been made or, if an objection has been made, the objector has not established that the transfer would be contrary to the interests of the ((incapacitated)) person under a guardianship; and

(c) Plans for care and services for the ((incapacitated)) person under a guardianship in the other state are reasonable and sufficient.

(5) The court shall issue a provisional order granting a petition to transfer a ((guardianship of the estate))conservatorship and shall direct the ((guardian of the estate))conservator to petition for ((guardianship of the estate or)) conservatorship in the other state if the court is satisfied that the ((guardianship of the estate))conservatorship will be accepted by the court of the other state and the court finds that:

(a) The protected person is physically present in or is reasonably expected to move permanently to the other state, or the protected person has a significant connection to the other state considering the factors in RCW 11.90.200(2);

(b) An objection to the transfer has not been made or, if an objection has been made, the objector has not established that the transfer would be contrary to the interests of the protected person; and

(c) Adequate arrangements will be made for management of the protected person's property.

(6) The court shall issue a final order confirming the transfer and terminating the guardianship ((of the person or guardianship of the estate))or conservatorship upon its receipt of:

(a) A provisional order accepting the proceeding from the court to which the proceeding is to be transferred which is issued under provisions similar to RCW 11.90.410; and

(b) The documents required to terminate a guardianship ((of the person or guardianship of the estate))or conservatorship in this state.

Sec. 505. RCW 11.90.410 and 2009 c 81 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To confirm transfer of a guardianship or conservatorship transferred to this state under provisions similar to RCW 11.90.400, the guardian or conservator must petition the court in this state to accept the guardianship or conservatorship. The petition must include a certified copy of the other state's provisional order of transfer.

(2) Notice of a petition under subsection (1) of this section must be given to those persons that would be entitled to notice if the petition were a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order in both the transferring state and this state. The notice must be given in the same manner as notice is required to be given in this state.

(3) On the court's own motion or on request of the guardian or conservator, the ((incapacitated))person under a guardianship, person under a conservatorship, or protected person, or other person required to be notified of the proceeding, the court shall hold a hearing on a petition filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(4) The court shall issue an order provisionally granting a petition filed under subsection (1) of this section unless:

(a) An objection is made and the objector establishes that transfer of the proceeding would be contrary to the interests of the ((incapacitated))person under a guardianship, person under a conservatorship, or protected person; or

(b) The guardian or conservator is ineligible for appointment in this state.

(5) The court shall issue a final order accepting the proceeding and appointing the guardian or conservator as guardian ((of the person or guardian of the estate))or conservator in this state upon its receipt from the court from which the proceeding is being transferred of a final order issued under provisions similar to RCW 11.90.400 transferring the proceeding to this state.

(6) Not later than ninety days after issuance of a final order accepting transfer of a guardianship or conservatorship, the court shall determine whether the guardianship ((of the person or guardianship of the estate))or conservatorship needs to be modified to conform to the law of this state.

(7) In granting a petition under this section, the court shall recognize a guardianship or conservatorship order from the other state, including the determination of the ((incapacitated))person under a guardianship, person under a conservatorship, or protected person's incapacity and the appointment of the guardian or conservator.

(8) The denial by a court of this state of a petition to accept a guardianship or conservatorship transferred from another state does not affect the ability of the guardian or conservator to seek appointment as guardian or ((guardian of the estate))conservator in this state if the court has jurisdiction to make an appointment other than by reason of the provisional order of transfer.

PART VI

SUPPORTED DECISION-MAKING AGREEMENTS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. DEFINITIONS.The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and sections 602 through 612 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Disability" means, with respect to an individual, a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities.

(2) "Supported decision-making agreement" is an agreement between an adult with a disability and one or more supporters entered into under this chapter.

(3) "Supporter" means an adult who has entered into a supported decision-making agreement with an adult with a disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. PURPOSE.The purpose of sections 601 through 612 of this act is to recognize a less restrictive alternative to guardianship for adults with disabilities who need assistance with decisions regarding daily living.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. PRESUMPTION OF CAPACITY.(1) All adults are presumed to be capable of managing their affairs and to have legal capacity.

(2) The manner in which an adult communicates with others is not grounds for deciding that the adult is incapable of managing the adult's affairs.

(3) Execution of a supported decision-making agreement may not be used as evidence of incapacity and does not preclude the ability of the adult who has entered into such an agreement to act independently of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. SCOPE OF SUPPORTED DECISION-MAKING AGREEMENT.An adult with a disability may voluntarily, without undue influence or coercion, enter into a supported decision-making agreement with a supporter under which the adult with a disability authorizes the supporter to do any or all of the following:

(1) Provide supported decision-making, including assistance in understanding the options, responsibilities, and consequences of the adult's life decisions, without making those decisions on behalf of the adult with a disability;

(2) Assist the adult in accessing, collecting, and obtaining information that is relevant to a given life decision, including medical, psychological, financial, educational, or treatment records, from any person;

(3) Assist the adult with a disability in understanding the information described in subsection (2) of this section; and

(4) Assist the adult in communicating the adult's decisions to appropriate persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605. AUTHORITY OF SUPPORTER.A supporter may exercise the authority granted to the supporter in the supported decision-making agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606. TERM OF AGREEMENT.(1) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, the supported decision-making agreement extends until terminated by either party or by the terms of the agreement.

(2) The supported decision-making agreement is terminated if:

(a) The department of social and health services finds that the adult with a disability has been abused, neglected, or exploited by the supporter;

(b) The supporter is found criminally liable for conduct described in (a) of this subsection;

(c) The person with a disability gives notice to the supporter orally, in writing, through an assistive technology device, or by any other means or act showing a specific intent to terminate the agreement; or

(d) The supporter provides written notice of the supporter's resignation to the person with a disability. If a supported decision-making agreement includes more than one supporter, each supporter can terminate the agreement only as to that supporter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607. DISQUALIFICATION OF SUPPORTER.The following are disqualified from acting as a supporter:

(1) A person who is an employer or employee of the adult with a disability, unless the person is an immediate family member of the adult with a disability;

(2) A person directly providing paid support services to the adult with a disability, unless the person is an immediate family member of the adult with a disability; and

(3) An individual against whom the person with a disability has obtained an order of protection from abuse, or an individual who is the subject of a civil or criminal order prohibiting contact with the adult with a disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608. ACCESS TO PERSONAL INFORMATION.(1) A supporter is only authorized to assist the adult with a disability in accessing, collecting, or obtaining information that is relevant to a decision authorized under the supported decision-making agreement.

(2) If a supporter assists an adult with a disability in accessing, collecting, or obtaining personal information, including protected health information under the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, or educational records under the federal family educational rights and privacy act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g, the supporter shall ensure the information is kept privileged and confidential, as applicable, and is not subject to unauthorized access, use, or disclosure.

(3) The existence of a supported decision-making agreement does not preclude an adult with a disability from seeking personal information without the assistance of a supporter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609. AUTHORIZING AND WITNESSING OF SUPPORTED DECISION-MAKING AGREEMENT.(1) A supported decision-making agreement must be in writing, dated, and signed voluntarily, without coercion or undue influence, by the adult with a disability and the supporter in the presence of two or more subscribing witnesses or a notary public.

(2) If signed before two witnesses, the attesting witnesses must be at least eighteen years of age.

(3) The witnesses required by subsection (1) of this section may not be any of the following:

(a) A supporter for the person with a disability;

(b) An employee or agent of a supporter named in the supported decision-making agreement;

(c) A paid provider of services to the person with a disability; or

(d) Any person who does not understand the type of communication the person with a disability uses, unless an individual who understands the person with a disability's means of communication is present to assist during the execution of the supported decision-making agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610. FORM OF SUPPORTED DECISION-MAKING AGREEMENT.(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a supported decision-making agreement is valid only if it is in substantially the following form:

SUPPORTED DECISION-MAKING AGREEMENT

Appointment of Supporter

I, ..... (name of supported adult), make this agreement of my own free will.

I agree and designate that:

Name: ..... (name of supporter)

Address: ..... (address of supporter)

Phone Number: ..... (phone number of supporter)

Email Address: ..... (email address of supporter)

is my supporter.

My supporter may help me with making everyday life decisions relating to the following:

(Y/N) Obtaining food, clothing, and shelter.

(Y/N) Taking care of my health.

(Y/N) Managing my financial affairs.

(Y/N) Other matters: ..... (specify).

My supporter is not allowed to make decisions for me. To help me with my decisions, my supporter may:

1. Help me access, collect, or obtain information that is relevant to a decision, including medical, psychological, financial, educational, or treatment records;

2. Help me understand my options so I can make an informed decision; and

3. Help me communicate my decision to appropriate persons.

(Y/N) A release allowing my supporter to see protected health information under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, is attached.

(Y/N) A release allowing my supporter to see educational records under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g, is attached.

Effective Date of Supported Decision-Making Agreement

This supported decision-making agreement is effective immediately and will continue until ..... (insert date) or until the agreement is terminated by my supporter or me or by operation of law.

Signed this ..... (day) day of ..... (month), ..... (year)

Consent of Supporter

I, ..... (name of supporter), acknowledge my responsibilities and consent to act as a supporter under this agreement.

(Signature of supporter)

(Printed name of supporter)

Supporter

(Signature of supported adult)

(Printed name of supported adult)

Supported Adult

(Signature of witness 1)

(Printed name of witness 1)

Witness 1

(Signature of witness 2)

(Printed name of witness 2)

Witness 2

State of .....

County of .....

This record was acknowledged before me on ..... (date) by ..... (name(s) of individuals).

. . . .

(Signature of notary public)

(Stamp)

. . . .

(Title of office)

My commission expires:

. . . .

(Date)

WARNING: PROTECTION FOR THE ADULT WITH A DISABILITY

IF A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A COPY OF THIS AGREEMENT OR IS AWARE OF THE EXISTENCE OF THIS AGREEMENT HAS CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT THE ADULT WITH A DISABILITY IS BEING ABUSED, NEGLECTED, OR EXPLOITED BY THE SUPPORTER, THE PERSON SHALL REPORT THE ALLEGED ABUSE, NEGLECT, OR EXPLOITATION TO THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES BY CALLING THE ABUSE HOTLINE AT 1-800-END-HARM.

(2) A supported decision-making agreement may be in any form not inconsistent with subsection (1) of this section and the other requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611. RELIANCE ON AGREEMENT—LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.(1) A person who receives the original or a copy of a supported decision-making agreement shall rely on the agreement.

(2) A person is not subject to criminal or civil liability and has not engaged in professional misconduct for an act or omission if the act or omission is done in good faith and in reliance on a supported decision-making agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612. REPORTING OF SUSPECTED ABUSE, NEGLECT, OR EXPLOITATION.If a person who receives a copy of a supported decision-making agreement or is aware of the existence of a supported decision-making agreement has cause to believe that the adult with a disability is being abused, neglected, or exploited by the supporter, the person shall report the alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation to the department of social and health services, except where the person is exempted from requirements to report abuse due to a confidential relationship recognized in statute, regulation, or professional standards.

PART VII

TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS

Sec. 701. RCW 2.56.150 and 2005 c 282 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrator for the courts shall review the advisability and feasibility of the statewide mandatory use of court-appointed special advocates as described in RCW 26.12.175 to act as guardians ad litem in appropriate cases under Titles 13 and 26 RCW. The review must explore the feasibility of obtaining various sources of private and public funding to implement statewide mandatory use of court-appointed special advocates, such as grants and donations, instead of or in combination with raising court fees or assessments.

(2) The administrator shall also conduct a study on the feasibility and desirability of requiring all persons who act as guardians ad litem under Titles 11, 13, and 26 RCW to be certified as qualified guardians ad litem prior to their eligibility for appointment.

(3) In conducting the review and study the administrator shall consult with: (a) The presidents or directors of all public benefit nonprofit corporations that are eligible to receive state funds under RCW 43.330.135; (b) the attorney general, or a designee; (c) the secretary of the department of social and health services, or a designee; (d) the superior court judges' association; (e) the Washington state bar association; (f) public defenders who represent children under Title 13 or 26 RCW; (g) private attorneys who represent parents under Title 13 or 26 RCW; (h) professionals who evaluate families for the purposes of determining the custody or placement decisions of children; (i) the office of financial management; (j) persons who act as volunteer or compensated guardians ad litem; and (k) parents who have dealt with guardians ad litem in court cases. For the purposes of studying the feasibility of a certification requirement for guardians ad litem acting under Title 11 RCW the administrator shall consult with the advisory group formed under RCW ((11.88.090))11.130.155.

(4) The administrator shall also conduct a review of problems and concerns about the role of guardians ad litem in actions under Titles 11, 13, and 26 RCW and recommend alternatives to strengthen judicial oversight of guardians ad litem and ensure fairness and impartiality of the process. The administrator must accept and obtain comments from parties designated in subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 702. RCW 4.16.190 and 2006 c 8 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless otherwise provided in this section, if a person entitled to bring an action mentioned in this chapter, except for a penalty or forfeiture, or against a sheriff or other officer, for an escape, be at the time the cause of action accrued either under the age of eighteen years, or incompetent or disabled to such a degree that he or she cannot understand the nature of the proceedings, such incompetency or disability as determined according to chapter ((11.88))11.130 RCW, or imprisoned on a criminal charge prior to sentencing, the time of such disability shall not be a part of the time limited for the commencement of action.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section with respect to a person under the age of eighteen years does not apply to the time limited for the commencement of an action under RCW 4.16.350.

Sec. 703. RCW 7.28.090 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 7.28.070 and 7.28.080 shall not extend to lands or tenements owned by the United States or this state, nor to school lands, nor to lands held for any public purpose. Nor shall they extend to lands or tenements when there shall be an adverse title to such lands or tenements, and the holder of such adverse title is a person under eighteen years of age, or ((incompetent within the meaning of RCW 11.88.010: PROVIDED, Such))has been placed under a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265. However, such persons as aforesaid shall commence an action to recover such lands or tenements so possessed as aforesaid, within three years after the several disabilities herein enumerated shall cease to exist, and shall prosecute such action to judgment, or in case of vacant and unoccupied land shall, within the time last aforesaid, pay to the person or persons who have paid the same for his or her betterments, and the taxes, with interest on said taxes at the legal rate per annum that have been paid on said vacant and unimproved land.

Sec. 704. RCW 7.36.020 and 2008 c 6 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

Writs of habeas corpus shall be granted in favor of parents, guardians, limited guardians where appropriate, spouses or domestic partners, and next of kin, and to enforce the rights, and for the protection of ((infants and incompetent or disabled persons within the meaning of RCW 11.88.010))minors and persons who have been placed under a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265; and the proceedings shall in all cases conform to the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 705. RCW 7.70.065 and 2019 c 232 s 8 and 2019 c 209 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Informed consent for health care for a patient who is ((not competent, as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(e)))a minor or, to consent may be obtained from a person authorized to consent on behalf of such patient.

(a) Persons authorized to provide informed consent to health care on behalf of a patient who ((is not competent to consent, based upon a reason other than incapacity as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(d)))has been placed under a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265 a minor or, shall be a member of one of the following classes of persons in the following order of priority:

(i) The appointed guardian of the patient, if any;

(ii) The individual, if any, to whom the patient has given a durable power of attorney that encompasses the authority to make health care decisions;

(iii) The patient's spouse or state registered domestic partner;

(iv) Children of the patient who are at least eighteen years of age;

(v) Parents of the patient;

(vi) Adult brothers and sisters of the patient;

(vii) Adult grandchildren of the patient who are familiar with the patient;

(viii) Adult nieces and nephews of the patient who are familiar with the patient;

(ix) Adult aunts and uncles of the patient who are familiar with the patient; and

(x)(A) An adult who:

(I) Has exhibited special care and concern for the patient;

(II) Is familiar with the patient's personal values;

(III) Is reasonably available to make health care decisions;

(IV) Is not any of the following: A physician to the patient or an employee of the physician; the owner, administrator, or employee of a health care facility, nursing home, or long-term care facility where the patient resides or receives care; or a person who receives compensation to provide care to the patient; and

(V) Provides a declaration under (a)(x)(B) of this subsection.

(B) An adult who meets the requirements of (a)(x)(A) of this subsection shall provide a declaration, which is effective for up to six months from the date of the declaration, signed and dated under penalty of perjury pursuant to ((RCW 9A.72.085))chapter 5.50 RCW, that recites facts and circumstances demonstrating that he or she is familiar with the patient and that he or she:

(I) Meets the requirements of (a)(x)(A) of this subsection;

(II) Is a close friend of the patient;

(III) Is willing and able to become involved in the patient's health care;

(IV) Has maintained such regular contact with the patient as to be familiar with the patient's activities, health, personal values, and morals; and

(V) Is not aware of a person in a higher priority class willing and able to provide informed consent to health care on behalf of the patient.

(C) A health care provider may, but is not required to, rely on a declaration provided under (a)(x)(B) of this subsection. The health care provider or health care facility where services are rendered is immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, or from professional or other disciplinary action when such reliance is based on a declaration provided in compliance with (a)(x)(B) of this subsection.

(b) If the health care provider seeking informed consent for proposed health care of the patient who ((is not competent to consent under RCW 11.88.010(1)(e), other than a person determined to be incapacitated because he or she is under the age of majority and who is not otherwise authorized to provide informed consent))has been placed under a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265, makes reasonable efforts to locate and secure authorization from a competent person in the first or succeeding class and finds no such person available, authorization may be given by any person in the next class in the order of descending priority. However, no person under this section may provide informed consent to health care:

(i) If a person of higher priority under this section has refused to give such authorization; or

(ii) If there are two or more individuals in the same class and the decision is not unanimous among all available members of that class.

(c) Before any person authorized to provide informed consent on behalf of a patient ((not competent to consent under RCW 11.88.010(1)(e), other than a person determined to be incapacitated because he or she is under the age of majority and who is not otherwise authorized to provide informed consent))who has been placed under a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265, exercises that authority, the person must first determine in good faith that that patient, if competent, would consent to the proposed health care. If such a determination cannot be made, the decision to consent to the proposed health care may be made only after determining that the proposed health care is in the patient's best interests.

(d) No rights under Washington's death with dignity act, chapter 70.245 RCW, may be exercised through a person authorized to provide informed consent to health care on behalf of a patient ((not competent to consent under RCW 11.88.010(1)(e)))who is a minor or has been placed under a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265.

(2) Informed consent for health care, including mental health care, for a patient who ((is not competent, as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(e), because he or she)) is under the age of majority and who is not otherwise authorized to provide informed consent, may be obtained from a person authorized to consent on behalf of such a patient.

(a) Persons authorized to provide informed consent to health care, including mental health care, on behalf of a patient who ((is incapacitated, as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(e), because he or she)) is under the age of majority and who is not otherwise authorized to provide informed consent, shall be a member of one of the following classes of persons in the following order of priority:

(i) The appointed guardian, or legal custodian authorized pursuant to Title 26 RCW, of the minor patient, if any;

(ii) A person authorized by the court to consent to medical care for a child in out-of-home placement pursuant to chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW, if any;

(iii) Parents of the minor patient;

(iv) The individual, if any, to whom the minor's parent has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the minor patient; and

(v) A competent adult representing himself or herself to be a relative responsible for the health care of such minor patient or a competent adult who has signed and dated a declaration under penalty of perjury pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW stating that the adult person is a relative responsible for the health care of the minor patient. Such declaration shall be effective for up to six months from the date of the declaration.

(b)(i) Informed consent for health care on behalf of a patient who ((is incapacitated, as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(e), because he or she)) is under the age of majority and who is not otherwise authorized to provide informed consent may be obtained from a school nurse, school counselor, or homeless student liaison when:

(A) Consent is necessary for nonemergency, outpatient, primary care services, including physical examinations, vision examinations and eyeglasses, dental examinations, hearing examinations and hearing aids, immunizations, treatments for illnesses and conditions, and routine follow-up care customarily provided by a health care provider in an outpatient setting, excluding elective surgeries;

(B) The minor patient meets the definition of a "homeless child or youth" under the federal McKinney-Vento homeless education assistance improvements act of 2001, P.L. 107-110, January 8, 2002, 115 Stat. 2005; and

(C) The minor patient is not under the supervision or control of a parent, custodian, or legal guardian, and is not in the care and custody of the department of social and health services.

(ii) A person authorized to consent to care under this subsection (2)(b) and the person's employing school or school district are not subject to administrative sanctions or civil damages resulting from the consent or nonconsent for care, any care, or payment for any care, rendered pursuant to this section. Nothing in this section prevents a health care facility or a health care provider from seeking reimbursement from other sources for care provided to a minor patient under this subsection (2)(b).

(iii) Upon request by a health care facility or a health care provider, a person authorized to consent to care under this subsection (2)(b) must provide to the person rendering care a declaration signed and dated under penalty of perjury pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW stating that the person is a school nurse, school counselor, or homeless student liaison and that the minor patient meets the elements under (b)(i) of this subsection. The declaration must also include written notice of the exemption from liability under (b)(ii) of this subsection.

(c) A health care provider may, but is not required to, rely on the representations or declaration of a person claiming to be a relative responsible for the care of the minor patient, under (a)(v) of this subsection, or a person claiming to be authorized to consent to the health care of the minor patient under (b) of this subsection, if the health care provider does not have actual notice of the falsity of any of the statements made by the person claiming to be a relative responsible for the health care of the minor patient, or person claiming to be authorized to consent to the health care of the minor patient.

(d) A health care facility or a health care provider may, in its discretion, require documentation of a person's claimed status as being a relative responsible for the health care of the minor patient, or a person claiming to be authorized to consent to the health care of the minor patient under (b) of this subsection. However, there is no obligation to require such documentation.

(e) The health care provider or health care facility where services are rendered shall be immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, or from professional or other disciplinary action when such reliance is based on a declaration signed under penalty of perjury pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW stating that the adult person is a relative responsible for the health care of the minor patient under (a)(v) of this subsection, or a person claiming to be authorized to consent to the health care of the minor patient under (b) of this subsection.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "health care," "health care provider," and "health care facility" shall be defined as established in RCW 70.02.010.

(4) A person who knowingly provides a false declaration under this section shall be subject to criminal penalties under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

Sec. 706. RCW 9.35.005 and 2017 c 4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Financial information" means any of the following information identifiable to the individual that concerns the amount and conditions of an individual's assets, liabilities, or credit:

(a) Account numbers and balances;

(b) Transactional information concerning an account; and

(c) Codes, passwords, social security numbers, tax identification numbers, driver's license or permit numbers, state identicard numbers issued by the department of licensing, and other information held for the purpose of account access or transaction initiation.

(2) "Financial information repository" means a person engaged in the business of providing services to customers who have a credit, deposit, trust, stock, or other financial account or relationship with the person.

(3) "Means of identification" means information or an item that is not describing finances or credit but is personal to or identifiable with an individual or other person, including: A current or former name of the person, telephone number, an electronic address, or identifier of the individual or a member of his or her family, including the ancestor of the person; information relating to a change in name, address, telephone number, or electronic address or identifier of the individual or his or her family; a social security, driver's license, or tax identification number of the individual or a member of his or her family; and other information that could be used to identify the person, including unique biometric data.

(4) "Person" means a person as defined in RCW 9A.04.110.

(5) "Senior" means a person over the age of sixty-five.

(6) "Victim" means a person whose means of identification or financial information has been used or transferred with the intent to commit, or to aid or abet, any unlawful activity.

(7) "Vulnerable individual" means a person:

(((i) [(a)]))(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself;

(((ii) [(b)] Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88))(b) Who has been placed under a guardianship under chapter 11.130 RCW;

(((iii) [(c)]))(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW 71A.10.020;

(((iv) [(d)]))(d) Admitted to any facility;

(((v) [(e)]))(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW;

(((vi) [(f)]))(f) Receiving services from an individual provider as defined in RCW 74.39A.240; or

(((vii) [(g)]))(g) Who self-directs his or her own care and receives services from a personal aide under chapter 74.39 RCW.

Sec. 707. RCW 9A.44.010 and 2007 c 20 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Sexual intercourse" (a) has its ordinary meaning and occurs upon any penetration, however slight, and

(b) Also means any penetration of the vagina or anus however slight, by an object, when committed on one person by another, whether such persons are of the same or opposite sex, except when such penetration is accomplished for medically recognized treatment or diagnostic purposes, and

(c) Also means any act of sexual contact between persons involving the sex organs of one person and the mouth or anus of another whether such persons are of the same or opposite sex.

(2) "Sexual contact" means any touching of the sexual or other intimate parts of a person done for the purpose of gratifying sexual desire of either party or a third party.

(3) "Married" means one who is legally married to another, but does not include a person who is living separate and apart from his or her spouse and who has filed in an appropriate court for legal separation or for dissolution of his or her marriage.

(4) "Mental incapacity" is that condition existing at the time of the offense which prevents a person from understanding the nature or consequences of the act of sexual intercourse whether that condition is produced by illness, defect, the influence of a substance or from some other cause.

(5) "Physically helpless" means a person who is unconscious or for any other reason is physically unable to communicate unwillingness to an act.

(6) "Forcible compulsion" means physical force which overcomes resistance, or a threat, express or implied, that places a person in fear of death or physical injury to herself or himself or another person, or in fear that she or he or another person will be kidnapped.

(7) "Consent" means that at the time of the act of sexual intercourse or sexual contact there are actual words or conduct indicating freely given agreement to have sexual intercourse or sexual contact.

(8) "Significant relationship" means a situation in which the perpetrator is:

(a) A person who undertakes the responsibility, professionally or voluntarily, to provide education, health, welfare, or organized recreational activities principally for minors;

(b) A person who in the course of his or her employment supervises minors; or

(c) A person who provides welfare, health or residential assistance, personal care, or organized recreational activities to frail elders or vulnerable adults, including a provider, employee, temporary employee, volunteer, or independent contractor who supplies services to long-term care facilities licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW, and home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, but not including a consensual sexual partner.

(9) "Abuse of a supervisory position" means:

(a) To use a direct or indirect threat or promise to exercise authority to the detriment or benefit of a minor; or

(b) To exploit a significant relationship in order to obtain the consent of a minor.

(10) "Person with a developmental disability," for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(c) and 9A.44.100(1)(c), means a person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

(11) "Person with supervisory authority," for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1) (c) or (e) and 9A.44.100(1) (c) or (e), means any proprietor or employee of any public or private care or treatment facility who directly supervises developmentally disabled, mentally disordered, or chemically dependent persons at the facility.

(12) "Person with a mental disorder" for the purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(e) and 9A.44.100(1)(e) means a person with a "mental disorder" as defined in RCW 71.05.020.

(13) "Person with a chemical dependency" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(e) and 9A.44.100(1)(e) means a person who is "chemically dependent" as defined in RCW 70.96A.020(((4))).

(14) "Health care provider" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.100 means a person who is, holds himself or herself out to be, or provides services as if he or she were: (a) A member of a health care profession under chapter 18.130 RCW; or (b) registered under chapter 18.19 RCW or licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, regardless of whether the health care provider is licensed, certified, or registered by the state.

(15) "Treatment" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.100 means the active delivery of professional services by a health care provider which the health care provider holds himself or herself out to be qualified to provide.

(16) "Frail elder or vulnerable adult" means a person sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself. "Frail elder or vulnerable adult" also includes a person ((found incapacitated under chapter 11.88))who has been placed under a guardianship under chapter 11.130 RCW, a person over eighteen years of age who has a developmental disability under chapter 71A.10 RCW, a person admitted to a long-term care facility that is licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW, and a person receiving services from a home health, hospice, or home care agency licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW.

Sec. 708. RCW 11.02.005 and 2018 c 22 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

When used in this title, unless otherwise required from the context:

(1) "Administrator" means a personal representative of the estate of a decedent and the term may be used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.

(2) "Codicil" means a will that modifies or partially revokes an existing earlier will. A codicil need not refer to or be attached to the earlier will.

(3) "Degree of kinship" means the degree of kinship as computed according to the rules of the civil law; that is, by counting upward from the intestate to the nearest common ancestor and then downward to the relative, the degree of kinship being the sum of these two counts.

(4) "Executor" means a personal representative of the estate of a decedent appointed by will and the term may be used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.

(5) "Guardian" or "limited guardian" means a personal representative of the person or estate of ((an incompetent or disabled))a person ((as defined in RCW 11.88.010))who has been placed under a guardianship under chapter 11.130 RCW and the term may be used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.

(6) "Heirs" denotes those persons, including the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the real and personal property of a decedent on the decedent's death intestate.

(7) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal revenue code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2001.

(8) "Issue" means all the lineal descendants of an individual. An adopted individual is a lineal descendant of each of his or her adoptive parents and of all individuals with regard to which each adoptive parent is a lineal descendant. A child conceived prior to the death of a parent but born after the death of the deceased parent is considered to be the surviving issue of the deceased parent for purposes of this title.

(9) "Net estate" refers to the real and personal property of a decedent exclusive of homestead rights, exempt property, the family allowance and enforceable claims against, and debts of, the deceased or the estate.

(10) "Nonprobate asset" means those rights and interests of a person having beneficial ownership of an asset that pass on the person's death under a written instrument or arrangement other than the person's will. "Nonprobate asset" includes, but is not limited to, a right or interest passing under a joint tenancy with right of survivorship, joint bank account with right of survivorship, transfer on death deed, payable on death or trust bank account, transfer on death security or security account, deed or conveyance if possession has been postponed until the death of the person, trust of which the person is grantor and that becomes effective or irrevocable only upon the person's death, community property agreement, individual retirement account or bond, or note or other contract the payment or performance of which is affected by the death of the person. "Nonprobate asset" does not include: A payable-on-death provision of a life insurance policy, annuity, or other similar contract, or of an employee benefit plan; a right or interest passing by descent and distribution under chapter 11.04 RCW; a right or interest if, before death, the person has irrevocably transferred the right or interest, the person has waived the power to transfer it or, in the case of contractual arrangement, the person has waived the unilateral right to rescind or modify the arrangement; or a right or interest held by the person solely in a fiduciary capacity. For the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or declaration of invalidity of marriage, RCW 11.07.010(5) applies. For the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to testamentary disposition of nonprobate assets, see RCW 11.11.010(7).

(11) "Personal representative" includes executor, administrator, special administrator, and guardian or limited guardian and special representative.

(12) "Real estate" includes, except as otherwise specifically provided herein, all lands, tenements, and hereditaments, and all rights thereto, and all interest therein possessed and claimed in fee simple, or for the life of a third person.

(13) "Representation" refers to a method of determining distribution in which the takers are in unequal degrees of kinship with respect to a decedent, and is accomplished as follows: After first determining who, of those entitled to share in the estate, are in the nearest degree of kinship, the estate is divided into equal shares, the number of shares being the sum of the number of persons who survive the decedent who are in the nearest degree of kinship and the number of persons in the same degree of kinship who died before the decedent but who left issue surviving the decedent; each share of a deceased person in the nearest degree must be divided among those of the deceased person's issue who survive the decedent and have no ancestor then living who is in the line of relationship between them and the decedent, those more remote in degree taking together the share which their ancestor would have taken had he or she survived the decedent.

(14) References to "section 2033A" of the internal revenue code in wills, trust agreements, powers of appointment, beneficiary designations, and other instruments governed by or subject to this title are deemed to refer to the comparable or corresponding provisions of section 2057 of the internal revenue code, as added by section 6006(b) of the internal revenue service restructuring act of 1998 (H.R. 2676, P.L. 105-206); and references to the section 2033A "exclusion" are deemed to mean the section 2057 deduction.

(15) "Settlor" has the same meaning as provided for "trustor" in this section.

(16) "Special administrator" means a personal representative of the estate of a decedent appointed for limited purposes and the term may be used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.

(17) "Surviving spouse" or "surviving domestic partner" does not include an individual whose marriage to or state registered domestic partnership with the decedent has been terminated, dissolved, or invalidated unless, by virtue of a subsequent marriage or state registered domestic partnership, he or she is married to or in a domestic partnership with the decedent at the time of death. A decree of separation that does not terminate the status of spouses or domestic partners is not a dissolution or invalidation for purposes of this subsection.

(18) "Trustee" means an original, added, or successor trustee and includes the state, or any agency thereof, when it is acting as the trustee of a trust to which chapter 11.98 RCW applies.

(19) "Trustor" means a person, including a testator, who creates, or contributes property to, a trust.

(20) "Will" means an instrument validly executed as required by RCW 11.12.020.

Words that import the singular number may also be applied to the plural of persons and things.

Words importing the masculine gender only may be extended to females also.

Sec. 709. RCW 11.28.185 and 2008 c 6 s 915 are each amended to read as follows:

When the terms of the decedent's will manifest an intent that the personal representative appointed to administer the estate shall not be required to furnish bond or other security, or when the personal representative is the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of the decedent and it appears to the court that the entire estate, after provision for expenses and claims of creditors, will be distributable to such spouse or surviving domestic partner, then such personal representative shall not be required to give bond or other security as a condition of appointment. In all cases where a bank or trust company authorized to act as personal representative is appointed as personal representative, no bond shall be required. In all other cases, unless waived by the court, the personal representative shall give such bond or other security, in such amount and with such surety or sureties, as the court may direct.

Every person required to furnish bond must, before receiving letters testamentary or of administration, execute a bond to the state of Washington conditioned that the personal representative shall faithfully execute the duty of the trust according to law.

The court may at any time after appointment of the personal representative require said personal representative to give a bond or additional bond, the same to be conditioned and to be approved as provided in this section; or the court may allow a reduction of the bond upon a proper showing.

In lieu of bond, the court may in its discretion, substitute other security or financial arrangements, such as provided under RCW ((11.88.105))11.130.445, or as the court may deem adequate to protect the assets of the estate.

Sec. 710. RCW 11.76.080 and 2008 c 6 s 806 are each amended to read as follows:

If there be any alleged incapacitated person ((as defined in RCW 11.88.010)) interested in the estate who has no legally appointed guardian or limited guardian, the court:

(1) At any stage of the proceeding in its discretion and for such purpose or purposes as it shall indicate, may appoint; and

(2) For hearings held under RCW 11.54.010, 11.68.041, 11.68.100, and 11.76.050 or for entry of an order adjudicating testacy or intestacy and heirship when no personal representative is appointed to administer the estate of the decedent, shall appoint some disinterested person as guardian ad litem to represent the allegedly incapacitated person with reference to any petition, proceeding report, or adjudication of testacy or intestacy without the appointment of a personal representative to administer the estate of decedent in which the alleged incapacitated person may have an interest, who, on behalf of the alleged incapacitated person, may contest the same as any other person interested might contest it, and who shall be allowed by the court reasonable compensation for his or her services: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That where a surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is the sole beneficiary under the terms of a will, the court may grant a motion by the personal representative to waive the appointment of a guardian ad litem for a person who is the minor child of the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner and the decedent and who is incapacitated solely for the reason of his or her being under eighteen years of age.

Sec. 711. RCW 11.86.021 and 2016 c 209 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A beneficiary may disclaim an interest in whole or in part, or with reference to specific parts, shares or assets, in the manner provided in RCW 11.86.031.

(2) Likewise, a beneficiary may so disclaim through an agent or attorney so authorized by written instrument.

(3) A personal representative, guardian, attorney-in-fact if authorized under a durable power of attorney under chapter 11.125 RCW, or other legal representative of the estate of a minor, incompetent, or deceased beneficiary, may so disclaim on behalf of the beneficiary, with or without court order, if:

(a) The legal representative deems the disclaimer to be in the best interests of those interested in the estate of the beneficiary and of those who take the disclaimed interest because of the disclaimer, and not detrimental to the best interests of the beneficiary; and

(b) In the case of a guardian, no order has been issued under ((RCW 11.92.140))chapter 11.130 RCW determining that the disclaimer is not in the best interests of the beneficiary.

Sec. 712. RCW 11.90.210 and 2009 c 81 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter provides the exclusive jurisdictional basis for a court of this state to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order for an adult under ((chapters 11.88 and 11.92))chapter 11.130 RCW.

Sec. 713. RCW 11.96A.050 and 2013 c 272 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Venue for proceedings pertaining to trusts is:

(a) For testamentary trusts established under wills probated in the state of Washington, in the superior court of the county where the probate of the will is being administered or was completed or, in the alternative, the superior court of the county where any qualified beneficiary of the trust as defined in RCW 11.98.002 resides, the county where any trustee resides or has a place of business, or the county where any real property that is an asset of the trust is located; and

(b) For all other trusts, in the superior court of the county where any qualified beneficiary of the trust as defined in RCW 11.98.002 resides, the county where any trustee resides or has a place of business, or the county where any real property that is an asset of the trust is located. If no county has venue for proceedings pertaining to a trust under the preceding sentence, then in any county.

(2) A party to a proceeding pertaining to a trust may request that venue be changed. If the request is made within four months of the giving of the first notice of a proceeding pertaining to the trust, except for good cause shown, venue must be moved to the county with the strongest connection to the trust as determined by the court, considering such factors as the residence of a qualified beneficiary of the trust as defined in RCW 11.98.002, the residence or place of business of a trustee, and the location of any real property that is an asset of the trust.

(3) Venue for proceedings subject to chapter ((11.88 or 11.92))11.130 RCW must be determined under the provisions of those chapters.

(4) Venue for proceedings pertaining to the probate of wills, the administration and disposition of a decedent's property, including nonprobate assets, and any other matter not identified in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, must be in any county in the state of Washington that the petitioner selects. A party to a proceeding may request that venue be changed if the request is made within four months of the mailing of the notice of appointment and pendency of probate required by RCW 11.28.237, and except for good cause shown, venue must be moved as follows:

(a) If the decedent was a resident of the state of Washington at the time of death, to the county of the decedent's residence; or

(b) If the decedent was not a resident of the state of Washington at the time of death, to any of the following:

(i) Any county in which any part of the probate estate might be;

(ii) If there are no probate assets, any county where any nonprobate asset might be; or

(iii) The county in which the decedent died.

(5) Once letters testamentary or of administration have been granted in the state of Washington, all orders, settlements, trials, and other proceedings under this title must be had or made in the county in which such letters have been granted unless venue is moved as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(6) Venue for proceedings pertaining to powers of attorney must be in the superior court of the county of the principal's residence, except for good cause shown.

(7) If venue is moved, an action taken before venue is changed is not invalid because of the venue.

(8) Any request to change venue that is made more than four months after the commencement of the action may be granted in the discretion of the court.

Sec. 714. RCW 11.96A.080 and 1999 c 42 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 11.96A.260 through 11.96A.320, any party may have a judicial proceeding for the declaration of rights or legal relations with respect to any matter, as defined by RCW 11.96A.030; the resolution of any other case or controversy that arises under the Revised Code of Washington and references judicial proceedings under this title; or the determination of the persons entitled to notice under RCW 11.96A.110 or 11.96A.120.

(2) The provisions of this chapter apply to disputes arising in connection with estates of incapacitated persons unless otherwise covered by ((chapters 11.88 and 11.92))chapter 11.130 RCW. The provisions of this chapter shall not supersede, but shall supplement, any otherwise applicable provisions and procedures contained in this title, including without limitation those contained in chapter 11.20, 11.24, 11.28, 11.40, 11.42, or 11.56 RCW. The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to actions for wrongful death under chapter 4.20 RCW.

Sec. 715. RCW 11.96A.120 and 2013 c 272 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this section has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.

(2) The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this section is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation before the consent would otherwise have become effective.

(3) The following limitations on the ability to serve as a virtual representative apply:

(a) A trustor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this section with respect to the termination and modification of an irrevocable trust; and

(b) Representation of an incapacitated trustor with respect to his or her powers over a trust is subject to the provisions of RCW 11.103.030, and chapters 11.96A((, 11.88, and 11.92))and 11.130 RCW.

(4) To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented or among those being represented with respect to the particular question or dispute:

(a) A guardian may represent and bind the estate that the guardian controls, subject to chapters 11.96A((, 11.88, and 11.92))and 11.130 RCW;

(b) A guardian of the person may represent and bind the incapacitated person if a guardian of the incapacitated person's estate has not been appointed;

(c) An agent having authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute may represent and bind the principal;

(d) A trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust;

(e) A personal representative of a decedent's estate may represent and bind persons interested in the estate; and

(f) A parent may represent and bind the parent's minor or unborn child or children if a guardian for the child or children has not been appointed.

(5) Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented with regard to the particular question or dispute.

(6) Where an interest has been given to persons who comprise a certain class upon the happening of a certain event, the living persons who would constitute the class as of the date the representation is to be determined may virtually represent all other members of the class as of that date, but only to the extent that there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person(s) represented with regard to the particular question or dispute.

(7) Where an interest has been given to a living person, and the same interest, or a share in it, is to pass to the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner or to persons who are, or might be, the heirs, issue, or other kindred of that living person or the distributees of the estate of that living person upon the happening of a future event, that living person may virtually represent the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, heirs, issue, or other kindred of the person, and the distributees of the estate of the person, but only to the extent that there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person(s) represented with regard to the particular question or dispute.

(8) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, where an interest has been given to a person or a class of persons, or both, upon the happening of any future event, and the same interest or a share of the interest is to pass to another person or class of persons, or both, upon the happening of an additional future event, the living person or persons who would take the interest upon the happening of the first event may virtually represent the persons and classes of persons who might take on the happening of the additional future event, but only to the extent that there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person(s) represented with regard to the particular question or dispute.

(9) To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the holder of the power of appointment and the persons represented with respect to the particular question or dispute, the holder of a lifetime or testamentary power of appointment may virtually represent and bind persons who are permissible appointees or takers in default (but only to the extent that they are permissible appointees in the case of a limited power of appointment) under the power, and who are not permissible distributees as defined in RCW 11.98.002.

(10) The attorney general may virtually represent and bind a charitable organization if:

(a) The charitable organization is not a qualified beneficiary as defined in RCW 11.98.002 specified in the trust instrument or acting as trustee; or

(b) The charitable organization is a qualified beneficiary, but is not a permissible distributee, as those terms are defined in RCW 11.98.002, and its beneficial interest in the trust is subject to change by the trustor or by a person designated by the trustor.

(11) An action taken by the court is conclusive and binding upon each person receiving actual or constructive notice or who is otherwise represented under this section.

(12) This section is intended to adopt the common law concept of virtual representation. This section supplements the common law relating to the doctrine of virtual representation and may not be construed as limiting the application of that common law doctrine.

Sec. 716. RCW 11.96A.130 and 1999 c 42 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter eliminates the requirement to give notice to a person who has requested special notice under RCW 11.28.240 or ((11.92.150))notice under RCW 11.130.080.

Sec. 717. RCW 11.96A.150 and 2007 c 475 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Either the superior court or any court on an appeal may, in its discretion, order costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, to be awarded to any party: (a) From any party to the proceedings; (b) from the assets of the estate or trust involved in the proceedings; or (c) from any nonprobate asset that is the subject of the proceedings. The court may order the costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, to be paid in such amount and in such manner as the court determines to be equitable. In exercising its discretion under this section, the court may consider any and all factors that it deems to be relevant and appropriate, which factors may but need not include whether the litigation benefits the estate or trust involved.

(2) This section applies to all proceedings governed by this title, including but not limited to proceedings involving trusts, decedent's estates and properties, and guardianship matters. This section shall not be construed as being limited by any other specific statutory provision providing for the payment of costs, including RCW 11.68.070 and 11.24.050, unless such statute specifically provides otherwise. This section shall apply to matters involving guardians and guardians ad litem ((and shall not be limited or controlled by the provisions of RCW 11.88.090(10))).

Sec. 718. RCW 11.96A.220 and 1999 c 42 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 11.96A.210 through 11.96A.250 shall be applicable to the resolution of any matter, as defined by RCW 11.96A.030, other than matters subject to chapter ((11.88 or 11.92))11.130 RCW, or a trust for a minor or other incapacitated person created at its inception by the judgment or decree of a court unless the judgment or decree provides that RCW 11.96A.210 through 11.96A.250 shall be applicable. If all parties agree to a resolution of any such matter, then the agreement shall be evidenced by a written agreement signed by all parties. Subject to the provisions of RCW 11.96A.240, the written agreement shall be binding and conclusive on all persons interested in the estate or trust. The agreement shall identify the subject matter of the dispute and the parties. If the agreement or a memorandum of the agreement is to be filed with the court under RCW 11.96A.230, the agreement may, but need not, include provisions specifically addressing jurisdiction, governing law, the waiver of notice of the filing as provided in RCW 11.96A.230, and the discharge of any special representative who has acted with respect to the agreement.

If a party who virtually represents another under RCW 11.96A.120 signs the agreement, then the party's signature constitutes the signature of all persons whom the party virtually represents, and all the virtually represented persons shall be bound by the agreement.

Sec. 719. RCW 11.103.030 and 2016 c 209 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the terms of a trust expressly provide that the trust is revocable, the trustor may not revoke or amend the trust.

(2) If a revocable trust is created or funded by more than one trustor and unless the trust agreement provides otherwise:

(a) To the extent the trust consists of community property, the trust may be revoked by either spouse or either domestic partner acting alone but may be amended only by joint action of both spouses or both domestic partners;

(b) To the extent the trust consists of property other than community property, each trustor may revoke or amend the trust with regard to the portion of the trust property attributable to that trustor's contribution;

(c) The character of community property or separate property is unaffected by its transfer to and from a revocable trust; and

(d) Upon the revocation or amendment of the trust by fewer than all of the trustors, the trustee must promptly notify the other trustors of the revocation or amendment.

(3) The trustor may revoke or amend a revocable trust:

(a) By substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms of the trust; or

(b)(i) If the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by:

(A) A later will or codicil that expressly refers to the trust or specifically devises property that would otherwise have passed according to the terms of the trust; or

(B) A written instrument signed by the trustor evidencing intent to revoke or amend.

(ii) The requirements of chapter 11.11 RCW do not apply to revocation or amendment of a revocable trust under (b)(i) of this subsection.

(4) Upon revocation of a revocable trust, the trustee must deliver the trust property as the trustor directs.

(5) A trustor's powers with respect to the revocation or amendment of a trust or distribution of the property of a trust may be exercised by the trustor's agent under a power of attorney only to the extent specified in the power of attorney document, as provided in RCW 11.125.240 and to the extent consistent with or expressly authorized by the trust agreement.

(6) A guardian of the trustor may exercise a trustor's powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property only with the approval of the court supervising the guardianship pursuant to ((RCW 11.92.140))chapter 11.130 RCW.

(7) A trustee who does not know that a trust has been revoked or amended is not liable to the trustor or trustor's successors in interest for distributions made and other actions taken on the assumption that the trust had not been amended or revoked.

(8) This section does not limit or affect operation of RCW 11.96A.220 through 11.96A.240.

Sec. 720. RCW 11.107.060 and 2017 c 29 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Beneficiary with a disability" means a beneficiary of the first trust who the trustee believes may qualify for governmental benefits based on disability, whether or not the beneficiary currently receives those benefits or is an individual who ((is incapacitated within the meaning of RCW 11.88.010))has been placed under a guardianship under chapter 11.130 RCW.

(b) "Governmental benefits" means financial aid or services from a state, federal, or other public agency.

(c) "Special needs trust" means a trust the trustee believes would not be considered a resource for purposes of determining whether the beneficiary with a disability is eligible for governmental benefits.

(2) A trustee may exercise the decanting power under RCW 11.107.020 and 11.107.030 over the property of the first trust as if the trustee had authority to distribute principal to a beneficiary with a disability subject to expanded discretion if:

(a) The second trust is a special needs trust that benefits the beneficiary with a disability; and

(b) The trustee determines that exercise of the decanting power will further the purposes of the first trust.

(3) In an exercise of the decanting power under this section, the following rules apply:

(a) The provisions of the second trust for a beneficiary with a disability may:

(i) Meet the medicaid law requirements for an account in a pooled trust for a beneficiary with a disability under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1369p(d)(4)(C), as amended, including requiring a payback to the state of medicaid expenditures of funds not retained by the pooled trust; or

(ii) Meet the medicaid law requirements for a trust for the sole benefit of a beneficiary with a disability under age sixty-five under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1369(d)(4)(A), as amended, including requiring a payback to the state of medicaid expenditures.

(b) RCW 11.107.020(1)(a)(iii) does not apply to the interests of the beneficiary with a disability.

(c) Except as affected by any change to the interests of the beneficiary with a disability, the second trusts, in the aggregate, must grant each other beneficiary of the first trust beneficial interests in the second trusts which are substantially similar to the beneficiary's beneficial interests in the first trust unless inconsistent with (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection (3).

Sec. 721. RCW 11.120.140 and 2016 c 140 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless otherwise ordered by the court, a guardian appointed ((due to a finding of incapacity under RCW 11.88.010(1)))under chapter 11.130 RCW has the right to access an incapacitated person's digital assets other than the content of electronic communications.

(2) Unless otherwise ordered by the court or directed by the user, a custodian shall disclose to a guardian the catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by an incapacitated person and any digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, if the guardian gives the custodian:

(a) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

(b) Certified copies of letters of guardianship and the court order appointing the guardian; and

(c) If requested by the custodian:

(i) A number, user name, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the account of the person; or

(ii) Evidence linking the account to the incapacitated person.

(3) A guardian may request a custodian of the incapacitated person's digital assets to suspend or terminate an account of the incapacitated person for good cause. A request made under this section must be accompanied by certified copies of letters of guardianship and the court order appointing the guardian.

Sec. 722. RCW 11.125.400 and 2016 c 209 s 217 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, where language in a power of attorney grants general authority with respect to health care matters:

(1) The agent shall be authorized to act as the principal's personal representative pursuant to the health insurance portability and accountability act, sections 1171 through 1179 of the social security act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320d, as amended, and applicable regulations for all purposes thereunder, including but not limited to accessing and acquiring the principal's health care related information.

(2) The agent shall be authorized to provide informed consent for health care decisions on the principal's behalf. If a principal has appointed more than one agent with authority to make mental health treatment decisions in accordance with a directive under chapter 71.32 RCW, to the extent of any conflict, the most recently appointed agent shall be treated as the principal's agent for mental health treatment decisions unless provided otherwise in either appointment.

(3) Unless he or she is the spouse, state registered domestic partner, father or mother, or adult child or brother or sister of the principal, none of the following persons may act as the agent for the principal: Any of the principal's physicians, the physicians' employees, or the owners, administrators, or employees of the health care facility or long-term care facility as defined in RCW 43.190.020 where the principal resides or receives care. Except when the principal has consented in a mental health advance directive executed under chapter 71.32 RCW to inpatient admission or electroconvulsive therapy, this authorization is subject to the same limitations as those that apply to a guardian under ((RCW 11.92.043(5) (a) through (c) and 11.92.190))chapter 11.130 RCW.

Sec. 723. RCW 11.125.410 and 2016 c 209 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, the following general provisions shall apply to any power of attorney making reference to the care of the principal's minor children:

(1) A parent or guardian, through a power of attorney, may authorize an agent to make health care decisions on behalf of one or more of his or her children, or children for whom he or she is the legal guardian, who are under the age of majority as defined in RCW 26.28.015, to be effective if the child has no other parent or legal representative readily available and authorized to give such consent.

(2) A principal may further nominate a guardian or guardians of the person, or of the estate or both, of a minor child, whether born at the time of making the durable power of attorney or afterwards, to continue during the disability of the principal, during the minority of the child or for any less time by including such a provision in his or her power of attorney.

(3) The authority of any guardian of the person of any minor child shall supersede the authority of a designated agent to make health care decisions for the minor only after such designated guardian has been appointed by the court.

(4) In the event a conflict between the provisions of a will nominating a testamentary guardian under ((the authority of RCW 11.88.080))chapter 11.130 RCW and the nomination of a guardian under the authority of this statute, the most recent designation shall control.

Sec. 724. RCW 13.32A.160 and 2019 c 124 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a proper child in need of services petition to approve an out-of-home placement is filed under RCW 13.32A.120, 13.32A.140, or 13.32A.150 the juvenile court shall: (a)(i) Schedule a fact-finding hearing to be held: (A) For a child who resides in a place other than his or her parent's home and other than an out-of-home placement, within five calendar days unless the last calendar day is a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, in which case the hearing shall be held on the preceding judicial day; or (B) for a child living at home or in an out-of-home placement, within ten days; and (ii) notify the parent, child, and the department of such date; (b) notify the parent of the right to be represented by counsel and, if indigent, to have counsel appointed for him or her by the court; (c) appoint legal counsel for the child; (d) inform the child and his or her parent of the legal consequences of the court approving or disapproving a child in need of services petition; (e) notify the parents of their rights under this chapter and chapters ((11.88))11.130, 13.34, and 71.34 RCW, including the right to file an at-risk youth petition, the right to submit an application for admission of their child to a treatment facility for alcohol, chemical dependency, or mental health treatment, and the right to file a guardianship petition; and (f) notify all parties, including the department, of their right to present evidence at the fact-finding hearing.

(2) Upon filing of a child in need of services petition, the child may be placed, if not already placed, by the department in a crisis residential center, HOPE center, foster family home, group home facility licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW, or any other suitable residence to be determined by the department. The court may place a child in a crisis residential center for a temporary out-of-home placement as long as the requirements of RCW 13.32A.125 are met.

(3) If the child has been placed in a foster family home or group care facility under chapter 74.15 RCW, the child shall remain there, or in any other suitable residence as determined by the department, pending resolution of the petition by the court. Any placement may be reviewed by the court within three judicial days upon the request of the juvenile or the juvenile's parent.

Sec. 725. RCW 13.34.270 and 2019 c 470 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the department of social and health services places a child with a developmental disability in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW 74.13.350, the department shall obtain a judicial determination within one hundred eighty days of the placement that continued placement is in the best interests of the child. If the child's out-of-home placement ends before one hundred eighty days have elapsed, no judicial determination is required.

(2) To obtain the judicial determination, the department shall file a petition alleging that there is located or residing within the county a child who has a developmental disability and that the child has been placed in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW 74.13.350. The petition shall request that the court review the child's placement, make a determination whether continued placement is in the best interests of the child, and take other necessary action as provided in this section. The petition shall contain the name, date of birth, and residence of the child and the names and residences of the child's parent or legal guardian who has agreed to the child's placement in out-of-home care. Reasonable attempts shall be made by the department to ascertain and set forth in the petition the identity, location, and custodial status of any parent who is not a party to the placement agreement and why that parent cannot assume custody of the child.

(3) Upon filing of the petition, the clerk of the court shall schedule the petition for a hearing to be held no later than fourteen calendar days after the petition has been filed. The department shall provide notification of the time, date, and purpose of the hearing to the parent or legal guardian who has agreed to the child's placement in out-of-home care. The department shall also make reasonable attempts to notify any parent who is not a party to the placement agreement, if the parent's identity and location is known. Notification under this section may be given by the most expedient means, including but not limited to, mail, personal service, and telephone.

(4) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child as provided in RCW 13.34.100, unless the court for good cause finds the appointment unnecessary.

(5) Permanency planning hearings shall be held as provided in this section. At the hearing, the court shall review whether the child's best interests are served by continued out-of-home placement and determine the future legal status of the child.

(a) For children age ten and under, a permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and an adoption decree or guardianship order under chapter ((11.88))11.130 RCW has not previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later than twelve months following commencement of the child's current placement episode.

(b) For children over age ten, a permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least fifteen months and an adoption decree or guardianship order under chapter ((11.88))11.130 RCW has not previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later than eighteen months following commencement of the current placement episode.

(c) No later than ten working days before the permanency planning hearing, the department shall submit a written permanency plan to the court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all parties. The plan shall be directed toward securing a safe, stable, and permanent home for the child as soon as possible. The plan shall identify one of the following outcomes as the primary goal and may also identify additional outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the child's parent or legal guardian; adoption; guardianship; or long-term out-of-home care, until the child is age eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and the child's care provider.

(d) If a goal of long-term out-of-home care has been achieved before the permanency planning hearing, the court shall review the child's status to determine whether the placement and the plan for the child's care remains appropriate. In cases where the primary permanency planning goal has not been achieved, the court shall inquire regarding the reasons why the primary goal has not been achieved and determine what needs to be done to make it possible to achieve the primary goal.

(e) Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court shall hold a further permanency planning hearing in accordance with this section at least once every twelve months until a permanency planning goal is achieved or the voluntary placement agreement is terminated.

(6) Any party to the voluntary placement agreement may terminate the agreement at any time. Upon termination of the agreement, the child shall be returned to the care of the child's parent or legal guardian, unless the child has been taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050, placed in shelter care pursuant to RCW 13.34.060, or placed in foster care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130. The department shall notify the court upon termination of the voluntary placement agreement and return of the child to the care of the child's parent or legal guardian. Whenever a voluntary placement agreement is terminated, an action under this section shall be dismissed.

(7) When state or federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a child with a developmental disability, placed in care as a result of an action under this chapter, the department shall refer the case to the division of child support, unless the department finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child support against the parent or parents of the child.

(8) This section does not prevent the department of children, youth, and families from filing a dependency petition if there is reason to believe that the child is a dependent child as defined in RCW 13.34.030. An action filed under this section shall be dismissed upon the filing of a dependency petition regarding a child who is the subject of the action under this section.

(9) For purposes of this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, "department" means the department of social and health services.

Sec. 726. RCW 18.20.020 and 2012 c 10 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adult day services" means care and services provided to a nonresident individual by the assisted living facility on the assisted living facility premises, for a period of time not to exceed ten continuous hours, and does not involve an overnight stay.

(2) "Assisted living facility" means any home or other institution, however named, which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or implied purpose of providing housing, basic services, and assuming general responsibility for the safety and well-being of the residents, and may also provide domiciliary care, consistent with chapter 142, Laws of 2004, to seven or more residents after July 1, 2000. However, an assisted living facility that is licensed for three to six residents prior to or on July 1, 2000, may maintain its assisted living facility license as long as it is continually licensed as an assisted living facility. "Assisted living facility" shall not include facilities certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, nor any home, institution or section thereof which is otherwise licensed and regulated under the provisions of state law providing specifically for the licensing and regulation of such home, institution or section thereof. Nor shall it include any independent senior housing, independent living units in continuing care retirement communities, or other similar living situations including those subsidized by the department of housing and urban development.

(3) "Basic services" means housekeeping services, meals, nutritious snacks, laundry, and activities.

(4) "Department" means the state department of social and health services.

(5) "Domiciliary care" means: Assistance with activities of daily living provided by the assisted living facility either directly or indirectly; or health support services, if provided directly or indirectly by the assisted living facility; or intermittent nursing services, if provided directly or indirectly by the assisted living facility.

(6) "General responsibility for the safety and well-being of the resident" means the provision of the following: Prescribed general low sodium diets; prescribed general diabetic diets; prescribed mechanical soft foods; emergency assistance; monitoring of the resident; arranging health care appointments with outside health care providers and reminding residents of such appointments as necessary; coordinating health care services with outside health care providers consistent with RCW 18.20.380; assisting the resident to obtain and maintain glasses, hearing aids, dentures, canes, crutches, walkers, wheelchairs, and assistive communication devices; observation of the resident for changes in overall functioning; blood pressure checks as scheduled; responding appropriately when there are observable or reported changes in the resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning; or medication assistance as permitted under RCW 69.41.085 and as defined in RCW 69.41.010.

(7) "Legal representative" means a person or persons identified in RCW 7.70.065 who may act on behalf of the resident pursuant to the scope of their legal authority. The legal representative shall not be affiliated with the licensee, assisted living facility, or management company, unless the affiliated person is a family member of the resident.

(8) "Nonresident individual" means a person who resides in independent senior housing, independent living units in continuing care retirement communities, or in other similar living environments or in an unlicensed room located within an assisted living facility. Nothing in this chapter prohibits nonresidents from receiving one or more of the services listed in RCW 18.20.030(5) or requires licensure as an assisted living facility when one or more of the services listed in RCW 18.20.030(5) are provided to nonresidents. A nonresident individual may not receive domiciliary care, as defined in this chapter, directly or indirectly by the assisted living facility and may not receive the items and services listed in subsection (6) of this section, except during the time the person is receiving adult day services as defined in this section.

(9) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor thereof.

(10) "Resident" means an individual who is not related by blood or marriage to the operator of the assisted living facility, and by reason of age or disability, chooses to reside in the assisted living facility and receives basic services and one or more of the services listed under general responsibility for the safety and well-being of the resident and may receive domiciliary care or respite care provided directly or indirectly by the assisted living facility and shall be permitted to receive hospice care through an outside service provider when arranged by the resident or the resident's legal representative under RCW 18.20.380.

(11) "Resident applicant" means an individual who is seeking admission to a licensed assisted living facility and who has completed and signed an application for admission, or such application for admission has been completed and signed in their behalf by their legal representative if any, and if not, then the designated representative if any.

(12) "Resident's representative" means a person designated voluntarily by a competent resident, in writing, to act in the resident's behalf concerning the care and services provided by the assisted living facility and to receive information from the assisted living facility, if there is no legal representative. The resident's competence shall be determined using the criteria in ((RCW 11.88.010(1)(e)))chapter 11.130 RCW. The resident's representative may not be affiliated with the licensee, assisted living facility, or management company, unless the affiliated person is a family member of the resident. The resident's representative shall not have authority to act on behalf of the resident once the resident is no longer competent.

(13) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

Sec. 727. RCW 25.15.131 and 2015 c 188 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is dissociated as a member of a limited liability company upon the occurrence of one or more of the following events:

(a) The member dies or withdraws by voluntary act from the limited liability company as provided in subsection (2) of this section;

(b) The transfer of all of the member's transferable interest in the limited liability company;

(c) The member is removed as a member in accordance with the limited liability company agreement;

(d) The occurrence of an event upon which the member ceases to be a member under the limited liability company agreement;

(e) The person is a corporation, limited liability company, general partnership, or limited partnership, and the person is removed as a member by the unanimous consent of the other members, which may be done under this subsection (1)(e) only if:

(i) The person has filed articles of dissolution, a certificate of dissolution or the equivalent, or the person has been administratively or judicially dissolved, or its right to conduct business has been suspended or revoked by the jurisdiction of its incorporation, or the person has otherwise been dissolved; and

(ii) The dissolution has not been revoked or the person or its right to conduct business has not been reinstated within ninety days after the limited liability company notifies the person that it will be removed as a member for any reason identified in (e)(i) of this subsection;

(f) Unless all other members otherwise agree at the time, the member (i) makes a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; (ii) files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy; (iii) becomes the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy proceedings; (iv) files a petition or answer seeking for the member any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation; (v) files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegations of a petition filed against the member in any proceeding of the nature described in (f)(i) through (iv) of this subsection; or (vi) seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the member or of all or any substantial part of the member's properties;

(g) Unless all other members otherwise agree at the time, if within one hundred twenty days after the commencement of any proceeding against the member seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation, the proceeding has not been dismissed, or if within ninety days after the appointment without his or her consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the member or of all or any substantial part of the member's properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed, or within ninety days after the expiration of any stay, the appointment is not vacated; or

(h) Unless all other members otherwise agree at the time, in the case of a member who is an individual, the entry of an order by a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicating the member incapacitated, as used and defined under chapter ((11.88))11.130 RCW, as to his or her estate.

(2) A member may withdraw from a limited liability company at the time or upon the happening of events specified in and in accordance with the limited liability company agreement. If the limited liability company agreement does not specify the time or the events upon the happening of which a member may withdraw, a member may not withdraw from the limited liability company without the written consent of all other members.

(3) When a person is dissociated as a member of a limited liability company:

(a) The person's right to participate as a member in the management and conduct of the limited liability company's activities terminates;

(b) If the limited liability company is member-managed, the person's fiduciary duties as a member end with regard to matters arising and events occurring after the person's dissociation; and

(c) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, any transferable interest owned by the person immediately before dissociation in the person's capacity as a member is owned by the person solely as a transferee.

(4) A person's dissociation as a member of a limited liability company does not of itself discharge the person from any debt, obligation, or other liability to the limited liability company or the other members which the person incurred while a member.

(5) If a member dies, the deceased member's personal representative or other legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee provided in RCW 25.15.251 and, for the purposes of settling the estate, the rights of a current member under RCW 25.15.136.

Sec. 728. RCW 29A.08.515 and 2004 c 267 s 125 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receiving official notice that a court has imposed a guardianship for an incapacitated person and has determined that the person is incompetent for the purpose of rationally exercising the right to vote, under chapter ((11.88))11.130 RCW, if the incapacitated person is a registered voter in the county, the county auditor shall cancel the incapacitated person's voter registration.

Sec. 729. RCW 70.58A.010 and 2019 c 148 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adult" means a person who is at least eighteen years of age, or an emancipated minor under chapter 13.64 RCW.

(2) "Amendment" means a change to a certification item on the vital record.

(3) "Authorized representative" means a person permitted to receive a certification who is:

(a) Identified in a notarized statement signed by a qualified applicant; or

(b) An agent identified in a power of attorney as defined in chapter 11.125 RCW.

(4) "Certification" means the document, in either paper or electronic format, containing all or part of the information contained in the original vital record from which the document is derived, and is issued from the central vital records system. A certification includes an attestation by the state or local registrar to the accuracy of information, and has the full force and effect of the original vital record.

(5) "Certification item" means any item of information that appears on certifications.

(6) "Coroner" means the person elected or appointed in a county under chapter 36.16 RCW to serve as the county coroner and fulfill the responsibilities established under chapter 36.24 RCW.

(7) "Cremated remains" has the same meaning as "cremated human remains" in chapter 68.04 RCW.

(8) "Delayed report of live birth" means the report submitted to the department for the purpose of registering the live birth of a person born in state that was not registered within one year of the date of live birth.

(9) "Department" means the department of health.

(10) "Domestic partner" means a party to a state registered domestic partnership established under chapter 26.60 RCW.

(11) "Facility" means any licensed establishment, public or private, located in state, which provides inpatient or outpatient medical, surgical, or diagnostic care or treatment; or nursing, custodial, or domiciliary care. The term also includes establishments to which persons are committed by law including, but not limited to:

(a) Mental illness detention facilities designated to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals detained or committed, under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(b) City and county jails;

(c) State department of corrections facilities; and

(d) Juvenile correction centers governed by Title 72 RCW.

(12) "Fetal death" means any product of conception that shows no evidence of life, such as breathing, beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles after complete expulsion or extraction from the individual who gave birth that is not an induced termination of pregnancy and:

(a) Has completed twenty or more weeks of gestation as calculated from the date the last menstrual period of the individual who gave birth began, to the date of expulsion or extraction; or

(b) Weighs three hundred fifty grams or more, if weeks of gestation are not known.

(13) "Final disposition" means the burial, interment, entombment, cremation, removal from the state, or other manner of disposing of human remains as authorized under chapter 68.50 RCW.

(14) "Funeral director" means a person licensed under chapter 18.39 RCW as a funeral director.

(15) "Funeral establishment" means a place of business licensed under chapter 18.39 RCW as a funeral establishment.

(16) "Government agencies" include state boards, commissions, committees, departments, educational institutions, or other state agencies which are created by or pursuant to statute, other than courts and the legislature; county or city agencies, United States federal agencies, and federally recognized tribes and tribal organizations.

(17) "Human remains" means the body of a deceased person, includes the body in any stage of decomposition, and includes cremated human remains, but does not include human remains that are or were at any time under the jurisdiction of the state physical anthropologist under chapter 27.44 RCW.

(18) "Individual" means a natural person.

(19) "Induced termination of pregnancy" means the purposeful interruption of an intrauterine pregnancy with an intention other than to produce a live-born infant, and which does not result in a live birth.

(20) "Informational copy" means a birth or death record issued from the central vital records system, containing all or part of the information contained in the original vital record from which the document is derived, and indicating it cannot be used for legal purposes on its face.

(21) "Legal guardian" means a person who serves as a guardian for the purpose of either legal or custodial matters, or both, relating to the person for whom the guardian is appointed. The term legal guardian includes, but is not limited to, guardians appointed pursuant to chapters ((11.88))11.130 and 13.36 RCW.

(22) "Legal representative" means a licensed attorney representing either the subject of the record or qualified applicant.

(23) "Live birth" means the complete expulsion or extraction of a product of human conception from the individual who gave birth, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, which, after such expulsion or extraction, breathes or shows any other evidence of life, such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles.

(24) "Local health officer" has the same meaning as in chapter 70.05 RCW.

(25) "Medical certifier" for a death or fetal death means an individual required to attest to the cause of death information provided on a report of death or fetal death. Each individual certifying cause of death or fetal death may certify cause of death only as permitted by that individual's professional scope of practice. These individuals include:

(a) A physician, physician's assistant, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner last in attendance at death or who treated the decedent through examination, medical advice, or medications within the twelve months preceding the death;

(b) A midwife, only in cases of fetal death; and

(c) A physician performing an autopsy, when the decedent was not treated within the last twelve months and the person died a natural death.

(26) "Medical examiner" means the person appointed under chapter 36.24 RCW to fulfill the responsibilities established under chapter 36.24 RCW.

(27) "Midwife" means a person licensed to practice midwifery pursuant to chapter 18.50 RCW.

(28) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine, naturopathy, or osteopathy pursuant to Title 18 RCW.

(29) "Registration" or "register" means the process by which a report is approved and incorporated as a vital record into the vital records system.

(30) "Registration date" means the month, day, and year a report is incorporated into the vital records system.

(31) "Report" means an electronic or paper document containing information related to a vital life event for the purpose of registering the vital life event.

(32) "Sealed record" means the original record of a vital life event and the evidence submitted to support a change to the original record.

(33) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(34) "State" means Washington state unless otherwise specified.

(35) "State registrar" means the person appointed by the secretary to administer the vital records system under RCW 70.58A.030.

(36) "Territory of the United States" means American Samoa, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, and the United States Virgin Islands.

(37) "Vital life event" means a birth, death, fetal death, marriage, dissolution of marriage, dissolution of domestic partnership, declaration of invalidity of marriage, declaration of invalidity of domestic partnership, and legal separation.

(38) "Vital record" or "record" means a report of a vital life event that has been registered and supporting documentation.

(39) "Vital records system" means the statewide system created, operated, and maintained by the department under this chapter.

(40) "Vital statistics" means the aggregated data derived from vital records, including related reports, and supporting documentation.

Sec. 730. RCW 70.97.040 and 2013 c 23 s 179 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person who is a resident of an enhanced services facility shall be entitled to all the rights set forth in this chapter, and chapters 71.05 and 70.96A RCW, and shall retain all rights not denied him or her under these chapters.

(b) No person shall be presumed incompetent as a consequence of receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a mental disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or both, under this chapter, or chapter 71.05 or 70.96A RCW, or any prior laws of this state dealing with mental illness. Competency shall not be determined or withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.77 or ((11.88))11.130 RCW.

(c) At the time of his or her treatment planning meeting, every resident of an enhanced services facility shall be given a written statement setting forth the substance of this section. The department shall by rule develop a statement and process for informing residents of their rights in a manner that is likely to be understood by the resident.

(2) Every resident of an enhanced services facility shall have the right to adequate care and individualized treatment.

(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to deny to any person treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination.

(4) Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter shall be given a reasonable choice of an available physician or other professional person qualified to provide such services.

(5) The physician-patient privilege or the psychologist-client privilege shall be deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to other proceedings under chapter 10.77, 70.96A, or 71.05 RCW, the privileges shall be waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or the public.

(6) Insofar as danger to the person or others is not created, each resident of an enhanced services facility shall have, in addition to other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights, a list of which shall be prominently posted in all facilities, institutions, and hospitals providing such services:

(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;

(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;

(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her private use;

(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;

(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls, consistent with an effective treatment program;

(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;

(g) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to RCW 71.05.215 or 71.05.217, or the performance of electroconvulsant therapy, or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, unless ordered by a court under RCW 71.05.217;

(h) To discuss and actively participate in treatment plans and decisions with professional persons;

(i) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances;

(j) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to that particular issue; and

(k) To complain about rights violations or conditions and request the assistance of a mental health ombuds or representative of Washington protection and advocacy. The facility may not prohibit or interfere with a resident's decision to consult with an advocate of his or her choice.

(7) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit a resident from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.

(8) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and sentence or active supervision by the department of corrections.

(9) A person has a right to refuse placement, except where subject to commitment, in an enhanced services facility. No person shall be denied other department services solely on the grounds that he or she has made such a refusal.

(10) A person has a right to appeal the decision of the department that he or she is eligible for placement at an enhanced services facility, and shall be given notice of the right to appeal in a format that is accessible to the person with instructions regarding what to do if the person wants to appeal.

Sec. 731. RCW 71.05.360 and 2019 c 446 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under the provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to all the rights set forth in this chapter, which shall be prominently posted in the facility, and shall retain all rights not denied him or her under this chapter except as chapter 9.41 RCW may limit the right of a person to purchase or possess a firearm or to qualify for a concealed pistol license if the person is committed under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320 for mental health treatment.

(b) No person shall be presumed incompetent as a consequence of receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a mental disorder or substance use disorder, under this chapter or any prior laws of this state dealing with mental illness or substance use disorders. Competency shall not be determined or withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.77 or ((11.88))11.130 RCW.

(c) Any person who leaves a public or private agency following evaluation or treatment for a mental disorder or substance use disorder shall be given a written statement setting forth the substance of this section.

(2) Each person involuntarily detained or committed pursuant to this chapter shall have the right to adequate care and individualized treatment.

(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to deny to any person treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination.

(4) Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter shall be given a reasonable choice of an available physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other professional person qualified to provide such services.

(5) Whenever any person is detained for evaluation and treatment pursuant to this chapter, both the person and, if possible, a responsible member of his or her immediate family, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be advised as soon as possible in writing or orally, by the officer or person taking him or her into custody or by personnel of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program where the person is detained that unless the person is released or voluntarily admits himself or herself for treatment within seventy-two hours of the initial detention:

(a) A judicial hearing in a superior court, either by a judge or court commissioner thereof, shall be held not more than seventy-two hours after the initial detention to determine whether there is probable cause to detain the person after the seventy-two hours have expired for up to an additional fourteen days without further automatic hearing for the reason that the person is a person whose mental disorder or substance use disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or that the person is gravely disabled;

(b) The person has a right to communicate immediately with an attorney; has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or her before and at the probable cause hearing if he or she is indigent; and has the right to be told the name and address of the attorney that the mental health professional has designated pursuant to this chapter;

(c) The person has the right to remain silent and that any statement he or she makes may be used against him or her;

(d) The person has the right to present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her at the probable cause hearing; and

(e) The person has the right to refuse psychiatric medications, including antipsychotic medication beginning twenty-four hours prior to the probable cause hearing.

(6) When proceedings are initiated under RCW 71.05.153, no later than twelve hours after such person is admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program the personnel of the facility or the designated crisis responder shall serve on such person a copy of the petition for initial detention and the name, business address, and phone number of the designated attorney and shall forthwith commence service of a copy of the petition for initial detention on the designated attorney.

(7) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this section is hereby authorized, and shall be held according to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by the supreme court.

(8) At the probable cause hearing the detained person shall have the following rights in addition to the rights previously specified:

(a) To present evidence on his or her behalf;

(b) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;

(c) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;

(d) To remain silent;

(e) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file.

(9) Privileges between patients and physicians, physician assistants, psychologists, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners are deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges shall be waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or the public.

The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.

The record maker shall not be required to testify in order to introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions of the record which contain opinions as to the detained person's mental state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such conclusions is available for cross-examination.

(10) Insofar as danger to the person or others is not created, each person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights:

(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;

(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;

(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her private use;

(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;

(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls, consistent with an effective treatment program;

(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;

(g) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional persons;

(h) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications and not to thereafter be administered antipsychotic medications unless ordered by a court under RCW 71.05.217 or pursuant to an administrative hearing under RCW 71.05.215;

(i) Not to consent to the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, unless ordered by a court under RCW 71.05.217;

(j) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances;

(k) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to that particular issue.

(11) Every person involuntarily detained shall immediately be informed of his or her right to a hearing to review the legality of his or her detention and of his or her right to counsel, by the professional person in charge of the facility providing evaluation and treatment, or his or her designee, and, when appropriate, by the court. If the person so elects, the court shall immediately appoint an attorney to assist him or her.

(12) A person challenging his or her detention or his or her attorney shall have the right to designate and have the court appoint a reasonably available independent physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other professional person to examine the person detained, the results of which examination may be used in the proceeding. The person shall, if he or she is financially able, bear the cost of such expert examination, otherwise such expert examination shall be at public expense.

(13) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the patient from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.

(14) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person committed on or prior to January 1, 1974, from exercising a right available to him or her at or prior to January 1, 1974, for obtaining release from confinement.

(15) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and sentence or an active condition of supervision by the department of corrections.

Sec. 732. RCW 71.32.020 and 2016 c 209 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adult" means any individual who has attained the age of majority or is an emancipated minor.

(2) "Agent" has the same meaning as an attorney-in-fact or agent as provided in chapter 11.125 RCW.

(3) "Capacity" means that an adult has not been found to be incapacitated pursuant to this chapter or ((RCW 11.88.010(1)(e)))chapter 11.130 RCW.

(4) "Court" means a superior court under chapter 2.08 RCW.

(5) "Health care facility" means a hospital, as defined in RCW 70.41.020; an institution, as defined in RCW 71.12.455; a state hospital, as defined in RCW 72.23.010; a nursing home, as defined in RCW 18.51.010; or a clinic that is part of a community mental health service delivery system, as defined in RCW 71.24.025.

(6) "Health care provider" means an osteopathic physician or osteopathic physician's assistant licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.57A RCW, a physician or physician's assistant licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.71A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under RCW 18.79.050.

(7) "Incapacitated" means an adult who: (a) Is unable to understand the nature, character, and anticipated results of proposed treatment or alternatives; understand the recognized serious possible risks, complications, and anticipated benefits in treatments and alternatives, including nontreatment; or communicate his or her understanding or treatment decisions; or (b) has been found to be incompetent pursuant to ((RCW 11.88.010(1)(e)))chapter 11.130 RCW.

(8) "Informed consent" means consent that is given after the person: (a) Is provided with a description of the nature, character, and anticipated results of proposed treatments and alternatives, and the recognized serious possible risks, complications, and anticipated benefits in the treatments and alternatives, including nontreatment, in language that the person can reasonably be expected to understand; or (b) elects not to be given the information included in (a) of this subsection.

(9) "Long-term care facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 43.190.020.

(10) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions.

(11) "Mental health advance directive" or "directive" means a written document in which the principal makes a declaration of instructions or preferences or appoints an agent to make decisions on behalf of the principal regarding the principal's mental health treatment, or both, and that is consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(12) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW.

(13) "Principal" means an adult who has executed a mental health advance directive.

(14) "Professional person" means a mental health professional and shall also mean a physician, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW.

(15) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

Sec. 733. RCW 71A.16.030 and 1998 c 216 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The department will develop an outreach program to ensure that any eligible person with developmental disabilities services in homes, the community, and residential habilitation centers will be made aware of these services. This subsection (1) expires June 30, 2003.

(2))) The secretary shall establish a single procedure for persons to apply for a determination of eligibility for services provided to persons with developmental disabilities.

(((3) Until June 30, 2003, the procedure set out under subsection (1) of this section must require that all applicants and all persons with developmental disabilities currently receiving services from the division of developmental disabilities within the department be given notice of the existence and availability of residential habilitation center and community support services. For genuine choice to exist, people must know what the options are. Available options must be clearly explained, with services customized to fit the unique needs and circumstances of developmentally disabled clients and their families. Choice of providers and design of services and supports will be determined by the individual in conjunction with the department. When the person cannot make these choices, the person's legal guardian may make them, consistent with chapter 11.88 or 11.92 RCW. This subsection expires June 30, 2003.

(4)))(2) An application may be submitted by a person with a developmental disability, by the legal representative of a person with a developmental disability, or by any other person who is authorized by rule of the secretary to submit an application.

Sec. 734. RCW 73.36.050 and 1994 c 147 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A petition for the appointment of a guardian may be filed by any relative or friend of the ward or by any person who is authorized by law to file such a petition. If there is no person so authorized or if the person so authorized refuses or fails to file such a petition within thirty days after mailing of notice by the veterans administration to the last known address of the person, if any, indicating the necessity for the same, a petition for appointment may be filed by any resident of this state.

(2) The petition for appointment shall set forth the name, age, place of residence of the ward, the name and place of residence of the nearest relative, if known, and the fact that the ward is entitled to receive benefits payable by or through the veterans administration and shall set forth the amount of moneys then due and the amount of probable future payments.

(3) The petition shall also set forth the name and address of the person or institution, if any, having actual custody of the ward and the name, age, relationship, if any, occupation and address of the proposed guardian and if the nominee is a natural person, the number of wards for whom the nominee is presently acting as guardian. Notwithstanding any law as to priority of persons entitled to appointment, or the nomination in the petition, the court may appoint some other individual or a bank or trust company as guardian, if the court determines it is for the best interest of the ward.

(4) In the case of a mentally incompetent ward the petition shall show that such ward has been rated incompetent by the veterans administration on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the veterans administration.

(5) All proceedings under this chapter shall be governed by the provisions of ((chapters 11.88 and 11.92))chapter 11.130 RCW which shall prevail over any conflicting provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 735. RCW 74.34.020 and 2019 c 325 s 5030 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing, shelter, or health care.

(2) "Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse, and personal exploitation of a vulnerable adult, and improper use of restraint against a vulnerable adult which have the following meanings:

(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual conduct, including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape, sodomy, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual harassment. Sexual abuse also includes any sexual conduct between a staff person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is consensual.

(b) "Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching, choking, kicking, shoving, or prodding.

(c) "Mental abuse" means a willful verbal or nonverbal action that threatens, humiliates, harasses, coerces, intimidates, isolates, unreasonably confines, or punishes a vulnerable adult. Mental abuse may include ridiculing, yelling, or swearing.

(d) "Personal exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of another.

(e) "Improper use of restraint" means the inappropriate use of chemical, physical, or mechanical restraints for convenience or discipline or in a manner that: (i) Is inconsistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW; (ii) is not medically authorized; or (iii) otherwise constitutes abuse under this section.

(3) "Chemical restraint" means the administration of any drug to manage a vulnerable adult's behavior in a way that reduces the safety risk to the vulnerable adult or others, has the temporary effect of restricting the vulnerable adult's freedom of movement, and is not standard treatment for the vulnerable adult's medical or psychiatric condition.

(4) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the receipt of services is voluntary.

(5) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(6) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, assisted living facilities; chapter 18.51 RCW, nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36 RCW, soldiers' homes; chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation centers; or any other facility licensed or certified by the department.

(7) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use, control over, or withholding of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult by any person or entity for any person's or entity's profit or advantage other than for the vulnerable adult's profit or advantage. "Financial exploitation" includes, but is not limited to:

(a) The use of deception, intimidation, or undue influence by a person or entity in a position of trust and confidence with a vulnerable adult to obtain or use the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult;

(b) The breach of a fiduciary duty, including, but not limited to, the misuse of a power of attorney, trust, or a guardianship appointment, that results in the unauthorized appropriation, sale, or transfer of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult; or

(c) Obtaining or using a vulnerable adult's property, income, resources, or trust funds without lawful authority, by a person or entity who knows or clearly should know that the vulnerable adult lacks the capacity to consent to the release or use of his or her property, income, resources, or trust funds.

(8) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 30A.22.040 and 30A.22.041. For purposes of this chapter only, "financial institution" also means a "broker-dealer" or "investment adviser" as defined in RCW 21.20.005.

(9) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW or a state hospital defined in chapter 72.23 RCW and any employee, agent, officer, director, or independent contractor thereof.

(10) "Incapacitated person" means a person who is at a significant risk of personal or financial harm under ((RCW 11.88.010(1) (a), (b), (c), or (d)))chapter 11.130 RCW.

(11) "Individual provider" means a person under contract with the department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or 74.39A RCW.

(12) "Interested person" means a person who demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the person is interested in the welfare of the vulnerable adult, that the person has a good faith belief that the court's intervention is necessary, and that the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress at the time the petition is filed, to protect his or her own interests.

(13)(a) "Isolate" or "isolation" means to restrict a vulnerable adult's ability to communicate, visit, interact, or otherwise associate with persons of his or her choosing. Isolation may be evidenced by acts including but not limited to:

(i) Acts that prevent a vulnerable adult from sending, making, or receiving his or her personal mail, electronic communications, or telephone calls; or

(ii) Acts that prevent or obstruct the vulnerable adult from meeting with others, such as telling a prospective visitor or caller that a vulnerable adult is not present, or does not wish contact, where the statement is contrary to the express wishes of the vulnerable adult.

(b) The term "isolate" or "isolation" may not be construed in a manner that prevents a guardian or limited guardian from performing his or her fiduciary obligations under chapter ((11.92))11.130 RCW or prevents a hospital or facility from providing treatment consistent with the standard of care for delivery of health services.

(14) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department; law enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel; individual provider; an employee of a facility; an operator of a facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health, adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, or hospice agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.

(15) "Mechanical restraint" means any device attached or adjacent to the vulnerable adult's body that he or she cannot easily remove that restricts freedom of movement or normal access to his or her body. "Mechanical restraint" does not include the use of devices, materials, or equipment that are (a) medically authorized, as required, and (b) used in a manner that is consistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW.

(16) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the goods and services that maintain physical or mental health of a vulnerable adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm or pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission by a person or entity with a duty of care that demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's health, welfare, or safety, including but not limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100.

(17) "Permissive reporter" means any person, including, but not limited to, an employee of a financial institution, attorney, or volunteer in a facility or program providing services for vulnerable adults.

(18) "Physical restraint" means the application of physical force without the use of any device, for the purpose of restraining the free movement of a vulnerable adult's body. "Physical restraint" does not include (a) briefly holding without undue force a vulnerable adult in order to calm or comfort him or her, or (b) holding a vulnerable adult's hand to safely escort him or her from one area to another.

(19) "Protective services" means any services provided by the department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral for legal assistance.

(20) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable adult, not living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the goods and services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or mental health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the vulnerable adult's well-being. This definition may include a vulnerable adult who is receiving services through home health, hospice, or a home care agency, or an individual provider when the neglect is not a result of inaction by that agency or individual provider.

(21) "Social worker" means:

(a) A social worker as defined in RCW 18.320.010(2); or

(b) Anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of vulnerable adults, or providing social services to vulnerable adults, whether in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(22) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:

(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself; or

(b) Found incapacitated under chapter ((11.88))11.130 RCW; or

(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW 71A.10.020; or

(d) Admitted to any facility; or

(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; or

(f) Receiving services from an individual provider; or

(g) Who self-directs his or her own care and receives services from a personal aide under chapter 74.39 RCW.

(23) "Vulnerable adult advocacy team" means a team of three or more persons who coordinate a multidisciplinary process, in compliance with chapter 266, Laws of 2017 and the protocol governed by RCW 74.34.320, for preventing, identifying, investigating, prosecuting, and providing services related to abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of vulnerable adults.

Sec. 736. RCW 74.34.067 and 2013 c 263 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Where appropriate, an investigation by the department may include a private interview with the vulnerable adult regarding the alleged abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect.

(2) In conducting the investigation, the department shall interview the complainant, unless anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to interview the vulnerable adult or adults harmed, and, consistent with the protection of the vulnerable adult shall interview facility staff, any available independent sources of relevant information, including if appropriate the family members of the vulnerable adult.

(3) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and consultation with: (a) Those persons or agencies required to report under this chapter or submit a report under this chapter; (b) consultants designated by the department; and (c) designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if client information exchanged is pertinent to cases under investigation or the provision of protective services. Information considered privileged by statute and not directly related to reports required by this chapter must not be divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.

(4) The department shall prepare and keep on file a report of each investigation conducted by the department for a period of time in accordance with policies established by the department.

(5) If the department has reason to believe that the vulnerable adult has suffered from abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect, and lacks the ability or capacity to consent, and needs the protection of a guardian, the department may bring a guardianship action under chapter ((11.88))11.130 RCW.

(6) For purposes consistent with this chapter, the department, the certified professional guardian board, and the office of public guardianship may share information contained in reports and investigations of the abuse, abandonment, neglect, self-neglect, and financial exploitation of vulnerable adults. This information may be used solely for (a) recruiting or appointing appropriate guardians and (b) monitoring, or when appropriate, disciplining certified professional or public guardians. Reports of abuse, abandonment, neglect, self-neglect, and financial exploitation are confidential under RCW 74.34.095 and other laws, and secondary disclosure of information shared under this section is prohibited.

(7) When the investigation is completed and the department determines that an incident of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect has occurred, the department shall inform the vulnerable adult of their right to refuse protective services, and ensure that, if necessary, appropriate protective services are provided to the vulnerable adult, with the consent of the vulnerable adult. The vulnerable adult has the right to withdraw or refuse protective services.

(8) The department's adult protective services division may enter into agreements with federally recognized tribes to investigate reports of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect of vulnerable adults on property over which a federally recognized tribe has exclusive jurisdiction. If the department has information that abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect is criminal or is placing a vulnerable adult on tribal property at potential risk of personal or financial harm, the department may notify tribal law enforcement or another tribal representative specified by the tribe. Upon receipt of the notification, the tribe may assume jurisdiction of the matter. Neither the department nor its employees may participate in the investigation after the tribe assumes jurisdiction. The department, its officers, and its employees are not liable for any action or inaction of the tribe or for any harm to the alleged victim, the person against whom the allegations were made, or other parties that occurs after the tribe assumes jurisdiction. Nothing in this section limits the department's jurisdiction and authority over facilities or entities that the department licenses or certifies under federal or state law.

(9) The department may photograph a vulnerable adult or their environment for the purpose of providing documentary evidence of the physical condition of the vulnerable adult or his or her environment. When photographing the vulnerable adult, the department shall obtain permission from the vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative unless immediate photographing is necessary to preserve evidence. However, if the legal representative is alleged to have abused, neglected, abandoned, or exploited the vulnerable adult, consent from the legal representative is not necessary. No such consent is necessary when photographing the physical environment.

(10) When the investigation is complete and the department determines that the incident of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect has occurred, the department shall inform the facility in which the incident occurred, consistent with confidentiality requirements concerning the vulnerable adult, witnesses, and complainants.

Sec. 737. RCW 74.34.135 and 2007 c 312 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a petition for protection under RCW 74.34.110 is filed by someone other than the vulnerable adult or the vulnerable adult's full guardian over either the person or the estate, or both, and the vulnerable adult for whom protection is sought advises the court at the hearing that he or she does not want all or part of the protection sought in the petition, then the court may dismiss the petition or the provisions that the vulnerable adult objects to and any protection order issued under RCW 74.34.120 or 74.34.130, or the court may take additional testimony or evidence, or order additional evidentiary hearings to determine whether the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress, to protect his or her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the petition or order. If an additional evidentiary hearing is ordered and the court determines that there is reason to believe that there is a genuine issue about whether the vulnerable adult is unable to protect his or her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the petition or order, the court may issue a temporary order for protection of the vulnerable adult pending a decision after the evidentiary hearing.

(2) An evidentiary hearing on the issue of whether the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress, to protect his or her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the petition or order, shall be held within fourteen days of entry of the temporary order for protection under subsection (1) of this section. If the court did not enter a temporary order for protection, the evidentiary hearing shall be held within fourteen days of the prior hearing on the petition. Notice of the time and place of the evidentiary hearing shall be personally served upon the vulnerable adult and the respondent not less than six court days before the hearing. When good faith attempts to personally serve the vulnerable adult and the respondent have been unsuccessful, the court shall permit service by mail, or by publication if the court determines that personal service and service by mail cannot be obtained. If timely service cannot be made, the court may set a new hearing date. A hearing under this subsection is not necessary if the vulnerable adult has been determined to be fully incapacitated over either the person or the estate, or both, under the guardianship laws, chapter ((11.88))11.130 RCW. If a hearing is scheduled under this subsection, the protection order shall remain in effect pending the court's decision at the subsequent hearing.

(3) At the hearing scheduled by the court, the court shall give the vulnerable adult, the respondent, the petitioner, and in the court's discretion other interested persons, the opportunity to testify and submit relevant evidence.

(4) If the court determines that the vulnerable adult is capable of protecting his or her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the petition, and the individual continues to object to the protection order, the court shall dismiss the order or may modify the order if agreed to by the vulnerable adult. If the court determines that the vulnerable adult is not capable of protecting his or her person or estate in connection with the issues raised in the petition or order, and that the individual continues to need protection, the court shall order relief consistent with RCW 74.34.130 as it deems necessary for the protection of the vulnerable adult. In the entry of any order that is inconsistent with the expressed wishes of the vulnerable adult, the court's order shall be governed by the legislative findings contained in RCW 74.34.005.

Sec. 738. RCW 74.34.163 and 2007 c 312 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Any vulnerable adult who has not been adjudicated fully incapacitated under chapter ((11.88))11.130 RCW, or the vulnerable adult's guardian, at any time subsequent to entry of a permanent protection order under this chapter, may apply to the court for an order to modify or vacate the order. In a hearing on an application to dismiss or modify the protection order, the court shall grant such relief consistent with RCW 74.34.110 as it deems necessary for the protection of the vulnerable adult, including dismissal or modification of the protection order.

Sec. 739. RCW 74.42.430 and 1980 c 184 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The facility shall develop written guidelines governing:

(1) All services provided by the facility;

(2) Admission, transfer or discharge;

(3) The use of chemical and physical restraints, the personnel authorized to administer restraints in an emergency, and procedures for monitoring and controlling the use of the restraints;

(4) Procedures for receiving and responding to residents' complaints and recommendations;

(5) Access to, duplication of, and dissemination of information from the resident's record;

(6) Residents' rights, privileges, and duties;

(7) Procedures if the resident is adjudicated incompetent or incapable of understanding his or her rights and responsibilities;

(8) When to recommend initiation of guardianship proceedings under chapter ((11.88))11.130 RCW; ((and))

(9) Emergencies;

(10) Procedures for isolation of residents with infectious diseases; and

(11) Procedures for residents to refuse treatment and for the facility to document informed refusal.

The written guidelines shall be made available to the staff, residents, members of residents' families, and the public.

PART VIII

INTENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. A new section is added to chapter 11.130 RCW to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature to protect the liberty and autonomy of all people of this state, and to enable them to exercise their rights under the law to the maximum extent, consistent with the capacity of each person. The legislature recognizes that people with incapacities have unique abilities and needs, and that some people with incapacities cannot exercise their rights or provide for their basic needs without the help of a guardian. However, their liberty and autonomy should be restricted through guardianship, conservatorship, emergency guardianship, emergency conservatorship, and other protective arrangements only to the minimum extent necessary to adequately provide for their own health or safety, or to adequately manage their financial affairs.

PART IX

TECHNICAL

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. Sections 601 through 612 of this act are each added to chapter 11.130 RCW.

Sec. 902. RCW 11.130.915 and 2019 c 437 s 807 are each amended to read as follows:

This act takes effect January 1, ((2021))2022, except that:

(1) Section 129, chapter 437, Laws of 2019 takes effect on the effective date of this section; and

(2) Sections 101 through 128, 130 through 136, 201 through 216, 602, 802, 803, and 805, chapter 437, Laws of 2019 take effect January 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903. 2019 c 437 s 801 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 11.88.005 (Legislative intent) and 1990 c 122 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 1, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 1;

(2) RCW 11.88.008 ("Professional guardian" defined) and 1997 c 312 s 2;

(3) RCW 11.88.010 (Authority to appoint guardians—Definitions—Venue—Nomination by principal) and 2016 c 209 s 403, 2008 c 6 s 802, 2005 c 236 s 3, (2005 c 236 s 2 expired January 1, 2006), 2004 c 267 s 139, 1991 c 289 s 1, 1990 c 122 s 2, 1984 c 149 s 176, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 2, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.010;

(4) RCW 11.88.020 (Qualifications) and 2011 c 329 s 1, 1997 c 312 s 1, 1990 c 122 s 3, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 3, 1971 c 28 s 4, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.020;

(5) RCW 11.88.030 (Petition—Contents—Hearing) and 2011 c 329 s 2, 2009 c 521 s 36, 1996 c 249 s 8, 1995 c 297 s 1, 1991 c 289 s 2, 1990 c 122 s 4, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 3, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 4, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.030;

(6) RCW 11.88.040 (Notice and hearing, when required—Service—Procedure) and 2008 c 6 s 803, 1995 c 297 s 2, 1991 c 289 s 3, 1990 c 122 s 5, 1984 c 149 s 177, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 4, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 5, 1969 c 70 s 1, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.040;

(7) RCW 11.88.045 (Legal counsel and jury trial—Proof—Medical report—Examinations—Waiver) and 2001 c 148 s 1, 1996 c 249 s 9, 1995 c 297 s 3, 1991 c 289 s 4, 1990 c 122 s 6, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 5, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 7;

(8) RCW 11.88.080 (Guardians nominated by will or durable power of attorney) and 2016 c 209 s 401, 2005 c 97 s 11, 1990 c 122 s 7, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.080;

(9) RCW 11.88.090 (Guardian ad litem—Mediation—Appointment—Qualifications—Notice of and statement by guardian ad litem—Hearing and notice—Attorneys' fees and costs—Registry—Duties—Report—Responses—Fee) and 2008 c 6 s 804, 2000 c 124 s 1, 1999 c 360 s 1, 1996 c 249 s 10, 1995 c 297 s 4, 1991 c 289 s 5, 1990 c 122 s 8, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 6, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 9, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.090;

(10) RCW 11.88.093 (Ex parte communications—Removal) and 2000 c 124 s 10;

(11) RCW 11.88.095 (Disposition of guardianship petition) and 2011 c 329 s 4, 1995 c 297 s 5, 1991 c 289 s 6, & 1990 c 122 s 9;

(12) RCW 11.88.097 (Guardian ad litem—Fees) and 2000 c 124 s 13;

(13) RCW 11.88.100 (Oath and bond of guardian or limited guardian) and 2010 c 8 s 2088, 1990 c 122 s 10, 1983 c 271 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 7, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 10, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.100;

(14) RCW 11.88.105 (Reduction in amount of bond) and 1990 c 122 s 11, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 11, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.105;

(15) RCW 11.88.107 (When bond not required) and 1990 c 122 s 12, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 8, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 12, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.107;

(16) RCW 11.88.110 (Law on executors' and administrators' bonds applicable) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 13 & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.110;

(17) RCW 11.88.115 (Notice to department of revenue);

(18) RCW 11.88.120 (Modification or termination of guardianship—Procedure) and 2017 c 271 s 2, 2015 c 293 s 1, 1991 c 289 s 7, 1990 c 122 s 14, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 9, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 14, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.120;

(19) RCW 11.88.125 (Standby limited guardian or limited guardian) and 2013 c 304 s 1, 2011 c 329 s 5, 2008 c 6 s 805, 1991 c 289 s 8, 1990 c 122 s 15, 1979 c 32 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 10, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 6;

(20) RCW 11.88.127 (Guardianship—Incapacitated person—Letters of guardianship) and 2011 c 329 s 6;

(21) RCW 11.88.130 (Transfer of jurisdiction and venue) and 1990 c 122 s 16, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 15, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.130;

(22) RCW 11.88.140 (Termination of guardianship or limited guardianship) and 2016 c 202 s 9, 2011 c 329 s 7, 1991 c 289 s 9, 1990 c 122 s 17, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 11, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 16, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.140;

(23) RCW 11.88.150 (Administration of deceased incapacitated person's estate) and 2010 c 8 s 2089, 1990 c 122 s 18, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 12, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 17, & 1965 c 145 s 11.88.150;

(24) RCW 11.88.160 (Guardianships involving veterans) and 1990 c 122 s 13;

(25) RCW 11.88.170 (Guardianship courthouse facilitator program) and 2015 c 295 s 1;

(26) RCW 11.88.900 (Construction—Chapter applicable to state registered domestic partnerships—2009 c 521) and 2009 c 521 s 35;

(27) RCW 11.92.010 (Guardians or limited guardians under court control—Legal age) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 18, 1971 c 28 s 5, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.010;

(28) RCW 11.92.035 (Claims) and 1990 c 122 s 19, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 19, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.035;

(29) RCW 11.92.040 (Duties of guardian or limited guardian in general) and 2011 c 329 s 9, 1991 c 289 s 10, 1990 c 122 s 20, & 1985 c 30 s 9;

(30) RCW 11.92.043 (Additional duties) and 2017 c 268 s 3, 2011 c 329 s 3, 1991 c 289 s 11, & 1990 c 122 s 21;

(31) RCW 11.92.050 (Intermediate accounts or reports—Hearing—Order) and 2011 c 329 s 10, 1995 c 297 s 6, 1990 c 122 s 23, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 21, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.050;

(32) RCW 11.92.053 (Settlement of estate upon termination) and 2011 c 329 s 8, 1995 c 297 s 7, 1990 c 122 s 24, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.053;

(33) RCW 11.92.056 (Citation of surety on bond) and 1990 c 122 s 25, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 22, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.056;

(34) RCW 11.92.060 (Guardian to represent incapacitated person—Compromise of claims—Service of process) and 1990 c 122 s 26, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 23, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.060;

(35) RCW 11.92.090 (Sale, exchange, lease, or mortgage of property) and 1990 c 122 s 27, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 24, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.090;

(36) RCW 11.92.096 (Guardian access to certain held assets) and 1991 c 289 s 13;

(37) RCW 11.92.100 (Petition—Contents) and 1990 c 122 s 28, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 25, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.100;

(38) RCW 11.92.110 (Sale of real estate) and 1990 c 122 s 29, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 26, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.110;

(39) RCW 11.92.115 (Return and confirmation of sale) and 2010 c 8 s 2090, 1990 c 122 s 30, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 27, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.115;

(40) RCW 11.92.120 (Confirmation conclusive) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 28 & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.120;

(41) RCW 11.92.125 (Broker's fee and closing expenses—Sale, exchange, mortgage, or lease of real estate) and 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 15 & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.125;

(42) RCW 11.92.130 (Performance of contracts) and 1990 c 122 s 31, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 29, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.130;

(43) RCW 11.92.140 (Court authorization for actions regarding guardianship funds) and 2008 c 6 s 807, 1999 c 42 s 616, 1991 c 193 s 32, 1990 c 122 s 32, & 1985 c 30 s 10;

(44) RCW 11.92.150 (Request for special notice of proceedings) and 1990 c 122 s 33 & 1985 c 30 s 11;

(45) RCW 11.92.160 (Citation for failure to file account or report) and 1990 c 122 s 34, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 31, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.160;

(46) RCW 11.92.170 (Removal of property of nonresident incapacitated person) and 1990 c 122 s 35, 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 16, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 32, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.170;

(47) RCW 11.92.180 (Compensation and expenses of guardian or limited guardian—Attorney's fees—Department of social and health services clients paying part of costs—Rules) and 1995 c 297 s 8, 1994 c 68 s 1, 1991 c 289 s 12, 1990 c 122 s 36, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 33, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.180;

(48) RCW 11.92.185 (Concealed or embezzled property) and 1990 c 122 s 37, 1975 1st ex.s. c 95 s 34, & 1965 c 145 s 11.92.185;

(49) RCW 11.92.190 (Detention of person in residential placement facility against will prohibited—Effect of court order—Service of notice of residential placement) and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 412, 1996 c 249 s 11, & 1977 ex.s. c 309 s 14; and

(50) RCW 11.92.195 (Incapacitated persons—Right to associate with persons of their choosing) and 2017 c 268 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 26.10.010 (Intent) and 1987 c 460 s 25;

(2) RCW 26.10.015 (Mandatory use of approved forms) and 1992 c 229 s 4 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 27;

(3) RCW 26.10.020 (Civil practice to govern—Designation of proceedings—Decrees) and 1987 c 460 s 26;

(4) RCW 26.10.030 (Child custody proceeding—Commencement—Notice—Intervention) and 2003 c 105 s 3, 2000 c 135 s 3, 1998 c 130 s 4, & 1987 c 460 s 27;

(5) RCW 26.10.032 (Child custody motion—Affidavit required—Notice—Denial of motion—Show cause hearing) and 2003 c 105 s 6;

(6) RCW 26.10.034 (Petitions—Indian child statement—Application of federal Indian child welfare act) and 2011 c 309 s 31, 2004 c 64 s 1, & 2003 c 105 s 7;

(7) RCW 26.10.040 (Provisions for child support, custody, and visitation—Federal tax exemption—Continuing restraining orders—Domestic violence or antiharassment protection orders—Notice of modification or termination of restraining order) and 2000 c 119 s 8, 1995 c 93 s 3, 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 453, 1989 c 375 s 31, & 1987 c 460 s 28;

(8) RCW 26.10.045 (Child support schedule) and 1988 c 275 s 12;

(9) RCW 26.10.050 (Child support by parents—Apportionment of expense) and 2008 c 6 s 1023 & 1987 c 460 s 29;

(10) RCW 26.10.060 (Health insurance coverage—Conditions) and 1989 c 375 s 19 & 1987 c 460 s 30;

(11) RCW 26.10.070 (Minor or dependent child—Court appointed attorney to represent—Payment of costs, fees, and disbursements) and 1989 c 375 s 20 & 1987 c 460 s 31;

(12) RCW 26.10.080 (Payment of costs, attorney's fees, etc.) and 1987 c 460 s 35;

(13) RCW 26.10.090 (Failure to comply with decree or temporary injunction—Obligation to make support payments or permit visitation not suspended—Motion) and 1987 c 460 s 36;

(14) RCW 26.10.100 (Determination of custody—Child's best interests) and 1987 c 460 s 38;

(15) RCW 26.10.110 (Temporary custody order—Vacation of order) and 1987 c 460 s 39;

(16) RCW 26.10.120 (Interview with child by court—Advice of professional personnel) and 1987 c 460 s 40;

(17) RCW 26.10.130 (Investigation and report) and 1993 c 289 s 2 & 1987 c 460 s 41;

(18) RCW 26.10.135 (Custody orders—Background information to be consulted) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 333 & 2003 c 105 s 1;

(19) RCW 26.10.140 (Hearing—Record—Expenses of witnesses) and 1987 c 460 s 42;

(20) RCW 26.10.150 (Access to child's education and medical records) and 1987 c 460 s 43;

(21) RCW 26.10.160 (Visitation rights—Limitations) and 2018 c 183 s 7, 2011 c 89 s 7, 2004 c 38 s 13, 1996 c 303 s 2, 1994 c 267 s 2, 1989 c 326 s 2, & 1987 c 460 s 44;

(22) RCW 26.10.170 (Powers and duties of custodian—Supervision by appropriate agency when necessary) and 1987 c 460 s 45;

(23) RCW 26.10.180 (Remedies when a child is taken, enticed, or concealed) and 2008 c 6 s 1024, 1989 c 375 s 21, & 1987 c 460 s 46;

(24) RCW 26.10.190 (Petitions for modification and proceedings concerning relocation of child—Assessment of attorneys' fees) and 2000 c 21 s 21, 1989 c 375 s 24, & 1987 c 460 s 47;

(25) RCW 26.10.200 (Temporary custody order or modification of custody decree—Affidavits required) and 1987 c 460 s 48;

(26) RCW 26.10.210 (Venue) and 1987 c 460 s 49;

(27) RCW 26.10.220 (Restraining orders—Notice—Refusal to comply—Arrest—Penalty—Defense—Peace officers, immunity) and 2000 c 119 s 22, 1999 c 184 s 11, 1996 c 248 s 10, 1995 c 246 s 30, & 1987 c 460 s 50; and

(28) RCW 26.10.910 (Short title—1987 c 460).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906. A new section is added to chapter 11.130 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To the extent of a conflict between this chapter and chapter 11.88 or 11.92 RCW, chapter 11.88 or 11.92 RCW prevails.

(2) This section expires January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907. (1) Except for sections 101 through 122, 301 through 307, 312, 313, 801, 902, 903, 905, and 906 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2022.

(2) Sections 101 through 122, 301 through 307, 312, 313, 801, 905, and 906 of this act take effect January 1, 2021.

--- END ---