BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:

(a) Hate crime and domestic terrorism are a growing problem both in the state of Washington and in the United States. Sadly, since 2017, there has been a forty-two percent increase in the number of reported hate crimes in Washington compared to a seventeen percent increase in the country as a whole. Not only are the number of hate crimes increasing, but the severity is increasing as well. The number of incidents that involve the use of a weapon is on the rise, as is the incidence of sustained injuries as a result of those hate crimes.

(b) Likewise we have seen an increase in the incidence of larger scale or coordinated attacks by extremists and extremist groups that can only be characterized as domestic terrorism.

(2) It is the legislature's intent to hold persons and entities accountable for materially aiding domestic terrorism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who materially aids in domestic terrorism is liable to the victim of the domestic terrorism in a civil cause of action for actual damages, punitive damages of up to one hundred thousand dollars, and reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred in bringing the action.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Domestic terrorism" means an act that is dangerous to human life, a violation of the criminal laws of this state, and intended to:

(i) Intimidate or coerce a civilian population;

(ii) Influence the policy of a government by intimidation or coercion; or

(iii) Affect the conduct of a government by mass destruction, assassination, or kidnapping.

(b) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, or other legal or commercial entity. The term does not include a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---