BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must provide persons working as early learning providers on the effective date of this section and who are required to have early childhood education initial certificates or short certificates, or both, the option to meet these requirements through their experience-based demonstrated competence.

(2) An existing early learning provider is eligible to demonstrate their competence if the provider:

(a) Has been employed by a licensed child care center or home, or both, for a total of seven years by August 1, 2024; and

(b) Completed all training that was required during the seven years including in-service requirements and health and safety training.

(3) The experience-based demonstrated competence is an individual determination and is portable between facilities.

(4) The department must review applications for the experience-based competency demonstration and inform applicants of their results on a quarterly basis.

--- END ---