BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Pursuant to chapter 43.09 RCW, the joint legislative audit and review committee must conduct a performance audit of the information technology and records related units at the department of corrections, including:

(a) The administrative structure of the units, including whether the units should be restructured to respond efficiently to changes in sentencing laws and other emergent issues;

(b) The sufficiency of staffing levels and expertise at each of the units; and

(c) An evaluation of the advance corrections project's impact on workload and staff resources at each of the units.

(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report its findings to the governor and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) Pursuant to chapter 43.09 RCW, the joint legislative audit and review committee must conduct a performance audit of the medical and health related units of the department of corrections, including:

(a) The administrative structure of the units, including whether the units should be restructured to respond efficiently to inmate health complaints;

(b) The sufficiency of staffing levels and expertise at each of the units; and

(c) Potential costs and benefits of implementing an electronic medical health records system including:

(i) Savings to staffing costs compared to the current medical records system; and

(ii) Changes to the quality and efficiency of medical care provided for inmates.

(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report its findings to the governor and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

In consultation with the administrative office of the courts, superior court judges' association, Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, Washington public defender association, and Washington association of county clerks, the department shall develop a mandatory sentencing elements worksheet. The worksheet shall be used to identify and record the elements of the court's order that are required by the department to calculate an offender's confinement term, and community custody term when ordered. The Washington administrative office of the courts must include the mandatory sentencing elements worksheet in a specific section within its felony judgment and sentence forms.

Sec. 4. RCW 72.09.010 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature to establish a comprehensive system of corrections for convicted law violators within the state of Washington to accomplish the following objectives.

(1) The ((system should))highest duty of the department and the secretary is to ensure the public safety. The system should be designed and managed to provide the maximum feasible safety for the persons and property of the general public, the staff, and the inmates.

(2) The system should punish the offender for violating the laws of the state of Washington. This punishment should generally be limited to the denial of liberty of the offender.

(3) The system should positively impact offenders by stressing personal responsibility and accountability and by discouraging recidivism.

(4) The system should treat all offenders fairly and equitably without regard to race, religion, sex, national origin, residence, or social condition.

(5) The system, as much as possible, should reflect the values of the community including:

(a) Avoiding idleness. Idleness is not only wasteful but destructive to the individual and to the community.

(b) Adoption of the work ethic. It is the community expectation that all individuals should work and through their efforts benefit both themselves and the community.

(c) Providing opportunities for self improvement. All individuals should have opportunities to grow and expand their skills and abilities so as to fulfill their role in the community.

(d) Linking the receipt or denial of privileges to responsible behavior and accomplishments. The individual who works to improve himself or herself and the community should be rewarded for these efforts. As a corollary, there should be no rewards for no effort.

(e) Sharing in the obligations of the community. All citizens, the public and inmates alike, have a personal and fiscal obligation in the corrections system. All communities must share in the responsibility of the corrections system.

(6) The system should provide for prudent management of resources. The avoidance of unnecessary or inefficient public expenditures on the part of offenders and the department is essential. Offenders must be accountable to the department, and the department to the public and the legislature. The human and fiscal resources of the community are limited. The management and use of these resources can be enhanced by wise investment, productive programs, the reduction of duplication and waste, and the joining together of all involved parties in a common endeavor. Since most offenders return to the community, it is wise for the state and the communities to make an investment in effective rehabilitation programs for offenders and the wise use of resources.

(7) The system should provide for restitution. Those who have damaged others, persons or property, have a responsibility to make restitution for these damages.

(8) The system should be accountable to the citizens of the state. In return, the individual citizens and local units of government must meet their responsibilities to make the corrections system effective.

(9) The system should meet those national standards which the state determines to be appropriate.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.480 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A current, newly created or reworked judgment and sentence document for each felony sentencing shall record any and all recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under RCW 9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of the sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in this section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing judge's reasons for going either above or below the presumptive sentence range for any and all felony crimes covered as public records under RCW 9.94A.475. In addition, each felony judgment and sentence document must contain in a specific section the mandatory sentencing elements worksheet developed by the department of corrections in section 3 of this act. Both the sentencing judge and the prosecuting attorney's office shall each retain or receive a completed copy of each sentencing document as defined in this section for their own records.

(2) The caseload forecast council shall be sent a completed copy of the judgment and sentence document upon conviction for each felony sentencing under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) If any completed judgment and sentence document as defined in subsection (1) of this section is not sent to the caseload forecast council as required in subsection (2) of this section, the caseload forecast council shall have the authority and shall undertake reasonable and necessary steps to assure that all past, current, and future sentencing documents as defined in subsection (1) of this section are received by the caseload forecast council.

Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.585 and 2002 c 290 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentence within the standard sentence range, under RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517, for an offense shall not be appealed. For purposes of this section, a sentence imposed on a first-time offender under RCW 9.94A.650 shall also be deemed to be within the standard sentence range for the offense and shall not be appealed.

(2) A sentence outside the standard sentence range for the offense is subject to appeal by the defendant or the state. The appeal shall be to the court of appeals in accordance with rules adopted by the supreme court.

(3) Pending review of the sentence, the sentencing court or the court of appeals may order the defendant confined or placed on conditional release, including bond.

(4) To reverse a sentence which is outside the standard sentence range, the reviewing court must find: (a) Either that the reasons supplied by the sentencing court are not supported by the record which was before the judge or that those reasons do not justify a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that offense; or (b) that the sentence imposed was clearly excessive or clearly too lenient.

(5) A review under this section shall be made solely upon the record that was before the sentencing court. Written briefs shall not be required and the review and decision shall be made in an expedited manner according to rules adopted by the supreme court.

(6) The court of appeals shall issue a written opinion in support of its decision whenever the judgment of the sentencing court is reversed and may issue written opinions in any other case where the court believes that a written opinion would provide guidance to sentencing courts and others in implementing this chapter and in developing a common law of sentencing within the state.

(7) The department may petition for a review of a sentence committing an offender to the custody or jurisdiction of the department. The review shall be limited to errors of law or to address a missing, incomplete, or illegible mandatory sentencing elements worksheet required pursuant to RCW 9.94A.480(1). Such petition shall be filed with the court of appeals no later than ninety days after the department has actual knowledge of terms of the sentence. The petition shall include a certification by the department that all reasonable efforts to resolve the dispute at the superior court level have been exhausted.

Sec. 7. RCW 9.94A.704 and 2016 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who is sentenced to a period of community custody shall report to and be placed under the supervision of the department, subject to RCW 9.94A.501.

(2)(a) The department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of community custody based upon the risk to community safety.

(b) Within the funds available for community custody, the department shall determine conditions on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection (2)(b).

(3) If the offender is supervised by the department, the department shall at a minimum instruct the offender to:

(a) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;

(b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries;

(c) Notify the community corrections officer of any change in the offender's address or employment;

(d) Pay the supervision fee assessment; and

(e) Disclose the fact of supervision to any mental health or chemical dependency treatment provider, as required by RCW 9.94A.722.

(4) The department may require the offender to participate in rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and to obey all laws.

(5) If the offender was sentenced pursuant to a conviction for a sex offense, the department may:

(a) Require the offender to refrain from direct or indirect contact with the victim of the crime or immediate family member of the victim of the crime. If a victim or an immediate family member of a victim has requested that the offender not contact him or her after notice as provided in RCW 72.09.340, the department shall require the offender to refrain from contact with the requestor. Where the victim is a minor, the parent or guardian of the victim may make a request on the victim's behalf. This subsection is not intended to reduce the preexisting authority of the department to impose no-contact conditions regardless of the offender's crime and regardless of who is protected by the no-contact condition, where such condition is based on risk to community safety.

(b) Impose electronic monitoring. Within the resources made available by the department for this purpose, the department shall carry out any electronic monitoring using the most appropriate technology given the individual circumstances of the offender. As used in this section, "electronic monitoring" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030.

(6) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court-imposed conditions.

(7)(a) The department shall notify the offender in writing of any additional conditions or modifications.

(b) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department. The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds that it is not reasonably related to the crime of conviction, the offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community.

(8) The department shall notify the offender in writing upon community custody intake of the department's violation process.

(9) The department may require offenders to pay for special services rendered including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and telephone reporting, dependent on the offender's ability to pay. The department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(10)(a) When an offender on community custody is under the authority of the board, the department shall assess the offender's risk of recidivism and shall recommend to the board any additional or modified conditions based upon the offender's risk to community safety and may recommend affirmative conduct or electronic monitoring consistent with subsections (4) through (6) of this section.

(b) The board may impose conditions in addition to court-ordered conditions. The board must consider and may impose department-recommended conditions. The board must impose a condition requiring the offender to refrain from contact with the victim or immediate family member of the victim as provided in subsection (5)(a) of this section.

(c) By the close of the next business day, after receiving notice of a condition imposed by the board or the department, an offender may request an administrative hearing under rules adopted by the board. The condition shall remain in effect unless the hearing examiner finds that it is not reasonably related to any of the following:

(i) The crime of conviction;

(ii) The offender's risk of reoffending;

(iii) The safety of the community.

(d) If the department finds that an emergency exists requiring the immediate imposition of additional conditions in order to prevent the offender from committing a crime, the department may impose such conditions. The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to those set by the board or the court and may not contravene or decrease court-imposed or board-imposed conditions. Conditions imposed under this subsection shall take effect immediately after notice to the offender by personal service, but shall not remain in effect longer than seven working days unless approved by the board.

(11) In setting, modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(12) The department shall make every reasonable effort and prioritize staffing to pursue active warrants of offenders who have violated the terms of their supervision.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.94A.704 and 2019 c 263 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who is sentenced to a period of community custody shall report to and be placed under the supervision of the department, subject to RCW 9.94A.501.

(2)(a) The department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of community custody based upon the risk to community safety.

(b) Within the funds available for community custody, the department shall determine conditions on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection (2)(b).

(3) If the offender is supervised by the department, the department shall at a minimum instruct the offender to:

(a) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;

(b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries;

(c) Notify the community corrections officer of any change in the offender's address or employment;

(d) Pay the supervision fee assessment; and

(e) Disclose the fact of supervision to any mental health, chemical dependency, or domestic violence treatment provider, as required by RCW 9.94A.722.

(4) The department may require the offender to participate in rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and to obey all laws.

(5) If the offender was sentenced pursuant to a conviction for a sex offense or domestic violence, the department may:

(a) Require the offender to refrain from direct or indirect contact with the victim of the crime or immediate family member of the victim of the crime. If a victim or an immediate family member of a victim has requested that the offender not contact him or her after notice as provided in RCW 72.09.340, the department shall require the offender to refrain from contact with the requestor. Where the victim is a minor, the parent or guardian of the victim may make a request on the victim's behalf. This subsection is not intended to reduce the preexisting authority of the department to impose no-contact conditions regardless of the offender's crime and regardless of who is protected by the no-contact condition, where such condition is based on risk to community safety.

(b) Impose electronic monitoring. Within the resources made available by the department for this purpose, the department shall carry out any electronic monitoring using the most appropriate technology given the individual circumstances of the offender. As used in this section, "electronic monitoring" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030.

(6) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court-imposed conditions.

(7)(a) The department shall notify the offender in writing of any additional conditions or modifications.

(b) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department. The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds that it is not reasonably related to the crime of conviction, the offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community.

(8) The department shall notify the offender in writing upon community custody intake of the department's violation process.

(9) The department may require offenders to pay for special services rendered including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and telephone reporting, dependent on the offender's ability to pay. The department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(10)(a) When an offender on community custody is under the authority of the board, the department shall assess the offender's risk of recidivism and shall recommend to the board any additional or modified conditions based upon the offender's risk to community safety and may recommend affirmative conduct or electronic monitoring consistent with subsections (4) through (6) of this section.

(b) The board may impose conditions in addition to court-ordered conditions. The board must consider and may impose department-recommended conditions. The board must impose a condition requiring the offender to refrain from contact with the victim or immediate family member of the victim as provided in subsection (5)(a) of this section.

(c) By the close of the next business day, after receiving notice of a condition imposed by the board or the department, an offender may request an administrative hearing under rules adopted by the board. The condition shall remain in effect unless the hearing examiner finds that it is not reasonably related to any of the following:

(i) The crime of conviction;

(ii) The offender's risk of reoffending;

(iii) The safety of the community;

(iv) The offender's risk of domestic violence reoffense.

(d) If the department finds that an emergency exists requiring the immediate imposition of additional conditions in order to prevent the offender from committing a crime, the department may impose such conditions. The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to those set by the board or the court and may not contravene or decrease court-imposed or board-imposed conditions. Conditions imposed under this subsection shall take effect immediately after notice to the offender by personal service, but shall not remain in effect longer than seven working days unless approved by the board.

(11) In setting, modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(12) The department shall make every reasonable effort and prioritize staffing to pursue active warrants of offenders who have violated the terms of their supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Section 7 of this act expires January 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Section 8 of this act takes effect January 1, 2021.

--- END ---