BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 27.12.222 and 1984 c 186 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

A rural county library district, intercounty rural library district, or island library district may contract indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding nonvoter approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to one-tenth of one percent of the value of the taxable property within the district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. The maximum term of nonvoter approved general obligation bonds shall not exceed ((six))twenty years. A rural county library district, island library district, or intercounty rural library district may additionally contract indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, together with any outstanding general indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to one-half of one percent of the value of the taxable property within the district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015 whenever a proposition authorizing the issuance of such bonds has been approved by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 39.36.050, by three-fifths of the persons voting on the proposition at which election the number of persons voting on the proposition shall constitute not less than forty percent of the total number of votes cast in such taxing district at the last preceding general election. If the voters shall so authorize at an election held pursuant to RCW 39.36.050, the district may levy annual taxes in excess of normal legal limitations to pay the principal and interest upon such bonds as they shall become due. The excess levies mentioned in this section or in RCW 84.52.052 or 84.52.056 may be made notwithstanding anything contained in RCW 27.12.050 or 27.12.150 or any other statute pertaining to such library districts.

Sec. 2. RCW 27.15.020 and 2015 c 53 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt of a completed written request to both establish a library capital facility area and submit a ballot proposition under RCW 27.15.050 to finance library capital facilities, that is signed by a majority of the members of the board of trustees of a library district or board of trustees of a city or town library, the county legislative authority or county legislative authorities for the county or counties in which a proposed library capital facility area is to be established ((shall))must submit ((separate))a ballot proposition((s)) to voters to ((authorize establishing))establish the proposed library capital facility area and ((authorizing))authorize the library capital facility area((, if established,)) to finance library capital facilities by issuing general indebtedness and imposing excess levies to retire the indebtedness. The ballot proposition((s shall))must be submitted to voters at a general or special election. If the proposed election date is not a general election, the county legislative authority is encouraged to request an election when another unit of local government with territory located in the proposed library capital facility area is already holding a special election under RCW 29A.04.330. ((Approval of the ballot proposition to create a library capital facility area shall be))The ballot proposition must be approved by a simple majority vote.

(2) A completed request submitted under this section ((shall))must include: (((1)))(a) A description of the boundaries of the library capital facility area; and (((2)))(b) a copy of the resolution of the legislative authority of each city or town, and board of trustees of each library district, with territory included within the proposed library capital facility area indicating both: (((a)))(i) Its approval of the creation of the proposed library capital facility area; and (((b)))(ii) agreement on how election costs will be paid for submitting the ballot proposition((s)) to voters ((that authorize the library capital facility area to incur general indebtedness and impose excess levies to retire the general indebtedness)).

--- END ---