BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning July 1, 2020, the department of ecology may not apply or enforce any interpretive statement, policy statement, or rule unless the interpretive statement, policy statement, or rule has been adopted as a rule in accordance with the rule-making process provided in this chapter, codified in the Washington Administrative Code, and expressly ratified by the legislature in a bill enacted pursuant to the state Constitution.

--- END ---