BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds it is essential that the citizens of Washington state trust both the integrity and the intentions of law enforcement officers with whom they come in contact regarding traffic violations and that law enforcement agencies avoid the appearance of impropriety in the way they evaluate the performance of law enforcement officers. The legislature intends by this act to ensure that the performance of law enforcement officers is evaluated with objectivity, neutrality, impartiality, and fairness and avoids the perception that traffic stops are occurring pursuant to any real or alleged quota system or directive to enhance the evaluation of a law enforcement officer's performance or to enhance a law enforcement agency's revenue from the assessment of penalties imposed for traffic violations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.64 RCW to read as follows:

The number of citations issued by a law enforcement officer for traffic infractions, or the amount of penalties assessed from the issuance of such citations, may not be considered in any performance review, evaluation, rating, assessment, salary, promotion, or assignment of the law enforcement officer.

--- END ---