BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 81.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall conduct a review of the actions taken by the department of transportation, Amtrak, and sound transit to comply with the recommendations provided in the national transportation safety board Amtrak passenger train 501 derailment railroad accident report dated May 21, 2019. The commission shall monitor the actions taken by the department, Amtrak, and sound transit until it can confirm that the three entities have complied with the recommendations.

(2) By December 1, 2020, the commission shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature a report that details the actions taken by the department, Amtrak, and sound transit to comply with the applicable national transportation safety board recommendations.

(3) Passenger rail service may not resume on the Point Defiance bypass rail corridor, and no state funds shall be expended for such service, until ten days after the commission submits confirmation to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature that the department, Amtrak, and sound transit have complied with the national transportation safety board recommendations and provides the report referenced in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

Passenger rail service may not resume on the Point Defiance bypass rail corridor, and no state funds shall be expended for such service, until ten days after the utilities and transportation commission submits the confirmation required in section 1(3) of this act.

--- END ---