BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is an on-premises endorsement available to any:

(a) Licensed domestic winery to sell beer, produced in Washington, by the single serving for on-premises consumption; and

(b) Licensed domestic brewery or microbrewery to sell wine, produced in Washington, by the single serving for on-premises consumption.

(2) The holder of the endorsement is limited to three offerings of beer for a domestic winery and three offerings of wine for a domestic brewery or microbrewery.

(3) The annual fee for the endorsement is two hundred dollars for each retail location.

--- END ---