BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.231 and 2013 c 23 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((is authorized to))must grant and issue temporary permits in lieu of certificates of competency whenever an electrician coming into the state of Washington from another state requests the department for a temporary permit to engage in the electrical construction trade as an electrician during the period of time between filing of an application for a certificate as provided in RCW 19.28.181 and the date the results of taking the examination provided for in RCW 19.28.201 are furnished to the applicant if the applicant:

(a) Holds a journey level or specialty electrician certificate that is active and in good standing that allows the individual to work as a journey level or specialty electrician in the licensing state; and

(b) Has acquired the journey level or specialty electrician certificate from the other state through a state-administered examination with a passing score from the licensing state.

(2) The temporary permit may include a photograph of the holder.

(3) The department is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with other states providing for the acceptance of such states' journey level and specialty electrician certificate of competency or its equivalent when such states' requirements are equal to the standards set by this chapter. No temporary permit shall be issued to:

(((1)))(a) Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a certificate of competency, except that any person who has failed the examination for competency under this section shall be entitled to continue to work under a temporary permit for ninety days if the person is enrolled in a journey level electrician refresher course and shows evidence to the department that he or she has not missed any classes. The person, after completing the journey level electrician refresher course, shall be eligible to retake the examination for competency at the next scheduled time.

(((2)))(b) Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the department with such evidence required under RCW 19.28.181.

(((3)))(c) Any apprentice electrician.

(4) Permits issued under subsection (1) of this section are valid for one hundred twenty days and may be renewed up to three times.

(5) The department may not:

(a) Require contractors that hire temporary permit holders to hire a certain number of in-state electricians; or

(b) Add additional education, apprenticeship, or experience requirements beyond the requirements set forth in subsections (1) and (3) of this section.

--- END ---