BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every health carrier offering dental only coverage delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed by a health carrier on and after January 1, 2021, shall:

(a) Permit every category of dental provider licensed under chapter 18.29, 18.30, 18.32, or 18.260 RCW to provide dental services or care included in their benefits package, to the extent that:

(i) The provision of such dental services or care is within the health care providers' permitted scope of practice; and

(ii) The providers agree to abide by standards related to:

(A) Provision, utilization review, and cost containment of dental services;

(B) Management and administrative procedures; and

(C) Provision of cost-effective and clinically efficacious dental services;

(b) Annually report the names and addresses of all officers, directors, or trustees of the health carrier during the preceding year, and the amount of wages, expense reimbursements, or other payments to such individuals, unless substantially similar information is filed with the commissioner or the national association of insurance commissioners. This requirement does not apply to a foreign or alien insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW that files a supplemental compensation exhibit in its annual statement as required by law.

(2) The requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section do not apply to a licensed health care profession regulated under Title 18 RCW when the licensing statute for the profession states that such requirements do not apply.

(3) For purposes of this section, "health carrier," in addition to the definition in RCW 48.43.005, also includes health care service contractors, limited health care service contractors, and disability insurers offering dental only coverage.

--- END ---