BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

LIMITING ANNUAL MOTOR VEHICLE LICENSE FEES TO $30

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) State and local motor vehicle license fees may not exceed thirty dollars per year for motor vehicles, regardless of year, value, make, or model.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "state and local motor vehicle license fees" means the general license tab fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles, including but not limited to cars, sport utility vehicles, light trucks under RCW 46.17.355, motorcycles, and motor homes, and do not include charges approved by voters after the effective date of this section. This annual fee must be paid and collected annually and is due at the time of initial and renewal vehicle registration.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.350 and 2019 c 44 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following vehicle license fee by vehicle type:

VEHICLE TYPE

INITIAL FEE

RENEWAL FEE

DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Auto stage, six seats or less

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(b) Camper

$ 4.90

$ 3.50

RCW 46.68.030

(c) Commercial trailer

$ ((34.00))30.00

$ ((34.00))30.00

RCW 46.68.035

(d) For hire vehicle, six seats or less

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(e) Mobile home (if registered)

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(f) Moped

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(g) Motor home

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(h) Motorcycle

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(i) Off-road vehicle

$ 18.00

$ 18.00

RCW 46.68.045

(j) Passenger car

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(k) Private use single-axle trailer

$ 15.00

$ 15.00

RCW 46.68.035

(l) Snowmobile

$ ((50.00))30.00

$ ((50.00))30.00

RCW 46.68.350

(m) Snowmobile, vintage

$ 12.00

$ 12.00

RCW 46.68.350

(n) Sport utility vehicle

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(o) Tow truck

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(p) Trailer, over 2000 pounds

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(q) Travel trailer

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(r) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle, on-road use

$ 12.00

$ 12.00

RCW 46.09.540

(s) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle, off-road use

$ 18.00

$ 18.00

RCW 46.09.510

(2) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1) of this section is in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005, and any other fee or tax required by law.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.17.355 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due before July 1, 2016, in lieu of the vehicle license fee required under RCW 46.17.350 and before accepting an application for a vehicle registration for motor vehicles described in RCW 46.16A.455, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following license fee by weight:

WEIGHT

SCHEDULE A

SCHEDULE B

4,000 pounds

$ 38.00

$ 38.00

6,000 pounds

$ 48.00

$ 48.00

8,000 pounds

$ 58.00

$ 58.00

10,000 pounds

$ 60.00

$ 60.00

12,000 pounds

$ 77.00

$ 77.00

14,000 pounds

$ 88.00

$ 88.00

16,000 pounds

$ 100.00

$ 100.00

18,000 pounds

$ 152.00

$ 152.00

20,000 pounds

$ 169.00

$ 169.00

22,000 pounds

$ 183.00

$ 183.00

24,000 pounds

$ 198.00

$ 198.00

26,000 pounds

$ 209.00

$ 209.00

28,000 pounds

$ 247.00

$ 247.00

30,000 pounds

$ 285.00

$ 285.00

32,000 pounds

$ 344.00

$ 344.00

34,000 pounds

$ 366.00

$ 366.00

36,000 pounds

$ 397.00

$ 397.00

38,000 pounds

$ 436.00

$ 436.00

40,000 pounds

$ 499.00

$ 499.00

42,000 pounds

$ 519.00

$ 609.00

44,000 pounds

$ 530.00

$ 620.00

46,000 pounds

$ 570.00

$ 660.00

48,000 pounds

$ 594.00

$ 684.00

50,000 pounds

$ 645.00

$ 735.00

52,000 pounds

$ 678.00

$ 768.00

54,000 pounds

$ 732.00

$ 822.00

56,000 pounds

$ 773.00

$ 863.00

58,000 pounds

$ 804.00

$ 894.00

60,000 pounds

$ 857.00

$ 947.00

62,000 pounds

$ 919.00

$ 1,009.00

64,000 pounds

$ 939.00

$ 1,029.00

66,000 pounds

$ 1,046.00

$ 1,136.00

68,000 pounds

$ 1,091.00

$ 1,181.00

70,000 pounds

$ 1,175.00

$ 1,265.00

72,000 pounds

$ 1,257.00

$ 1,347.00

74,000 pounds

$ 1,366.00

$ 1,456.00

76,000 pounds

$ 1,476.00

$ 1,566.00

78,000 pounds

$ 1,612.00

$ 1,702.00

80,000 pounds

$ 1,740.00

$ 1,830.00

82,000 pounds

$ 1,861.00

$ 1,951.00

84,000 pounds

$ 1,981.00

$ 2,071.00

86,000 pounds

$ 2,102.00

$ 2,192.00

88,000 pounds

$ 2,223.00

$ 2,313.00

90,000 pounds

$ 2,344.00

$ 2,434.00

92,000 pounds

$ 2,464.00

$ 2,554.00

94,000 pounds

$ 2,585.00

$ 2,675.00

96,000 pounds

$ 2,706.00

$ 2,796.00

98,000 pounds

$ 2,827.00

$ 2,917.00

100,000 pounds

$ 2,947.00

$ 3,037.00

102,000 pounds

$ 3,068.00

$ 3,158.00

104,000 pounds

$ 3,189.00

$ 3,279.00

105,500 pounds

$ 3,310.00

$ 3,400.00

(b) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2016, in lieu of the vehicle license fee required under RCW 46.17.350 and before accepting an application for a vehicle registration for motor vehicles described in RCW 46.16A.455, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following license fee by gross weight:

WEIGHT

SCHEDULE A

SCHEDULE B

4,000 pounds

$ ((53.00))30.00

$ ((53.00))30.00

6,000 pounds

$ ((73.00))30.00

$ ((73.00))30.00

8,000 pounds

$ ((93.00))30.00

$ ((93.00))30.00

10,000 pounds

$ ((93.00))30.00

$ ((93.00))30.00

12,000 pounds

$ 81.00

$ 81.00

14,000 pounds

$ 88.00

$ 88.00

16,000 pounds

$ 100.00

$ 100.00

18,000 pounds

$ 152.00

$ 152.00

20,000 pounds

$ 169.00

$ 169.00

22,000 pounds

$ 183.00

$ 183.00

24,000 pounds

$ 198.00

$ 198.00

26,000 pounds

$ 209.00

$ 209.00

28,000 pounds

$ 247.00

$ 247.00

30,000 pounds

$ 285.00

$ 285.00

32,000 pounds

$ 344.00

$ 344.00

34,000 pounds

$ 366.00

$ 366.00

36,000 pounds

$ 397.00

$ 397.00

38,000 pounds

$ 436.00

$ 436.00

40,000 pounds

$ 499.00

$ 499.00

42,000 pounds

$ 519.00

$ 609.00

44,000 pounds

$ 530.00

$ 620.00

46,000 pounds

$ 570.00

$ 660.00

48,000 pounds

$ 594.00

$ 684.00

50,000 pounds

$ 645.00

$ 735.00

52,000 pounds

$ 678.00

$ 768.00

54,000 pounds

$ 732.00

$ 822.00

56,000 pounds

$ 773.00

$ 863.00

58,000 pounds

$ 804.00

$ 894.00

60,000 pounds

$ 857.00

$ 947.00

62,000 pounds

$ 919.00

$ 1,009.00

64,000 pounds

$ 939.00

$ 1,029.00

66,000 pounds

$ 1,046.00

$ 1,136.00

68,000 pounds

$ 1,091.00

$ 1,181.00

70,000 pounds

$ 1,175.00

$ 1,265.00

72,000 pounds

$ 1,257.00

$ 1,347.00

74,000 pounds

$ 1,366.00

$ 1,456.00

76,000 pounds

$ 1,476.00

$ 1,566.00

78,000 pounds

$ 1,612.00

$ 1,702.00

80,000 pounds

$ 1,740.00

$ 1,830.00

82,000 pounds

$ 1,861.00

$ 1,951.00

84,000 pounds

$ 1,981.00

$ 2,071.00

86,000 pounds

$ 2,102.00

$ 2,192.00

88,000 pounds

$ 2,223.00

$ 2,313.00

90,000 pounds

$ 2,344.00

$ 2,434.00

92,000 pounds

$ 2,464.00

$ 2,554.00

94,000 pounds

$ 2,585.00

$ 2,675.00

96,000 pounds

$ 2,706.00

$ 2,796.00

98,000 pounds

$ 2,827.00

$ 2,917.00

100,000 pounds

$ 2,947.00

$ 3,037.00

102,000 pounds

$ 3,068.00

$ 3,158.00

104,000 pounds

$ 3,189.00

$ 3,279.00

105,500 pounds

$ 3,310.00

$ 3,400.00

(2) Schedule A applies to vehicles either used exclusively for hauling logs or that do not tow trailers. Schedule B applies to vehicles that tow trailers and are not covered under Schedule A.

(3) If the resultant gross weight is not listed in the table provided in subsection (1) of this section, it must be increased to the next higher weight.

(4) The license fees provided in subsection (1) of this section and the freight project fee provided in subsection (((6)))(7) of this section are in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005 and any other fee or tax required by law.

(5) The license fees provided in subsection (1) of this section for light trucks weighing 10,000 pounds or less are limited to thirty dollars.

(6) The license fee based on declared gross weight as provided in subsection (1) of this section must be distributed under RCW 46.68.035.

(((6)))(7) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2016, in addition to the license fee based on declared gross weight as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require an applicant with a vehicle with a declared gross weight of more than 10,000 pounds, unless specifically exempt, to pay a freight project fee equal to fifteen percent of the license fee provided in subsection (1) of this section, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, which must be distributed under RCW 46.68.035.

(((7)))(8) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2022, in addition to the license fee based on declared gross weight as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require an applicant with a vehicle with a declared gross weight of less than or equal to 12,000 pounds, unless specifically exempt, to pay an additional weight fee of ten dollars, which must be distributed under RCW 46.68.035.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.17.323 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for an annual vehicle registration renewal for a vehicle that both (a) uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and (b) is capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require the applicant to pay a ((one hundred dollar fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law))thirty dollar fee. The ((one hundred))thirty dollar fee is due only at the time of annual registration renewal.

(2) This section only applies to a vehicle that is designed to have the capability to drive at a speed of more than thirty-five miles per hour.

(3)(((a) The fee under this section is imposed to provide funds to mitigate the impact of vehicles on state roads and highways and for the purpose of evaluating the feasibility of transitioning from a revenue collection system based on fuel taxes to a road user assessment system, and is separate and distinct from other vehicle license fees. Proceeds from the fee must be used for highway purposes, and must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070, subject to (b) of this subsection.

(b))) If in any year the amount of proceeds from the fee collected under this section exceeds one million dollars, the excess amount over one million dollars must be deposited as follows:

(((i)))(a) Seventy percent to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070;

(((ii)))(b) Fifteen percent to the transportation improvement account created in RCW 47.26.084; and

(((iii)))(c) Fifteen percent to the rural arterial trust account created in RCW 36.79.020.

(((4)(a) In addition to the fee established in subsection (1) of this section, before accepting an application for an annual vehicle registration renewal for a vehicle that both (i) uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and (ii) is capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require the applicant to pay a fifty dollar fee.

(b) The fee required under (a) of this subsection must be distributed as follows:

(i) The first one million dollars raised by the fee must be deposited into the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070; and

(ii) Any remaining amounts must be deposited into the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

(5) This section applies to annual vehicle registration renewals until the effective date of enacted legislation that imposes a vehicle miles traveled fee or tax.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 46.17.365 (Motor vehicle weight fee—Motor home vehicle weight fee) and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 202 & 2010 c 161 s 533; and

(2) RCW 46.68.415 (Motor vehicle weight fee, motor home vehicle weight fee—Disposition) and 2010 c 161 s 813.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. CONSTRUCTION CLAUSE.The provisions of this act are to be liberally construed to effectuate the intent, policies, and purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE.If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. SHORT TITLE.This act may be known and cited as the bring back our $30 car tabs act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This act applies retroactively to December 5, 2019.

--- END ---