BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that in 1980, the services for children with multiple handicaps program was created in chapter 74.26 RCW to better serve children living with multiple disabilities, including acute medical needs. The legislature finds that this program was never implemented because the medically intensive children's program was utilized to provide a similar level of service. The legislature finds that transparency and clarity in state laws is important to ensure that residents of Washington state are aware of the different types of services that are available to them. The legislature further finds that it is important that terminology in state laws reflect modern and respectful standards. The legislature therefore resolves to repeal authorization of the children with multiple handicaps program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 74.26.010 (Legislative intent) and 1980 c 106 s 1;

(2) RCW 74.26.020 (Eligibility criteria) and 1980 c 106 s 2;

(3) RCW 74.26.030 (Program plan for services—Local agency support) and 1980 c 106 s 3;

(4) RCW 74.26.040 (Administrative responsibility—Regulations) and 1980 c 106 s 4;

(5) RCW 74.26.050 (Contracts for services—Supervision) and 1980 c 106 s 5; and

(6) RCW 74.26.060 (Program costs—Liability of insurers) and 1980 c 106 s 6.

--- END ---