BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction must oversee school library information and technology programs, as defined in RCW 28A.320.240 by, at a minimum:

(1) Identifying a single point of contact at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to respond to library information and technology inquiries;

(2) Gathering and analyzing data related to the implementation of school library information and technology programs and the assessment of students' educational technology literacy and technology fluency;

(3) Providing technical assistance on establishing school library information and technology programs within existing resources to schools that do not have school library information and technology programs, beginning with schools receiving funding under Title I, part A of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965;

(4) Assisting public schools with the effective implementation of school library information and technology programs;

(5) Supporting public schools in evaluating how they are providing opportunities for every student to meet basic education technology literacy and fluency goals, under RCW 28A.150.210;

(6) Identifying and sharing assessments and other measures of students' knowledge and skill in the areas of educational technology literacy and technology fluency, as defined in RCW 28A.655.075; and

(7) Producing, in consultation with the Washington state school directors' association, guidance for school districts on the best models and practices for school library information and technology programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 15, 2020, and by December 15, 2021, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature preliminary and final reports that include information about, and recommendations to improve, school library information and technology programs, as defined in RCW 28A.320.240. The final report must include the following elements at a minimum:

(a) A summary of previously compiled reports or studies on school library information and technology programs;

(b) Data on school library information and technology programs, for example: The number and characteristics of schools with access to the programs and the number and characteristics of students served by the programs;

(c) A description of the best models and practices for school library information and technology programs;

(d) A summary of the capital needed to build space for a school library information and technology program in every public school and a strategy for meeting those needs starting with schools receiving funding under Title I, part A of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965 and small school districts;

(e) Recommendations to improve the quality of school library information and technology programs;

(f) Recommendations for strategies to achieve and measure equitable access to information and technology in all public schools;

(g) Recommendations for additional data collection and analysis to determine whether access to school library information and technology programs is equitable; and

(h) Recommendations for changes to state law and policy necessary to build and implement quality school library information and technology programs accessible by every public school student.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must conduct a study on the benefits of school library information and technology programs and teacher-librarians on student educational outcomes.

(2) By December 15, 2022, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the results of the study required by subsection (1) of this section.

(3) This section expires December 15, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

By September 1, 2022, each school district must adopt or amend: (1) A policy that acknowledges the requirement for boards of directors to provide every student with access to school library information and technology programs as specified in RCW 28A.320.240; and (2) procedures that describe how students can access school library information and technology resources and materials.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.320.240 and 2015 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of this section is to identify quality criteria for school library information and technology programs that support the student learning goals under RCW 28A.150.210, the essential academic learning requirements under RCW 28A.655.070, and high school graduation requirements adopted under RCW 28A.230.090.

(2) Every board of directors shall provide resources and materials for the operation of school library information and technology programs ((as the board deems necessary for the proper education of the district's students or as otherwise required by law or rule of the superintendent of public instruction))so that every student in the school district has access to these programs.

(3) "Teacher-librarian" means a certificated teacher with a library media endorsement under rules adopted by the professional educator standards board.

(4) "School library information and technology program" means a school-based program that is staffed by a certificated teacher-librarian and provides a broad, flexible array of services, resources, and instruction that support student mastery of the essential academic learning requirements and state standards in all subject areas and the implementation of the district's school improvement plan.

(5) The teacher-librarian, through the school library information and technology program, shall collaborate as an instructional partner to help all students meet the content goals in all subject areas, and assist high school students completing high school and beyond plans required for graduation.

(6) The teacher-librarian's duties may include, but are not limited to, collaborating with his or her schools to:

(a) Integrate information and technology into curriculum and instruction, including but not limited to instructing other certificated staff about using and integrating information and technology literacy into instruction through workshops, modeling lessons, and individual peer coaching;

(b) Provide information management instruction to students and staff about how to effectively use emerging learning technologies for school and lifelong learning, as well as in the appropriate use of computers and mobile devices in an educational setting;

(c) Help teachers and students efficiently and effectively access the highest quality information available while using information ethically;

(d) Instruct students in digital citizenship including how to be critical consumers of information and provide guidance about thoughtful and strategic use of online resources; and

(e) Create a culture of reading in the school community by developing a diverse, student-focused collection of materials that ensures all students can find something of quality to read and by facilitating school-wide reading initiatives along with providing individual support and guidance for students.

--- END ---