BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.14.130 and 1993 c 122 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For any industrial insurance claim for which the worker may be entitled to benefits other than medical treatment only, when a self-insurer has determined to allow an industrial insurance claim, the self-insurer must issue an order allowing the claim to the injured worker, attending medical provider, and the department within sixty days from the date that the claim is filed. The order of the self-insurer must be issued consistent with rules adopted by the department.

(2) The self-insurer ((shall))must request ((allowance or)) denial of a claim within sixty days from the date that the claim is filed.

(3) If the self-insurer fails to act within sixty days from the date that the claim is filed, the department ((shall))must promptly intervene and adjudicate the claim.

(4) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section, including the:

(a) Form of orders allowing industrial insurance claims consistent with the standards followed by the department; and

(b) Process for a self-insurer to request and obtain an interlocutory order from the department allowing the self-insurer additional time to investigate the validity of a claim.

--- END ---