BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.76.730 and 2019 c 176 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature recognizes that dual credit programs reduce both the cost and time of attendance to obtain a postsecondary degree. The legislature intends to reduce barriers and increase access to postsecondary educational opportunities for low-income students by removing the financial barriers for dual enrollment programs for students.

(2) The office, in consultation with the institutions of higher education and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall create the Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program. The office shall administer the Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program and may adopt rules as necessary.

(3) Eligible students are those who meet the following requirements:

(a) Qualify for the free or reduced-price lunch program;

(b) Are enrolled in one or more dual credit programs, as defined in RCW 28B.15.821, such as college in the high school and running start; and

(c) Have at least a 2.0 grade point average.

(4) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, beginning with the 2019-20 academic year, the office may award scholarships to eligible students. The scholarship award must be as follows:

(a) For eligible students enrolled in running start:

(i) Mandatory fees, as defined in RCW 28A.600.310(2), prorated based on credit load;

(ii) Course fees or laboratory fees as determined appropriate by college or university policies to pay for specified course related costs; ((and))

(iii) A textbook voucher to be used at the institution of higher education's bookstore where the student is enrolled. For every credit per quarter the student is enrolled, the student shall receive a textbook voucher for ten dollars, up to a maximum of fifteen credits per quarter, or the equivalent, per year; and

(iv) Apprenticeship materials as determined appropriate by the college or university to pay for specific course-related material costs, which may include occupation-specific tools, work clothes, rain gear, or boots.

(b) An eligible student enrolled in a college in the high school program may receive a scholarship for tuition fees as set forth under RCW 28A.600.290(5)(a).

(5) The Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program must apply after the fee waivers for low-income students under RCW 28A.600.310 and subsidies under RCW 28A.600.290 are provided for.

--- END ---