BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The department of commerce shall examine the economic and environmental costs and benefits of dismantling the Hiram M. Chittenden locks, breaching or removing the dams in the Seattle city light Skagit river hydroelectric project, and restoring Ravenna creek to flow above ground. The department shall report the results of its examination to the legislature by January 1, 2021. The examination required under this section must be completed within existing resources.

--- END ---