BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any provider licensed under Title 18 RCW or facility licensed under Title 70 RCW that provides abortion services must provide the following information to the department of health during the month following provision of the service:

(a) The number of patients who became unintentionally sterile following an abortion;

(b) The number of patients who required a hospital stay of at least one night due to complications from an abortion;

(c) The number of unsuccessful abortions resulting in a live birth.

(2) The facility or provider must report the information required in subsection (1) of this section in conjunction with all other abortion data required by the department in rule.

(3) The department must include data collected pursuant to this section in any publicly available report on abortion statistics in a form that does not identify the facility, patient, or provider.

--- END ---