BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 52.18.050 and 2017 c 196 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The initial imposition of a benefit charge authorized by this chapter must be approved by not less than sixty percent of the voters of the district voting at a general election or at a special election called by the district for that purpose.

(b) An election held for the initial imposition of a benefit charge must be held not more than twelve months prior to the date on which the first charge is to be assessed.

(c) A benefit charge approved at an election expires in six or fewer years as authorized by the voters unless subsequently reapproved by the voters.

(2) Ballot measures calling for the initial imposition of a benefit charge must be submitted so as to enable voters favoring the authorization of a benefit charge to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote "No," and the ballot question must be as follows:

"Shall . . . . . . county fire protection district No. . . . . be authorized to impose benefit charges each year for . . . . (insert number of years not to exceed six) years, not to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under RCW 52.16.160?

YES

NO

□

□"

(3)(a) The continued imposition of a benefit charge authorized by this chapter may be approved for six consecutive years, ten consecutive years, or permanently.

A ballot measure calling for the continued imposition of a benefit charge for six consecutive years or ten consecutive years must be approved by a majority of the voters of the district voting at a general election or at a special election called by the district for that purpose.

A ballot measure calling for the continued imposition of a benefit charge as a permanent benefit charge must be approved by not less than sixty percent of the voters of the district voting at a general election or at a special election called by the district for that purpose.

(b) Ballot measures calling for the continued imposition of a benefit charge must be submitted so as to enable voters favoring the continued imposition of the benefit charge to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote "No." The ballot question must be substantially in the following form:

"Shall . . . . . . county fire protection district No. . . . . be authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit charges . . . . . (insert "each year for six consecutive years", "each year for ten consecutive years," or "permanently"), not to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under RCW 52.16.160?

YES

NO

□

□"

Sec. 2. RCW 52.26.220 and 2017 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The initial imposition of a benefit charge authorized by this chapter must be approved by not less than sixty percent majority of the voters of the regional fire protection service authority voting at a general election or at a special election called by the authority for that purpose. Ballot measures containing an authorization to impose benefit charges that are approved by the voters pursuant to RCW 52.26.060 satisfy the proposition approval requirement of this subsection and subsection (2) of this section.

(b) An election held for the initial imposition of a benefit charge must be held not more than twelve months prior to the date on which the first charge is to be assessed.

(c) A benefit charge approved at an election expires in six or fewer years as authorized by the voters, unless subsequently reapproved by the voters.

(2) Ballot measures calling for the initial imposition of a benefit charge must be submitted so as to enable voters favoring the authorization of a benefit charge to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote "No." The ballot question is as follows:

"Shall . . . . . . the regional fire protection service authority composed of (insert the participating fire protection jurisdictions) . . . . . be authorized to impose benefit charges each year for . . . . (insert number of years not to exceed six) years, not to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under RCW 52.26.140(1)(c)?

YES

NO

□

□"

(3)(a) The continued imposition of a benefit charge authorized by this chapter may be approved for six consecutive years, ten consecutive years, or permanently. A ballot measure calling for the continued imposition of a benefit charge for six consecutive years or ten consecutive years must be approved by a majority of the voters of the regional fire protection service authority voting at a general election or at a special election called by the authority for that purpose. A ballot measure calling for the continued imposition of a benefit charge as a permanent benefit charge must be approved by not less than sixty percent of the voters of the regional fire protection service authority voting at a general election or at a special election called by the authority for that purpose.

(b) Ballot measures calling for the continued imposition of a benefit charge must be submitted so as to enable voters favoring the continued imposition of the benefit charge to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote "No." The ballot question must be substantially in the following form:

"Shall . . . . . the regional fire protection service authority composed of (insert the participating fire protection jurisdictions) . . . . . . be authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit charges . . . . . (insert " each year for six consecutive years," "each year for ten consecutive years," or "permanently"), not to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under RCW 52.26.140(1)(c)?

YES

NO

□

□"

--- END ---