BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.185C RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department, working in conjunction with the department of licensing, shall create and implement an identicard program to provide homeless individuals within Washington state a state-issued identicard pursuant to RCW 46.20.117.

(2) A homeless individual is eligible for a no cost original or renewal identicard pursuant to this section on a one-time basis, provided the individual:

(a) Meets the department of licensing criteria under RCW 46.20.117;

(b) Meets the definition of a homeless person pursuant to RCW 43.185C.010, which can be on a sheltered or unsheltered basis;

(c) Is expected to reside in a location within Washington state; and

(d) Does not have a current and valid state-issued identicard or driver's license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2021.

--- END ---