BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A developmentally disabled person, as defined in RCW 71A.10.020, may apply to the department to obtain a developmentally disabled designation on a driver's license or identicard issued under this section by providing self-attestation that the individual has a developmental disability.

(2) The developmentally disabled designation must be provided to eligible individuals at no additional cost beyond other applicable driver's license or identicard fees required by law.

(3) The department, jointly with the department of social and health services, must develop procedures to allow individuals to apply for the developmentally disabled designation in the most efficient and convenient manner possible. The procedures must include public information regarding the ability to apply for the developmentally disabled designation on a driver's license or identicard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2022.

--- END ---