BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.58.020 and 1995 c 347 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that the shorelines of the state are among the most valuable and fragile of its natural resources and that there is great concern throughout the state relating to their utilization, protection, restoration, and preservation. In addition it finds that ever increasing pressures of additional uses are being placed on the shorelines necessitating increased coordination in the management and development of the shorelines of the state. The legislature further finds that much of the shorelines of the state and the uplands adjacent thereto are in private ownership; that unrestricted construction on the privately owned or publicly owned shorelines of the state is not in the best public interest; and therefore, coordinated planning is necessary in order to protect the public interest associated with the shorelines of the state while, at the same time, recognizing and protecting private property rights consistent with the public interest. In addition, the legislature finds that expanding offshore drilling off the coastal ocean waters has the very real potential to significantly damage Washington's coastline and negatively impact the state's coastal resources. There is, therefore, a clear and urgent demand for a planned, rational, and concerted effort, jointly performed by federal, state, and local governments, to prevent the inherent harm in an uncoordinated and piecemeal development of the state's shorelines.

It is the policy of the state to provide for the management of the shorelines of the state by planning for and fostering all reasonable and appropriate uses. This policy is designed to ((insure))ensure the development of these shorelines in a manner which, while allowing for limited reduction of rights of the public in the navigable waters, will promote and enhance the public interest. The policy is also designed to ensure protection from economic and environmental risk from oil spill and pollution brought by offshore oil extraction operations and onshore industrialization associated with the extraction. This policy contemplates protecting against adverse effects to the public health, the land and its vegetation and wildlife, and the waters of the state and their aquatic life, while protecting generally public rights of navigation and corollary rights incidental thereto.

The legislature declares that the interest of all of the people shall be paramount in the management of shorelines of statewide significance. The department, in adopting guidelines for shorelines of statewide significance, and local government, in developing master programs for shorelines of statewide significance, shall give preference to uses in the following order of preference which:

(1) Recognize and protect the statewide interest over local interest;

(2) Preserve the natural character of the shoreline;

(3) Result in long term over short term benefit;

(4) Protect the resources and ecology of the shoreline;

(5) Increase public access to publicly owned areas of the shorelines;

(6) Increase recreational opportunities for the public in the shoreline;

(7) Provide for any other element as defined in RCW 90.58.100 deemed appropriate or necessary.

In the implementation of this policy the public's opportunity to enjoy the physical and aesthetic qualities of natural shorelines of the state shall be preserved to the greatest extent feasible consistent with the overall best interest of the state and the people generally. To this end uses shall be preferred which are consistent with control of pollution and prevention of damage to the natural environment, or are unique to or dependent upon use of the state's shoreline. Alterations of the natural condition of the shorelines of the state, in those limited instances when authorized, shall be given priority for single-family residences and their appurtenant structures, ports, shoreline recreational uses including but not limited to parks, marinas, piers, and other improvements facilitating public access to shorelines of the state, industrial and commercial developments which are particularly dependent on their location on or use of the shorelines of the state and other development that will provide an opportunity for substantial numbers of the people to enjoy the shorelines of the state. Alterations of the natural condition of the shorelines and shorelands of the state shall be recognized by the department. Shorelines and shorelands of the state shall be appropriately classified and these classifications shall be revised when circumstances warrant regardless of whether the change in circumstances occurs through man-made causes or natural causes. Any areas resulting from alterations of the natural condition of the shorelines and shorelands of the state no longer meeting the definition of "shorelines of the state" shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 90.58 RCW.

Permitted uses in the shorelines of the state shall be designed and conducted in a manner to minimize, insofar as practical, any resultant damage to the ecology and environment of the shoreline area and any interference with the public's use of the water.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.58.160 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Surface drilling for oil or gas, and infrastructure for handling or transporting oil or gas extracted from the outer continental shelf adjacent to Washington state waters, is prohibited in ((the waters of Puget Sound north to the Canadian boundary and the Strait of Juan de Fuca))shorelines of the state seaward from the ordinary high water mark ((and on all lands within one thousand feet landward from said mark)).

Sec. 3. RCW 43.143.010 and 1997 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of this chapter is to articulate policies and establish guidelines for the exercise of state and local management authority over Washington's coastal waters, seabed, and shorelines.

(2) There shall be no leasing of Washington's tidal or submerged lands extending from ((mean high tide))the ordinary high water mark seaward three miles along the Washington coast from Cape Flattery south to ((Cape Disappointment))Washington's southern boundary, nor in Grays Harbor, Willapa Bay, and the Columbia river downstream from the Longview bridge, for purposes of oil or gas exploration, development, or production, nor for infrastructure to handle oil and gas extracted from the outer continental shelf adjacent to Washington state waters and transported through state waters.

(3) When conflicts arise among uses and activities, priority shall be given to resource uses and activities that will not adversely impact renewable resources over uses which are likely to have an adverse impact on renewable resources.

(4) It is the policy of the state of Washington to actively encourage the conservation of liquid fossil fuels, and to explore available methods of encouraging such conservation.

(5) It is not currently the intent of the legislature to include recreational uses or currently existing commercial uses involving fishing or other renewable marine or ocean resources within the uses and activities which must meet the planning and review criteria set forth in RCW 43.143.030. It is not the intent of the legislature, however, to permanently exclude these uses from the requirements of RCW 43.143.030. If information becomes available which indicates that such uses should reasonably be covered by the requirements of RCW 43.143.030, the permitting government or agency may require compliance with those requirements, and appeals of that decision shall be handled through the established appeals procedure for that permit or approval.

(6) The state shall participate in federal ocean and marine resource decisions to the fullest extent possible to ensure that the decisions are consistent with the state's policy concerning the use of those resources.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.143.020 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 2 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,))The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter((:))unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Coastal counties" means Clallam, Jefferson, Grays Harbor, and Pacific counties.

(2) "Coastal waters" means the waters of the Pacific Ocean seaward from Cape Flattery south to ((Cape Disappointment))Washington's southern boundary, from ((mean high tide))the ordinary high water mark seaward two hundred miles.

(3) "Outer continental shelf" means all submerged lands lying seaward and outside of the area of lands beneath navigable waters, as set forth by the federal submerged lands act (43 U.S.C. Sec. 1331), and all of which appertain to the United States and are subject to its jurisdiction and control.

--- END ---