BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that expanding the use of renewable biological resources as feedstock in the production of fuels, chemicals, and other materials is an important part of developing a sustainable economy throughout Washington.

(2) The legislature further finds that the expansion of a strong, circular bioeconomy throughout the state would provide new jobs at local and regional levels, create opportunities to grow new bio-based product markets, help produce large volumes of low carbon fuels, and diversify sources of energy in Washington.

(3) The legislature further finds that Washington state contains ideal conditions to develop a robust bioeconomy due to its well-trained workforce and manufacturing experience, available land base for growing feedstock, excellent infrastructure, and access to domestic and global markets.

(4) Therefore, the legislature intends to direct a study to identify opportunities, and to develop processes, systems, and policies, that promote the expansion of a strong, circular bioeconomy throughout Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The University of Washington is directed to conduct a study to identify opportunities to further develop Washington state's bioeconomy to expand the use of renewable biological resources in the production of fuels, chemicals, and other materials. The study, at minimum, must:

(a) Develop, to the extent feasible, new processes that use biomass resources to produce high value chemicals, high value products, and high volume fuels in Washington, including the development of processes to fractionate feedstocks, such as woody biomass;

(b) Develop, to the extent feasible, biomass production systems that provide effective water treatments in Washington, with an emphasis on cleaning municipal treatment wastewater and roadway stormwater;

(c) Identify and assess optimal locations throughout Washington state to site a biorefinery factory; and

(d) Identify and analyze policy options that can promote the further development of a circular bioeconomy in Washington.

(2) By July 1, 2023, the results of the study required in subsection (1) of this section must be submitted in a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature consistent with the requirements of RCW 43.01.036.

--- END ---