BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of fish and wildlife shall work with a designated representative chosen by the primary advocacy groups in Washington state in the formation of the warm water game fish enhancement advisory group. The department of fish and wildlife and the representative shall cooperatively select advisory group members that are interested in growth and improvement of warm water fisheries and fishing opportunities. Those representatives must be determined by the department of fish and wildlife and must include members from recognized recreational fishing and warm water advocacy groups and organizations regardless of political affiliation. Members must provide equitable representation from the various geographic areas of the state where warm water fishing occurs. The advisory group must consist of no fewer than five and no more than nine members at any one time.

(2) This section expires December 30, 2023.

--- END ---