BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds and declares that the connection between transportation and health is indisputable; transportation systems can impact health in both positive and negative ways. Consideration of health implications in transportation policy has the potential to support health equity by preventing chronic diseases and improving traffic safety and air quality, all of which can drive savings in health care costs.

The rate of obesity in Washington remains a concern. Almost twenty-nine percent of adults and twelve percent of our tenth graders are obese, with significantly higher rates in populations with lower income and lower education. Access to regular physical activity has been declining in our social and physical environments. People who are active are more likely to maintain a healthy weight and less likely to develop chronic diseases. In addition, we know that exposure to unhealthy air quality is linked to premature mortality, cardiac symptoms, exacerbation of asthma symptoms, diminished lung function, and increased hospitalization.

Washington is committed to routinely consider the health implications of transportation planning and community design.

Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that this act serves to expand the existing goals, objectives, and responsibilities related to the operation of a statewide transportation system to include the health of people living in Washington.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.04.280 and 2016 c 35 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the state's transportation system. The policy goals established under this section are deemed consistent with the benchmark categories adopted by the state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30, 2000. Public investments in transportation should support achievement of these policy goals:

(a) Economic vitality: To promote and develop transportation systems that stimulate, support, and enhance the movement of people and goods to ensure a prosperous economy;

(b) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;

(c) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of transportation customers and the transportation system;

(d) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and people throughout Washington state, including congestion relief and improved freight mobility;

(e) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance healthy communities, and protect the environment; ((and))

(f) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system; and

(g) Health: To improve the health of Washington's residents, by considering health implications and encouraging active transportation when designing, building, and maintaining Washington's transportation system.

(2) The powers, duties, and functions of state transportation agencies must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) These policy goals are intended to be the basis for establishing detailed and measurable objectives and related performance measures.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature that the office of financial management, in consultation with the transportation commission, establish objectives and performance measures for the department and other state agencies with transportation-related responsibilities to ensure transportation system performance at local, regional, and state government levels progresses toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section. The office of financial management shall submit objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year thereafter.

(5) A local or regional agency engaging in transportation planning may voluntarily establish objectives and performance measures to demonstrate progress toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section or any other transportation policy goals established by the local or regional agency. A local or regional agency engaging in transportation planning is encouraged to provide local and regional objectives and performance measures to be included with the objectives and performance measures submitted to the legislature pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

(6) This section does not create a private right of action.

--- END ---