BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9A.48 RCW to read as follows:

When any person is found guilty of violating RCW 9A.48.090 or 9A.48.105, the court must order a mandatory thirty-day period of community restitution to require the removal of graffiti from buildings in the local area where the offense was committed, unless the court finds that such an order is not practical. The community restitution must be imposed consecutively to any other community restitution the court imposes for the offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as the keep our communities graffiti free act.

--- END ---