BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 50A.05 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall coordinate outreach and education to paid family and medical leave benefit recipients with a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system that connects families with children prenatal through age five and residing in Washington state to appropriate services and community resources. This coordination shall include but is not limited to the following activities:

(1) Placing information about the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system on the paid family and medical leave program web site;

(2) Placing information about the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system in printed paid family and medical leave outreach materials;

(3) Whenever feasible, conducting joint outreach events.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. By December 1, 2020, the employment security department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the ability for the paid family and medical leave program and a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system to provide integrated services to eligible beneficiaries. The report shall include an analysis of any statutory changes needed to allow information and data to be shared between the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system and the paid family and medical leave program.

--- END ---