BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.216.010 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 201 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, or facility that provides child care and early learning services outside a child's own home and includes the following irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency:

(a) "Child day care center" means an agency that regularly provides early childhood education and early learning services for a group of children for periods of less than twenty-four hours;

(b) "Early learning" includes but is not limited to programs and services for child care; state, federal, private, and nonprofit preschool; child care subsidies; child care resource and referral; parental education and support; and training and professional development for early learning professionals;

(c) "Family day care provider" means a child care provider who regularly provides early childhood education and early learning services for not more than twelve children in the provider's home in the family living quarters;

(d) "Nongovernmental private-public partnership" means an entity registered as a nonprofit corporation in Washington state with a primary focus on early learning, school readiness, and parental support, and an ability to raise a minimum of five million dollars in contributions;

(e) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community facility.

(2) "Agency" does not include the following:

(a) Persons related to the child in the following ways:

(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;

(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;

(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law; or

(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, even after the marriage is terminated;

(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child;

(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or children, with or without compensation, where the person providing care for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not conduct such activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the purpose of engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to, advertising such care;

(d) Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one another's children;

(e) Nursery schools that are engaged primarily in early childhood education with preschool children and in which no child is enrolled on a regular basis for more than four hours per day;

(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a stated academic curriculum, and accept only school age children;

(g) Seasonal camps ((of three months' or less duration)) engaged primarily in recreational or educational activities for three consecutive months or less in duration, within each period of twelve consecutive months;

(h) Facilities providing child care for periods of less than twenty-four hours when a parent or legal guardian of the child remains on the premises of the facility for the purpose of participating in:

(i) Activities other than employment; or

(ii) Employment of up to two hours per day when the facility is operated by a nonprofit entity that also operates a licensed child care program at the same facility in another location or at another facility;

(i) Any entity that provides recreational or educational programming for school age children only and the entity meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The entity utilizes a drop-in model for programming, where children are able to attend during any or all program hours without a formal reservation;

(ii) The entity does not assume responsibility in lieu of the parent, unless for coordinated transportation;

(iii) The entity is a local affiliate of a national nonprofit; and

(iv) The entity is in compliance with all safety and quality standards set by the associated national agency;

(j) A program operated by any unit of local, state, or federal government;

(k) A program located within the boundaries of a federally recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;

(l) A program located on a federal military reservation, except where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to the licensing requirements of this chapter;

(m) A program that offers early learning and support services, such as parent education, and does not provide child care services on a regular basis.

(3) "Applicant" means a person who requests or seeks employment in an agency.

(4) "Conviction information" means criminal history record information relating to an incident which has led to a conviction or other disposition adverse to the applicant.

(5) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(6) "Early achievers" means a program that improves the quality of early learning programs and supports and rewards providers for their participation.

(7) "Early childhood education and assistance program contractor" means an organization that provides early childhood education and assistance program services under a signed contract with the department.

(8) "Early childhood education and assistance program provider" means an organization that provides site level, direct, and high quality early childhood education and assistance program services under the direction of an early childhood education and assistance program contractor.

(9) "Early start" means an integrated high quality continuum of early learning programs for children birth-to-five years of age. Components of early start include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Home visiting and parent education and support programs;

(b) The early achievers program described in RCW 43.216.085;

(c) Integrated full-day and part-day high quality early learning programs; and

(d) High quality preschool for children whose family income is at or below one hundred ten percent of the federal poverty level.

(10) "Education data center" means the education data center established in RCW 43.41.400, commonly referred to as the education research and data center.

(11) "Employer" means a person or business that engages the services of one or more people, especially for wages or salary to work in an agency.

(12) "Enforcement action" means denial, suspension, revocation, modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW 43.216.325(1) or assessment of civil monetary penalties pursuant to RCW 43.216.325(3).

(13) "Extended day program" means an early childhood education and assistance program that offers early learning education for at least ten hours per day, a minimum of two thousand hours per year, at least four days per week, and operates year-round.

(14) "Full day program" means an early childhood education and assistance program that offers early learning education for a minimum of one thousand hours per year.

(15) "Inspection report" means a written or digital record developed by the department that identifies violations of licensing standards. An inspection report does not include a child care facility licensing compliance agreement as defined in RCW 43.216.395.

(16) "Low-income child care provider" means a person who administers a child care program that consists of at least eighty percent of children receiving working connections child care subsidy.

(((16)))(17) "Low-income neighborhood" means a district or community where more than twenty percent of households are below the federal poverty level.

(((17)))(18) "Negative action" means a court order, court judgment, or an adverse action taken by an agency, in any state, federal, tribal, or foreign jurisdiction, which results in a finding against the applicant reasonably related to the individual's character, suitability, and competence to care for or have unsupervised access to children in child care. This may include, but is not limited to:

(a) A decision issued by an administrative law judge;

(b) A final determination, decision, or finding made by an agency following an investigation;

(c) An adverse agency action, including termination, revocation, or denial of a license or certification, or if pending adverse agency action, the voluntary surrender of a license, certification, or contract in lieu of the adverse action;

(d) A revocation, denial, or restriction placed on any professional license; or

(e) A final decision of a disciplinary board.

(((18)))(19) "Nonconviction information" means arrest, founded allegations of child abuse, or neglect pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW, or other negative action adverse to the applicant.

(((19)))(20) "Nonschool age child" means a child who is age six years or younger and who is not enrolled in a public or private school.

(((20)))(21) "Part day program" means an early childhood education and assistance program that offers early learning education for at least two and one-half hours per class session, at least three hundred twenty hours per year, for a minimum of thirty weeks per year.

(((21)))(22) "Private school" means a private school approved by the state under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

(((22)))(23) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.

(((23)))(24) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care to be maintained by an agency.

(((24)))(25) "School age child" means a child who is five years of age through twelve years of age and is attending a public or private school or is receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW.

(((25)))(26) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department.

(((26)))(27) "Washington state preschool program" means an education program for children three-to-five years of age who have not yet entered kindergarten, such as the early childhood education and assistance program.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.216.255 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No later than November 1, 2016, the department shall implement a single set of licensing standards for child care and the early childhood education and assistance program. The department shall produce the single set of licensing standards within the department's available appropriations. The new licensing standards must:

(a) Provide minimum ((health and safety standards))licensing requirements for child care and preschool programs;

(b) Rely on the standards established in the early achievers program to address quality issues in participating early childhood programs;

(c) Take into account the separate needs of family care providers and child care centers; and

(d) Promote the continued safety of child care settings.

(2) Private schools that operate early learning programs and do not receive state subsidy payments shall be subject only to the minimum health and safety standards ((in subsection (1)(a) of this section))as defined in RCW 43.216.395(2)(b) and the requirements necessary to assure a sufficient early childhood education to meet usual requirements needed for transition into elementary school. The state, and any agency thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any specific educational or other programs for early learning programs operated by private schools except for programs that receive state subsidy payments.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.216.305 and 2018 c 58 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each agency shall make application for a license or the continuation of a full license to the department ((on forms))using a method prescribed by the department. Upon receipt of such application, the department shall either grant or deny a license or continuation of a full license within ninety days. A license or continuation shall be granted if the agency meets the minimum requirements set forth in this chapter and the departmental requirements consistent with this chapter, except that an initial license may be issued as provided in RCW 43.216.315. The department shall consider whether an agency is in good standing, as defined in subsection (4)(b) of this section, before granting a continuation of a full license. Full licenses provided for in this chapter shall continue to remain valid so long as the licensee meets the requirements for a nonexpiring license in subsection (2) of this section. The licensee, however, shall advise the secretary of any material change in circumstances which might constitute grounds for reclassification of license as to category. The license issued under this chapter is not transferable and applies only to the licensee and the location stated in the application. For licensed family day care homes having an acceptable history of child care, the license may remain in effect for two weeks after a move.

(2) In order to qualify for a nonexpiring full license, a licensee must meet the following requirements on an annual basis as established from the date of initial licensure:

(a) Submit the annual licensing fee;

(b) Submit a declaration to the department indicating the licensee's intent to continue operating a licensed child care program, or the intent to cease operation on a date certain;

(c) Submit a declaration of compliance with all licensing rules; and

(d) Submit background check applications into the department's electronic workforce registry, as defined by rule and on the schedule established by the department, for all current employees of the agency.

(3) If a licensee fails to meet the requirements in subsection (2) of this section for continuation of a full license the license expires and the licensee must submit a new application for licensure under this chapter.

(4)(a) Nothing about the nonexpiring license process may interfere with the department's established monitoring practice.

(b) For the purpose of this section, an agency is considered to be in good standing if in the intervening period between monitoring visits the agency does not have any of the following:

(i) Valid complaints;

(ii) A history of noncompliance related to those valid complaints or pending from prior monitoring visits; or

(iii) Other information that when evaluated would result in a finding of noncompliance with this section.

(c) The department shall consider whether an agency is in good standing when determining the most appropriate approach and process for monitoring visits, for the purposes of administrative efficiency while protecting children, consistent with this chapter. If the department determines that an agency is not in good standing, the department may issue a probationary license, as provided in RCW 43.216.320.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.216.395 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall develop an internal review process to determine whether department licensors have appropriately and consistently applied agency rules ((in child care facility licensing compliance agreements))on inspection reports that do not involve a violation of health and safety standards. Adverse licensing decisions including license denial, suspension, revocation, modification, or nonrenewal pursuant to RCW 43.216.325 or imposition of civil fines pursuant to RCW 43.216.335 are not subject to the internal review process in this section, but may be appealed using the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Child care facility licensing compliance agreement" means an agreement issued by the department in lieu of the department taking enforcement action against a child care provider that contains: (i) A description of the violation and the rule or law that was violated; (ii) a statement from the licensee regarding the proposed plan to comply with the rule or law; (iii) the date the violation must be corrected; (iv) information regarding other licensing action that may be imposed if compliance does not occur by the required date; and (v) the signature of the licensor and licensee or the licensee's delegate.

(b) "Health and safety standards" means rules or requirements developed by the department to protect the health and safety of children against ((substantial)) risk of bodily, mental, or psychological injury, harm, illness, or death.

(3) The internal review process shall be conducted by the following six individuals:

(a) Three department employees who may include child care licensors; and

(b) Three child care providers selected by the department from names submitted by the oversight board for children, youth, and families established in RCW 43.216.015.

(4) The internal review process established in this section may overturn, change, or uphold a department licensing decision by majority vote. In the event that the six individuals conducting the internal review process are equally divided, the secretary or the secretary's designee shall make the decision of the internal review process. The internal review process must provide the parties with a written decision of the outcome after completion of the internal review process. A licensee must request a review under the internal review process within ten days of the development of ((a child care facility licensing compliance agreement))an inspection report and the internal review process must be completed within ((thirty))sixty days after the request from the licensee to initiate the internal review process is received.

(5) A licensee may request a final review by the oversight board for children, youth, and families after completing the internal review process established in this section by giving notice to the department and the oversight board for children, youth, and families within ten days of receiving the written decision produced by the internal review process.

(((6) The department shall not develop a child care facility licensing compliance agreement with a child care provider for first-time violations of rules that do not relate to health and safety standards and that can be corrected on the same day that the violation is identified. The department shall develop a procedure for providing a warning and offering technical assistance to providers in response to these first-time violations.))

Sec. 5. RCW 72.40.250 and 2019 c 266 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the powers and duties under RCW 72.40.022 and 72.40.024, the director of the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, or the director's designee, and the superintendent of the state school for the blind shall:

(1) Develop written procedures for the supervision of employees and volunteers who have the potential for contact with students. Such procedures shall be designed to prevent child abuse and neglect by providing for adequate supervision of such employees and volunteers, taking into consideration such factors as the student population served, architectural factors, and the size of the facility. Such procedures shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(a) Staffing patterns and the rationale for such;

(b) Responsibilities of supervisors;

(c) The method by which staff and volunteers are made aware of the identity of all supervisors, including designated on-site supervisors;

(d) Provision of written supervisory guidelines to employees and volunteers;

(e) Periodic supervisory conferences for employees and volunteers; and

(f) Written performance evaluations of staff to be conducted by supervisors in a manner consistent with applicable provisions of the civil service law.

(2) Develop written procedures for the protection of students when there is reason to believe an incident has occurred which would render a minor student an abused or neglected child within the meaning of RCW 26.44.020. Such procedures shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(a) Investigation. Immediately upon notification that a report of child abuse or neglect has been made to the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families or a law enforcement agency, the superintendent or the director, or the director's designee, shall:

(i) Preserve any potential evidence through such actions as securing the area where suspected abuse or neglect occurred;

(ii) Obtain proper and prompt medical evaluation and treatment, as needed, with documentation of any evidence of abuse or neglect; and

(iii) Provide necessary assistance to the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families and local law enforcement in their investigations;

(b) Safety. Upon notification that a report of suspected child abuse or neglect has been made to the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families or a law enforcement agency, the superintendent or the director or his or her designee, with consideration for causing as little disruption as possible to the daily routines of the students, shall evaluate the situation and immediately take appropriate action to assure the health and safety of the students involved in the report and of any other students similarly situated, and take such additional action as is necessary to prevent future acts of abuse or neglect. Such action may include:

(i) Consistent with federal and state law:

(A) Removing the alleged perpetrator from the school;

(B) Increasing the degree of supervision of the alleged perpetrator; and

(C) Initiating appropriate disciplinary action against the alleged perpetrator;

(ii) Provision of increased training and increased supervision to volunteers and staff pertinent to the prevention and remediation of abuse and neglect;

(iii) Temporary removal of the students from a program and reassignment of the students within the school, as an emergency measure, if it is determined that there is a risk to the health or safety of such students in remaining in that program. Whenever a student is removed, pursuant to this subsection (2)(b)(iii), from a special education program or service specified in his or her individualized education program, the action shall be reviewed in an individualized education program meeting; and

(iv) Provision of counseling to the students involved in the report or any other students, as appropriate;

(c) Corrective action plans. Upon receipt of the results of an investigation by the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families pursuant to a report of suspected child abuse or neglect, the superintendent or the director, or the director's designee, after consideration of any recommendations by the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families for preventive and remedial action, shall implement a written plan of action designed to assure the continued health and safety of students and to provide for the prevention of future acts of abuse or neglect.

Sec. 6. RCW 72.40.280 and 2009 c 381 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families must periodically monitor the residential program at the state school for the deaf, including but not limited to examining the residential-related policies and procedures as well as the residential facilities. The department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families must make recommendations to the director and the board of trustees of the center or its successor board on health and safety improvements related to child safety and well-being. The department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families must conduct the monitoring reviews at least annually. The director or the director's designee may from time to time request technical assistance from the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families.

(2) ((The department of social and health services must conduct a comprehensive child health and safety review, as defined in rule, of the residential program at the state school for the deaf every three years.

(3))) The state school for the deaf must provide the department of ((social and health services'))children, youth, and families' staff with full and complete access to all records and documents that the department staff may request to carry out the requirements of this section. The department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families must have full and complete access to all students and staff of the state school for the deaf to conduct interviews to carry out the requirements of this section.

(((4)))(3) For the purposes of this section, the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families must use the safety standards established in this chapter when conducting the reviews.

Sec. 7. RCW 74.15.125 and 1995 c 302 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may issue a probationary license to a licensee who has had a license but is temporarily unable to comply with a rule or has been the subject of multiple complaints or concerns about noncompliance if:

(a) The noncompliance does not present an immediate threat to the health and well-being of the children but would be likely to do so if allowed to continue; and

(b) The licensee has a plan approved by the department to correct the area of noncompliance within the probationary period.

(2) A probationary license may be issued for up to six months, and at the discretion of the department it may be extended for an additional six months. The department shall immediately terminate the probationary license, if at any time the noncompliance for which the probationary license was issued presents an immediate threat to the health or well-being of the children.

(3) The department may, at any time, issue a probationary license for due cause that states the conditions of probation.

(4) An existing license is invalidated when a probationary license is issued.

(5) At the expiration of the probationary license, the department shall reinstate the original license for the remainder of its term, issue a new license, or revoke the original license.

(6) A right to an adjudicative proceeding shall not accrue to the licensee whose license has been placed on probationary status unless the licensee does not agree with the placement on probationary status and the department then suspends, revokes, or modifies the license.

(7)(a) The department may issue a child-specific license to individuals listed in RCW 13.34.030(21) who opt to become licensed for placement of relative children in the department's care, custody, and control.

(b) Such individuals must meet all minimum licensing requirements for foster family homes established pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 and are subject to child-specific license criteria, which the department is authorized to establish by rule.

(c) For purposes of federal funding, a child-specific license is considered a full license with all of the rights and responsibilities of a foster family home license, except that at the discretion of the department the licensee may only receive placement of specific children who are related to the licensee.

(d) Placement with a relative who holds a child-specific license is subject to the department's sole discretion. A child-specific license does not confer upon the licensee a right to placement of a particular child, nor does it confer party status in any proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.216.015 and 2019 c 429 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department of children, youth, and families is created as an executive branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. The vision for the department is that Washington state's children and youth grow up safe and healthy—thriving physically, emotionally, and academically, nurtured by family and community.

(b) The department, in partnership with state and local agencies, tribes, and communities, shall protect children and youth from harm and promote healthy development with effective, high quality prevention, intervention, and early education services delivered in an equitable manner. An important role for the department shall be to provide preventative services to help secure and preserve families in crisis. The department shall partner with the federally recognized Indian tribes to develop effective services for youth and families while respecting the sovereignty of those tribes and the government-to-government relationship. Nothing in chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. alters the duties, requirements, and policies of the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Secs. 1901 through 1963, as amended, or the Indian child welfare act, chapter 13.38 RCW.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, the department must develop definitions for, work plans to address, and metrics to measure the outcomes for children, youth, and families served by the department and must work with state agencies to ensure services for children, youth, and families are science-based, outcome-driven, data-informed, and collaborative.

(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2018, the department must establish short and long-term population level outcome measure goals, including metrics regarding reducing disparities by family income, race, and ethnicity in each outcome.

(b) The department must report to the legislature on outcome measures, actions taken, progress toward these goals, and plans for the future year, no less than annually, beginning December 1, 2018.

(c) The outcome measures must include, but are not limited to:

(i) Improving child development and school readiness through voluntary, high quality early learning opportunities as measured by: (A) Increasing the number and proportion of children kindergarten-ready as measured by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WAKids) assessment including mathematics; (B) increasing the proportion of children in early learning programs that have achieved the level 3 or higher early achievers quality standard; and (C) increasing the available supply of licensed child care in both child care centers and family homes, including providers not receiving state subsidy;

(ii) Preventing child abuse and neglect;

(iii) Improving child and youth safety, permanency, and well-being as measured by: (A) Reducing the number of children entering out-of-home care; (B) reducing a child's length of stay in out-of-home care; (C) reducing maltreatment of youth while in out-of-home care; (D) licensing more foster homes than there are children in foster care; (E) reducing the number of children that reenter out-of-home care within twelve months; (F) increasing the stability of placements for children in out-of-home care; and (G) developing strategies to demonstrate to foster families that their service and involvement is highly valued by the department, as demonstrated by the development of strategies to consult with foster families regarding future placement of a foster child currently placed with a foster family;

(iv) Improving reconciliation of children and youth with their families as measured by: (A) Increasing family reunification; and (B) increasing the number of youth who are reunified with their family of origin;

(v) In collaboration with county juvenile justice programs, improving adolescent outcomes including reducing multisystem involvement and homelessness; and increasing school graduation rates and successful transitions to adulthood for youth involved in the child welfare and juvenile justice systems;

(vi) Reducing future demand for mental health and substance use disorder treatment for youth involved in the child welfare and juvenile justice systems;

(vii) In collaboration with county juvenile justice programs, reducing criminal justice involvement and recidivism as measured by: (A) An increase in the number of youth who successfully complete the terms of diversion or alternative sentencing options; (B) a decrease in the number of youth who commit subsequent crimes; and (C) eliminating the discharge of youth from institutional settings into homelessness; and

(viii) Reducing racial and ethnic disproportionality and disparities in system involvement and across child and youth outcomes in collaboration with other state agencies.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2018, the department must:

(a) Lead ongoing collaborative work to minimize or eliminate systemic barriers to effective, integrated services in collaboration with state agencies serving children, youth, and families;

(b) Identify necessary improvements and updates to statutes relevant to their responsibilities and proposing legislative changes to the governor no less than biennially;

(c) Help create a data-focused environment in which there are aligned outcomes and shared accountability for achieving those outcomes, with shared, real-time data that is accessible to authorized persons interacting with the family, child, or youth to identify what is needed and which services would be effective;

(d) Lead the provision of state services to adolescents, focusing on key transition points for youth, including exiting foster care and institutions, and coordinating with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to address the unique needs of homeless youth; and

(e) Create and annually update a list of the rights and responsibilities of foster parents in partnership with foster parent representatives. The list of foster parent rights and responsibilities must be posted on the department's web site, provided to individuals participating in a foster parent orientation before licensure, provided to foster parents in writing at the time of licensure, and provided to foster parents applying for license renewal.

(5) The department is accountable to the public. To ensure transparency, beginning December 30, 2018, agency performance data for the services provided by the department, including outcome data for contracted services, must be available to the public, consistent with confidentiality laws, federal protections, and individual rights to privacy. Publicly available data must include budget and funding decisions, performance-based contracting data, including data for contracted services, and performance data on metrics identified in this section. The board must work with the secretary and director to develop the most effective and cost-efficient ways to make department data available to the public, including making this data readily available on the department's web site.

(6) The department shall ensure that all new and renewed contracts for services are performance-based.

(7) The department must execute all new and renewed contracts for services in accordance with this section and consistent with RCW 74.13B.020. When contracted services are managed through a network administrator or other third party, the department must execute data-sharing agreements with the entities managing the contracts to track provider performance measures. Contracts with network administrators or other third parties must provide the contract administrator the ability to shift resources from one provider to another, to evaluate individual provider performance, to add or delete services in consultation with the department, and to reinvest savings from increased efficiencies into new or improved services in their catchment area. Whenever possible, contractor performance data must be made available to the public, consistent with confidentiality laws and individual rights to privacy.

(8)(a) The board shall begin its work and call the first meeting of the board on or after July 1, 2018. The board shall immediately assume the duties of the legislative children's oversight committee, as provided for in RCW 74.13.570 and assume the full functions of the board as provided for in this section by July 1, 2019. The office of innovation, alignment, and accountability shall provide quarterly updates regarding the implementation of the department to the board between July 1, 2018, and July 1, 2019.

(b) The office of the family and children's ombuds shall establish the board. The board is authorized for the purpose of monitoring and ensuring that the department achieves the stated outcomes of chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess., and complies with administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules, and policies pertaining to early learning, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and children and family services.

(9)(a) The board shall consist of the following members:

(i) Two senators and two representatives from the legislature with one member from each major caucus;

(ii) One nonvoting representative from the governor's office;

(iii) One subject matter expert in early learning;

(iv) One subject matter expert in child welfare;

(v) One subject matter expert in juvenile rehabilitation and justice;

(vi) One subject matter expert in reducing disparities in child outcomes by family income and race and ethnicity;

(vii) One tribal representative from west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(viii) One tribal representative from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(ix) One current or former foster parent representative;

(x) One representative of an organization that advocates for the best interest of the child;

(xi) One parent stakeholder group representative;

(xii) One law enforcement representative;

(xiii) One child welfare caseworker representative;

(xiv) One early childhood learning program implementation practitioner;

(xv) One current or former foster youth under age twenty-five;

(xvi) One individual under age twenty-five with current or previous experience with the juvenile justice system;

(xvii) One physician with experience working with children or youth; and

(xviii) One judicial representative presiding over child welfare court proceedings or other children's matters.

(b) The senate members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the senate. The house of representatives members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives. Members shall be appointed before the close of each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year.

(c) The remaining board members shall be nominated by the governor, subject to the approval of the appointed legislators by majority vote, and serve four-year terms. When nominating and approving members after July 28, 2019, the governor and appointed legislators must ensure that at least five of the board members reside east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(10) The board has the following powers, which may be exercised by majority vote of the board:

(a) To receive reports of the office of the family and children's ombuds;

(b) To obtain access to all relevant records in the possession of the office of the family and children's ombuds, except as prohibited by law;

(c) To select its officers and adoption of rules for orderly procedure;

(d) To request investigations by the office of the family and children's ombuds of administrative acts;

(e) To request and receive information, outcome data, documents, materials, and records from the department relating to children and family welfare, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and early learning;

(f) To determine whether the department is achieving the performance measures;

(g) If final review is requested by a licensee, to review whether department licensors appropriately and consistently applied agency rules ((in child care facility licensing compliance agreements as defined in RCW 43.216.395))on inspection reports that do not involve a violation of health and safety standards as defined in RCW 43.216.395 in cases that have already been reviewed by the internal review process described in RCW 43.216.395 with the authority to overturn, change, or uphold such decisions;

(h) To conduct annual reviews of a sample of department contracts for services from a variety of program and service areas to ensure that those contracts are performance-based and to assess the measures included in each contract; and

(i) Upon receipt of records or data from the office of the family and children's ombuds or the department, the board is subject to the same confidentiality restrictions as the office of the family and children's ombuds is under RCW 43.06A.050. The provisions of RCW 43.06A.060 also apply to the board.

(11) The board has general oversight over the performance and policies of the department and shall provide advice and input to the department and the governor.

(12) The board must no less than twice per year convene stakeholder meetings to allow feedback to the board regarding contracting with the department, departmental use of local, state, private, and federal funds, and other matters as relating to carrying out the duties of the department.

(13) The board shall review existing surveys of providers, customers, parent groups, and external services to assess whether the department is effectively delivering services, and shall conduct additional surveys as needed to assess whether the department is effectively delivering services.

(14) The board is subject to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, except to the extent disclosure of records or information is otherwise confidential under state or federal law.

(15) Records or information received by the board is confidential to the extent permitted by state or federal law. This subsection does not create an exception for records covered by RCW 13.50.100.

(16) The board members shall receive no compensation for their service on the board, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while conducting business of the board when authorized by the board and within resources allocated for this purpose, except appointed legislators who shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(17) The board shall select, by majority vote, an executive director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the board and shall be responsible for carrying out the policies adopted by the board. The executive director is exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and shall serve at the pleasure of the board established in this section.

(18) The board shall maintain a staff not to exceed one full-time equivalent employee. The board-selected executive director of the board is responsible for coordinating staff appointments.

(19) The board shall issue an annual report to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year with an initial report delivered by December 1, 2019. The report must review the department's progress towards meeting stated performance measures and desired performance outcomes, and must also include a review of the department's strategic plan, policies, and rules.

(20) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Board" means the oversight board for children, youth, and families established in subsection (8) of this section.

(b) "Director" means the director of the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability.

(c) "Performance-based contract" means results-oriented contracting that focuses on the quality or outcomes that tie at least a portion of the contractor's payment, contract extensions, or contract renewals to the achievement of specific measurable performance standards and requirements.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.44.010 and 1995 c 369 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her authorized deputy, shall have authority at all times of day and night, in the performance of duties imposed by this chapter, to enter upon and examine any building or premises where any fire has occurred and other buildings and premises adjoining or near thereto.

(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her authorized deputy, shall have authority at any reasonable hour to enter into any public building or premises or any building or premises used for public purposes to inspect for fire hazards, except that the local fire authority shall inspect child day care centers as defined in RCW 43.216.010(1)(a). However, if the local fire authority cannot complete such an inspection, then the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall complete the inspection.

--- END ---