BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.300.801 and 2009 c 410 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative youth advisory council is established to examine issues of importance to youth, including but not limited to education, employment, strategies to increase youth participation in state and municipal government, safe environments for youth, substance abuse, emotional and physical health, foster care, poverty, homelessness, and youth access to services on a statewide and municipal basis.

(2) The council consists of at least twenty-two members as provided in this subsection who, at the time of appointment, are aged fourteen to eighteen. The council shall select a chair from among its members.

(3) ((Except for initial members, members))Members shall serve two-year terms, and if eligible, may be reappointed for subsequent two-year terms. ((One-half of the initial members shall be appointed to one-year terms, and these appointments shall be made in such a way as to preserve overall representation on the committee.))

(4)(a) ((By July 2, 2007, and annually thereafter, students))Students may apply annually to be considered for participation in the program by completing an online application form and submitting the application to the legislative youth advisory council. The council may develop selection criteria and an application review process. The council shall recommend candidates whose names will be submitted to the office of the lieutenant governor for final selection. ((Beginning May 7, 2009, the))The office of the lieutenant governor shall notify all applicants of the final selections ((using existing staff and resources)).

(b) ((Within existing staff and resources, the))The office of the lieutenant governor shall make the application available on the lieutenant governor's web site.

(5) ((If the council has sufficient funds from any source, then))Subject to the approval of the office of the lieutenant governor, the council shall have the following duties:

(a) Advising the legislature on proposed and pending legislation, including state budget expenditures and policy matters relating to youth;

(b) Advising the standing committees of the legislature and study commissions, committees, and task forces regarding issues relating to youth;

(c) Conducting periodic seminars for its members regarding leadership, government, and the legislature;

(d) Accepting and soliciting for grants and donations from public and private sources to support the activities of the council; and

(e) Reporting annually by December 1st to the legislature on its activities, including proposed legislation that implements recommendations of the council.

(6) ((If the council has sufficient funds from any source, then in))In carrying out its duties under this section, the council ((may))must meet at least three times ((but not more than six times)) per year. ((The council shall consider conducting at least some of the meetings via the K-20 telecommunications network.))The council is encouraged to use technology, such as remote video conferencing technology, to facilitate members' participation in meetings. The council is encouraged to invite local state legislators to participate in the meetings. The council is encouraged to poll other students in order to get a broad perspective on ((the)) various policy issues. The council is encouraged to use technology to conduct ((the)) polling((, including the council's web site, if the council has a web site)).

(7) ((If the council has sufficient funds from any source, then members shall))Members may be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(8) ((If sufficient funds are available from any source, beginning with May 7, 2009, the))The office of ((superintendent of public instruction))the lieutenant governor shall provide administration, ((coordination))supervision, and facilitation ((assistance))support to the council. In facilitating the program, the office of the lieutenant governor may collaborate with the association of Washington generals established in RCW 43.15.030. The senate and house of representatives may provide policy and fiscal briefings and assistance with drafting proposed legislation. The senate and the house of representatives shall each develop internal policies relating to staff assistance provided to the council. Such policies may include applicable internal personnel and practices guidelines, resource use and expense reimbursement guidelines, and applicable ethics mandates. Provision of funds, resources, and staff, as well as the assignment and direction of staff, remains at all times within the sole discretion of the chamber making the provision.

(9) The office of the lieutenant governor, ((the office of the superintendent of public instruction,)) the legislature, any agency of the legislature, and any official or employee of such office or agency are immune from liability for any injury that is incurred by or caused by a member of the legislative youth advisory council and that occurs while the member of the council is performing duties of the council or is otherwise engaged in activities or receiving services for which reimbursement is allowed under subsection (7) of this section. The immunity provided by this subsection does not apply to an injury intentionally caused by the act or omission of an employee or official of ((the superintendent of public instruction or)) the office of the lieutenant governor, the legislature, or any agency of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.801 is recodified as a section in chapter 43.15 RCW.

--- END ---