BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

2019-2021 FISCAL BIENNIUM

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 101. 2019 c 416 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,403,000))

$1,419,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($116,000))

$121,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,819,000))

$1,840,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $300,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management, in direct coordination with the office of state treasurer, to evaluate, coordinate, and assist in efforts by state agencies in developing cost recovery mechanisms for credit card and other financial transaction fees currently paid from state funds. This may include disbursing interagency reimbursements for the implementation costs incurred by the affected agencies. As part of the first phase of this effort, the office of financial management, with the assistance of relevant agencies, must develop implementation plans and take all necessary steps to ensure that the actual cost-recovery mechanisms will be in place by January 1, 2020, for the vehicles and drivers programs of the department of licensing. By November 1, 2019, the office of financial management must provide a report to the joint transportation committee on the phase 1 implementation plan and options to expand similar cost recovery mechanisms to other state agencies and programs, including the ferries division.

(2) Within existing resources, the office of financial management shall issue a request for information for an account-based system capable of processing state tolling, state ferry ticketing and reservations, and state parks discover pass transactions.

Sec. 102. 2019 c 416 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,357,000))

$1,358,000

Sec. 103. 2019 c 416 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS

Pilotage Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,228,000))

$6,037,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,125,000 of the pilotage account—state appropriation is provided solely for self-insurance liability premium expenditures; however, this appropriation is contingent upon the board:

(a) Annually depositing the first one hundred fifty thousand dollars collected through Puget Sound pilotage district pilotage tariffs into the pilotage account; and

(b) Assessing a self-insurance premium surcharge of sixteen dollars per pilotage assignment on vessels requiring pilotage in the Puget Sound pilotage district.

(2) The board of pilotage commissioners shall file the annual report to the governor and chairs of the transportation committees required under RCW 88.16.035(1)(f) by September 1, 2019, and annually thereafter. The report must include the continuation of policies and procedures necessary to increase the diversity of pilots, trainees, and applicants, including a diversity action plan. The diversity action plan must articulate a comprehensive vision of the board's diversity goals and the steps it will take to reach those goals.

Sec. 104. 2019 c 416 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,861,000))

$3,081,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 201. 2019 c 416 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,588,000))

$4,672,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,035,000))

$27,047,000

Highway Safety Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$118,000

School Zone Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$850,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($32,591,000))

$32,687,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $150,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 54 (((Substitute Senate Bill No. 5710))), Laws of 2019 (Cooper Jones Active Transportation Safety Council). If chapter 54 (((Substitute Senate Bill No. 5710))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(2) The Washington traffic safety commission may oversee a pilot program in up to three cities implementing the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras in zones that have been designated by ordinance as "Stay Out of Areas of Racing."

(a) Any programs authorized by the commission must be authorized by December 31, ((2019))2020.

(b) If a city has established an authorized automated vehicle noise enforcement camera pilot program under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the system.

(c) Any city administering a pilot program overseen by the traffic safety commission shall use the following guidelines to administer the program:

(i) Automated vehicle noise enforcement camera may record photographs or audio of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only while a violation is occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle;

(ii) The law enforcement agency of the city or county government shall ((plainly mark the locations))install two signs facing opposite directions within two hundred feet, or otherwise consistent with the uniform manual on traffic control devices, where the automated vehicle noise enforcement camera is used ((by placing signs on street locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws violations are being detected by automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras that record both audio and video))that state "Street Racing Noise Pilot Program in Progress";

(iii) Cities testing the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras must ((provide periodic notice by mail to its residents))post information on the city web site and notify local media outlets indicating the zones in which the automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras will be used;

(iv) A city may only issue a warning notice with no penalty for a violation detected by automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras in a Stay Out of Areas of Racing zone. Warning notices must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle within fourteen days of the detected violation;

(v) A violation detected through the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras is not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120;

(vi) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, videos, microphotographs, audio recordings, or electronic images prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding. No photograph, microphotograph, audio recording, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other than the issuance of warnings for violations under this section or retained longer than necessary to issue a warning notice as required under this subsection (2); and

(vii) By June 30, 2021, the participating cities shall provide a report to the commission and appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, warnings issued, data retention and use, and other relevant issues regarding automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.

(3) The Washington traffic safety commission may oversee a demonstration project in one county, coordinating with a public transportation benefit area (PTBA) and the department of transportation, to test the feasibility and accuracy of the use of automated enforcement technology for high occupancy vehicle (HOV) lane passenger compliance. All costs associated with the demonstration project must be borne by the participating public transportation benefit area. Any photograph, microphotograph, or electronic images of a driver or passengers are for the exclusive use of the PTBA in the determination of whether a HOV passenger violation has occurred to test the feasibility accuracy of automated enforcement under this subsection and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding. All photographs, microphotographs, and electronic images must be destroyed after determining a passenger count and no later than the completion of the demonstration project. No warnings or notices of infraction may be issued under the demonstration project.

For purposes of the demonstration project, an automated enforcement technology device may record an image of a driver and passenger of a motor vehicle. The county and PTBA must erect signs marking the locations where the automated enforcement for HOV passenger requirements is occurring.

The PTBA, in consultation with the Washington traffic safety commission, must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature with the number of violations detected during the demonstration project, whether the technology used was accurate and any recommendations for future use of automated enforcement technology for HOV lane enforcement by June 30, 2021.

Sec. 202. 2019 c 416 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,137,000))

$1,127,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,803,000))

$2,780,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,677,000))

$1,662,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,617,000))

$5,569,000

Sec. 203. 2019 c 416 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,526,000))

$3,825,000

Sec. 204. 2019 c 416 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,938,000))

$1,936,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($750,000))

$682,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$275,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,963,000))

$2,893,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $400,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct a comprehensive assessment of statewide transportation needs and priorities, and existing and potential transportation funding mechanisms to address those needs and priorities. The assessment must include: (a) Recommendations on the critical state and local transportation projects, programs, and services needed to achieve an efficient, effective, statewide transportation system over the next ten years; (b) a comprehensive menu of funding options for the legislature to consider to address the identified transportation system investments; ((and)) (c) recommendations on whether a revision to the statewide transportation policy goals in RCW 47.04.280 is warranted in light of the recommendations and options identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection; and (d) an analysis of the economic impacts of a range of future transportation investments. The assessment must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2020. Starting July 1, 2020, and concluding by December 31, 2020, a committee-appointed commission or panel shall review the assessment and make final recommendations to the legislature for consideration during the 2021 legislative session on a realistic, achievable plan for funding transportation programs, projects, and services over the next ten years including a timeline for legislative action on funding the identified transportation system needs shortfall.

(2)(a) (($450,000))$382,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct an analysis of the electrification of public fleets in Washington state. The study must include the following:

(i) An inventory of existing public fleets for the state of Washington, counties, a sampling of cities, and public transit agencies. The inventory must differentiate among battery and fuel cell electric vehicles, hybrid vehicles, gasoline powered vehicles, and any other functional categories. Three cities from each of the following population ranges must be selected for the analysis:

(A) Population up to and including twenty-five thousand;

(B) Population greater than twenty-five thousand and up to and including fifty thousand;

(C) Population greater than fifty thousand and up to and including one hundred thousand;

(D) Population greater than one hundred thousand;

(ii) A review of currently available battery and fuel cell electric vehicle alternatives to the vehicle types most commonly used by the state, counties, cities, and public transit agencies. The review must include:

(A) The average vehicle cost differential among the commercially available fuel options;

(B) A cost benefit analysis of the conversion of different vehicle classes; and

(C) Recommendations for the types of vehicles that should be excluded from consideration due to insufficient alternatives, unreliable technology, or excessive cost;

(iii) The projected costs of achieving substantial conversion to battery and/or fuel cell electric fleets by 2025, 2030, and 2035 for the state, counties, cities, and public transit agencies. This cost estimate must include:

(A) Vehicle acquisition costs, charging and refueling infrastructure costs, and other associated costs;

(B) Financial constraints of each type of entity to transition to an electric vehicle fleet; and

(C) Any other identified barriers to transitioning to a battery and/or fuel cell electric vehicle fleet;

(iv) Identification and analysis of financing mechanisms that could be used to finance the transition of publicly owned vehicles to battery and fuel cell electric vehicles. These mechanisms include, but are not limited to: Energy or carbon savings performance contracting, utility grants and rebates, revolving loan funds, state grant programs, private third-party financing, fleet management services, leasing, vehicle use optimization, and vehicle to grid technology; and

(v) The predicted number and location profile of electric vehicle fueling stations needed statewide to provide fueling for the fleets of the state, counties, cities, and public transit agencies.

(b) In developing and implementing the study, the joint transportation committee must solicit input from representatives of the department of enterprise services, the department of transportation, the department of licensing, the department of commerce, the Washington state association of counties, the association of Washington cities, the Washington state transit association, transit agencies, and others as deemed appropriate.

(c) The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by September 30, 2020.

(3)(a) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct a study of the feasibility of an east-west intercity passenger rail system. The study must include the following elements:

(i) Projections of potential ridership;

(ii) Review of relevant planning studies;

(iii) Establishment of an advisory group and associated meetings;

(iv) Development of a Stampede Pass corridor alignment to maximize ridership, revenue, and rationale, considering service to population centers: Auburn, Cle Elum, Yakima, Tri-Cities, Ellensburg, Toppenish, and Spokane;

(v) Assessment of current infrastructure conditions, including station stop locations;

(vi) Identification of equipment needs; and

(vii) Identification of operator options.

(b) A report of the study findings and recommendations is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2020.

(4)(a) $275,000 of the highway safety fund—state appropriation is for a study of vehicle subagents in Washington state. The study must consider and include recommendations, as necessary, on the following:

(i) The relevant statutes, rules, and/or regulations authorizing vehicle subagents and any changes made to the relevant statutes, rules, and/or regulations;

(ii) The current process of selecting and authorizing a vehicle subagent, including the change of ownership process and the identification of any barriers to entry into the vehicle subagent market;

(iii) The annual business expenditures borne by each of the vehicle subagent businesses since fiscal year 2010 and identification of any materials, including office equipment and supplies, provided by the department of licensing to each vehicle subagent since fiscal year 2010. To accomplish this task, each vehicle subagent must provide expenditure data to the joint transportation committee for the purposes of this study;

(iv) The oversight provided by the county auditors and/or the department of licensing over the vehicle subagent businesses;

(v) The history of service fees, how increases to the service fee rate are made, and how the requested fee increase is determined;

(vi) The online vehicle registration renewal process and any potential improvements to the online process;

(vii) The department of licensing's ability to provide more vehicle licensing services directly, particularly taking into account the increase in online vehicle renewal transactions;

(viii) The potential expansion of services that can be performed by vehicle subagents; and

(ix) The process by which the geographic locations of vehicle subagents are determined.

(b) In conducting the study, the joint transportation committee must consult with the department of licensing, a representative of county auditors, and a representative of vehicle subagents.

(c) The joint transportation committee may collect any data from the department of licensing, county auditors, and vehicle subagents that is necessary to conduct the study.

(d) The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by September 30, 2020.

Sec. 205. 2019 c 416 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,893,000))

$2,171,000

((Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$112,000))

Interstate 405 and state Route Number 167 Express Toll Lanes ((Operations))

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($250,000))

$410,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$271,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$158,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$136,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,255,000))

$3,146,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The commission shall reconvene the road usage charge steering committee, with the same membership described in chapter 297, Laws of 2018, and shall report at least once every three months to the steering committee with updates on report development for the completed road usage charge pilot project until the final report is submitted. The final report on the road usage charge pilot project is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2020, and should include recommendations for necessary next steps to consider impacts to communities of color, low-income households, vulnerable populations, and displaced communities. Any legislative vacancies on the steering committee must be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives for a house of representatives member vacancy, and by the president of the senate for a senate member vacancy.

(b) The commission shall coordinate with the department of transportation to jointly seek federal funds available through the federal surface transportation system funding alternatives grant program, applying toll credits for meeting match requirements. One or more grant applications may be developed that, at a minimum, propose to:

(i)(A) Update the recommended road usage charge operational concepts and business case presented to the road usage charge steering committee to reflect a range of scenarios regarding fleet electrification and use of shared vehicles. The operational concepts must include technological or system features necessary to ensure collection of the road usage charge from electric vehicles and fleets of shared and/or autonomous vehicles, if applicable. The business case must assess a range of gross revenue impacts to a road usage charge and fuel taxes resulting from changes to total vehicle miles traveled under scenarios with varying degrees of shared, autonomous, and/or electric vehicle adoption rates;

(B) Develop a detailed plan for phasing in the implementation of road usage charges for vehicles operated in Washington, incorporating any updates to road usage charge policy recommendations made in (a) and (b)(i)(A) of this subsection and including consideration of methods for reducing the cost of collections for a road usage charge system in Washington state; and

(C) Examine the allocation of current gas tax revenues and possible frameworks for the allocation of road usage charge revenues that could be used to evaluate policy choices once road usage charge revenues comprise a significant share of state revenues for transportation purposes.

(ii) A year-end report on the status of any federally-funded project for which federal funding is secured must be provided to the governor's office and the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2020.

(c) If additional federal funding becomes available after January 1, 2020, the transportation commission, jointly with the department of licensing, must develop an implementation plan for imposing a per mile fee on electric, hybrid, and state fleet vehicles that builds off the ongoing work of the transportation commission in evaluating a road usage charge. The plan must include, but is not limited to:

(i) Different mileage reporting options;

(ii) Recommended fee methods and rates for achieving cost efficiency, fairness, minimal administrative cost, payment compliance, consumer choice, and preserving individual privacy;

(iii) Options for variable rates based on the factors listed in (c)(ii) of this subsection and vehicle classifications of vehicles, ensuring vehicles are paying for their proportional impact on road preservation and maintenance costs, climate emission impacts, fuel efficiency, or other policy levers that the legislature may want to consider;

(iv) Alternatives in the payment method to allow for monthly or quarterly payment rather than payment on an annual basis;

(v) Any recommended statutory changes, including suggested offsets or rebates to the per mile fee to recognize other taxes and fees paid by electric and hybrid vehicle owners;

(vi) Specific recommendations to better align the system with other vehicle-related charges and potentially establish the framework for broader implementation of a per mile funding system, including analysis of the preferred method for addressing eighteenth amendment restriction considerations and options to incorporate existing gas tax distributions and allocations into a per mile funding system at the time these revenues comprise a significant share of state revenues for transportation purposes; and

(vii) A recommended implementation and governance structure, and transition plan with the department as the designated lead agency to operate and administer the per mile funding system.

(2)(a) $250,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes ((operations)) account—state appropriation is provided solely for the transportation commission to conduct a study, applicable to the Interstate 405 express toll lanes, of discounted tolls and other similar programs for low-income drivers that are provided by other states, countries, or other entities and how such a program could be implemented in the state of Washington. The transportation commission may contract with a consultant to conduct all or a portion of this study.

(b) In conducting this study, the transportation commission shall consult with both the department of transportation and the department of social and health services.

(c) The transportation commission shall, at a minimum, consider the following issues when conducting the study of discounted tolls and other similar programs for low-income drivers:

(i) The benefits, requirements, and any potential detriments to the users of a program;

(ii) The most cost-effective way to implement a program given existing financial commitments, shared cost requirements across facilities, and technical requirements to execute and maintain a program;

(iii) The implications of a program for tolling policies, revenues, costs, operations, and enforcement; and

(iv) Any implications to tolled facilities based on the type of tolling implemented on a particular facility.

(d) The transportation commission shall provide a report detailing the findings of this study and recommendations for implementing a discounted toll or other appropriate program in the state of Washington to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021.

(3) $160,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $271,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $158,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $136,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the transportation commission's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2020, the commission shall convene a ferry capital construction oversight committee. The committee shall meet at least two times every year to review the Washington state ferries capital construction plan and make recommendations to control costs and ensure that ferry capital investments meet projected future needs. The commission shall support the committee within existing resources. Members of the committee must include at least four citizen representatives from communities served by Washington state ferries.

(5) The legislature requests that the commission commence proceedings to name state route number 165 as The Glacier Highway to commemorate the significance of glaciers to the state of Washington.

Sec. 206. 2019 c 416 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($813,000))

$772,000

Sec. 207. 2019 c 416 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($508,503,000))

$498,832,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,069,000))

$16,078,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,257,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,188,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,010,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($286,000))

$4,286,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,182,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,988,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,158,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$996,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($537,313,000))

$536,975,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(2) $510,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ignition interlock program at the Washington state patrol to provide funding for two staff to work and provide support for the program in working with manufacturers, service centers, technicians, and participants in the program.

(3) $1,424,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely to enter into an agreement for upgraded land mobile software, hardware, and equipment.

(4) $2,582,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of radios and other related equipment.

(5) $343,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for aerial criminal investigation tools, including software licensing and maintenance, and annual certification.

(6) $514,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional staff to address the increase in the number of toxicology cases from impaired driving and death investigations.

(7) $580,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of and administrative support to the license investigation unit to enforce vehicle registration laws in southwestern Washington. The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of revenue, shall maintain a running estimate of the additional vehicle registration fees, sales and use taxes, and local vehicle fees remitted to the state pursuant to activity conducted by the license investigation unit. Beginning October 1, 2019, and quarterly thereafter, the Washington state patrol shall submit a report detailing the additional revenue amounts generated since July 1, 2017, to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. At the end of the calendar quarter in which it is estimated that more than $625,000 in state sales and use taxes have been remitted to the state since July 1, 2017, the Washington state patrol shall notify the state treasurer and the state treasurer shall transfer funds pursuant to section 406 ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2019.

(8) $18,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the license investigation unit to procure an additional license plate reader and related costs.

(9) The Washington state patrol and the office of financial management must be consulted by the department of transportation during the design phase of any improvement or preservation project that could impact Washington state patrol weigh station operations. During the design phase of any such project, the department of transportation must estimate the cost of designing around the affected weigh station's current operations, as well as the cost of moving the affected weigh station.

(10) $4,210,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for a third arming and a third trooper basic training class. The cadet class is expected to graduate in June 2021.

(11) $65,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 440 (((Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497))), Laws of 2019 (immigrants in the workplace). If chapter 440 (((Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(12)(a) The Washington state patrol must report quarterly to the house and senate transportation committees on the status of recruitment and retention activities as follows:

(i) A summary of recruitment and retention strategies;

(ii) The number of transportation funded staff vacancies by major category;

(iii) The number of applicants for each of the positions by these categories;

(iv) The composition of workforce; and

(v) Other relevant outcome measures with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years.

(b) By January 1, 2020, the Washington state patrol must submit to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor a workforce diversity plan. The plan must identify ongoing, and both short-term and long-term, specific comprehensive outreach and recruitment strategies to increase populations underrepresented within both commissioned and noncommissioned employee groups.

(13) $1,182,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $1,988,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $1,158,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $996,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington state patrol's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations and enforcement for the respective tolling facilities.

(14) $100,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6218, Laws of 2020 (Washington state patrol retirement definition of salary), which reflects an increase in the Washington state patrol retirement system pension contribution rate of 0.15 percent for changes to the definition of salary. If Senate Bill No. 6218, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(15) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for the state patrol and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

(16) The Washington state patrol is directed to terminate its "Agreement for Utility Connection and Reimbursement of Water Extension Expenses" with the city of Shelton, belatedly recorded on June 12, 2017, subject to the city of Shelton's consent to terminate the agreement. The legislature finds that the water connection extension constructed by the Washington state patrol from the city of Shelton's water facilities to the Washington state patrol academy was necessary to meet the water supply needs of the academy. The legislature also finds that the water connection provides an ongoing water supply that is necessary to the operation of the training facility, that the state is making use of the water connection for these public activities, and that any future incidental use of the municipal infrastructure put in place to support these activities will not impede the Washington state patrol's ongoing use of the water connection extension. Therefore, the legislature determines that under the public policy of this state, reimbursement by any other entity is not required, notwithstanding any prior condition regarding contributions of other entities that Washington state patrol was required to satisfy prior to expenditure of the funds for construction of the extension, and that the Washington state patrol shall terminate the agreement.

Sec. 208. 2019 c 416 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,044,000))

$5,048,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($536,000))

$561,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($243,189,000))

$241,859,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,294,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($77,219,000))

$72,812,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$186,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,858,000))

$10,008,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,143,000))

$5,777,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,012,000))

$7,654,000

License Plate Technology Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,250,000

Abandoned Recreational Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,925,000

Limousine Carriers Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$113,000

Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$264,000

DOL Technology Improvement & Data Management

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,250,000

Agency Financial Transaction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,903,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($365,770,000))

$366,939,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $139,000 of the motorcycle safety education account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 65 (((Substitute House Bill No. 1116))), Laws of 2019 (motorcycle safety). If chapter 65 (((Substitute House Bill No. 1116))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(2) $404,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for a new driver testing system at the department. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and 46.82.310, the department is authorized to increase driver training school license application and renewal fees in fiscal years 2020 and 2021, as necessary to fully support the cost of activities related to administration of the driver training school program, including the cost of the new driver testing system described in this subsection.

(3) $25,000 of the motorcycle safety education account—state appropriation, $4,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation, $1,708,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation, $576,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $22,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation, and $28,000 of the department of licensing services account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to fund the appropriate staff((, other than data stewards,)) and necessary equipment and software for data management, data analytics, and data compliance activities. The department must, in consultation with the office of the chief information officer, construct a framework with goals for providing better data stewardship and a plan to achieve those goals. The department must provide the framework and plan to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2019, and an update by May 1, 2020. Appropriations provided for the data stewardship and privacy project described in this subsection are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(4) Appropriations provided for the cloud continuity of operations project in this section are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(((6)))(5) $24,028,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs necessary to accommodate increased demand for enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards. The department shall report on a quarterly basis on the use of these funds, associated workload, and information with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years. The report must include detailed statewide and by licensing service office information on staffing levels, average monthly wait times, the number of enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards issued/renewed, and the number of primary drivers' licenses and identicards issued/renewed. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall implement efficiency measures to reduce the time for licensing transactions and wait times including, but not limited to, the installation of additional cameras at licensing service offices that reduce bottlenecks and align with the "keep your customer" initiative.

(((8)))(6) $507,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5419), Laws of 2019 (vehicle service fees) or chapter 417 (((Engrossed House Bill No. 1789))), Laws of 2019 (vehicle service fees). If neither chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5419), Laws of 2019 or chapter 417 (((Engrossed House Bill No. 1789))), Laws of 2019 are enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((10)))(7) $25,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 177 (((Engrossed House Bill No. 1996))), Laws of 2019 (San Juan Islands license plate). If chapter 177 (((Engrossed House Bill No. 1996))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((11)))(8) $24,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 384 (((House Bill No. 2062))), Laws of 2019 (Seattle Storm license plate). If chapter 384 (((House Bill No. 2062))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((13)))(9) $65,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 440 (((Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497))), Laws of 2019 (immigrants in the workplace). If chapter 440 (((Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((14)))(10) The appropriations in this section assume implementation of additional cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least $11,903,000 in credit card and other financial transaction costs as part of charges imposed for driver and vehicle fee transactions beginning January 1, 2020. At the direction of the office of financial management, the department must develop a method of tracking the additional amount of credit card and other financial cost-recovery revenues. In consultation with the office of financial management, the department must notify the state treasurer of these amounts and the state treasurer must deposit these revenues in the agency financial transaction account created in section 717 ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2019 on a quarterly basis.

(((18)))(11) $1,281,000 of the department of licensing service account—state appropriation is provided solely for savings from the implementation of chapter 417 (((Engrossed House Bill No. 1789))), Laws of 2019 (vehicle service fees). If chapter 417 (((Engrossed House Bill No. 1789))), Laws of 2019 is enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((19)))(12) $2,650,000 of the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing reimbursements in accordance with the department's abandoned recreational vehicle disposal reimbursement program. It is the intent of the legislature that the department prioritize this funding for allowable and approved reimbursements and not to build a reserve of funds within the account.

(((20)))(13) $20,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 210 (((Substitute House Bill No. 1197))), Laws of 2019 (Gold Star license plate). If chapter 210 (((Substitute House Bill No. 1197))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((21)))(14) $31,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 262 (((Substitute House Bill No. 1436))), Laws of 2019 (snow bikes). If chapter 262 (((Substitute House Bill No. 1436))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((22)))(15) $24,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 139 (((House Bill No. 2058))), Laws of 2019 (Purple Heart license plate). If chapter 139 (((House Bill No. 2058))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((23)))(16) $24,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 278 (((Engrossed House Bill No. 2067))), Laws of 2019 (vehicle and vessel owner information). If chapter 278 (((Engrossed House Bill No. 2067))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((25)))(17) $600,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide an interagency transfer to the department of social and health services, children's administration division for the purpose of providing driver's license support to a larger population of foster youth than is already served within existing resources. Support services include reimbursement of driver's license issuance costs, fees for driver training education, and motor vehicle liability insurance costs.

(((26)))(18) The department must place personal and company data elements in separate data fields to allow the department to select discrete data elements when providing information or data to persons or entities outside the department. Pursuant to the restrictions in federal and state law, a person's photo, social security number, or medical information must not be made available through public disclosure or data being provided under RCW 46.12.630 or 46.12.635.

(((30)))(19) $91,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs related to the one Washington project.

(((31)))(20) $974,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for communication and outreach activities necessary to inform the public of federally acceptable identification options including, but not limited to, enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards. The department shall continue the outreach plan that includes informational material that can be effectively communicated to all communities and populations in Washington. To accomplish this work, the department shall contract with an external vendor with demonstrated experience and expertise in outreach and marketing to underrepresented communities in a culturally-responsive fashion.

(21) Due to the passage of chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020, the department, working with the office of financial management, shall provide a monthly report on the number of registrations involved and differences between actual collections and collections if the initiative was not subject to a temporary injunction as of December 5, 2019.

(22) $35,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $50,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6156, Laws of 2020 (collector vehicle license plates). If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6156, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection lapse.

(23) $19,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6032, Laws of 2020 (apples special license plate). If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6032, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(24) $14,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6115, Laws of 2020 (off road vehicle registrations). If Senate Bill No. 6115, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(25) $105,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6251, Laws of 2020 (tribal vehicles compact). If Senate Bill No. 6251, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(26) $107,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5544, Laws of 2020 (veteran commercial driver's license waivers). If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5544, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(27) $57,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6072, Laws of 2020 (state wildlife account). If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6072, Laws of 2020 is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(28) The appropriations in this section assume full cost recovery for the administration and collection of a motor vehicle excise tax on behalf of any regional transit authority pursuant to section 706 of this act.

(29) $1,624,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement a pilot program allowing the registered owner, or the registered owner's authorized representative, of a vehicle that is subject to a motor vehicle excise tax to enter into either a quarterly or monthly payment plan with the department for the amount of motor vehicle excise tax due. To defray the cost of administering the pilot, the department may charge a fee of not more than one percent of each vehicle registration transaction when paid with a quarterly or monthly payment plan and this fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070. It is the intent of the legislature that under the pilot, payments made after the application for a renewal vehicle registration are not subject to additional fees under RCW 46.17.040(1)(b), 46.17.005, 46.17.025, or 46.17.015.

Sec. 209. 2019 c 416 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM B

((High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,774,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$513,000))

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($43,773,000))

$59,056,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,145,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,807,000))

$33,805,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,061,000))

$21,616,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes ((Operations)) Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($18,329,000))

$27,456,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($118,402,000))

$146,078,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation and (($11,034,000))$11,925,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.

(2) As long as the facility is tolled, the department must provide quarterly reports to the transportation committees of the legislature on the Interstate 405 express toll lane project performance measures listed in RCW 47.56.880(4). These reports must include:

(a) Information on the travel times and travel time reliability (at a minimum, average and 90th percentile travel times) maintained during peak and nonpeak periods in the express toll lanes and general purpose lanes for both the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor including, but not limited to, northbound from Bellevue to Rose Hill, state route number 520 at NE 148th to Interstate 405 at state route number 522, Bellevue to Bothell (both NE 8th to state route number 522 and NE 8th to state route number 527), and a trip internal to the corridor (such as NE 85th to NE 160th) and similar southbound trips;

(b) A month-to-month comparison of travel times and travel time reliability for the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor as specified in (a) of this subsection since implementation of the express toll lanes and, to the extent available, a comparison to the travel times and travel time reliability prior to implementation of the express toll lanes;

(c) Total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane (i) compared to total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane, on this segment of Interstate 405 prior to implementation of the express toll lanes and (ii) compared to total express toll lane and total general purpose lane traffic volumes, as well as per lane traffic volumes for each type of lane, from month to month since implementation of the express toll lanes; and

(d) Underlying congestion measurements, that is, speeds, that are being used to generate the summary graphs provided, to be made available in a digital file format.

(3)(a) (($71,000))$2,114,000 of the ((high occupancy))Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes ((operations)) account—state appropriation, (($1,238,000))$4,920,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, (($532,000))$2,116,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, (($460,000 of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation,)) and (($699,000))$2,776,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to finish implementing a new tolling customer service toll collection system, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) The department shall continue to work with the office of financial management, office of the chief information officer, and the transportation committees of the legislature on the project management plan that includes a provision for independent verification and validation of contract deliverables from the successful bidder and a provision for quality assurance that includes reporting independently to the office of the chief information officer on an ongoing basis during system implementation.

(4) The department shall make detailed quarterly reports to the transportation committees of the legislature and the public on the department's web site on the following:

(a) The use of consultants in the tolling program, including the name of the contractor, the scope of work, the type of contract, timelines, deliverables, any new task orders, and any extensions to existing consultant contracts;

(b) The nonvendor costs of administering toll operations, including the costs of staffing the division, consultants, and other personal service contracts required for technical oversight and management assistance, insurance, payments related to credit card processing, transponder purchases and inventory management, facility operations and maintenance, and other miscellaneous nonvendor costs;

(c) The vendor-related costs of operating tolled facilities, including the costs of the customer service center, cash collections on the Tacoma Narrows bridge, electronic payment processing, and toll collection equipment maintenance, renewal, and replacement;

(d) The toll adjudication process, including a summary table for each toll facility that includes:

(i) The number of notices of civil penalty issued;

(ii) The number of recipients who pay before the notice becomes a penalty;

(iii) The number of recipients who request a hearing and the number who do not respond;

(iv) Workload costs related to hearings;

(v) The cost and effectiveness of debt collection activities; and

(vi) Revenues generated from notices of civil penalty; and

(e) A summary of toll revenue by facility on all operating toll facilities and ((high occupancy))express toll lane systems, and an itemized depiction of the use of that revenue.

(5) (($17,517,000))$24,734,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes ((operations)) account—state appropriation is provided solely for operational costs related to the express toll lane facility.

(6) In calendar year 2021, toll equipment on the Tacoma Narrows Bridge will have reached the end of its operational life. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department plans to issue a request for proposals as the first stage of a competitive procurement process that will replace the toll equipment and select a new tolling operator for the Tacoma Narrows Bridge. The request for proposals and subsequent competitive procurement must incorporate elements that prioritize the overall goal of lowering costs per transaction for the facility, such as incentives for innovative approaches which result in lower transactional costs, requests for efficiencies on the part of the bidder that lower operational costs, and incorporation of technologies such as self-serve credit card machines or other point-of-payment technologies that lower costs or improve operational efficiencies.

(7) (($19,362,000))$18,840,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation is provided solely for the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility's expected share of collecting toll revenues, operating customer services, and maintaining toll collection systems. The legislature expects to see appropriate reductions to the other toll facility accounts once tolling on the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility commences and any previously incurred costs for start-up of the new facility are charged back to the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account. The office of financial management shall closely monitor the application of the cost allocation model and ensure that the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility is adequately sharing costs and the other toll facility accounts are not being overspent or subsidizing the new state route number 99 tunnel toll facility.

(8) (($256,000))$608,000 of the ((high occupancy toll lanes operations account—state appropriation and $352,000 of the)) Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes ((operations)) account—state appropriation are provided solely for increased levels of service from the Washington state patrol for enforcement of toll lane violations on the state route number 167 high occupancy toll lanes and the Interstate 405 express toll lanes. The department shall compile monthly data on the number of Washington state patrol enforcement hours on each facility and the percentage of time during peak hours that speeds are at or above forty-five miles per hour on each facility. The department shall provide this data in a report to the transportation committees of the legislature on at least a calendar quarterly basis.

(9) The department shall develop an ongoing cost allocation method to assign appropriate costs to each of the toll funds for services provided by each Washington state department of transportation program and all relevant transportation agencies, including the Washington state patrol and the transportation commission. This method should update the toll cost allocation method used in the 2020 supplemental transportation appropriations act. By December 1, 2020, a report with the recommended method and any changes shall be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management.

(10) The legislature intends to allow owners of vehicles subject to a motor vehicle excise tax to pay renewal vehicle registration fees with a "Good to Go!" account beginning no later than 2024. Within existing resources, the department and the department of licensing must jointly report to the governor and chairs of the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021, with a detailed recommended approach to allow payment of renewal vehicle registration fees with a "Good to Go!" account for owners of vehicles subject to a motor vehicle excise tax.

Sec. 210. 2019 c 416 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY—PROGRAM C

Transportation Partnership Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,460,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($94,993,000))

$95,810,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$263,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,878,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,460,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($101,054,000))

$101,871,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,114,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the development of the labor system replacement project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. It is the intent of the legislature that if any portion of the labor system replacement project is leveraged in the future for the time, leave, and labor distribution of any other agencies, the motor vehicle account will be reimbursed proportionally for the development of the system since amounts expended from the motor vehicle account must be used exclusively for highway purposes in conformance with Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution. This must be accomplished through a loan arrangement with the current interest rate under the terms set by the office of the state treasurer at the time the system is deployed to additional agencies. If the motor vehicle account is not reimbursed for future use of the system, it is further the intent of the legislature that reductions will be made to central service agency charges accordingly. The department shall provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2019, detailing the project timeline as of July 1, 2019, an updated project timeline if necessary, expenditures made to date for the purposes of this project, and expenditures projected through the remainder of the project timeline.

(2) (($198,000))$1,375,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's cost related to the one Washington project.

(3) $21,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the activities of the information technology program in developing and maintaining information systems that support the operations and program delivery of the department, ensuring compliance with section 701 of this act, and the requirements of the office of the chief information officer under RCW 43.88.092 to evaluate and prioritize any new financial and capital systems replacement or modernization project and any other information technology project. During the 2019-2021 biennium, the department ((is prohibited from using))may use the distributed direct program support or ((any)) other cost allocation method to fund ((any))a new ((financial and)) capital systems replacement or modernization project ((without having the project evaluated and prioritized by the office of the chief information officer and submitting)). The department shall submit a decision package for implementation of a new capital systems replacement project to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature as part of the normal budget process for the 2021-2023 biennium.

Sec. 211. 2019 c 416 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM D—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,149,000))

$34,512,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($33,183,000))

$34,546,000

Sec. 212. 2019 c 416 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—AVIATION—PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,635,000))

$7,542,000

Aeronautics Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,542,000))

$3,043,000

Aeronautics Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($10,237,000))

$10,645,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($2,751,000))$2,862,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the airport aid grant program, which provides competitive grants to public use airports for pavement, safety, maintenance, planning, and security.

(2) (($468,000))$268,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for one FTE dedicated to planning aviation emergency services and addressing emerging aeronautics requirements((, and for the implementation of chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1397), Laws of 2019 (electric aircraft work group), which extends the electric aircraft work group past its current expiration and allows WSDOT to employ a consultant to assist with the work group. If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1397), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, $200,000 of the amount in this subsection lapses)).

(3) $200,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to convene an electric aircraft work group to study the state of the electrically powered aircraft industry and assess infrastructure needs related to the deployment of electric or hybrid-electric aircraft for commercial air travel in Washington state.

(a) The chair of the work group may be a consultant specializing in aeronautics. The work group must include, but is not limited to, representation from the electric aircraft industry, the aircraft manufacturing industry, electric utility districts, the battery industry, the department of commerce, the department of transportation aviation division, the airline pilots association, a primary airport representing an airport association, and the airline industry.

(b) The study must include, but is not limited to:

(i) Infrastructure requirements necessary to facilitate electric aircraft operations at airports;

(ii) Potential economic and public benefits including, but not limited to, the direct and indirect impact on the number of manufacturing and service jobs and the wages from those jobs in Washington state;

(iii) Potential incentives for industry in the manufacturing and operation of electric aircraft for regional air travel;

(iv) Educational and workforce requirements for manufacturing and maintaining electric aircraft;

(v) Demand and forecast for electric aircraft use to include expected timeline of the aircraft entering the market given federal aviation administration certification requirements;

(vi) Identification of up to six airports in Washington state that may benefit from a pilot program once an electrically propelled aircraft for commercial use becomes available; and

(vii) Recommendations to further the advancement of the electrification of aircraft for regional commercial use within Washington state, including specific, measureable goals for the years 2030, 2040, and 2050 that reflect progressive and substantial increases in the utilization of electric and hybrid-electric commercial aircraft.

(c) The work group must submit a report and accompanying recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2020.

(((d) If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1397), Laws of 2019 is enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection (3) lapses.))

(4) $150,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 396 (((Substitute Senate Bill No. 5370))), Laws of 2019 (aviation coordinating commission). ((If chapter 396 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5370), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))

Sec. 213. 2019 c 416 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM H

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($59,801,000))

$59,093,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$258,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($60,559,000))

$59,851,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature recognizes that the trail known as the Rocky Reach Trail, and its extensions, serve to separate motor vehicle traffic from pedestrians and bicyclists, increasing motor vehicle safety on state route number 2 and the coincident section of state route number 97. Consistent with chapter 47.30 RCW and pursuant to RCW 47.12.080, the legislature declares that transferring portions of WSDOT Inventory Control (IC) No. 2-09-04686 containing the trail and associated buffer areas to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is consistent with the public interest. The legislature directs the department to transfer the property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission.

(a) The department must be paid fair market value for any portions of the transferred real property that is later abandoned, vacated, or ceases to be publicly maintained for trail purposes.

(b) Prior to completing the transfer in this subsection (1), the department must ensure that provisions are made to accommodate private and public utilities and any facilities that predate the department's acquisition of the property, at no cost to those entities. Prior to completing the transfer, the department shall also ensure that provisions, by fair market assessment, are made to accommodate other private and public utilities and any facilities that have been legally allowed by permit or other instrument.

(c) The department may sell any adjoining property that is not necessary to support the Rocky Reach Trail and adjacent buffer areas only after the transfer of trail-related property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is complete. Adjoining property owners must be given the first opportunity to acquire such property that abuts their property, and applicable boundary line or other adjustments must be made to the legal descriptions for recording purposes.

(2) With respect to Parcel 12 of the real property conveyed by the state of Washington to the city of Mercer Island under that certain quitclaim deed, dated April 19, 2000, recorded in King county under recording no. 20000425001234, the requirement in the deed that the property be used for road/street purposes only will be deemed satisfied by the department of transportation so long as commuter parking, as part of the vertical development of the property, is one of the significant uses of the property.

(3) $1,600,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for real estate services activities. Consistent with RCW 47.12.120 and during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, when initiating, extending, or renewing any rent or lease agreements with a regional transit authority, consideration of value must be equivalent to one hundred percent of economic or market rent.

(4)(a) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to:

(i) Determine the real property owned by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department in King county that is surplus property located in an area encompassing south of Dearborn Street in Seattle, south of Newcastle, west of SR 515, and north of South 216th to SR 515; and

(ii) Use any remaining funds after (a)(i) of this subsection is completed to identify additional real property across the state owned by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department that is surplus property.

(b) The department shall provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature describing the properties it has identified as surplus property under (a) of this subsection by October 1, 2020.

Sec. 214. 2019 c 416 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS—PROGRAM K

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$670,000

((Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000,000))

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,634,000))

$434,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,304,000))

$1,104,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The economic partnerships program must continue to explore retail partnerships at state-owned park and ride facilities, as authorized in RCW 47.04.295.

(2) $350,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to execute a transit oriented development pilot project at Kingsgate park and ride in Kirkland intended to be completed by December 31, 2023. The purpose of the pilot project is to demonstrate how appropriate department properties may be used to provide multiple public benefits such as affordable and market rate housing, commercial development, and institutional facilities in addition to transportation purposes. To accomplish the pilot project, the department is authorized to exercise all legal and administrative powers authorized in statute that may include, but is not limited to, the transfer, lease, or sale of some or all of the property to another governmental agency, public development authority, or nonprofit developer approved by the department and partner agencies. The department may also partner with sound transit, King county, the city of Kirkland, and any other federal, regional, or local jurisdiction on any policy changes necessary from those jurisdictions to facilitate the pilot project. By December 1, 2019, the department must report to the legislature on any legislative actions necessary to facilitate the pilot project and future transit oriented development projects.

(3) (($2,000,000 of the electric vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely))It is the intent of the legislature that funding for the clean alternative fuel vehicle charging and refueling infrastructure program in chapter 287 (((Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042))), Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) will be provided in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium and the department must be ready to issue a call for projects at the beginning of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. ((If chapter 287 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))

(4) (($1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely))It is the intent of the legislature that funding will be provided in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium for the pilot program established under chapter 287 (((Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042))), Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) to provide clean alternative fuel vehicle use opportunities to underserved communities and low to moderate income members of the workforce not readily served by transit or located in transportation corridors with emissions that exceed federal or state emissions standards. ((If chapter 287 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses))The department must be ready to issue a call for projects at the beginning of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(5) $84,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for an interagency transfer to the department of commerce for the purpose of conducting a study as described in chapter 287 (((Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042))), Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) to identify opportunities to reduce barriers to electric vehicle adoption by lower income residents of the state through the use of vehicle and infrastructure financing assistance. If chapter 287 (((Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(6) Building on the information and experience gained from the transit oriented development project at the Kingsgate park and ride, the department must identify a pilot park and ride with future public-private partnership development potential in Pierce county and report back to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021, with a proposal for moving forward in the 2021-2023 biennium with a pilot project.

Sec. 215. 2019 c 416 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM M

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($495,228,000))

$486,417,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,447,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,549,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,533,000))

$9,535,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes ((Operations)) Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,370,000))

$4,528,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($519,127,000))

$513,476,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $6,170,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for utility fees assessed by local governments as authorized under RCW 90.03.525 for the mitigation of stormwater runoff from state highways. Plan and reporting requirements as required in chapter 435 (((Senate Bill No. 5505))), Laws of 2019 (Local Stormwater Charges) shall be consistent with the January 2012 findings of the Joint Transportation Committee Report for Effective Cost Recovery Structure for WSDOT, Jurisdictions, and Efficiencies in Stormwater Management.

(b) Pursuant to RCW 90.03.525(3), the department and the utilities imposing charges to the department shall negotiate with the goal of agreeing to rates such that the total charges to the department for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium do not exceed the amount provided in this subsection. The department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the amount of funds requested, the funds granted, and the strategies used to keep costs down, by January 17, 2021. If chapter 435 (((Senate Bill No. 5505))), Laws of 2019 (local stormwater charges) is enacted by June 30, 2019, this subsection (1)(b) does not take effect.

(2) $4,447,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the state route number 520 floating bridge. These funds must be used in accordance with RCW 47.56.830(3).

(3) $1,549,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the new Tacoma Narrows bridge. These funds must be used in accordance with RCW 47.56.830(3).

(4) (($1,370,000))$2,050,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes ((operations)) account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes between Lynnwood and Bellevue, and Renton and the southernmost point of the express toll lanes. These funds must be used in accordance with RCW 47.56.830(3).

(5) $2,478,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintenance for the 2019-2021 biennium only on the Interstate 405 roadway between Renton and Bellevue.

(6)(($5,000,000))(a) $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contingency pool for snow and ice removal. The department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature when they have spent the base budget for snow and ice removal and will begin using the contingency pool funding.

(b) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for the contingency pool for snow and ice removal, and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

(((6)))(7) $1,025,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement safety improvements and debris clean up on department-owned rights-of-way in the city of Seattle at levels above that being implemented as of January 1, 2019. The department must contract out or hire a crew dedicated solely to collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public, department employees, or people encamped upon department-owned rights-of-way. The department may request assistance from the Washington state patrol as necessary in order for both agencies to provide enhanced safety-related activities regarding the emergency hazards along state highway rights-of-way in the Seattle area.

(((7)))(8) $1,015,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Tacoma. The program shall address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. $570,000 is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Tacoma shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.

(((8)))(9) The department must commence a pilot program for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium at the four highest demand safety rest areas to create and maintain an online calendar for volunteer groups to check availability of weekends for the free coffee program. The calendar must be updated at least weekly and show dates and times that are, or are not, available to participate in the free coffee program. The department must submit a report to the legislature on the ongoing pilot by December 1, 2020, outlining the costs and benefits of the online calendar pilot, and including surveys from the volunteer groups and agency staff to determine its effectiveness.

Sec. 216. 2019 c 416 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($70,681,000))

$76,112,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,050,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$53,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$31,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($72,981,000))

$78,554,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects completed in the prior fiscal biennium.

(2)(a) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (i) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (ii) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (iii) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (iv) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.

(b) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to vehicles that deliver or collect blood, tissue, or blood components for a blood-collecting or distributing establishment regulated under chapter 70.335 RCW. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, blood-collecting or distributing establishment vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(c) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to organ transport vehicles transporting a time urgent organ for an organ procurement organization as defined in RCW 68.64.010. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, organ transport vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(d) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to private, for hire vehicles regulated under chapter 81.72 RCW that have been specially manufactured, designed, or modified for the transportation of a person who has a mobility disability and uses a wheelchair or other assistive device. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, wheelchair-accessible taxicabs that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered public transportation vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(((d)))(e) Nothing in this subsection (2) is intended to exempt these vehicles from paying tolls when they do not meet the occupancy requirements established by the department for ((high occupancy))express toll lanes.

(3) When regional transit authority construction activities are visible from a state highway, the department shall allow the regional transit authority to place safe and appropriate signage informing the public of the purpose of the construction activity.

(4) The department must make signage for low-height bridges a high priority.

(5) $32,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $53,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $31,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $26,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the traffic operations program's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

Sec. 217. 2019 c 416 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($38,782,000))

$37,487,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,380,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,129,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$199,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$116,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($41,791,000))

$41,030,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program that makes awards for the following: (a) Support for nonprofit agencies, churches, and other entities to help provide outreach to populations underrepresented in the current apprenticeship programs; (b) preapprenticeship training; and (c) child care, transportation, and other supports that are needed to help women, veterans, and minorities enter and succeed in apprenticeship. The department must report on grants that have been awarded and the amount of funds disbursed by December 1st each year. If moneys are provided in the omnibus operating appropriations act for a career connected learning grant program, defined in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1336), Laws of 2019, or otherwise, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(2) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a user-centered and mobile-compatible web site redesign using estimated web site ad revenues.

(3) From the revenues generated by the five dollar per studded tire fee under RCW 46.37.427, $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the appropriate local jurisdictions and relevant stakeholder groups, to establish a pilot media-based public information campaign regarding the damage of studded tire use on state and local roadways in Whatcom county, and to continue the existing pilot information campaign in Spokane county. The reason for the geographic selection of Spokane and Whatcom counties is based on the high utilization of studded tires in these jurisdictions. The public information campaigns must primarily focus on making the consumer aware of the safety implications for other drivers, road deterioration, financial impact for taxpayers, and, secondarily, the alternatives to studded tires. The Whatcom county pilot media-based public information campaign must begin by September 1, 2020. By January 14, 2021, the department must provide the transportation committees of the legislature an update on the Spokane and Whatcom county pilot media-based public information campaigns.

(4) (($138,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5489), Laws of 2019 (concerning environmental health disparities). If chapter . . . (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5489), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses))$119,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $199,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $116,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $100,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the transportation management and support program's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

Sec. 218. 2019 c 416 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH—PROGRAM T

((High Occupancy))Interstate 405 and State Route

Number 167 Express Toll Lanes ((Operations))

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$3,123,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,403,000))

$25,638,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,485,000))

$35,385,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($800,000))

$1,200,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$710,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,809,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$207,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$121,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$104,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($66,307,000))

$69,397,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $130,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for completion of a corridor study to identify potential improvements between exit 116 and exit 99 of Interstate 5. The study should further develop mid- and long-term strategies from the corridor sketch, and identify potential US 101/I-5 interchange improvements, a strategic plan for the Nisqually River bridges, regional congestion relief options, and ecosystem benefits to the Nisqually River estuary for salmon productivity and flood control.

(2) The study on state route number 518 referenced in section 218(5), chapter 297, Laws of 2018 must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 30, 2019.

(3) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to complete the Tacoma mall direct access feasibility study.

(4) $4,600,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely to complete the road usage charge pilot project overseen by the transportation commission using the remaining unspent amount of the federal grant award. The purpose of the road usage charge pilot project is to explore the viability of a road usage charge as a possible replacement for the gas tax.

(5) $3,000,000 of the ((high occupancy))Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes ((operations)) account—state appropriation is provided solely for updating the state route number 167 master plan. If neither chapter 421 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825))), Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling) nor chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2132), Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling) is enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(6) $123,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $207,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $121,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $104,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the transportation planning, data, and research program's proportional share of time spent supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

(7)(a) By December 31, 2020, the department shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature a report with a sample performance-based evaluation applied to an existing highway capacity project and an existing multimodal transportation project funded in the 2015 Connecting Washington package. The sample performance-based evaluation must consider: (i) The transportation policy goals listed in RCW 47.04.280; and (ii) the themes of health, accessibility, environmental justice, equity, and climate change, and how those themes should be defined in a transportation context.

(b) The department must incorporate feedback from interested stakeholders, including traditionally underserved and historically disadvantaged populations, and the report shall include the project evaluation procedures used for the performance-based evaluation. This report will help provide a better path to determining that the most beneficial projects are selected and funded in future transportation budgets.

(8) Within existing resources, the department shall conduct a study of options to establish road connections between state route number 704 in Spanaway and Interstate 5. The department shall examine potential benefits to traffic congestion, emergency management, and other benefits or issues of a new road connection. A report of the study must be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021.

Sec. 219. 2019 c 416 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES—PROGRAM U

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($71,996,000))

$78,427,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,491,000))

$2,690,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$122,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$205,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$120,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($74,487,000))

$81,666,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ((Prior to))After entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state for the department that exceeds five million dollars, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(2) Beginning October 1, 2019, and quarterly thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the Washington state ferry system to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements; and (d) information on the impacts of moving legal costs associated with the Washington state ferry system into the statewide self-insurance pool.

(3) Beginning October 1, 2019, and quarterly thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the nonferry operations of the department to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; and (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements.

(4) $122,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, $205,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $120,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and $102,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the charges from other agencies' program's proportional share of supporting tolling operations for the respective tolling facilities.

Sec. 220. 2019 c 416 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM V

State Vehicle Parking Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$784,000

Regional Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($96,630,000))

$90,798,000

Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$32,223,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($128,554,000))

$146,151,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,574,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($261,865,000))

$273,630,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($62,679,000))$62,698,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation. ((If chapter 287 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042), Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) is not enacted by June 30, 2019, $10,000,000 of the amount in this subsection lapses.)) Of this amount:

(a) (($14,278,000))$14,297,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers must be based on need, including the availability of other providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips provided. ((If chapter 287 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042), Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) is not enacted by June 30, 2019, $2,278,000 of the amount in this subsection lapses.))

(b) $48,401,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit agency must, to the greatest extent practicable, have a maintenance of effort for special needs transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies must be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response service and route deviated service in calendar year 2017 as reported in the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2017" published by the department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than thirty percent of these distributions. ((If chapter 287 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042), Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) is not enacted by June 30, 2019, $7,722,000 of the amount in this subsection lapses.))

(2) $32,223,000 of the rural mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100.

(3)(a) (($10,290,000))$10,539,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (i) Public transit agencies to add vanpools or replace vans; and (ii) incentives for employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; operating costs for public transit agencies are not eligible for funding under this grant program. Additional employees may not be hired from the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. The department shall encourage grant applicants and recipients to leverage funds other than state funds.

(b) At least $1,600,000 of the amount provided in this subsection must be used for vanpool grants in congested corridors.

(4) (($18,951,000))$27,483,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-2))2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, Program - Public Transportation Program (V).

(5)(a) (($77,679,000))$63,315,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-2))2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2019, and December 15, 2020, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will be completed on schedule. A grantee may not receive more than twenty-five percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection. Additionally, when allocating funding for the 2021-2023 biennium, no more than thirty percent of the total grant program may directly benefit or support one grantee. The department shall not approve any increases or changes to the scope of a project for the purpose of a grantee expending remaining funds on an awarded grant.

(b) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities. For purposes of this subsection, (i) "private transportation provider" means: An auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and (ii) "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.

(6) Funds provided for the commute trip reduction (CTR) program may also be used for the growth and transportation efficiency center program.

(7) $7,670,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $784,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation are provided solely for CTR grants and activities. Of this amount:

(a) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue a pilot transit pass incentive program. Businesses and nonprofit organizations located in a county adjacent to Puget Sound with a population of more than seven hundred thousand that have never offered transit subsidies to employees are eligible to apply to the program for a fifty percent rebate on the cost of employee transit subsidies provided through the regional ORCA fare collection system. No single business or nonprofit organization may receive more than ten thousand dollars from the program.

(i) Businesses and nonprofit organizations may apply and be awarded funds prior to purchasing a transit subsidy, but the department may not provide reimbursement until proof of purchase or a contract has been provided to the department.

(ii) The department shall update the transportation committees of the legislature on the impact of the program by January 31, 2020, and may adopt rules to administer the program.

(b) $30,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation is provided solely for the STAR pass program for state employees residing in Mason and Grays Harbor Counties. Use of the pass is for public transportation between Mason County and Thurston County, and Grays Harbor and Thurston County. The pass may also be used within Grays Harbor County. The STAR pass commute trip reduction program is open to any state employee who expresses intent to commute to his or her assigned state worksite using a public transit system currently participating in the STAR pass program.

(c) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a first mile/last mile connections grant program. Eligible grant recipients include cities, businesses, nonprofits, and transportation network companies with first mile/last mile solution proposals. Transit agencies are not eligible. The commute trip reduction board shall develop grant parameters, evaluation criteria, and evaluate grant proposals. The commute trip reduction board shall provide the transportation committees of the legislature a report on the effectiveness of this grant program and best practices for continuing the program.

(8) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, (($28,048,000))$32,377,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for connecting Washington transit projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-2))2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020. It is the intent of the legislature that entities identified to receive funding in the LEAP document referenced in this subsection receive the amounts specified in the time frame specified in that LEAP document. If an entity has already completed a project in the LEAP document referenced in this subsection before the time frame identified, the entity may substitute another transit project or projects that cost a similar or lesser amount.

(9) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for transit coordination grants.

(10) The department shall not require more than a ten percent match from nonprofit transportation providers for state grants.

(11)(a) For projects funded as part of the 2015 connecting Washington transportation package listed on the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (4) of this section, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project with an appropriation that cannot be used for the current fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the following projects:

(i) King County Metro - RapidRide Expansion, Burien-Delridge (G2000031);

(ii) King County Metro - Route 40 Northgate to Downtown (G2000032);

(iii) Mason Transit Park & Ride Development (G2000042); or

(iv) Pierce Transit - SR 7 Express Service (((G2000046)))(G2000045).

(b) At least ten business days before advancing a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(c) To the extent practicable, the department shall use the flexibility and authority granted in this section to minimize the amount of reappropriations needed each biennium.

(12) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for Intercity Transit for the Dash shuttle program.

(13)(a) $485,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for King county for:

(i) An expanded pilot program to provide certain students in the Highline, Tukwila, and Lake Washington school districts with an ORCA card during these school districts' summer vacations. In order to be eligible for an ORCA card under this program, a student must also be in high school, be eligible for free and reduced-price lunches, and have a job or other responsibility during the summer; and

(ii) Providing administrative support to other interested school districts in King county to prepare for implementing similar programs for their students.

(b) King county must provide a report to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2021, regarding:

(i) The annual student usage of the pilot program;

(ii) Available ridership data;

(iii) A cost estimate, including a detailed description of the various expenses leading to the cost estimate, and any other factors relevant to expanding the program to other King county school districts;

(iv) A cost estimate, including a detailed description of the various expenses leading to the cost estimate, and any other factors relevant to expanding the program to student populations other than high school or eligible for free and reduced-price lunches;

(v) Opportunities for subsidized ORCA cards or local grant or matching funds; and

(vi) Any additional information that would help determine if the pilot program should be extended or expanded.

(14) (($12,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely))It is the intent of the legislature that funding for the green transportation capital grant program established in chapter 287 (((Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042))), Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) will be provided in the 2021-2023 biennium and that projects submitted by the department for the 2020 legislative session will retain their place on the prioritized list, ahead of any newly submitted projects. ((If chapter 287 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))

(15) $555,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for an interagency transfer to the Washington State University extension energy program to establish and administer a technical assistance and education program for public agencies on the use of alternative fuel vehicles. If chapter 287 (((Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2042))), Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) is not enacted by June 30, 2019, $375,000 of the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(16) As a short-term solution, appropriation authority for the public transportation program in this section is reduced to reflect anticipated underruns in this program, based on historical reappropriation levels. It is the intent of the legislature that no public transportation grants or projects be delayed as a result of revenue reductions, except that funding for the green transportation capital program created by chapter 287, Laws of 2019 be delayed until 2021-2023.

(17) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for the public transportation program's capital project grants as listed by amount on the LEAP list referenced in subsections (4), (5), and (8) of this section, and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

Sec. 221. 2019 c 416 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—MARINE—PROGRAM X

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($540,746,000))

$547,056,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,932,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$121,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($549,049,000))

$555,359,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2019-2021 supplemental and 2021-2023 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs.

(2) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department may enter into a distributor controlled fuel hedging program and other methods of hedging approved by the fuel hedging committee, which must include a representative of the department of enterprise services.

(3) (($76,261,000))$73,161,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, which reflect cost savings from a reduced biodiesel fuel requirement and, therefore, is contingent upon the enactment of section 703 ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2019. The amount provided in this subsection represents the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge. The department shall review future use of alternative fuels and dual fuel configurations, including hydrogen.

(4) $650,000 of the Puget sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for increased staffing at Washington ferry terminals to meet increased workload and customer expectations. Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department shall contract with uniformed officers for additional traffic control assistance at the Kingston ferry terminal during peak ferry travel times, with a particular focus on Sundays and holiday weekends. Traffic control methods should include, but not be limited to, holding traffic on the shoulder at Lindvog Road until space opens for cars at the tollbooths and dock, and management of traffic on Highway 104 in order to ensure Kingston residents and business owners have access to businesses, roads, and driveways.

(5) $254,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated inventory logistics manager on a one-time basis.

(6) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for operating costs related to moving vessels for emergency capital repairs. Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(7) By January 1, 2020, the ferries division must submit a workforce plan for reducing overtime due to shortages of staff available to fill vacant crew positions. The plan must include numbers of crew positions being filled by staff working overtime, strategies for filling these positions with straight time employees, progress toward implementing those strategies, and a forecast for when overtime expenditures will return to historical averages.

(8) $160,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for a ferry fleet baseline noise study, conducted by a consultant, for the purpose of establishing plans and data-driven goals to reduce ferry noise when Southern resident orca whales are present. In addition, the study must establish prioritized strategies to address vessels serving routes with the greatest exposure to orca whale movements.

(9)(((a))) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department((, in consultation with the Washington state transportation center, to develop a plan for service on the triangle route with a goal of providing maximum sailings moving the most passengers to all stops in the least travel time, including waits between sailings, within budget and resource constraints))to contract with uniformed officers for additional traffic control assistance at the Fauntleroy ferry terminal.

(((b) The Washington state transportation center must use new traffic management models and scheduling tools to examine proposed improvements for the triangle route. The department shall report to the standing transportation committees of the legislature by January 15, 2021. The report must include:

(i) Implementation and status of data collection, modeling, scheduling, capital investments, and procedural improvements to allow Washington state ferries to schedule more sailings to and from all stops on the triangle route with minimum time between sailings;

(ii) Recommendations for emergency boat allocations, regular schedule policies, and emergency schedule policies based on all customers alternative travel options to ensure that any dock with no road access is prioritized in scheduling and scheduled service is provided based on population size, demographics, and local medical services;

(iii) Triangle route pilot economic analysis of Washington state ferries fare revenue and fuel cost impact of offering additional, better spaced sailings;

(iv) Results of an economic analysis of the return on investment of potentially acquiring and using traffic control infrastructure, technology, walk on loading bridges, and Good-to-Go and ORCA replacement of current fare sales, validation, collections, accounting, and all associated labor and benefits costs that can be saved via those capital investments; and

(v) Recommendation on policies, procedures, or agency interpretations of statute that may be adopted to mitigate any delays or disruptions to scheduled sailings.

(c) If at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection (9) lapses.))

(10) $15,139,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for training. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $2,500,000 is for training for new employees.

(b) $160,000 is for electronic chart display and information system training.

(c) $379,000 is for marine evacuation slide training.

Sec. 222. 2019 c 416 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—OPERATING

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($75,576,000))

$70,243,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$717,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($76,793,000))

$71,460,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a)(i) $224,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $671,000 of the multimodal transportation account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for continued analysis of the ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor in a new study, with participation from Washington, Oregon, and British Columbia. No funds may be expended until the department is in receipt of $671,000 in private/local funding provided solely for this purpose.

(ii) The ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor advisory group must include legislative membership.

(iii) "Ultra high-speed" means a maximum testing speed of at least two hundred fifty miles per hour.

(b) The study must consist of the following:

(i) Development of proposed corridor governance, general powers, operating structure, legal instruments, and contracting requirements, in the context of the roles of relevant jurisdictions, including federal, state, provincial, and local governments;

(ii) ((An assessment of current laws in state and provincial jurisdictions and identification of any proposed changes to laws, regulations, and/or agreements that are needed to proceed with development))Development of a long-term funding and financing strategy for project initiation, development, construction, and program administration of the high-speed corridor, building on the funding and financing chapter of the 2019 business case analysis and aligned with the recommendations of (b)(i) of this subsection; and

(iii) Development of ((general recommendations for the authorization needed to advance the development of the corridor))recommendations for a department-led ultra-high speed corridor engagement plan for policy leadership from elected officials.

(c) This study must build on the results of the 2018 Washington state ultra high-speed ground transportation business case analysis and the 2019 Washington state ultra high-speed ground transportation study findings report. The department shall consult with the transportation committees of the legislature regarding all issues related to proposed corridor governance.

(((c)))(d) The development work referenced in (b) of this subsection is intended to identify and make recommendations related to specific entities, including interjurisdictional entities, policies, and processes required for the purposes of furthering preliminary analysis efforts for the ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor. This development work is not intended to authorize one or more entities to assume decision making authority for the design, construction, or operation of an ultra high-speed rail corridor.

(((d)))(e) By January 1, 2021, the department shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature an interim update on the study required under this subsection (1). By ((December))June 1, ((2020))2021, the department shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature a report of the study's findings regarding the three elements noted in this subsection. As applicable, the report should also be sent to the executive and legislative branches of government in the state of Oregon and appropriate government bodies in the province of British Columbia.

(2) The department is directed to continue to pursue efforts to reduce costs, increase ridership, and review Amtrak Cascades fares and fare schedules. Within thirty days of each annual cost/revenue reconciliation under the Amtrak service contract, the department shall report annual credits to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees. Annual credits from Amtrak to the department including, but not limited to, credits due to higher ridership, reduced level of service, and fare or fare schedule adjustments, must be used to offset corresponding amounts of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, which must be placed in reserve.

Sec. 223. 2019 c 416 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,190,000))

$12,183,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,567,000

Multiuse Roadway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$132,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$350,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($15,239,000))

$15,232,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $350,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a study by the Puget Sound regional council of new passenger ferry service to better connect communities throughout the twelve county Puget Sound region. The study must assess potential new routes, identify future terminal locations, and provide recommendations to accelerate the electrification of the ferry fleet. The study must identify future passenger only demand throughout Western Washington, analyze potential routes and terminal locations on Puget Sound, Lake Washington, and Lake Union with an emphasis on preserving waterfront opportunities in public ownership and opportunities for partnership. The study must determine whether and when the passenger ferry service achieves a net reduction in carbon emissions including an analysis of the emissions of modes that passengers would otherwise have used. The study must estimate capital and operating costs for routes and terminals. The study must include early and continuous outreach with all interested stakeholders and a report to the legislature and all interested parties by January 31, 2021.

(2) $1,142,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to:

(a) In coordination with stakeholders, identify county-owned fish passage barriers, with priority given to barriers that share the same stream system as state-owned fish passage barriers. The study must identify, map, and provide a preliminary assessment of county-owned barriers that need correction, and provide, where possible, preliminary costs estimates for each barrier correction. The study must provide recommendations on:

(i) How to prioritize county-owned barriers within the same stream system of state-owned barriers in the current six-year construction plan to maximize state investment; and

(ii) How future state six-year construction plans should incorporate county-owned barriers;

(b) Update the local agency guidelines manual, including exploring alternatives within the local agency guidelines manual on county priorities;

(c) Study the current state of county transportation funding, identify emerging issues, and identify potential future alternative transportation fuel funding sources to meet current and future needs.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—CAPITAL

Sec. 301. 2019 c 416 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($18,094,000))

$16,215,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$81,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,220,000))

$16,599,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,250,000))

$1,899,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,320,000))

$1,250,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($42,884,000))

$46,044,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects by amount, as listed in the LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-3 as developed April 27, 2019,))2020-3 as developed February 25, 2020, Senate Chair FMSIB Project List.

(2) ((Until directed by the legislature, the board may not initiate a new call for projects. By January 1, 2020, the board must report to the legislature on alternative proposals to revise its project award and obligation process, which result in lower reappropriations.))It is the intent of the legislature that no capital projects be delayed as a result of revenue reductions, but that as a short-term solution appropriation authority for the freight mobility strategic investment board's capital grant programs is reduced to reflect anticipated underruns in this program, based on historical reappropriation levels.

(3) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for the freight mobility strategic investment board's capital grant programs, and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

Sec. 302. 2019 c 416 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($65,996,000))

$59,773,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,456,000))

$4,456,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$39,590,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($107,042,000))

$103,819,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature that no capital projects be delayed as a result of revenue reductions, but that as a short-term solution appropriation authority for the county road administration board's capital grant programs is reduced to reflect anticipated underruns in this program, based on historical reappropriation levels.

(2) $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for the county road administration board's capital grant programs, and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

Sec. 303. 2019 c 416 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,890,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($228,510,000))

$220,627,000

Complete Streets Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,670,000))

$10,200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($249,070,000))

$241,717,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $9,315,000 of the transportation improvement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Relight Washington Program.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature that no capital projects be delayed as a result of revenue reductions, but that as a short-term solution appropriation authority for the transportation improvement board's capital grant programs is reduced to reflect anticipated underruns in this program, based on historical reappropriation levels.

(3) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for the transportation improvement board's capital grant programs, and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

Sec. 304. 2019 c 416 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITIES—PROGRAM D—(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($50,990,000))

$51,187,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($42,497,000))

$51,523,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($93,487,000))

$102,710,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($42,497,000))$51,523,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for a new Olympic region maintenance and administration facility to be located on the department-owned site at the intersection of Marvin Road and 32nd Avenue in Lacey, Washington.

(2)(a) (($43,100,000))$43,297,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department facility located at 15700 Dayton Ave N in Shoreline. This appropriation is contingent upon the department of ecology signing a not less than twenty-year agreement to pay a share of any financing contract issued pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.

(b) Payments from the department of ecology as described in this subsection shall be deposited into the motor vehicle account.

(c) Total project costs are not to exceed $46,500,000.

(3) $1,565,000 from the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for furniture for the renovated Northwest Region Headquarters at Dayton Avenue. The department must efficiently furnish the renovated building. ((The amount provided in this subsection is the maximum the department may spend on furniture for this facility.))

Sec. 305. 2019 c 416 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—IMPROVEMENTS—PROGRAM I

((High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000))

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($325,275,000))

$408,660,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($92,504,000))

$141,611,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($154,337,000))

$167,313,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,839,000))

$70,404,000

Connecting Washington Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,137,381,000))

$2,413,452,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($81,000,000))

$72,134,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,408,000))

$4,853,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$77,956,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,819,000))

$10,429,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes ((Operations)) Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($48,036,000))

$90,027,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,977,555,000))

$3,456,839,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account—state appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-1))2020-1 as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-2))2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, additional congressional action not related to a specific project or purpose, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities or fish passage barrier corrections (0BI4001).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act. Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised. The department shall submit a report on fiscal year funds transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.

(4) The connecting Washington account—state appropriation includes up to (($1,519,899,000))$1,809,342,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.

(5) The special category C account—state appropriation includes up to (($75,274,000))$60,534,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW ((47.10.861))47.10.812.

(6) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to (($150,232,000))$178,407,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW ((47.10.812))47.10.873.

(7) The Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation includes up to $77,956,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(8) ((The multimodal transportation account—state appropriation includes up to $5,408,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.867.

(9) $90,464,000))$165,798,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, (($7,006,000))$19,790,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, (($3,383,000))$3,384,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, $77,956,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation, and $1,838,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z). It is the intent of the legislature that the $25,000,000 increase in funding provided in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium be covered by any legal damages paid to the state as a result of a lawsuit related to contractual provisions for construction and delivery of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project. The legislature intends that the $25,000,000 of the transportation partnership account—state funds be repaid when those damages are recovered.

(((10)))(9) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for transit mitigation for the SR 99/Viaduct Project - Construction Mitigation project (809940B).

(((11) $164,000,000))(10) $168,655,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation ((is)), $1,052,000 of the special category C account—state appropriation, and $738,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the US 395 North Spokane Corridor project (M00800R).

(((12)(a) $22,195,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $12,805,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, and $48,000,000))(11) $82,991,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes ((operations)) account—state appropriation ((are))is provided solely for the I-405/SR 522 to I-5 Capacity Improvements project (L2000234) for activities related to adding capacity on Interstate 405 between state route number 522 and Interstate 5, with the goals of increasing vehicle throughput and aligning project completion with the implementation of bus rapid transit in the vicinity of the project. ((The transportation partnership account—state appropriation and transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation are a transfer or a reappropriation of a transfer from the I-405/Kirkland Vicinity Stage 2 - Widening project (8BI1002) due to savings and will fund right-of-way and construction for an additional phase of this I-405 project.

(b) If sufficient bonding authority to complete this project is not provided within chapter 421 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825), Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling) or chapter 421 (House Bill No. 2132), Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling), or within a bond authorization act referencing chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825), Laws of 2019 or chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2132), Laws of 2019, by June 30, 2019, $21,000,000 of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation provided in this subsection lapses, and it is the intent of the legislature to reduce the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation in the 2021-2023 biennium to $5,000,000, and in the 2023-2025 biennium to $0 on the list referenced in subsection (2) of this section.))

(((13)))(12)(a) (($395,822,000))$422,099,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation((, $60,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation,)) and (($342,000))$456,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Seattle Corridor Improvements - West End project (M00400R).

(b) Recognizing that the department of transportation requires full possession of parcel number 1-23190 to complete the Montlake Phase of the West End project, the department is directed to:

(i) Work with the operator of the Montlake boulevard market located on parcel number 1-23190 to negotiate a lease allowing continued operations up to January 1, 2020. After that time, the department shall identify an area in the vicinity of the Montlake property for a temporary market or other food service to be provided during the period of project construction. Should the current operator elect not to participate in providing that temporary service, the department shall then develop an outreach plan with the city to solicit community input on the food services provided, and then advertise the opportunity to other potential vendors. Further, the department shall work with the city of Seattle and existing permit processes to facilitate vendor access to and use of the area in the vicinity of the Montlake property.

(ii) Upon completion of the Montlake Phase of the West End project (current anticipated contract completion of 2023), WSDOT shall sell that portion of the property not used for permanent transportation improvements and initiate a process to convey that surplus property to a subsequent owner.

(c) $60,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations located in a city with a population exceeding six hundred thousand persons and that empower artists through equitable access to vital expertise, opportunities, and business services. Funds may be used only for the purpose of preserving, commemorating, and sharing the history of the city of Seattle's freeway protests and making the history of activism around the promotion of more integrated transportation and land use planning accessible to current and future generations through the preservation of Bent 2 of the R. H. Thompson freeway ramp.

(((14)))(13) It is the intent of the legislature that for the I-5 JBLM Corridor Improvements project (M00100R), the department shall actively pursue $50,000,000 in federal funds to pay for this project to supplant state funds in the future. $50,000,000 in connecting Washington account funding must be held in unallotted status during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. These funds may only be used after the department has provided notice to the office of financial management that it has exhausted all efforts to secure federal funds from the federal highway administration and the department of defense.

(((15) $265,100,000))(14) $310,469,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R).

(a) Any savings on the project must stay on the Puget Sound Gateway corridor until the project is complete.

(b) Proceeds from the sale of any surplus real property acquired for the purpose of building the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway (M00600R) project must be deposited into the motor vehicle account for the purpose of constructing the project.

(c) In making budget allocations to the Puget Sound Gateway project, the department shall implement the project's construction as a single corridor investment. The department shall develop a coordinated corridor construction and implementation plan for state route number 167 and state route number 509 in collaboration with affected stakeholders. Specific funding allocations must be based on where and when specific project segments are ready for construction to move forward and investments can be best optimized for timely project completion. Emphasis must be placed on avoiding gaps in fund expenditures for either project.

(d) It is the legislature's intent that the department shall construct a full single-point urban interchange at the junction of state route number 161 (Meridian avenue) and state route number 167 and a full single-point urban interchange at the junction of state route number 509 and 188th Street. If the department receives additional funds from an outside source for this project after the base project is fully funded, the funds must first be applied toward the completion of these two full single-point urban interchanges.

(e) In designing the state route number 509/state route number 516 interchange component of the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R), the department shall make every effort to utilize the preferred "4B" design.

(f) The department shall explore the development of a multiuse trail for bicyclists, pedestrians, skateboarders, and similar users along the SR 167 right-of-way acquired for the project to connect a network of new and existing trails from Mount Rainier to Point Defiance Park.

(g) If sufficient bonding authority to complete this project is not provided within chapter 421 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825))), Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling) or chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2132), Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling), or within a bond authorization act referencing chapter 421 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825))), Laws of 2019 or chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2132), Laws of 2019, by June 30, 2019, it is the intent of the legislature to return the Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R) to its previously identified construction schedule by moving $128,900,000 in connecting Washington account—state appropriation back to the 2027-2029 biennium from the 2023-2025 biennium on the list referenced in subsection (2) of this section. If sufficient bonding authority is provided, it is the intent of the legislature to advance the project to allow for earlier completion and inflationary savings.

(((16)))(15) It is the intent of the legislature that, for the I-5/North Lewis County Interchange project (L2000204), the department develop and design the project with the objective of significantly improving access to the industrially zoned properties in north Lewis county. The design must consider the county's process of investigating alternatives to improve such access from Interstate 5 that began in March 2015.

(((18) $950,000))(16) $1,029,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation is provided solely for the U.S. 2 Trestle IJR project (L1000158).

(((19)))(17) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's annual budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.

(((20)))(18) Any advisory group that the department convenes during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium must consider the interests of the entire state of Washington.

(((21)))(19) The legislature finds that there are sixteen companies involved in wood preserving in the state that employ four hundred workers and have an annual payroll of fifteen million dollars. Before the department's switch to steel guardrails, ninety percent of the twenty-five hundred mile guardrail system was constructed of preserved wood and one hundred ten thousand wood guardrail posts were produced annually for state use. Moreover, the policy of using steel posts requires the state to use imported steel. Given these findings, where practicable, and until June 30, 2021, the department shall include the design option to use wood guardrail posts, in addition to steel posts, in new guardrail installations. The selection of posts must be consistent with the agency design manual policy that existed before December 2009.

(((22)))(20)(a) For projects funded as part of the 2015 connecting Washington transportation package listed on the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project in this section with an appropriation that cannot be used for the current fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the following projects:

(i) I-82 Yakima - Union Gap Economic Development Improvements (T21100R);

(ii) I-5 Federal Way - Triangle Vicinity Improvements (T20400R); or

(iii) SR 522/Paradise Lk Rd Interchange & Widening on SR 522 (Design/Engineering) (NPARADI).

(b) At least ten business days before advancing a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(c) For connecting Washington projects that have already begun and are eligible for the authority granted in section 601 of this act, the department shall prioritize advancing the following projects if expected reappropriations become available:

(i) SR 14/I-205 to SE 164th Ave - Auxiliary Lanes (L2000102);

(ii) SR 305 Construction - Safety Improvements (N30500R);

(iii) SR 14/Bingen Underpass (L2220062);

(iv) I-405/NE 132nd Interchange - Totem Lake (L1000110);

(v) US Hwy 2 Safety (N00200R);

(vi) US-12/Walla Walla Corridor Improvements (T20900R);

(vii) I-5 JBLM Corridor Improvements (M00100R);

(viii) I-5/Slater Road Interchange - Improvements (L1000099);

(ix) SR 510/Yelm Loop Phase 2 (T32700R); or

(x) SR 520/124th St Interchange (Design and Right of Way) (L1000098).

(d) To the extent practicable, the department shall use the flexibility and authority granted in this section and in section 601 of this act to minimize the amount of reappropriations needed each biennium.

(((23)))(21) The legislature continues to prioritize the replacement of the state's aging infrastructure and recognizes the importance of reusing and recycling construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials in our transportation system. To accomplish Washington state's sustainability goals in transportation and in accordance with RCW 70.95.805, the legislature reaffirms its determination that recycled concrete aggregate and other transportation building materials are natural resource construction materials that are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled, and are a commodity as defined in WAC 173-350-100.

Further, the legislature determines construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials substantially meet widely recognized international, national, and local standards and specifications referenced in American society for testing and materials, American concrete institute, Washington state department of transportation, Seattle department of transportation, American public works association, federal aviation administration, and federal highway administration specifications, and are described as necessary and desirable products for recycling and reuse by state and federal agencies.

As these recyclable materials have well established markets, are substantially a primary or secondary product of necessary construction processes and production, and are managed as an item of commercial value, construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials are exempt from chapter 173-350 WAC.

(((24)))(22)(a) $17,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for staffing of a project office to replace the Interstate 5 bridge across the Columbia river (G2000088). If at least a $9,000,000 transfer is not authorized in section 406(29) ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2019, then $9,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation lapses.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $7,780,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation must be placed in unallotted status by the office of financial management until the department develops a detailed plan for the work of this project office in consultation with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature. The director of the office of financial management shall consult with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature prior to making a decision to allot these funds.

(c) The work of this project office includes, but is not limited to, the reevaluation of the purpose and need identified for the project previously known as the Columbia river crossing, the reevaluation of permits and development of a finance plan, the reengagement of key stakeholders and the public, and the reevaluation of scope, schedule, and budget for a reinvigorated bistate effort for replacement of the Interstate 5 Columbia river bridge. When reevaluating the finance plan for the project, the department shall assume that some costs of the new facility may be covered by tolls. The project office must also study the possible different governance structures for a bridge authority that would provide for the joint administration of the bridges over the Columbia river between Oregon and Washington. As part of this study, the project office must examine the feasibility and necessity of an interstate compact in conjunction with the national center for interstate compacts.

(d) Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department must implement chapter 137 (((Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1994))), Laws of 2019 (projects of statewide significance).

(e) The department shall have as a goal to:

(i) Reengage project stakeholders and reevaluate the purpose and need and environmental permits by July 1, 2020;

(ii) Develop a finance plan by December 1, 2020; and

(iii) Have made significant progress toward beginning the supplemental environmental impact statement process by June 30, 2021. The department shall aim to provide a progress report on these activities to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019, and a final report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(((25)))(23) $17,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to begin the pre-design phase on the I-5/Columbia River Bridge project (G2000088); however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993))), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((26)))(24)(a) (($36,500,000))$191,360,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, (($44,961,000))$47,655,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $11,179,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, $6,100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, and (($18,539,000))$18,706,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Fish Passage Barrier project (0BI4001) with the intent of fully complying with the court injunction by 2030.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $320,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely to remove the fish passage barrier on state route number 6 that interfaces with Boistfort Valley water utilities near milepost 46.6.

(c) The department shall coordinate with the Brian Abbott fish passage barrier removal board to use a watershed approach to maximize habitat gain by replacing both state and local culverts. The department shall deliver high habitat value fish passage barrier corrections that it has identified, guided by the following factors: Opportunity to bundle projects, ability to leverage investments by others, presence of other barriers, project readiness, other transportation projects in the area, and transportation impacts.

(d) The department must keep track of, for each barrier removed: (i) The location; (ii) the amount of fish habitat gain; and (iii) the amount spent to comply with the injunction.

(e) It is the intent of the legislature that for the amount listed for the 2021-2023 biennium for the Fish Barriers project (G2000091) on the LEAP list referenced in subsection (1) of this section, that accrued practical design savings deposited in the transportation future funding program account be used to help fund the cost of fully complying with the court injunction by 2030.

(((27) $14,750,000))(25) $16,649,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $373,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, and $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the I-90/Barker to Harvard – Improve Interchanges & Local Roads project (L2000122). The connecting Washington account appropriation for the improvements that fall within the city of Liberty Lake may only be expended if the city of Liberty Lake agrees to cover any project costs within the city of Liberty Lake above the $20,900,000 of state appropriation provided for the total project in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-1))2020-1 as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, Program – Highway Improvements (I).

(((28)))(26)(a) (($7,060,000))$6,799,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, (($72,000))$31,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, (($3,580,000))$3,812,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, and $7,000,000 of the ((high occupancy))Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes ((operations)) account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 410 to SR 18 - Congestion Management project (316706C).

(b) If sufficient bonding authority to complete this project is not provided within chapter 421 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825))), Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling) or chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2132), Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling), or within a bond authorization act referencing chapter 421 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825))), Laws of 2019 or chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2132), Laws of 2019, by June 30, 2019, it is the intent of the legislature to remove the $100,000,000 in toll funding from this project on the list referenced in subsection (2) of this section.

(((29)))(27) For the I-405/North 8th Street Direct Access Ramp in Renton project (L1000280), if sufficient bonding authority to begin this project is not provided within chapter 421 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825))), Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling) or chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2132), Laws of 2019 (addressing tolling), or within a bond authorization act referencing chapter 421 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825))), Laws of 2019 or chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2132), Laws of 2019, by June 30, 2019, it is the intent of the legislature to remove the project from the list referenced in subsection (2) of this section.

(((30) $7,900,000))(28) $7,985,000 of the Special Category C account—state appropriation and $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the SR 18 Widening - Issaquah/Hobart Rd to Raging River project (L1000199) for improving and widening state route number 18 to four lanes from Issaquah-Hobart Road to Raging River.

(((31)))(29) $2,250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-5 Corridor from Mounts Road to Tumwater project (L1000231) for completing a National and State Environmental Policy Act (NEPA/SEPA) analysis to identify mid- and long-term environmental impacts associated with future improvements along the I-5 corridor from Tumwater to DuPont.

(((32) $1,290,000))(30) $622,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the US 101/East Sequim Corridor Improvements project (L2000343); however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993))), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((33) $12,800,000))(31) $12,916,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 522/Paradise Lk Rd Interchange & Widening on SR 522 (Design/Engineering) project (NPARADI); however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993))), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((34)))(32) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the US 101/Morse Creek Safety Barrier project (L1000247); however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993))), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((35)))(33) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 162/410 Interchange Design and Right of Way project (L1000276); however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993))), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((36) $1,000,000))(34) $679,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-5/Rush Road Interchange Improvements project (L1000223); however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993))), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(35) It is the intent of the legislature that no capital projects be delayed as a result of revenue reductions, but that as a short-term solution appropriation authority for this program is reduced to reflect anticipated underruns in this program, based on historical reappropriation levels.

(36) $45,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for projects as listed by amount on the LEAP list referenced in subsection (2) of this section, and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

Sec. 306. 2019 c 416 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PRESERVATION—PROGRAM P

Recreational Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,744,000))

$2,971,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($23,706,000))

$20,248,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($74,885,000))

$82,447,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($454,758,000))

$490,744,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,159,000))

$7,408,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($544,000))

$326,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($189,771,000))

$204,630,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,906,000))

$8,350,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,018,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,617,000))

$17,892,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($768,100,000))

$838,044,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account—state appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-1))2020-1 as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-2))2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, additional congressional action not related to a specific project or purpose, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities or fish passage barrier corrections (0BI4001).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act. Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised. The department shall submit a report on fiscal year funds transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.

(4) (($25,036,000))$26,683,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the land mobile radio upgrade (G2000055) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. The land mobile radio project is subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer. The department, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, shall identify where existing or proposed mobile radio technology investments should be consolidated, identify when existing or proposed mobile radio technology investments can be reused or leveraged to meet multiagency needs, increase mobile radio interoperability between agencies, and identify how redundant investments can be reduced over time. The department shall also provide quarterly reports to the technology services board on project progress.

(5) (($2,500,000))$4,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for extraordinary costs incurred from litigation awards, settlements, or dispute mitigation activities not eligible for funding from the self-insurance fund. The amount provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the department submits a request to the office of financial management that includes documentation detailing litigation-related expenses. The office of financial management may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for litigation awards, settlements, and dispute mitigation activities have been exhausted. No funds provided in this subsection may be expended on any legal fees related to the SR 99/Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project (809936Z).

(6) The appropriation in this section includes funding for starting planning, engineering, and construction of the Elwha River bridge replacement. To the greatest extent practicable, the department shall maintain public access on the existing route.

(7) (($22,729,000))$21,289,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and (($553,000))$840,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the preservation of structurally deficient bridges or bridges that are at risk of becoming structurally deficient (L1000068). These funds must be used widely around the state of Washington. When practicable, the department shall pursue design-build contracts for these bridge projects to expedite delivery. The department shall provide a report that identifies the progress of each project funded in this subsection as part of its annual agency budget request.

(8) The department must consult with the Washington state patrol and the office of financial management during the design phase of any improvement or preservation project that could impact Washington state patrol weigh station operations. During the design phase of any such project, the department must estimate the cost of designing around the affected weigh station's current operations, as well as the cost of moving the affected weigh station.

(9) During the course of any planned resurfacing or other preservation activity on state route number 26 between Colfax and Othello in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must add dug-in reflectors.

(10)(a) For projects funded as part of the 2015 connecting Washington transportation package listed on the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project in this section with an appropriation that cannot be used for the current fiscal biennium to advance the SR 4/Abernathy Creek Br - Replace Bridge project (400411A).

(b) At least ten business days before advancing the project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of the project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(c) To the extent practicable, the department shall use the flexibility and authority granted in this section and in section 601 of this act to minimize the amount of reappropriations needed each biennium.

(11) Within the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, the department may transfer funds from Highway System Preservation (L1100071) to other preservation projects listed in the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if it is determined necessary for completion of these high priority preservation projects. The department's next budget submittal after using this subsection must appropriately reflect the transfer.

Sec. 307. 2019 c 416 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,311,000))

$8,433,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,331,000))

$6,137,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($500,000))

$579,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($13,142,000))

$15,249,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $700,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 99 Aurora Bridge ITS project (L2000338); however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993))), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature that no capital projects be delayed as a result of revenue reductions, but that as a short-term solution appropriation authority for this program is reduced to reflect anticipated underruns in this program, based on historical reappropriation levels.

(3) $700,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for projects as listed by amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed February 25, 2020, Program – Traffic Operations (Q), and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

Sec. 308. 2019 c 416 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM W

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($111,076,000))

$114,953,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($141,750,000))

$198,688,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($350,000))

$4,779,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,936,000))

$6,582,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($92,766,000))

$96,617,000

Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($99,000,000))

$96,030,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$986,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($449,878,000))

$523,635,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-2))2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).

(2) (($1,461,000))$2,857,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation, (($59,650,000))$17,832,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation, and $63,789,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, are provided solely for the Mukilteo ferry terminal (952515P). To the extent practicable, the department shall avoid the closure of, or disruption to, any existing public access walkways in the vicinity of the terminal project during construction.

(3) (($73,089,000))$102,641,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation((, $33,089,000))and $34,998,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation((, and $8,778,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation)) are provided solely for the Seattle Terminal Replacement project (900010L).

(4) (($5,000,000))$5,357,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(5) $2,300,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ORCA acceptance project (L2000300). The ferry system shall work with Washington technology solutions and the tolling division on the development of a new, interoperable ticketing system.

(6) $495,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for an electric ferry planning team (G2000087) to develop ten-year and twenty-year implementation plans to efficiently deploy hybrid-electric vessels, including a cost-benefit analysis of construction and operation of hybrid-electric vessels with and without charging infrastructure. The plan includes, but is not limited to, vessel technology and feasibility, vessel and terminal deployment schedules, project financing, and workforce requirements. The plan shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2020.

(7) $35,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation and (($6,500,000))$8,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the conversion of up to two Jumbo Mark II vessels to electric hybrid propulsion (G2000084). The department shall seek additional funds for the purposes of this subsection. The department may spend from the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation in this section only as much as the department receives in Volkswagen settlement funds for the purposes of this subsection.

(8) $400,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a request for proposals for a new maintenance management system (project L2000301) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(9) (($99,000,000))$96,030,000 of the capital vessel replacement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the acquisition of a 144-car hybrid-electric vessel. The vendor must present to the joint transportation committee and the office of financial management, by September 15, 2019, a list of options that will result in significant cost savings changes in terms of construction or the long-term maintenance and operations of the vessel. The vendor must allow for exercising the options without a penalty. It is the intent of the legislature to provide an additional $88,000,000 in funding in the 2021-23 biennium. ((Unless (a) chapter 431 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2161), Laws of 2019 (capital surcharge) or chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5992), Laws of 2019 (capital surcharge) is enacted by June 30, 2019, and (b) chapter 417 (Engrossed House Bill No. 1789), Laws of 2019 (service fees) or chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5419), Laws of 2019 (service fees) is enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))The reduction provided in this subsection is an assumed underrun pursuant to subsection (11) of this section.

(10) The capital vessel replacement account—state appropriation includes up to (($99,000,000))$96,030,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(11) It is the intent of the legislature that no capital projects be delayed as a result of revenue reductions, but that as a short-term solution appropriation authority for this program is reduced to reflect anticipated underruns in this program, based on historical reappropriation levels.

(12) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for projects as listed by amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed February 25, 2020, Program – Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W), and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

Sec. 309. 2019 c 416 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,750,000

Essential Rail Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($500,000))

$716,000

Transportation Infrastructure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,554,000))

$7,503,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($85,441,000))

$95,125,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,302,000))

$8,601,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$336,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($103,883,000))

$114,031,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-2))2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, Program - Rail Program (Y).

(2) $7,136,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation is provided solely for new low-interest loans approved by the department through the freight rail investment bank (FRIB) program. The department shall issue FRIB program loans with a repayment period of no more than ten years, and charge only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's costs to administer the loans. The department shall report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on all FRIB loans issued.

(3) (($8,112,000))$7,968,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation((, $51,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation, and $135,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation are))is provided solely for new statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) $367,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation and $1,100,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely to reimburse Highline Grain, LLC for approved work completed on Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) railroad track in Spokane county between the BNSF Railway Interchange at Cheney and Geiger Junction and must be administered in a manner consistent with freight rail assistance program projects. The value of the public benefit of this project is expected to meet or exceed the cost of this project in: Shipper savings on transportation costs; jobs saved in rail-dependent industries; and/or reduced future costs to repair wear and tear on state and local highways due to fewer annual truck trips (reduced vehicle miles traveled). The amounts provided in this subsection are not a commitment for future legislatures, but it is the legislature's intent that future legislatures will work to approve biennial appropriations until the full $7,337,000 cost of this project is reimbursed.

(5)(a) (($365,000))$716,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation ((is))and $82,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of the rehabilitation and maintenance of the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad line (F01111B).

(b) Expenditures from the essential rail assistance account—state in this subsection may not exceed the combined total of:

(i) Revenues and transfers deposited into the essential rail assistance account from leases and sale of property relating to the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad;

(ii) Revenues from trackage rights agreement fees paid by shippers; and

(iii) Revenues and transfers transferred from the miscellaneous program account to the essential rail assistance account, pursuant to RCW 47.76.360, for the purpose of sustaining the grain train program by maintaining the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad.

(6) The department shall issue a call for projects for the freight rail assistance program, and shall evaluate the applications in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of 2011. By November 15, 2020, the department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(7) $10,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely as expenditure authority for any insurance proceeds received by the state for Passenger Rail Equipment Replacement (project 700010C.) The department must use this expenditure authority only to purchase ((new train sets))replacement equipment that ((have))has been competitively procured and for service recovery needs and corrective actions related to the December 2017 derailment.

(8) (($600,000))$898,000 of the multimodal transportation account—federal appropriation and (($6,000))$8,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Ridgefield Rail Overpass (project 725910A). Total costs for this project may not exceed $909,000 across fiscal biennia.

(9)(a) For projects funded as part of the 2015 connecting Washington transportation package listed on the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project in this section with an appropriation that cannot be used for the current fiscal biennium to advance the South Kelso Railroad Crossing project (L1000147).

(b) At least ten business days before advancing the project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of the project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(c) To the extent practicable, the department shall use the flexibility and authority granted in this section to minimize the amount of reappropriations needed each biennium.

(10) The multimodal transportation account—state appropriation includes up to (($19,592,000))$25,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.867.

(11) The department must report to the joint transportation committee on the progress made on freight rail investment bank projects and freight rail assistance projects funded during this biennium by January 1, 2020.

(12) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Chelatchie Prairie railroad roadbed rehabilitation project (L1000233).

(13) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Port of Moses Lake Northern Columbia Basin railroad feasibility study (L1000235).

(14) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Spokane airport transload facility project (L1000242).

(15) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the grade separation at Bell road project (L1000239)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(16) $750,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation ((is))and $399,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the rail crossing improvements at 6th Ave. and South 19th St. project (L2000289)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(17) It is the intent of the legislature that no capital projects be delayed as a result of revenue reductions, but that as a short-term solution appropriation authority for this program is reduced to reflect anticipated underruns in this program, based on historical reappropriation levels.

(18) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for projects as listed by amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed February 25, 2020, Program – Rail Program (Y), and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

Sec. 310. 2019 c 416 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—CAPITAL

Highway Infrastructure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($793,000))

$1,276,000

Highway Infrastructure Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($981,000))

$1,337,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($750,000))

$1,380,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($800,000))

$1,314,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($30,878,000))

$38,707,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,813,000))

$67,690,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,500,000))

$29,000,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($172,454,000))

$155,550,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($72,269,000))

$87,469,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($334,238,000))

$383,723,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-2))2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).

(2) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:

(a) $18,380,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for newly selected pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects. (($5,940,000))$18,577,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and (($750,000))$1,380,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation are reappropriated for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects selected in the previous biennia (L2000188).

(b) $11,400,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and $7,750,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for newly selected safe routes to school projects. (($6,690,000))$11,354,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, (($2,320,000))$4,640,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, and (($800,000))$1,314,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation are reappropriated for safe routes to school projects selected in the previous biennia (L2000189). The department may consider the special situations facing high-need areas, as defined by schools or project areas in which the percentage of the children eligible to receive free and reduced-price meals under the national school lunch program is equal to, or greater than, the state average as determined by the department, when evaluating project proposals against established funding criteria while ensuring continued compliance with federal eligibility requirements.

(3) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019, and December 1, 2020, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program. The report must include, but is not limited to, a list of projects selected and a brief description of each project's status.

(4) (($28,319,000))$37,537,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for bicycle and pedestrian projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) (($19,160,000))$23,926,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Covington Connector (L2000104). The amounts described in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section are not a commitment by future legislatures, but it is the legislature's intent that future legislatures will work to approve appropriations in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium to reimburse the city of Covington for approved work completed on the project up to the full $24,000,000 cost of this project.

(6)(a) For projects funded as part of the 2015 connecting Washington transportation package listed on the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project in this section with an appropriation that cannot be used for the current fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the following projects:

(i) East-West Corridor Overpass and Bridge (L2000067);

(ii) 41st Street Rucker Avenue Freight Corridor Phase 2 (L2000134);

(iii) Mottman Rd Pedestrian & Street Improvements (L1000089);

(iv) I-5/Port of Tacoma Road Interchange (L1000087);

(v) Complete SR 522 Improvements-Kenmore (T10600R);

(vi) SR 99 Revitalization in Edmonds (NEDMOND); or

(vii) SR 523 145th Street (L1000148);

(b) At least ten business days before advancing a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(c) To the extent practicable, the department shall use the flexibility and authority granted in this section to minimize the amount of reappropriations needed each biennium.

(7) It is the expectation of the legislature that the department will be administering a local railroad crossing safety grant program for $7,000,000 in federal funds during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(8)(a) (($15,213,000))$41,483,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for national highway freight network projects identified on the project list submitted in accordance with section 218(4)(b), chapter 14, Laws of 2016 on October 31, 2016.

(b) In advance of the expiration of the fixing America's surface transportation (FAST) act in 2020, the department must work with the Washington state freight advisory committee to agree on a framework for allocation of any new national highway freight funding that may be approved in a new federal surface transportation reauthorization act. The department and representatives of the advisory committee must report to the joint transportation committee by October 1, 2020, on the status of planning for allocating new funds for this program.

(9) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Beech Street Extension project (L1000222)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(10) $3,900,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Dupont-Steilacoom road improvements project (L1000224)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(11) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 104/40th place northeast roundabout project (L1000244)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(12) $860,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Clinton to Ken's corner trail project (L1000249).

(13) $210,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-405/44th gateway signage and green-scaping improvements project (L1000250)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(14) (($750,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Edmonds waterfront connector project (L1000252).

(15))) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Wallace Kneeland and Shelton springs road intersection improvements project (L1000260)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(((16)))(15) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the complete 224th Phase two project (L1000270)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount in this subsection provided from the motor vehicle account—state appropriation lapses)).

(((17)))(16) $60,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the installation of an updated meteorological station at the Colville airport (L1000279).

(((18)))(17)(a) $700,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Ballard-Interbay Regional Transportation system plan project (L1000281)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(b) Funding in this subsection is provided solely for the city of Seattle to develop a plan and report for the Ballard-Interbay Regional Transportation System project to improve mobility for people and freight. The plan must be developed in coordination and partnership with entities including but not limited to the city of Seattle, King county, the Port of Seattle, Sound Transit, the Washington state military department for the Seattle armory, and the Washington state department of transportation. The plan must examine replacement of the Ballard bridge and the Magnolia bridge, which was damaged in the 2001 Nisqually earthquake. The city must provide a report on the plan that includes recommendations to the Seattle city council, King county council, and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2020. The report must include recommendations on how to maintain the current and future capacities of the Magnolia and Ballard bridges, an overview and analysis of all plans between 2010 and 2020 that examine how to replace the Magnolia bridge, and recommendations on a timeline for constructing new Magnolia and Ballard bridges.

(((19)))(18) $750,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Mickelson Parkway project (L1000282)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(((20)))(19) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the South 314th Street Improvements project (L1000283)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(((21)))(20) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Ridgefield South I-5 Access Planning project (L1000284)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(((22)))(21) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washougal 32nd Street Underpass Design and Permitting project (L1000285)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(((23)))(22) $600,000 of the Connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, and (($50,000))$267,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Bingen Walnut Creek and Maple Railroad Crossing (L2000328)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount in this subsection provided from the motor vehicle account—state appropriation lapses)).

(((24)))(23) $1,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 303 Warren Avenue Bridge Pedestrian Improvements project (L2000339)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(((25)))(24) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the 72nd/Washington Improvements in Yakima project (L2000341)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(((26)))(25) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the 48th/Washington Improvements in Yakima project (L2000342)((; however, if at least $50,000,000 is not made available, by means of transfer, deposit, appropriation, or other similar conveyance, to the motor vehicle account for stormwater-related activities through the enactment of chapter 422 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5993), Laws of 2019 (model toxics control program reform) by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses)).

(26) It is the intent of the legislature that no capital projects be delayed as a result of revenue reductions, but that as a short-term solution appropriation authority for this program is reduced to reflect anticipated underruns in this program, based on historical reappropriation levels.

(27) $7,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $10,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely as restitutive expenditure authority for projects as listed by amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed February 25, 2020, Program – Local Programs Program (Z), and may be spent only if a court of final jurisdiction holds that chapter 1 (Initiative Measure No. 976), Laws of 2020 is unconstitutional in its entirety.

Sec. 311. 2019 c 416 s 313 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

QUARTERLY REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CAPITAL PROGRAM

On a quarterly basis, the department of transportation shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees the following reports for all capital programs:

(1) For active projects, the report must include:

(a) A TEIS version containing actual capital expenditures for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget;

(b) Anticipated cost savings, cost increases, reappropriations, and schedule adjustments for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget;

(c) The award amount, the engineer's estimate, and the number of bidders for all active projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget;

(d) Projected costs and schedule for individual projects that are funded at a programmatic level for projects relating to bridge rail, guard rail, fish passage barrier removal, roadside safety projects, and seismic bridges. Projects within this programmatic level funding must be completed on a priority basis and scoped to be completed within the current programmatic budget;

(e) Highway projects that may be reduced in scope and still achieve a functional benefit;

(f) Highway projects that have experienced scope increases and that can be reduced in scope;

(g) Highway projects that have lost significant local or regional contributions that were essential to completing the project; and

(h) Contingency amounts for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget.

(2) For completed projects, the report must:

(a) Compare the costs and operationally complete date for projects with budgets of twenty million dollars or more that are funded with preexisting funds to the original project cost estimates and schedule; and

(b) Provide a list of nickel ((and)), TPA, and connecting Washington projects charging to the nickel/TPA/CWA environmental mitigation reserve (OBI4ENV) and the amount each project is charging.

(3) For prospective projects, the report must:

(a) Identify the estimated advertisement date for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted transportation budget that are going to advertisement during the current fiscal biennium;

(b) Identify the anticipated operationally complete date for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted transportation budget that are going to advertisement during the current fiscal biennium; and

(c) Identify the estimated cost of completion for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted transportation budget that are going to advertisement during the current fiscal biennium.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 401. 2019 c 416 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($376,000))

$278,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$125,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,636,000))

$1,412,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,599,000))

$7,433,000

Highway Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,327,766,000))

$1,268,249,000

Ferry Bond Retirement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$25,077,000

Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,684,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,594,000))

$29,584,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($86,493,000))

$86,483,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,491,340,000))

$1,431,325,000

Sec. 402. 2019 c 416 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Multimodal Transportation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$25,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($327,000))

$282,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,520,000))

$1,541,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($75,000))

$56,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,947,000))

$1,904,000

Sec. 403. 2019 c 416 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to

cities and counties
. . . .
(($518,198,000))

$508,276,000

Sec. 404. 2019 c 416 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and

statutory transfers
. . . .
(($2,188,945,000))

$2,146,790,000

Sec. 405. 2019 c 416 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and

transfers
. . . .
(($220,426,000))

$235,788,000

Sec. 406. 2019 c 416 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS

(1) Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation

Account—State
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$54,000,000

(2) Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

(3) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State
. . . .
(($7,000,000))

$57,000,000

(4) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Freight Mobility Investment

Account—State
. . . .
(($8,511,000))

$970,000

(5) ((Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Rural Arterial Trust

Account—State
. . . .
$4,844,000

(6))) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Transportation Improvement

Account—State
. . . .
(($9,688,000))

$1,101,000

(((7) Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State
. . . .
$44,000,000

(8)))(6) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State
. . . .
$52,000,000

(7) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State
. . . .
$55,000,000

(8) Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

(9) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to

the State Route Number 520 Corridor

Account—State
. . . .
$1,434,000

(10) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting

Washington Account—State
. . . .
(($50,000,000))

$60,000,000

(11) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Freight

Mobility Multimodal Account—State
. . . .
(($8,511,000))

$1,011,000

(12) ((Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound

Capital Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

(13) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound

Ferry Operations Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

(14))) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Regional

Mobility Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
(($27,679,000))

$11,215,000

(((15)))(13) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Rural

Mobility Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
$15,223,000

(((16)))(14) Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—

State Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget

Sound Capital Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($20,000,000))

$15,000,000

(((17)))(15)(a) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Motor Vehicle Account—State
. . . .
$9,992,000

(b) The transfer identified in this subsection is provided solely to repay in full the motor vehicle account—state appropriation loan from section 1005(21) ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2019.

(((18)))(16)(a) Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Alaskan Way Viaduct

Replacement Project Account—State
. . . .
(($77,951,000))

$77,956,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents that portion of the up to $200,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873, intended to be sold through the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, used only for construction of the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z), and that must be repaid from the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account consistent with RCW 47.56.864.

(((19)))(17) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the County Arterial Preservation

Account—State
. . . .
(($4,844,000))

$4,829,000

(((20)))(18)(a) General Fund Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State
. . . .
$625,000

(b) The state treasurer shall transfer the funds only after receiving notification from the Washington state patrol under section 207(7) ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2019.

(((21)))(19) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation

Partnership Account—State
. . . .
(($3,293,000))

$2,312,000

(((22)))(20)(a) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Transportation Partnership Account—State
. . . .
(($19,262,000))

$15,858,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents repayment of debt service incurred for the construction of the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z).

(((23)))(21) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor

Vehicle Account—State
. . . .
$950,000

(((24)))(22)(a) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

(b) A transfer in the amount of $5,000,000 was made from the Motor Vehicle Account to the Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account in April 2019. It is the intent of the legislature that this transfer was to be temporary, for the purpose of minimizing the impact of toll increases, and this is an equivalent reimbursing transfer to occur in November 2019.

(((25)))(23)(a) Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)

—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Tacoma

Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State
. . . .
$12,543,000

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that this transfer is temporary, for the purpose of minimizing the impact of toll increases, and an equivalent reimbursing transfer is to occur after the debt service and deferred sales tax on the Tacoma Narrows bridge construction costs are fully repaid in accordance with chapter 195, Laws of 2018.

(((26)))(24) Transportation Infrastructure Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the multimodal

Transportation Account—State. . . .$9,000,000

(((27)))(25) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Pilotage

Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

(((28)))(26)(a) Motor Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the County Road

Administration Board Emergency Loan Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

(b) If chapter 157 (((Senate Bill No. 5923))), Laws of 2019 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((29)))(27)(a) Advanced Environmental Mitigation

Revolving Account—State Appropriation: For transfer

to the Motor Vehicle Account—State
. . . .
$9,000,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection is contingent on at least a $9,000,000 transfer to the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account authorized by June 30, 2019, in the omnibus capital appropriations act.

(((30) Motor Vehicle account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Electric Vehicle Charging

Infrastructure Account—State
. . . .
$12,255,000

(31) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Electric Vehicle

Charging Infrastructure Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

(32)))(28) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Complete Streets

Grant Program Account—State
. . . .
(($14,670,000))

$10,200,000

(((33)))(29)(a) Transportation Partnership

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State
. . . .
(($99,000,000))

$96,030,000

(b)The amount transferred in this subsection represents proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(30) Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

(31) Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account—State
. . . .
$1,389,000

(32) Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account—State
. . . .
$95,000,000

Sec. 407. 2019 c 416 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For distribution to cities and

counties
. . . .
$26,786,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

distribution to cities and counties
. . . .
$23,438,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$50,224,000

Sec. 408. 2019 c 416 s 408 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUE

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$199,522,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$25,372,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($225,273,000))

$224,894,000

COMPENSATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. A new section is added to 2019 c 416 (uncodified) to read as follows:

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS

Sections 502 and 503 of this act represent the results of the negotiations for fiscal year 2021 collective bargaining agreement changes, permitted under chapter 47.64 RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 502 and 503 of this act are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements. The collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 502 and 503 of this act may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. A new section is added to 2019 c 416 (uncodified) to read as follows:

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MEBA-UL

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the marine engineers' beneficial association unlicensed engine room employees pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021 fiscal year. Funding is provided to ensure training opportunities are available to all bargaining unit employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. A new section is added to 2019 c 416 (uncodified) to read as follows:

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MEBA-L

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the marine engineers' beneficial association licensed engineer officers pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2021 fiscal year. Funding is provided to ensure training opportunities are available to all bargaining unit employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. A new section is added to 2019 c 416 (uncodified) to read as follows:

GENERAL STATE EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

Except as otherwise provided in sections 501 through 503 of this act, state employee compensation adjustments will be provided in accordance with funding adjustments provided in the 2020 supplemental omnibus appropriations act.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS

Sec. 601. 2019 c 416 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FUND TRANSFERS

(1) The 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements and 2015 connecting Washington projects or improvements are listed in the LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-1))2020-1 as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source and amount over a sixteen-year period. Current fiscal biennium funding for each project is a line-item appropriation, while the outer year funding allocations represent a sixteen-year plan. The department of transportation is expected to use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in the delivery and completion of all transportation partnership account and connecting Washington account projects on the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. For the 2019-2021 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of the office of financial management may provide written authorization for a transfer of appropriation authority between projects funded with transportation partnership account appropriations or connecting Washington account appropriations to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the respective program under the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source referenced on the respective project list;

(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;

(c) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated to the project are in excess of the amount needed in the current fiscal biennium;

(d) Transfers may not occur for projects not identified on the applicable project list;

(e) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session;

(f) Transfers to a project may not be made with funds designated as attributable to practical design savings as described in RCW 47.01.480;

(g) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of the office of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature. Until the legislature reconvenes to consider the 2020 supplemental omnibus transportation appropriations act, any unexpended 2017-2019 appropriation balance as approved by the office of financial management, in consultation with the chairs and ranking members of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees, may be considered when transferring funds between projects; and

(h) Transfers between projects may be made by the department of transportation without the formal written approval provided under this subsection (1), provided that the transfer amount does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars or ten percent of the total project, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported quarterly to the director of the office of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees.

(2) The department of transportation must submit quarterly all transfers authorized under this section in the transportation executive information system. The office of financial management must maintain a legislative baseline project list identified in the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act, and update that project list with all authorized transfers under this section.

(3) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature.

(4) Before approval, the office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner and consider any concerns raised by the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees.

(5) No fewer than ten days after the receipt of a project transfer request, the director of the office of financial management must provide written notification to the department of any decision regarding project transfers, with copies submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

(6) The department must submit annually as part of its budget submittal a report detailing all transfers made pursuant to this section.

Sec. 602. 2019 c 416 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

TRANSIT, BICYCLE, AND PEDESTRIAN ELEMENTS REPORTING

(1) By November 15th of each year, the department of transportation must report on amounts expended to benefit transit, bicycle, or pedestrian elements within all connecting Washington projects in programs I, P, and Z identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2019-2))2020-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 27, 2019))February 25, 2020. The report must address each modal category separately and identify if eighteenth amendment protected funds have been used and, if not, the source of funding.

(2) To facilitate the report in subsection (1) of this section, the department of transportation must require that all bids on connecting Washington projects include an estimate on the cost to implement any transit, bicycle, or pedestrian project elements.

MISCELLANEOUS 2019-2021 FISCAL BIENNIUM

Sec. 701. 2019 c 416 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY OVERSIGHT

(1) Agencies must apply to the office of financial management and the office of the state chief information officer for approval before beginning a project or proceeding with each discreet stage of a project subject to this section. At each stage, the office of the state chief information officer must certify that the project has an approved technology budget and investment plan, complies with state information technology and security requirements, and other policies defined by the office of the state chief information officer. The office of financial management must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the receipt of each application and may not approve a funding request for ten business days from the date of notification.

(2)(a) Each project must have a technology budget. The technology budget must use a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, each fund source, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the entire project investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project onset through implementation and close out.

(b) As part of the development of a technology budget and at each request for funding, the agency shall submit detailed financial information to the office of financial management and the office of the state chief information officer. The technology budget must describe the total cost of the project by fiscal month to include and identify:

(i) Fund sources;

(ii) Full-time equivalent staffing level to include job classification assumptions;

(iii) A discreet appropriation index and program index;

(iv) Object and subobject codes of expenditures; and

(v) Anticipated deliverables.

(c) If a project technology budget changes and a revised technology budget is completed, a comparison of the revised technology budget to the last approved technology budget must be posted to the dashboard, to include a narrative rationale on what changed, why, and how that impacts the project in scope, budget, and schedule.

(3)(a) Each project must have an investment plan that includes:

(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities;

(ii) The office of the state chief information officer staff assigned to the project;

(iii) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project;

(iv) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product;

(v) Ongoing maintenance and operations cost of the project post implementation and close out delineated by agency staffing, contracted staffing, and service level agreements; and

(vi) Financial budget coding to include at least discrete program index and subobject codes.

(4) Projects with estimated costs greater than one hundred million dollars from initiation to completion and implementation may be divided into discrete subprojects as determined by the office of the state chief information officer. Each subproject must have a technology budget and investment plan as provided in this section.

(5)(a) The office of the state chief information officer shall maintain an information technology project dashboard that provides updated information each fiscal month on projects subject to this section. This includes, at least:

(i) Project changes each fiscal month;

(ii) Noting if the project has a completed market requirements document;

(iii) Financial status of information technology projects under oversight; ((and))

(iv) Coordination with agencies;

(v) Monthly quality assurance reports, if applicable;

(vi) Monthly office of the state chief information officer status reports;

(vii) Historical project budget and expenditures through fiscal year 2019;

(viii) Budget and expenditures each fiscal month; and

(ix) Estimated annual maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year.

(b) The dashboard must retain a roll up of the entire project cost, including all subprojects, that can be displayed the subproject detail.

(6) If the project affects more than one agency:

(a) A separate technology budget and investment plan must be prepared for each agency; and

(b) The dashboard must contain a statewide project technology budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.

(7) For any project that exceeds two million dollars in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:

(a) Quality assurance for the project must report independently the office of the chief information officer;

(b) The office of the chief information officer must review, and, if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;

(c) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;

(d) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed; and

(e) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements.

(8) The office of the state chief information officer must evaluate the project at each stage and certify whether the project is planned, managed, and meeting deliverable targets as defined in the project's approved technology budget and investment plan.

(9) The office of the state chief information officer may suspend or terminate a project at any time if it determines that the project is not meeting or not expected to meet anticipated performance and technology outcomes. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall unallot any unused funding and shall not make any expenditure for the project without the approval of the office of financial management. The office of the state chief information officer must report on July 1st and December 1st each calendar year, beginning July 1, 2020, any suspension or termination of a project in the previous six month period to legislative fiscal committees.

(10) The office of the state chief information officer, in consultation with the office of financial management, may identify additional projects to be subject to this section, including projects that are not separately identified within an agency budget. The office of the state chief information officer must report on July 1st and December 1st each calendar year, beginning July 1, 2020, any additional projects to be subjected to this section that were identified in the previous six month period to legislative fiscal committees.

(11) The following department of transportation projects are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in this section: Labor System Replacement, New Ferry Division Dispatch System, Maintenance Management System, Land Mobile Radio System Replacement, and New CSC System and Operator.

Sec. 702. RCW 36.79.020 and 1997 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created in the motor vehicle fund the rural arterial trust account. All moneys deposited in the motor vehicle fund to be credited to the rural arterial trust account shall be expended for (1) the construction and improvement of county rural arterials and collectors, (2) the construction of replacement bridges funded by the federal bridge replacement program on access roads in rural areas, and (3) those expenses of the board associated with the administration of the rural arterial program. However, during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the rural arterial trust account to the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 703. RCW 82.32.385 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 420 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning September 2019 and ending ((June 2021))December 2019, by the last day of September((,))and December((, March, and June of each year)), the state treasurer must transfer from the general fund to the connecting Washington account created in RCW 46.68.395 thirteen million six hundred eighty thousand dollars.

(2) Beginning March 2020 and ending June 2021, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer must transfer from the general fund to the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070 thirteen million six hundred eighty thousand dollars.

(3) Beginning September 2021 and ending June 2023, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer must transfer from the general fund to the connecting Washington account created in RCW 46.68.395 thirteen million eight hundred five thousand dollars.

(((3)))(4) Beginning September 2023 and ending June 2025, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer must transfer from the general fund to the connecting Washington account created in RCW 46.68.395 thirteen million nine hundred eighty-seven thousand dollars.

(((4)))(5) Beginning September 2025 and ending June 2027, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer must transfer from the general fund to the connecting Washington account created in RCW 46.68.395 eleven million six hundred fifty-eight thousand dollars.

(((5)))(6) Beginning September 2027 and ending June 2029, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer must transfer from the general fund to the connecting Washington account created in RCW 46.68.395 seven million five hundred sixty-four thousand dollars.

(((6)))(7) Beginning September 2029 and ending June 2031, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer must transfer from the general fund to the connecting Washington account created in RCW 46.68.395 four million fifty-six thousand dollars.

Sec. 704. RCW 47.66.110 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 11 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The transit coordination grant program is created in the department. The purpose of the transit coordination grant program is to encourage joint planning and coordination on the part of central Puget Sound transit systems in order to improve the user experience, increase ridership, and make the most effective use of tax dollars. The department shall oversee, manage, score, select, and evaluate transit coordination grant program project applications, and shall select transit coordination grant recipients annually. A transit agency located in a county or counties with a population of seven hundred thousand or more that border Puget Sound is eligible to apply to the department for transit coordination grants.

(2) Projects eligible for transit coordination grants include, but are not limited to, projects that:

(a) Integrate marketing efforts;

(b) Align fare structures;

(c) Integrate service planning;

(d) Coordinate long-range planning, including capital projects planning and implementation;

(e) Integrate other administrative functions and internal business processes as appropriate; and

(f) Integrate certain customer-focused tools and initiatives.

(3) Transit coordination grants must, at a minimum, be proposed jointly by two or more eligible transit agencies and must include a description of the:

(a) Issue or problem to be addressed;

(b) Specific solution and measurable outcomes;

(c) Benefits such as cost savings, travel time improvements, improved coordination, and improved customer experience; and

(d) Performance measurements and an evaluation plan that includes the identification of milestones towards successful completion of the project.

(4) Transit coordination grant applications must include measurable outcomes for the project including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Impacts on service, such as increased service, improved service delivery, and improved transfers and coordination across transit service;

(b) Impacts on customer service, such as: Improved reliability; improved outreach and coordination with customers, employers, and communities; improvements in customer service functions, such as customer response time and web-based and other communications; and

(c) Impacts on administration, such as improved marketing and outreach efforts, integrated customer-focused tools, and improved cross-agency communications.

(5) Transit coordination grant applications must also include:

(a) Project budget and cost details; and

(b) A commitment and description of local matching funding of at least ten percent of the project cost.

(6) Upon completion of the project, transit coordination grant recipients must provide a report to the department that includes an overview of the project, how the grant funds were spent, and the extent to which the identified project outcomes were met. In addition, such reports must include a description of best practices that could be transferred to other transit agencies faced with similar issues to those addressed by the transit coordination grant recipient. The department must report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature on the transit coordination grants that were awarded, and the report must include data to determine if completed transit coordination grant projects produced the anticipated outcomes included in the grant applications.

(7) This section expires July 1, ((2020))2021.

Sec. 705. RCW 82.44.200 and 2019 c 287 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The electric vehicle account is created in the transportation infrastructure account. Proceeds from the principal and interest payments made on loans from the account must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes specified in RCW 47.04.350, 82.08.9999, and 82.12.9999, and the support of other transportation electrification and alternative fuel related purposes. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the electric vehicle account to the multimodal transportation account.

Sec. 706. RCW 82.44.135 and 2006 c 318 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before a local government subject to this chapter may impose a motor vehicle excise tax, the local government must contract with the department for the collection of the tax. The department may charge a reasonable amount, not to exceed one percent of tax collections, or two and one-half percent during the 2019-2021 biennium, for the administration and collection of the tax.

(2) For fiscal year 2021, the department shall charge a minimum of seven million eight hundred two thousand dollars, which is the reasonable amount aimed at achieving full cost recovery for the administration and collection of a motor vehicle excise tax. The amount of the full reimbursement for the administration and collection of the motor vehicle excise tax must be deducted before distributing any revenues to a regional transit authority. Any reimbursement to ensure full cost recovery beyond the amount specified in this subsection may be negotiated between the department and the regional transit authority if full cost recovery has not been achieved, or if based on emergent issues.

Sec. 707. RCW 46.68.395 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The connecting Washington account is created in the motor vehicle fund. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used only for projects or improvements identified as connecting Washington projects or improvements in a transportation appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or improvements.

(2) Moneys in the connecting Washington account may not be expended on the state route number 99 Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project.

(3) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the connecting Washington account to the motor vehicle fund.

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---