BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is a retailer's license, designated as a spirits, beer, and wine school-operated restaurant, to sell spirituous liquor by the individual glass, beer, and wine, at retail, for consumption on the premises, including mixed drinks and cocktails compounded or mixed on the premises only. The license issuance and renewal fee is one thousand dollars per year. A license may be issued only to an applicant who is a postsecondary institution as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and who will use the license as part of a course or training program for students of the postsecondary institution.

(2) Except as provided in this section, all the privileges and limitations of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license issued under RCW 66.24.400 apply to a license issued under this section.

(a) The board shall establish food service requirements for a license issued under this section. The food service requirements may include requirements to serve complete meals when open to the public, but may not require a licensee to serve as many complete meals as the board requires of spirits, beer, and wine restaurants licensed under RCW 66.24.400.

(b) A licensee operating under this section may operate under hours established by the licensee.

(3) The same alcohol server training requirements applicable to workers at spirits, beer, and wine restaurants licensed under RCW 66.24.400 apply to workers, students, and any person who engages in the sale or service of liquor authorized under this section.

--- END ---