BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to explore new school funding models that would permit and promote equitable access to innovative modes of instruction which allow students to earn credit through demonstration of mastery learning standards instead of completion of hours of classroom instruction. Therefore, the legislature intends to create a pilot program which authorizes full-time enrollment funding for students participating in established mastery-based learning programs and to examine the efficiency, cost, and impacts of these funding models.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By July 1, 2020, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall create and administer an innovative learning pilot program to authorize full-time enrollment funding for students participating in mastery-based learning programs.

(2) To participate in the innovative learning pilot program, school districts must have a waiver from the credit unit graduation requirements, granted by the state board of education, for the 2019-20 school year. Districts wishing to participate must submit to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in a manner determined by the office, the following information:

(a) Affirmation that the district wishes to participate in the pilot program and the specific schools with a waiver within the district that would participate in the pilot program;

(b) A description of the mastery-based learning program that the school district intends to implement and the number of students that are expected to participate; and

(c) An explanation of the goals of the mastery-based learning program and how the school district intends to measure and assess attainment of the goals.

(3) The pilot program must be in effect through the 2022-23 school year.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules necessary for the effective and efficient implementation of this section, including rules that define full-time enrollment standards for students based on regular participation in an approved mastery-based learning program rather than hours of seat time. Rules adopted pursuant to this section must permit participating school districts to report full-time equivalent students in an approved mastery-based learning program for general apportionment funding.

(5) By December 1, 2022, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the state board of education, must report to the legislature regarding the efficiency, cost, and impacts of the funding model or models used under the pilot program.

(6) For purposes of this section, "mastery-based learning program" means an educational program where:

(a) Students advance upon demonstrated mastery of content;

(b) Competencies include explicit, measurable, transferable learning objectives that empower students;

(c) Assessments are meaningful and a positive learning experience for students;

(d) Students receive rapid, differentiated support based on their individual learning needs; and

(e) Learning outcomes emphasize competencies that include application and creation of knowledge along with the development of important skills and dispositions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---