BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW to read as follows:

The commission must adopt rules allowing the department of corrections pharmacy to accept returns of unit dose packages or full or partial multiple dose medication cards from the facilities it serves and reuse the unexpired medication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 69.70 RCW to read as follows:

The pharmacy quality assurance commission may adopt rules to allow the safe donation of prescription drugs under this chapter including, but not limited to, allowing pharmacy to pharmacy donation of unexpired prescription drug stock.

--- END ---