BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that preservation and enhancement of city trees and urban forests contributes multiple benefits, including stormwater management, carbon sequestration, local air and water quality enhancements, and fish and wildlife habitat, and is a cost-effective way to meet these objectives. The legislature further finds that climate change is impacting our state in numerous ways, including summer heat waves, heavier winter rains, and lower air quality, all of which can be improved by increased tree canopy. The legislature further finds that modern and well-crafted urban forestry programs can have significant additional benefits related to human health, especially when delivered in highly impacted communities with higher health disparities and that also have lower existing tree canopy. Significant research exists demonstrating health benefits of trees and green spaces, including air and water quality improvements, positive emotional responses to being in nature, physical activity, and social cohesion through interacting in public green spaces. Furthermore, the legislature finds that Washington state faces continued urgency in adequately protecting essential salmon habitat, which is necessary to promote salmon recovery and thus help protect our endangered southern resident killer whale population. It is the intent of the legislature to enhance urban forestry programs that maximize cobenefits related to human health and salmon recovery.

(2) The legislature further recognizes that the existing evergreen communities act, in chapter 76.15 RCW and related programs in state law, established a successful framework for supporting urban forestry in Washington state. That act established the need for tools including canopy assessment and regional tree canopy analysis, and targeted technical assistance to support cities and counties seeking to deliver impactful urban forestry programs. The legislature intends to modernize and add capacity to the evergreen communities act by utilizing information and analysis around environmental health disparities and salmon recovery plans, and increasing capacity for the delivery of an urban forestry program in order to strengthen and enhance the impacts of this legislation and to expand participation to include federally recognized tribes and other community-based organizations.

Sec. 2. RCW 76.15.005 and 1991 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Trees and other woody vegetation are a necessary and important part of community ((and urban)) environments. ((Community and urban))Urban and community forests have many values and uses including conserving energy, reducing air and water pollution and soil erosion, contributing to property values, attracting business, reducing glare and noise, providing aesthetic and historical values, providing wood products, and affording comfort and protection for humans and wildlife.

(2) ((As urban and community areas in Washington state grow, the need to plan for and protect community and urban forests increases. Cities and communities benefit from assistance in developing and maintaining community and urban forestry programs that also address future growth.

(3) Assistance and encouragement in establishment, retention, and enhancement of these forests and trees by local governments, citizens, organizations, and professionals are in the interest of the state based on the contributions these forests make in preserving and enhancing the quality of life of Washington's municipalities and counties while providing opportunities for economic development))As urban and community areas in Washington state grow, the need to plan for, promote, and manage urban and community forests increases. Cities and communities benefit from assistance in developing and maintaining urban and community forestry programs that also address future growth.

(3) Assistance and encouragement in the establishment, retention, and enhancement of these forests and trees by local governments, residents, organizations, and professionals are in the interest of the state based on the contributions these forests make in preserving and enhancing the quality of life of Washington's cities, counties, and tribal lands while providing opportunities for economic development.

(4) Well-maintained urban forests deliver local air and water quality benefits that can have positive impacts on human health.

(5) Increased tree canopy in urban areas can positively impact salmon populations through stormwater management and reduction of stream temperatures, thereby improving critical salmon habitat.

Sec. 3. RCW 76.15.007 and 1991 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of this chapter is to:

(1) Encourage ((planting and maintenance and management of trees in the state's municipalities and counties and maximize the potential of tree and vegetative cover in improving the quality of the environment.

(2) Encourage the coordination of state and local agency activities and maximize citizen participation in the development and implementation of community and urban forestry-related programs.

(3) Foster healthy economic activity for the state's community and urban forestry-related businesses through cooperative and supportive contracts with the private business sector.

(4) Facilitate the creation of employment opportunities related to community and urban forestry activities including opportunities for inner city youth to learn teamwork, resource conservation, environmental appreciation, and job skills.

(5) Provide meaningful voluntary opportunities for the state's citizens and organizations interested in community and urban forestry activities))planning for, planting, maintaining, and managing of trees in the state's cities, counties, and tribal lands and maximize the potential of tree and vegetative cover in improving the quality of the environment.

(2) Encourage the coordination of activities by state, local agency, and federally recognized tribes, and maximize resident participation in the development and implementation of urban and community forestry-related programs, including through capacity building to facilitate participation from new partners.

(3) Foster healthy economic activity for the state's urban and community forestry-related businesses through cooperative and supportive contracts with the private business sector.

(4) Facilitate the creation of employment opportunities related to urban and community forestry activities, including opportunities for youth, especially in urban areas, to learn teamwork, resource conservation, environmental appreciation, and job skills.

(5) Provide meaningful voluntary opportunities for the state's residents and organizations interested in urban and community forestry activities.

(6) Contribute to improved human health through targeted delivery of programs and activities in highly impacted communities with greater health disparities.

(7) Contribute to salmon and orca recovery through targeted delivery of programs and activities in regions that include important salmon habitat identified by regional salmon recovery plans.

Sec. 4. RCW 76.15.010 and 2008 c 299 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the))The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) (("Community and urban forest" is that land in and around human settlements ranging from small communities to metropolitan areas, occupied or potentially occupied by trees and associated vegetation. Community and urban forestland may be planted or unplanted, used or unused, and includes public and private lands, lands along transportation and utility corridors, and forested watershed lands within populated areas.

(2) "Community and urban forest assessment" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 35.105.010.

(3) "Community and urban forest inventory" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 35.105.010.

(4) "Community and urban forestry" means the planning, establishment, protection, care, and management of trees and associated plants individually, in small groups, or under forest conditions within municipalities and counties.

(5))) "Department" means the department of natural resources.

(((6) "Municipality" means a city, town, port district, public school district, community college district, irrigation district, weed control district, park district, or other political subdivision of the state.

(7) "Person" means an individual, partnership, private or public municipal corporation, Indian tribe, state entity, county or local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever nature.))

(2) "Evergreen community" means a city, town, or county designated as such under RCW 76.15.090.

(3) "Highly impacted community" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 19.405.020 or an equivalent cumulative impacts analysis that identifies the environmental health conditions of communities as a factor of both environmental health hazards and vulnerable populations as defined in RCW 19.405.020.

(4) "Management plan" means an urban forest management plan developed pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "Tree canopy" means the layer of leaves, branches, and stems of trees that cover the ground when viewed from above and that can be measured as a percentage of a land area shaded by trees.

(6) "Tribes" means any federally recognized Indian tribes whose traditional lands and territories include parts of the state.

(7) "Urban and community forest" or "urban forest" is that land in and around human settlements ranging from small communities to metropolitan areas, occupied or potentially occupied by trees and associated vegetation. Urban and community forestland may be planted or unplanted, used or unused, and includes public and private lands, lands along transportation and utility corridors, and forested watershed lands within populated areas.

(8) "Urban and community forest assessment" or "urban forest assessment" means an analysis of the urban and community forest inventory to: Establish the scope and scale of forest-related benefits and services; determine the economic valuation of such benefits, highlight trends, and issues of concern; identify high priority areas to be addressed; outline strategies for addressing the critical issues and urban landscapes; and identify opportunities for retaining trees, expanding forest canopy, and planting additional trees to sustain Washington's urban and community forests.

(9) "Urban and community forest inventory" or "urban forest inventory" means a management tool designed to gauge the condition, management status, health, and diversity of an urban and community forest. An inventory may evaluate individual trees or groups of trees or canopy cover within urban and community forests, and will be periodically updated by the department.

(10) "Urban and community forestry" or "urban forestry" means the planning, establishment, protection, care, and management of trees and associated plants individually, in small groups, or under more naturally forested conditions within cities, counties, and tribal lands.

(11) "Urban and community forestry ordinance" or "urban forestry ordinance" is an ordinance developed by a city, county, or tribe that promotes urban forestry management and care of trees.

(12) "Vulnerable populations" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 19.405.020.

Sec. 5. RCW 76.15.020 and 2008 c 299 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may establish and maintain a program in ((community and urban forestry to accomplish the purpose stated in RCW 76.15.007. The department may assist municipalities and counties in establishing and maintaining community and urban forestry programs and encourage persons to engage in appropriate and improved tree management and care.

(2) The department may advise, encourage, and assist municipalities, counties, and other public and private entities in the development and coordination of policies, programs, and activities for the promotion of community and urban forestry.

(3) The department may appoint a committee or council, in addition to the technical advisory committee created in RCW 76.15.080 to advise the department in establishing and carrying out a program in community and urban forestry.

(4) The department may assist municipal and county tree maintenance programs by making surplus equipment available on loan where feasible for community and urban))urban and community forestry to accomplish the purpose stated in RCW 76.15.007. The department may assist cities, counties, and federally recognized tribes in establishing and maintaining urban and community forestry programs and encourage appropriate and improved tree management and care.

(2) The department may advise, encourage, and assist cities, counties, tribes, and other public and private entities in the development and coordination of policies, programs, and activities for the promotion of urban and community forestry.

(3) The department may appoint a committee or council to advise the department in establishing and carrying out a program in urban and community forestry.

(4) The department may assist municipal and county tree maintenance programs by making surplus equipment available on loan where feasible for urban and community forestry programs and cooperative projects.

Sec. 6. RCW 76.15.030 and 1991 c 179 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may:

(1) Receive and disburse any and all moneys contributed, allotted, or paid by the United States under authority of any act of congress for the purposes of this chapter.

(2) Receive such gifts, grants, bequests, and endowments and donations of labor, material, seedlings, and equipment from public or private sources as may be made for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, and may spend the gifts, grants, bequests, endowments, and donations as well as other moneys from public or private sources.

(3) Charge fees for attendance at workshops and conferences, and for various publications and other materials that the department may prepare.

(4) Enter into agreements and contracts with ((persons having community and urban))cities, counties, tribes, nonprofit organizations, and others having urban and community forestry-related responsibilities.

Sec. 7. RCW 76.15.050 and 1993 c 204 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may enter into agreements with one or more nonprofit organizations whose primary purpose is urban tree planting. The agreements ((shall be to further public education about and support for urban tree planting, and for obtaining voluntary activities by the local community organizations in tree planting programs. The agreements shall ensure that such programs are consistent with the purposes of the community and urban))must be directed at furthering public education about and support for urban tree planning, planting, establishment, care, and long-term maintenance, and for obtaining voluntary activities by the local community organizations in tree planting programs. The agreements must ensure these programs are consistent with the purposes of the urban and community forestry program under this chapter.

Sec. 8. RCW 76.15.060 and 1993 c 204 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((shall encourage urban planting of tree varieties that are site-appropriate and provide the best combination of energy and water conservation, fire safety and other safety, wildlife habitat))must encourage urban planting and care through establishment and long-term management of trees, encouraging varieties that are site-appropriate and provide the best combination of energy and water conservation, fire safety and other safety, wildlife habitat, stormwater management, and aesthetic value. The department may provide technical assistance in developing programs in tree planting for energy conservation in areas of the state where such programs are most cost-effective. The department must conduct analyses and prioritize target regions for delivery of programs, policies, and activities that include criteria related to human health and salmon recovery data as provided in section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 76.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must conduct analyses of the needs and opportunities related to urban forestry in Washington by assessing tree canopy cover and urban forestry inventory data.

(a) The department must utilize existing recent tree canopy study and inventory data when available.

(b) The department may add additional canopy analysis in regions where adequate data is not available through internal analysis and the use of research consultants as needed.

(c) In collaboration with local governments, the department may conduct prioritized inventories of urban forests where adequate data is not available.

(2) The department must identify priority regions for the implementation of urban forestry programs. Priority must be determined through the use and review of analyses and tools including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Canopy analysis and inventory of urban and community forestry data as determined in subsection (1)(a) of this section;

(b) Health disparity mapping tools that identify highly impacted communities such as the department of health's Washington tracking network. Communities should be identified at the census tract level;

(c) Salmon and orca recovery data including, but not limited to, the Puget Sound partnership action agenda and other regional and statewide salmon and orca recovery plans and efforts, to target program delivery in areas where there are significant opportunities related to salmon and orca habitat and health; and

(d) The department's twenty-year forest health strategic plan.

(3) The department may consult with external experts as part of the review and analysis that will determine priority regions for the purposes of this chapter. Consultation may be conducted with experts such as: Other state agencies; a statewide organization representing urban and community forestry programs; health experts; salmon recovery experts; and other technical experts as needed.

(4) The department must consult with the appropriate tribes in watersheds where urban forestry work is taking place.

(5) The department shall, through its analysis and consultation, seek to identify areas where urban forestry will generate the greatest confluence of benefits in relation to canopy needs, health disparities, and salmon habitat.

(6) The department must ensure a minimum of fifty percent of the resources used in delivering the policies, programs, and activities of this chapter are benefiting vulnerable populations and are delivered in or within one-quarter mile of highly impacted communities as identified by the tools described in subsection (2)(b) of this section, and scale these resources so the most resources are allocated to the highest impacted communities within these areas. This includes resources for establishing and maintaining new trees as well as maintenance of existing tree canopy.

(7) The department shall conduct a statewide inventory of urban and community forests using urban forest inventory and assessment protocols established by the United States forest service to produce statistically relevant estimates of the quantity, health, composition, and benefits of urban trees and forests. Inventory data must be maintained and periodically updated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 76.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must provide technical assistance and capacity building resources and opportunities to cities, counties, federally recognized tribes, and other public and private entities in the development and coordination of policies, programs, and activities for the promotion of urban and community forestry.

(2) The department may use existing urban and community forestry inventory tools or develop additional tools to assist cities, counties, federally recognized tribes, and other public and private entities to collect urban and community forest tree data that informs urban and community forestry management, planning, and policy development.

(3) The department shall strive to enable Washington cities' urban forest managers to access carbon markets by working to ensure tools developed under this section are compatible with existing and developing urban forest carbon market reporting protocols.

(4) The department may use existing tools to assist communities to develop urban forestry management plans. Management plans may include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

(a) Inventory and assessment of the jurisdiction's urban and community forests utilized as a dynamic management tool to set goals, implement programs, and monitor outcomes that may be adjusted over time;

(b) Canopy cover goals;

(c) Reforestation and tree canopy expansion goals within the city's, town's, and county's boundaries;

(d) Restoration of public forests;

(e) Achieving forest stand and diversity goals;

(f) Maximizing vegetated stormwater management with trees and other vegetation that reduces runoff, increases soil infiltration, and reduces stormwater pollution;

(g) Environmental health goals specific to air quality, habitat for wildlife, and energy conservation;

(h) Vegetation management practices and programs to prevent vegetation from interfering with or damaging utilities and public facilities;

(i) Prioritizing planting sites;

(j) Standards for tree selection, siting, planting, and pruning;

(k) Scheduling maintenance and stewardship for new and established trees;

(l) Staff and volunteer training requirements emphasizing appropriate expertise and professionalism;

(m) Guidelines for protecting existing trees from construction-related damage and damage related to preserving territorial views;

(n) Integrating disease and pest management;

(o) Wood waste utilization;

(p) Community outreach, participation, education programs, and partnerships with nongovernment organizations;

(q) Time frames for achieving plan goals, objectives, and tasks;

(r) Monitoring and measuring progress toward those benchmarks and goals;

(s) Consistency with the urban wildland interface codes developed by the state building code council;

(t) Emphasizing landscape and revegetation plans in residential and commercial development areas where tree retention objectives are challenging to achieve; and

(u) Maximizing building heating and cooling energy efficiency through appropriate siting of trees for summer shading, passive solar heating in winter, and for wind breaks.

(5) The department may use existing tools to assist communities to develop urban forestry ordinances. Ordinances may include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

(a) Tree canopy cover, density, and spacing;

(b) Tree conservation and retention;

(c) Vegetated stormwater runoff management using native trees and appropriate nonnative, nonnaturalized vegetation;

(d) Clearing, grading, protection of soils, reductions in soil compaction, and use of appropriate soils with low runoff potential and high infiltration rates;

(e) Appropriate tree siting and maintenance for vegetation management practices and programs to prevent vegetation from interfering with or damaging utilities and public facilities;

(f) Native species and nonnative, nonnaturalized species diversity selection to reduce disease and pests in urban forests;

(g) Tree maintenance;

(h) Street tree installation and maintenance;

(i) Tree and vegetation buffers for riparian areas, critical areas, transportation and utility corridors, and commercial and residential areas;

(j) Tree assessments for new construction permitting;

(k) Recommended forest conditions for different land use types;

(l) Variances for hardship and safety;

(m) Variances to avoid conflicts with renewable solar energy infrastructure, passive solar building design, and locally grown produce; and

(n) Permits and appeals.

(6) The department may consult with the department of commerce in the process of providing technical assistance, on issues including, but not limited to, intersections between urban forestry programs and growth management act planning.

(7) The department may use existing and develop additional innovative tools to facilitate successful implementation of urban forestry programs including, but not limited to, comprehensive tool kit packages (tree kits) that can easily be shared, locally adapted, and used by cities, counties, tribes, and community stakeholders.

(8) The department must encourage communities to include participation and input by vulnerable populations through community organizations and members of the public for urban and community forestry plans in the regions where they are based.

(9) Delivery of resources must be targeted based on the analysis and prioritization provided in section 9 of this act.

Sec. 11. RCW 76.15.090 and 2008 c 299 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall manage the application and evaluation of candidates for evergreen community designation ((under RCW 35.105.030, and forward its recommendations to the department of community, trade, and economic development)).

(2) The department shall develop the criteria for an evergreen community designation program. Under this program, the state may recognize as an evergreen community a city, county, or area of tribal land that has developed an excellent urban forest management program.

(3) Designation as an evergreen community must include no fewer than two graduated steps. The department may require additional graduated steps and establish the minimum requirements for each recognized step.

(a) The first graduated step of designation as an evergreen community includes satisfaction of the following requirements:

(i) The development and implementation of a tree board or tree department;

(ii) The development of a tree care ordinance;

(iii) The implementation of an urban forestry program with an annual budget of at least two dollars for every city resident;

(iv) Official recognition of arbor day; and

(v) The completion of or update to an existing urban forest inventory for the city, county, or tribal land, or the formal adoption of an inventory developed for the city, county, or tribe by the department.

(b) The second graduated step of designation as an evergreen community includes the adoption of an urban forestry management plan. The management plan must:

(i) Exceed the minimum standards determined by the department; and

(ii) Incorporate meaningful community engagement from vulnerable populations located in the area so needs and priorities of these communities inform implementation of the plan.

(4) The department shall develop gateway signage and logos for an evergreen community.

(5) The department may consult with the department of commerce in carrying out the requirements of this section.

Sec. 12. RCW 35.92.390 and 2008 c 299 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Municipal utilities under this chapter are encouraged to provide information to their customers regarding landscaping that includes tree planting for energy conservation.

(2)(a) Municipal utilities under this chapter are encouraged to request voluntary donations from their customers for the purposes of urban forestry. The request may be in the form of a check-off on the billing statement or other form of request for a voluntary donation.

(b) Voluntary donations collected by municipal utilities under this section may be used by the municipal utility to:

(i) Support the development and implementation of ((evergreen community))urban forestry ordinances, as that term is defined in RCW ((35.105.010))76.15.010, for cities, towns, or counties within their service areas; or

(ii) Complete projects consistent with the ((model evergreen community))urban forestry management plans and ordinances developed under RCW ((35.105.050))76.15.090.

(c) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business under chapter 82.16 RCW.

Sec. 13. RCW 35A.80.040 and 2008 c 299 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Code cities providing utility services under this chapter are encouraged to provide information to their customers regarding landscaping that includes tree planting for energy conservation.

(2)(a) Code cities providing utility services under this chapter are encouraged to request voluntary donations from their customers for the purposes of urban forestry. The request may be in the form of a check-off on the billing statement or other form of a request for a voluntary donation.

(b) Voluntary donations collected by code cities under this section may be used by the code city to:

(i) Support the development and implementation of ((evergreen community))urban forestry ordinances, as that term is defined in RCW ((35.105.010))76.15.010, for cities, towns, or counties within their service areas; or

(ii) Complete projects consistent with the ((model evergreen community))urban forestry management plans and ordinances developed under RCW ((35.105.050))76.15.090.

(c) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business under chapter 82.16 RCW.

Sec. 14. RCW 80.28.300 and 2008 c 299 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Gas companies and electrical companies under this chapter are encouraged to provide information to their customers regarding landscaping that includes tree planting for energy conservation.

(2)(a) Gas companies and electrical companies under this chapter may request voluntary donations from their customers for the purposes of urban forestry. The request may be in the form of a check-off on the billing statement or other form of a request for a voluntary donation.

(b) Voluntary donations collected by gas companies and electrical companies under this section may be used by the gas companies and electrical companies to:

(i) Support the development and implementation of ((evergreen community))urban forestry ordinances, as that term is defined in RCW ((35.105.010))76.15.010, for cities, towns, or counties within their service areas; or

(ii) Complete projects consistent with the ((model evergreen community))urban forestry management plans and ordinances developed under RCW ((35.105.050))76.15.090.

(c) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business under chapter 82.16 RCW.

Sec. 15. RCW 89.08.520 and 2008 c 299 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In administering grant programs to improve water quality and protect habitat, the commission shall:

(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications;

(b) In its grant prioritization and selection process, consider:

(i) The statement of environmental benefits;

(ii) Whether, except as conditioned by RCW 89.08.580, the applicant is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, and except as otherwise provided in RCW 89.08.590, and effective one calendar year following the development and statewide availability of ((model evergreen community))urban forestry management plans and ordinances under RCW ((35.105.050))76.15.090, whether the applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the evergreen community ((recognition))designation program created in RCW ((35.105.030))76.15.090; and

(iii) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310; and

(c) Not provide funding, after January 1, 2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound that are in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

(2)(a) The commission shall also develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be used both for management and performance assessment of the grant program.

(b) The commission shall work with the districts to develop uniform performance measures across participating districts and, to the extent possible, the commission should coordinate its performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies as defined in RCW 43.41.270. The commission shall consult with affected interest groups in implementing this section.

Sec. 16. RCW 79.105.150 and 2019 c 415 s 986 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the aquatic lands enhancement account may be used to support the shellfish program, the ballast water program, hatcheries, the Puget Sound toxic sampling program and steelhead mortality research at the department of fish and wildlife, the knotweed program at the department of agriculture, actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification, which may include the creation of a center on ocean acidification, the Puget SoundCorps program, and support of the marine resource advisory council and the Washington coastal marine advisory council. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the geoduck aquaculture research account for research related to shellfish aquaculture. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the marine resources stewardship trust account.

(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the recreation and conservation funding board shall:

(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications;

(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration, except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the development and statewide availability of ((model evergreen community))urban forestry management plans and ordinances under RCW ((35.105.050))76.15.090, whether the applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the evergreen community ((recognition))designation program created in RCW ((35.105.030))76.15.090 in its prioritization and selection process; and

(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.

(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies as defined in RCW 43.41.270.

(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in implementing this section.

(5) Any project designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 17. RCW 80.28.300 and 2008 c 299 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Gas companies and electrical companies under this chapter are encouraged to provide information to their customers regarding landscaping that includes tree planting for energy conservation.

(2)(a) Gas companies and electrical companies under this chapter may request voluntary donations from their customers for the purposes of urban forestry. The request may be in the form of a check-off on the billing statement or other form of a request for a voluntary donation.

(b) Voluntary donations collected by gas companies and electrical companies under this section may be used by the gas companies and electrical companies to:

(i) Support the development and implementation of ((evergreen community))urban forestry ordinances, as that term is defined in RCW ((35.105.010))76.15.010, for cities, towns, or counties within their service areas; or

(ii) Complete projects consistent with the ((model evergreen community))urban forestry management plans and ordinances developed under RCW ((35.105.050))76.15.090.

(c) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business under chapter 82.16 RCW.

Sec. 18. RCW 43.155.120 and 2008 c 299 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

When administering funds under this chapter, the board shall give preference only to an evergreen community recognized under RCW ((35.105.030))76.15.090 in comparison to other entities that are eligible to receive evergreen community designation. Entities not eligible for designation as an evergreen community shall not be given less preferential treatment than an evergreen community.

Sec. 19. RCW 70.146.070 and 2013 c 275 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When making grants or loans for water pollution control facilities, the department shall consider the following:

(a) The protection of water quality and public health;

(b) The cost to residential ratepayers if they had to finance water pollution control facilities without state assistance;

(c) Actions required under federal and state permits and compliance orders;

(d) The level of local fiscal effort by residential ratepayers since 1972 in financing water pollution control facilities;

(e) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 70.146.110, whether the entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010;

(f) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;

(g) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 70.146.120, and effective one calendar year following the development and statewide availability of ((model evergreen community))urban forestry management plans and ordinances under RCW ((35.105.050))76.15.090, whether the project is sponsored by an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the evergreen community ((recognition))designation program created in RCW ((35.105.030))76.15.090;

(h) The extent to which the applicant county or city, or if the applicant is another public body, the extent to which the county or city in which the applicant public body is located, has established programs to mitigate nonpoint pollution of the surface or subterranean water sought to be protected by the water pollution control facility named in the application for state assistance; and

(i) The recommendations of the Puget Sound partnership, created in RCW 90.71.210, and any other board, council, commission, or group established by the legislature or a state agency to study water pollution control issues in the state.

(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive a grant or loan for water pollution control facilities unless it has adopted a comprehensive plan, including a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town that has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as provided in RCW 36.70A.040 may request a grant or loan for water pollution control facilities. This subsection does not require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting a grant or loan under this chapter if such request is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from receiving a grant or loan under this chapter if the comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040 before the department executes a contractual agreement for the grant or loan.

(3) Whenever the department is considering awarding grants or loans for public facilities to special districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.

(4) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the effects of water pollution on Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 20. RCW 79A.15.040 and 2016 c 149 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter prior to July 1, 2016, to the habitat conservation account shall be distributed in the following way:

(a) Not less than forty percent through June 30, 2011, at which time the amount shall become forty-five percent, for the acquisition and development of critical habitat;

(b) Not less than thirty percent for the acquisition and development of natural areas;

(c) Not less than twenty percent for the acquisition and development of urban wildlife habitat; and

(d) Not less than ten percent through June 30, 2011, at which time the amount shall become five percent, shall be used by the board to fund restoration and enhancement projects on state lands. Only the department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife may apply for these funds to be used on existing habitat and natural area lands.

(2) Moneys appropriated beginning July 1, 2016, for this chapter to the habitat conservation account shall be distributed in the following way:

(a) Not less than thirty-five percent for the acquisition and development of critical habitat;

(b) Not less than twenty-five percent for the acquisition and development of natural areas;

(c) Not less than fifteen percent for the acquisition or enhancement or restoration of riparian habitat;

(d) Not less than fifteen percent for the acquisition and development of urban wildlife habitat; and

(e) Not less than ten percent or three million dollars, whichever is less, for the board to fund restoration and enhancement projects on state lands. Any amount above three million dollars must be distributed for the purposes of (c) of this subsection.

(3)(a) In distributing these funds, the board retains discretion to meet the most pressing needs for critical habitat, natural areas, riparian protection, and urban wildlife habitat, and is not required to meet the percentages described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section in any one biennium.

(b) If not enough project applications are submitted in a category within the habitat conservation account to meet the percentages described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section in any biennium, the board retains discretion to distribute any remaining funds to the other categories within the account.

(4) State agencies and nonprofit nature conservancies may apply for acquisition and development funds for natural areas projects under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(5) State and local agencies and nonprofit nature conservancies may apply for acquisition and development funds for critical habitat, urban wildlife habitat, and riparian protection projects under this section. Other state agencies not defined in RCW 79A.15.010, such as the department of transportation and the department of corrections, may enter into interagency agreements with state agencies to apply in partnership for riparian protection funds under this section.

(6) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the state parks and recreation commission may apply for restoration and enhancement funds to be used on existing state-owned lands.

(7)(a) Any lands that have been acquired with grants under this section by the department of fish and wildlife are subject to an amount in lieu of real property taxes and an additional amount for control of noxious weeds as determined by RCW 77.12.203.

(b) Any lands that have been acquired with grants under this section by the department of natural resources are subject to payments in the amounts required under the provisions of RCW 79.70.130 and 79.71.130.

(8) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 79A.15.140 or 79A.15.150, the board in its evaluating process shall consider the following in determining distribution priority:

(a) Whether the entity applying for funding is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010;

(b) Effective one calendar year following the development and statewide availability of ((model evergreen community))urban forestry management plans and ordinances under RCW ((35.105.050))76.15.090, whether the entity receiving assistance has been recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the evergreen community ((recognition))designation program created in RCW ((35.105.030))76.15.090; and

(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

(9) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 21. RCW 36.01.260 and 2008 c 299 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any county may adopt ((evergreen community))urban forestry ordinances, as that term is defined in RCW ((35.105.010))76.15.010, which the county must apply to new building or land development in the unincorporated portions of the county's urban growth areas, as that term is defined in RCW 36.70A.030, and may apply to other areas of the county as deemed appropriate by the county.

(2) As an alternative to subsection (1) of this section, a city or town may request that the county in which it is located apply to any new building or land development permit in the unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas, as defined in RCW 36.70A.030, the ((evergreen community))urban forestry ordinances standards adopted under RCW ((35.105.090))76.15.090 by the city or town in the county located closest to the proposed building or development.

Sec. 22. RCW 54.16.400 and 2008 c 299 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Public utility districts may request voluntary donations from their customers for the purposes of urban forestry. The request may be in the form of a check-off on the billing statement or other form of a request for a voluntary donation.

(2) Voluntary donations collected by public utility districts under this section may be used by the public utility district to:

(a) Support the development and implementation of ((evergreen community))urban forestry ordinances, as that term is defined in RCW ((35.105.010))76.15.010, for cities, towns, or counties within their service areas; or

(b) Complete projects consistent with the ((model evergreen community))urban forestry management plans and ordinances developed under RCW ((35.105.050))76.15.090.

(3) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business under chapter 82.16 RCW.

Sec. 23. RCW 89.08.590 and 2008 c 299 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

When administering funds under this chapter, the commission shall give preference only to an evergreen community recognized under RCW ((35.105.030))76.15.090 in comparison to other entities that are eligible to receive evergreen community designation. Entities not eligible for designation as an evergreen community shall not be given less preferential treatment than an evergreen community.

Sec. 24. RCW 79.105.630 and 2008 c 299 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

When administering funds under this chapter, the recreation and conservation funding board shall give preference only to an evergreen community recognized under RCW ((35.105.030))76.15.090 in comparison to other entities that are eligible to receive evergreen community designation. Entities not eligible for designation as an evergreen community shall not be given less preferential treatment than an evergreen community.

Sec. 25. RCW 79A.15.150 and 2008 c 299 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

When administering funds under this chapter, the recreation and conservation funding board shall give preference only to an evergreen community recognized under RCW ((35.105.030))76.15.090 in comparison to other entities that are eligible to receive evergreen community designation. Entities not eligible for designation as an evergreen community shall not be given less preferential treatment than an evergreen community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 35.105.010 (Definitions) and 2009 c 565 s 21 & 2008 c 299 s 2;

(2) RCW 35.105.020 (Coordination with department of natural resources) and 2008 c 299 s 6;

(3) RCW 35.105.030 (Evergreen community recognition program) and 2008 c 299 s 7;

(4) RCW 35.105.040 (Evergreen community grant and competitive awards program) and 2008 c 299 s 9;

(5) RCW 35.105.050 (Development of model evergreen community management plans and ordinances) and 2008 c 299 s 10;

(6) RCW 35.105.060 (Report to the legislature) and 2008 c 299 s 11;

(7) RCW 35.105.070 (Model evergreen community management plans—Elements to consider) and 2008 c 299 s 12;

(8) RCW 35.105.080 (Model evergreen community ordinances—Elements to consider) and 2008 c 299 s 13;

(9) RCW 35.105.090 (Evergreen community management plans and ordinances—Local jurisdictions may adopt) and 2008 c 299 s 14;

(10) RCW 35.105.100 (Submission and review of management plans and evergreen community ordinances) and 2008 c 299 s 16;

(11) RCW 35.105.110 (Evergreen communities partnership task force) and 2008 c 299 s 17;

(12) RCW 35.105.120 (Limitations of chapter) and 2008 c 299 s 18;

(13) RCW 76.15.070 (Prioritized statewide inventory of community and urban forests—Community and urban forest assessment—Criteria and implementation plan) and 2008 c 299 s 4; and

(14) RCW 76.15.080 (Technical advisory committee) and 2008 c 299 s 5.

--- END ---