BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) All counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040, and all cities with a population of fifteen thousand or more on or after July 1, 2020, located within a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040, must provide by ordinance and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls, authorization for the development of duplexes, triplexes, quadplexes, sixplexes, stacked flats, townhouses, and courtyard apartments in areas zoned for detached single-family residential use and within one-half mile of a transit stop as defined in RCW 43.21C.420(3).

(2) All counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040, and all cities with a population of ten thousand or more on or after July 1, 2020, located within a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040, must provide by ordinance and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls, authorization for the development of duplexes in areas zoned for detached single-family residential use.

(3) Ordinances, development regulations, and other official controls adopted pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section are only required to apply in the portions of cities and counties that are within urban growth areas designated under this chapter.

(4) Cities and counties subject to subsection (1) or (2) of this section may not regulate the siting, design, parking, or other aspects of duplexes, triplexes, quadplexes, sixplexes, stacked flats, townhouses, or courtyard apartments in such a way as to discourage the development of such housing through unreasonable costs, fees, or delays.

(5) Nothing in this section prohibits cities or counties from permitting single-family residences.

(6)(a) The requirements of this section apply and take effect on the latter of:

(i) July 1, 2021, for all counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040 and all cities with a population of at least ten thousand in such counties as of July 1, 2020; or

(ii) Twelve months after a determination by the office of financial management that a city in a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 has reached a population threshold established in subsection (1) of this section.

(b) In any city or county covered by this section that has not passed ordinances, regulations, or other official controls as required by this section as of the date applicable under (a) of this subsection, the requirements of this section supersede, preempt, and invalidate any local development regulations that conflict with the provisions of this section.

(7) For the purposes of this section, "courtyard apartment" means five to twelve attached apartment units arranged on two or three sides of a central courtyard or lawn area.

--- END ---