BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the epidemic of gun violence has led to a corresponding increase in the number of persons experiencing gun-related trauma. Those impacted by gun violence may include victims, survivors, their families, and friends. Mental health treatment available for impacted individuals may be inadequate or inaccessible without assistance navigating the health system. The legislature finds that the state must address the growing need for mental health care responsive to gun violence in a comprehensive manner that promotes evidence-based treatment. Furthermore, the legislature finds there is a moral imperative to help persons affected by trauma related to gun violence obtain comprehensive information about treatment options and to access appropriate care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the University of Washington shall contract with a level one trauma center in the state of Washington to provide a statewide helpline, counseling, and referral service for victims, friends, and family members impacted by gun violence and community professionals, legal practitioners, health providers, and others who engage with them. The service must be developed in consultation with the office of crime victims advocacy established in RCW 43.280.080, and include the opportunity for brief clinical encounters, problem solving, and referral to the best statewide resources available to meet their needs. The service must become conversant with providers across the state that are trained in evidence-based trauma therapy and establish relationships to ensure specific knowledge of available resources. The office of crime victims advocacy established in RCW 43.280.080 must provide consultation within existing resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences shall develop a best practice guide for therapy for gun violence victims in collaboration with the harborview center for sexual assault and traumatic stress. The guide must summarize the state of the knowledge in this area and provide recommendations for areas of focus and action that are meaningful and practical for different constituencies. The guide must be made available to the public online and disseminated across the state to appropriate entities including but not limited to medical examiner's offices, prosecuting attorneys, level one and level two trauma centers, and victim support organizations.

--- END ---