BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that as the housing affordability crisis continues, creative strategies and solutions must be considered. The legislature understands that two of the most critical ways to prevent the cycle of homelessness from continuing is to provide a formerly homeless individual shelter and the ability to pursue education. The legislature further acknowledges that both social isolation and loneliness in older adults is associated with increased mortality. The legislature finds that in order to properly help some of the state's most vulnerable residents, creative and unique solutions must be studied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the student achievement council shall study the feasibility of developing a pilot program that would provide postsecondary students housing within a retirement facility.

(a) In developing the pilot program, the student achievement council shall consider the following:

(i) Legal barriers and potential liabilities;

(ii) Best practices from similar programs;

(iii) Requirements for accommodations to meet a postsecondary student's academic and basic needs, including access to transportation; and

(iv) Regional housing needs of postsecondary students.

(b) The student achievement council shall also identify postsecondary student placement options at retirement facilities in proximity to institutions of higher education.

(2) By December 1, 2020, the student achievement council shall submit to the appropriate higher education committees of the legislature a report of the study's findings with recommendations on the development of the pilot program.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Postsecondary student" has the same meaning as "resident student" as defined in RCW 28B.15.012.

(b) "Retirement facility" includes nursing homes as defined in RCW 18.51.010, assisted living facilities as defined in RCW 18.20.020, affordable housing, as defined in RCW 43.185A.010, for seniors, and other long-term care providers as determined by the student achievement council.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2021.

--- END ---