BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The health care authority shall facilitate a work group to examine the use of mental health advance directives in Washington, how to improve and promote awareness and utilization of mental health advance directives in Washington, examine barriers and outcomes, and advise the legislature in the updating of the mental health advance directive law.

(2) The work group shall be convened by the health care authority and invite participation from behavioral health advocates, including but not limited to disability rights Washington, the national alliance on mental illness, and mothers of the mentally ill; peers and peer advocates; hospitals; physicians; community behavioral health agencies; dementia advocates; the Washington state bar association elder law section; Seattle University school of law; the Washington state long-term care ombuds; managed care organizations; designated crisis responders; jails; and others at the discretion of the health care authority.

(3) The work group shall meet not less than quarterly, starting during the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2020, and submit a final report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2021.

(4) This section expires June 30, 2024.

--- END ---