BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the transparency in reproductive health act.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.02.100 and 1992 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The sovereign people hereby declare that every individual possesses a fundamental right of privacy with respect to personal reproductive decisions.

Accordingly, it is the public policy of the state of Washington that:

(1) Every individual has the fundamental right to choose or refuse birth control;

(2) Every woman has the fundamental right to choose or refuse to have an abortion, except as specifically limited by RCW 9.02.100 through 9.02.170 and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902;

(3) Except as specifically permitted by RCW 9.02.100 through 9.02.170 and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902, the state shall not deny or interfere with a woman's fundamental right to choose or refuse to have an abortion; ((and))

(4) A woman seeking to have an abortion in the state of Washington has a right to be fully informed about abortions and the potential risks associated with abortions. This includes the right to know about:

(a) Abortion methods and associated medical risks;

(b) Possible adverse psychological effects of abortion;

(c) Potential harms to the fetus child should the abortion go wrong;

(d) Medical benefits and risks of carrying a pregnancy to term;

(e) Probable gestational age of the fetus at the time the abortion is to be performed;

(f) Public and private agencies and services available to assist a woman through pregnancy, childbirth, and raising a child; and

(g) Adoption services; and

(5) The state shall not discriminate against the exercise of these rights in the regulation or provision of benefits, facilities, services, or information.

--- END ---