BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that with the passage of the federal food, conservation, and energy act of 2008 the federal government changed the name of the federal nutrition program to the supplemental nutrition assistance program in an effort to fight stigma related to the name "food stamps." With passage of this legislation, the United States department of agriculture encouraged states to change the name of their state-administered programs. Although the department of social and health services administers food benefits programs referred to as "basic food" and the "food assistance program," there are multiple sections of the Revised Code of Washington that still use the obsolete term "food stamps" when referencing the programs.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.101.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The following definitions shall be applied in connection with this chapter:

(1) "Anticipated cost of counsel" means the cost of retaining private counsel for representation on the matter before the court.

(2) "Available funds" means liquid assets and disposable net monthly income calculated after provision is made for bail obligations. For the purpose of determining available funds, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) "Liquid assets" means cash, savings accounts, bank accounts, stocks, bonds, certificates of deposit, equity in real estate, and equity in motor vehicles. A motor vehicle necessary to maintain employment and having a market value not greater than three thousand dollars shall not be considered a liquid asset.

(b) "Income" means salary, wages, interest, dividends, and other earnings which are reportable for federal income tax purposes, and cash payments such as reimbursements received from pensions, annuities, social security, and public assistance programs. It includes any contribution received from any family member or other person who is domiciled in the same residence as the defendant and who is helping to defray the defendant's basic living costs.

(c) "Disposable net monthly income" means the income remaining each month after deducting federal, state, or local income taxes, social security taxes, contributory retirement, union dues, and basic living costs.

(d) "Basic living costs" means the average monthly amount spent by the defendant for reasonable payments toward living costs, such as shelter, food, utilities, health care, transportation, clothing, loan payments, support payments, and court-imposed obligations.

(3) "Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court proceeding, is:

(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance: Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, medical care services under RCW 74.09.035, pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under Title 74 RCW, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or supplemental security income; or

(b) Involuntarily committed to a public mental health facility; or

(c) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less of the current federally established poverty level; or

(d) Unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter before the court because his or her available funds are insufficient to pay any amount for the retention of counsel.

(4) "Indigent and able to contribute" means a person who, at any stage of a court proceeding, is unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter before the court because his or her available funds are less than the anticipated cost of counsel but sufficient for the person to pay a portion of that cost.

Sec. 3. RCW 13.34.030 and 2019 c 172 s 2 and 2019 c 46 s 5016 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abandoned" means when the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian has expressed, either by statement or conduct, an intent to forego, for an extended period, parental rights or responsibilities despite an ability to exercise such rights and responsibilities. If the court finds that the petitioner has exercised due diligence in attempting to locate the parent, no contact between the child and the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian for a period of three months creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment, even if there is no expressed intent to abandon.

(2) "Child," "juvenile," and "youth" mean:

(a) Any individual under the age of eighteen years; or

(b) Any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to receive and who elects to receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031. A youth who remains dependent and who receives extended foster care services under RCW 74.13.031 shall not be considered a "child" under any other statute or for any other purpose.

(3) "Current placement episode" means the period of time that begins with the most recent date that the child was removed from the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of placement in out-of-home care and continues until: (a) The child returns home; (b) an adoption decree, a permanent custody order, or guardianship order is entered; or (c) the dependency is dismissed, whichever occurs first.

(4) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(5) "Dependency guardian" means the person, nonprofit corporation, or Indian tribe appointed by the court pursuant to this chapter for the limited purpose of assisting the court in the supervision of the dependency.

(6) "Dependent child" means any child who:

(a) Has been abandoned;

(b) Is abused or neglected as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW by a person legally responsible for the care of the child;

(c) Has no parent, guardian, or custodian capable of adequately caring for the child, such that the child is in circumstances which constitute a danger of substantial damage to the child's psychological or physical development; or

(d) Is receiving extended foster care services, as authorized by RCW 74.13.031.

(7) "Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another neurological or other condition of an individual found by the secretary of the department of social and health services to be closely related to an intellectual disability or to require treatment similar to that required for individuals with intellectual disabilities, which disability originates before the individual attains age eighteen, which has continued or can be expected to continue indefinitely, and which constitutes a substantial limitation to the individual.

(8) "Educational liaison" means a person who has been appointed by the court to fulfill responsibilities outlined in RCW 13.34.046.

(9) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other support services the department is authorized to provide under RCW 74.13.031. These services may include placement in licensed, relative, or otherwise approved care, or supervised independent living settings; assistance in meeting basic needs; independent living services; medical assistance; and counseling or treatment.

(10) "Guardian" means the person or agency that: (a) Has been appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding, including a guardian appointed pursuant to chapter 13.36 RCW; and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under this chapter.

(11) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, appointed by the court to represent the best interests of a child in a proceeding under this chapter, or in any matter which may be consolidated with a proceeding under this chapter. A "court-appointed special advocate" appointed by the court to be the guardian ad litem for the child, or to perform substantially the same duties and functions as a guardian ad litem, shall be deemed to be guardian ad litem for all purposes and uses of this chapter.

(12) "Guardian ad litem program" means a court-authorized volunteer program, which is or may be established by the superior court of the county in which such proceeding is filed, to manage all aspects of volunteer guardian ad litem representation for children alleged or found to be dependent. Such management shall include but is not limited to: Recruitment, screening, training, supervision, assignment, and discharge of volunteers.

(13) "Housing assistance" means appropriate referrals by the department or other agencies to federal, state, local, or private agencies or organizations, assistance with forms, applications, or financial subsidies or other monetary assistance for housing. For purposes of this chapter, "housing assistance" is not a remedial service or family reunification service as described in RCW 13.34.025(2).

(14) "Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court proceeding, is:

(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance: Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, medical care services under RCW 74.09.035, pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under Title 74 RCW, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or supplemental security income; or

(b) Involuntarily committed to a public mental health facility; or

(c) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less of the federally established poverty level; or

(d) Unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter before the court because his or her available funds are insufficient to pay any amount for the retention of counsel.

(15) "Nonminor dependent" means any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is participating in extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

(16) "Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(17) "Parent" means the biological or adoptive parents of a child, or an individual who has established a parent-child relationship under RCW 26.26A.100, unless the legal rights of that person have been terminated by a judicial proceeding pursuant to this chapter, chapter 26.33 RCW, or the equivalent laws of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(18) "Prevention and family services and programs" means specific mental health prevention and treatment services, substance abuse prevention and treatment services, and in-home parent skill-based programs that qualify for federal funding under the federal family first prevention services act, P.L. 115-123. For purposes of this chapter, prevention and family services and programs are not remedial services or family reunification services as described in RCW 13.34.025(2).

(19) "Prevention services" means preservation services, as defined in chapter 74.14C RCW, and other reasonably available services, including housing assistance, capable of preventing the need for out-of-home placement while protecting the child. Prevention services include, but are not limited to, prevention and family services and programs as defined in this section.

(20) "Qualified residential treatment program" means a program licensed as a group care facility under chapter 74.15 RCW that also qualifies for funding under the federal family first prevention services act under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 672(k) and meets the requirements provided in RCW 13.34.420.

(21) "Relative" includes persons related to a child in the following ways:

(a) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;

(b) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;

(c) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law;

(d) Spouses of any persons named in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, even after the marriage is terminated;

(e) Relatives, as named in (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection, of any half sibling of the child; or

(f) Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four hour basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);

(22) "Shelter care" means temporary physical care in a facility licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in a home not required to be licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030.

(23) "Sibling" means a child's birth brother, birth sister, adoptive brother, adoptive sister, half-brother, or half-sister, or as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe for an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040.

(24) "Social study" means a written evaluation of matters relevant to the disposition of the case that contains the information required by RCW 13.34.430.

(25) "Supervised independent living" includes, but is not limited to, apartment living, room and board arrangements, college or university dormitories, and shared roommate settings. Supervised independent living settings must be approved by the department or the court.

(26) "Voluntary placement agreement" means, for the purposes of extended foster care services, a written voluntary agreement between a nonminor dependent who agrees to submit to the care and authority of the department for the purposes of participating in the extended foster care program.

Sec. 4. RCW 26.19.071 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Consideration of all income. All income and resources of each parent's household shall be disclosed and considered by the court when the court determines the child support obligation of each parent. Only the income of the parents of the children whose support is at issue shall be calculated for purposes of calculating the basic support obligation. Income and resources of any other person shall not be included in calculating the basic support obligation.

(2) Verification of income. Tax returns for the preceding two years and current paystubs shall be provided to verify income and deductions. Other sufficient verification shall be required for income and deductions which do not appear on tax returns or paystubs.

(3) Income sources included in gross monthly income. Except as specifically excluded in subsection (4) of this section, monthly gross income shall include income from any source, including:

(a) Salaries;

(b) Wages;

(c) Commissions;

(d) Deferred compensation;

(e) Overtime, except as excluded for income in subsection (4)(i) of this section;

(f) Contract-related benefits;

(g) Income from second jobs, except as excluded for income in subsection (4)(i) of this section;

(h) Dividends;

(i) Interest;

(j) Trust income;

(k) Severance pay;

(l) Annuities;

(m) Capital gains;

(n) Pension retirement benefits;

(o) Workers' compensation;

(p) Unemployment benefits;

(q) Maintenance actually received;

(r) Bonuses;

(s) Social security benefits;

(t) Disability insurance benefits; and

(u) Income from self-employment, rent, royalties, contracts, proprietorship of a business, or joint ownership of a partnership or closely held corporation.

(4) Income sources excluded from gross monthly income. The following income and resources shall be disclosed but shall not be included in gross income:

(a) Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner or income of other adults in the household;

(b) Child support received from other relationships;

(c) Gifts and prizes;

(d) Temporary assistance for needy families;

(e) Supplemental security income;

(f) Aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits;

(g) Pregnant women assistance benefits;

(h) Food ((stamps))benefits under Title 74 RCW; and

(i) Overtime or income from second jobs beyond forty hours per week averaged over a twelve-month period worked to provide for a current family's needs, to retire past relationship debts, or to retire child support debt, when the court finds the income will cease when the party has paid off his or her debts.

Receipt of income and resources from temporary assistance for needy families, supplemental security income, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, and food ((stamps))benefits under Title 74 RCW shall not be a reason to deviate from the standard calculation.

(5) Determination of net income. The following expenses shall be disclosed and deducted from gross monthly income to calculate net monthly income:

(a) Federal and state income taxes;

(b) Federal insurance contributions act deductions;

(c) Mandatory pension plan payments;

(d) Mandatory union or professional dues;

(e) State industrial insurance premiums;

(f) Court-ordered maintenance to the extent actually paid;

(g) Up to five thousand dollars per year in voluntary retirement contributions actually made if the contributions show a pattern of contributions during the one-year period preceding the action establishing the child support order unless there is a determination that the contributions were made for the purpose of reducing child support; and

(h) Normal business expenses and self-employment taxes for self-employed persons. Justification shall be required for any business expense deduction about which there is disagreement.

Items deducted from gross income under this subsection shall not be a reason to deviate from the standard calculation.

(6) Imputation of income. The court shall impute income to a parent when the parent is voluntarily unemployed or voluntarily underemployed. The court shall determine whether the parent is voluntarily underemployed or voluntarily unemployed based upon that parent's work history, education, health, and age, or any other relevant factors. A court shall not impute income to a parent who is gainfully employed on a full-time basis, unless the court finds that the parent is voluntarily underemployed and finds that the parent is purposely underemployed to reduce the parent's child support obligation. Income shall not be imputed for an unemployable parent. Income shall not be imputed to a parent to the extent the parent is unemployed or significantly underemployed due to the parent's efforts to comply with court-ordered reunification efforts under chapter 13.34 RCW or under a voluntary placement agreement with an agency supervising the child. In the absence of records of a parent's actual earnings, the court shall impute a parent's income in the following order of priority:

(a) Full-time earnings at the current rate of pay;

(b) Full-time earnings at the historical rate of pay based on reliable information, such as employment security department data;

(c) Full-time earnings at a past rate of pay where information is incomplete or sporadic;

(d) Full-time earnings at minimum wage in the jurisdiction where the parent resides if the parent has a recent history of minimum wage earnings, is recently coming off public assistance, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, pregnant women assistance benefits, essential needs and housing support, supplemental security income, or disability, has recently been released from incarceration, or is a high school student;

(e) Median net monthly income of year-round full-time workers as derived from the United States bureau of census, current population reports, or such replacement report as published by the bureau of census.

Sec. 5. RCW 34.05.482 and 1998 c 79 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An agency may use brief adjudicative proceedings if:

(a) The use of those proceedings in the circumstances does not violate any provision of law;

(b) The protection of the public interest does not require the agency to give notice and an opportunity to participate to persons other than the parties;

(c) The matter is entirely within one or more categories for which the agency by rule has adopted this section and RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494; and

(d) The issue and interests involved in the controversy do not warrant use of the procedures of RCW 34.05.413 through 34.05.479.

(2) Brief adjudicative proceedings are not authorized for public assistance and food ((stamp or)) benefit programs provided for in Title 74 RCW, including but not limited to public assistance as defined in RCW 74.04.005(((1))).

Sec. 6. RCW 41.56.465 and 2007 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In making its determination, the panel shall be mindful of the legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as additional standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, the panel shall consider:

(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;

(b) Stipulations of the parties;

(c) The average consumer prices for goods and services, commonly known as the cost of living;

(d) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through (c) of this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings; and

(e) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under (a) through (d) of this subsection, that are normally or traditionally taken into consideration in the determination of wages, hours, and conditions of employment. For those employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(((7)(a)))(13)(a) who are employed by the governing body of a city or town with a population of less than fifteen thousand, or a county with a population of less than seventy thousand, consideration must also be given to regional differences in the cost of living.

(2) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(((7) (a) through (d)))(13) (a) through (d), the panel shall also consider a comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel of like employers of similar size on the west coast of the United States.

(3) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(((7) (e) through (h)))(13) (e) through (h), the panel shall also consider a comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel of public fire departments of similar size on the west coast of the United States. However, when an adequate number of comparable employers exists within the state of Washington, other west coast employers may not be considered.

(4) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.028:

(a) The panel shall also consider:

(i) A comparison of child care provider subsidy rates and reimbursement programs by public entities, including counties and municipalities, along the west coast of the United States; and

(ii) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and

(b) The panel may consider:

(i) The public's interest in reducing turnover and increasing retention of child care providers;

(ii) The state's interest in promoting, through education and training, a stable child care workforce to provide quality and reliable child care from all providers throughout the state; and

(iii) In addition, for employees exempt from licensing under chapter 74.15 RCW, the state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance upon public benefit programs including but not limited to medical coupons, food ((stamps))benefits under Title 74 RCW, subsidized housing, and emergency medical services.

(5) For employees listed in RCW 74.39A.270:

(a) The panel shall consider:

(i) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of publicly reimbursed personnel providing similar services to similar clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United States; and

(ii) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and

(b) The panel may consider:

(i) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of publicly employed personnel providing similar services to similar clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United States;

(ii) The state's interest in promoting a stable long-term care workforce to provide quality and reliable care to vulnerable elderly and disabled recipients;

(iii) The state's interest in ensuring access to affordable, quality health care for all state citizens; and

(iv) The state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance upon public benefit programs including but not limited to medical coupons, food ((stamps))benefits, subsidized housing, and emergency medical services.

(6) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section may not be construed to authorize the panel to require the employer to pay, directly or indirectly, the increased employee contributions resulting from chapter 502, Laws of 1993 or chapter 517, Laws of 1993 as required under chapter 41.26 RCW.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.20B.620 and 1998 c 79 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Overpayments of public assistance or food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically)) under RCW 74.04.300 shall become a lien against the real and personal property of the recipient from the time of filing by the department with the county auditor of the county in which the recipient resides or owns property, and the lien claim has preference over the claims of all unsecured creditors.

Debts due the state for overpayments of public assistance or food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under Title 74 RCW may be recovered by the state by deduction from the subsequent assistance payments to such persons, lien and foreclosure, or order to withhold and deliver, or may be recovered by civil action.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.20B.630 and 1998 c 79 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who owes a debt to the state for an overpayment of public assistance and/or food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under Title 74 RCW shall be notified of that debt by either personal service or certified mail, return receipt requested. Personal service, return of the requested receipt, or refusal by the debtor of such notice is proof of notice to the debtor of the debt owed. Service of the notice shall be in the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action. The notice shall include a statement of the debt owed; a statement that the property of the debtor will be subject to collection action after the debtor terminates from public assistance and/or food ((stamps or)) benefits under Title 74 RCW; a statement that the property will be subject to lien and foreclosure, distraint, seizure and sale, or order to withhold and deliver; and a statement that the net proceeds will be applied to the satisfaction of the overpayment debt. Action to collect the debt by lien and foreclosure, distraint, seizure and sale, or order to withhold and deliver, is lawful after ninety days from the debtor's termination from public assistance and/or food ((stamps or)) benefits under Title 74 RCW or the receipt of the notice of debt, whichever is later. This does not preclude the department from recovering overpayments by deduction from subsequent assistance payments, not exceeding deductions as authorized under federal law with regard to financial assistance programs((: PROVIDED, That)). However, subject to federal legal requirements, deductions shall not exceed five percent of the grant payment standard if the overpayment resulted from error on the part of the department or error on the part of the recipient without willful or knowing intent of the recipient in obtaining or retaining the overpayment.

(2) A current or former recipient who is aggrieved by a claim that he or she owes a debt for an overpayment of public assistance or food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits under Title 74 RCW transferred electronically has the right to an adjudicative proceeding pursuant to RCW 74.08.080. If no application is filed, the debt will be subject to collection action as authorized under this chapter. If a timely application is filed, the execution of collection action on the debt shall be stayed pending the final adjudicative order or termination of the debtor from public assistance and/or food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under Title 74 RCW, whichever occurs later.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.16A.140 and 2010 c 161 s 410 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of vehicle registration, a resident is a person who manifests an intent to live or be located in this state on more than a temporary or transient basis. Evidence of residency includes, but is not limited to:

(a) Becoming a registered voter in this state;

(b) Receiving benefits under one of the Washington public assistance programs; or

(c) Declaring residency for the purpose of obtaining a state license or tuition fees at resident rates.

(2) A natural person may be a resident of this state even though that person has or claims residency or domicile in another state or intends to leave this state at some future time. A natural person is presumed a resident if the natural person meets at least two of the following conditions:

(a) Maintains a residence in this state for personal use;

(b) Has a Washington state driver's license or a Washington state resident hunting or fishing license;

(c) Uses a Washington state address for federal income tax or state tax purposes;

(d) Has previously maintained a residence in this state for personal use and has not established a permanent residence outside the state of Washington, such as a person who retires and lives in a motor home or vessel that is not permanently attached to any property;

(e) Claims this state as his or her residence for obtaining eligibility to hold a public office or for judicial actions;

(f) Is a custodial parent with a child attending public schools in this state.

(3) "Washington public assistance programs," as referred to in subsection (1)(b) of this section, includes only public assistance programs for which more than fifty percent of the combined costs of benefits and administration are paid from state funds. "Washington public assistance programs" does not include: The ((food stamp))supplemental nutrition assistance program under the federal food ((stamp act of 1964))and nutrition act of 2008; programs under the child nutrition act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. Secs. 1771 through 1788; and temporary assistance for needy families.

(4) A resident of the state shall apply for a certificate of title under chapter 46.12 RCW and register under this chapter a vehicle to be operated on the highways of the state. New Washington residents are allowed thirty days from the date they become residents as defined in this section to obtain Washington registration for their vehicles. This thirty-day period may not be combined with any other period of reciprocity provided for in this chapter or chapter 46.85 RCW.

Sec. 10. RCW 46.20.021 and 1999 c 6 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) New Washington residents must obtain a valid Washington driver's license within thirty days from the date they become residents.

(2) To qualify for a Washington driver's license, a person must surrender to the department all valid driver's licenses that any other jurisdiction has issued to him or her. The department must invalidate the surrendered photograph license and may return it to the person.

(a) The invalidated license, along with a valid temporary Washington driver's license provided for in RCW 46.20.065, is proper identification.

(b) The department shall notify the previous issuing department that the licensee is now licensed in a new jurisdiction.

(3) For the purposes of obtaining a valid driver's license, a resident is a person who manifests an intent to live or be located in this state on more than a temporary or transient basis. Evidence of residency includes but is not limited to:

(a) Becoming a registered voter in this state; or

(b) Receiving benefits under one of the Washington public assistance programs; or

(c) Declaring residency for the purpose of obtaining a state license or tuition fees at resident rates.

(4)(a) "Washington public assistance programs" means public assistance programs that receive more than fifty percent of the combined costs of benefits and administration from state funds.

(b) "Washington public assistance programs" does not include:

(i) The ((Food Stamp))supplemental nutrition assistance program under the federal food ((Stamp Act of 1964))and nutrition act of 2008;

(ii) Programs under the Child Nutrition Act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. Secs. 1771 through 1788;

(iii) Temporary Assistance for Needy Families; and

(iv) Any other program that does not meet the criteria of (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 11. RCW 73.08.005 and 2017 c 185 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Direct costs" includes those allowable costs that can be readily assigned to the statutory objectives of this chapter, consistent with the cost principles promulgated by the federal office of management and budget in circular No. A-87, dated May 10, 2004.

(2) "Family" means the spouse or domestic partner, surviving spouse, surviving domestic partner, and dependent children of a living or deceased veteran, or a servicemember who was killed in the line of duty regardless of the number of days served.

(3) "Indigent" means a person who is defined as such by the county legislative authority using one or more of the following definitions:

(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance: Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under Title 74 RCW, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, medical care services, or supplemental security income;

(b) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of up to one hundred fifty percent or less of the current federally established poverty level, or receiving an annual income not exceeding a higher qualifying income established by the county legislative authority; or

(c) Unable to pay reasonable costs for shelter, food, utilities, and transportation because his or her available funds are insufficient.

(4) "Indirect costs" includes those allowable costs that are generally associated with carrying out the statutory objectives of this chapter, but the identification and tracking of those costs cannot be readily assigned to a specific statutory objective without an accounting effort that is disproportionate to the benefit received. A county legislative authority may allocate allowable indirect costs to its veterans' assistance fund if it is accomplished in a manner consistent with the cost principles promulgated by the federal office of management and budget in circular No. A-87, dated May 10, 2004.

(5)(a) "Veteran" means:

(i) A person who served in the active military, naval, or air service; a member of the women's air forces service pilots during World War II; a United States documented merchant mariner with service aboard an oceangoing vessel operated by the war shipping administration; the office of defense transportation, or their agents, from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946; or a civil service crewmember with service aboard a United States army transport service or United States naval transportation service vessel in oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946, who meets one of the following criteria:

(A) Served on active duty for at least one hundred eighty days and who was released with an honorable discharge;

(B) Received an honorable or general under honorable characterization of service with a medical reason for separation for a condition listed as non-existed prior to service, regardless of number of days served; or

(C) Received an honorable discharge and has received a rating for a service connected disability from the United States department of veterans affairs regardless of number of days served;

(ii) A current member honorably serving in the armed forces reserve or national guard who has been activated by presidential call up for purposes other than training;

(iii) A former member of the armed forces reserve or national guard who has fulfilled his or her initial military service obligation and was released with an honorable discharge;

(iv) A former member of the armed forces reserve or national guard who does not have over one hundred seventy-nine days of active duty service, but meets the federal definition of a veteran having completed twenty years of service.

(b) At the discretion of the county legislative authority and in consultation with the veterans' advisory board, counties may expand eligibility for the veterans assistance fund as the county determines necessary, which may include serving veterans with additional discharge characterizations.

(6) "Veterans' advisory board" means a board established by a county legislative authority under the authority of RCW 73.08.035.

(7) "Veterans' assistance fund" means an account in the custody of the county auditor, or the chief financial officer in a county operating under a charter, that is funded by taxes levied under the authority of RCW 73.08.080.

(8) "Veterans' assistance program" means a program approved by the county legislative authority under the authority of RCW 73.08.010 that is fully or partially funded by the veterans' assistance fund authorized by RCW 73.08.080.

Sec. 12. RCW 74.04.205 and 2004 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the maximum extent allowable by federal law, the department shall implement simplified reporting for ((the)) food ((stamp program by October 31, 2004))benefits programs under this title.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "simplified reporting" means the only change in circumstance that a recipient of a benefit program must report between eligibility reviews is an increase of income that would result in ineligibility for the benefit program or a change of address. Every six months the assistance unit must either complete a semiannual report or participate in an eligibility review.

Sec. 13. RCW 74.04.300 and 2003 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If a recipient receives public assistance and/or food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under this title for which the recipient is not eligible, or receives public assistance and/or food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under this title in an amount greater than that for which the recipient is eligible, the portion of the payment to which the recipient is not entitled shall be a debt due the state recoverable under RCW 43.20B.030 and 43.20B.620 through 43.20B.645. It shall be the duty of recipients of cash benefits to notify the department of changes to earned income ((as defined in RCW 74.04.005(11))). It shall be the duty of recipients of cash benefits to notify the department of changes to liquid resources ((as defined in RCW 74.04.005(10))) that would result in ineligibility for cash benefits. It shall be the duty of recipients of food benefits to report changes in income that result in ineligibility for food benefits. All recipients shall report changes required in this section by the tenth of the month following the month in which the change occurs. The department shall make a determination of eligibility within ten days from the date it receives the reported change from the recipient. The department shall adopt rules consistent with federal law and regulations for additional reporting requirements. The department shall advise applicants for assistance that failure to report as required, failure to reveal resources or income, and false statements will result in recovery by the state of any overpayment and may result in criminal prosecution.

Sec. 14. RCW 74.04.380 and 1998 c 79 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of social and health services, from funds appropriated to the department for such purpose, shall, upon receipt of authorization from the governor, provide for the receiving, warehousing and distributing of federal and other surplus food commodities for the use and assistance of recipients of public assistance or other needy families and individuals certified as eligible to obtain such commodities. The secretary is authorized to enter into such agreements as may be necessary with the federal government or any state agency in order to participate in any program of distribution of surplus food commodities including but not limited to a food ((stamp or)) benefit program. The secretary shall hire personnel, establish distribution centers and acquire such facilities as may be required to carry out the intent of this section; and the secretary may carry out any such program as a sole operation of the department or in conjunction or cooperation with any similar program of distribution by private individuals or organizations, any department of the state or any political subdivision of the state.

The secretary shall discontinue such program, or any part thereof, whenever in the determination of the governor such program, or any part thereof, is no longer in the best interest of the state.

Sec. 15. RCW 74.04.500 and 1998 c 79 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is authorized to establish a food ((stamp or)) benefit program under the federal food ((stamp act of 1977))and nutrition act of 2008, as amended.

Sec. 16. RCW 74.04.510 and 1998 c 79 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall adopt rules conforming to federal laws, rules, and regulations required to be observed in maintaining the eligibility of the state to receive from the federal government and to issue or distribute to recipients, ((food stamps, coupons, or food stamp or coupon))supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits ((transferred electronically)) under a food ((stamp or)) benefits plan. Such rules shall relate to and include, but shall not be limited to: (1) The classifications of and requirements of eligibility of households to receive ((food stamps, coupons, or food stamp or coupon))supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits ((transferred electronically)); and (2) the periods during which households shall be certified or recertified to be eligible to receive ((food stamps, coupons, or food stamp or coupon))supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits ((transferred electronically)) under this plan.

Sec. 17. RCW 74.04.515 and 1998 c 79 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

In administering the food ((stamp or benefits)) programs under this title, there shall be no discrimination against any applicant or recipient by reason of age, sex, handicap, religious creed, political beliefs, race, color, or national origin.

Sec. 18. RCW 74.04.520 and 1998 c 79 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of RCW 74.04.060 relating to disclosure of information regarding public assistance recipients shall apply to recipients of food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under this title.

Sec. 19. RCW 74.04.535 and 2013 c 39 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, the employment security department, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall work in partnership to expand the food ((stamp))benefit employment and training program. Subject to federal approval, the program shall be expanded to three additional community colleges or other community-based locations in 2010 and shall expand capacity at participating colleges. To the greatest extent possible, expansion shall be geographically diverse. The agencies shall:

(a) Identify and seek out partnerships with community-based organizations that can provide support services and case management to participants through performance-based contracts in the food ((stamp))benefit employment and training program, and do not replace the positions or work of department employees;

(b) Identify eligible nonfederal matching funds to draw down the federal match for food ((stamp))benefit employment and training services. Matching funds may include: Local funds, foundation grants, employer-paid costs, and the state allocation to community and technical colleges.

(2) Employment and training funds may be allocated for: Educational programs to develop skills for employability, vocational education, English as a second language courses, adult basic education, courses to assist persons to obtain a high school equivalency certificate as described in RCW 28B.50.536, remedial programs, job readiness training, case management, intake, assessment, evaluation, and barrier removal and support services such as tuition, books, child care, transportation, housing, and counseling services.

(3) The department shall annually track and report outcomes including those achieved through performance-based contracts as follows: Federal funding received, the number of participants served, achievement points, the number of participants who enter employment during or after participation in the food ((stamp))benefit employment and training program, and the average wage of jobs attained. The report shall be submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on November 1st of each year, beginning in 2010.

(4) For purposes of this section, "food ((stamp))benefit employment and training program" refers to a program established and administered through the employment security department and the department of social and health services.

Sec. 20. RCW 74.04.750 and 1998 c 79 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Applicants and recipients under this title must satisfy all reporting requirements imposed by the department.

(2) The secretary shall have the discretion to consider: (a) Food ((stamp allotments or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under this title and/or (b) rent or housing subsidies as income in determining eligibility for and assistance to be provided by public assistance programs. If the department considers food ((stamp allotments or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under this title as income in determining eligibility for assistance, applicants or recipients for any grant assistance program must apply for and take all reasonable actions necessary to establish and maintain eligibility for food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under this title.

Sec. 21. RCW 74.08.046 and 1998 c 79 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

There is designated to be included in the public assistance payment level a monthly energy assistance allowance. The allowance shall be excluded from consideration as income for the purpose of determining eligibility and benefit levels of food ((stamp or)) benefit((s)) program recipients to the maximum extent exclusion is authorized by federal law. The allowance shall be calculated on a seasonal basis for the period of November 1st through April 30th.

Sec. 22. RCW 74.08.080 and 1998 c 79 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A public assistance applicant or recipient who is aggrieved by a decision of the department or an authorized agency of the department has the right to an adjudicative proceeding. A current or former recipient who is aggrieved by a department claim that he or she owes a debt for an overpayment of assistance or food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically, or both))under this title, has the right to an adjudicative proceeding.

(b) An applicant or recipient has no right to an adjudicative proceeding when the sole basis for the department's decision is a state or federal law that requires an assistance adjustment for a class of recipients.

(2) The adjudicative proceeding is governed by the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and this subsection.

(a) The applicant or recipient must file the application for an adjudicative proceeding with the secretary within ninety days after receiving notice of the aggrieving decision.

(b) The hearing shall be conducted at the local community services office or other location in Washington convenient to the appellant.

(c) The appellant or his or her representative has the right to inspect his or her department file and, upon request, to receive copies of department documents relevant to the proceedings free of charge.

(d) The appellant has the right to a copy of the tape recording of the hearing free of charge.

(e) The department is limited to recovering an overpayment arising from assistance being continued pending the adjudicative proceeding to the amount recoverable up to the sixtieth day after the secretary's receipt of the application for an adjudicative proceeding.

(f) If the final adjudicative order is made in favor of the appellant, assistance shall be paid from the date of denial of the application for assistance or thirty days following the date of application for temporary assistance for needy families or forty-five days after date of application for all other programs, whichever is sooner; or in the case of a recipient, from the effective date of the local community services office decision.

(g) This subsection applies only to an adjudicative proceeding in which the appellant is an applicant for or recipient of medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically needy and the issue is his or her eligibility or ineligibility due to the assignment or transfer of a resource. The burden is on the department to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the person knowingly and willingly assigned or transferred the resource at less than market value for the purpose of qualifying or continuing to qualify for medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically needy. If the prevailing party in the adjudicative proceeding is the applicant or recipient, he or she is entitled to reasonable attorney's fees.

(3) When a person files a petition for judicial review as provided in RCW 34.05.514 of an adjudicative order entered in a public assistance program, no filing fee shall be collected from the person and no bond shall be required on any appeal. In the event that the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court renders a decision in favor of the appellant, said appellant shall be entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs. If a decision of the court is made in favor of the appellant, assistance shall be paid from date of the denial of the application for assistance or thirty days after the application for temporary assistance for needy families or forty-five days following the date of application, whichever is sooner; or in the case of a recipient, from the effective date of the local community services office decision.

Sec. 23. RCW 74.08.331 and 2011 c 96 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who by means of a willfully false statement, or representation, or impersonation, or a willful failure to reveal any material fact, condition, or circumstance affecting eligibility or need for assistance, including medical care, surplus commodities, and food ((stamps or food stamp)) benefits ((transferred electronically))under this title, as required by law, or a willful failure to promptly notify the county office in writing as required by law or any change in status in respect to resources, or income, or need, or family composition, money contribution and other support, from whatever source derived, including unemployment insurance, or any other change in circumstances affecting the person's eligibility or need for assistance, or other fraudulent device, obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person to obtain any public assistance to which the person is not entitled or greater public assistance than that to which he or she is justly entitled is guilty of theft in the first degree under RCW 9A.56.030 and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than fifteen years.

(2) Any person who by means of a willfully false statement or representation or by impersonation or other fraudulent device aids or abets in buying, selling, or in any other way disposing of the real property of a recipient of public assistance without the consent of the secretary is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment for up to three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail or a fine of not to exceed one thousand dollars or by both.

Sec. 24. RCW 74.08A.060 and 1997 c 58 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

Single adults without dependents between eighteen and fifty years of age shall comply with federal ((food stamp))supplemental nutrition assistance program work requirements as a condition of eligibility. The department may exempt any counties or subcounty areas from the federal ((food stamp))supplemental nutrition assistance program work requirements in P.L. 104-193, unless the department receives written evidence of official action by a county or subcounty governing entity, taken after noticed consideration, that indicates that a county or subcounty area chooses not to use an exemption to the federal ((food stamp))supplemental nutrition assistance program work requirements.

Sec. 25. RCW 74.08A.120 and 1999 c 120 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may establish a food assistance program for legal immigrants who are ineligible for the federal ((food stamp))supplemental nutrition assistance program.

(2) The rules for the state food assistance program shall follow exactly the rules of the federal ((food stamp))supplemental nutrition assistance program except for the provisions pertaining to immigrant status.

(3) The benefit under the state food assistance program shall be established by the legislature in the biennial operating budget.

(4) The department may enter into a contract with the United States department of agriculture to use the existing federal ((food stamp))supplemental nutrition assistance program coupon system for the purposes of administering the state food assistance program.

(5) In the event the department is unable to enter into a contract with the United States department of agriculture, the department may issue vouchers to eligible households for the purchase of eligible foods at participating retailers.

Sec. 26. RCW 74.25A.045 and 1998 c 79 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

A local employment partnership council shall be established in each pilot project area to assist the department of social and health services in the administration of this chapter and to allow local flexibility in dealing with the particular needs of each pilot project area. Each council shall be primarily responsible for recruiting and encouraging participation of employment providers in the project site. Each council shall be composed of nine members who shall be appointed by the county legislative authority of the county in which the pilot project operates. Councilmembers shall be residents of or employers in the pilot project area in which they are appointed and shall serve three-year terms. The council shall have two members who are current or former recipients of the aid to families with dependent children or temporary assistance for needy families programs or food ((stamp or)) benefits programs under this title, two members who represent labor, and five members who represent the local business community. In addition, one person representing the local community service office of the department of social and health services, one person representing a community action agency or other nonprofit service provider, and one person from a local city or county government shall serve as nonvoting members.

Sec. 27. RCW 80.36.470 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 118 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Adult recipients of department-administered programs for the financially needy which provide continuing financial or medical assistance, food ((stamps))benefits under Title 74 RCW, or supportive services to persons in their own homes are eligible for participation in the telephone assistance program. The department must notify the participants of their eligibility.

(2) Participants in community service voice mail programs are eligible for participation in services available under RCW 80.36.420 (1), (2), and (3) after completing use of community service voice mail services. Eligibility must be for a period including the remainder of the current service year and the following service year. Community agencies must notify the department of participants eligible under this subsection.

(3) Enrollment in the Washington telephone assistance program may not result in expenditures that exceed the total amount of funds made available by the legislature for the Washington telephone assistance program. When the department finds that there is a danger of an overexpenditure of appropriated funds, the department must close the Washington telephone assistance program enrollment until the department finds the danger no longer exists.

Sec. 28. RCW 82.32.330 and 2011 c 174 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner whatever a return or tax information;

(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to, or part of, the return so filed;

(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts, deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii) whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or other imposition, or offense. However, data, material, or documents that do not disclose information related to a specific or identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter requires any person possessing data, material, or documents made confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from such data, material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;

(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;

(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address, telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and

(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer, agent, employee, or representative.

(2) Returns and tax information are confidential and privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or tax information.

(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:

(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:

(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under this title or chapter 83.100 RCW is a party in the proceeding;

(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in the proceeding; or

(iii) Brought by the department under RCW 18.27.040 or 19.28.071;

(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the director prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person, at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such other person. However, tax information not received from the taxpayer must not be so disclosed if the director determines that such disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil or criminal liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other government agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with respect to such information unless such information is required to be disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of any court;

(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer against whom a warrant under RCW 82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for a period of at least ten working days. The department is not required to disclose any information under this subsection if a taxpayer has entered a deferred payment arrangement with the department for the payment of a warrant that has not been filed and is making payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness within twelve months;

(d) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;

(e) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of industry or the professions;

(f) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and employees;

(g) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was sought;

(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;

(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the United States department of justice, including the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms and explosives, the department of defense, the immigration and customs enforcement and the customs and border protection agencies of the United States department of homeland security, the United States coast guard, the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United States department of treasury, and the United States department of transportation, or any authorized representative of these federal agencies, for official purposes;

(j) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW 82.32.410;

(k) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing address, revenue tax registration numbers, reseller permit numbers and the expiration date and status of such permits, North American industry classification system or standard industrial classification code of a taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This subsection may not be construed as giving authority to the department to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any commercial purpose;

(l) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as a public record available for inspection and copying under the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court of record and is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;

(m) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food ((stamp))benefits fraud by retailers;

(n) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property;

(o) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person has succeeded;

(p) Disclosing real estate excise tax affidavit forms filed under RCW 82.45.150 in the possession of the department, including real estate excise tax affidavit forms for transactions exempt or otherwise not subject to tax;

(q) Disclosing to local taxing jurisdictions the identity of sellers granted relief under RCW 82.32.430(5)(b)(i) and the period for which relief is granted;

(r) Disclosing such return or tax information to the court in respect to the department's application for a subpoena under RCW 82.32.117;

(s) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted liability under RCW 83.100.120 return or tax information pertaining to that person's liability for tax under chapter 83.100 RCW;

(t) Disclosing such return or tax information to the streamlined sales tax governing board, member states of the streamlined sales tax governing board, or authorized representatives of such board or states, for the limited purposes of:

(i) Conducting on behalf of member states sales and use tax audits of taxpayers; or

(ii) Auditing certified service providers or certified automated systems providers; or

(u) Disclosing any such return or tax information when the disclosure is specifically authorized under any other section of the Revised Code of Washington.

(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity, or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only when the person under investigation and the person in possession of data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals, financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials, or documents.

(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under this subsection (4), the department must, through written correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence must clearly identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge brought under (c) of this subsection.

(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for injunctive relief. The court must limit or deny the request of the department if the court determines that:

(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;

(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or

(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the petitioner.

(d) The department must reimburse reasonable expenses for the production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.

(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.

(5) Service of a subpoena issued under RCW 82.32.117 does not constitute a disclosure of return or tax information under this section. Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this section, a person served with a subpoena under RCW 82.32.117 may disclose the existence or content of the subpoena to that person's legal counsel.

(6) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as provided under subsection (3) (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), or (m) of this section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the state, such person must forfeit such office or employment and is incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for a period of two years thereafter.

--- END ---