BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.170.040 and 1991 c 334 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain an armed private security guard license:

(a) Be licensed as a private security guard;

(b) Be at least twenty-one years of age;

(c) Have a current firearms certificate issued by the commission; and

(d) Pay the fee established by the director, which must be clearly itemized on each application and renewal form.

(2) An armed private security guard license may take the form of an endorsement to the security guard license if deemed appropriate by the director.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.170.130 and 1995 c 277 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Applications for licenses required under this chapter shall be filed with the director on a form provided by the director. The director may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria.

(2) After receipt of an application for ((a license))licensure or renewal, the director shall conduct an investigation to determine whether the facts set forth in the application are true and shall request that the Washington state patrol compare the fingerprints submitted with the application to fingerprint records available to the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol shall forward the fingerprints of applicants for an armed private security guard license to the federal bureau of investigation for a national criminal history records check. The director may require that fingerprint cards of licensees be periodically reprocessed to identify criminal convictions subsequent to registration.

(3) The director shall solicit comments from the chief law enforcement officer of the county and city or town in which the applicant's employer is located on issuance of a permanent private security guard license.

(4) A summary of the information acquired under this section, to the extent that it is public information, shall be forwarded by the department to the applicant's employer.

--- END ---