BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature acknowledges that parents are in the best position to determine which school best meets their child's educational needs. Parents need to be empowered to send their child to their school of choice. The legislature declares that every parent has a right to choose how and where his or her child is educated in the state of Washington.

(2) The legislature intends to support parental school choice by making state funding follow each child to the school of choice. Schools include public schools, including charter schools, and private schools.

(3) By September 1, 2020, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must submit a report with recommendations to the legislature on how to implement this section including necessary amendments to the state Constitution and any necessary statutory changes.

--- END ---