BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.020 and 2019 c 446 s 2, 2019 c 444 s 16, and 2019 c 325 s 3001 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(3) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;

(4) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(5) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;

(6) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;

(7) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105;

(8) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;

(9) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;

(10) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization;

(11) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;

(12) "Department" means the department of health;

(13) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county or an entity appointed by the county, to perform the duties specified in this chapter;

(14) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;

(15) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;

(16) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(5);

(17) "Director" means the director of the authority;

(18) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;

(19) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(20) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;

(21) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;

(22) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;

(23) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court. For purposes of this chapter, at any hearing the petitioner, the respondent, the witnesses, and the presiding judicial officer may be present and participate either in person or by video, as determined by the court. The term "video" as used herein shall include any functional equivalent. At any hearing conducted by video, the technology used must permit the judicial officer, counsel, all parties, and the witnesses to be able to see, hear, and speak, when authorized, during the hearing; to allow attorneys to use exhibits or other materials during the hearing; and to allow respondent's counsel to be in the same location as the respondent unless otherwise requested by the respondent or the respondent's counsel. Witnesses in a proceeding may also appear in court through other means, including telephonically, pursuant to the requirements of superior court civil rule 43. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the court, upon its own motion or upon a motion for good cause by any party, may require all parties and witnesses to participate in the hearing in person rather than by video. In ruling on any such motion, the court may allow in-person or video testimony; and the court may consider, among other things, whether the respondent's alleged mental illness affects the respondent's ability to perceive or participate in the proceeding by video;

(24) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;

(25) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;

(26) "In need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment" means that a person, as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder: (a) Has been committed by a court to detention for involuntary behavioral health treatment during the preceding thirty-six months; (b) is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient treatment without an order for less restrictive alternative treatment, based on a history of nonadherence with treatment or in view of the person's current behavior; (c) is likely to benefit from less restrictive alternative treatment; and (d) requires less restrictive alternative treatment to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled within a reasonably short period of time;

(27) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;

(28) "Information related to mental health services" means all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services by a mental health service provider. This may include documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information;

(29) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;

(30) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(31) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public mental health and substance use disorder service providers under RCW 71.05.130;

(32) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585;

(33) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;

(34) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;

(35) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder;

(36) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;

(37) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(38) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health services to persons with mental disorders or substance use disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section, community mental health service delivery systems or community behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025, facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW, approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities as defined in this section, and correctional facilities operated by state and local governments;

(39) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;

(40) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW;

(41) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders;

(42) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(43) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;

(44) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;

(45) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;

(46) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;

(47) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;

(48) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;

(49) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;

(50) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occuring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occuring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health;

(51) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.94A.030;

(52) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;

(53) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;

(54) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(55) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;

(56) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;

(57) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, which is designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and must meet department residential treatment facility standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or involuntary placement facility;

(58) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property;

(59) "Psychiatric pharmacist practitioner" means a licensed pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW who enters into a written agreement establishing guidelines and protocols as described under, but not limited to, RCW 18.64.011(28) with a psychiatrist that includes collaborative assessment, evaluation, and management of behavioral health conditions.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.210 and 2019 c 446 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each person involuntarily detained and accepted or admitted at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program:

(a) Shall, within twenty-four hours of his or her admission or acceptance at the facility, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, be examined and evaluated by:

(i) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(ii) One mental health professional. If the person is detained for substance use disorder evaluation and treatment, the person may be examined by a chemical dependency professional instead of a mental health professional; and

(b) Shall receive such treatment and care as his or her condition requires including treatment on an outpatient basis for the period that he or she is detained, except that, beginning twenty-four hours prior to a trial or hearing pursuant to RCW 71.05.215, 71.05.240, 71.05.310, 71.05.320, 71.05.590, or 71.05.217, the individual may refuse psychiatric medications, but may not refuse: (i) Any other medication previously prescribed by a person licensed under Title 18 RCW; or (ii) emergency lifesaving treatment, and the individual shall be informed at an appropriate time of his or her right of such refusal. The person shall be detained up to seventy-two hours, if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee, the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled. A person who has been detained for seventy-two hours shall no later than the end of such period be released, unless referred for further care on a voluntary basis, or detained pursuant to court order for further treatment as provided in this chapter.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the mental health professional or chemical dependency professional and licensed physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the person, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment program, or, if detained to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility then the person shall be referred to the more appropriate placement; however, a person may only be referred to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if there is an available secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the person.

(3) An evaluation and treatment center, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admitting or accepting any person pursuant to this chapter whose physical condition reveals the need for hospitalization shall assure that such person is transferred to an appropriate hospital for evaluation or admission for treatment. Notice of such fact shall be given to the court, the designated attorney, and the designated crisis responder and the court shall order such continuance in proceedings under this chapter as may be necessary, but in no event may this continuance be more than fourteen days.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.05.210 and 2019 c 446 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each person involuntarily detained and accepted or admitted at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program:

(a) Shall, within twenty-four hours of his or her admission or acceptance at the facility, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, be examined and evaluated by:

(i) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(ii) One mental health professional. If the person is detained for substance use disorder evaluation and treatment, the person may be examined by a chemical dependency professional instead of a mental health professional; and

(b) Shall receive such treatment and care as his or her condition requires including treatment on an outpatient basis for the period that he or she is detained, except that, beginning twenty-four hours prior to a trial or hearing pursuant to RCW 71.05.215, 71.05.240, 71.05.310, 71.05.320, 71.05.590, or 71.05.217, the individual may refuse psychiatric medications, but may not refuse: (i) Any other medication previously prescribed by a person licensed under Title 18 RCW; or (ii) emergency lifesaving treatment, and the individual shall be informed at an appropriate time of his or her right of such refusal. The person shall be detained up to seventy-two hours, if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee, the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled. A person who has been detained for seventy-two hours shall no later than the end of such period be released, unless referred for further care on a voluntary basis, or detained pursuant to court order for further treatment as provided in this chapter.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the mental health professional or chemical dependency professional and licensed physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the person, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment program, or, if detained to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility then the person shall be referred to the more appropriate placement.

(3) An evaluation and treatment center, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admitting or accepting any person pursuant to this chapter whose physical condition reveals the need for hospitalization shall assure that such person is transferred to an appropriate hospital for evaluation or admission for treatment. Notice of such fact shall be given to the court, the designated attorney, and the designated crisis responder and the court shall order such continuance in proceedings under this chapter as may be necessary, but in no event may this continuance be more than fourteen days.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.05.215 and 2018 c 201 s 3008 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to be gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder has a right to refuse antipsychotic medication unless it is determined that the failure to medicate may result in a likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or substantially prolong the length of involuntary commitment and there is no less intrusive course of treatment than medication in the best interest of that person.

(2) The authority shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this chapter. These rules shall include:

(a) An attempt to obtain the informed consent of the person prior to administration of antipsychotic medication.

(b) For short-term treatment up to thirty days, the right to refuse antipsychotic medications unless there is an additional concurring medical opinion approving medication by a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician or physician assistant in consultation with a mental health professional with prescriptive authority.

(c) For continued treatment beyond thirty days through the hearing on any petition filed under RCW 71.05.217, the right to periodic review of the decision to medicate by the medical director or designee.

(d) Administration of antipsychotic medication in an emergency and review of this decision within twenty-four hours. An emergency exists if the person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, and medically acceptable alternatives to administration of antipsychotic medications are not available or are unlikely to be successful; and in the opinion of the physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, the person's condition constitutes an emergency requiring the treatment be instituted prior to obtaining a second medical opinion.

(e) Documentation in the medical record of the attempt by the physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner to obtain informed consent and the reasons why antipsychotic medication is being administered over the person's objection or lack of consent.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.05.217 and 2016 c 155 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Insofar as danger to the individual or others is not created, each person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights, a list of which shall be prominently posted in all facilities, institutions, and hospitals providing such services:

(1) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;

(2) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;

(3) To have access to individual storage space for his or her private use;

(4) To have visitors at reasonable times;

(5) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls;

(6) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;

(7) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(4) or the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the following standards and procedures:

(a) The administration of antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy shall not be ordered unless the petitioning party proves by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that there exists a compelling state interest that justifies overriding the patient's lack of consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications or electroconvulsant therapy, that the proposed treatment is necessary and effective, and that medically acceptable alternative forms of treatment are not available, have not been successful, or are not likely to be effective.

(b) The court shall make specific findings of fact concerning: (i) The existence of one or more compelling state interests; (ii) the necessity and effectiveness of the treatment; and (iii) the person's desires regarding the proposed treatment. If the patient is unable to make a rational and informed decision about consenting to or refusing the proposed treatment, the court shall make a substituted judgment for the patient as if he or she were competent to make such a determination.

(c) The person shall be present at any hearing on a request to administer antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy filed pursuant to this subsection. The person has the right: (i) To be represented by an attorney; (ii) to present evidence; (iii) to cross-examine witnesses; (iv) to have the rules of evidence enforced; (v) to remain silent; (vi) to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file; and (vii) to be given reasonable notice and an opportunity to prepare for the hearing. The court may appoint a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychologist within their scope of practice, physician assistant, or physician to examine and testify on behalf of such person. The court shall appoint a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychologist within their scope of practice, physician assistant, or physician designated by such person or the person's counsel to testify on behalf of the person in cases where an order for electroconvulsant therapy is sought.

(d) An order for the administration of antipsychotic medications entered following a hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be effective for the period of the current involuntary treatment order, and any interim period during which the person is awaiting trial or hearing on a new petition for involuntary treatment or involuntary medication.

(e) Any person detained pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(4), who subsequently refuses antipsychotic medication, shall be entitled to the procedures set forth in this subsection.

(f) Antipsychotic medication may be administered to a nonconsenting person detained or committed pursuant to this chapter without a court order pursuant to RCW 71.05.215(2) or under the following circumstances:

(i) A person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm;

(ii) Medically acceptable alternatives to administration of antipsychotic medications are not available, have not been successful, or are not likely to be effective; and

(iii) In the opinion of the physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner with responsibility for treatment of the person, or his or her designee, the person's condition constitutes an emergency requiring the treatment be instituted before a judicial hearing as authorized pursuant to this section can be held.

If antipsychotic medications are administered over a person's lack of consent pursuant to this subsection, a petition for an order authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medications shall be filed on the next judicial day. The hearing shall be held within two judicial days. If deemed necessary by the physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner with responsibility for the treatment of the person, administration of antipsychotic medications may continue until the hearing is held;

(8) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to that particular issue;

(9) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.05.230 and 2018 c 291 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A person detained for seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment may be committed for not more than fourteen additional days of involuntary intensive treatment or ninety additional days of a less restrictive alternative treatment. A petition may only be filed if the following conditions are met:

(1) The professional staff of the facility providing evaluation services has analyzed the person's condition and finds that the condition is caused by mental disorder or substance use disorder and results in a likelihood of serious harm, results in the person being gravely disabled, or results in the person being in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment, and are prepared to testify those conditions are met; and

(2) The person has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment and the professional staff of the facility has evidence that he or she has not in good faith volunteered; and

(3) The facility providing intensive treatment is certified to provide such treatment by the department; and

(4)(a)(i) The professional staff of the facility or the designated crisis responder has filed a petition with the court for a fourteen day involuntary detention or a ninety day less restrictive alternative. The petition must be signed by:

(A) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(B) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or mental health professional.

(ii) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced registered nurse practitioner instead of a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner. The persons signing the petition must have examined the person.

(b) If involuntary detention is sought the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled and that there are no less restrictive alternatives to detention in the best interest of such person or others. The petition shall state specifically that less restrictive alternative treatment was considered and specify why treatment less restrictive than detention is not appropriate. If an involuntary less restrictive alternative is sought, the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a mental disorder or as a result of a substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, is gravely disabled, or is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment, and shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services; and

(5) A copy of the petition has been served on the detained person, his or her attorney and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, prior to the probable cause hearing; and

(6) The court at the time the petition was filed and before the probable cause hearing has appointed counsel to represent such person if no other counsel has appeared; and

(7) The petition reflects that the person was informed of the loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed for mental health treatment; and

(8) At the conclusion of the initial commitment period, the professional staff of the agency or facility or the designated crisis responder may petition for an additional period of either ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment or ninety days of involuntary intensive treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.290; and

(9) If the hospital or facility designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary treatment, the outpatient facility so designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment has agreed to assume such responsibility.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.05.290 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 14 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At any time during a person's fourteen day intensive treatment period, the professional person in charge of a treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the designated crisis responder may petition the superior court for an order requiring such person to undergo an additional period of treatment. Such petition must be based on one or more of the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280.

(2)(a)(i) The petition shall summarize the facts which support the need for further commitment and shall be supported by affidavits based on an examination of the patient and signed by:

(A) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(B) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or mental health professional.

(ii) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced registered nurse practitioner instead of a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner.

(b) The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained person which supports the petition and shall explain what, if any, less restrictive treatments which are alternatives to detention are available to such person, and shall state the willingness of the affiant to testify to such facts in subsequent judicial proceedings under this chapter. If less restrictive alternative treatment is sought, the petition shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services.

(3) If a person has been determined to be incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4), then the professional person in charge of the treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the designated crisis responder may directly file a petition for one hundred eighty day treatment under RCW 71.05.280(3). No petition for initial detention or fourteen day detention is required before such a petition may be filed.

Sec. 8. RCW 71.05.300 and 2019 c 325 s 3007 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The petition for ninety day treatment shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court at least three days before expiration of the fourteen-day period of intensive treatment. At the time of filing such petition, the clerk shall set a time for the person to come before the court on the next judicial day after the day of filing unless such appearance is waived by the person's attorney, and the clerk shall notify the designated crisis responder. The designated crisis responder shall immediately notify the person detained, his or her attorney, if any, and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, the prosecuting attorney, and the behavioral health administrative services organization administrator, and provide a copy of the petition to such persons as soon as possible. The behavioral health administrative services organization administrator or designee may review the petition and may appear and testify at the full hearing on the petition.

(2) At the time set for appearance the detained person shall be brought before the court, unless such appearance has been waived and the court shall advise him or her of his or her right to be represented by an attorney, his or her right to a jury trial, and, if the petition is for commitment for mental health treatment, his or her loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed. If the detained person is not represented by an attorney, or is indigent or is unwilling to retain an attorney, the court shall immediately appoint an attorney to represent him or her. The court shall, if requested, appoint a reasonably available licensed physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychologist, psychiatrist, or other professional person, designated by the detained person to examine and testify on behalf of the detained person.

(3) The court may, if requested, also appoint a professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 to seek less restrictive alternative courses of treatment and to testify on behalf of the detained person. In the case of a person with a developmental disability who has been determined to be incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4), then the appointed professional person under this section shall be a developmental disabilities professional.

(4) The court shall also set a date for a full hearing on the petition as provided in RCW 71.05.310.

Sec. 9. RCW 71.05.360 and 2019 c 446 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under the provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to all the rights set forth in this chapter, which shall be prominently posted in the facility, and shall retain all rights not denied him or her under this chapter except as chapter 9.41 RCW may limit the right of a person to purchase or possess a firearm or to qualify for a concealed pistol license if the person is committed under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320 for mental health treatment.

(b) No person shall be presumed incompetent as a consequence of receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a mental disorder or substance use disorder, under this chapter or any prior laws of this state dealing with mental illness or substance use disorders. Competency shall not be determined or withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.77 or 11.88 RCW.

(c) Any person who leaves a public or private agency following evaluation or treatment for a mental disorder or substance use disorder shall be given a written statement setting forth the substance of this section.

(2) Each person involuntarily detained or committed pursuant to this chapter shall have the right to adequate care and individualized treatment.

(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to deny to any person treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination.

(4) Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter shall be given a reasonable choice of an available physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other professional person qualified to provide such services.

(5) Whenever any person is detained for evaluation and treatment pursuant to this chapter, both the person and, if possible, a responsible member of his or her immediate family, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be advised as soon as possible in writing or orally, by the officer or person taking him or her into custody or by personnel of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program where the person is detained that unless the person is released or voluntarily admits himself or herself for treatment within seventy-two hours of the initial detention:

(a) A judicial hearing in a superior court, either by a judge or court commissioner thereof, shall be held not more than seventy-two hours after the initial detention to determine whether there is probable cause to detain the person after the seventy-two hours have expired for up to an additional fourteen days without further automatic hearing for the reason that the person is a person whose mental disorder or substance use disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or that the person is gravely disabled;

(b) The person has a right to communicate immediately with an attorney; has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or her before and at the probable cause hearing if he or she is indigent; and has the right to be told the name and address of the attorney that the mental health professional has designated pursuant to this chapter;

(c) The person has the right to remain silent and that any statement he or she makes may be used against him or her;

(d) The person has the right to present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her at the probable cause hearing; and

(e) The person has the right to refuse psychiatric medications, including antipsychotic medication beginning twenty-four hours prior to the probable cause hearing.

(6) When proceedings are initiated under RCW 71.05.153, no later than twelve hours after such person is admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program the personnel of the facility or the designated crisis responder shall serve on such person a copy of the petition for initial detention and the name, business address, and phone number of the designated attorney and shall forthwith commence service of a copy of the petition for initial detention on the designated attorney.

(7) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this section is hereby authorized, and shall be held according to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by the supreme court.

(8) At the probable cause hearing the detained person shall have the following rights in addition to the rights previously specified:

(a) To present evidence on his or her behalf;

(b) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;

(c) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;

(d) To remain silent;

(e) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file.

(9) Privileges between patients and physicians, physician assistants, psychologists, psychiatric pharmacist practitioners, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners are deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges shall be waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or the public.

The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.

The record maker shall not be required to testify in order to introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions of the record which contain opinions as to the detained person's mental state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such conclusions is available for cross-examination.

(10) Insofar as danger to the person or others is not created, each person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights:

(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;

(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;

(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her private use;

(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;

(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls, consistent with an effective treatment program;

(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;

(g) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional persons;

(h) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications and not to thereafter be administered antipsychotic medications unless ordered by a court under RCW 71.05.217 or pursuant to an administrative hearing under RCW 71.05.215;

(i) Not to consent to the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, unless ordered by a court under RCW 71.05.217;

(j) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances;

(k) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to that particular issue.

(11) Every person involuntarily detained shall immediately be informed of his or her right to a hearing to review the legality of his or her detention and of his or her right to counsel, by the professional person in charge of the facility providing evaluation and treatment, or his or her designee, and, when appropriate, by the court. If the person so elects, the court shall immediately appoint an attorney to assist him or her.

(12) A person challenging his or her detention or his or her attorney shall have the right to designate and have the court appoint a reasonably available independent physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other professional person to examine the person detained, the results of which examination may be used in the proceeding. The person shall, if he or she is financially able, bear the cost of such expert examination, otherwise such expert examination shall be at public expense.

(13) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the patient from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.

(14) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person committed on or prior to January 1, 1974, from exercising a right available to him or her at or prior to January 1, 1974, for obtaining release from confinement.

(15) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and sentence or an active condition of supervision by the department of corrections.

Sec. 10. RCW 71.05.660 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 420 and 2016 c 155 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter or chapter 70.02 or 71.34 RCW shall be construed to interfere with communications between physicians, physician assistants, psychiatric pharmacist practitioners, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners, or psychologists and patients and attorneys and clients.

Sec. 11. RCW 71.05.760 and 2019 c 446 s 16 and 2019 c 325 s 3015 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The authority or its designee shall provide training to the designated crisis responders.

(b)(i) To qualify as a designated crisis responder, a person must have received substance use disorder training as determined by the authority and be a:

(A) Psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker;

(B) Person who is licensed by the department as a mental health counselor or mental health counselor associate, or marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapist associate;

(C) Person with a master's degree or further advanced degree in counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or university and who have, in addition, at least two years of experience in direct treatment of persons with mental illness or emotional disturbance, such experience gained under the direction of a mental health professional;

(D) Person who meets the waiver criteria of RCW 71.24.260, which waiver was granted before 1986;

(E) Person who had an approved waiver to perform the duties of a mental health professional that was requested by the regional support network and granted by the department of social and health services before July 1, 2001; or

(F) Person who has been granted an exception of the minimum requirements of a mental health professional by the department consistent with rules adopted by the secretary.

(ii) Training must include training specific to the duties of a designated crisis responder, including diagnosis of substance abuse and dependence and assessment of risk associated with substance use.

(2)(a) The authority must ensure that at least one sixteen-bed secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility is operational by April 1, 2018, and that at least two sixteen-bed secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities are operational by April 1, 2019.

(b) If, at any time during the implementation of secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility capacity, federal funding becomes unavailable for federal match for services provided in secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities, then the authority must cease any expansion of secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities until further direction is provided by the legislature.

Sec. 12. RCW 71.34.020 and 2019 c 446 s 24, 2019 c 444 s 17, 2019 c 381 s 2, and 2019 c 325 s 2001 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(3) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(4) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(5) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(6) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.

(7) "Children's mental health specialist" means:

(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and

(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.

(8) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.

(9) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.

(10) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(11) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(12) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(13) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.

(14) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.

(15) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(16) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.

(17) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(18) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031(19)(a).

(19) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor who is not residing in a facility providing inpatient treatment as defined in this chapter.

(20) "Likelihood of serious harm" means either: (a) A substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (b) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (c) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others.

(21) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(22) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a handicap, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(23) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.

(24) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, social worker, and such other mental health professionals as defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of health under this chapter.

(25) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(26) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.

(27)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to ((RCW 9A.72.085))chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).

(28) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW.

(29) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.

(30) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.

(31) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.

(32) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.

(33) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(34) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.

(35) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.

(36) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.

(37) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.

(38) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(39) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.

(40) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(41) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW, or a person certified as a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional trainee under RCW 18.205.095 working under the direct supervision of a certified ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional.

(42) "Psychiatric pharmacist practitioner" means a licensed pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW who enters into a written agreement establishing guidelines and protocols under, but not limited to, RCW 18.64.011(28) with a psychiatrist or child psychiatrist that includes collaborative assessment, evaluation, and management of behavioral health conditions.

Sec. 13. RCW 71.34.355 and 2016 c 155 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Absent a risk to self or others, minors treated under this chapter have the following rights, which shall be prominently posted in the evaluation and treatment facility:

(1) To wear their own clothes and to keep and use personal possessions;

(2) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of their own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;

(3) To have individual storage space for private use;

(4) To have visitors at reasonable times;

(5) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls;

(6) To have ready access to letter-writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;

(7) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with mental health professionals;

(8) To have the right to adequate care and individualized treatment;

(9) Not to consent to the performance of electroconvulsive treatment or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, upon him or her, and not to have electroconvulsive treatment or nonemergency surgery in such circumstance unless ordered by a court pursuant to a judicial hearing in which the minor is present and represented by counsel, and the court shall appoint a psychiatrist, physician assistant, psychologist, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician designated by the minor or the minor's counsel to testify on behalf of the minor. The minor's parent may exercise this right on the minor's behalf, and must be informed of any impending treatment;

(10) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances.

Sec. 14. RCW 71.34.720 and 2019 c 446 s 34 and 2019 c 444 s 18 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Each minor approved by the facility for inpatient admission shall be examined and evaluated by a children's mental health specialist, for minors admitted as a result of a mental disorder, or by a substance use disorder professional or co-occurring disorder specialist, for minors admitted as a result of a substance use disorder, as to the child's mental condition and by a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner as to the child's physical condition within twenty-four hours of admission. Reasonable measures shall be taken to ensure medical treatment is provided for any condition requiring immediate medical attention.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the children's mental health specialist or substance use disorder specialist and the physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the minor, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment program or, if detained to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility, then the minor shall be referred to the more appropriate placement; however a minor may only be referred to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if there is a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and that has adequate space for the minor.

(3) The admitting facility shall take reasonable steps to notify immediately the minor's parent of the admission.

(4) During the initial seventy-two hour treatment period, the minor has a right to associate or receive communications from parents or others unless the professional person in charge determines that such communication would be seriously detrimental to the minor's condition or treatment and so indicates in the minor's clinical record, and notifies the minor's parents of this determination. In no event may the minor be denied the opportunity to consult an attorney.

(5) If the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admits the minor, it may detain the minor for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours from the time of provisional acceptance. The computation of such seventy-two hour period shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. This initial treatment period shall not exceed seventy-two hours except when an application for voluntary inpatient treatment is received or a petition for fourteen-day commitment is filed.

(6) Within twelve hours of the admission, the facility shall advise the minor of his or her rights as set forth in this chapter.

Sec. 15. RCW 71.34.720 and 2019 c 446 s 35 and 2019 c 444 s 19 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Each minor approved by the facility for inpatient admission shall be examined and evaluated by a children's mental health specialist, for minors admitted as a result of a mental disorder, or by a substance use disorder professional or co-occurring disorder specialist, for minors admitted as a result of a substance use disorder, as to the child's mental condition and by a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner as to the child's physical condition within twenty-four hours of admission. Reasonable measures shall be taken to ensure medical treatment is provided for any condition requiring immediate medical attention.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the children's mental health specialist or substance use disorder specialist and the physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the minor, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment program or, if detained to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility, then the minor shall be referred to the more appropriate placement.

(3) The admitting facility shall take reasonable steps to notify immediately the minor's parent of the admission.

(4) During the initial seventy-two hour treatment period, the minor has a right to associate or receive communications from parents or others unless the professional person in charge determines that such communication would be seriously detrimental to the minor's condition or treatment and so indicates in the minor's clinical record, and notifies the minor's parents of this determination. In no event may the minor be denied the opportunity to consult an attorney.

(5) If the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admits the minor, it may detain the minor for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours from the time of provisional acceptance. The computation of such seventy-two hour period shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. This initial treatment period shall not exceed seventy-two hours except when an application for voluntary inpatient treatment is received or a petition for fourteen-day commitment is filed.

(6) Within twelve hours of the admission, the facility shall advise the minor of his or her rights as set forth in this chapter.

Sec. 16. RCW 71.34.730 and 2019 c 446 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The professional person in charge of an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program where a minor has been admitted involuntarily for the initial seventy-two hour treatment period under this chapter may petition to have a minor committed to an evaluation and treatment facility or, in the case of a minor with a substance use disorder, to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program for fourteen-day diagnosis, evaluation, and treatment.

If the professional person in charge of the facility does not petition to have the minor committed, the parent who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision in court. The parent shall file notice with the court and provide a copy of the treatment and evaluation facility's report.

(2) A petition for commitment of a minor under this section shall be filed with the superior court in the county where the minor is residing or being detained.

(a) A petition for a fourteen-day commitment shall be signed by:

(i) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(ii) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or mental health professional.

(b) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced registered nurse practitioner instead of a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner. The person signing the petition must have examined the minor, and the petition must contain the following:

(i) The name and address of the petitioner;

(ii) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for fourteen-day commitment;

(iii) The name, telephone number, and address if known of every person believed by the petitioner to be legally responsible for the minor;

(iv) A statement that the petitioner has examined the minor and finds that the minor's condition meets required criteria for fourteen-day commitment and the supporting facts therefor;

(v) A statement that the minor has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment but has been unwilling or unable to consent to necessary treatment;

(vi) If the petition is for mental health treatment, a statement that the minor has been advised of the loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed;

(vii) A statement recommending the appropriate facility or facilities to provide the necessary treatment; and

(viii) A statement concerning whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.

(c) A copy of the petition shall be personally delivered to the minor by the petitioner or petitioner's designee. A copy of the petition shall be sent to the minor's attorney and the minor's parent.

Sec. 17. RCW 71.34.770 and 2016 c 155 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The professional person in charge of the inpatient treatment facility may authorize release for the minor under such conditions as appropriate. Conditional release may be revoked pursuant to RCW 71.34.780 if leave conditions are not met or the minor's functioning substantially deteriorates.

(2) Minors may be discharged prior to expiration of the commitment period if the treating physician, physician assistant, psychiatric pharmacist practitioner, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or professional person in charge concludes that the minor no longer meets commitment criteria.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. Sections 3 and 15 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. Sections 2 and 14 of this act expire July 1, 2026.

--- END ---