BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.125.030 and 2018 c 179 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director, in cooperation with the marine finfish aquatic farmers, shall develop proposed rules for the implementation, administration, and enforcement of marine finfish aquaculture programs. In developing such proposed rules, the director must use a negotiated rule-making process pursuant to RCW 34.05.310. ((The proposed rules shall be submitted to the appropriate legislative committees by January 1, 2002, to allow for legislative review of the proposed rules.)) The proposed rules shall include the following elements:

(((1)))(a) Provisions for the prevention of escapes of cultured marine finfish aquaculture products from enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels;

(((2)))(b) Provisions for the development and implementation of management plans to facilitate the most rapid recapture of live marine finfish aquaculture products that have escaped from enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels, and to prevent the spread or permanent escape of these products;

(((3)))(c) Provisions for the development of management practices based on the latest available science, to include:

(((a)))(i) Procedures for inspections of marine aquatic farming locations on a regular basis to determine conformity with law and the rules of the department relating to the operation of marine aquatic farming locations. The rules must provide for the recovery of actual costs incurred for required inspections, monitoring, and compliance testing by the department; and

(((b)))(ii) Operating procedures at marine aquatic farming locations to prevent the escape of marine finfish, to include the use of net antifoulants;

(((4)))(d) Provisions for the eradication of those cultured marine finfish aquaculture products that have escaped from enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels found spawning in state waters;

(((5)))(e) Provisions for the determination of appropriate species, stocks, and races of marine finfish aquaculture products allowed to be cultured at specific locations and sites;

(((6)))(f) Provisions for the development of an Atlantic salmon watch program similar to the one in operation in British Columbia, Canada. The program must provide for the monitoring of escapes of Atlantic salmon from marine aquatic farming locations, monitor the occurrence of naturally produced Atlantic salmon, determine the impact of Atlantic salmon on naturally produced and cultured finfish stocks, provide a focal point for consolidation of scientific information, and provide a forum for interaction and education of the public; and

(((7)))(g) Provisions for the development of an education program to assist marine aquatic farmers so that they operate in an environmentally sound manner.

(((8)))(2) The department must implement this section consistent with RCW 77.125.050.

--- END ---