BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A water utility may notify a municipal or public corporation operating or proposing to operate a well that is used to discharge fluids into the subsurface, as authorized under this chapter, when the water utility finds PFAS chemicals in its drinking water supply from a groundwater source underlying the area served by the municipal or public corporation.

(2) Upon request by the water utility, the municipal or public corporation must provide the water utility the opportunity to review and comment on plans for a new well that is used to discharge fluids into the subsurface or modifications to a well that is used to discharge fluids into the subsurface.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "PFAS chemicals" means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.

(b) "Well that is used to discharge fluids into the subsurface" includes: (i) A bored, drilled, or driven shaft, or dug hole whose depth is greater than the largest surface dimension; (ii) an improved sinkhole; or (iii) a subsurface fluid distribution system.

--- END ---