BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever an agency is required to submit a report to the legislature in November or December, the agency shall make all practicable efforts to submit the report by October 31st.

--- END ---