BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The position of military spouse liaison is created within the department.

(2) The duties of the military spouse liaison include, but are not limited to:

(a) Conducting outreach to and advocating on behalf of military spouses in Washington;

(b) Providing assistance and information to military spouses seeking professional licenses and credentials or other employment in Washington;

(c) Coordinating research on issues facing military spouses and creating informational materials to assist military spouses and their families;

(d) Examining barriers and providing recommendations to assist spouses in accessing high quality child care and developing resources in coordination with military installations and the department of children, youth, and families to increase access to high quality child care for military families; and

(e) Developing, in coordination with the employment security department and employers, a common form for military spouses to complete highlighting specific skills, education, and training to help spouses quickly find meaningful employment in relevant economic sectors.

(3) The military spouse liaison is encouraged to periodically report on the work of the liaison to the relevant standing committees of the legislature and the joint committee on veterans' and military affairs and participate in policy development relating to military spouses.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.70.250 and 2019 c 415 s 966 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business.

(2) The secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered by the department. Any and all fees or assessments, or both, levied on the state to cover the costs of the operations and activities of the interstate health professions licensure compacts with participating authorities listed under chapter 18.130 RCW shall be borne by the persons who hold licenses issued pursuant to the authority and procedures established under the compacts. All spouses or state-registered domestic partners of service members of any branch of the United States armed forces, national guard, or armed forces reserves shall have application fees, license fees, and any other fees associated with licensing waived by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of administering that program and the cost of regulating licensed volunteer medical workers in accordance with RCW 18.130.360, except as provided in RCW 18.79.202. In no case may the secretary increase a licensing fee for an ambulatory surgical facility licensed under chapter 70.230 RCW during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, nor may he or she commence the adoption of rules to increase a licensing fee during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(3) All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The nursing care quality assurance commission shall work with the national council of state boards of nursing and the national licensure compact administrators to develop a plan and timeline to address elements of the nurse licensure compact that currently fail to address concerns regarding:

(a) The financing mechanisms of the interstate compact and how state licensing fees from a multistate license are spent by the compact's governing authority;

(b) What educational and continuing education criteria an applicant must meet to receive a multistate licensure through the nurse licensure compact, especially when a state legislature has determined certain topics to be necessary and therefore required for nurses or all health care professionals;

(c) How the national council for the state boards of nursing and the national licensure compact administrators ensure their applicants and licensees understand what practice rules apply when practicing outside the home state;

(d) How the national council for the state boards of nursing and the national licensure compact administrators track where multistate licensees are practicing; and

(e) What data the interstate national council for the state boards of nursing and the national licensure compact administrators can provide to show that interstate compacts are increasing access to care, helping with health profession shortages in certain states, and improving protection of the public.

(2) The nursing care quality assurance commission shall report to the legislature on progress on the above topics by December 1, 2021.

--- END ---