BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.02.075 and 2013 c 144 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

((The))(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department must collect a handling fee on each business license application and each renewal application filing. The department must set the amount of the handling fees by rule, as authorized by RCW 19.02.030. The handling fees may not exceed ((nineteen dollars for each business license application, and eleven))ninety dollars for each business license application filed by any person to open or reopen a business, ten dollars for each business license renewal application filing, and nineteen dollars for each business license application filed for any other purpose. Handling fees collected under this section must be deposited in the business license account created under RCW 19.02.210.

(b) No handling fee is collected on a business license application filed by an existing business for the following purposes:

(i) To open an additional location; or

(ii) To obtain a nonresident city endorsement.

(2) The department may increase all handling ((and renewal)) fees within the limits provided in this section for the purposes of defraying the department's costs associated with the administration of this chapter, including making improvements in the business licensing service program, ((including))such as improvements in technology and customer services, expanded access, and infrastructure.

(3) Annually, by the last day of September, beginning September 30, 2023, the department must review the business license account balance at the end of the previous fiscal year. If the balance in the account exceeds one million dollars or the department projects that the balance in the business license account will exceed one million dollars at the end of the current fiscal year, the department must reduce one or more of the handling fees authorized in subsection (1) of this section. Handling fees must be reduced under this subsection (3) to the extent the department determines necessary to result in a balance in the business license account of no more than one million dollars at the end of the next fiscal year as projected by the department. This subsection (3) does not require the department to reduce handling fees more than once in any fiscal year.

(4) In increasing or decreasing any fee under this section, the department may round the adjusted fee to the nearest whole dollar that does not exceed the dollar limits in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2020.

--- END ---