BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.48.170 and 1994 c 264 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Applications for permits shall be made on forms prescribed by the department and shall contain the name and address of the applicant, a description of the applicant's operations, the quantity and type of waste material sought to be disposed of, the proposed method of disposal, and any other relevant information deemed necessary by the department. Application for permits shall be made at least sixty days prior to commencement of any proposed discharge or permit expiration date, whichever is applicable. Upon receipt of a proper application relating to a new operation, or an operation previously under permit for which an increase in volume of wastes or change in character of effluent is requested over that previously authorized, the department shall instruct the applicant to publish notices thereof by such means and within such time as the department shall prescribe. The department shall require that the notice so prescribed shall be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the disposal of waste material is proposed to be made and in such other appropriate information media as the department may direct. Said notice shall include a statement that any person desiring to present his or her views to the department with regard to said application may do so in writing to the department, or any person interested in the department's action on an application for a permit, may submit his or her views or notify the department of his or her interest within thirty days of the last date of publication of notice. Such notification or submission of views to the department shall entitle said persons to a copy of the action taken on the application. Upon receipt by the department of an application, it shall immediately send notice thereof containing pertinent information to the director of fish and wildlife and to the secretary of social and health services. When an application complying with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the department has been filed with the department, it shall be its duty to investigate the application, and determine whether the use of public waters for waste disposal as proposed will pollute the same in violation of the public policy of the state.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the department may determine that the exclusive means of providing public notice for applicants covered under the construction stormwater general permit is by publication on the department's internet web site, or through an electronic subscription service operated by the department that allows subscribers to electronically receive notice, or both.

--- END ---