BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adverse event" means a health problem that occurs after vaccination that may or may not be caused by a vaccine.

(2) "Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Health care provider" means the same as in RCW 48.43.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The department shall establish a vaccine adverse event reporting system that is designed to facilitate quality improvement in the health care system, improve patient safety, and assist the public in making informed health care choices.

(2)(a) When a health care provider is made aware of an adverse event, they shall, within forty-eight hours, submit notification of the event to the department, with the date, type of adverse event, and any additional contextual information the provider deems relevant.

(b) The health care provider may amend the notification within sixty days of the submission.

(3) The notification must be filed in a format specified by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The department shall:

(1) Collect all data received through the reporting system and produce a report on an annual basis that is made available on the department's web site detailing the number and types of events associated with each type of vaccine;

(2) Watch for unexpected or unusual patterns in adverse event notifications and investigate events when necessary;

(3) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---