BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health or social welfare organization may deduct from the measure of tax amounts received as compensation for providing mental health services or substance use disorder treatment services under a government-funded program.

(2) A behavioral health administrative services organization may deduct from the measure of tax amounts received from the state of Washington for distribution to a health or social welfare organization that is eligible to deduct the distribution under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) A person claiming a deduction under this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(b) "Health or social welfare organization" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.431.

(c) "Mental health services" means mental health services as described in chapter 71.24 RCW.

(d) "Substance use disorder treatment services" means substance use disorder treatment services as described in chapter 71.24 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---