BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 2.53 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A pilot project is established to create a grant program for low-income families to receive financial support for acquiring legal services to assist with the guardianship appointment process provided in chapters 11.88 and 11.130 RCW. The pilot project must start August 1, 2020, and end July 1, 2022.

(2) The office of civil legal aid shall administer and implement the pilot project in two separate counties and shall collaborate with one or more nonprofit entities with experience assisting in the guardianship appointment process.

(3) The office of civil legal aid shall provide oversight and administrative support for the pilot project. No more than five percent of the funding provided for the pilot project may be used by the office for the purposes of this subsection.

(4) The office of civil legal aid shall submit a report regarding the pilot project to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The report must be submitted by December 1, 2021, and must include a recommendation on whether the pilot project should be continued, expanded, or discontinued.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2022.

--- END ---