BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to appropriations, the department shall develop and implement a pilot program for gender-responsive and trauma-informed outpatient substance abuse treatment at the Washington corrections center for women. The pilot program shall be designed to address the unique risks and needs that lead to addiction and criminal behavior in women. The pilot program shall be strength-based and healing-centered, and incorporate concepts of personal power, recovery, healing, and self-efficacy.

(2) The purpose of the pilot program is to provide a safe environment for positive change, reduce posttraumatic stress symptoms, increase successful coping strategies, and reduce the likelihood of future criminal justice involvement and substance abuse.

(3) The pilot program established under this section shall use evidence-based practices to address substance abuse, trauma, and mental health issues through comprehensive, integrated, and culturally relevant services including, but not limited to:

(a) Treatment groups and treatment community meetings;

(b) Mindfulness and healing practices;

(c) Social skills workshops;

(d) Individual case management;

(e) Independent skill practice and study;

(f) Transition groups and services;

(g) Positive recovery activities;

(h) Acts of service; and

(i) Family engagement activities.

(4) To the extent possible, the services provided through the pilot program shall be included in the individual's reentry plan under RCW 72.09.270 to ensure continuity of care and successful reintegration into the community.

(5) By December 1, 2021, the department shall provide a report to the governor and relevant legislative committees on the results and findings from the pilot program.

--- END ---