BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the safe station program is a program that started with successful model programs in the cities of Manchester and Nashua, New Hampshire and has spread throughout New England, including a widespread presence in Rhode Island. Participating fire departments are designated as safe stations and provide twenty-four hour, seven days a week drop-in services for persons who need help related to a substance use disorder. Basic screening is provided by emergency medical technicians who are trained to provide a welcoming environment and connect persons to treatment support and services, including transportation to acute medical services when warranted. Safe spaces break down barriers for individuals and allow them to speak and interact with supportive peers in recovery. Safe stations provide an alternative to emergency rooms and can serve as a diversion for people who need help but are not at the point of crisis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of commerce shall manage a grant program to award funding to a fire department in the state of Washington to implement a safe station pilot program based on the New England model.

(2) Certified substance use disorder peer specialists may be employed in a safe station pilot program under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 70.385 RCW to read as follows:

Certified substance use disorder peer counselors may be employed in the pilot program established under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---