BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

A city or town of any class may not enact, maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions that prohibit for any period of time any evictions of tenants by landlords in single-family or multifamily residential rental units or manufactured/mobile home communities as authorized under chapter 59.12, 59.18, or 59.20 RCW unless the city or town compensates the landlord for the cost of rent, as defined in RCW 59.18.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

A code city may not enact, maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions that prohibit for any period of time any evictions of tenants by landlords in single-family or multifamily residential rental units or manufactured/mobile home communities as authorized under chapter 59.12, 59.18, or 59.20 RCW unless the code city compensates the landlord for the cost of rent, as defined in RCW 59.18.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

A county may not enact, maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions that prohibit for any period of time any evictions of tenants by landlords in single-family or multifamily residential rental units or manufactured/mobile home communities as authorized under chapter 59.12, 59.18, or 59.20 RCW unless the county compensates the landlord for the cost of rent, as defined in RCW 59.18.030.

--- END ---