BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.400.303 and 2019 c 266 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts, educational service districts, the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, and their contractors hiring employees who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children or developmentally disabled persons shall require a record check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of investigation before hiring an employee and biennially thereafter. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. The requesting entity may provide a copy of the record report to the applicant at the applicant's request. When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of the investigation. ((If the applicant has had a record check within the previous two years, the district, the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, or contractor may waive the requirement.)) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the district, pursuant to chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW, the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, or contractor hiring the employee shall determine who shall pay costs associated with the record check.

(2) Federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools may use the process in subsection (1) of this section to perform record checks for their employees and applicants for employment.

(3)(a) School districts, educational service districts, the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools, charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, schools that are the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW, and their contractors may use the process in subsection (1) of this section to perform record checks for any prospective volunteer who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children under eighteen years of age or developmentally disabled persons, during the course of his or her involvement with the school or organization under circumstances where access will or may involve the following:

(i) Groups of five or fewer children under twelve years of age;

(ii) Groups of three or fewer children between twelve and eighteen years of age; or

(iii) Developmentally disabled persons.

(b) For purposes of (a) of this subsection, "unsupervised" means not in the presence of:

(i) Another employee or volunteer from the same school or organization; or

(ii) Any relative or guardian of any of the children or developmentally disabled persons to which the prospective employee or volunteer has access during the course of his or her involvement with the school or organization.

(4) Individuals who hold a valid portable background check clearance card issued by the department of children, youth, and families consistent with RCW 43.216.270 can meet the requirements in subsection (1) of this section by providing a true and accurate copy of their Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background report results to the office of the superintendent of public instruction if the portable background check clearance card was issued within two years before application.

(5) The cost of record checks must include: The fees established by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for the criminal history background checks; a fee paid to the superintendent of public instruction for the cost of administering this section and RCW 28A.195.080 and 28A.410.010; and other applicable fees for obtaining the fingerprints.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.410.010 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 33 s 3 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 221 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board shall establish, publish, and enforce rules determining eligibility for and certification of personnel employed in the common schools of this state, including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute or provisional duty and under such certificates or permits as the board shall deem proper or as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules shall require that the initial application for certification shall require, at the applicant's expense, a criminal history record check of the applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of investigation. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. An individual who holds a valid portable background check clearance card issued by the department of children, youth, and families consistent with RCW 43.216.270 is exempt from the office of the superintendent of public instruction fingerprint background check if the individual provides a true and accurate copy of his or her Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background report results to the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the portable background check clearance card was issued within two years before application. ((The superintendent of public instruction may waive the record check for any applicant who has had a record check within the two years before application.)) The superintendent of public instruction shall use the fingerprint criminal history record check information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a certificate under this section. The rules shall permit a holder of a lapsed certificate but not a revoked or suspended certificate, upon submission of a criminal history record check, to be employed on a conditional basis by a school district with the requirement that the holder must complete any certificate renewal requirements established by the state board of education within two years of initial reemployment.

(b) In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of American sign language the board shall consult with the national association of the deaf, "sign instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state association of the deaf for evaluation and certification of sign language instructors.

(c) The board shall develop rules consistent with RCW 18.340.020 for the certification of spouses of military personnel.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall act as the administrator of any such rules and have the power to issue any certificates or permits and revoke the same in accordance with board rules.

--- END ---