BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall engage with key international markets to increase trade and investment opportunities for Washington companies and regions.

(2) The department engagement with international markets shall focus on three deliverables:

(a) Increased international business opportunities for Washington businesses, particularly small businesses in rural communities;

(b) Increased investment in Washington by multinational companies in communities statewide; and

(c) The maintenance and development of new partnerships with, but not limited to, international governments, businesses and organizations, focusing on the innovative industries of tomorrow, including clean technology (such as battery storage, renewables, and electrified transportation), aerospace, agriculture, information, communication technology, advanced manufacturing, and life sciences.

(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must establish representation in key international markets that will provide the greatest opportunities for increased trade and investment for small businesses in the state of Washington. Prior to entering into any contract for representation, the department must consult with associate development organizations and other organizations and associations that represent small business, rural industries, and disadvantaged business enterprises. At least thirty days prior to executing a contract for representation, the department must also notify the members of the appropriate economic development committees of the legislature of the contractor, location(s) of representation and a summary of the duties and responsibilities under the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

By December 1st of each even-numbered year, the department must transmit a report summarizing outcomes under section 1 of this act and be available to present an update on global trade and exports to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The report must include the following information and metrics resulting from the department's engagement with international markets:

(1) An overview of activities and contracts funded through appropriated funds;

(2) Additional funding invested in Washington companies;

(3) The number of jobs created in Washington;

(4) The number of partnerships established and maintained by the department with international governments, businesses, and organizations; and

(5) The international markets that the department has established representation in.

--- END ---