BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Research indicates a higher prevalence of eating disorders among people with diabetes, as compared to their peers without diabetes. Eating disorders and disordered eating behaviors, especially insulin omission, are associated with poorer glycemic control and serious risk for increased morbidity and mortality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. By December 1, 2020, the department of health shall make available on its web site links to existing information related to the condition commonly known as "diabulimia," an eating disorder associated with individuals with type 1 diabetes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act shall be known and may be cited as Alyssa's law.

--- END ---