BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that ferry service between Anacortes and British Columbia, Canada contributes to the state's economy. The legislature intends that this service continue even if the state can no longer operate it. Therefore, the legislature intends to permit a private auto ferry to operate between the Anacortes area and British Columbia in the case that the legislature decides to end state service to Sidney, British Columbia.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.60.120 and 2003 c 373 s 2 and 2003 c 83 s 204 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If the department acquires or constructs, maintains, and operates any ferry crossings upon or toll bridges over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or connecting waters, there shall not be constructed, operated, or maintained any other ferry crossing upon or bridge over any such waters within ten miles of any such crossing or bridge operated or maintained by the department excepting such bridges or ferry crossings in existence, and being operated and maintained under a lawfully issued franchise at the time of the location of the ferry crossing or construction of the toll bridge by the department.

(2) The ten-mile distance in subsection (1) of this section means ten statute miles measured by airline distance. The ten-mile restriction shall be applied by comparing the two end points (termini) of a state ferry crossing to those of a private ferry crossing.

(3) The Washington utilities and transportation commission may, upon written petition of a commercial ferry operator certificated or applying for certification under chapter 81.84 RCW, and upon notice and hearing, grant a waiver from the ten-mile restriction. The waiver must not be detrimental to the public interest. In making a decision to waive the ten-mile restriction, the commission shall consider, but is not limited to, the impact of the waiver on transportation congestion mitigation, air quality improvement, and the overall impact on the Washington state ferry system. The commission shall act upon a request for a waiver within ninety days after the conclusion of the hearing. A waiver is effective for a period of five years from the date of issuance. At the end of five years the waiver becomes permanent unless appealed within thirty days by the commission on its own motion, the department, or an interested party.

(4) The department shall not maintain and operate any ferry crossing or toll bridge over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or connecting waters that would infringe upon any franchise lawfully issued by the state and in existence and being exercised at the time of the location of the ferry crossing or toll bridge by the department, without first acquiring the rights granted to such franchise holder under the franchise.

(5) This section does not apply to ((the)):

(a) The operation of passenger-only ferry service by public transportation benefit areas meeting the requirements of RCW 36.57A.200 ((or to the));

(b) The operation of passenger-only ferry service by ferry districts; or

(c) The operation of direct international ferry services between the state of Washington and British Columbia, Canada.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.64.090 and 2019 c 230 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in RCW 47.60.656 and subsections (2) and (4) of this section, or as provided in RCW 36.54.130 and subsection (3) of this section, if any party assumes the operation and maintenance of any ferry or ferry system by rent, lease, or charter from the department of transportation, such party shall assume and be bound by all the provisions herein and any agreement or contract for such operation of any ferry or ferry system entered into by the department shall provide that the wages to be paid, hours of employment, working conditions, and seniority rights of employees will be established by the commission in accordance with the terms and provisions of this chapter and it shall further provide that all labor disputes shall be adjudicated in accordance with this chapter (( 47.64 RCW)).

(2) If a public transportation benefit area meeting the requirements of RCW 36.57A.200 has voter approval to operate passenger-only ferry service, it may enter into an agreement with Washington State Ferries to rent, lease, or purchase passenger-only vessels, related equipment, or terminal space for purposes of loading and unloading the passenger-only ferry. Charges for the vessels, equipment, and space must be fair market value taking into account the public benefit derived from the ferry service. A benefit area or subcontractor of that benefit area that qualifies under this subsection is not subject to the restrictions of subsection (1) of this section, but is subject to:

(a) The terms of those collective bargaining agreements that it or its subcontractors negotiate with the exclusive bargaining representatives of its or its subcontractors' employees under chapter 41.56 RCW or the National Labor Relations Act, as applicable;

(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a requirement that the benefit area and any contract with its subcontractors, give preferential hiring to former employees of the department of transportation who separated from employment with the department because of termination of the ferry service by the state of Washington; and

(c) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a requirement that the benefit area and any contract with its subcontractors, on any questions concerning representation of employees for collective bargaining purposes, may be determined by conducting a cross-check comparing an employee organization's membership records or bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the employer. A determination through a cross-check process may be made upon a showing of interest submitted in support of the exclusive bargaining representative by more than fifty percent of the employees.

(3) If a ferry district is formed under RCW 36.54.110 to operate passenger-only ferry service, it may enter into an agreement with Washington State Ferries to rent, lease, or purchase vessels, related equipment, or terminal space for purposes of loading and unloading the ferry. Charges for the vessels, equipment, and space must be fair market value taking into account the public benefit derived from the ferry service. A ferry district or subcontractor of that district that qualifies under this subsection is not subject to the restrictions of subsection (1) of this section, but is subject to:

(a) The terms of those collective bargaining agreements that it or its subcontractors negotiate with the exclusive bargaining representatives of its or its subcontractors' employees under chapter 41.56 RCW or the national labor relations act, as applicable;

(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a requirement that the ferry district and any contract with its subcontractors, give preferential hiring to former employees of the department of transportation who separated from employment with the department because of termination of the ferry service by the state of Washington; and

(c) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a requirement that the ferry district and any contract with its subcontractors, on any questions concerning representation of employees for collective bargaining purposes, may be determined by conducting a cross-check comparing an employee organization's membership records or bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the employer.

(4) The department of transportation shall make its terminal, dock, and pier space available to private operators of passenger-only ferries or to private operators of direct international ferry services between the state of Washington and British Columbia, Canada if the space can be made available without limiting the operation of car ferries operated by the department. These private operators are not bound by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section. Charges for the equipment and space must be fair market value taking into account the public benefit derived from the passenger-only ferry service or the direct international ferry services.

Sec. 4. RCW 88.16.070 and 2018 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Every vessel not exempt under this section that operates in the waters of the Puget Sound pilotage district or Grays Harbor pilotage district is subject to compulsory pilotage under this chapter.

(1) A United States vessel on a voyage in which it is operating exclusively on its coastwise endorsement, its fishery endorsement (including catching and processing its own catch outside United States waters and economic zone for delivery in the United States), and/or its recreational (or pleasure) endorsement, and all United States and Canadian vessels engaged exclusively in the coasting trade on the west coast of the continental United States (including Alaska) and/or British Columbia shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter unless a pilot licensed under this chapter be actually employed, in which case the pilotage rates provided for in this chapter or established under RCW 81.116.010 through 81.116.060 shall apply.

(2) The board may, upon the written petition of any interested party, and upon notice and opportunity for hearing, grant an exemption from the provisions of this chapter to any vessel that the board finds is (a) a small passenger vessel or commercial ferry that is not more than ((one))five thousand three hundred gross tons (international), does not exceed ((two))three hundred feet in overall length, is manned by United States-licensed deck and engine officers appropriate to the size of the vessel with merchant mariner credentials issued by the United States coast guard or Canadian deck and engine officers with Canadian-issued certificates of competency appropriate to the size of the vessel, and is operated exclusively in the waters of the Puget Sound pilotage district and lower British Columbia, or (b) a yacht that is not more than one thousand three hundred gross tons (international) and does not exceed two hundred feet in overall length. Such an exemption shall not be detrimental to the public interest in regard to safe operation preventing loss of human lives, loss of property, and protecting the marine environment of the state of Washington. Such petition shall set out the general description of the vessel, the contemplated use of same, the proposed area of operation, and the name and address of the vessel's owner. The board shall annually, or at any other time when in the public interest, review any exemptions granted to this specified class of small vessels to insure that each exempted vessel remains in compliance with the original exemption. The board shall have the authority to revoke such exemption where there is not continued compliance with the requirements for exemption. The board shall maintain a file which shall include all petitions for exemption, a roster of vessels granted exemption, and the board's written decisions which shall set forth the findings for grants of exemption. Each applicant for exemption or annual renewal shall pay a fee, payable to the pilotage account. Fees for initial applications and for renewals shall be established by rule, and shall not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars. The board shall report annually to the legislature on such exemptions.

(3) Every vessel not exempt under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall, while navigating the Puget Sound and Grays Harbor pilotage districts, employ a pilot licensed under the provisions of this chapter and shall be liable for and pay pilotage rates in accordance with the pilotage rates herein established or which may hereafter be established under the provisions of this chapter or under RCW 81.116.010 through 81.116.060: PROVIDED, That any vessel inbound to or outbound from Canadian ports is exempt from the provisions of this section, if said vessel actually employs a pilot licensed by the Pacific pilotage authority (the pilot licensing authority for the western district of Canada), and if it is communicating with the vessel traffic system and has appropriate navigational charts, and if said vessel uses only those waters east of the international boundary line which are west of a line which begins at the southwestern edge of Point Roberts then to Alden Point (Patos Island), then to Skipjack Island light, then to Turn Point (Stuart Island), then to Kellet Bluff (Henry Island), then to Lime Kiln (San Juan Island) then to the intersection of one hundred twenty-three degrees seven minutes west longitude and forty-eight degrees twenty-five minutes north latitude then to the international boundary. The board shall correspond with the Pacific pilotage authority from time to time to ensure the provisions of this section are enforced. If any exempted vessel does not comply with these provisions it shall be deemed to be in violation of this section and subject to the penalties provided in RCW 88.16.150 as now or hereafter amended and liable to pilotage fees as determined by the board. The board shall investigate any accident on the waters covered by this chapter involving a Canadian pilot and shall include the results in its annual report.

--- END ---