BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state parks and recreation commission and the state library have developed a pilot program with several library systems throughout the state to encourage library patrons to gain outdoor recreation experiences at state parks and other recreational lands administered by the state. Under this program, the state parks and recreation commission has provided library discover passes to libraries that may be checked out on a temporary basis by library patrons for vehicle parking in state parks. The program requires libraries to include equipment, such as backpacks and binoculars, with the library discover passes that are checked out to enhance the library patron's outdoor experience. The legislature intends by this act to make available resources so that the state parks and recreation commission may offer library discover passes to any library that chooses to make library discover passes and certain outdoor equipment available for loan to library patrons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 79A.80 RCW to read as follows:

Once each calendar year, the commission must provide at least two library discover passes to any library that submits a request to the commission, so that the library can provide the pass on a loan basis to their patrons as with other library materials. The commission is not required to replace any library discover pass that is lost or not returned. The commission should prioritize the distribution of any additional library discover passes to libraries that also check out outdoor equipment, such as backpacks, binoculars, field guides, and other equipment that will enhance the patron's outdoor experience.

--- END ---