BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.117 RCW to read as follows:

(1) January of each year will be known as Chinese American history month. Each January is designated as a time for people of this state to commemorate the contributions of Chinese Americans to the history and heritage of Washington state and the United States.

(2) Public schools are encouraged to designate time for appropriate activities in commemoration of Chinese American history month and the lives, history, achievements, and contributions of Chinese Americans.

--- END ---