BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.29A RCW to read as follows:

(1) An electric utility shall impose a surcharge of three cents per kilowatt-hour of electricity used to charge a vehicle at each electric vehicle charging station served by the electric utility.

(2) By January 1, 2021, each electric utility shall examine the technological feasibility of imposing a surcharge on electricity used to charge vehicles at residences within the service area of the electric utility.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Electric vehicle charging station" has the same meaning as defined under RCW 46.08.185.

(b) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as defined under RCW 46.04.670.

--- END ---