BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

A member of the legislature may not introduce as prime sponsor more than four bills during a legislative session, excluding committee substitute bills.

--- END ---