BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

The building code council must adopt rules requiring the installation of an electric vehicle charging infrastructure for the construction of a new building serving group B, group R-1 hotel and motel only, group R-2, and group R-3 one or two family home occupancies as required by this section.

(1) As used in this section, "electric vehicle ready" means a new parking space that is designed and constructed to include a fully wired circuit with a 208/240-volt, 40-amp electric vehicle charging receptacle outlet or termination point, including conduit, wiring, and the electric service capacity necessary to serve the receptacle to allow for the future installation of electric vehicle supply equipment.

(2) The required number of electric vehicle ready parking spaces will be determined by whether the parking is for residential or nonresidential use. Parking clearly set aside and reserved for residential use must meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section. Parking for all other uses must meet the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Residential uses.

(a) Private parking for individual residential units. When parking for any individual dwelling unit is provided in a private garage, carport, or parking area, separate from any parking facilities serving other units, at least one parking space in that garage, carport, or parking area must be electric vehicle ready.

(b) Surface parking for multiple residences. When parking for multifamily residential uses is provided in a surface parking area serving multiple residences, the number of parking spaces that must be electric vehicle ready is calculated as follows:

(i) When between one and six parking spaces are provided, each of those parking spaces must be electric vehicle ready;

(ii) When between seven and twenty-five parking spaces are provided, a minimum of six of those parking spaces must be electric vehicle ready; and

(iii) When more than twenty-five parking spaces are provided, a minimum of twenty percent of those parking spaces must be electric vehicle ready.

(c) Parking garages for multiple residences. When parking for multifamily residential uses is provided in a parking garage serving multiple residences, a minimum of twenty percent of those parking spaces must be electric vehicle ready.

(d) Other residential uses. When parking is provided for all other residential uses, a minimum of twenty percent of those spaces must be electric vehicle ready.

(4) Nonresidential uses. When new parking is provided for nonresidential uses, a minimum of ten percent of those spaces must be electric vehicle ready.

(5) Rounding. When calculating the number of required electric vehicle ready parking spaces, any fraction of a portion of an electric vehicle ready parking space must be rounded up to the nearest whole number.

(6) Exceptions or reductions. The building code council must allow for limited reductions in the number of required electric vehicle ready spaces or provide exemptions where there is substantial evidence showing the added electrical load attributed to meeting the requirements of this section would:

(a) Alter the local utility infrastructure design requirements on the utility side of the legal point of service requiring on-property power transformation; or

(b) Require an upgrade to an existing residential electrical service.

(7) Accessible parking. Where new electric vehicle ready parking spaces and new accessible parking spaces are both provided, parking facilities must be designed so that at least one accessible parking space is electric vehicle ready.

(8) Nothing in this section may be construed to require the installation of electric vehicle supply equipment.

--- END ---