BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Skylights were part of the original 1928 construction of the Washington state legislative building. The skylights were removed in the 1970s and roofed over. It is necessary to replace the legislative skylight openings that are located above the house of representatives and senate chambers in the legislative building to allow as much natural light as possible into the chambers and restore the bronze ceiling laylight.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of five million nine hundred eighty-two thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the state building construction account-state appropriation to the department of enterprise services for the purposes of this act. This funding is for design and construction for the restoration of the legislative skylight openings that are located above the house of representatives and senate chambers, to include work on the bronze ceiling laylight, skylight attic, roof and skylight system, and chamber acoustics.

--- END ---