BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.45.230 and 2019 c 424 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January 1, 2020, and ending June 30, ((2023))2020, the amounts received for the tax imposed on each sale of real property under RCW 82.45.060 must be deposited as follows:

(a) 1.7 percent must be deposited into the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050;

(b) 1.4 percent must be deposited into the city-county assistance account created in RCW 43.08.290;

(c) 79.4 percent must be deposited into the general fund; and

(d) The remainder must be deposited into the educational legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.

(2) Beginning July 1, ((2023))2020, and thereafter, the amounts received for the tax imposed on each sale of real property under RCW 82.45.060 must be deposited as follows:

(a) 5.2 percent must be deposited into the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050;

(b) 1.4 percent must be deposited into the city-county assistance account created in RCW 43.08.290;

(c) 79.4 percent must be deposited into the general fund; and

(d) The remainder must be deposited into the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.

--- END ---