BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature to restore the freedoms, rights, and liberties granted to citizens of the United States under the Declaration of Independence and Constitution of the United States that were lost to the people of Washington during the 2020 legislative session. In order to restore freedom, return the right of conscience, empower parents, treat all citizens equally, repeal tax increases on middle class families, and defend the right of individuals to protect themselves and their families, the legislature shall repeal and eliminate all laws passed by the legislature between January 1st and March 13th 2020.

--- END ---