BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature declared as state policy, in RCW 80.28.074, the preservation of affordable electric services to the residents of the state. The legislature finds that the COVID-19 pandemic has caused severe adverse economic impacts and made electric utility services unaffordable to many residents of the state as demonstrated by the growing number of customers with significant unpaid portions of their utility bills. The legislature finds that costs associated with legislation enacted prior to the COVID-19 pandemic will be incorporated into retail electric rates and exacerbate the financial hardship faced by electric utility customers. The legislature further finds that modest statutory changes are available that will reduce utility compliance costs with minimal to no impact on the fundamental goals of the legislation. The legislature therefore intends to provide certain temporary compliance relief to reduce costs to utilities and create financial support for utility customers economically impacted by COVID-19.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.285.040 and 2019 c 288 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.

(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council in the most recently published regional power plan as it existed on June 12, 2014, or a subsequent date as may be provided by the department or the commission by rule, each qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective conservation potential through 2019. Nothing in the rule adopted under this subsection precludes a qualifying utility from using its utility specific conservation measures, values, and assumptions in identifying its achievable cost-effective conservation potential. At least every two years thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.

(b) Beginning January 2010, each qualifying utility shall establish and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of achievable opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that target during the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each biennial target must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata share for that two-year period of its cost-effective conservation potential for the subsequent ten-year period.

(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection, beginning on January 1, 2014, cost-effective conservation achieved by a qualifying utility in excess of its biennial acquisition target may be used to help meet the immediately subsequent two biennial acquisition targets, such that no more than twenty percent of any biennial target may be met with excess conservation savings.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2014, a qualifying utility may use single large facility conservation savings in excess of its biennial target to meet up to an additional five percent of the immediately subsequent two biennial acquisition targets, such that no more than twenty-five percent of any biennial target may be met with excess conservation savings allowed under all of the provisions of this section combined. For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c)(ii), "single large facility conservation savings" means cost-effective conservation savings achieved in a single biennial period at the premises of a single customer of a qualifying utility whose annual electricity consumption prior to the conservation savings exceeded five average megawatts.

(iii) Beginning January 1, 2012, and until December 31, 2017, a qualifying utility with an industrial facility located in a county with a population between ninety-five thousand and one hundred fifteen thousand that is directly interconnected with electricity facilities that are capable of carrying electricity at transmission voltage may use cost-effective conservation from that industrial facility in excess of its biennial acquisition target to help meet the immediately subsequent two biennial acquisition targets, such that no more than twenty-five percent of any biennial target may be met with excess conservation savings allowed under all of the provisions of this section combined.

(d) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.

(e) The commission may determine if a conservation program implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the commission's policies and practice.

(f) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.

(g) For the compliance periods January 1, 2020, to December 31, 2021, and January 1, 2022, to December 31, 2023, a qualifying utility is considered to be in compliance with its obligation under this subsection and with RCW 19.405.050(3), if the amount of funds the utility used to directly and indirectly assist retail customers coupled with the funds directed towards conservation during the compliance period equals or exceeds the amount of utility funds expended in the immediately previous compliance period to meet the obligations under this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, indirect assistance of retail customers includes any arrearages in customer payments for rendered utility services.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (j) of this subsection, each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or any combination of them, to meet the following annual targets:

(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each year thereafter through December 31, 2015;

(ii) At least nine percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each year thereafter through December 31, 2019; and

(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and each year thereafter.

(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated renewable energy credits.

(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average of the utility's load for the previous two years.

(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity from resources other than coal transition power or renewable resources other than on a daily spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a combination of both.

(e) A qualifying utility may use renewable energy credits to meet the requirements of this section, subject to the limitations of this subsection.

(i) A renewable energy credit from electricity generated by a resource other than freshwater may be used to meet a requirement applicable to the year in which the credit was created, the year before the year in which the credit was created, or the year after the year in which the credit was created.

(ii) A renewable energy credit from electricity generated by freshwater:

(A) May only be used to meet a requirement applicable to the year in which the credit was created; and

(B) Must be acquired by the qualifying utility through ownership of the generation facility or through a transaction that conveyed both the electricity and the nonpower attributes of the electricity.

(iii) A renewable energy credit transferred to an investor-owned utility pursuant to the Bonneville power administration's residential exchange program may not be used by any utility other than the utility receiving the credit from the Bonneville power administration.

(iv) Each renewable energy credit may only be used once to meet the requirements of this section and must be retired using procedures of the renewable energy credit tracking system.

(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:

(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity; or

(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the program established in RCW 19.29A.090.

(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where the cofiring commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be considered to produce eligible renewable resources in direct proportion to the percentage of the total heat value represented by the heat value of the renewable resources.

(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one and two-tenths times its base value:

(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and

(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship programs approved by the council during facility construction.

(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra credit.

(i) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target. Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure, strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.

(j)(i) Beginning January 1, 2016, only a qualifying utility that owns or is directly interconnected to a qualified biomass energy facility may use qualified biomass energy to meet its compliance obligation under this subsection.

(ii) A qualifying utility may no longer use electricity and associated renewable energy credits from a qualified biomass energy facility if the associated industrial pulping or wood manufacturing facility ceases operation other than for purposes of maintenance or upgrade.

(k) An industrial facility that hosts a qualified biomass energy facility may only transfer or sell renewable energy credits associated with qualified biomass energy generated at its facility to the qualifying utility with which it is directly interconnected with facilities owned by such a qualifying utility and that are capable of carrying electricity at transmission voltage. The qualifying utility may only use an amount of renewable energy credits associated with qualified biomass energy that are equivalent to the proportionate amount of its annual targets under (a)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection that was created by the load of the industrial facility. A qualifying utility that owns a qualified biomass energy facility may not transfer or sell renewable energy credits associated with qualified biomass energy to another person, entity, or qualifying utility.

(l) Beginning January 1, 2020, a qualifying utility may use eligible renewable resources as identified under RCW 19.285.030(12) (g) and (h) to meet its compliance obligation under this subsection (2). A qualifying utility may not transfer or sell these eligible renewable resources to another utility for compliance purposes under this chapter.

(m) Beginning January 1, ((2030))2021, a qualifying utility is considered to be in compliance with an annual target in (a) of this subsection if the utility uses electricity from: (i) Renewable resources and renewable energy credits as defined in RCW 19.285.030; and (ii) nonemitting electric generation as defined in RCW 19.405.020, in an amount equal to or exceeding one hundred percent of the utility's ((average)) annual retail electric load of the previous year. Nothing in this subsection relieves the requirements of a qualifying utility to comply with subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31, 2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of December 7, 2006.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.405.060 and 2019 c 288 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) By January 1, 2022, and every four years thereafter, each investor-owned utility must develop and submit to the commission:

(i) A four-year clean energy implementation plan for the standards established under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) that proposes specific targets for energy efficiency, demand response, and renewable energy; and

(ii) Proposed interim targets for meeting the standard under RCW 19.405.040(1) during the years prior to 2030 and between 2030 and 2045.

(b) An investor-owned utility's clean energy implementation plan must:

(i) Be informed by the investor-owned utility's clean energy action plan developed under RCW 19.280.030;

(ii) Be consistent with subsection (3) of this section; and

(iii) Identify specific actions to be taken by the investor-owned utility over the next four years, consistent with the utility's long-range integrated resource plan and resource adequacy requirements, that demonstrate progress toward meeting the standards under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) and the interim targets proposed under (a)(i) of this subsection. The specific actions identified must be informed by the investor-owned utility's historic performance under median water conditions and resource capability and by the investor-owned utility's participation in centralized markets. In identifying specific actions in its clean energy implementation plan, the investor-owned utility may also take into consideration any significant and unplanned loss or addition of load it experiences.

(c) The commission, after a hearing, must by order approve, reject, or approve with conditions an investor-owned utility's clean energy implementation plan and interim targets. The commission may, in its order, recommend or require more stringent targets than those proposed by the investor-owned utility. The commission may periodically adjust or expedite timelines if it can be demonstrated that the targets or timelines can be achieved in a manner consistent with the following:

(i) Maintaining and protecting the safety, reliable operation, and balancing of the electric system;

(ii) Planning to meet the standards at the lowest reasonable cost, considering risk;

(iii) Ensuring that all customers are benefiting from the transition to clean energy: Through the equitable distribution of energy and nonenergy benefits and the reduction of burdens to vulnerable populations and highly impacted communities; long-term and short-term public health and environmental benefits and reduction of costs and risks; and energy security and resiliency; and

(iv) Ensuring that no customer or class of customers is unreasonably harmed by any resulting increases in the cost of utility-supplied electricity as may be necessary to comply with the standards.

(2)(a) By January 1, 2022, and every four years thereafter, each consumer-owned utility must develop and submit to the department a four-year clean energy implementation plan for the standards established under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) that:

(i) Proposes interim targets for meeting the standard under RCW 19.405.040(1) during the years prior to 2030 and between 2030 and 2045, as well as specific targets for energy efficiency, demand response, and renewable energy;

(ii) Is informed by the consumer-owned utility's clean energy action plan developed under RCW 19.280.030(1) or other ten-year plan developed under RCW 19.280.030(5);

(iii) Is consistent with subsection (4) of this section; and

(iv) Identifies specific actions to be taken by the consumer-owned utility over the next four years, consistent with the utility's long-range resource plan and resource adequacy requirements, that demonstrate progress towards meeting the standards under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) and the interim targets proposed under (a)(i) of this subsection. The specific actions identified must be informed by the consumer-owned utility's historic performance under median water conditions and resource capability and by the consumer-owned utility's participation in centralized markets. In identifying specific actions in its clean energy implementation plan, the consumer-owned utility may also take into consideration any significant and unplanned loss or addition of load it experiences.

(b) The governing body of the consumer-owned utility must, after a public meeting, adopt the consumer-owned utility's clean energy implementation plan. The clean energy implementation plan must be submitted to the department and made available to the public. The governing body may adopt more stringent targets than those proposed by the consumer-owned utility and periodically adjust or expedite timelines if it can be demonstrated that such targets or timelines can be achieved in a manner consistent with the following:

(i) Maintaining and protecting the safety, reliable operation, and balancing of the electric system;

(ii) Planning to meet the standards at the lowest reasonable cost, considering risk;

(iii) Ensuring that all customers are benefiting from the transition to clean energy: Through the equitable distribution of energy and nonenergy benefits and reduction of burdens to vulnerable populations and highly impacted communities; long-term and short-term public health and environmental benefits and reduction of costs and risks; and energy security and resiliency; and

(iv) Ensuring that no customer or class of customers is unreasonably harmed by any resulting increases in the cost of utility-supplied electricity as may be necessary to comply with the standards.

(3)(a) An investor-owned utility must be considered to be in compliance with the standards under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) if, over the four-year compliance period, the average annual incremental cost of meeting the standards or the interim targets established under subsection (1) of this section equals a two percent increase of the investor-owned utility's weather-adjusted sales revenue to customers for electric operations above the previous year, as reported by the investor-owned utility in its most recent commission basis report. All costs included in the determination of cost impact must be directly attributable to actions necessary to comply with the requirements of RCW 19.405.040 and 19.405.050.

(b) If an investor-owned utility relies on (a) of this subsection as a basis for compliance with the standard under RCW 19.405.040(1), then it must demonstrate that it has maximized investments in renewable resources and nonemitting electric generation prior to using alternative compliance options allowed under RCW 19.405.040(1)(b).

(4)(a) A consumer-owned utility must be considered to be in compliance with the standards under RCW 19.405.040(1) and 19.405.050(1) if, over the four-year compliance period, the average annual incremental cost of meeting the standards or the interim targets established under subsection (2) of this section meets or exceeds a two percent increase of the consumer-owned utility's retail revenue requirement above the previous year. All costs included in the determination of cost impact must be directly attributable to actions necessary to comply with the requirements of RCW 19.405.040 and 19.405.050.

(b) If a consumer-owned utility relies on (a) of this subsection as a basis for compliance with the standard under RCW 19.405.040(1), and it has not met eighty percent of its annual retail electric load using electricity from renewable resources and nonemitting electric generation, then it must demonstrate that it has maximized investments in renewable resources and nonemitting electric generation prior to using alternative compliance options allowed under RCW 19.405.040(1)(b).

(5) The commission, for investor-owned utilities, and the department, for consumer-owned utilities, must adopt rules establishing the methodology for calculating the incremental cost of compliance under this section, as compared to the cost of an alternative lowest reasonable cost portfolio of investments that are reasonably available.

(6) From January 1, 2022, through December 31, 2026, the requirements of this section and any associated compliance reporting are waived for any utility that uses electricity from: (a) Renewable resources as defined in RCW 19.285.030; and (b) nonemitting electric generation as defined in RCW 19.405.020, in an amount equal to or exceeding 80 percent of the utility's annual retail electric load.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. All cost savings to utilities under this act must be used for financial support to utility customers that have been economically impacted by COVID-19.

--- END ---