BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.32.010 and 2008 c 114 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Apartment" means a part of the property intended for any type of independent use, including one or more rooms or spaces located on one or more floors (or part or parts thereof) in a building, or if not in a building, a separately delineated place of storage or moorage of a boat, plane, or motor vehicle, regardless of whether it is destined for a residence, an office, storage or moorage of a boat, plane, or motor vehicle, the operation of any industry or business, or for any other use not prohibited by law, and which has a direct exit to a public street or highway, or to a common area leading to such street or highway. The boundaries of an apartment located in a building are the interior surfaces of the perimeter walls, floors, ceilings, windows and doors thereof, and the apartment includes both the portions of the building so described and the air space so encompassed. If the apartment is a separately delineated place of storage or moorage of a boat, plane, or motor vehicle the boundaries are those specified in the declaration. In interpreting declarations, deeds, and plans, the existing physical boundaries of the apartment as originally constructed or as reconstructed in substantial accordance with the original plans thereof shall be conclusively presumed to be its boundaries rather than the metes and bounds expressed or depicted in the declaration, deed or plan, regardless of settling or lateral movement of the building and regardless of minor variance between boundaries shown in the declaration, deed, or plan and those of apartments in the building.

(2) "Apartment owner" means the person or persons owning an apartment, as herein defined, in fee simple absolute or qualified, by way of leasehold or by way of a periodic estate, or in any other manner in which real property may be owned, leased or possessed in this state, together with an undivided interest in a like estate of the common areas and facilities in the percentage specified and established in the declaration as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended.

(3) "Apartment number" means the number, letter, or combination thereof, designating the apartment in the declaration as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended.

(4) "Association of apartment owners" means all of the apartment owners acting as a group in accordance with the bylaws and with the declaration as it is duly recorded or as they may be lawfully amended.

(5) "Building" means a building, containing two or more apartments, or two or more buildings each containing one or more apartments, and comprising a part of the property.

(6) "Common areas and facilities", unless otherwise provided in the declaration as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended, includes:

(a) The land on which the building is located;

(b) The foundations, columns, girders, beams, supports, main walls, roofs, halls, corridors, lobbys, stairs, stairways, fire escapes, and entrances and exits of the building;

(c) The basements, yards, gardens, parking areas and storage spaces;

(d) The premises for the lodging of janitors or persons in charge of the property;

(e) The installations of central services such as power, light, gas, hot and cold water, heating, refrigeration, air conditioning and incinerating;

(f) The elevators, tanks, pumps, motors, fans, compressors, ducts and in general all apparatus and installations existing for common use;

(g) Such community and commercial facilities as may be provided for in the declaration as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended;

(h) All other parts of the property necessary or convenient to its existence, maintenance and safety, or normally in common use.

(7) "Common expenses" include:

(a) All sums lawfully assessed against the apartment owners by the association of apartment owners;

(b) Expenses of administration, maintenance, repair, or replacement of the common areas and facilities;

(c) Expenses agreed upon as common expenses by the association of apartment owners;

(d) Expenses declared common expenses by the provisions of this chapter, or by the declaration as it is duly recorded, or by the bylaws, or as they may be lawfully amended.

(8) "Common profits" means the balance of all income, rents, profits and revenues from the common areas and facilities remaining after the deduction of the common expenses.

(9) "Declaration" means the instrument by which the property is submitted to provisions of this chapter, as hereinafter provided, and as it may be, from time to time, lawfully amended.

(10) "Land" means the material of the earth, whatever may be the ingredients of which it is composed, whether soil, rock, or other substance, whether or not submerged, and includes free or occupied space for an indefinite distance upwards as well as downwards, subject to limitations upon the use of airspace imposed, and rights in the use of the airspace granted, by the laws of this state or of the United States.

(11) "Limited common areas and facilities" includes those common areas and facilities designated in the declaration, as it is duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended, as reserved for use of certain apartment or apartments to the exclusion of the other apartments.

(12) "Majority" or "majority of apartment owners" means the apartment owners with fifty-one percent or more of the votes in accordance with the percentages assigned in the declaration, as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended, to the apartments for voting purposes.

(13) "Person" includes any individual, corporation, partnership, association, trustee, or other legal entity.

(14) "Property" means the land, the building, all improvements and structures thereon, all owned in fee simple absolute or qualified, by way of leasehold or by way of a periodic estate, or in any other manner in which real property may be owned, leased or possessed in this state, and all easements, rights and appurtenances belonging thereto, none of which shall be considered as a security or security interest, and all articles of personalty intended for use in connection therewith, which have been or are intended to be submitted to the provisions of this chapter.

(15) "Percent of the apartment owners" means the apartment owners with the stated percent or more of the votes in accordance with the percentages assigned in the declaration, as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended, to the apartments for voting purposes.

(16) "Electronic transmission" or "electronically transmitted" means any electronic communication not directly involving the physical transfer of a writing in a tangible medium, but that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by the sender and the recipient of the communication, and that may be directly reproduced in a tangible medium by a sender and recipient.

(17) "Tangible medium" means a writing, copy of a writing, facsimile, or a physical reproduction, each on paper or on other tangible material.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 64.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision in the governing documents, notice to the association of apartment owners, board of directors, or any apartment owner or occupant of an apartment under this chapter shall be in writing and shall be provided to the recipient by personal delivery, public or private mail or delivery service, or by electronic transmission as provided in this section: PROVIDED, That if this chapter requires different or additional notice requirements for particular circumstances, those requirements shall apply.

(2) Notice in a tangible medium shall be provided as follows:

(a) Notice to the association of apartment owners or board of directors shall be addressed to the association's registered agent at its registered office, to the association at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report, or to an address provided by the association to the apartment owners.

(b) Notice to an apartment owner or occupant shall be addressed to the apartment address unless the apartment owner has requested, in a writing delivered to the association, that notices be sent to an alternate address.

(3) Notice in an electronic transmission shall be provided as follows:

(a) Notice to the association of apartment owners, the board of directors, or apartment owners by electronic transmission is effective only upon those who have consented, in writing, to receive electronically transmitted notices under this chapter and have designated the address, location, or system to which such notices may be electronically transmitted, provided that such notice otherwise complies with any other requirements of this chapter and applicable law.

(b) Notice under this subsection includes any materials that accompany the notice.

(c) Owners who have consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may revoke this consent by delivering a revocation to the association of apartment owners in writing.

(d) The consent of any apartment owner is revoked if the association is unable to electronically transmit two consecutive notices and this inability becomes known to the secretary of the association of apartment owners or any other person responsible for giving the notice. The inadvertent failure by the association of apartment owners to treat this inability as a revocation does not invalidate any meeting or other action.

(e) Notice to apartment owners who have consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may be provided by posting the notice on an electronic network and delivering to the apartment owner separate notice of the posting, together with comprehensible instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network.

(4) Notice is effective as follows:

(a) Notice provided in a tangible medium is effective as of the date of hand delivery, deposit with the carrier, or when sent by fax.

(b) Notice provided in an electronic transmission is effective as of the date it:

(i) Is electronically transmitted to an address, location, or system designated by the recipient for that purpose; or

(ii) Has been posted on an electronic network and separate notice of the posting has been sent to the recipient containing instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network.

(5) The ineffectiveness of a good faith effort to deliver notice by an authorized means does not invalidate action taken at or without a meeting.

(6) This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 64.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Apartment owners may vote at a meeting in person, by absentee ballot pursuant to subsection (3)(d) of this section, or by a proxy pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

(2) When a vote is conducted without a meeting, apartment owners may vote by ballot pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

(3) At a meeting of apartment owners the following requirements apply:

(a) Apartment owners or their proxies who are present in person may vote by voice vote, show of hands, standing, written ballot, or any other method for determining the votes of apartment owners, as designated by the person presiding at the meeting.

(b) If only one of several apartment owners of an apartment is present, that apartment owner is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that apartment. If more than one of the apartment owners are present, the votes allocated to that apartment may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the apartment owners, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is a majority agreement if any one of the apartment owners casts the votes allocated to the apartment without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other apartment owners of the apartment.

(c) Unless a greater number or fraction of the votes in the association is required under this chapter or the declaration or organizational documents, a majority of the votes cast determines the outcome of any action of the association.

(d) Whenever proposals or board members are to be voted upon at a meeting, an apartment owner may vote by duly executed absentee ballot if:

(i) The name of each candidate and the text of each proposal to be voted upon are set forth in a writing accompanying or contained in the notice of meeting; and

(ii) A ballot is provided by the association for such purpose.

(4) When an apartment owner votes by absentee ballot, the association must be able to verify that the ballot is cast by the apartment owner having the right to do so.

(5) Except as provided otherwise in the declaration or organizational documents, the following requirements apply with respect to proxy voting:

(a) Votes allocated to an apartment may be cast pursuant to a directed or undirected proxy duly executed by an apartment owner in the same manner as provided in RCW 24.06.110.

(b) If an apartment is owned by more than one person, each apartment owner of the apartment may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other apartment owners of the apartment through a duly executed proxy.

(c) An apartment owner may revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section only by actual notice of revocation to the secretary or the person presiding over a meeting of the association or by delivery of a subsequent proxy. The death or disability of an apartment owner does not revoke a proxy given by the apartment owner unless the person presiding over the meeting has actual notice of the death or disability.

(d) A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice.

(e) Unless stated otherwise in the proxy, a proxy terminates eleven months after its date of issuance.

(6) Unless prohibited or limited by the declaration or organizational documents, an association may conduct a vote without a meeting. In that event, the following requirements apply:

(a) The association must notify the apartment owners that the vote will be taken by ballot.

(b) The notice must state:

(i) The time and date by which a ballot must be delivered to the association to be counted, which may not be fewer than fourteen days after the date of the notice, and which deadline may be extended in accordance with (g) of this subsection;

(ii) The percent of votes necessary to meet the quorum requirements;

(iii) The percent of votes necessary to approve each matter other than election of board members; and

(iv) The time, date, and manner by which apartment owners wishing to deliver information to all apartment owners regarding the subject of the vote may do so.

(c) The association must deliver a ballot to every apartment owner with the notice.

(d) The ballot must set forth each proposed action and provide an opportunity to vote for or against the action.

(e) A ballot cast pursuant to this section may be revoked only by actual notice to the association of revocation. The death or disability of an apartment owner does not revoke a ballot unless the association has actual notice of the death or disability prior to the date set forth in (b)(i) of this subsection.

(f) Approval by ballot pursuant to this subsection is valid only if the number of votes cast by ballot equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action.

(g) If the association does not receive a sufficient number of votes to constitute a quorum or to approve the proposal by the date and time established for return of ballots, the board of directors may extend the deadline for a reasonable period not to exceed eleven months upon further notice to all members in accordance with (b) of this subsection. In that event, all votes previously cast on the proposal must be counted unless subsequently revoked as provided in this section.

(h) A ballot or revocation is not effective until received by the association.

(i) The association must give notice to apartment owners of any action taken pursuant to this subsection within a reasonable time after the action is taken.

(j) When an action is taken pursuant to this subsection, a record of the action, including the ballots or a report of the persons appointed to tabulate such ballots, must be kept with the minutes of meetings of the association.

(7) If the governing documents require that votes on specified matters affecting the common interest community be cast by lessees rather than apartment owners of leased apartments:

(a) This section applies to lessees as if they were apartment owners;

(b) Apartment owners that have leased their apartments to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and

(c) Lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were apartment owners.

(8) Apartment owners must also be given notice, in the manner provided in section 2 of this act, of all meetings at which lessees may be entitled to vote.

(9) In any vote of the apartment owners, votes allocated to an apartment owned by the association must be cast in the same proportion as the votes cast on the matter by apartment owners other than the association.

(10) Except as otherwise restricted by the declaration, bylaws, or articles of incorporation, meetings of apartment owners may be conducted by telephonic, video, or other conferencing process, if: (a) The meeting notice states the conferencing process to be used and provides information explaining how apartment owners may participate in the conference directly or by meeting at a central location or conference connection; and (b) the process provides all apartment owners the opportunity to hear or perceive the discussion and to comment.

Sec. 4. RCW 64.34.020 and 2011 c 189 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

In the declaration and bylaws, unless specifically provided otherwise or the context requires otherwise, and in this chapter:

(1) "Affiliate" means any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the referenced person. A person "controls" another person if the person: (a) Is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the referenced person; (b) directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty percent of the voting interest in the referenced person; (c) controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the referenced person; or (d) has contributed more than twenty percent of the capital of the referenced person. A person "is controlled by" another person if the other person: (i) Is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the person; (ii) directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty percent of the voting interest in the person; (iii) controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the person; or (iv) has contributed more than twenty percent of the capital of the person. Control does not exist if the powers described in this subsection are held solely as security for an obligation and are not exercised.

(2) "Allocated interests" means the undivided interest in the common elements, the common expense liability, and votes in the association allocated to each unit.

(3) "Assessment" means all sums chargeable by the association against a unit including, without limitation: (a) Regular and special assessments for common expenses, charges, and fines imposed by the association; (b) interest and late charges on any delinquent account; and (c) costs of collection, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account.

(4) "Association" or "unit owners' association" means the unit owners' association organized under RCW 64.34.300.

(5) "Baseline funding plan" means establishing a reserve funding goal of maintaining a reserve account balance above zero dollars throughout the thirty-year study period described under RCW 64.34.380.

(6) "Board of directors" means the body, regardless of name, with primary authority to manage the affairs of the association.

(7) "Common elements" means all portions of a condominium other than the units.

(8) "Common expense liability" means the liability for common expenses allocated to each unit pursuant to RCW 64.34.224.

(9) "Common expenses" means expenditures made by or financial liabilities of the association, together with any allocations to reserves.

(10) "Condominium" means real property, portions of which are designated for separate ownership and the remainder of which is designated for common ownership solely by the owners of those portions. Real property is not a condominium unless the undivided interests in the common elements are vested in the unit owners, and unless a declaration and a survey map and plans have been recorded pursuant to this chapter.

(11) "Contribution rate" means, in a reserve study as described in RCW 64.34.380, the amount contributed to the reserve account so that the association will have cash reserves to pay major maintenance, repair, or replacement costs without the need of a special assessment.

(12) "Conversion condominium" means a condominium (a) that at any time before creation of the condominium was lawfully occupied wholly or partially by a tenant or subtenant for residential purposes pursuant to a rental agreement, oral or written, express or implied, for which the tenant or subtenant had not received the notice described in (b) of this subsection; or (b) that, at any time within twelve months before the conveyance of, or acceptance of an agreement to convey, any unit therein other than to a declarant or any affiliate of a declarant, was lawfully occupied wholly or partially by a residential tenant of a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant and such tenant was not notified in writing, prior to lawfully occupying a unit or executing a rental agreement, whichever event first occurs, that the unit was part of a condominium and subject to sale. "Conversion condominium" shall not include a condominium in which, before July 1, 1990, any unit therein had been conveyed or been made subject to an agreement to convey to any transferee other than a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant.

(13) "Conveyance" means any transfer of the ownership of a unit, including a transfer by deed or by real estate contract and, with respect to a unit in a leasehold condominium, a transfer by lease or assignment thereof, but shall not include a transfer solely for security.

(14) "Dealer" means a person who, together with such person's affiliates, owns or has a right to acquire either six or more units in a condominium or fifty percent or more of the units in a condominium containing more than two units.

(15) "Declarant" means:

(a) Any person who executes as declarant a declaration as defined in subsection (17) of this section; or

(b) Any person who reserves any special declarant right in the declaration; or

(c) Any person who exercises special declarant rights or to whom special declarant rights are transferred; or

(d) Any person who is the owner of a fee interest in the real property which is subjected to the declaration at the time of the recording of an instrument pursuant to RCW 64.34.316 and who directly or through one or more affiliates is materially involved in the construction, marketing, or sale of units in the condominium created by the recording of the instrument.

(16) "Declarant control" means the right of the declarant or persons designated by the declarant to appoint and remove officers and members of the board of directors, or to veto or approve a proposed action of the board or association, pursuant to RCW 64.34.308 (5) or (6).

(17) "Declaration" means the document, however denominated, that creates a condominium by setting forth the information required by RCW 64.34.216 and any amendments to that document.

(18) "Development rights" means any right or combination of rights reserved by a declarant in the declaration to: (a) Add real property or improvements to a condominium; (b) create units, common elements, or limited common elements within real property included or added to a condominium; (c) subdivide units or convert units into common elements; (d) withdraw real property from a condominium; or (e) reallocate limited common elements with respect to units that have not been conveyed by the declarant.

(19) "Dispose" or "disposition" means a voluntary transfer or conveyance to a purchaser or lessee of any legal or equitable interest in a unit, but does not include the transfer or release of a security interest.

(20) "Effective age" means the difference between the estimated useful life and remaining useful life.

(21) "Eligible mortgagee" means the holder of a mortgage on a unit that has filed with the secretary of the association a written request that it be given copies of notices of any action by the association that requires the consent of mortgagees.

(22) "Foreclosure" means a forfeiture or judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure of a mortgage or a deed in lieu thereof.

(23) "Full funding plan" means setting a reserve funding goal of achieving one hundred percent fully funded reserves by the end of the thirty-year study period described under RCW 64.34.380, in which the reserve account balance equals the sum of the deteriorated portion of all reserve components.

(24) "Fully funded balance" means the current value of the deteriorated portion, not the total replacement value, of all the reserve components. The fully funded balance for each reserve component is calculated by multiplying the current replacement cost of that reserve component by its effective age, then dividing the result by that reserve component's useful life. The sum total of all reserve components' fully funded balances is the association's fully funded balance.

(25) "Identifying number" means the designation of each unit in a condominium.

(26) "Leasehold condominium" means a condominium in which all or a portion of the real property is subject to a lease, the expiration or termination of which will terminate the condominium or reduce its size.

(27) "Limited common element" means a portion of the common elements allocated by the declaration or by operation of RCW 64.34.204 (2) or (4) for the exclusive use of one or more but fewer than all of the units.

(28) "Master association" means an organization described in RCW 64.34.276, whether or not it is also an association described in RCW 64.34.300.

(29) "Mortgage" means a mortgage, deed of trust or real estate contract.

(30) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, trust, governmental subdivision or agency, or other legal entity.

(31) "Purchaser" means any person, other than a declarant or a dealer, who by means of a disposition acquires a legal or equitable interest in a unit other than (a) a leasehold interest, including renewal options, of less than twenty years at the time of creation of the unit, or (b) as security for an obligation.

(32) "Real property" means any fee, leasehold or other estate or interest in, over, or under land, including structures, fixtures, and other improvements thereon and easements, rights and interests appurtenant thereto which by custom, usage, or law pass with a conveyance of land although not described in the contract of sale or instrument of conveyance. "Real property" includes parcels, with or without upper or lower boundaries, and spaces that may be filled with air or water.

(33) "Remaining useful life" means the estimated time, in years, before a reserve component will require major maintenance, repair, or replacement to perform its intended function.

(34) "Replacement cost" means the current cost of replacing, repairing, or restoring a reserve component to its original functional condition.

(35) "Reserve component" means a common element whose cost of maintenance, repair, or replacement is infrequent, significant, and impractical to include in an annual budget.

(36) "Reserve study professional" means an independent person who is suitably qualified by knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education to prepare a reserve study in accordance with RCW 64.34.380 and 64.34.382.

(37) "Residential purposes" means use for dwelling or recreational purposes, or both.

(38) "Significant assets" means that the current total cost of major maintenance, repair, and replacement of the reserve components is fifty percent or more of the gross budget of the association, excluding reserve account funds.

(39) "Special declarant rights" means rights reserved for the benefit of a declarant to: (a) Complete improvements indicated on survey maps and plans filed with the declaration under RCW 64.34.232; (b) exercise any development right under RCW 64.34.236; (c) maintain sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the condominium, and models under RCW 64.34.256; (d) use easements through the common elements for the purpose of making improvements within the condominium or within real property which may be added to the condominium under RCW 64.34.260; (e) make the condominium part of a larger condominium or a development under RCW 64.34.280; (f) make the condominium subject to a master association under RCW 64.34.276; or (g) appoint or remove any officer of the association or any master association or any member of the board of directors, or to veto or approve a proposed action of the board or association, during any period of declarant control under RCW 64.34.308(5).

(40) "Timeshare" shall have the meaning specified in the timeshare act, RCW 64.36.010(11).

(41) "Unit" means a physical portion of the condominium designated for separate ownership, the boundaries of which are described pursuant to RCW 64.34.216(1)(d). "Separate ownership" includes leasing a unit in a leasehold condominium under a lease that expires contemporaneously with any lease, the expiration or termination of which will remove the unit from the condominium.

(42) "Unit owner" means a declarant or other person who owns a unit or leases a unit in a leasehold condominium under a lease that expires simultaneously with any lease, the expiration or termination of which will remove the unit from the condominium, but does not include a person who has an interest in a unit solely as security for an obligation. "Unit owner" means the vendee, not the vendor, of a unit under a real estate contract.

(43) "Useful life" means the estimated time, between years, that major maintenance, repair, or replacement is estimated to occur.

(44) "Electronic transmission" or "electronically transmitted" means any electronic communication not directly involving the physical transfer of a writing in a tangible medium, but that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by the sender and the recipient of the communication, and that may be directly reproduced in a tangible medium by a sender and recipient.

(45) "Tangible medium" means a writing, copy of a writing, facsimile, or a physical reproduction, each on paper or on other tangible material.

Sec. 5. RCW 64.34.332 and 1989 c 43 s 3-109 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A meeting of the association must be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the association may be called by the president, a majority of the board of directors, or by unit owners having twenty percent or any lower percentage specified in the declaration or bylaws of the votes in the association. Not less than ((ten))fourteen nor more than ((sixty))fifty days in advance of any meeting, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause notice to be ((hand-delivered or sent prepaid by first-class United States mail to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the unit owner))provided in accordance with this chapter. The notice of any meeting shall state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda to be voted on by the members, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, changes in the previously approved budget that result in a change in assessment obligations, and any proposal to remove a director or officer.

(2) Except as otherwise restricted by the declaration, bylaws, or articles of incorporation, meetings of unit owners may be conducted by telephonic, video, or other conferencing process, if: (a) The meeting notice states the conferencing process to be used and provides information explaining how unit owners may participate in the conference directly or by meeting at a central location or conference connection; and (b) the process provides all unit owners the opportunity to hear or perceive the discussion and to comment.

Sec. 6. RCW 64.34.340 and 1992 c 220 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) If only one of the multiple owners of a unit is present at a meeting of the association or has delivered a written ballot or proxy to the association secretary, the owner is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that unit. If more than one of the multiple owners are present or has delivered a written ballot or proxy to the association secretary, the votes allocated to that unit may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the multiple owners, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is majority agreement if any one of the multiple owners casts the votes allocated to that unit without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other owners of the unit.

(2) Votes allocated to a unit may be cast pursuant to a proxy duly executed by a unit owner. If a unit is owned by more than one person, each owner of the unit may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other owners of the unit through a duly executed proxy. A unit owner may not revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section except by actual notice of revocation to the person presiding over a meeting of the association. A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice. Unless stated otherwise in the proxy, a proxy terminates eleven months after its date of issuance.

(3) If the declaration requires that votes on specified matters affecting the condominium be cast by lessees rather than unit owners of leased units: (a) The provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section apply to lessees as if they were unit owners; (b) unit owners who have leased their units to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and (c) lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were unit owners. Unit owners must also be given notice, in the manner provided in RCW 64.34.332, of all meetings at which lessees may be entitled to vote.

(4) No votes allocated to a unit owned by the association may be cast, and in determining the percentage of votes required to act on any matter, the votes allocated to units owned by the association shall be disregarded.))(1) Unit owners may vote at a meeting in person, by absentee ballot pursuant to subsection (3)(d) of this section, or by a proxy pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

(2) When a vote is conducted without a meeting, unit owners may vote by ballot pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

(3) At a meeting of unit owners the following requirements apply:

(a) Unit owners or their proxies who are present in person may vote by voice vote, show of hands, standing, written ballot, or any other method for determining the votes of unit owners, as designated by the person presiding at the meeting.

(b) If only one of several unit owners of a unit is present, that unit owner is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that unit. If more than one of the unit owners are present, the votes allocated to that unit may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the unit owners, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is a majority agreement if any one of the unit owners casts the votes allocated to the unit without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other unit owners of the unit.

(c) Unless a greater number or fraction of the votes in the association is required under this chapter or the declaration or organizational documents, a majority of the votes cast determines the outcome of any action of the association.

(d) Whenever proposals or board members are to be voted upon at a meeting, a unit owner may vote by duly executed absentee ballot if:

(i) The name of each candidate and the text of each proposal to be voted upon are set forth in a writing accompanying or contained in the notice of meeting; and

(ii) A ballot is provided by the association for such purpose.

(4) When a unit owner votes by absentee ballot, the association must be able to verify that the ballot is cast by the unit owner having the right to do so.

(5) Except as provided otherwise in the declaration or organizational documents, the following requirements apply with respect to proxy voting:

(a) Votes allocated to a unit may be cast pursuant to a directed or undirected proxy duly executed by a unit owner in the same manner as provided in RCW 24.06.110.

(b) If a unit is owned by more than one person, each unit owner of the unit may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other unit owners of the unit through a duly executed proxy.

(c) A unit owner may revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section only by actual notice of revocation to the secretary or the person presiding over a meeting of the association or by delivery of a subsequent proxy. The death or disability of a unit owner does not revoke a proxy given by the unit owner unless the person presiding over the meeting has actual notice of the death or disability.

(d) A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice.

(e) Unless stated otherwise in the proxy, a proxy terminates eleven months after its date of issuance.

(6) Unless prohibited or limited by the declaration or organizational documents, an association may conduct a vote without a meeting. In that event, the following requirements apply:

(a) The association must notify the unit owners that the vote will be taken by ballot.

(b) The notice must state:

(i) The time and date by which a ballot must be delivered to the association to be counted, which may not be fewer than fourteen days after the date of the notice, and which deadline may be extended in accordance with (g) of this subsection;

(ii) The percent of votes necessary to meet the quorum requirements;

(iii) The percent of votes necessary to approve each matter other than election of board members; and

(iv) The time, date, and manner by which unit owners wishing to deliver information to all unit owners regarding the subject of the vote may do so.

(c) The association must deliver a ballot to every unit owner with the notice.

(d) The ballot must set forth each proposed action and provide an opportunity to vote for or against the action.

(e) A ballot cast pursuant to this section may be revoked only by actual notice to the association of revocation. The death or disability of a unit owner does not revoke a ballot unless the association has actual notice of the death or disability prior to the date set forth in (b)(i) of this subsection.

(f) Approval by ballot pursuant to this subsection is valid only if the number of votes cast by ballot equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action.

(g) If the association does not receive a sufficient number of votes to constitute a quorum or to approve the proposal by the date and time established for return of ballots, the board of directors may extend the deadline for a reasonable period not to exceed eleven months upon further notice to all members in accordance with (b) of this subsection. In that event, all votes previously cast on the proposal must be counted unless subsequently revoked as provided in this section.

(h) A ballot or revocation is not effective until received by the association.

(i) The association must give notice to unit owners of any action taken pursuant to this subsection within a reasonable time after the action is taken.

(j) When an action is taken pursuant to this subsection, a record of the action, including the ballots or a report of the persons appointed to tabulate such ballots, must be kept with the minutes of meetings of the association.

(7) If the governing documents require that votes on specified matters affecting the common interest community be cast by lessees rather than unit owners of leased units:

(a) This section applies to lessees as if they were unit owners;

(b) Unit owners that have leased their units to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and

(c) Lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were unit owners.

(8) Unit owners must also be given notice, in the manner provided in section 8 of this act, of all meetings at which lessees may be entitled to vote.

(9) In any vote of the unit owners, votes allocated to a unit owned by the association must be cast in the same proportion as the votes cast on the matter by unit owners other than the association.

Sec. 7. RCW 64.34.352 and 1992 c 220 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Commencing not later than the time of the first conveyance of a unit to a person other than a declarant, the association shall maintain, to the extent reasonably available:

(a) Property insurance on the condominium, which may, but need not, include equipment, improvements, and betterments in a unit installed by the declarant or the unit owners, insuring against all risks of direct physical loss commonly insured against. The total amount of insurance after application of any deductibles shall be not less than eighty percent, or such greater amount specified in the declaration, of the actual cash value of the insured property at the time the insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, foundations, and other items normally excluded from property policies; and

(b) Liability insurance, including medical payments insurance, in an amount determined by the board of directors but not less than the amount specified in the declaration, covering all occurrences commonly insured against for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of or in connection with the use, ownership, or maintenance of the common elements.

(2) If the insurance described in subsection (1) of this section is not reasonably available, or is modified, canceled, or not renewed, the association promptly shall cause notice of that fact to be ((hand-delivered or sent prepaid by first-class United States mail))provided to each unit owner in accordance with this chapter, to all unit owners, to each eligible mortgagee, and to each mortgagee to whom a certificate or memorandum of insurance has been issued at their respective last known addresses. The declaration may require the association to carry any other insurance, and the association in any event may carry any other insurance it deems appropriate to protect the association or the unit owners.

(3) Insurance policies carried pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall provide that:

(a) Each unit owner is an insured person under the policy with respect to liability arising out of the owner's interest in the common elements or membership in the association;

(b) The insurer waives its right to subrogation under the policy against any unit owner, member of the owner's household, and lessee of the owner;

(c) No act or omission by any unit owner, unless acting within the scope of the owner's authority on behalf of the association, will void the policy or be a condition to recovery under the policy; and

(d) If, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a unit owner covering the same risk covered by the policy, the association's policy provides primary insurance.

(4) Any loss covered by the property insurance under subsection (1)(a) of this section must be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for that loss are payable to any insurance trustee designated for that purpose, or otherwise to the association, and not to any holder of a mortgage. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold any insurance proceeds in trust for unit owners and lienholders as their interests may appear. Subject to the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the proceeds must be disbursed first for the repair or restoration of the damaged property, and unit owners and lienholders are not entitled to receive payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is a surplus of proceeds after the property has been completely repaired or restored or the condominium is terminated.

(5) An insurance policy issued to the association does not prevent a unit owner from obtaining insurance for the owner's own benefit.

(6) An insurer that has issued an insurance policy under this section shall issue certificates or memoranda of insurance to the association and, upon written request, to any unit owner or holder of a mortgage. The insurer issuing the policy may not modify the amount or the extent of the coverage of the policy or cancel or refuse to renew the policy unless the insurer has complied with all applicable provisions of chapter 48.18 RCW pertaining to the cancellation or nonrenewal of contracts of insurance. The insurer shall not modify the amount or the extent of the coverage of the policy, or cancel or refuse to renew the policy without complying with this section.

(7) Any portion of the condominium for which insurance is required under this section which is damaged or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless: (a) The condominium is terminated; (b) repair or replacement would be illegal under any state or local health or safety statute or ordinance; or (c) eighty percent of the unit owners, including every owner of a unit or assigned limited common element which will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild. The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds and reserves is a common expense. If all of the damaged or destroyed portions of the condominium are not repaired or replaced: (i) The insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged common elements shall be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the condominium; (ii) the insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited common elements which are not rebuilt shall be distributed to the owners of those units and the owners of the units to which those limited common elements were allocated, or to lienholders, as their interests may appear; and (iii) the remainder of the proceeds shall be distributed to all the unit owners or lienholders, as their interests may appear, in proportion to the common element interests of all the units. If the unit owners vote not to rebuild any unit, that unit's allocated interests are automatically reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been condemned under RCW 64.34.060(1), and the association promptly shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, RCW 64.34.268 governs the distribution of insurance proceeds if the condominium is terminated.

(8) The provisions of this section may be varied or waived as provided in the declaration if all units of a condominium are restricted to nonresidential use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision in the governing documents, notice to the association, board of directors, or any owner or occupant of a unit under this chapter shall be in writing and shall be provided to the recipient by personal delivery, public or private mail or delivery service, or by electronic transmission as provided in this section: PROVIDED, That if this chapter requires different or additional notice requirements for particular circumstances, those requirements shall apply.

(2) Notice in a tangible medium shall be provided as follows:

(a) Notice to the association or board of directors shall be addressed to the association's registered agent at its registered office, to the association at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report, or to an address provided by the association to the unit owners.

(b) Notice to a unit owner or occupant shall be addressed to the unit address unless the unit owner has requested, in a writing delivered to the association, that notices be sent to an alternate address.

(3) Notice in an electronic transmission shall be provided as follows:

(a) Notice to the association, the board of directors, or unit owners by electronic transmission is effective only upon those who have consented, in writing, to receive electronically transmitted notices under this chapter and have designated the address, location, or system to which such notices may be electronically transmitted, provided that such notice otherwise complies with any other requirements of this chapter and applicable law.

(b) Notice under this subsection includes any materials that accompany the notice.

(c) Owners who have consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may revoke this consent by delivering a revocation to the association in writing.

(d) The consent of any owner is revoked if the association is unable to electronically transmit two consecutive notices and this inability becomes known to the secretary of the association or any other person responsible for giving the notice. The inadvertent failure by the association to treat this inability as a revocation does not invalidate any meeting or other action.

(e) Notice to unit owners who have consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may be provided by posting the notice on an electronic network and delivering to the unit owner separate notice of the posting, together with comprehensible instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network.

(4) Notice is effective as follows:

(a) Notice provided in a tangible medium is effective as of the date of hand delivery, deposit with the carrier, or when sent by fax.

(b) Notice provided in an electronic transmission is effective as of the date it:

(i) Is electronically transmitted to an address, location, or system designated by the recipient for that purpose; or

(ii) Has been posted on an electronic network and separate notice of the posting has been sent to the recipient containing instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network.

(5) The ineffectiveness of a good faith effort to deliver notice by an authorized means does not invalidate action taken at or without a meeting.

(6) This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

Sec. 9. RCW 64.38.010 and 2011 c 189 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Assessment" means all sums chargeable to an owner by an association in accordance with RCW 64.38.020.

(2) "Baseline funding plan" means establishing a reserve funding goal of maintaining a reserve account balance above zero dollars throughout the thirty-year study period described under RCW 64.38.065.

(3) "Board of directors" or "board" means the body, regardless of name, with primary authority to manage the affairs of the association.

(4) "Common areas" means property owned, or otherwise maintained, repaired or administered by the association.

(5) "Common expense" means the costs incurred by the association to exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter.

(6) "Contribution rate" means, in a reserve study as described in RCW ((64.34.380))64.38.065, the amount contributed to the reserve account so that the association will have cash reserves to pay major maintenance, repair, or replacement costs without the need of a special assessment.

(7) "Effective age" means the difference between the estimated useful life and remaining useful life.

(8) "Full funding plan" means setting a reserve funding goal of achieving one hundred percent fully funded reserves by the end of the thirty-year study period described under RCW 64.38.065, in which the reserve account balance equals the sum of the deteriorated portion of all reserve components.

(9) "Fully funded balance" means the current value of the deteriorated portion, not the total replacement value, of all the reserve components. The fully funded balance for each reserve component is calculated by multiplying the current replacement cost of the reserve component by its effective age, then dividing the result by the reserve component's useful life. The sum total of all reserve components' fully funded balances is the association's fully funded balance.

(10) "Governing documents" means the articles of incorporation, bylaws, plat, declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions, rules and regulations of the association, or other written instrument by which the association has the authority to exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter or to manage, maintain, or otherwise affect the property under its jurisdiction.

(11) "Homeowners' association" or "association" means a corporation, unincorporated association, or other legal entity, each member of which is an owner of residential real property located within the association's jurisdiction, as described in the governing documents, and by virtue of membership or ownership of property is obligated to pay real property taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance costs, or for improvement of real property other than that which is owned by the member. "Homeowners' association" does not mean an association created under chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW.

(12) "Lot" means a physical portion of the real property located within an association's jurisdiction designated for separate ownership.

(13) "Owner" means the owner of a lot, but does not include a person who has an interest in a lot solely as security for an obligation. "Owner" also means the vendee, not the vendor, of a lot under a real estate contract.

(14) "Remaining useful life" means the estimated time, in years, before a reserve component will require major maintenance, repair, or replacement to perform its intended function.

(15) "Replacement cost" means the current cost of replacing, repairing, or restoring a reserve component to its original functional condition.

(16) "Reserve component" means a common element whose cost of maintenance, repair, or replacement is infrequent, significant, and impractical to include in an annual budget.

(17) "Reserve study professional" means an independent person who is suitably qualified by knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education to prepare a reserve study in accordance with RCW ((64.34.380))64.38.065 and ((64.34.382))64.38.070.

(18) "Residential real property" means any real property, the use of which is limited by law, covenant or otherwise to primarily residential or recreational purposes.

(19) "Significant assets" means that the current replacement value of the major reserve components is seventy-five percent or more of the gross budget of the association, excluding the association's reserve account funds.

(20) "Useful life" means the estimated time, between years, that major maintenance, repair, or replacement is estimated to occur.

(21) "Electronic transmission" or "electronically transmitted" means any electronic communication not directly involving the physical transfer of a writing in a tangible medium, but that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by the sender and the recipient of the communication, and that may be directly reproduced in a tangible medium by a sender and recipient.

(22) "Tangible medium" means a writing, copy of a writing, facsimile, or a physical reproduction, each on paper or on other tangible material.

Sec. 10. RCW 64.38.035 and 2014 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A meeting of the association must be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the association may be called by the president, a majority of the board of directors, or by owners having ten percent of the votes in the association. The association must make available to each owner of record for examination and copying minutes from the previous association meeting not more than sixty days after the meeting. Minutes of the previous association meeting must be approved at the next association meeting in accordance with the association's governing documents.

(2) Not less than fourteen nor more than ((sixty))fifty days in advance of any meeting of the association, the secretary or other officers specified in the bylaws shall ((provide written))cause notice of the meeting to be provided to each owner ((of record by:

(a) Hand-delivery to the mailing address of the owner or other address designated in writing by the owner;

(b) Prepaid first-class United States mail to the mailing address of the owner or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the owner; or

(c) Electronic transmission to an address, location, or system designated in writing by the owner. Notice to owners by an electronic transmission complies with this section only with respect to those owners who have delivered to the secretary or other officers specified in the bylaws a written record consenting to receive electronically transmitted notices. An owner who has consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may revoke the consent at any time by delivering a written record of the revocation to the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws. Consent is deemed revoked if the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws is unable to electronically transmit two consecutive notices given in accordance with the consent))in accordance with this chapter.

(3) The notice of any meeting shall state the time and place of the meeting and the business to be placed on the agenda by the board of directors for a vote by the owners, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation, bylaws, any budget or changes in the previously approved budget that result in a change in assessment obligation, and any proposal to remove a director.

(4) Except as provided in this subsection, all meetings of the board of directors shall be open for observation by all owners of record and their authorized agents. The board of directors shall keep minutes of all actions taken by the board, which shall be available to all owners. Upon the affirmative vote in open meeting to assemble in closed session, the board of directors may convene in closed executive session to consider personnel matters; consult with legal counsel or consider communications with legal counsel; and discuss likely or pending litigation, matters involving possible violations of the governing documents of the association, and matters involving the possible liability of an owner to the association. The motion shall state specifically the purpose for the closed session. Reference to the motion and the stated purpose for the closed session shall be included in the minutes. The board of directors shall restrict the consideration of matters during the closed portions of meetings only to those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion. No motion, or other action adopted, passed, or agreed to in closed session may become effective unless the board of directors, following the closed session, reconvenes in open meeting and votes in the open meeting on such motion, or other action which is reasonably identified. The requirements of this subsection shall not require the disclosure of information in violation of law or which is otherwise exempt from disclosure.

(5) Except as otherwise restricted by the governing documents, meetings of the association may be conducted by telephonic, video, or other conferencing process, if: (a) The meeting notice states the conferencing process to be used and provides information explaining how owners may participate in the conference directly or by meeting at a central location or conference connection; and (b) the process provides all owners the opportunity to hear or perceive the discussion and to comment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision in the governing documents, notice to the association of apartment owners, board, or any apartment owner or occupant of an apartment under this chapter shall be in writing and shall be provided to the recipient by personal delivery, public or private mail or delivery service, or by electronic transmission as provided in this section: PROVIDED, That if this chapter requires different or additional notice requirements for particular circumstances, those requirements shall apply.

(2) Notice in a tangible medium shall be provided as follows:

(a) Notice to the association or board shall be addressed to the association's registered agent at its registered office, to the association at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report, or to an address provided by the association to the apartment owners.

(b) Notice to a lot owner or occupant shall be addressed to the lot address unless the owner has requested, in a writing delivered to the association, that notices be sent to an alternate address.

(3) Notice in an electronic transmission shall be provided as follows:

(a) Notice to the association, the board, or lot owners by electronic transmission is effective only upon those who have consented, in writing, to receive electronically transmitted notices under this chapter and have designated the address, location, or system to which such notices may be electronically transmitted, provided that such notice otherwise complies with any other requirements of this chapter and applicable law.

(b) Notice under this subsection includes any materials that accompany the notice.

(c) Owners who have consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may revoke this consent by delivering a revocation to the association in writing.

(d) The consent of any lot owner is revoked if the association is unable to electronically transmit two consecutive notices and this inability becomes known to the secretary of the association of apartment owners or any other person responsible for giving the notice. The inadvertent failure by the association of apartment owners to treat this inability as a revocation does not invalidate any meeting or other action.

(e) Notice to lot owners who have consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may be provided by posting the notice on an electronic network and delivering to the owner separate notice of the posting, together with comprehensible instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network.

(4) Notice is effective as follows:

(a) Notice provided in a tangible medium is effective as of the date of hand delivery, deposit with the carrier, or when sent by fax.

(b) Notice provided in an electronic transmission is effective as of the date it:

(i) Is electronically transmitted to an address, location, or system designated by the recipient for that purpose; or

(ii) Has been posted on an electronic network and separate notice of the posting has been sent to the recipient containing instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network.

(5) The ineffectiveness of a good faith effort to deliver notice by an authorized means does not invalidate action taken at or without a meeting.

(6) This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Owners may vote at a meeting in person, by absentee ballot pursuant to subsection (3)(d) of this section, or by a proxy pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

(2) When a vote is conducted without a meeting, owners may vote by ballot pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

(3) At a meeting of owners the following requirements apply:

(a) Owners or their proxies who are present in person may vote by voice vote, show of hands, standing, written ballot, or any other method for determining the votes of owners, as designated by the person presiding at the meeting.

(b) If only one of several owners of a lot is present, that lot owner is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that lot. If more than one of the lot owners are present, the votes allocated to that lot may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the lot owners, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is a majority agreement if any one of the lot owners casts the votes allocated to the lot without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other lot owners of the lot.

(c) Unless a greater number or fraction of the votes in the association is required under this chapter or the declaration or organizational documents, a majority of the votes cast determines the outcome of any action of the association.

(d) Whenever proposals or board members are to be voted upon at a meeting, an owner may vote by duly executed absentee ballot if:

(i) The name of each candidate and the text of each proposal to be voted upon are set forth in a writing accompanying or contained in the notice of meeting; and

(ii) A ballot is provided by the association for such purpose.

(4) When an owner votes by absentee ballot, the association must be able to verify that the ballot is cast by the owner having the right to do so.

(5) Except as provided otherwise in the declaration or organizational documents, the following requirements apply with respect to proxy voting:

(a) Votes allocated to a lot may be cast pursuant to a directed or undirected proxy duly executed by a lot owner in the same manner as provided in RCW 24.06.110.

(b) If a lot is owned by more than one person, each lot owner of the lot may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other lot owners of the lot through a duly executed proxy.

(c) An owner may revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section only by actual notice of revocation to the secretary or the person presiding over a meeting of the association or by delivery of a subsequent proxy. The death or disability of an owner does not revoke a proxy given by the owner unless the person presiding over the meeting has actual notice of the death or disability.

(d) A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice.

(e) Unless stated otherwise in the proxy, a proxy terminates eleven months after its date of issuance.

(6) Unless prohibited or limited by the declaration or organizational documents, an association may conduct a vote without a meeting. In that event, the following requirements apply:

(a) The association must notify the owners that the vote will be taken by ballot.

(b) The notice must state:

(i) The time and date by which a ballot must be delivered to the association to be counted, which may not be fewer than fourteen days after the date of the notice, and which deadline may be extended in accordance with (g) of this subsection;

(ii) The percent of votes necessary to meet the quorum requirements;

(iii) The percent of votes necessary to approve each matter other than election of board members; and

(iv) The time, date, and manner by which owners wishing to deliver information to all owners regarding the subject of the vote may do so.

(c) The association must deliver a ballot to every owner with the notice.

(d) The ballot must set forth each proposed action and provide an opportunity to vote for or against the action.

(e) A ballot cast pursuant to this section may be revoked only by actual notice to the association of revocation. The death or disability of an owner does not revoke a ballot unless the association has actual notice of the death or disability prior to the date set forth in (b)(i) of this subsection.

(f) Approval by ballot pursuant to this subsection is valid only if the number of votes cast by ballot equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action.

(g) If the association does not receive a sufficient number of votes to constitute a quorum or to approve the proposal by the date and time established for return of ballots, the board may extend the deadline for a reasonable period not to exceed eleven months upon further notice to all members in accordance with (b) of this subsection. In that event, all votes previously cast on the proposal must be counted unless subsequently revoked as provided in this section.

(h) A ballot or revocation is not effective until received by the association.

(i) The association must give notice to owners of any action taken pursuant to this subsection within a reasonable time after the action is taken.

(j) When an action is taken pursuant to this subsection, a record of the action, including the ballots or a report of the persons appointed to tabulate such ballots, must be kept with the minutes of meetings of the association.

(7) If the governing documents require that votes on specified matters affecting the common interest community be cast by lessees rather than owners of leased lots:

(a) This section applies to lessees as if they were owners;

(b) Owners that have leased their lots to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and

(c) Lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were owners.

(8) Owners must also be given notice, in the manner provided in section 11 of this act, of all meetings at which lessees may be entitled to vote.

(9) In any vote of the lot owners, votes allocated to a lot owned by the association must be cast in the same proportion as the votes cast on the matter by lot owners other than the association.

Sec. 13. RCW 64.90.445 and 2019 c 238 s 210 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following requirements apply to unit owner meetings:

(a) A meeting of the association must be held at least once each year. Failure to hold an annual meeting does not cause a forfeiture or give cause for dissolution of the association and does not affect otherwise valid association acts.

(b)(i) An association must hold a special meeting of unit owners to address any matter affecting the common interest community or the association if its president, a majority of the board, or unit owners having at least twenty percent, or any lower percentage specified in the organizational documents, of the votes in the association request that the secretary call the meeting.

(ii) If the association does not provide notice to unit owners of a special meeting within thirty days after the requisite number or percentage of unit owners request the secretary to do so, the requesting members may directly provide notice to all the unit owners of the meeting. Only matters described in the meeting notice required in (c) of this subsection may be considered at a special meeting.

(c) An association must provide notice to unit owners of the time, date, and place of each annual and special unit owners meeting not less than fourteen days and not more than fifty days before the meeting date. Notice may be by any means described in RCW 64.90.515. The notice of any meeting must state the time, date, and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including:

(i) The text of any proposed amendment to the declaration or organizational documents;

(ii) Any changes in the previously approved budget that result in a change in the assessment obligations; and

(iii) Any proposal to remove a board member or officer.

(d) The minimum time to provide notice required in (c) of this subsection may be reduced or waived for a meeting called to deal with an emergency.

(e) Unit owners must be given a reasonable opportunity at any meeting to comment regarding any matter affecting the common interest community or the association.

(f) ((The))Except as otherwise restricted by the declaration or organizational documents ((may allow for)), meetings of unit owners ((to))may be conducted by telephonic, video, or other conferencing process, if the process is consistent with subsection (2)(i) of this section.

(2) The following requirements apply to meetings of the board and committees authorized to act for the board:

(a) Meetings must be open to the unit owners except during executive sessions, but the board may expel or prohibit attendance by any person who, after warning by the chair of the meeting, disrupts the meeting. The board and those committees may hold an executive session only during a regular or special meeting of the board or a committee. A final vote or action may not be taken during an executive session.

(b) An executive session may be held only to:

(i) Consult with the association's attorney concerning legal matters;

(ii) Discuss existing or potential litigation or mediation, arbitration, or administrative proceedings;

(iii) Discuss labor or personnel matters;

(iv) Discuss contracts, leases, and other commercial transactions to purchase or provide goods or services currently being negotiated, including the review of bids or proposals, if premature general knowledge of those matters would place the association at a disadvantage; or

(v) Prevent public knowledge of the matter to be discussed if the board or committee determines that public knowledge would violate the privacy of any person.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, a gathering of members of the board or committees at which the board or committee members do not conduct association business is not a meeting of the board or committee. Board members and committee members may not use incidental or social gatherings to evade the open meeting requirements of this subsection.

(d) During the period of declarant control, the board must meet at least four times a year. At least one of those meetings must be held at the common interest community or at a place convenient to the community. After the transition meeting, all board meetings must be at the common interest community or at a place convenient to the common interest community unless the unit owners amend the bylaws to vary the location of those meetings.

(e) At each board meeting, the board must provide a reasonable opportunity for unit owners to comment regarding matters affecting the common interest community and the association.

(f) Unless the meeting is included in a schedule given to the unit owners or the meeting is called to deal with an emergency, the secretary or other officer specified in the organizational documents must provide notice of each board meeting to each board member and to the unit owners. The notice must be given at least fourteen days before the meeting and must state the time, date, place, and agenda of the meeting.

(g) If any materials are distributed to the board before the meeting, the board must make copies of those materials reasonably available to the unit owners, except that the board need not make available copies of unapproved minutes or materials that are to be considered in executive session.

(h) Unless the organizational documents provide otherwise, fewer than all board members may participate in a regular or special meeting by or conduct a meeting through the use of any means of communication by which all board members participating can hear each other during the meeting. A board member participating in a meeting by these means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

(i) Unless the organizational documents provide otherwise, the board may meet by participation of all board members by telephonic, video, or other conferencing process if:

(i) The meeting notice states the conferencing process to be used and provides information explaining how unit owners may participate in the conference directly or by meeting at a central location or conference connection; and

(ii) The process provides all unit owners the opportunity to hear or perceive the discussion and to comment as provided in (e) of this subsection.

(j) After the transition meeting, unit owners may amend the organizational documents to vary the procedures for meetings described in (i) of this subsection.

(k) Instead of meeting, the board may act by unanimous consent as documented in a record by all its members. Actions taken by unanimous consent must be kept as a record of the association with the meeting minutes. After the transition meeting, the board may act by unanimous consent only to undertake ministerial actions, actions subject to ratification by the unit owners, or to implement actions previously taken at a meeting of the board.

(l) A board member who is present at a board meeting at which any action is taken is presumed to have assented to the action taken unless the board member's dissent or abstention to such action is lodged with the person acting as the secretary of the meeting before adjournment of the meeting or provided in a record to the secretary of the association immediately after adjournment of the meeting. The right to dissent or abstain does not apply to a board member who voted in favor of such action at the meeting.

(m) A board member may not vote by proxy or absentee ballot.

(n) Even if an action by the board is not in compliance with this section, it is valid unless set aside by a court. A challenge to the validity of an action of the board for failure to comply with this section may not be brought more than ninety days after the minutes of the board of the meeting at which the action was taken are approved or the record of that action is distributed to unit owners, whichever is later.

(3) Minutes of all unit owner meetings and board meetings, excluding executive sessions, must be maintained in a record. The decision on each matter voted upon at a board meeting or unit owner meeting must be recorded in the minutes.

--- END ---