BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.84.610 and 2003 c 111 s 2127 are each amended to read as follows:

A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who knowingly:

(1) Deceives any voter in recording his or her vote by providing incorrect or misleading recording information or by providing faulty election equipment or records; ((or))

(2) Records the vote of any voter in a manner other than as designated by the voter; or

(3) Misrepresents an unofficial ballot collection site or device as an official ballot drop box that has been established by the county auditor.

Such a gross misdemeanor is punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

--- END ---