BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that child care is a critically important service to the economic recovery and future of Washington state. The legislature acknowledges that access to child care is essential for Washington families to be able to return to work. The legislature therefore resolves to increase access to employment and to facilitate statewide economic recovery by ensuring that temporary federal unemployment benefits do not disrupt continuity of care for families seeking work.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.216.137 and 2011 c 4 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the working connections child care program, the department shall not count the twenty-five dollar increase paid as part of an individual's weekly benefit amount as provided in RCW 50.20.1202 when determining a consumer's income eligibility and copayment.

(2) For the working connections child care program, the department shall not count any of the following when determining a consumer's income eligibility and copayment:

(a) Federal pandemic unemployment compensation under 15 U.S.C. Sec. 9023(b)(1)(B) or any extension of those benefits;

(b) Federal benefits provided under the lost wages assistance program provided under the President of the United States' memoranda issued on August 8, 2020; or

(c) Similar federally funded programs as determined in rule adopted by the department in consultation with the employment security department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---