BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.400 and 2020 c 204 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((Any physical improvement to single-family dwellings upon real property, including constructing))Constructing an accessory dwelling unit((, whether attached to or within the single-family dwelling or)) as a detached unit on the same real property((,)) shall be exempt from taxation for the three assessment years subsequent to the completion of the improvement to the extent that the improvement represents ((thirty))30 percent or less of the value of the original structure. A taxpayer desiring to obtain the exemption granted by this section must file notice of his or her intention to construct the improvement prior to the improvement being made on forms prescribed by the department of revenue and furnished to the taxpayer by the county assessor: PROVIDED, That this exemption cannot be claimed more than once in a five-year period.

The department of revenue shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary and convenient to properly administer the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2022 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---