BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70A.200.170 and 2020 c 20 s 1078 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is the coordinating and administrative agency working with the departments of natural resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and recreation commission in developing a biennial budget request for funds for the various agencies' litter collection programs.

(2) Funds may be used to meet the needs of efficient and effective litter collection and illegal dumping programs identified by the various agencies. The department shall develop criteria for evaluating the effectiveness and efficiency of the waste reduction, litter control, and recycling programs being administered by the various agencies listed in RCW 70A.200.140, and shall distribute funds according to the effectiveness and efficiency of those programs, with a priority given to litter control along state highways. In addition, the department shall approve funding requests for efficient and effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling programs, provide funds, and monitor the results of all agency programs.

(3) All agencies are responsible for reporting information on their litter collection programs as requested by the department.

(4) The department shall contract with the department of transportation to schedule litter prevention messaging and coordination of litter emphasis patrols with the Washington state patrol. Additionally, the department of transportation may coordinate with the department to conduct litter pickup during scheduled maintenance closures as situations allow.

Sec. 2. RCW 70A.200.190 and 2020 c 20 s 1079 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall provide funding to local units of government to establish, conduct, and evaluate community restitution and other programs for waste reduction, litter and illegal dump cleanup, and recycling. Programs eligible for funding under this section shall include, but not be limited to, programs established pursuant to RCW 72.09.260.

(2) Funds may be offered for costs associated with community waste reduction, litter cleanup and prevention, and recycling activities. The funding program must be flexible, allowing local governments to use funds broadly to meet their needs to reduce waste, control litter and illegal dumping, and promote recycling. Local governments are required to contribute resources or in-kind services. The department shall evaluate funding requests from local government according to the same criteria as those developed in RCW 70A.200.170, provide funds according to the effectiveness and efficiency of local government litter control programs, and monitor the results of all local government programs under this section.

(3) Local governments may initiate and apply to the department for reimbursement of litter clean-up activities on state highway ramps located within the jurisdiction of the local government.

(4) Local governments shall report information as requested by the department in funding agreements entered into by the department and a local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act may be known and cited as the welcome to Washington act.

--- END ---