BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.36.170 and 2020 c 148 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may pay no more than fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year from the ((fish, wildlife, and conservation))limited fish and wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170(((3)))(1) for claims and assessment costs for injury or loss of livestock caused by wolves submitted under RCW 77.36.100.

(2) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the department may also accept and expend money from other sources to address injury or loss of livestock or other property caused by wolves consistent with the requirements on that source of funding.

(3) If any wildlife account expenditures authorized under subsection (1) of this section are unspent as of June 30th of a fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer the unspent amount to the wolf-livestock conflict account created in RCW 77.36.180.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2021.

--- END ---