BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.48.110 and 1995 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of defacing a ((state))public monument if he or she knowingly defaces a statue, monument, or memorial on the state capitol campus, or other ((state)) property owned by a public body.

(2) For purposes of this section, "public body" means the federal government and the state of Washington, its agencies, institutions, political subdivisions, and municipal and quasi-municipal corporations now or hereafter existing under the laws of the state of Washington.

(3) Defacing a ((state))public monument is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---