BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.25.310 and 2016 sp.s. c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created the Washington invasive species council to exist until June 30, ((2022))2032. Staff support to the council shall be provided by the recreation and conservation office and from the agencies represented on the council. For administrative purposes, the council shall be located within the office.

(2) The purpose of the council is to provide policy level direction, planning, and coordination for combating harmful invasive species throughout the state and preventing the introduction of others that may be potentially harmful.

(3) The council is a joint effort between local, tribal, state, and federal governments, as well as the private sector and nongovernmental interests. The purpose of the council is to foster cooperation, communication, and coordinated approaches that support local, state, and regional initiatives for the prevention and control of invasive species.

(4) For the purposes of this chapter, "invasive species" include nonnative organisms that cause economic or environmental harm and are capable of spreading to new areas of the state. "Invasive species" does not include domestic livestock, intentionally planted agronomic crops, or nonharmful exotic organisms.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2032.

--- END ---