BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

The office of the Washington state auditor is authorized to conduct an audit procedure and review at the conclusion of any deadly force investigation conducted pursuant to RCW 10.114.011 to determine whether the actions of the involved law enforcement agency, investigative body, and prosecutor's office are in compliance with all rules and procedures for the investigation and reporting of incidents involving the use of deadly force. Audit procedures under this section shall be conducted in cooperation and coordination with the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

Upon the request of the commission, the office of the Washington state auditor is authorized to conduct an audit procedure on any law enforcement agency to ensure the agency is in compliance with all laws, policies, and procedures governing the training and certification of peace officers employed by the agency. A copy of any completed audit must be sent to the commission, law enforcement agency, city or county council, county prosecutor, and relevant committees of the legislature.

--- END ---