BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2023, out of the several funds specified in this act.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Fiscal year 2022" or "FY 2022" means the period beginning July 1, 2021, and ending June 30, 2022.

(b) "Fiscal year 2023" or "FY 2023" means the period beginning July 1, 2022, and ending June 30, 2023.

(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose.

(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2023-2025 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.

(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2021, from the 2019-2021 biennial appropriations for each project.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

Division III Roof Replacement and Maintenance (30000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$235,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$262,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Library-Archives Building (30000033)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) The secretary of state must enter into a financial contract for up to $103,143,000.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,078,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,222,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

State Archives Minor Works Projects (30000042)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$471,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$102,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$573,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

WTBBL Security Improvements (30000043)

Washington State Library Operations Account—

Federal
. . . .
$510,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$510,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Archives Minor Works (30000044)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$8,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$1,523,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$32,378,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,901,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,302,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,997,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$9,299,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,101,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess..

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$1,492,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$78,508,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$80,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2015-17 Community Economic Revitalization Board Program (30000834)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ultra-Efficient Affordable Housing Demonstration (30000836)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,128,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,878,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6001, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,716,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$24,810,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$1,578,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$32,104,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$79,386,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$111,490,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Economic Opportunity Grants (30000873)

Rural Washington Loan Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,750,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (30000875)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,155,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,752,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,907,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building for the Arts Grant Program (30000877)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Construction Loans (30000878)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1019, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$38,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$39,220,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$77,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Plus Health Matchmaker Program (30000879)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1014, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,124,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,362,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$29,402,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$34,764,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,336,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$46,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000882)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6007, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$4,448,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,279,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$7,727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,273,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building Communities Fund Grant (30000883)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6002, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$43,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$87,441,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,441,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning Facility Grants (40000006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
$999,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,501,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Clinic Capacity Grants (40000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,534,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,534,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

PWAA Preconstruction and Emergency Loan Programs (40000009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$53,099,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$83,099,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Housing Trust Fund Program (40000036)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1003, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$22,388,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$116,348,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$138,736,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,014,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$173,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Board (40000038)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1020, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$61,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,778,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$93,578,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Building for the Arts Grant Program (40000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1032, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,436,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,036,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Community Economic Revitalization Board (40000040)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$18,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (40000041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1034, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,642,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Transition 4 (40000042)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,881,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$11,249,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$32,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$470,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Building Communities Fund Program (40000043)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1036, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,785,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Early Learning Facilities (40000044)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$29,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,520,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Weatherization (40000048)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1038, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,970,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,030,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants Program (40000049)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1023, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,362,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$138,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Rehabilitation Loan Program (40000052)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$4,986,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Behavioral Health Capacity Grants (40000114)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$90,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$36,151,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$126,151,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$90,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$73,011,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$163,011,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Washington Broadband Program (40000117)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$20,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,050,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Behavioral Rehabilitation Services Capacity Grants (40000124)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1044, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1065, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,947,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,369,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,994,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Broadband Infrastructure (91000943)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 298, Laws of 2018. The community economic revitalization board may continue to make grants and loans under this section until the end of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$3,450,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$6,600,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$10,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019 Local and Community Projects (91001157)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1017, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,530,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Library Capital Improvement Program (91001239)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1053, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,838,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Capacity Grants (91001306)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1056, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$675,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1058, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$97,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$997,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,622,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,619,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,133,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,133,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local & Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6009, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$117,919,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$128,919,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Disaster Emergency Response (92000377)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$24,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,785,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Seattle Vocational Institute (40000136)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,105,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$175,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,280,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (40000139)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.135.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Animals as Natural Therapy. . . .$33,000

Bainbridge Island Child Care Centers. . . .$200,000

Bellevue Boys & Girls Club. . . .$156,000

Boys & Girls Club of Lewis County. . . .$14,000

Boys & Girls Club of Spokane County. . . .$600,000

Coyote Central. . . .$455,000

MLK Family Arts Mentoring & Enrichment Community

Center. . . .$15,000

Multicultural Child and Family Hope Center. . . .$250,000

Northwest's Child. . . .$16,000

Plus Delta After School Studios. . . .$16,000

Seattle JazzED. . . .$1,837,000

Starfire Sports. . . .$35,000

Whitewater Aquatics Management. . . .$62,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,689,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,689,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Early Learning Facilities-School Districts Grant (40000140)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $4,719,000 of the early learning facilities development account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects in the following amounts:

Selah Robert Lince ELC and Kindergarten—Phase 2. . . .$856,000

Pasco School District Lakeview ELC. . . .$200,000

Bethel Early Learning Center. . . .$856,000

Walla Walla Center for Children and Families. . . .$56,000

Bellingham Integrating Early Learning into New

District Office. . . .$456,000

Evergreen Burton ECE Center: Expanding Access to

Quality Care. . . .$667,000

Mount Baker Early Childhood Expansion. . . .$434,000

Soap Lake Elementary School Conversion to Early

Learning Facility. . . .$856,000

Ridgefield ELC—Phase 2. . . .$339,000

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
$4,720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Early Learning Facilities (91001677)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $370,000 of the early learning facilities development account—state appropriation is provided solely for Petah Villages - Outdoor Preschool.

(2) $29,630,000 of the early learning facilities development account—state appropriation is provided solely for early learning facilities grants subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092 to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning facilities for eligible organizations.

(3) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(4) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556.

(5) The department must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.

(6) When prioritizing applications for projects pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the department must award priority points to applications from a rural county or from a county located east of the Cascade mountains.

(7) The department shall, in consultation with the department of children, youth, and families, prepare a report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature regarding the geographical diversity of early learning facilities grants. The report must be submitted by December 1, 2022, and must provide the following information:

(a) Geographical disbursement of school district early learning grants, early learning facilities grants to eligible organizations, and early learning loans or grants provided by a nongovernmental private-public partnership contracted by the department, including type of grant, size of award, number of early childhood education and assistance program or working connections child care program slots added, and any other information that the department deems relevant;

(b) Disbursement of early learning grants or loans to providers in rural and nonrural counties, including type of grant, size of award, number of early childhood education and assistance program or working connections child care program slots added, and any other information that the department deems relevant; and

(c) Disbursement of early learning grants or loans to providers by type of provider, including school district, child care center, licensed family home, or other, including type of grant, size of award, number of early childhood education and assistance program or working connections child care program slots added, and any other information that the department deems relevant.

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Public Works Assistance Account-Construction (40000141)

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$110,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$110,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Building Communities Fund Grant Program (40000142)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,000,000 of the appropriation provided in this section is provided solely for grants for technical assistance, including, but not limited to, predevelopment, capacity building, and community outreach, as provided for in RCW 43.63A.125(3).

(2) The department shall conduct a stakeholder process to identify process improvements or statutory changes that can facilitate access to the building community fund by nonprofit organizations, particularly those entities that have not frequently accessed state capital funds. The department shall report interim findings and recommendations from this process to the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(3) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.

(4) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(5) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Asian Pacific Cultural Center. . . .$1,539,000

Chief Seattle Club. . . .$1,407,000

Coastal Community Action Program. . . .$2,990,000

Community Youth Services. . . .$203,000

Eritrean Association in Greater Seattle. . . .$514,000

Ethiopian Community in Seattle. . . .$745,000

HealthPoint. . . .$3,029,000

Lewis County Seniors. . . .$300,000

NATIVE Project. . . .$1,438,000

Nisqually Indian Tribe. . . .$3,500,000

Rainier Valley Food Bank. . . .$770,000

Reliable Enterprises. . . .$21,000

Sauk-Suiattle Indian Tribe. . . .$175,000

Sea Mar Community Health. . . .$1,700,000

Sea Mar Community Health Centers. . . .$1,332,000

Seven Acres Foundation. . . .$2,500,000

Volunteers of America of Eastern Washington and

Northern Idaho. . . .$2,500,000

White Center Community Development Association. . . .$2,700,000

YouthCare. . . .$1,563,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$31,926,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,926,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Building for the Arts Grant Program (40000143)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Bainbridge Performing Arts. . . .$1,600,000

Bellevue Arts Museum Capital Improvements. . . .$243,000

Classical 98.1. . . .$814,000

Confederated Tribes of the Chehalis Reservation. . . .$1,600,000

Cornish College of the Arts. . . .$1,600,000

Hands On Children's Museum. . . .$1,600,000

Harlequin Productions. . . .$500,000

Imagine Children's Museum. . . .$31,000

Kirkland Arts Center. . . .$220,000

Mini Mart City Park. . . .$200,000

Museum of Northwest Art. . . .$500,000

Orcas Center. . . .$133,000

Path With Art. . . .$1,757,000

Pilchuck Glass School. . . .$135,000

Port Angeles Waterfront Center dba Field Arts &

Events Hall. . . .$2,000,000

Roxy Bremerton Foundation. . . .$269,000

Seattle Symphony Orchestra. . . .$418,000

Sequim City Band. . . .$250,000

Village Theatre's Francis J. Gaudette Theatre

Renovation Project. . . .$257,000

Village Theatre's New Technical Studio Warehouse

Project. . . .$409,000

Washington Center for the Performing Arts. . . .$1,464,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 CERB Capital Construction (40000144)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants for broadband infrastructure.

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Account—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Clean Energy V - Investing in Washington's Clean Energy (40000148)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burdens.

(2) The 2021 state energy strategy should guide the department in the design of programs under this section, using an equity and environmental justice lens for program structure and participation. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize projects that build upon Washington's existing strengths in communities, aerospace, maritime, information and communications technology (particularly data center infrastructure, artificial intelligence and machine learning), grid modernization, advanced materials, and decarbonizing the built environment.

(3) Subject to the availability of funds, the department must reconvene an advisory committee to support involvement of a broad range of stakeholders in the design and implementation of programs implemented under this section to encourage collaboration, leverage partners, and engage communities and organizations in improving the equitable distribution of benefits from the program.

(4) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring, and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(5)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(6) The requirements in subsections (4) and (5) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(7)(a) $11,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grid modernization grants for projects that: Advance community resilience, clean and renewable energy technologies and transmission and distribution control systems; support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources and sustainable microgrids; and support state decarbonization goals pursuant to the clean energy transformation act, including requirements placed upon retail electric utilities.

(b) Projects must be implemented by community organizations, local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state (retail electric utilities). Projects submitted by applicants other than retail electric utilities must demonstrate partnership with their load serving entity to apply. Priority must be given to:

(i) Projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burden; and

(ii) Projects that demonstrate partnerships between eligible applicants in applying for funding, including utilities, public and private sector research organizations, businesses, tribes, and nonprofit organizations.

(c) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, develop program guidelines that encourage smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding. Where suitable, this may include funding for projects consisting solely of planning, predesign and/or predevelopment activities.

(d) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(8)(a) $15,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies. These grants must be used to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies, focusing on areas that help develop technologies to meet the state's climate goals, offer opportunities for economic and job growth, and strengthen technology supply chains.

(b) The program may include, but is not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, recycling energy system components, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(9)(a) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of building electrification projects that advance the goals of the 2021 state energy strategy to demonstrate grid-enabled, high-efficiency, all electric buildings.

(b) The program may include, but is not limited to: Shifting from fossil fuels to high-efficiency electric heat pumps and other electric equipment, control systems that enable grid integration or demand control, and on-site renewable generation and efficiency measures that significantly reduce building energy loads.

(c) Preference must be given to projects based on total greenhouse gas emissions reductions, accelerating the path to zero-energy, or that demonstrate early adoption of grid integration technology.

(d) Program funding may be administered to entities also receiving incentives provided according to RCW 19.27A.220 for buildings covered by the state energy performance standard, RCW 19.27A.210.

(10)(a) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for maritime electrification grants, including grants to decarbonize the maritime sector through the electrification of ferries, vessels, ports, charging and refueling infrastructure and on-land cargo movement. Grants must support demonstrations of various maritime electrification projects and must encourage partnership efforts from applicants.

(b) Fuel can be electricity or hydrogen, where the latter must be either entirely renewably generated or demonstrate a net zero greenhouse gas emission profile.

(c) Projects must be implemented by local governments including, but not limited to, port authorities and county public works departments, state agencies, federally recognized tribal governments, nonprofits or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible parties may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding. The department must coordinate with other state agencies that have other electrification programs, in order to determine to optimally accomplish each agency's respective policy and program goals.

(11) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants that enhance the viability of dairy digester bioenergy projects through advanced resource recovery systems that produce renewable natural gas and value-added biofertilizers, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and improve soil health and air and water quality. Grants target digesters in rural communities across Washington and must include at least one project east of the Cascades and one project west of the Cascades. State agencies must promote and demonstrate the use of such recovered biofertilizers through state procurement and contracts.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$125,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Energy Retrofits for Public Buildings Grant Program (40000149)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the state efficiency and environmental performance for the following projects:

(1) $457,000 is provided solely for photovoltaic panels for the capitol campus childcare center; and

(2) $9,543,000 is provided solely for engineering, design and material to install appropriate submetering hardware and software that measures energy consumption at selected buildings on department of corrections, department of social and health services, and department of veterans affairs campuses.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$120,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Weatherization Plus Health (40000150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners in making sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support through training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings. This is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$50,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 PWB Broadband Infrastructure (40000152)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants, loans, state match, and administrative expenses related to implementation of the broadband program. Of the amount appropriated in this section:

(1) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for loans. Moneys attributable to appropriations of state bond proceeds may not be expended for loans to nongovernmental entities.

(2) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants.

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$120,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$160,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Housing Trust Fund Investment in Affordable Housing (40000153)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the appropriations in this section are provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve or benefit low-income and special needs populations in need of housing. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(a) $5,000,000 is provided solely for housing that serves people with developmental disabilities.

(b) $4,000,000 is provided solely for Bellwether Housing and Chief Seattle Club.

(c) $515,000 is provided solely for the Manette Affordable Housing Project in Bremerton.

(d) $412,000 is provided solely for OlyCAP Affordable Housing and Child Care in Port Townsend.

(e) $3,295,000 is provided solely for the Swinomish didgwalic Transitional Housing in Anacortes.

(f) $250,000 is provided solely for Habitat for Humanity Seattle-King County to build seven houses of affordable housing in North Bend.

(g) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively.

(i) The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property.

(ii) To allocate preservation funds, the department must review applications and evaluate projects based on the following criteria:

(A) The age of the property, with priority given to buildings that are more than 15 years old;

(B) The population served, with priority given to projects with at least 50 percent of the housing units being occupied by families and individuals at or below 50 percent area median income;

(C) The degree to which the applicant demonstrates that the improvements will result in a reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both;

(D) The potential for additional years added to the affordability period of the property; and

(E) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(2) $100,000 of the appropriations in this section is provided solely for the department of social and health services to complete a study of the community-based housing needs of adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities. The department of social and health services shall collaborate with appropriate stakeholders and the department in completing this study and the study shall:

(a) Estimate the number of adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are facing housing insecurity;

(b) Make recommendations for how to improve housing stability for adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are facing housing insecurity;

(c) Make recommendations for how to increase the capacity of developers to support increasing the supply of housing that meets the needs of the intellectual and developmental disabilities population; and

(d) Be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2022.

(3) The legislature finds that there are insufficient data sources to identify adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities facing housing insecurity in Washington state and that the absence of reliable data limits the ability for the legislature to make informed decisions that will improve the outcomes of these individuals. The legislature further finds that reliable, current information about the unmet housing needs of this population will position Washington state to leverage community-based partnerships and funding to establish greater housing choice and increased community integration of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$28,472,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$176,528,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$205,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$800,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,005,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000219)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 15-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) In awarding funding for projects under subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.

(5) $47,950,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed in this subsection (5) and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section:

(a) $3,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least two enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of patients discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $6,600,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for enhanced adult residential care facilities for long-term placements of patients with dementia discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least two facilities with secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) $700,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least one crisis triage and stabilization facility that is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(e) $8,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for two 16-bed crisis triage and stabilization facilities in the King county region, one within the city of Seattle and one in south King county, consistent with the settlement agreement in A.B, by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al., No. 15–35462, and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(f) $1,050,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least two mental health peer respite centers that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. No more than one mental health peer respite center should be funded in each of the nine regions;

(g) $18,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals, freestanding evaluation and treatment providers, or freestanding psychiatric hospitals to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on 90-day or 180-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the omnibus operating appropriations act for these purposes;

(h) $700,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs;

(i) $4,700,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and

(j) $700,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions. Consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues.

(6)(a) $14,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

Compass Health Broadway Behavioral Health Facility. . . .$14,000,000

(b) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, except that the following projects are not required to establish new capacity:

Sound Enhanced Services Facility. . . .$2,000,000

(c) $1,600,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

Astria Toppenish Hospital. . . .$1,600,000

(d) $2,750,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, except that the following projects are not required to establish new capacity and may use funding for feasibility studies, predesign, site analysis, and site preparation:

Three Rivers Behavioral Health. . . .$2,750,000

(7) The department must notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(8) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(9) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated within subsection (5) of this section in the manner prescribed. However, if upon review of applications, the department determines, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category of projects under subsection (5) of this section, the department may allocate funds to other behavioral health capacity project categories within subsection (5) of this section, prioritizing projects under subsections (5)(a), (g), and (i) of this section. Underserved areas of the state may also be considered.

(10) The department must provide a progress report by November 1, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date; and

(c) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date that the facility began providing services.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$68,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$120,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$188,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000222)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue competitive financial assistance to eligible organizations under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire real property for a quick conversion into homeless or emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, or transitional housing for low-income people. Amounts provided in this section may be also used for renovation and building update costs associated with establishment of the acquired facilities. The department may only approve funding for projects resulting in increased shelter or housing capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating or maintenance costs associated with providing housing, supportive services, or debt service.

(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must follow the guidelines and compliance requirements in the housing trust fund program, including provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant, during which time the property must be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant. The criteria must include:

(a) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(b) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with the acquisition and any updates or improvements necessary to make the property habitable for its intended use;

(c) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds or units; and

(d) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the property and support its intended tenants throughout the end of the grant contract.

(3) The department must provide a progress report on its website by November 1, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, housing units, and anticipated completion date.

(4) The funding is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.

(5) If the department receives simultaneous applications for funding under this program, proposals that reach the greatest public benefit, as defined by the department, must be prioritized. For purposes of this subsection, "greatest public benefit" includes, but is not limited to:

(a) The greatest number of beds or units that will benefit low-income people;

(b) Whether the project has federally funded rental assistance tied to it;

(c) The scarcity of the affordable housing applied for compared to the number of available affordable housing units in the same geographic location; and

(d) The program's established funding priorities under RCW 43.185.070(5).

(6) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Tacoma Housing Authority affordable housing acquisition.

(7) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Keiro nursing home requisition.

(8) Funds may be used for permanent financing for real estate acquired using other short term acquisition sources. To expand availability of permanent housing, financing of acquisition of unoccupied multifamily housing is a priority. Funds shall also be provided specifically for the city of Seattle to move people experiencing unsheltered homelessness into safe spaces, including, but not limited to, tiny homes, hotels, enhanced emergency shelters, or other rapid housing alternatives. The department of commerce shall dispense funds to the city of Seattle and other qualifying applicants within 30 days of receipt of documentation from the applicant for qualifying uses and execution of any necessary contracts with the department.

State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$90,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$90,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Rural Rehabilitation Loan Program (40000223)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Landlord Mitigation Account (40000224)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section must be deposited in the landlord mitigation program account.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Local & Community Projects (40000230)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 05-05 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8)(a) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Adams County Property/Evidence Processing Facility

(Othello). . . .$900,000

Amara 29 Acre Opportunity in Pierce County

(Tacoma). . . .$246,000

American Lake Park ADA Improvement Project

(Lakewood). . . .$258,000

American Legion Post 150 Housing and Resource

Center (Raymond). . . .$85,000

Arlington Innovation Center (Arlington). . . .$200,000

Ballinger Park - Hall Creek Restoration

(Mountlake Terrace). . . .$824,000

Bellevue Arts Museum - BAM The Next 20 Years

(Bellevue). . . .$250,000

Bellevue High School Automotive Dynamometer

Install (Bellevue). . . .$277,000

Bigelow House Museum Preservation Project

(Olympia). . . .$52,000

BIPOC Artist Installation at Kraken Training

Center (Seattle). . . .$155,000

Brewery Park at Tumwater Falls Visitor Center

(Tumwater). . . .$900,000

Camp Kilworth - YMCA Day Camp/Environmental Educ

(Federal Way). . . .$1,030,000

Capitol Theatre Curtains/Soft Goods Replacement

(Yakima). . . .$250,000

Central Stage Theatre of County Kitsap (Silverdale). . . .$964,000

Cheney "Purple Pipe" Project (Cheney). . . .$1,900,000

City of Carnation Community Multi-Use Project

Comm (Carnation). . . .$1,030,000

City of Fircrest Water Meter Replacement Phase 2

(Fircrest). . . .$171,000

City of Wenatchee Community Center (Wenatchee). . . .$1,900,000

Clemans View Park (Naches). . . .$442,000

Community Action Resource and Training Center

(Omak). . . .$400,000

Cornforth Campbell Demolition & Infrastructure

(Puyallup). . . .$330,000

Coulon North Water Walk Repair and Enhancement

(Renton). . . .$1,339,000

Craft Beverage Quality Assurance Lab &

Instrumentation (Tumwater). . . .$773,000

Criminal Justice Transparency Reform Package

(Coupeville). . . .$595,000

Critical Updates to Daybreak Star Indian Cultural

Cent (Seattle). . . .$1,900,000

Cross Park Trail and Picnic Shelter (Tacoma). . . .$206,000

CSML Food Bank Facility (Moses Lake). . . .$1,900,000

Curran House Museum (University Place). . . .$85,000

Dawson Place Facilities (Everett). . . .$258,000

Day/Night House Exhibit Rebuild - Design Phase

(Seattle). . . .$300,000

Delridge Wetland Park (Seattle). . . .$244,000

Dental Care at Family First Community Center

(Renton). . . .$309,000

Early Learning Facility Project for Licensed

Childcare (Hoquiam). . . .$721,000

East County Family Resource Center Maintenance

(Washougal). . . .$450,000

Edmonds Marsh Restoration (Edmonds). . . .$258,000

Esther's Home (Pasco). . . .$1,000,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Housing (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Expansion of Madrona Day Treatment School

(Bremerton). . . .$321,000

Felts Field Gateway Project (Spokane). . . .$400,000

Ferry County Airport Runway Lighting System

(Republic). . . .$450,000

Food and Farming Center (Snohomish County). . . .$1,500,000

Fourth Plain Community Commons - Phase II

(Vancouver). . . .$1,236,000

Frontier Park - Goat Barn Roof (Graham). . . .$89,000

Frontier Park - Horse Arena Cover (Graham). . . .$1,811,000

Garfield Pool Upgrade (Garfield). . . .$500,000

Gas Station Park Improvements (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Gig Harbor Peninsula FISH New Facility

Construction (Gig Harbor). . . .$600,000

Granger Historical Society Museum (Granger). . . .$300,000

Green Lake Community Boathouse (Seattle). . . .$100,000

Grounds Improvement Proposal (Ritzville). . . .$150,000

HealthPoint Auburn Dental Expansion (Auburn). . . .$515,000

Index Phased Water Line Replacement (Index). . . .$1,215,000

Int'l Comm Health Services - Medical &

Dental Clinic (Bellevue). . . .$97,000

Issaquah Food and Clothing Bank (Issaquah). . . .$1,030,000

Joya Child & Family Development Center

(Spokane). . . .$1,200,000

La Center City Hall Consolidation and

Tenant Improvements (La Center). . . .$1,200,000

Lake Sacajawea Renovation Project (Longview). . . .$900,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center Phase 3

(Lake Stevens). . . .$2,100,000

Lakefront Property Acquisition (Lake

Forest Park). . . .$432,000

LGBTQ-Affirming Senior Center (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

Longview Hospice Care Center Renovation

(Longview). . . .$765,000

Lynnwood Neighborhood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$500,000

Magnuson Park Historic Hanger 2 Renovation

(Seattle). . . .$1,130,000

Main Street Phase 2 (Mountlake Terrace). . . .$1,200,000

Mariner Community Campus (Everett). . . .$1,670,000

Martin Luther King Center Improvements

(Pasco). . . .$1,000,000

Miller Park (Yakima). . . .$625,000

MLK Community Center Roof Replacement

(Spokane). . . .$1,380,000

Monroe ECEAP Facility Construction (Monroe). . . .$350,000

Mountain Rescue Center (North Bend). . . .$222,000

NE 92nd Avenue Pump Station & Force Main

(Battle Ground). . . .$1,900,000

Nelson Dam Removal Project (Naches). . . .$1,325,000

New Ground Kirkland (Kirkland). . . .$258,000

Non-Motorized Improvements on NE 131st

Way/90th Ave (Kirkland). . . .$515,000

North Bend Depot Rehabilitation (North Bend). . . .$151,000

North Creek Trail Section 4 Phase 2 (Bothell). . . .$618,000

Northwest Kidney Centers Port Angeles Clinic

(Port Angeles). . . .$900,000

Panther Lake Community Park (Kent). . . .$650,000

Perry Technical Institute Auditorium Renovation

(Yakima). . . .$550,000

Peter Kirk Community Center Roof and Retrofitted

Emerg (Kirkland). . . .$773,000

Phase 1 Master Plan - COVID Mitigation

(Lake Stevens). . . .$103,000

Phase 1 of Trails Plan Improvements (Issaquah). . . .$251,000

Planning & Upgrades Edmonds Boys & Girls Club

(Edmonds). . . .$200,000

Police Station Renovations - City of Duvall

(Duvall). . . .$107,000

Port of Vancouver Waterfront T1 Building

Demo/Deconst (Vancouver). . . .$1,000,000

Project Chairlift: Lifting Up Washington

State Chair 1 (Mead). . . .$750,000

Public Pavilion for Shoreline Park (Shoreline). . . .$361,000

Puyallup Valley Cultural Heritage Center

(Puyallup). . . .$272,000

Ramstead Regional Park (Everson). . . .$1,500,000

Redmond Senior and Community Center (Redmond). . . .$1,250,000

Redondo Fishing Pier (Des Moines). . . .$900,000

Replacement Hospice House (Richland). . . .$900,000

Ridgefield YMCA (Ridgefield). . . .$250,000

Ridgetop DNR Trust Land Property Purchase

(Silverdale). . . .$2,050,000

Ritzville Downtown Improvements (Ritzville). . . .$105,000

Seattle Aquarium - Ocean Pavilion Project

(Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Selah-Moxee Irrigation District (Moxee). . . .$300,000

Seminary Hill Natural Area Accessible Trail

Project (Centralia). . . .$50,000

Sheffield Trail (Fife). . . .$999,000

Silver Crest Park Upgrade (Mill Creek). . . .$90,000

Skabob House Cultural Center Art Studio

(Skokomish). . . .$500,000

Skagit County Morgue (Mt. Vernon). . . .$135,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Activity Ctr: Phase 2

Work (North Bend). . . .$361,000

SoCo Park (Covington). . . .$650,000

South Kitsap Community Events Center

(Port Orchard). . . .$1,236,000

Southwest WA Grain Project and Rail Transload

Facility (Chehalis). . . .$250,000

Spokane Valley Fairgrounds Exhibition Center

(Spokane Valley). . . .$750,000

Sprinker Recreation Center Outdoor Improvements

(Tacoma). . . .$400,000

Squire's Landing Park Waterfront & Open Space

Access Pr (Kenmore). . . .$927,000

The Campaign for Wesley Des Moines (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

The Eli's Park Project (Seattle). . . .$900,000

The Landing (Redmond). . . .$258,000

Together Center Redevelopment (Redmond). . . .$1,030,000

Trails End Community Meeting Space (Tumwater). . . .$155,000

Turf Field Lighting (Yakima). . . .$500,000

United Way of King County Building Restoration

(Seattle). . . .$566,000

Vader Wastewater Treatment Plant Improvements

(Vader). . . .$1,000,000

Wards Lake Park Improvement Project - Phase 1

(Lakewood). . . .$258,000

Water Conservation System (Othello). . . .$500,000

Water Loan Relief (Malden). . . .$239,000

Well 1 Water Main Rehabilitation (Shelton). . . .$1,400,000

Wenas Creek Screening, Passage Engineering

Design (Selah). . . .$150,000

Whatcom County Integrated Public Safety Radio

System (Bellingham). . . .$400,000

White Center Food Bank Relocation (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

Woodland Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex

(Woodland). . . .$600,000

Yakima Valley Fair and Rodeo (Grandview). . . .$235,000

(b) The funding for the Magnuson Park Historic Hanger 2 Renovation (Seattle) is contingent on the contribution of at least $6,000,000 for the Magnuson Park Center For Excellence. If the Magnuson Park Center For Excellence has not certified to the department of commerce that the project has secured at least $6,000,000 in total funding for the capital phase of the project by July 31, 2022, the funds in this subsection shall lapse. The lapse date of July 31, 2022, must be extended to the same extent that the city of Seattle grants an extension, if any, beyond that date for the same project, provided that no further extension may be granted past July 31, 2023. The Magnuson Park Center For Excellence must ensure that the long-term lease with Seattle Parks and Recreation stipulates meaningful public benefits that prioritize low-income, black, indigenous, and people of color youth and families of the Magnuson park and neighborhood. The lease must include provisions to proactively recruit and provide no-cost access to the residents as well as the creation of a scholarship fund dedicated to the residents for the center's events and programming. Additional public benefits to improve accessibility for Magnuson Park residents must be considered in the lease negotiations.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$88,443,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$88,443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021 Local and Community Projects (40000130)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1013, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,717,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,253,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,970,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rapid Response Community Preservation Pilot Program (91001278)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,518,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$482,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Port Hadlock Wastewater Facility Project (91001545)

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$522,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Hospital Preservation and Development Plan (91001544)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$48,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Broadband Office for Federal Match (92000953)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation is provided solely to the statewide broadband office to make investments that focus on unserved, rural areas of the state.

(2) The state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to the statewide broadband office to maximize opportunities to leverage federal funding. The statewide broadband office must develop a project evaluation process to assist in coordination among state broadband infrastructure funders to maximize opportunities to leverage federal funding and ensure efficient state investment in achieving the policy objectives of RCW 43.330.536. The project evaluation process must help standardize the assessment of proposed broadband projects so that the state funders, soon after a project is identified, can determine whether the project is a strong candidate for a known federal funding opportunity. The statewide broadband office must use the process to identify whether a project can be packaged as part of a regional or other coordinated federal grant proposal.

(3) The statewide broadband office, public works board, and community economic revitalization board are encouraged to enter into a memorandum of understanding outlining how coordination will take place so that the process can help with a coordinated funding strategy across these entities.

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Account—Federal
. . . .
$390,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$440,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$440,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Community Relief (92000957)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce to contract with the Communities of Concern Commission for development of a list of community-led capital projects that serve underserved communities. Eligible expenses include costs incurred by the Communities of Concern Commission in conducting outreach, developing an application process, providing technical assistance, and assisting project proponents with project readiness. The department must present the list prepared by the Communities of Concern Commission to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 15, 2022. It is the intent of the legislature to provide $2,500,000 in capital funding in the 2022 supplemental capital budget to fund projects identified in the list created by this subsection (1).

(2) $12,428,000 is provided solely for the following projects:

?al?al (means "home" in Lushootseed) (Seattle). . . .$900,000

Asberry Historic Home Site Acquisition (Tacoma). . . .$800,000

Be'er Sheva Park Improvements and Shoreline

Restoration (Seattle). . . .$300,000

Cham Community Center (CCC) (Seattle). . . .$515,000

Elevate Youngstown Capital Project (Seattle). . . .$515,000

Feast Collective Capital Request (Spokane). . . .$103,000

Feeding Change Campaign (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Khmer Community Center & Cultural Hub (Seattle). . . .$309,000

Neighborhood House Early Learning Facilities (Seattle). . . .$2,050,000

Shiloh Baptist Housing Development Project (Tacoma). . . .$2,100,000

Skyway Resource Center Renovation Project (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Wadajir Residences & Souq (Tukwila). . . .$1,339,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,831,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,331,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Community Dental Capacity Grants (91001660)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Dental Expansion for Maple Street Clinic (Spokane). . . .$297,000

NEW Health CHC Dental Expansion (Newport). . . .$1,970,000

Peninsula Community Health - Key Peninsula

Dental (Gig Harbor). . . .$490,000

Sea-Mar Kent Expansion (Kent). . . .$670,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,427,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,427,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Enhanced Shelter Capacity Grants (92000939)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1022, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,318,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,818,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Increasing Housing Inventory (92001122)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section must be deposited in the growth management planning and environmental review account to be used for the evaluation of transit oriented development.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Reimann Roads, Telecomm. and Utility Relocation (Pasco) (92001004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Child Care Minor Renovation Grants (92001109)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

$10,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to child care providers for minor renovations and small capital purchases and projects. The grants are intended to support child care providers so that they may maintain operations or expand operations during and after the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(1) The department shall collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to conduct outreach to licensed family homes to ensure they are made aware of the grant opportunity.

(2) The department shall give priority to projects that make minor renovations without adding capacity and are therefore ineligible for the early learning facilities program.

(3) All grants provided in this section must be awarded by September 30, 2022.

(4) Of the amounts provided in this section, no more than four percent may be retained by the department for administrative purposes.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1081. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to acquire land and rights of way along the Cowlitz river for the United States army corps of engineers to dredge. The land is necessary for dredged material deposit sites for the Mt. St. Helen's flood protection project.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1082. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to cover staffing costs of the facilities oversight team.

Thurston County Capital Facilities—State
. . . .
$2,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,769,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,440,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,819,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1083. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

OFM Capital Budget Staff (30000040)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to cover staffing costs of the capital budget team.

Thurston County Capital Facilities—State
. . . .
$1,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,469,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,260,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1084. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (30000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, a request letter for emergency funding signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The request must include a statement describing the health and safety hazard and impacts to facility operations, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project.

(2) For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management.

(3) The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding and include what funded level was approved.

(4) The office of financial management must report quarterly, beginning October 1, 2021, on the funding approved by agency and by emergency to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1085. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Fircrest School Land Use Assessment (92000035)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$211,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$289,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1086. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Coronavirus Capital Projects Pool (92001123)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for eligible coronavirus capital project expenditures to mitigate the fiscal effects stemming from the public health emergency caused by COVID-19.

(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for eligible capital projects according to and in compliance with the American recovery plan act. The office of financial management shall act as the authorized officer to make distributions from this pool. Projects that could be funded in the pool include, but are not limited to:

(a) Construction of the public health lab south laboratory addition, in the amount of $66,500,000;

(b) E-wing remodel to a molecular lab, in the amount of $14,200,000;

(c) Early learning facilities COVID-19 renovation grants, in the amount of $51,000,000;

(d) Temple of Justice HVAC, lighting, and water renovation, in the amount of $15,000,000; and

(e) Office of the superintendent of public instruction school HVAC project pool.

(3) Agencies must apply to the office of financial management to apply for funds from the coronavirus capital project pool. The total amount provided may not exceed the amount appropriated in this section.

(4)(a) The office of financial management shall create and publish, at least:

(i) A pool requirement submittal checklist;

(ii) Narrative and fiscal templates that agencies must complete and submit; and

(iii) A reference document that outlines how a project might be eligible for the American recovery plan act.

(b) Prior to applying, agencies must meet with the office of financial management to discuss the request to ensure it qualifies as an eligible project;

(c) Agencies requesting project funds must submit documents as required by the office of financial management;

(d) The office of financial management must notify the senate ways and means and the house capital committees of the legislature of the receipt of each application and may not approve a funding request for 10 business days after the date of notification; and

(e) The office of financial management must track the approved amounts by agency, the coronavirus capital projects account balance, and the amounts approved for each agency to legislative fiscal staff each quarter.

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
$189,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$189,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-Term Management Planning (30000740)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations and appropriation are subject to the provisions of section 1026, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$156,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,663,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,819,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,165,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,699,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Elevator Modernization (30000786)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1075, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for elevator modernization. The funding is to modernize one elevator, which must be selected and prioritized based on safety and security.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,102,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$989,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,391,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Physical Security & Safety Improvements (30000812)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $188,000 is provided solely for a duress alarm system on the capitol campus.

(2) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,462,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,482,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$710,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,654,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$604,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,446,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,416,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,586,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Facility Professional Services: Staffing (40000225)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for architectural and engineering services to manage public works contracting for all state facilities pursuant to RCW 43.19.450.

(2) At the end of each fiscal year, and by December 31 of each year, the department must report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature on performance, including the following:

(a) The number of projects managed by each manager by fiscal year;

(b) The number of projects managed by each manager compared to the prior fiscal year by the same manager;

(c) The number of project predesigns completed on time, reported by project, by fiscal year, by manager, and in total;

(d) The number of project designs completed on time, reported by project, by fiscal year, by manager, and in total;

(e) The number of project constructions completed on time, reported by project, by fiscal year, by manager, and in total;

(f) Projects that were not completed on schedule, how many months delayed they were, and the reasons for the delays;

(g) The number and cost of the change orders and the reason for each change order;

(h) The number of facility professional staff by classification assigned by project to include the budget, actual staffing used, and the number of vacancies by classification; and

(i) A list of the inter agency agreements executed with state agencies during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium to provide staff support to state agencies that is over and above the allocation provided in this section. The list must include the agency, the amount of dollars by fiscal year, and the rationale for the additional service.

(3) At least twice per year, the department shall convene a group of private sector architects, contractors, state agency facilities personnel, and legislative fiscal staff to share, at a minimum, information on high performance methods, ideas, operating and maintenance issues, and costs. The facilities personnel must be from the community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher education, and any other state agencies that have recently completed a new building or are currently in the design or construction phase.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$84,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$105,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Exterior Preservation Cleaning (40000033)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1083(1), chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,930,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

2019-21 Statewide Minor Works - Programmatic Projects (40000141)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$496,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

SEEP: EVSE at State Facilities (40000161)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for electric vehicle service equipment infrastructure on the capitol campus to accommodate charging station installation. The electric vehicle charging equipment works toward state efficiency and environmental performance and the department must prioritize locations to complete work by June 30, 2022.

(2) The department must report where the equipment was installed, by address, in fiscal year 2020, fiscal year 2021, and where it will be installed by fiscal year in 2021-2023, to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

Thurston County Capital Facilities—State
. . . .
$285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$215,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

21-31 Statewide Minor Works - Preservation (40000180)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$887,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,442,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Security & Safety Enhancements (40000226)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the security improvements of exterior door access control. The exterior doors must be prioritized based on safety and security. The department must keep senate and house security informed and must coordinate on plans and schedule with them for, at least, west capitol campus.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Campus Modernization (92000020)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 356, Laws of 2020. The reappropriations must be coded and tracked as discrete subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.

(a) $3,370,000 is provided solely for the Irv Newhouse building replacement subproject and is for design and construction of the Irv Newhouse building for the senate, located on opportunity site six. The department must:

(i) Start the procurement delivery contract selection by September 1, 2021;

(ii) Have design contract selection completed by October 1, 2021;

(iii) Start design validation by October 1, 2021; and

(iv) Start design by December 1, 2021.

(b) $6,530,000 is provided solely for the Pritchard subproject. The design must result in:

(i) High performance buildings that meet net-zero-ready energy standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than 35; and

(ii) Sufficient program space required to support legislative offices and support functions.

(2) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The new appropriations must be coded and tracked as discrete subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.

(a) $65,667,000 is provided solely for the Irv Newhouse building replacement subproject, on opportunity site six. The department must:

(i) Start design by December 1, 2021. The design must assume:

(A) Necessary program space required to support senate offices and support functions;

(B) A building façade similar to the American neoclassical style with a base, shaft, and capitol expression focus with some relief expressed in modern construction methods to include adding more detailing and depth to the exterior so that it will fit with existing legislative buildings on west capital campus, like the John Cherberg building;

(C) Member offices of similar size as member offices in the John A. Cherberg building;

(D) Design and construction of a high performance building that meets net-zero-ready energy standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than 35;

(E) Building construction that may be procured using a performance-based contracting method, such as design-build, and may include an energy performance guarantee comparing actual performance data with the energy design target;

(F) Demolition of the buildings, located on opportunity site six; and

(G) Consultation with the leadership of the senate, or their designee(s), at least every other month, effective July 1, 2021; and

(ii) Ensure the subproject meets legislative intent to complete design by April 30, 2023, and start construction by September 1, 2023.

(b) $11,585,000 is provided solely for the global legislative campus modernization subproject. This includes, but is not limited to, modular buildings lease or purchases and associated costs, site development on campus to include Columbia street, historic preservation, and stakeholder outreach.

(c) $2,008,000 is provided solely for the Pritchard subproject. The design must result in:

(i) High performance buildings that meet net-zero-ready energy standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than 35; and

(ii) Sufficient program space required to support legislative offices and support functions.

(3) The state capitol committee, in consultation with capitol campus design advisory committee, may review architectural design proposals for continuity with the 2006 master plan for the capitol of the state of Washington and 2009 west capitol campus historic landscape preservation and vegetation management plan. As part of planning efforts, the state capitol committee may conduct a review of current design criteria and standards.

(4) The Irv Newhouse building replacement and Pritchard building designs should include an analysis of comprehensive impacts to the campus and the surrounding neighborhood, an evaluation of future workforce projections, and an analysis of traffic impacts, parking needs, visual buffers, and campus aesthetics. The design should include a public engagement process including the capitol campus design advisory committee and state capitol committee.

(5) $180,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to conduct a preservation study. The department must conduct a preservation study of the Pritchard building as a continuation of the predesign in section . . . of this act. The study must include an analysis of seismic and geotechnical aspects, building codes, constructability, and costs associated with renovation and expansion of the Pritchard building to accommodate tenant space needs. The department shall contract with a third-party historic preservation specialist to ensure the study is in compliance with the secretary of the interior and any other applicable standards for historic rehabilitation. The study must include a public engagement process including the capitol campus design advisory committee and state capitol committee. The study is subject to review and approval by the state capitol committee by March 31, 2022, to inform the design of a renovation, expansion, or replacement of the Pritchard building.

(6) The department of enterprise services may sell by auction the Ayers and Carlyon houses, known as the press houses, separate and apart from the underlying land, subject to the following conditions:

(a) The purchaser, at its sole cost and expense, must remove the houses by December 31, 2021;

(b) The state is not responsible for any costs or expenses associated with the sale, removal or relocation of the buildings from opportunity site six; and

(c) Any sale proceeds must be deposited into the Thurston county capital facilities account.

(7) Implementation of subsections (3) through (6) of this section is not intended to delay the design and construction of any of the subprojects included in the legislative campus modernization project.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,900,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$67,885,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$11,585,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$79,440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$93,470,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$173,506,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Cleaning (92000028)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1091, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for exterior preservation cleaning and repair of the John A. Cherberg building.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$987,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$1,593,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$513,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,537,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Insurance Commissioner Office Building Predesign (92000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1092, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account—

State
. . . .
$14,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$286,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Temple of Justice HVAC, Lighting & Water Systems (92000040)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding is provided for design, which must start by August 31, 2021. To assist in funding this project, the department must apply for competitive grant funding made available through the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, in the coronavirus capital projects pool under section 1086 of this act;

(2) The final predesign must be submitted to the office of financial management by July 1, 2021; and

(3) The final energy services proposal must be submitted to the senate ways and means committee and the house capital budget committee prior to the department starting the design phase.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Joint Force Readiness Center: Replacement (30000591)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$43,485,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$43,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

King County Area Readiness Center (30000592)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely to acquire land in King county for a readiness center and to complete a predesign. The predesign must include identification of water supply mitigation that may be used to offset water supply impacts to the city of North Bend that would result from the water use of the future readiness center. If the department has not signed a purchase and sale agreement by June 30, 2023, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse. The department must work to secure federal funding to cover a portion of the costs for design and construction.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$107,555,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tactical Unmanned Aircraft System (TUAS) (30000596)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$14,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tri-Cities Readiness Center (30000808)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,200,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$13,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,464,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,164,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1105. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Kent Readiness Center (30000917)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,150,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$380,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1106. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Snohomish Readiness Center (30000930)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,562,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,188,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1107. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Anacortes Readiness Center Major Renovation (40000004)

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,551,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,551,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,102,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$75,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,252,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1108. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2019-21 Biennium (40000036)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,100,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,336,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,836,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1109. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2019-21 Biennium (40000037)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$20,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$109,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$22,309,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$691,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1110. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Soldiers Memorial Park (40000062)

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$56,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$556,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1111. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Stryker Canopies Kent Site (40000073)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1112. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Stryker Canopies Bremerton Site (40000077)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1113. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Montesano Field Maintenance Shop (FMS) Addition (40000095)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1114. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Field Maintenance Shop Addition-Sedro Woolley FMS (40000104)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,376,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1115. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 21-23 Biennium (40000185)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$13,113,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,365,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$17,478,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,478,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1116. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2021-23 Biennium (40000188)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$8,727,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,596,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1117. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg. 20 Roof Top Unit Upgrade (40000189)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,513,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1118. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg 47 and 48 Barracks Replacement (40000190)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,147,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,147,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1119. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg 65 Barracks Replacement (40000191)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,236,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,236,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1120. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Ephrata Field Maintenance Shop Addition (40000193)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,194,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1121. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

JBLM Non-Organizational (POV) Parking Expansion (40000196)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,245,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,245,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1122. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

YTC Dining Facility: Transient Training (40000197)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$486,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1123. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Rehabilitation of Beverly Bridge (30000022)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1111, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$429,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,740,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$5,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$406,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1124. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Historic County Courthouse Grants Program (30000023)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1112, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,035,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$84,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,119,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1125. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000024)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$383,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$62,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1126. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Historic Cemetery Grant Program (40000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$175,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1127. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Ebey's National Historic Reserve (40000003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1115, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$655,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$345,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1128. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

21-23 Heritage Barn Grants (40000005)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1129. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

21-23 Historic County Courthouse Rehabilitation Program (40000006)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,162,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,162,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1130. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

21-23 Historic Cemetery Grant Program (40000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,060,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,575,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Training Facility Capital and Functional Needs Assessment (91000002)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

L&I HQ Elevators (30000018)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$425,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$425,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,084,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,934,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects (30000035)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$1,075,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,072,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,147,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,483,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,842,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,472,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Modernize Lab and Training Facility (30000043)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2005, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$42,478,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$7,496,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$49,974,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,229,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$53,203,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Air Handler Retrofit and Cooling Tower Replacement (30000059)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$2,369,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$2,369,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,738,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,738,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2003, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,358,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,832,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center: Kitchen & Dining Room Upgrades (20081506)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$848,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$152,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Back-Up Power & Electrical Feeders (30000415)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,029,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: New Boiler Plant (30000468)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,032,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,297,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,575,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,110,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,685,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School - Multiple Buildings: Roofing Replacement & Repairs (30002752)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2005, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,908,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$722,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to further the recommendations of the December 2019 report from the William D. Ruckleshaus center to redesign the intermediate care facility of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center to function as short-term crisis stabilization and intervention. It is also the intent of the legislature to concentrate the footprint of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center on the northern portion of the property. As a result, $7,750,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for design of a 100-bed nursing facility in the northeast portion of the campus and $2,243,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to temporarily relocate the adult training program to a different location on the Fircrest Rehabilitation Center campus to facilitate construction of a 100-bed nursing facility.

(2) The department must repurpose one of the existing nursing facility buildings once residents have been relocated to the new nursing facility to be used as the permanent site of the adult training program until such time as the intermediate care facility has been redesigned to function as short-term crisis stabilization and intervention.

(3) The department must seek input from individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, including the residents at Fircrest and their families or guardians, in design of a nursing facility.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$242,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,235,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,057,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: New HVAC DDC Controls (30002759)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,227,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,173,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Forensic Services: Two Wards Addition (30002765)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,572,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,928,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Repairs & Upgrades (30003211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,234,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$36,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Water System Replacement (30003213)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$973,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: CLIP Capacity (30003324)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,064,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,880,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-King County SCTF: Expansion (30003564)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2010, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$227,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,383,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

State Psychiatric Hospitals: Compliance with Federal Requirements (30003569)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,678,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Master Plan Update (30003571)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2016, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$154,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$371,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Yakima Valley School-Multiple Buildings: Safety Improvements (30003573)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-Community Facilities: New Capacity (30003577)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department must consult with the communities that are potential sites for these facilities.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$388,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$112,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: New Security Fence (30003578)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$479,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,241,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Fire Suppression (30003579)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$895,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Elevator Modernization (30003582)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,821,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$279,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Windows Security (30003585)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$446,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,104,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$102,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$98,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Forensic Services: Roofing Replacement (30003603)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$487,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,468,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: Emergency Electrical System Upgrades (30003616)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$876,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,055,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$124,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Behavioral Health: Compliance with Systems Improvement Agreement (30003849)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,635,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Wards Renovations for Forensic Services (40000026)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,790,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000381)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,333,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,043,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$11,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,674,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000382)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$825,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,649,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,474,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$281,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,755,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DSHS & DCYF Fire Alarms (91000066)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions section 2009, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,777,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,042,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,819,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: New Forensic Hospital (91000067)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2040, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) The department must complete the design funded in this section in a manner that will consider ways to reduce costs associated with the construction of the new forensic hospital.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$51,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$998,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$560,163,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$612,163,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital Elevators (91000068)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$2,395,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$305,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Fire Doors Replacement (40000392)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,046,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$54,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Eastlake & Westlake: Fire & Smoke Controls (40000404)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,933,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$117,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: Fire Stops (40000405)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,991,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$139,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-Fire House: Electrical Upgrades (40000422)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,112,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$423,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-EL & WL: HVAC Compliance & Monitoring (40000492)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$99,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Activity Therapy Building: HVAC Upgrades (40000493)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane-Columbia Cottage: Behavioral Health Expansion (40000567)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide 2021-23 (40000569)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to complete a comprehensive review and plan of the water system on the Fircrest campus.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,755,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,010,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,765,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2021-23 (40000571)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,610,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,440,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$15,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$96,700,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$111,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide-Behavioral Health: Patient Safety Improvements 2021-23 (40000578)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,223,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,223,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 29: Roofing Replacement (40000589)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,285,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 27: Roofing Replacement (40000888)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH and WSH-All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,593,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$58,669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital & CSTC Power Upgrades (91000070)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,081,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$219,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Owned, Mixed Use Community Civil 48-Bed Capacity (91000074)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$168,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$182,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$55,274,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$55,624,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Operated Community Civil 16-Bed Capacity (91000075)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,131,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$869,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Owned, Mixed Use Community Civil 48-Bed Capacity (91000077)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2054, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,235,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$37,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,765,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$57,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School-Pats E,C Cottage Cooling Upgrades (91000078)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,362,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,638,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital Treatment & Recovery Center (91000080)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,464,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$536,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Community Nursing Care Homes (92000042)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to further the recommendations of the December 2019 report from the William D. Ruckleshaus center to redesign intermediate care facilities of the residential habilitation centers to function as short-term crisis stabilization and intervention by constructing smaller, nursing care homes in community settings to care for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(2) $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to complete a predesign of community nursing care homes to provide nursing facility level of care to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities. The predesign must include options for four or five individual facilities with a minimum of four beds in each and for an individual facility with a minimum of 30 beds.

(3) The department shall provide recommendations for where these community nursing care homes should be located geographically in the state and an analysis of the costs associated with operating these homes. The department shall submit a report of this information to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Residential Habilitation Center Land Management (92000044)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall hire one full-time employee with expertise in land management and development to manage the lands of the residential habilitation centers including, but not limited to, the long-term, revenue generating opportunities for underused portions of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center. It is the intent of the legislature that this position will maximize the earning potential of the lands to fund services for those with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Wing Addition (30000301)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,734,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$585,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

New Central Boiler Plant (30000381)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department must submit a preliminary predesign to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative committees by December 31, 2021. Appropriations for design and construction may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the department's predesign.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$540,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,265,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Construction Loans (30000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2034, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$69,609,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$87,609,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2035, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,858,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,858,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Othello Water Supply and Storage (40000008)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$965,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$585,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000025)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$31,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000027)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2068, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Small & Disadvantaged Communities DW (40000031)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$743,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$743,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Replace Air Handling Unit (AHU) in A/Q-wings (40000034)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,894,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,894,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (40000037)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Facility Program (40000038)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$467,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$467,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2021-23 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000049)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

(3) Of the amounts provided in this section, $5,736,000 must be granted to the Lakewood Water District to remove per and polyfluorinated alkyl substances from the Scotts Wellfield.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$34,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2021-23 Drinking Water Construction Loans - State Match (40000051)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department of health must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Washington Veterans Home: Bldg 6 & 7 Demo and Grounds Improvement (30000002)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$317,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,902,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$755,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$955,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,339,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$15,460,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,324,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: To assist in funding this project, the department must apply for competitive federal grant funding made available through the American rescue plan and, upon receipt of any such funding, an equal amount of the state building construction account—state appropriation shall be placed in unallotted status.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,384,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$162,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSH - Life Safety Grant (40000013)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$325,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$175,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen-Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School-Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$29,962,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,762,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000400)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects - SW 2021-23 (40000532)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$761,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$478,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,239,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,239,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School - Baker North Remodel (40000534)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,624,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,624,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Perimeter Wall Renovation (30000117)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,063,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,263,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Boiler Replacement (30000130)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$624,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,624,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,010,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Replace Roofs (30000654)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,719,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,219,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: TRU Roof Programs and Recreation Building (30000738)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,996,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Support Buildings Roof Replacement (40000380)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,427,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,427,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW IMU Recreation Yard Improvement (30001123)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,032,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,532,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC Security Electronics Network Renovation (30001124)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Reclaimed Water Line (40000058)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,871,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$116,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Clinic Roof Replacement (40000180)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$825,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,333,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: SOU and TRU - Domestic Water and HVAC Piping System (40000246)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2026, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,729,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$18,922,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,051,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works - Preservation Projects (40000254)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,833,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$72,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: Sewer System HABU (Highest and Best Use) (40000185)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2103, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works - Preservation Projects (40000187)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,973,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,473,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Unit Six Roof Replacement (92000037)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$277,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$927,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: AC for MSU (92000039)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$46,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,296,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account—

Water Supply Facilities—State
. . . .
$295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,116,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,411,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Pier 63 Creosote Removal (92000193)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3002, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Site Closure Account—State
. . . .
$8,472,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,930,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$604,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,484,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,599,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$57,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$393,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,881,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$72,394,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and section 3002, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$317,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$38,717,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,034,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$87,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,913,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$17,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$45,824,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,864,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,042,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,835,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,812,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$91,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$709,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,013,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,987,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Dungeness Water Supply & Mitigation (30000333)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$639,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,411,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3020, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$1,273,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,987,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects - Programmatic (30000335)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,071,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,984,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$9,357,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$53,180,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,537,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The reappropriations and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations and appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,627,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$543,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,330,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$7,444,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,456,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The reappropriations and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations and appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$8,711,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,081,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$22,792,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,955,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$52,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000490)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,720,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$22,444,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,757,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,201,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000536)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,962,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,038,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,094,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,466,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000538)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$1,982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,164,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,146,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$6,379,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,002,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000588)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3068, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$1,313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,687,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000589)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,129,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,926,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

(2)(a) $3,250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the acquisition of real property in lower Kittitas county known as the Eaton Ranch property by the state through the department of enterprise services on behalf of the department of ecology. This appropriation is provided to fund the closing, project, and transaction costs related to the acquisition of the property. The departments must expedite the review and execution of the transaction by June 30, 2022. It is the intent of the legislature that the state hold the property until a transfer to the United States bureau of reclamation for the purposes of construction of a water supply reservoir in accordance with the Yakima Basin integrated plan, or until such purpose is declared by the bureau no longer feasible.

(b) The legislature recognizes and declares that the acquisition of a portion of the Eaton Ranch for the construction of a water supply reservoir in accordance with the goals and objectives of the Yakima Basin integrated plan is a unique circumstance and the Eaton Ranch property offers special and essential features that are expected to yield broad public benefit to the state. It is the intent of the legislature that the department of ecology provide the necessary funding through subsequent funding requests to maintain and principally operate the land for grazing of livestock with the local conservation district, or an equivalent organization, until a transfer of the property to the United States bureau of reclamation.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$3,564,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,436,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000591)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$889,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,111,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000670)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$17,621,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,139,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000672)

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$47,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$953,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000673)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,027,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,684,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000704)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,342,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$94,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,436,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Centennial Clean Water Program (30000705)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,403,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,597,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design 2017-19 (30000706)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$24,036,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,428,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,464,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Remedial Action Grants (30000707)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,261,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,616,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Flood Control and Cleanup (30000708)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,688,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,712,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$35,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000710)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$160,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$210,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
$9,152,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,569,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$17,721,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,079,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000714)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3017, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,907,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,093,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000740)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,233,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,267,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Regional Office Improvements and Stormwater Treatment (30000741)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,503,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,383,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,886,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000742)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (30000749)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$155,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,027,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,182,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000763)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,155,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,085,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000796)

The reappropriations and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation and appropriation are subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$10,673,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,149,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$33,822,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,578,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Stormwater Financial Assistance (30000797)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,257,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,843,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Catastrophic Flood Relief (40000006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3023, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

VW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$109,662,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,038,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$112,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reduce Air Pollution from Transit/Sch. Buses/State-Owned Vehicles (40000109)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3019, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$16,099,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,301,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000110)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3074, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$148,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—Federal
. . . .
$53,837,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$201,837,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,163,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$204,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000111)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,197,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$37,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,234,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 ASARCO Cleanup (40000114)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$6,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (40000115)

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$668,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$332,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000116)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3074, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,010,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,990,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000117)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$12,108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (40000126)

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,910,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (40000127)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Mercury Switch Removal (40000128)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$64,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Floodplains by Design (40000129)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$46,163,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,237,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Clean Up Toxics Sites – Puget Sound (40000130)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3080, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$12,415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$352,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,767,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000144)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3020, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$44,617,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,389,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$49,006,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015 Drought Authority (40000146)

State Drought Preparedness Account—State
. . . .
$669,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (40000147)

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$631,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey HQ Roof Replacement (40000148)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$142,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,089,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000149)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000152)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3087, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$22,970,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$10,500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$35,870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,130,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000177)

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$31,504,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,496,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000179)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) $3,250,000 of the reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the acquisition of real property in lower Kittitas county known as the Eaton Ranch property by the state through the department of enterprise services on behalf of the department of ecology. This reappropriation is provided to fund the closing, project, and transaction costs related to the acquisition of the property. The departments must expedite the review and execution of the transaction by June 30, 2022. It is the intent of the legislature that the state hold the property until a transfer to the United States bureau of reclamation for the purposes of construction of a water supply reservoir in accordance with the Yakima Basin integrated plan, or until such purpose is declared by the bureau no longer feasible.

(b) The legislature recognizes and declares that the acquisition of a portion of the Eaton Ranch for the construction of a water supply reservoir in accordance with the goals and objectives of the Yakima Basin integrated plan is a unique circumstance and the Eaton Ranch property offers special and essential features that are expected to yield broad public benefit to the state. It is the intent of the legislature that the department of ecology provide the necessary funding through subsequent funding requests to maintain and principally operate the land for grazing of livestock with the local conservation district, or an equivalent organization, until a transfer of the property to the United States bureau of reclamation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,788,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Zosel Dam Preservation (40000193)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$80,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000194)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3091, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$6,918,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,286,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey HQ Facility Preservation Project—Minor Works (40000207)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$193,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000209)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3023, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$62,458,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,449,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$73,907,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Chemical Action Plan Implementation (40000210)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,883,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,821,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Remedial Action Grants (40000211)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$46,763,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,201,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$49,964,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2020 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000286)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2020 Remedial Action Grants (40000288)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$32,645,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,656,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 ASARCO Everett Smelter Plume Cleanup (40000303)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$10,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,722,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,536,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Remedial Action Grant Program (40000304)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2021-11, developed March 25, 2021.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$71,194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$264,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$335,994,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000336)

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$75,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$280,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$355,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000337)

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$225,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—Federal
. . . .
$75,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (40000338)

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 State Match - Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000339)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $15 million of the appropriation must be transferred to the water pollution control revolving account.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000340)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$20,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (40000346)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2021-7, developed March 25, 2021.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$5,808,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,808,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000359)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial program grant.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded clean water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000360)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$11,093,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$51,093,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (40000371)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Freshwater Aquatic Invasive Plants Grant Program (40000375)

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account—State
. . . .
$1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Freshwater Algae Grant Program (40000376)

Aquatic Algae Control Account—State
. . . .
$730,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000378)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish and administer a program to:

(a) Provide grants or other public funding to persons intending to remediate contaminated real property for development of affordable housing, as defined in RCW 43.185A.010. The grants or public funding may only be used for:

(i) Integrated planning to fund studies and other activities necessary to facilitate the acquisition, remediation, and adaptive reuse of known or suspected contaminated real property for affordable housing development, including:

(A) The activities specified under RCW 70A.305.190(5)(d); and

(B) Entry into development agreements pursuant to RCW 36.70B.170, 36.70B.180, and 36.70B.190 to accelerate the development of the contaminated real property into affordable housing; and

(ii) Remediation of contaminated real property for affordable housing development; or

(b) Remediate contaminated real property where a person intends to develop affordable housing, as defined in RCW 43.185A.010.

(2) When evaluating projects under this section, the department must consult with the department of commerce and consider at a minimum:

(a) The ability of the project to expedite the cleanup and reuse of the contaminated real property for affordable housing development;

(b) The extent to which the project leverages other public or private funding for the cleanup and reuse of the contaminated real property for affordable housing development;

(c) The suitability of the real property for affordable housing based on the threat posed by the contamination to human health;

(d) Whether the work to be funded is ready to proceed and be completed; and

(e) The distribution of funding throughout the state and among public and private entities.

(3) Any remediation of contaminated real property funded under this section must be performed:

(a) Under an agreed order or consent decree issued under chapter 70A.305 RCW or by the department; and

(b) In accordance with the rules established under chapter 70A.305 RCW.

(4) Real property remediated under this section must be restricted to affordable housing use for a period of no less than 30 years.

(a) To ensure that real property remediated under this section is used for affordable housing, the department may file a lien against the real property pursuant to RCW 70A.305.060, require the person to record an interest in the real property in accordance with RCW 64.04.130, or use other means deemed by the department to be no less protective of the affordable housing use and interests of the department.

(b) Any person who refuses, without sufficient cause, to comply with this subsection is subject to enforcement pursuant to any agreement or chapter 70A.305 RCW for the repayment, with interest, of funds provided or expended by the department under this section.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$10,161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,161,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey HQ Parking Garage Preservation (40000384)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$760,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$570,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$759,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$759,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$379,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account—State
. . . .
$570,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,797,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,797,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 ASARCO Tacoma Smelter Plume Cleanup (40000386)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000387)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,050,000 of the appropriation in this section is for board-approved projects to protect and restore aquatic species habitat, including construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition planning and project development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; postconstruction and acquisition monitoring and adaptive management; and engagement of state agencies, tribes, conservation partners, landowners, and other parties.

(2) $33,050,000 of the appropriation in this section is for board-approved projects to reduce flood damage, including construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition project planning and development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; and engagement of state agencies, tribes, project sponsors, landowners, and other parties.

(3) $3,900,000 of the appropriation in this section is for the operations of the office of Chehalis Basin and Chehalis Basin board to oversee the development, implementation, and amendment of the Chehalis Basin strategy. Oversight operations include, but are not limited to: Providing financial accountability, project management, and board meeting administration and facilitation.

(4) The Chehalis Basin Board has the discretion to reallocate the funding between subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section if needed to meet the objectives of this appropriation and approved by at least six of seven voting members of the board. However, $3,900,000 is the maximum amount the department may expend for the purposes in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) Up to one and a half percent of the appropriation in this section may be used by the recreation and conservation office to administer contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section. Contract administration includes, but is not limited to: Drafting and amending contracts, reviewing and approving invoices, tracking expenditures, and performing field inspections to assess project status when conducting similar assessments related to other agency contracts in the same geographic area.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$240,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$310,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (40000388)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$32,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Floodplains by Design (40000389)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2021-23, developed March 25, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,908,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$280,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$330,908,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Reducing Diesel GHG & Toxic Emissions (40000390)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000391)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,281,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,124,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,405,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Puget Sound Nutrient Reduction Grant Program (40000396)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$36,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000397)

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000399)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $16,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely to assist in planning, designing, engineering, development coordination, and construction of the EL 79.2 delivery system of the Odessa groundwater replacement project, sufficient to irrigate at least 13,000 acres. Within amounts appropriated in this subsection:

(a) $400,000 may be provided to assist Grant County Conservation District in applying for support from the United States department of agriculture-natural resource conservation service to secure federal funding for surface water delivery systems on the Columbia Basin Project.

(b) $150,000 may be used for improvements at EL 85, including radial arm gates.

(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for the continued development and building of the EL 22.1 surface water irrigation system, including a canal pump station, an electrical power substation, booster pump stations, and a large diameter full-sized pipeline sufficient to irrigate 16,000 acres.

(3) The East Columbia Basin Irrigation District may not be allowed to make any administrative charges to amounts within these appropriations.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$43,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$205,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000422)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$42,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$168,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$210,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Product Replacement Program (40000436)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$26,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Availability (91000343)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$7,943,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,657,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Water (91000347)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,290,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$210,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

PFAS Pilot Project (91000359)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3103, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3028, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$29,293,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$67,673,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$96,966,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought Response (92000142)

State Drought Preparedness Account—State
. . . .
$1,215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,508,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,723,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port of Tacoma Arkema/Dunlap Mound (92000158)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,173,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Program Demonstration and Design (30000001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State
. . . .
$228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,572,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Program (30000002)

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$1,638,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,318,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,956,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000669)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$639,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$467,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,106,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financing Assistance Program 2019-21 (30000702)

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$11,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2019-21 Leaking Tank Model Remedies Activity (30000703)

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State
. . . .
$732,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State
. . . .
$263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$32,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,052,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,079,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (30000704)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3026, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2021-23 Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm (30000705)

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$48,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2021-23 Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (30000706)

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$32,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm 2017-19 (92000001)

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$10,330,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,370,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Simcoe - Historic Officers Quarters Renovation (30000155)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$208,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$84,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$292,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes State Park: Dry Falls Campground Renovation (30000305)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$305,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$97,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$821,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,023,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,844,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Willapa Hills Trail Develop Safe Multi-Use Trail Crossing at SR 6 (30000519)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,902,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$481,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,383,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Schafer Relocate Campground (30000532)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,978,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$788,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,137,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,337,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,914,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,024,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,938,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Local Grant Authority (30000857)

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—

Private/Local
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,516,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,516,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Federal Grant Authority (30000858)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$938,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$142,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Pier & Marine Learning Center Improve or Replace (30000950)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$708,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,016,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst & Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,023,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$245,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,268,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition (30000976)

Parkland Acquisition Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,245,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,245,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructure (30000978)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$338,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,253,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,591,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Penrose Point Sewer Improvements (30000981)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$629,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$110,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$739,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Sunset Beach Picnic Area (30000984)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,383,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$377,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Water System Renovation (30001016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$397,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electrical System Renovation (30001018)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$629,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$729,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide New Park (30001019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steptoe Butte Road Improvements (30001076)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$178,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$288,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$466,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Fish Barrier Removal (40000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electric Vehicle Charging Stations (40000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Preservation Minor Works 2019-21 (40000151)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,139,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,308,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Nisqually New Full Service Park (40000153)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,788,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,126,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,069,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,945,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,928,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Nisqually Day Use Improvements (40000202)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$383,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,828,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,211,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Saint Edward Maintenance Facility (40000218)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,199,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,199,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Preservation 2021-23 (40000364)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,447,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program 2021-23 (40000365)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,936,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,936,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Recreational Marine Sewage Disposal Program (CVA) (40000366)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Electric Vehicle Charging Stations 2021-23 (40000370)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Forest Health & Hazard Reduction 2021-23 (40000371)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Comfort Station Pilot Project (91000433)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$54,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,113,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,167,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92000014)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,239,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,761,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

St. Edward Environmental Education and Research Center (92000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$486,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

2021-23 State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92000017)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a pool of eligible projects owned by the state parks and recreation commission.

(2) The following projects are the only projects eligible for funding in this section:

(a) Larrabee Water System Replacement;

(b) Cape Disappointment - Welcome Center and Entrance Improvements;

(c) Blake Island Marine Facilities Improvements;

(d) Cape Disappointment: Campground Access Road Culverts;

(e) Twenty-Five Mile Creek - Replace Moorage Floats;

(f) Maryhill Parkwide Septic System Overhaul;

(g) Palouse to Cascade Trail - Crab Creek Trestle Replacement;

(h) Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way;

(i) Sun Lakes Replace Primary Lift Station;

(j) Lyons Ferry Campground Reestablishment;

(k) Fort Flagler - WW1 Historic Facilities Preservation;

(l) Palouse Falls Day Use Area Renovation;

(m) Birch Bay - Repair Failing Bridge;

(n) Centennial Trail Paving Repair and Overlay;

(o) Deception Pass - Bowman Bay Pier Replacement;

(p) Ike Kinswa: Main Campground Loop Utility Upgrades;

(q) South Whidbey - Campground to Day Use Conversion;

(r) Wallace Falls Water System Replacement;

(s) Willapa Hills Trail: Bridge 48 and Trail Relocation;

(t) Statewide - Facility & Infrastructure Backlog Reduction 2021-23;

(u) Statewide - ADA Compliance 2021-23;

(v) Statewide - Code/Regulatory Compliance 2021-23;

(w) Statewide - Marine Facilities Rehabilitation 2021-23;

(x) Palouse to Cascades Trail – Repair Trestles and Trail Access;

(y) Electrical, Water and Sewer Infrastructure Preservation 2021-23;

(z) Statewide Park Paving Projects 2021-23; and

(aa) Statewide Park Comfort Station Replacements 2021-23.

(3) The department shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature the list of projects with funding levels, allotments, and schedules for the projects in this section by January 1, 2022.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$47,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A, developed May 24, 2011.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$637,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$41,363,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3161, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$616,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$132,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$2,189,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
$470,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,407,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$61,593,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000206)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3162, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,334,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$55,768,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$61,102,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000210)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2013-2B, developed April 10, 2013.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$124,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,876,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$69,097,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000212)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: No moneys may be expended from the reappropriation in this section for the Elwha Estuary Conservation and Restoration subproject.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$226,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,774,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Land and Water Conservation (30000216)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$495,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,505,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-1, developed June 30, 2015.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$1,181,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$2,910,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$3,268,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
$1,345,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,704,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$46,619,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$55,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000221)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3164, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$515,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,778,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,293,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$64,052,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,345,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$49,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,161,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000223)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3025, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$344,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,481,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000224)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3167, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,296,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,024,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3170. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000225)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-2, developed June 30, 2015.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$268,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,001,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,269,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3171. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000226)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3169, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,792,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,208,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3172. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: No moneys may be expended from the reappropriation in this section for the Elwha Estuary Conservation and Restoration subproject.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$82,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,918,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3173. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000228)

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$41,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$428,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$469,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3174. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreational Trails Program (30000229)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$607,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,587,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3175. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000230)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$632,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,207,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,839,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3176. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Land and Water Conservation (30000231)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$474,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,317,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,791,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3177. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000233)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,840,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3178. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000408)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$32,369,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,642,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$34,011,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$32,202,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,213,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3179. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2017-42, developed July 20, 2017, and LEAP capital document No. 2018-6H, developed January 3, 2018.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$5,860,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$12,592,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$12,474,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$30,926,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$49,074,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$80,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3180. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Facilities Program (30000410)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$5,902,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,273,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3181. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000411)

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$895,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3182. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000412)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,302,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,775,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3183. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2018-9H, developed March 5, 2018.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$884,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,732,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,616,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,669,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,285,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3184. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000414)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3185. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000415)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: No moneys may be expended from the reappropriation in this section for the Elwha Estuary Conservation and Restoration subproject.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3186. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000416)

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$561,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$252,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$813,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3187. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreational Trails Program (30000417)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$253,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,747,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3188. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Land and Water Conservation (30000419)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$835,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,127,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,962,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3189. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (30000420)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,769,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,731,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3190. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$106,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,894,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3191. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (40000002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3200, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$6,880,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$20,349,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$28,025,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$55,254,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,746,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$85,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3192. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000004)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3201, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$41,394,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,918,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$59,312,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3193. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Boating Facilities Program (40000005)

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$14,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,378,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,872,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3194. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000006)

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$8,031,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,380,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,411,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3195. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amounts reappropriated in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital documents No. 2020-467-HSBA, developed on February 25, 2020, and No. 2020-467-HB, developed on February 14, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,597,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,403,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3196. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2019-6H, developed April 27, 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,044,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$556,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3197. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000009)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,982,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$49,507,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3198. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: No moneys may be expended from the reappropriation in this section for the Elwha Estuary Conservation and Restoration subproject.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,053,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3199. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (40000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3208, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,086,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,086,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3200. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3209, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,822,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,669,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3201. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Firearms and Archery Range (40000013)

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$510,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3202. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Recreational Trails Program (40000014)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,224,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$776,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3203. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Boating Infrastructure Grants (40000015)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,181,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3204. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000016)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,072,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,928,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3205. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,233,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3206. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (40000019)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2021-42, developed March 25, 2021.

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$480,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$580,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3207. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the lead entity program as described in chapter 77.85 RCW.

(2) $640,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for regional fisheries enhancement groups created in RCW 77.95.060.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$50,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$90,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$400,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$490,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3208. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Boating Facilities Program (40000023)

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$14,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$74,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3209. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000025)

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3210. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000027)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,227,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$45,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$56,427,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3211. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2021-9, developed March 25, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,866,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,866,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3212. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000031)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$219,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$269,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3213. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (40000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2021-21, developed March 25, 2021. The board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the appropriation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3214. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000035)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2021-51, developed March 25, 2021.

(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed three percent of the appropriation.

(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration. The portion of the funds retained for technical assistance may not exceed 4.12 percent of the appropriation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$38,469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$131,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$169,669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3215. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Firearms and Archery Range (40000037)

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,520,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3216. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Recreational Trails Program (40000039)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$15,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3217. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Boating Infrastructure Grants (40000041)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3218. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000043)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3219. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000045)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: No moneys may be expended from the appropriation in this section for the Elwha Estuary Conservation and Restoration subproject.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3220. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Community Forest Grant Program (40000047)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2021-25, developed on March 25, 2021. The office may retain up to four percent of the appropriation for administrative costs, including costs for activities related to this section.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,299,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$44,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,299,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3221. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 - Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000050)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,957,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,957,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3222. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Coastal Restoration Grants (91000448)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3177, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$152,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,033,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3223. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Upper Quinault River Restoration Project (91000958)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,359,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$641,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3224. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Brian Abbott Fish Passage Barrier Removal Board (91000566)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,198,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,549,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3225. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Statewide Multi-Modal Trails Database (92000448)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the recreation and conservation office to develop an official statewide database of paved and unpaved multimodal trails that displays a network of local, regional, and statewide trails that connect, or have the potential of connecting, to provide transportation alternatives and that are available to public access. In developing the database and trails network, the recreation and conservation office must use and build upon trails work done by the Washington state parks and recreation commission, local and regional governments, and the active transportation plan developed by the Washington state department of transportation. The recreation and conservation office should consider the inventorying and mapping efforts already undertaken by nonprofit and private organizations provided that the recreation and conservation office deems the information meets their needs for data standards and integrity and the trails are understood to be open and available for use by the public.

(2) Using the existing spatial data collected in subsection (1) of this section, the recreation and conservation office must maintain a statewide network of public recreational and commuter routes to facilitate the stewardship of a statewide trails system. The network of trails and the trails database must be developed in a manner that allows the recreation and conservation office to update data on a regular basis in consultation and collaboration with other state agencies, cities, counties, parks and recreation districts, regional governments, and private and nonprofit organizations.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3226. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreation & Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3049, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$132,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,859,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$5,991,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$28,790,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3227. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 Community Forest Pilot (92000447)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3219, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3228. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3033, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,492,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,724,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,216,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3229. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (40000004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3221, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) Up to three percent of the reappropriation may be used for the commission to administer the grant or loan program.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,970,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,030,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3230. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Natural Resource Investments (40000005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3222, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) Up to three percent of the reappropriation may be used for the commission to administer the grant or loan program.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,633,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3231. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Match for Federal RCPP (40000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3051, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,123,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,126,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,249,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3232. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (40000009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3224, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$120,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3233. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 CREP PIP Loan Program (40000010)

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3234. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) (40000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance to private landowners.

(2) Up to three percent of the appropriation may be used for the commission to administer the grant or loan program.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$26,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3235. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (40000014)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to three percent of the appropriation may be used for the commission to administer the grant or loan program.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3236. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) PIP Loan (40000015)

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3237. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Natural Resource Investment for the Economy & Environment (40000016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to three percent of the appropriation provided may be used for the agency to administer the grant or loan program.

(2) Up to five percent of the appropriation provided may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for projects.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3238. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Regional Conservation Partnership Program (RCPP) Match (40000017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$22,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3239. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to three percent of the appropriation provided may be used for the agency to administer the grant or loan program.

(2) Up to five percent of the appropriation provided may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for shellfish projects.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3240. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match 2017-19 (91000009)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,553,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,047,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3241. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 CREP Riparian Contract Funding (91000015)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$629,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,271,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3242. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match (91000017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3243. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Commission Ranch & Farmland Preservation Projects (92000004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3230, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,662,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,860,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,522,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3244. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Natural Resource Investment for the Economy & Environment 2017-19 (92000011)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3245. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program 2017-19 (92000013)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3053, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,033,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$967,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3246. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program 2017-19 (92000014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6019, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3247. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3063, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

(2) The department, in consultation with the department of ecology, must prioritize this project, finalize the acquisition of a preferred site, and provide a comprehensive progress report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by September 15th, 2021. The report must include a decision package requesting funding in the 2022 supplemental capital budget and an expedited timeline for final completion of the project by end of fiscal year 2024.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,108,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$36,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$51,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3248. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,138,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,888,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3249. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$7,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,767,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,953,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,800,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$12,920,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$85,801,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$63,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$175,221,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3250. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Spring Hatchery Renovation (30000214)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$789,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$704,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,493,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3251. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Samish Hatchery Intakes (30000276)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,232,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,732,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3252. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,833,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,078,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3253. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,450,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,006,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,706,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3254. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wallace River Hatchery - Replace Intakes and Ponds (30000660)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,280,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,333,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,138,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3255. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,946,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,048,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3256. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Cooperative Elk Damage Fencing (30000662)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3243, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3257. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Spokane Hatchery Renovation (30000663)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$18,735,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3258. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Edmonds Pier Renovation (30000664)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$654,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3259. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hazard Fuel Reductions, Forest Health and Ecosystem Improvement (30000665)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,130,000

Forest Resiliency Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,870,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3260. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Naselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,532,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,753,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,885,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3261. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Springs Production Shift (30000723)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,570,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3262. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000756)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3263. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Programmatic (30000782)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,560,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3264. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Snow Creek Reconstruct Facility (30000826)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3057, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$70,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$166,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,060,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,196,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3265. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Forks Creek Hatchery - Renovate Intake and Diversion (30000827)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,420,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,441,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,372,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3266. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$577,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$777,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3267. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,606,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,906,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3268. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

PSNERP Match (30000846)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,754,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,750,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,504,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$34,809,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$774,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$461,662,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$505,749,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3269. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Falls Hatchery Replace Raceways and PA System (30000848)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$519,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$297,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$816,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3270. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wiley Slough Dike Raising (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$72,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,453,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3271. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Scatter Creek Wildlife Area Fire Damage (40000005)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$781,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3272. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation 2019-21 (40000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,630,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3273. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Programmatic 2019-21 (40000008)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$677,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,427,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3274. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Toutle River Fish Collection Facility - Match (40000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to purchase easements as part of sediment abatement.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,371,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$404,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,312,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,087,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3275. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Elochoman Hatchery Demolition and Restoration (40000024)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3276. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Snohomish County Wildlife Rehabilitation Facility (PAWS) (40000025)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3277. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Region 1 Office - Construct Secure Storage (40000087)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$57,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$93,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3278. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation 21-23 (40000089)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3279. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Program 21-23 (40000092)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,928,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,928,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3280. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

SRKW - New Cowlitz River Hatchery (40000145)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$38,486,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,786,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3281. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

SRKW - Kendall Creek Hatchery Modifications (40000146)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,317,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,317,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3282. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

SRKW - Sol Duc Hatchery Modifications (40000147)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,697,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,897,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3283. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Rufus Woods Fishing Access (91000151)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$347,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,653,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3284. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$520,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3285. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Naches Rearing Ponds (92000049)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3286. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Shrubsteppe and Rangeland Cooperative Wildlife Fencing (92000050)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall collaborate with landowners affected by wildfire in shrubsteppe habitat and provide funding to public and private landowners to rebuild wildlife-friendly fences in impacted and prioritized areas.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3287. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 State Forest Land Replacement (40000085)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriation is provided solely to the department to transfer from state forestland status to natural resources conservation area status certain state forestlands in counties with:

(i) A population of twenty-five thousand or fewer; and

(ii) Risks of timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered species act.

(b) This appropriation must be used equally for the transfer of qualifying state forestlands in the qualifying counties.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy replacement state forestland, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.

(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.

(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section. The department will identify eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsections (1) and (2) of this section, in consultation with the applicable counties, and will not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3288. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Forest Health Resiliency and Hazard Reduction (40000087)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $15,800,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for: Mitigating risk of uncharacteristic wildfire and other disturbances to protect lives, communities, property, ecosystems, and working forests; implementing forest health treatments, prioritized pursuant to chapter 76.06 RCW, on state lands and state forestlands, high-risk private lands, and federal lands, including implementation of the "good neighbor" agreement signed with the United States forest service and the bureau of land management, and "good neighbor" cross boundary competitive grants to forest collaboratives; and increasing the use of prescribed fire through improved trainings, prescribed burn certification programs, and shared stewardship strategies with federal land managers.

(2) $4,200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning and administering the forest health treatments pursuant to subsection (1) of this section with the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department must contract with the Washington conservation corps, including veterans, to provide forest health treatments that may include thinning, pruning, and brush disposal, and other wildfire preparedness and fuel modification practices for firewise communities; and

(b) The department must work in conjunction with communities, counties, fire districts, and conservation districts in implementing wildfire preparedness and fuel modification practices for firewise communities.

Forest Resiliency Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$120,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3289. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Sustainable Recreation (40000088)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3290. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Trust Land Replacement (40000089)

Community and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement

Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$61,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$244,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$305,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3291. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Forest Legacy (40000090)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$17,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$68,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$85,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3292. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Land Acquisition Grants (40000091)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3293. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Road Maintenance and Abandonment Planning (40000092)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,928,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,928,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3294. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (40000093)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3295. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Omak Consolidation, Expansion and Relocation (40000033)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$107,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$108,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3296. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer Program (40000034)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,725,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3297. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (40000037)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,582,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3298. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway (40000038)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$636,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,856,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3299. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Acquisition Grants (40000039)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3300. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sunshine Mine (40000042)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3301. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (40000044)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$155,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,705,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,860,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy 2019-21 (40000045)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$7,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3303. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities 2019-21 (40000046)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,705,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3304. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (40000049)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3292, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,979,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,221,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Large Vessel Removals (40000051)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (40000052)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Grouse Ridge Fish Barriers & RMAP Compliance (40000056)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,210,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,730,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Emergent Environmental Mitigation Projects (40000058)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$790,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$320,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Minor Works Preservation (40000070)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,498,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,498,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Minor Works Programmatic (40000071)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Longview Fire Station Purchase (40000072)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$995,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$995,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3312. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Derelict Vessel Removal Program (40000075)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for removing high priority abandoned and derelict vessels in Washington's waters, including The Hero in Pacific county.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3313. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Forestry Riparian Easement Program (40000077)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$35,257,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,757,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3314. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Puget Sound Corps (40000079)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for state land recreation, natural areas, aquatics, resource protection, and urban forestry projects statewide.

(2) $1,300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementing projects to remove invasive and noxious weeds and creosote-treated wood and to revegetate riparian zones in the Snohomish watershed pursuant to the departments' salmon strategy.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$32,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3315. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (40000081)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3316. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Rural Broadband Investment (40000082)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $600,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for installation of new communication towers at Ellis Peak, Striped Peak, and Paradise Peak.

(2) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for communication tower upgrades at Blyn Mountain and Capitol Peak.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3317. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Airway Heights Facility Replacement (40000025)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3318. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 School Seismic Safety (40000083)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,770,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3319. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Port of Willapa Harbor Energy Innovation District Grant (91000099)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3320. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Administrative Site/Minor Works Pool (92000034)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3321. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

2019-21 Grants to Improve Safety and Access at Fairs (92000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,856,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3322. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

DNR and Camp Colman Collaboration (92000037)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to contract with a third party facilitator for the purpose of collaborating with the YMCA of greater Seattle, Camp Colman, on finding solutions for maintaining a high-quality camp experience and establishing a barrier free passage for migrating fish species at Whiteman cove. Should the department and the YMCA reach agreement about a collaborative process, the department must report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, about areas of mutual agreement and any recommendations that could be enacted by the legislature. If the department and the YMCA of Greater Seattle choose to not begin to collaborate by July 31, 2021, the funding in this subsection shall lapse.

General Fund—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3323. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

2021-23 WA State Fair Health and Safety Grants (92000005)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,005,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,005,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Emergency Power Generator Replacement (30000171)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$875,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Minor Works and Repairs (40000031)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,250,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA - Student Dormitory HVAC (40000034)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

2021-23 Aviation Revitalization Loans (40000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section must be deposited in the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account.

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$66,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$529,837,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$529,903,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,529,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$385,701,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$387,230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5013, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,617,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$639,008,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$645,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Emergency Repairs and Equal Access Grants for K-12 Public Schools (30000182)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$184,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$372,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$556,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,444,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skill Centers - Minor Works (30000187)

School Construction and Skills Centers Building

Account—State
. . . .
$521,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,479,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skill Center - Core Growth (30000197)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,392,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Classrooms and Labs (30000203)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$961,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,039,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2017-19 School Construction Assistance Program (40000003)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$68,793,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$68,708,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$811,249,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$948,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance Level (40000013)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to provisions of section 5002, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$630,616,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$185,462,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$816,078,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$224,878,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,040,956,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School District Health and Safety 2019-21 (40000019)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5016, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$842,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$366,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,208,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids / Healthy Schools 2019-21 (40000021)

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,120,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,130,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skills Centers Minor Works (40000023)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,795,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Career Preparation and Launch Equipment Grants (40000032)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5019, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$104,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$896,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School Construction Assistance Program (40000034)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $778,876,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.

(2) $2,841,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$756,460,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$22,257,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$781,717,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,900,084,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,681,801,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-2023 Healthy Kids - Healthy Schools (40000037)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria for providing funding for specific projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Districts may apply for grants, but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation for grants awarded in this section;

(b) Any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and

(c) Applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program may be prioritized.

(2) The remaining portion of the appropriation may be used:

(a) For the replacement of lead-contaminated pipes and drinking water fixtures.

(b) To purchase equipment or make repairs to existing equipment that is related to improving:

(i) Children's physical health, and may include, but is not limited to, fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation; and

(ii) Children's nutrition, and may include, but is not limited to, garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-12 Capital Programs Administration (40000038)

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Small District and Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (40000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a modernization grant to the Mount Adams school district to complete the replacement of Harrah Elementary School.

(2)(a) $38,900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts with total enrollments of 1,000 students or less with significant building system deficiencies and limited financial capacity as approved by the superintendent of public instruction's small district modernization grant advisory committee.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction must submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee, to the legislature by January 15, 2021. The list must include: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $5,000,000; (iii) estimated total project costs; and (iv) local funding resources. The appropriated funds in this subsection may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. 2021-24, developed March 15, 2021.

(3) $1,100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts with enrollments of 1,000 students or less interested in seeking modernization grants. The superintendent of public instruction may prioritize planning grants for school districts with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district. Planning grants may only be awarded to school districts with an estimated total project cost of $5,000,000 or less.

(4)(a) $4,218,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants and modernization grants to state tribal compact schools. The superintendent may prioritize planning grants for state tribal compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.

(b) The superintendent must submit a prioritized list of state-tribal compact school modernization projects to the legislature by January 15, 2021. The list must include: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the planning grant amount; and (iii) estimated total project costs. The appropriated funds in this subsection (4)(b) may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. 2021-44, developed March 15, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$47,218,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$188,872,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$236,090,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Skills Centers Minor Works (40000040)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: In addition to the conditions and limitations specified in section 7018 of this act, no skill center shall receive funding for more than two minor works projects within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center - Evergreen Building Modernization (40000048)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,830,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Seattle Public Schools Skills Center - Rainier Beach High School (40000050)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Puget Sound Skills Center Preservation (40000051)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,024,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,024,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School District Health and Safety (40000052)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,000,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency repair grants to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. For emergency repair grants only, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable.

(2) $7,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for health and safety and equal access grants to address nonrecurring urgent small repair projects and projects that improve compliance with the Americans with disabilities act and individuals with disabilities education act at K-12 public schools that could impact the health and safety of students and staff if not completed, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting school districts to one grant, not to exceed $200,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a comprehensive description of the issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the scope of work to remedy, including a detailed cost estimate of the work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, that will be applied to the project.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction must notify the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as projects described in subsection (1) of this section are approved for funding.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School Seismic Safety Retrofit Program (40000054)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for school seismic safety retrofit grants to school districts for seismic retrofits and seismic safety related improvements of school buildings used for the instruction of students in kindergarten through 12th grade. The superintendent of public instruction must prioritize school seismic safety retrofit grants for school districts with the most significant building deficiencies and the greatest seismic risks as determined by the school seismic safety retrofit planning grants, beginning with facilities classified as very high risk.

(2) In the development of school seismic safety retrofit projects, the superintendent of public instruction shall also give due consideration to the following: (a) Prioritizing improvements of school buildings used for the instruction of students in kindergarten through 12th grade; (b) the financial capacity of low property value school districts in the sizing of grant awards; and (c) facilities' seismic needs in light of the useful life of the facilities.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,676,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Career and Preparation Launch Grants (40000056)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide competitive grants to school districts to purchase and install career and technical education equipment that expands career connected learning and work-integrated learning opportunities.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with school districts and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding and outcomes for specific projects through a competitive grant program to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section consistent with the following priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Districts or schools must demonstrate that the request provides necessary equipment to deliver career and technical education; and

(b) Applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program must be prioritized.

(3) No single district may receive more than $150,000 of the appropriation.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Career and Technical Education Equipment Grants (91000408)

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$29,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$971,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,930,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-3 Class-size Reduction Grants (92000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5023, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,654,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$214,846,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$234,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Small Rural District Modernization Grants (92000040)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5008, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,867,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$39,133,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$41,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$28,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,625,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Everett Pathways to Medical Education (92000123)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$513,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,487,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Small District Modernization Grants (92000139)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,193,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,383,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 STEM Grants (92000140)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5029, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,660,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,040,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Distressed Schools (92000142)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,356,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,581,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,937,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Agricultural Science in Schools Grant to FFA Foundation (92000916)

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Distressed Schools (92000917)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $9,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a 12-classroom addition at Green Lake Elementary School in Seattle public schools.

(2) $940,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Healthy Schools pilot to reduce exposure to air pollution and improve air quality in schools.

(3) $772,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a school-based health center at Spanaway Middle School.

(4) $257,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for creating environmentally friendly and accessible restrooms at the new camp Waskowitz.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,969,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,969,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Seismic Safety Retrofit Program (92000148)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5006, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma (20102002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5036, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$700,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$36,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell (30000378)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5037, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,438,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$79,438,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Education - T-Wing Renovation/Addition (30000486)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$24,000,000

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$26,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$44,623,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

College of Engineering Interdisciplinary/Education Research Center (30000492)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$45,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Major Infrastructure (30000808)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$34,300,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$74,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

2019-21 Minor Works - Preservation (40000004)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$8,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,266,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$43,466,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Behavioral Health Teaching Facility (40000038)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6040 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$191,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$224,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Magnuson Health Sciences Phase II - Renovation/Replacement (40000049)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$58,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$64,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Seattle - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 21-23 (40000050)

UW Building Account—State
. . . .
$35,685,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$97,533,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$133,218,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 2021-23 (40000070)

UW Building Account—State
. . . .
$3,638,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 2021-23 (40000072)

UW Building Account—State
. . . .
$2,677,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$14,861,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,538,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Ctr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,988,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,988,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000019)

UW Building Account—State
. . . .
$25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,825,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$103,300,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$154,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Power Plant (91000026)

University of Washington Building

Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,658,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,258,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver - Life Sciences Building (30000840)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,100,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$52,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$57,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU Tri-Cities - Academic Building (30001190)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,650,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Global Animal Health Building (30001322)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$56,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$59,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman - STEM Teaching Labs (30001326)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Everett Real Estate Acquisition (40000006)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Preservation (MCR): 2019-21 (40000011)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Spokane-Biomedical and Health Sc Building Ph II (40000012)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$75,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$90,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Preservation (MCR): 2021-23 (40000145)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$27,793,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$142,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$170,293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Program (MCI & Omnibus Equip): 2021-23 (40000212)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$6,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$46,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Johnson Hall Replacement (40000271)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section may only be used for project expenses directly related to the demolition of Johnson Hall and site preparation work necessary to prepare for a new plant biosciences building for which design and construction funding is provided by the United States department of agriculture.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Campus Fire Protection and Domestic Water Reservoir (40000272)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Clark Hall Research Lab Renovation (40000274)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$4,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Pullman Sciences Building (40000284)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$53,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$53,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000037)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,115,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,460,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,690,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Interdisciplinary Science Center (30000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$69,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$72,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Science Renovation (30000507)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,287,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$45,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$98,787,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Preservation 2019-21 (40000011)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,866,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,634,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$26,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Program 2019-21 (40000015)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,339,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal II (40000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Albers Court Improvements (40000036)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$953,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,953,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal III (40000070)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$25,518,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Preservation 2021-23 (40000107)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventative Maintenance/Backlog Reduction 2021-23 (40000108)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Program 2021-23 (40000110)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Nutrition Science (30000456)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$42,080,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$59,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program: 2019-21 (40000007)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$80,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$920,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Health Education (40000009)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$55,505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,505,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation: 2019-21 (40000041)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$790,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$210,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$28,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Campus Security Enhancements (40000074)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,213,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,463,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Chiller Addition (40000075)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,189,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,189,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Humanities & Social Science Complex (40000081)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$63,846,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$69,051,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation 2021 - 2023 (40000083)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$6,499,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,346,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$9,845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$36,448,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$46,293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program 2021 - 2023 (40000084)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventative Facility Maintenance/Backlog Reduction 2021-23 (40000115)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,688,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar I Renovation (30000125)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$212,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,300,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,512,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000612)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,613,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,900,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,393,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Preservation (40000034)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,945,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,580,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$77,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$86,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lab II HVAC Upgrades (40000047)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works: Program 2021-23 (40000077)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (91000031)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,966,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,866,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Program: 2019-21 (91000033)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Access Control Security Upgrades (30000604)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$515,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,685,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Sciences Building Addition & Renovation (30000768)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$30,987,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,013,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Elevator Preservation Safety and ADA Upgrades (30000772)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,188,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,188,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2019-21 Classroom & Lab Upgrades (30000869)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$42,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$442,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,558,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical Engineering/Computer Science Building (30000872)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5089, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) The university may pursue the living building challenge petal certification instead of LEED silver certification required by RCW 39.35D.030.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$51,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$53,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (30000873)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,346,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,846,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program: 2019-21 (30000885)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2021-23 Classroom & Lab Upgrades (30000911)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Coast Salish Longhouse (30000912)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Any amount of the total project costs in excess of $3,500,000 must be paid for from private funds.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation 2021-23 (30000915)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$4,800,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$9,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$69,710,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$79,510,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program 2021-2023 (30000918)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Student Development and Success Center (30000919)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000010)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,614,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$14,456,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,684,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000288)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000297)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5054, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,186,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,986,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grant Projects: 2019-21 (40000014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5020, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,777,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,177,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (40000086)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,908,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,608,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grant Projects 2021-2023 (40000099)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,161,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Preservation - Minor Works 2021-23 (40000136)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$15,671,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,021,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Black History Commemoration (91000008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5022, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Program - Minor Works (92000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Campbell and Carriage House Repairs and Restoration (40000017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$618,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$956,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$382,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,956,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (40000026)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$692,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$867,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,559,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works: Preservation 2021-23 (40000041)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,088,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,088,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works: Program 2021-23 (40000048)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,077,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Student Services and Instructional Building (30000127)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,201,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$44,026,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,950,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$48,177,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal (30000129)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: All remaining work on this project must be completed by June 30, 2023.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$93,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,326,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: North County Satellite (30000135)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,287,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$53,230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$401,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$58,918,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett Community College: Learning Resource Center (30000136)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,283,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$48,084,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,732,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$52,099,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Science, Engineering, Technology Bldg (30000137)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$124,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$46,953,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,790,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$30,984,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,774,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend: Professional-Technical Education Center (30000981)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$48,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$37,338,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,386,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5025, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,849,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,506,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,308,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley: Wells Hall Replacement (30000985)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,044,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,371,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5129. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic: Shop Building Renovation (30000986)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$184,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,605,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5130. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Building Renovation - Phase 3 (30000987)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$31,138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,962,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5131. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle: Automotive Technology Renovation and Expansion (30000988)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,043,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,834,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5132. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Medical Mile Health Science Center (30000989)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$24,364,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,066,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5133. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$106,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$43,848,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,486,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5134. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Library Building Renovation (30001451)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$759,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$30,519,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,689,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,967,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5135. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Walla Walla Science and Technology Building Replacement (30001452)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$343,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$813,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,639,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5136. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls: Fine and Applied Arts Replacement (30001458)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5027, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,354,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,342,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,473,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5137. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake Washington: Center for Design (40000102)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,492,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$668,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,641,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5138. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Welcome Center for Student Success (40000105)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,126,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,812,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,938,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5139. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia: Teacher Education and Family Development Center (40000109)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,268,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,787,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5140. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Skagit: Library/Culinary Arts Building (40000110)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,257,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$22,757,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,014,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5141. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue: Center for Transdisciplinary Learning and Innovation (40000168)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,630,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$39,942,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$209,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5142. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee: Center for Technical Education and Innovation (40000198)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,266,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$41,557,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5143. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton: Health Sciences Center (40000204)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,997,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$43,937,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,934,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5144. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: STE(A)M Education Center (40000214)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,039,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,961,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5145. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia: CC5 Gateway building (40000222)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,096,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$33,486,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,582,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5146. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic Innovation and Technology Learning Center (40000103)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,552,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,552,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5147. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma: Center for Innovative Learning and Engagement (40000104)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,992,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,239,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,231,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5148. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lower Columbia: Center for Vocational and Transitional Studies (40000106)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,206,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,805,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,011,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5149. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Apprenticeship Center (40000107)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,368,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,674,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,042,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5150. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program (40000112)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,336,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$36,505,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5151. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds: Triton Learning Commons (40000114)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$34,709,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5152. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Fire Service Training Center (40000130)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$243,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5153. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (40000169)

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,826,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,883,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,709,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$33,818,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5154. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (40000171)

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,252,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,252,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5155. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs (40000173)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$752,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,558,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5156. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett: Baker Hall Replacement (40000190)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$63,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5157. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Preservation (40000258)

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,522,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$22,217,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,739,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5158. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Puyallup: STEM building (40000293)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,069,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$38,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$41,969,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5159. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Repairs - Facility (40000308)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,466,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,466,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5160. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (40000320)

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$91,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$114,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5161. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Preservation (40000321)

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$26,113,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,113,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5162. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Repairs - Roof (40000361)

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$8,087,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,771,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,858,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,858,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5163. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Site (40000409)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,163,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,163,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5164. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

2021-23 Career Preparation and Launch Grants (40000515)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to provide competitive grants to community and technical colleges to purchase and install equipment that expands career-connected learning opportunities.

(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop common criteria for providing competitive grant funding and outcomes for specific projects.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5165. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Infrastructure and Program (92000035)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5166. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

Creative Districts Capital Construction Projects (30000002)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$412,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$412,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5167. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

Yakima Sun Dome Reflectors (92000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: At least 20 percent of the total cost of this project must be paid from nonstate funds. The Washington state arts commission must sell the decommissioned reflectors from the Yakima Sun Dome Circle of Light and use the proceeds to preserve the state art collection.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$80,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$480,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5168. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Independent Living Skills Center (30000107)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$700,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,636,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$662,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5169. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Minor Works: Campus Preservation 2019-21 (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$455,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5170. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

21-23 Campus Preservation (40000015)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5171. FOR THE WASHINGTON CENTER FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTH

Academic and Physical Education Building (30000036)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$44,375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$637,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,012,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5172. FOR THE WASHINGTON CENTER FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTH

Minor Works: Preservation 2021-23 (30000047)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

(End of part)

PART 6

Sec. 6001. 2019 c 413 s 1004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (20074009)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
($2,000)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$62,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$60,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$199,760,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($199,822,000))

$199,820,000

Sec. 6002. 2019 c 413 s 1007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$6,760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,141,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($38,141,000))

$33,901,000

Sec. 6003. 2019 c 413 s 1010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess. and section 6008 of this act.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($10,406,000))

$8,906,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$278,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($10,684,000))

$9,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$70,816,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($81,500,000))

$80,000,000

Sec. 6004. 2019 c 413 s 1012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000835)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1035, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$597,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($25,000,000))

$23,597,000

Sec. 6005. 2019 c 413 s 1014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$2,515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,363,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,363,000))

$10,878,000

Sec. 6006. 2020 c 356 s 6002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6003 of this act, except that no funding may be directed to the Puyallup Meeker Mansion Public Plaza.

(2) The Interbay public development advisory committee shall provide a report to the legislature and office of the governor with recommendations by November 15, 2019. The Interbay advisory committee's recommendations must include recommendations regarding the structure, composition, and scope of authority of any subsequent state public development authority that may be established to implement the recommendations of the Interbay advisory committee.

(3) The Interbay public development advisory committee terminates June 30, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($90,642,000))

$90,538,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$39,799,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($130,441,000))

$130,337,000

Sec. 6007. 2020 c 356 s 1003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Housing Trust Fund Program (40000036)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $132,666,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation, $44,084,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for production and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $35,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with chronic mental illness. When evaluating applications for this population, the department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that show:

(i) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more health care entities that provide behavioral health care services to individuals eligible for the housing provided under this subsection;

(ii) A commitment by the applicant to provide, directly or through a formal partnership, necessary treatment and supportive services to the tenants and maintain the beds or housing units for at least a forty-year period;

(iii) Readiness to begin structural modifications or construction resulting in a fast project completion;

(iv) Program requirements that adhere to the key elements of permanent supportive housing programs including choice in housing and living arrangements, functional separation of housing and services, community integration, rights of tenancy, and voluntary recovery-focused services; and

(v) To achieve geographic distribution, the department must prioritize projects in rural areas as defined by the department per RCW 43.185.050 and unserved communities with the goal of maximizing the investment and increasing the number of supportive housing units in rural, unserved communities.

(b) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grant awards for modular housing which includes high quality affordable housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. These funds must be awarded to projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $200,000, excluding the value of land, off-site infrastructure costs, and any capitalized reserves, compliant with the Americans with disabilities act, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a fifty year period.

(c) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a state match or state matches on private contributions that fund the production and preservation of affordable housing. Awards must be made using a competitive process. If any funding remains unallocated after the first fiscal year during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department may allocate the remaining funding through its annual competitive process for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations in need of housing.

(d)(i) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively.

(ii) The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment to be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property.

(iii) To allocate preservation funds, the department must review applications and evaluate projects based on the following criteria:

(A) The age of the property, with priority given to buildings that are more than fifteen years old;

(B) The population served, with priority given to projects with at least 50 percent of the housing units being occupied by families and individuals at or below 50 percent area median income;

(C) The degree to which the applicant demonstrates that the improvements will result in a reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both;

(D) The potential for additional years added to the affordability period of the property; and

(E) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(e)(i) $7,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for loans or grants to design and construct ultra-high energy efficient affordable housing projects.

(ii) To receive funding, a project must provide a life-cycle cost analysis report to the department and must demonstrate energy-saving and renewable energy systems either designed to reach net-zero energy use after housing is fully occupied or designed to achieve the most recent building standard of the passive house institute US as of the effective date of this section.

(iii) The department must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following factors in assigning a numerical ranking to a project:

(A) Whether the proposed design has demonstrated that the project will achieve either net-zero energy use when fully occupied or will achieve the most recent building standard of the passive house institute US as of the effective date of this section;

(B) The life-cycle cost of the project;

(C) That the project demonstrates a design, use of materials, and construction process that can be replicated by the Washington building industry;

(D) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds;

(E) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to construction;

(F) Whether the project promotes sustainable use of resources and environmental quality;

(G) Whether the project is being well managed to fund maintenance and capital depreciation;

(H) Reduction of housing and utilities carbon footprint; and

(I) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(iv) The department must monitor and track the results of the housing projects that receive ultra-high energy efficiency funding under this section.

(f) (($44,084,000))$40,084,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

Bellwether Housing (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

Capitol Hill Housing Broadway (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

((Crosswalk Teen Shelter and Transitional Housing

Project (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Housing (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000))

FFC New Construction (Statewide). . . .$1,384,000

FUSION Emergency Housing for Homeless Families

(Federal Way). . . .$3,000,000

Highland Village (Airway Heights). . . .$5,500,000

Home At Last (Tacoma). . . .$2,250,000

Interfaith Works Shelter (Olympia). . . .$3,000,000

Pateros Gardens (Pateros). . . .$1,400,000

SCIDpda North Lot (Seattle). . . .$9,000,000

Tenny Creek Assisted Living (Vancouver). . . .$1,750,000

THA Arlington Drive (Tacoma). . . .$800,000

(g) $6,000,000 of the appropriation for Capitol Hill Housing Broadway (Seattle) in (f) of this subsection is provided solely for the purchase of the three south annex properties. The state board for community and technical colleges must transfer the three south annex properties located at 1500 Broadway, 1534 Broadway, and 909 East Pine street in Seattle to Capitol Hill Housing to provide services and housing for homeless youth or young adults at the 1500 Broadway and 909 East Pine street properties for a minimum of fifty years. The transfer agreement between the state board for community and technical colleges and Capitol Hill Housing must specify a mutually agreed transfer date and require Capitol Hill Housing to cover any closing costs with a total purchase price of nine million dollars for the three properties. The contract between the department and Capitol Hill Housing must:

(i) Provide that Capitol Hill Housing is responsible for maintaining and securing the 1500 Broadway and 909 East Pine properties until the site is redeveloped;

(ii) Specify that, if Capitol Hill Housing does not construct at least seventy affordable housing units on the site by 2028, this funding must be fully repaid to the state or the land must revert back to the state; and

(iii) Require that Capitol Hill Housing transfer the 1534 Broadway property to YouthCare Service Center for the purpose of developing a youth community center.

(h) $5,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grant awards for the development of community housing and cottage communities to shelter individuals or households experiencing homelessness. This funding must be awarded to projects that develop a minimum of four individual structures in the same location. Individual structures must contain insulation, electricity, overhead lights, and heating. Kitchens and bathrooms may be contained within the individual structures or offered as a separate facility that is shared with the community. When evaluating applications for this grant program, the department must prioritize projects that demonstrate:

(i) The availability of land to locate the community;

(ii) A strong readiness to proceed to construction;

(iii) A longer term of commitment to maintain the community;

(iv) A commitment by the applicant to provide, directly or through a formal partnership, case management and employment support services to the tenants;

(v) Access to employment centers, health care providers and other services; and

(vi) A community engagement strategy.

(i) $55,666,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations in need of housing. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(i) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing for veterans;

(ii) $3,616,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing that serves people with developmental disabilities;

(iii) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing that serves people who are employed as farmworkers; and

(iv)(A) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership.

(B) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must use a separate application form for applications to provide homeownership opportunities and evaluate homeownership project applications as allowed under chapter 43.185A RCW.

(C) In addition to the definition of "first-time home buyer" in RCW 43.185A.010, for the purposes of awarding homeownership projects during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium "first time home buyer" also includes:

(I) A single parent who has only owned a home with a former spouse while married;

(II) An individual who is a displaced homemaker as defined in 24 C.F.R. Sec. 93.2 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and has only owned a home with a spouse;

(III) An individual who has only owned a principal residence not permanently affixed to a permanent foundation in accordance with applicable regulations; or

(IV) An individual who has only owned a property that is discerned by a licensed building inspector as being uninhabitable.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3)(a) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

(b) By June 30, 2021, the department must report on its web site the following for every previous funding cycle: The number of homeownership and multifamily rental projects funded by housing trust fund moneys; the percentage of housing trust fund investments made to homeownership and multifamily rental projects; and the total number of households being served at up to eighty percent of the area median income, up to fifty percent of the area median income, and up to thirty percent of the area median income, for both homeownership and multifamily rental projects.

(4)(a) The department, in cooperation with the housing finance commission, must develop and implement a process for the collection of certified final development cost data from each grant or loan recipient under this section. The department must use this data as part of its cost containment policy.

(b) Beginning December 1, 2019, and continuing annually, the department must provide the legislature with a report of its final cost data for each project under this section. Such cost data must, at a minimum, include total development cost per unit for each project completed within the past year, descriptive statistics such as average and median per unit costs, regional cost variation, and other costs that the department deems necessary to improve cost controls and enhance understanding of development costs. The department must coordinate with the housing finance commission to identify relevant development costs data and ensure that the measures are consistent across relevant agencies.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($44,084,000))

$39,084,000

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State
. . . .
$132,666,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($176,750,000))

$171,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$480,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($656,750,000))

$651,750,000

Sec. 6008. 2019 c 413 s 1032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Building for the Arts Grant Program (40000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Seattle Theatre Group. . . .$310,000

Music Center of the Northwest. . . .$300,000

Seattle Symphony Orchestra. . . .$912,000

Broadway Center for the Performing Arts. . . .$586,000

Bainbridge Artisan Resource Network. . . .$1,057,000

Nordic Heritage Museum Foundation. . . .$2,000,000

Imagine Children's Museum. . . .$2,000,000

Seattle Opera. . . .$526,000

KidsQuest Children's Museum. . . .$816,000

((Central Stage Theatre of County Kitsap. . . .$964,000))

Roxy Bremerton Foundation. . . .$51,000

Port Angeles Waterfront Center. . . .$1,112,000

Rehabilitating Fort Worden's Historic Warehouses. . . .$712,000

Sea Mar Museum of Chicano/a Latino/a Culture. . . .$654,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($12,000,000))

$11,036,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$48,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($60,000,000))

$59,036,000

Sec. 6009. 2020 c 356 s 1006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Early Learning Facilities (40000044)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $300,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to the department for the early learning facilities grants in this section.

(2) $9,062,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects in the following amounts:

Proclaim Liberty Early Learning Facility. . . .$1,000,000

Roosevelt Child Care Center. . . .$1,500,000

City of Monroe, Boys & Girls Club ECEAP Facility. . . .$1,000,000

Family Support Center Olympia. . . .$600,000

Centralia-Chehalis Early Learning Conversion

Project. . . .$3,000,000

Club Discovery Early Learning. . . .$100,000

Anacortes Family Center. . . .$309,000

Boys & Girls Club Daycare. . . .$773,000

Issaquah School District Early Learning Center. . . .$155,000

Opportunity Council Early Learning Central Kitchen. . . .$52,000

Samish Longhouse Early Learning Center Expansion. . . .$273,000

Triumph Treatment Services Child Care. . . .$300,000

(3) (($4,186,000))$3,410,000 of the early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects for school districts, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092, in the following amounts:

Toppenish School District. . . .$111,000

Manson School District. . . .$400,000

Kettle Falls School District. . . .$395,000

North Thurston School District. . . .$324,000

Ellensburg School District . . . .$800,000

Everett School District. . . .(($800,000))$24,000

Tukwila School District. . . .$196,000

Richland School District. . . .$800,000

Lake Quinault School District. . . .$360,000

(4) The remaining portion of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for early learning facility grants and loans subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092 to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations.

(5) The department of children, youth, and families must develop methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department of commerce and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(6) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556.

(7) The department of commerce must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.

(8) When prioritizing applications for projects, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, within the boundaries of a regional transit authority in a county that has received distributions or appropriations under RCW 43.79.520, the department must give priority to applications for which at least ten percent of the total project cost is supported by those distributions or appropriations.

(9) The department, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of children, youth, and families must identify buildings in the inventory and condition of schools database that are no longer included in the inventory of K-12 instructional space for purposes of calculating school construction assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.515 RCW, but that could be repurposed as early learning facilities and made available to eligible organizations. The department must report its findings and the list of buildings identified in this section to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 15, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,362,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$22,248,000

Early Learning Facilities Development

Account—State
. . . .
(($4,186,000))

$3,410,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($35,796,000))

$35,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($115,796,000))

$115,020,000

Sec. 6010. 2020 c 356 s 1011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

?al?al "Home" in Lushootseed (Seattle). . . .$947,000

4th Ave. Street Enhancement (White Center). . . .$670,000

Abigail Stuart House (Olympia). . . .$250,000

Aging in PACE Washington (AiPACE) (Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Airport Utility Extension (Pullman). . . .$1,626,000

Aquatic and Recreation Center (King County). . . .$1,050,000

Arivva Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Arlington B&G Club Parking Safety (Arlington). . . .$530,000

Asotin Masonic Lodge (Asotin). . . .$62,000

Auburn Arts & Culture Center (Auburn). . . .$500,000

Audubon Center (Sequim). . . .$1,000,000

B&GC of Olympic Peninsula (Port Angeles). . . .$500,000

B&GC of Thurston County (Lacey). . . .$98,000

Ballard Food Bank (Seattle). . . .$750,000

Beacon Center Renovation (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Bellevue HERO House (Bellevue). . . .$46,000

Benton Co. Museum Building Improvements (Prosser). . . .$103,000

Big Brothers Big Sisters Learning Lab (Olympia). . . .$56,000

Blue Mountain Action Council Comm. Services Center

(Walla Walla). . . .$1,000,000

Bothell Downtown Revitalization (Bothell). . . .$1,500,000

Bowers Field Airport (Ellensburg). . . .$275,000

Boys & Girls Club of Thurston Co. Upgrades (Rochester). . . .$31,000

Boys & Girls Club Roof and Flooring Repairs (Federal Way). . . .$319,000

Brezee Creek Culvert Replacement/East 4th St. Widening

(La Center). . . .$1,500,000

Browns Park Project (Spokane Valley). . . .$536,000

Buffalo Soldiers' Museum (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Camas Washougal Nature Play Area (Washougal). . . .$103,000

Campus Towers (Longview). . . .$228,000

Carbonado Water Source Protection Acquisition

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Carl Maxey Center (Spokane). . . .$350,000

Carlisle Lake Park Improvements (Onalaska). . . .$213,000

Carlyle Housing Facility Upgrades (Spokane). . . .$400,000

Cathlamet Pioneer Center Restoration (Cathlamet). . . .$165,000

Centerville Fire Dept. (Centerville). . . .$216,000

Centerville Grange (Centerville). . . .$90,000

Centralia Fox Theater (Centralia). . . .$1,000,000

Chehalis River Bridge Ped Safety Lighting Ph2 (Aberdeen). . . .$323,000

Cheney Reclaimed Water Project (Cheney). . . .$2,000,000

Chief Kitsap Education and Community Resource Center

(Poulsbo). . . .$1,000,000

Chief Leschi Schools Facilities & Safety Project

(Puyallup). . . .$250,000

Chief Leschi Schools Safety & Security (Puyallup). . . .$250,000

Clymer Museum Remodel Ph2 (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Colfax Pantry Building (Colfax). . . .$247,000

Community Services of Moses Lake Food Bank Facility

(Moses Lake). . . .$2,000,000

Conconully Community Services Complex (Conconully). . . .$515,000

Cosmopolis Elem. Energy & Safety (Cosmopolis). . . .$206,000

Coulee City Medical Clinic (Coulee City). . . .$150,000

Curran House Museum (University Place). . . .$43,000

Dakota Homestead (Seattle). . . .$155,000

Dawson Park Improvements (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Dayton Pump Station (Edmonds). . . .$515,000

Downtown Park Gateway (Bellevue). . . .$1,030,000

Dungeness River Audubon Center Expansion (Sequim). . . .$500,000

East Blaine Infrastructure (Blaine). . . .$500,000

Ejido Community Farm (Whatcom). . . .$250,000

El Centro de la Raza Federal Way Office (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Enumclaw Aquatic Center (Enumclaw). . . .$258,000

Enumclaw Expo Center Roof (Enumclaw). . . .$250,000

Everett TOD Study (Everett). . . .$200,000

Everett YMCA (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

Evergreen High School Health Center (Vancouver). . . .$388,000

Evergreen Speedway Capital Improvement (Monroe). . . .$150,000

Excelsior Integrated Care Ctr. Sports Court (Spokane). . . .$266,000

Excelsior Roof & Gym Repair (Spokane). . . .$263,000

Excelsior Vocational Education Space (Spokane). . . .$164,000

Expanding on Excellence Capital Campaign (White Salmon). . . .$500,000

Family Education and Support Services (Tumwater). . . .$500,000

Felts Field Gateway Improvement Phase 1 (Spokane). . . .$100,000

Fennel Creek Trailhead (Bonney Lake). . . .$258,000

Filipino Hall Renovation (Wapato). . . .$63,000

Fircrest Pool (Fircrest). . . .$1,000,000

FISH Food Bank (Ellensburg). . . .$772,000

Fishtrap Creek Habitat Improvement (Lynden). . . .$258,000

Flood Plain Stabilization, Habitat Enhancement (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Food Lifeline (Seattle). . . .$1,004,000

Foothills Trail Extension (Wilkeson). . . .$500,000

Fort Steilacoom Park Artificial Turf Infields

(Lakewood). . . .$1,015,000

Fourth Plain Community Commons (Vancouver). . . .$800,000

Garfield Co. Hospital HVAC (Pomeroy). . . .$250,000

Gateway Center (Grays Harbor). . . .$500,000

Gene Coulon Memorial Beach Park Play Equipment

Upgrade (Renton). . . .$618,000

George Community Hall Roof (George). . . .$201,000

George Davis Creek Fish Passage Project (Sammamish). . . .$515,000

Gig Harbor Food Bank (Gig Harbor). . . .$180,000

Goldendale Airport (Goldendale). . . .$550,000

Granger Historical Museum Construction (Granger). . . .$150,000

Granite Falls Police Dept. Renovation Project

(Granite Falls). . . .$412,000

Grays Harbor and Willapa Bay Sedimentation (Grays Harbor). . . .$464,000

Grays Harbor YMCA (Grays Harbor). . . .$293,000

Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial (Maple Valley). . . .$102,000

Green Bridges, Healthy Communities; Aurora Bridge I-5

(Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Greenwood Cemetery Restoration (Centralia). . . .$402,000

Greenwood Cemetery Safety Upgrades (Centralia). . . .$91,000

HealthPoint (Tukwila). . . .$1,000,000

HealthPoint Dental Expansion (SeaTac). . . .$1,545,000

Heritage Senior Housing (Chelan). . . .$52,000

High Dune Trail & Conservation Project (Ocean Shores). . . .$140,000

Historic Downtown Chelan Revitalization (Chelan). . . .$52,000

Historic Olympic Stadium Preservation Project (Hoquiam). . . .$515,000

Historical Museum & Community Center Roof Replacement

(Washtucna). . . .$24,000

Historical Society Energy Upgrades (Anderson Island). . . .$14,000

Hoh Tribe Broadband (Grays Harbor). . . .$129,000

Horseshoe Lake ADA Upgrades (Woodland). . . .$82,000

Housing Needs Study (Statewide). . . .$200,000

Howard Bowen Event Complex (Sumas). . . .$1,712,000

Howe Farm Water Service (Port Orchard). . . .$52,000

ICHS Bellevue Clinic Renovation Project (Bellevue). . . .$1,600,000

Illahee Preserve's Lost Continent Acquisition (Bremerton). . . .$335,000

Imagine Children's Museum Expansion and Renovation

(Everett). . . .$2,000,000

Index Water System Design (Index). . . .$23,000

Infrastructure for Economic Development (Port Townsend). . . .$675,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center Phase 1 (Yakima). . . .$500,000

Interactive Educ. Enh./Friends Issaquah Hatchery

(Issaquah). . . .$113,000

Intersection Improvements Juanita Dr. (Kirkland). . . .$750,000

Japanese American Exclusion Memorial (Bainbridge Island). . . .$155,000

Japanese Gulch Daylight Project (Mukilteo). . . .$400,000

Keller House and Carriage House Paint Restoration

(Colville). . . .$45,000

Key Kirkland Sidewalk Repairs (Kirkland). . . .$537,000

Key Peninsula Elder Community (Gig Harbor). . . .$1,000,000

Ki-Be School Parking Lot Improvements (Benton City). . . .$268,000

Kitsap Conservation Study (Kitsap). . . .$51,000

Kittitas Valley Event Center (Ellensburg). . . .$206,000

Klickitat Co. Sheriff Office Training Bldg. (Goldendale). . . .$335,000

KNKX Radio Studio (Tacoma). . . .$824,000

Lacey Veterans Services Hub Facility Renovation (Lacey). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Chelan Community Center (Lake Chelan). . . .$250,000

Lake Chelan Water Supply (Wenatchee). . . .$464,000

Lake City Community Center Replacement (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center Phase II (Lake Stevens). . . .$1,000,000

Lake Sylvia State Park Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$250,000

Lake Wilderness Park Improvements (Maple Valley). . . .$200,000

Land Use & Infrastructure Subarea Plan (Mill Creek). . . .$300,000

Larson Gallery Renovation (Yakima). . . .$875,000

Leffler Park (Manson). . . .$265,000

Legacy in Motion (Puyallup). . . .$1,750,000

Legacy Site Utility Infrastructure (Maple Valley). . . .$154,000

Lewis Co. CHS Pediatric Clinic (Centralia). . . .$84,000

Little Badger Mountain Trailhead (Richland). . . .$464,000

Little Mountain Road Pipeline and Booster Station

(Mount Vernon). . . .$1,300,000

Long Beach Police Department (Long Beach). . . .$705,000

Lopez Island Swim Center (Lopez Island). . . .$1,000,000

Lummi Hatchery Project (San Juan). . . .$1,000,000

Mabton City Park (Mabton). . . .$54,000

Main Street Redevelopment Project - Phase 2

(University Place). . . .$985,000

Mariner Community Campus (Everett). . . .$2,250,000

Mary's Place (Burien). . . .$2,050,000

Marymount Museum/Spana-Park Senior Center (Spanaway). . . .$1,000,000

McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$500,000

McCormick Woods Sewer Lift #2 Improvements (Port Orchard). . . .$800,000

Melanie Dressel Park (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Mercer Is/Aubrey Davis Park Trail Upgrade (Mercer Island). . . .$500,000

Missing & Murdered Indigenous Women Memorial (Toppenish). . . .$49,000

Monroe B&G Club ADA Improvements (Monroe). . . .$464,000

Mountlake Terrace Main Street (Mountlake Terrace). . . .$750,000

Mt. Adams Comm. Forest, Klickitat Canyon Rim Purchase

(Glenwood). . . .$400,000

Mt. Adams School District Athletic Fields (Harrah). . . .$242,000

Mt. Peak Fire Lookout Tower (Enumclaw). . . .$381,000

Mt. Spokane SP Ski Lift (Mead). . . .$750,000

Mukilteo Promenade (Mukilteo). . . .$500,000

Museum Storage Building (Steilacoom). . . .$72,000

Naches Fire/Rescue, Yakima Co. #3 (Naches). . . .$200,000

Naselle HS Music/Vocational Wing (Naselle). . . .$258,000

Naselle Primary Care Clinic (Naselle). . . .$216,000

Naselle SD Flooring (Naselle). . . .$237,000

NCRA Maint. Bldg., Parking Lot, Event Space (Castle Rock). . . .$283,000

NEW Health Programs, Colville Dental Clinic (Colville). . . .$1,250,000

Newman Lake Flood Control Zone District (Newman Lake). . . .$415,000

North Elliott Bay Public Dock; Marine Transit Terminal

(Seattle). . . .$1,750,000

Northaven Affordable Senior Housing Campus (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Northshore Senior Center Rehabilitation Project (Bothell). . . .$500,000

Northwest African American Museum (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Northwest Native Canoe Center (Seattle). . . .$986,000

NW School of Wooden Boatbuilding (Port Hadlock). . . .$464,000

Oak Harbor Marina (Oak Harbor). . . .$400,000

Oakville SD Kitchen Renovation (Oakville). . . .$517,000

Oddfellows Ellensburg Bldg. Restoration (Ellensburg). . . .$267,000

Opening Doors - Permanent Supportive Housing Facility

(Bremerton). . . .$750,000

Orting City Hall and Police Station (Orting). . . .$600,000

Orting Ped Evac Crossing (Orting). . . .$103,000

Othello Regional Water (Othello). . . .$425,000

Outdoors for All (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Pacific Co. Fairgrounds Roof (Menlo). . . .$210,000

Packwood FEMA Floodplain Study (Packwood). . . .$637,000

Pasco Farmers Market & Park (Pasco). . . .$154,000

Pendergast Regional Park Phase II (Bremerton). . . .$50,000

Peninsula Community Health Service Dental Mobile

(Bremerton). . . .$340,000

PenMet - Cushman Trail Enhancements (Gig Harbor). . . .$52,000

PenMet Community Rec Center (Gig Harbor). . . .$173,000

Pet Overpopulation Prevention Vet Clinic Building

(West Richland). . . .$300,000

Pine Garden Apartment Roof (Shelton). . . .$46,000

Pioneer Park Fountain (Walla Walla). . . .$9,000

Pomeroy Booster Pumping Station (Pomeroy). . . .$112,000

Port of Everett (Everett). . . .$300,000

Port of Ilwaco Boatyard Modernization (Ilwaco). . . .$545,000

Port of Willapa Harbor Dredging Support Boat (Tokeland). . . .$180,000

Poulsbo Historical Society (Poulsbo). . . .$400,000

Prairie View Schoolhouse Community Center (Waverly). . . .$57,000

Protect Sewer Plant from Erosion (Ocean Shores). . . .$155,000

Puyallup Culvert Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$515,000

Puyallup Street Frontage Improvement (Puyallup). . . .$258,000

Puyallup VFW Kitchen Renovation (Puyallup). . . .$52,000

Quincy Hospital (Quincy). . . .$300,000

Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$206,000

Recreation Park Renovation (Chehalis). . . .$258,000

Redmond Pool (Redmond). . . .$1,000,000

Renton Trail Connector (Renton). . . .$500,000

Richmond Highland Recreation Center Repairs (Shoreline). . . .$500,000

Rise Together White Center Project (King County). . . .$1,000,000

Ritzville Business & Entrepreneurship Center (Ritzville). . . .$350,000

Rosalia Sewer Improvements (Rosalia). . . .$500,000

Roslyn Downtown Assoc. (Roslyn). . . .$480,000

Roslyn Housing Project (Roslyn). . . .$2,000,000

Royal Park & Rec Ctr. (Royal City). . . .$250,000

Sargent Oyster House Maritime Museum (Allyn). . . .$218,000

Schmid Ballfields Ph3 (Washougal). . . .$584,000

Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex (Woodland). . . .$500,000

Sea Mar Community Health Centers Tumwater Dental

(Olympia). . . .$170,000

Seaport Landing (Aberdeen). . . . $404,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Seattle Goodwill (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Sewage Lagoon Decommissioning (Concrete). . . .$255,000

Shelton Civic Center Parking Lot (Shelton). . . .$283,000

Shoreline Maintenance Facility - Brightwater Site

(Shoreline). . . .$500,000

Skabob House Cultural Center (Shelton). . . .$350,000

Skagit County Sheriff Radios (Skagit). . . .$1,000,000

Skamania Courthouse Plaza (Stevenson). . . .$150,000

Snohomish Carnegie Project (Snohomish). . . .$500,000

Snohomish County Sheriff's Office South Precinct

(Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Snohomish Fire District #26 Communications Project

(Gold Bar). . . .$27,000

Snoqualmie Early Learning Center (Snoqualmie). . . .$500,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Activities Center (North Bend). . . .$412,000

South Fork Snoqualmie Levee Setback Project (North Bend). . . .$250,000

SOZO Sports Indoor Arena (Yakima). . . .$600,000

Spokane Sportsplex (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Springbrook Park Expansion & Clover Creek Restoration

(Lakewood). . . .$773,000

SR 503 Ped/Bike Ph1&2 (Woodland). . . .$235,000

SR 530 "Oso" Slide Memorial (Arlington). . . .$300,000

Stan and Joan Cross Park (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Starfire Sports STEM (Tukwila). . . .$250,000

Stevens Co. Disaster Response Communications (Colville). . . .$500,000

Sultan Water Treatment Plant Design (Sultan). . . .$246,000

Sumas History Themed Playground and Water Park (Sumas). . . .$288,000

Sunnyside Airport Hangar Maintenance Facility

(Sunnyside). . . .$750,000

Sunnyside Yakima Valley-TEC Welding Program (Yakima). . . .$26,000

Sunset Multi-Service & Career Development Center

(Renton). . . .$1,000,000

SW WA Dance Center (Chehalis). . . .$62,000

SW WA Fairgrounds (Chehalis). . . .$103,000

SW Washington Regional Agriculture & Innovation Park

(Tenino). . . .$1,500,000

Swede Hall Renovation (Rochester). . . .$196,000

Tacoma Community House (Tacoma). . . .$413,000

Tam O'Shanter Park Circulation & Parking Phase 2

(Kelso). . . .$1,030,000

Tehaleh Slopes Bike Trail (Bonney Lake). . . .$309,000

Tenino City Hall Renovation (Tenino). . . .$515,000

Terminal 1 Waterfront Development (Vancouver). . . .$4,700,000

The AMP: Aids Memorial Pathway (Seattle). . . .$600,000

The Morck Hotel (Aberdeen). . . .$500,000

Toledo Sewer & Water (Toledo). . . .$469,000

Tonasket Senior Citizen Ctr. (Tonasket). . . .$33,000

Town Center to Burke Gilman Trail Connector

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$500,000

Tukwila Village Food Hall (Tukwila). . . .$400,000

Twin Springs Park (Kenmore). . . .$155,000

Twisp Civic Building & EOC (Twisp). . . .$1,288,000

United Way of Pierce County HVAC (Tacoma). . . .$206,000

University Place Arts (University Place). . . .$34,000

Vertical Evacuation (Ocean Shores). . . .$500,000

Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$123,000

Veterans Supportive Housing (Yakima). . . .$2,500,000

VOA Lynnwood Center (Lynnwood). . . . $1,050,000

Volunteer Park Amphitheater (Seattle). . . .$500,000

West Kelso Affordable Housing & Community Facility Study

(Kelso). . . .$258,000

WA Poison Control IT (Seattle). . . .$151,000

Waitsburg Taggart Road Waterline (Waitsburg). . . .$456,000

Wallula Dodd Water System Improvement (Walla Walla). . . .$1,000,000

Wapato Creek Restoration (Fife). . . .$258,000

Warren Ave. Playfield (Bremerton). . . .$206,000

Washington Park Boat Launch Storm Damage (Anacortes). . . .$200,000

Wesley Homes (Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Westport Dredge Material Use (Westport). . . .$250,000

Whidbey Is. B&G Coupeville (Coupeville). . . .$849,000

Whidbey Is. B&G Oak Harbor (Oak Harbor). . . .$743,000

Wilkeson Water Protection (Wilkeson). . . .$36,000

Willapa BH - Long Beach Safety Improvement Project

(Long Beach). . . .$225,000

William Shore Memorial Pool (Port Angeles). . . .$840,000

Wing Luke Museum Homestead Home (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Wisdom Ridge Business Park (Ridgefield). . . .$2,000,000

Yakima Co. Veterans Dental Facility (Yakima). . . .$469,000

Yakima Valley Fair & Rodeo Multi-Use Facility

(Grandview). . . .$200,000

Yelm Business Incubator Serving Thurston/Pierce

Counties (Yelm). . . .$200,000

Yelm Water Tower (Yelm). . . .$303,000

YMCA Childcare Center Tenant Improvements (Woodinville). . . .$1,000,000

(8) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Oak Harbor to enhance the fiscal sustainability and revenue generation of the city-owned marina through feasibility work, planning, development, and acquisition.

(9) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract for a study regarding both available and needed affordable housing for farmworkers and Native Americans in Washington state. The study must include data to inform policies related to affordable housing for farmworkers and Native Americans and supplement the housing assessment conducted by the affordable housing advisory board created in chapter 43.185B RCW.

(10) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Tacoma buffalo soldiers' museum to conduct a feasibility study for the rehabilitation of building 734, the band barracks at Fort Lawton in Discovery park. The study will provide an assessment of general conditions of building 734 and cost estimates for a comprehensive rehabilitation of the building to meet current building codes including, but not limited to heating, ventilation, air conditioning, and mechanical systems, seismic retrofits, and compliance with the Americans with disabilities act.

(11) $1,300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Skagit public utility district for the Little Mountain Road pipeline and booster station. $1,000,000 of these funds are provided solely for the design phase of the project; $150,000 of these funds are provided solely for land acquisition; and $150,000 of these funds are provided solely to the district for a public outreach effort to solicit input on the project from residents and rate payers.

(12) $1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for preconstruction activities by Aging in PACE (AiPACE) (Seattle).

(13) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section for Roslyn Housing Project is provided solely for a grant to enable Forterra NW, or a wholly-owned subsidiary of Forterra NW, to begin work on a community development project in the city of Roslyn that includes housing, commercial, retail, or governmental uses. The work must include phased preacquisition due diligence, land acquisition or predevelopment engineering, design, testing, and permitting activities, including work done by both the appropriation recipient and third parties retained by the recipient.

(14) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a feasibility study to locate the Buffalo Soldiers Museum at Fort Lawton in Seattle. Approval of a memorandum of understanding regarding the feasibility study must involve the city of Seattle and the Buffalo Soldiers Museum. The department may not impose any additional requirements on the feasibility study.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$163,011,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$163,011,000

Sec. 6011. 2020 c 356 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021 Local and Community Projects (40000130)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

?a?al Chief Seattle Club (Seattle). . . .$200,000

92nd Ave. Sewer Ext. (Battle Ground). . . .$258,000

Academy Smokestack Preservation (Vancouver). . . .$103,000

African Refugee & Immigrant Housing (Tukwila). . . .$200,000

AG Tour Train Ride (Reardan). . . .$125,000

Algona Wetland Preserve and Trail (Algona). . . .$50,000

Anderson Island Historical Society (Anderson Island). . . .$10,000

Anderson Road Infrastructure (Chelan). . . .$258,000

Ashley House (Shoreline). . . .$100,000

Asotin County Library Meeting Space (Clarkston). . . .$13,000

ASUW Shell House (WWI Hanger/Canoe House) (Seattle). . . .$100,000

Auburn Family YMCA (Auburn). . . .$128,000

Ballard P-Patch (Seattle). . . .$258,000

Ballinger Park-Hall Creek Restoration

(Mountlake Terrace). . . .$200,000

Bellevue Parks Changing Tables (Bellevue). . . .$100,000

Bethel High School Pierce College Annex Campus

(Graham). . . .$300,000

Brewery Park Visitor Center (Tumwater). . . .$50,000

Brewing Malting & Distilling System (Tumwater). . . .$112,000

Bridgeport Irrigation (Brewster). . . .$70,000

Cathlamet Pioneer Center Restoration (Cathlamet). . . .$55,000

Centralia Chehalis Steam Train Repair (Chehalis). . . .$154,000

Centro Cultural Mexicano (Redmond). . . .$80,000

City of Fircrest Meter Replacement (Fircrest). . . .$200,000

Columbia Dance Down Payment for Building Purchase

(Vancouver). . . .$100,000

Columbia Heritage Museum Repairs (Ilwaco). . . .$150,000

Communities of Concern Commission (Statewide). . . .$250,000

Community House on Broadway Kitchen Upgrades

(Longview). . . .$41,000

Community Hub Public Safety Initiative (Walla Walla). . . .$200,000

Community Pedestrian Safety (Tukwila). . . .$100,000

Community Youth Services Renovation (Olympia). . . .$155,000

Conconully Fire & Rescue (Riverside). . . .$179,000

Creative Districts (Statewide). . . .$200,000

Crosswalk Teen Shelter (Spokane). . . .$2,500,000

Doris Morrison Environmental Learning Center

(Greenacres). . . .$500,000

Downtown Pasco Revitalization (Pasco). . . .$350,000

Edmonds Carbon Recovery (Edmonds). . . .$250,000

EL 79.2 Distribution System Design (Othello). . . .$175,000

El Centro de la Raza (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Emergency Lockdown Shelter for Outdoor Preschool

(various). . . .$24,000

Emergency Shelter Project (Skykomish). . . .$20,000

Emergency Structural Repairs 1902 Van Marter Building

(Lind). . . .$25,000

Everett Recovery Cafe Renovation Project (Everett). . . .$200,000

Federal Way Little League Fields (Federal Way). . . .$50,000

Federal Way Safety Cameras (Federal Way). . . .$103,000

Field Arts and Events Hall (Port Angeles). . . .$1,500,000

Filipino Community Center (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Filipino-American Community Center (Bremerton). . . .$165,000

Five Mile Roundabout Art Project (Spokane). . . .$25,000

Fort Worden PDA - Sage Arts & Ed Center

(Port Townsend). . . .$560,000

Franklin Pierce Farm ARC (Tacoma). . . .$1,070,000

Fusion Housing (Federal Way). . . .$62,000

George Schmid Ball Field #3 and Lighting Phase 3

(Washougal). . . .$200,000

Gig Harbor Community Campus (Gig Harbor). . . .$52,000

Gig Harbor Peninsula FISH (Gig Harbor). . . .$250,000

Grant Co. Fairgrounds Lighting (Moses Lake). . . .$290,000

Harlequin State Theater (Olympia). . . .$88,000

Hilltop Housing (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Home At Last (Tacoma). . . .$200,000

If You Could Save Just One (Spokane). . . .$100,000

Index Water Line Replacement and Repair (Index). . . .$105,000

Institute for Community Leadership (Kent). . . .$46,000

Islands' Oil Spill Association (Friday Harbor). . . .$232,000

Jefferson County Food Preservation

(Port Ludlow). . . .$5,000

King County ((Emergency Training Facility))Raging River Quarry

Property (Fall City). . . .$1,000,000

Kingston Coffee Oasis (Kingston). . . .$150,000

Kitsap Humane Society (Silverdale). . . .$500,000

Klickitat Co. Domestic Violence Shelter (Goldendale). . . .$250,000

Lacey Food Bank (Lacey). . . .$193,000

Lake Stevens Early Learning Library (Lake Stevens). . . .$150,000

Lake WA Loop Trail Bicycle Safety Improvements (Kenmore). . . .$200,000

Lakebay Marina Acquisition & Preservation (Lakebay). . . .$100,000

Levee Repair (Starbuck). . . .$50,000

Levee Repair (Waitsburg). . . .$100,000

LGBTQ Senior Center (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Lions Club Community Ctr. Generator (Lyle). . . .$5,000

Longview Police Dept. New Office (Longview). . . .$250,000

Lower Yakima River Restoration (Richland). . . .$258,000

Magnuson Park Center for Excellence Building 2

(Seattle). . . .$78,000

Mason Co./Shelton YMCA (Shelton). . . .$750,000

Mini Mart City Park (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Morrow Manor (Poulsbo). . . .$250,000

Mount Zion Housing (Seattle). . . .$250,000

Mukilteo Solar Panels (Mukilteo). . . .$40,000

New Arcadia (Auburn). . . .$100,000

New Beginnings House (Puyallup). . . .$150,000

Non-motorized Bridge at Bothell Landing (Bothell). . . .$155,000

Our Lady of Fatima Community Ctr. (Moses Lake). . . .$128,000

Pataha Flour Mill Elevator (Pomeroy). . . .$40,000

Pete's Pool Ball Field Renovation (Enumclaw). . . .$77,000

Pike Place Market Public Access (Seattle). . . .$50,000

Point Wilson Lighthouse (Port Townsend). . . .$60,000

Port Angeles Boys and Girls Club (Port Angeles). . . .$400,000

Port of Quincy Intermodal Terminal Infrastructure

(Quincy). . . .$100,000

Port Susan Trail (Stanwood). . . .$200,000

Puyallup Food Bank Facility Expansion (Puyallup). . . .$217,000

Puyallup VFW Orting Civil War Medal of Honor Monument

(Orting). . . .$7,000

Ramstead Regional Park (Everson). . . .$200,000

REACH Literacy Center (Lacey). . . .$50,000

Redondo Fishing Pier (Des Moines). . . .$350,000

Renewable Hydrogen Production Pilot (East Wenatchee). . . .$250,000

Replacement Hospice House (Richland). . . .$200,000

Restroom Renovation (Ilwaco). . . .$35,000

Ridgefield Library Building Project (Ridgefield). . . .$500,000

Roy Water Tower (Roy). . . .$26,000

S. Kitsap HS NJROTC Equipment (Port Orchard). . . .$24,000

Safety Driven Replacement (Lake Stevens). . . .$125,000

Salvation Army Community Resource Center (Yakima). . . .$200,000

Sargent Oyster House Restoration (Allyn). . . .$10,000

Satsop Business Park (Elma). . . .$155,000

School and Transit Connector Sidewalk (Kirkland). . . .$120,000

School District & Comm Emergency Preparedness Center

(Carbonado). . . .$200,000

((Shelton-Mason County YMCA (Shelton). . . .$200,000))

Shore Aquatic Center Expansion (Port Angeles). . . .$200,000

Sign Reinstallation at Maplewood Elementary (Puyallup). . . .$5,000

Skagit Pump Station Modernization Design

(Mount Vernon). . . .$52,000

Sky Valley Emergency Generators (Sultan). . . .$75,000

Sky Valley Teen Center (Sultan). . . .$103,000

Sno Valley Kiosk (North Bend). . . .$20,000

Snohomish Boys and Girls Club (Snohomish). . . .$125,000

Snoqualmie Valley Shelter Service Resource

(Snoqualmie). . . .$200,000

South Yakima Conservation District Groundwater Mgmt

(Yakima). . . .$45,000

Spokane Sportsplex (Spokane). . . .$200,000

Spokane Valley Museum (Spokane Valley). . . .$70,000

Star Park Shelter (Ferndale). . . .$180,000

Stevens Elementary Solar Panels (Seattle). . . .$120,000

Sullivan Park Waterline Installation (Spokane Valley). . . .$130,000

Thurston Boys and Girls Club (Lacey). . . .$50,000

Trail Lighting - Cross Kirkland Corridor (Kirkland). . . .$200,000

Transitions TLC Transitional Housing Renovations

(Spokane). . . .$100,000

Vashon Food Bank Site Relocation (Vashon). . . .$36,000

Vashon Youth and Family Services (Vashon). . . .$86,000

WA Poison Center Emergency Response to

COVID-19 (Seattle). . . .$124,000

Waikiki Springs Nature Preserve (Spokane). . . .$1,548,000

Washington State Horse Park and Covered Arena

(Ellensburg). . . .$375,000

Wenatchee Valley Museum & Cultural Ctr. (Wenatchee). . . .$283,000

West Biddle Lake Dam Restoration (Vancouver). . . .$412,000

William Shore Pool (Port Angeles). . . .$500,000

Yakima County Care Campus Conversion Project (Yakima). . . .$275,000

Yelm Lions Club Cabin Renovation (Yelm). . . .$207,000

(8) It is the intent of the legislature that future applications for state funding for the ASUW Shell House be made through competitive grant programs.

(9) The Creative Districts program funded in this section shall be administered by the Washington state arts commission. The commission is authorized to use up to three percent of the funds to administer the program.

(10) Funds provided in this section for the Crosswalk Teen Shelter project are for preconstruction activities, including acquisition. Any remaining funds may be used for construction as long as the balance of nonstate funds needed to complete the project are firmly committed.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($29,970,000))

$32,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($29,970,000))

$32,270,000

Sec. 6012. 2020 c 356 s 1009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Seattle Vocational Institute (40000136)

It is the intent of the legislature that this funding be provided for the Seattle Vocational Institute no later than June 30, 2021, once the community preservation and development authority has selected board members and the title of the Seattle Vocational Institute building has been transferred to the board.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,300,000))

$1,125,000

State Taxable Construction Account—State
. . . .
$175,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,300,000

Sec. 6013. 2019 c 413 s 1058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(2) $1,000,000 of the reappropriation, not to exceed the amount remaining from the original appropriation, originally for the South Kirkland TOD/Cross Kirkland Corridor, may be used for the pedestrian crossing project at Kirkland Avenue and Lake Street.

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$2,528,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$3,528,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$33,109,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($37,109,000))

$36,637,000

Sec. 6014. 2019 c 413 s 1060 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$40,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$30,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($32,128,000))

$32,088,000

Sec. 6015. 2020 c 356 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Enhanced Shelter Capacity Grants (92000939)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($7,818,000))$6,318,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a homeless shelter grant program for the following list of shelter projects:

Auburn Resource Center (Auburn). . . .$1,500,000

Community House (Longview). . . .$206,000

((Crosswalk Teen Shelter (Spokane). . . .$1,500,000))

Harbor Hope Center Home for Girls (Gig Harbor). . . .$294,000

Noah's Ark Homeless Shelter (Wapato). . . .$100,000

Positive Adolescent Dev (PAD) Emergency Housing

(Bellingham). . . .$206,000

Rod's House Mixed Use Facility (Yakima). . . .$2,000,000

ROOTS Young Adult Shelter (Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Snoqualmie Valley Resource Center (Snoqualmie). . . .$206,000

St. Vincent de Paul Cold Weather Shelter (Renton). . . .$206,000

YMCA Oasis Teen Shelter (Mount Vernon). . . .$100,000

(2) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department of commerce must follow the guidelines and compliance requirements in the Housing Trust Fund program, including provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($7,818,000))

$6,318,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($7,818,000))

$6,318,000

Sec. 6016. 2019 c 413 s 1074 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Transportation Building Preservation (30000777)

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,925,000))

$1,725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,982,000))

$1,782,000

Sec. 6017. 2019 c 413 s 1079 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Building Envelope Repairs (30000829)

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,537,000))

$2,010,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,167,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($4,704,000))

$4,177,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$518,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,222,000))

$4,695,000

Sec. 6018. 2019 c 413 s 1066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Palouse to Cascades Trail Facilitation (92000833)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce to contract for facilitation and mediation of ownership, development, and use conflicts along the Palouse to Cascades trail in Adams and Whitman counties. The contractor shall convene a process that will make recommendations to the legislature by January 15, 2020. The parties to the facilitation shall include, but are not limited to: The state parks and recreation commission, the farm bureau, the department of natural resources, recreational trail user groups, local governments adjacent to the trail, and landowners adjacent to the trail.

(2) The recreation and conservation office shall not release funding for the following project on Washington wildlife and recreation program LEAP capital document No. 2019-5H: Palouse to Cascades Connection Malden and Rosalia, until July 1, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($150,000))

$134,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($150,000))

$134,000

Sec. 6019. 2020 c 356 s 1027 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Campus Modernization (92000020)

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The final predesign for legislative campus modernization must be submitted to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by ((September 1, 2020))February 5, 2021. The department must consult with the senate facilities and operations committee or their designee(s) and the house of representatives executive rules committee or their designee(s) during the development of and prior to finalizing and submitting the final predesign ((on September 1, 2020)).

(a) With respect to the Irv Newhouse building replacement on opportunity site six, the final predesign must include demolition of buildings on opportunity site six((, with the exception of the visitor center)). The predesign must include details and costs for temporary office space on Capitol Campus, for which modular space is an option, to be used at least during the construction of the building for Irv Newhouse occupants. The predesign must also consider an additional floor for the Irv Newhouse building, and this component of predesign must not delay nor impact the final predesign deliverable date. The predesign must assume the following:

(i) Necessary program space required to support senate offices and support functions;

(ii) A building facade similar to the American neoclassical style ((of existing legislative buildings on Capitol Campus))with a base, shaft, and capital expression focus with some relief expressed in modern construction methods to include adding more detailing and depth to the exterior so that it will fit with existing legislative buildings on west Capitol Campus, like the John Cherberg building;

(iii) Member offices of similar size as member offices in the John A. Cherberg building;

(iv) Design and construction of a high performance building that meets net-zero-ready energy standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than thirty-five;

(v) Building construction that ((must))may be procured using a performance-based contracting method, such as design-build, and ((must))may include an energy performance guarantee comparing actual performance data with the energy design target;

(vi) Temporary office space on Capitol Campus, for which modular space is an option, to be used during the construction of the building. Maximizing efficient use of modular space with Pritchard renovation or replacement must be considered;

(vii) Demolition of the buildings((, not including the visitor center,)) located on opportunity site six((. Demolition costs must not exceed six hundred thousand dollars)); and

(viii) At least bimonthly consultation with the senate facilities and operations committee or their designee(s).

(b) With respect to the Pritchard building replacement or renovation, and renovation of the third and fourth floors of the John L. O'Brien building, the predesign must assume the following:

(i) The necessary program space required to support house of representatives offices and support functions;

(ii) Building construction that ((must))may be procured using a performance-based contracting method, such as design-build, and ((must))may include an energy performance guarantee comparing actual performance data with the energy design target;

(iii) Design and construction that meets net-zero-ready energy standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than thirty-five;

(iv) The detail and cost of temporary office space on Capitol Campus, for which modular space is an option, to be used during the construction of the buildings for state employed occupants of any impacted building. Maximizing efficient use of modular space with the Newhouse replacement must be considered; and

(v) At least bimonthly consultation with the leadership of the house of representatives, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, or their designee(s), and tenants of any impacted buildings.

(c) The legislative campus modernization predesign must assume:

(i) Preference for the completion of construction of the Irv Newhouse building before the renovation or replacement of the Pritchard building and before the renovation of the third and fourth floors of the John L. O'Brien building;

(ii) The amount of parking on the capitol campus ((remains the same or increases))may not result in a loss greater than 60 parking spots as a result of the legislative campus modernization construction projects; and

(iii) Options for relocation of the occupants of impacted buildings that are not employed by the state to alternative locations((, including, but not limited to, the visitor center)).

(d) The legislative campus modernization predesign must include an analysis of comparative costs and benefits of locations for needed space, to include the following considerations:

(i) An additional floor added to the Irv Newhouse building replacement, and this component of design must not delay nor impact the final predesign deliverable date;

(ii) Additional space added to the Pritchard replacement or renovation; and

(iii) ((The impact to options to maintain, or increase, the amount of parking on Capitol Campus; and

(iv))) Space needed for legislative support agencies.

(e) The final predesign must include an analysis of the relative costs and benefits of designing and constructing the projects authorized under this section under a single contract or individual subproject contracts, based on an evaluation of, at least, the following criteria:

(i) The interdependency and interaction of the design and construction phases of the subprojects;

(ii) Subproject phasing and sequencing, including the timing and utilization of modular temporary office space on Capitol Campus during the construction phases;

(iii) Potential cost efficiencies under each subproject;

(iv) Provide an evaluation for the most efficient and effective contracting method for subproject delivery, including design-bid-build, general contractor/construction manager, and design-build for each subproject; and

(v) Other collateral impacts.

(f) The department must have a check-in meeting by October 1, 2020, with the administrative office of the senate, the administrative office of the house of representatives, and the legislative capital budget leads. This check-in meeting must be after the predesign is submitted to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees.

(2) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The new appropriations must be coded and tracked as separate discreet subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.

(a) $3,370,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Irv Newhouse building replacement, and the appropriation in this subsection (2)(a) is provided solely for design and construction of the Irv Newhouse building replacement for the senate, located on opportunity site six. The design must assume:

(i) Necessary program space required to support senate offices and support functions;

(ii) A building facade similar to the American neoclassical style ((of existing legislative buildings on Capitol Campus))with a base, shaft, and capital expression focus with some relief expressed in modern construction methods to include adding more detailing and depth to the exterior so that it will fit with existing legislative buildings on west Capitol Campus, like the John Cherberg building;

(iii) Member offices of similar size as member offices in the John A. Cherberg building;

(iv) Design and construction of a high performance building that meets net-zero-ready energy standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than thirty-five;

(v) Building construction that ((must))may be procured using a performance-based contracting method, such as design-build, and ((must))may include an energy performance guarantee comparing actual performance data with the energy design target;

(vi) Temporary office space on Capitol Campus, for which modular space is an option, to be used during the construction of the building. Maximizing efficient use of modular space with Pritchard renovation must be considered;

(vii) Demolition of the buildings((, not including the visitor center,)) located on opportunity site six((. Demolition costs must not exceed six hundred thousand dollars));

(viii) At least bimonthly consultation with the leadership of the senate, or their designee(s), and Irv Newhouse tenants; and

(ix) Procurement request for proposal or qualification of the design solution will be completed and released by ((February))May 1, 2021, and an architectural and engineering team for the design contract will be selected by September 30, 2021, for the Irv Newhouse building replacement.

(b) $6,530,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Pritchard building replacement or renovation((, and the renovation of the third and fourth floors of the John L. O'Brien building)). The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the design and construction and assumes:

(i) The necessary program space required to support house of representatives offices and support functions;

(ii) Additional office space necessary to offset house of representatives members and staff office space that may be eliminated in the renovation of the third and fourth floors of the John L. O'Brien building;

(iii) Design and construction of a high performance building that meets net-zero-ready energy standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than thirty-five;

(iv) Building construction that ((must))may be procured using a performance-based contracting method, such as design-build, and ((must))may include an energy performance guarantee comparing actual performance data with the energy design target;

(v) Temporary office space on Capitol Campus, for which modular space is an option, to be used during the construction of the building. Maximizing efficient use of modular space with Newhouse replacement must be considered; and

(vi) At least bimonthly consultation with the leadership of the house of representatives, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, or their designee(s), and tenants of any impacted building.

(c) $100,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the completion of predesign efforts as described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The department may sell by auction the Ayers and Carlyon houses, known as the press houses, separate and apart from the underlying land, subject to the following conditions:

(a) The purchaser, at its sole cost and expense, must remove the houses by December 31, 2021;

(b) The state is not responsible for any costs or expenses associated with the sale, removal, or relocation of the buildings from opportunity site six; and

(c) Any sale proceeds must be deposited into the Thurston county capital facilities account.

(4) Implementation of subsection (3) of this section is not intended to delay the design and construction of any of the subprojects included in the legislative campus modernization project.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$256,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$89,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$99,450,000

Sec. 6020. 2019 c 413 s 1097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2017-19 Biennium (30000812)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$20,395,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,814,000))

$1,614,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($22,284,000))

$22,084,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,413,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($24,697,000))

$24,497,000

Sec. 6021. 2019 c 413 s 1098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Centralia Readiness Center (30000818)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,289,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,287,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,576,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$174,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($6,750,000))

$7,950,000

Sec. 6022. 2019 c 413 s 1108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Air Support Operations Group (ASOG) Complex (40000163)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($4,766,000))

$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$27,622,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($32,388,000))

$27,622,000

Sec. 6023. 2019 c 413 s 1109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Mission Support Group/Logistics/Communications (MSG-Comm) Facility (40000167)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($2,114,000))

$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,284,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($33,398,000))

$31,284,000

Sec. 6024. 2019 c 413 s 2034 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 28: Treatment & Recovery Center (40000024)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($467,000))

$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$133,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($600,000))

$133,000

Sec. 6025. 2019 c 413 s 2088 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Replace Roofs (30000654)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$675,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,540,000))

$3,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,595,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($6,810,000))

$5,310,000

Sec. 6026. 2019 c 413 s 2089 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Replace Fire Alarm System (30000748)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$180,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($5,284,000))

$4,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$175,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,639,000))

$4,639,000

Sec. 6027. 2019 c 413 s 3020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

((The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $400,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the city of Tacoma to reimburse for clean up and remediation of the former Ruston Way tunnel, including costs that occurred prior to June 30, 2019.))

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
(($2,095,000))

$1,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,565,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($36,660,000))

$36,260,000

Sec. 6028. 2019 c 413 s 3091 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000194)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,260,000 of the model toxics control capital account appropriation is provided solely for reimbursing the Lakewood water district for costs for the Ponders drinking water treatment system, including costs incurred prior to July 1, 2019.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($9,637,000))

$8,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($49,637,000))

$48,204,000

Sec. 6029. 2019 c 413 s 3217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Upper Quinault River Restoration ((Phase 3 (WCRI) (910000958)))(91000958)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

Sec. 6030. 2019 c 413 s 3235 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
(($500,000))

$285,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,388,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,288,000))

$4,073,000

Sec. 6031. 2020 c 356 s 3025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($179,000))

$38,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,091,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,270,000))

$9,129,000

Sec. 6032. 2019 c 413 s 3278 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Pasco Local Improvement District (40000019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$2,894,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$2,894,000

Sec. 6033. 2019 c 413 s 3301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Fircrest Property (91000103)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following purposes:

(1) The department must, in consultation with the office of financial management and the department of social and health services, develop recommendations for future use of underutilized portions of the Fircrest School campus, including the southeast and southwest corners. Recommendations must include options for developing affordable housing and public open space on underutilized portions of the Fircrest School campus and any specific statutory language necessary to implement these recommendations. Recommendations must consider: (a) Current zoning restrictions; (b) current use; (c) current ownership; (d) current revenue generating capacity; (e) any specific statutory language necessary to implement these recommendations; and (f) any legal constraints.

(2) The department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2019.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, Reformatory,

Institutional Account—State
. . . .
(($250,000))

$8,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($250,000))

$8,000

Sec. 6034. 2019 c 413 s 4002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Burn Building - Structural Repairs (30000256)

Fire Service Training Account—State
. . . .
(($750,000))

$550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($750,000))

$550,000

Sec. 6035. 2019 c 413 s 4004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

High Throughput DNA Laboratory (40000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($277,000))$247,000 is provided solely for renovations to the crime lab.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($277,000))

$247,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($277,000))

$247,000

Sec. 6036. 2019 c 413 s 5011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2017-19 School Construction Assistance Program (40000003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($475,282,000))

$488,382,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($255,948,000))

$242,848,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$731,230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$217,520,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$948,750,000

Sec. 6037. 2020 c 356 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance Level (40000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,005,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($851,208,000))

$838,108,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$185,908,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal
. . . .
$3,840,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,040,956,000))

$1,027,856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,870,192,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,911,148,000))

$5,898,048,000

Sec. 6038. 2019 c 413 s 5020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Pilot Program (91000402)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,046,000))

$2,956,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,454,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,500,000))

$12,410,000

Sec. 6039. 2019 c 413 s 5047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Behavioral Health Institute at Harborview Medical Center (((910000025)))(91000025)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($500,000))

$469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($500,000))

$469,000

Sec. 6040. 2020 c 356 s 5011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Behavioral Health Teaching Facility (40000038)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1593 (behavioral health teaching facility). The appropriation provided may be used for predesign, siting, design costs, enabling projects, and early work packages. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.))

(b) The university must submit the predesign to the appropriate legislative committees by February 1, 2020.

(2) The behavioral health teaching facility must provide a minimum of fifty long-term civil commitment beds, fifty ((geriatric/voluntary))geriatric and adult psychiatric beds that treat both voluntary and involuntary treatment act (ITA) patients, where, on an annual basis, an average of at least twenty of the geriatric and adult psychiatric beds are filled with patients who are involuntarily detained at some point during their stay, and fifty licensed medical/surgery beds, ((with the capacity))available to treat medical and surgical problems for patients ((with))who also have a psychiatric diagnoses and/or substance use ((disorders))disorder diagnosis. The University should maximize the use of these medical/surgery beds for patients with psychiatric diagnoses or substance use disorders to the extent practicable. The project construction must also include construction of a 24/7 telehealth consultation program within the facility.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$33,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$191,250,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$224,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6041. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2019 c 413 s 1059 (uncodified); and

(2) 2019 c 413 s 1107 (uncodified).

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001. RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are $49,350,247 for the 2021-2023 biennium, $326,084,463 for the 2023-2025 biennium, and $461,853,431 for the 2025-2027 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $103,143,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new library-archives building.

(4) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,706,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(5) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $110,637,000 plus costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a nursing facility on the fircrest residential habilitation center campus. The department may contract to lease develop or lease purchase the facility. Before entering into a contract, the department must consult with the office of financial management and the office of the state treasurer. Should the department of social and health services choose to use a financing contract that does not provide for the issuance of certificates of participation, the financing contract shall be subject to approval by the state finance committee as required by RCW 39.94.010. In approving a financing contract not providing for the use of certificates of participation, the state finance committee should be reasonably certain that the contract is excluded from the computation of indebtedness, particularly that the contract is not backed by the full faith and credit of the state and the legislature is expressly not obligated to appropriate funds to make payments. For purposes of this subsection, "financing contract" includes but is not limited to a certificate of participation and tax exempt financing similar to that authorized in RCW 47.79.140.

(6) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Grays Harbor College for up to $3,200,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student services and instructional building.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Shoreline Community College for up to $3,128,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an allied health, science, and manufacturing replacement building.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate a health education building.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bates Technical College for up to $1,350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003. (1) To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, agencies must complete a predesign for state construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of $5,000,000, or $10,000,000 for higher education institutions. "Total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project.

(2) Appropriations for design may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign.

(3) The predesign must explore at least three project alternatives. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative should be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management.

(4) The office of financial management may make an exception to the predesign requirements in this section after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comment by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. (1) The legislature finds that use of life-cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects, engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable and cost efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life-cycle costs for any construction project over $10,000,000. The life-cycle costs must represent the present value sum of capital costs, installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most effective approach to the life-cycle cost analysis is to integrate it into the early part of the design process.

(2) Agencies must develop a minimum of three project alternatives for use in the life-cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. Agencies must choose the most reasonable and cost-effective solution, as supported by the life-cycle cost analysis. A brief description of each project alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life-cycle cost analysis section of the predesign.

(3) The office of financial management shall: (a) Make available a life-cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using the life-cycle cost model; and (c) update the life-cycle cost model annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates, and energy rates.

(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms' and general contractors' experience using life-cycle costs, operating costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative contracting methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005. Agencies administering construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of $5,000,000, or $10,000,000 for higher education institutions, must submit progress reports to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. "Total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st of each year in a format determined by the office of financial management. After the project is completed, agencies must also submit a closeout report that identifies the total project cost and any unspent appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.

(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.

(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. (1) Any building project that receives over $10,000,000 in funding from the capital budget must be built to sustainable standards. "Sustainable building" means a building that integrates and optimizes all major high-performance building attributes, including energy efficiency, durability, life-cycle performance, and occupant productivity, and minimizes greenhouse gas emissions. The following design and construction attributes must be integrated into the building project:

(a) Employ integrated design principles: Use a collaborative, integrated planning and design process that initiates and maintains an integrated project team in all stages of a project's planning and delivery. Establish performance goals for siting, energy, water, materials, and indoor environmental quality along with other comprehensive design goals and ensures incorporation of these goals throughout the design and life-cycle of the building. Consider all stages of the building's life-cycle, including deconstruction.

(b) Commissioning: Employ commissioning practices tailored to the size and complexity of the building and its system components in order to verify performance of building components and systems and help ensure that design requirements are met. This should include an experienced commissioning provider, inclusion of commissioning requirements in construction documents, a commissioning plan, verification of the installation and performance of systems to be commissioned, and a commissioning report.

(c) Optimize energy performance: Establish a whole building performance target that takes into account the intended use, occupancy, operations, plug loads, other energy demands, and design to earn the ENERGY STAR targets for new construction and major renovation where applicable. For new construction target low energy use index. For major renovations, target reducing energy use by fifty percent below prerenovations baseline.

(d) On-site renewable energy: Implement renewable energy generation projects on agency property for agency use, when life-cycle cost effective.

(e) High-efficiency electric equipment: Use only high-efficiency electric equipment for water and space heating needs not met through on-site renewable energy, when life-cycle cost effective.

(f) Measurement and verification: For buildings over 50,000 square feet, install building level electricity meters in new major construction and renovation projects to track and continuously optimize performance. Include equivalent meters for natural gas and steam, where natural gas and steam are used. Where appropriate, install dashboards inside buildings to display and incentivize occupants on energy use.

(g) Benchmarking: Compare performance data from the first year of operation with the energy design target. Verify that the building performance meets or exceeds the design target. For other building and space types, use an equivalent benchmarking tool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011. Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of projects on cultural resources and historic properties proposed in state-funded construction or acquisition projects, including grant or pass-through funding that culminates in construction or land acquisitions. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated early in the project planning process, prior to construction or taking title.

Sec. 7012. RCW 43.19.501 and 2020 c 356 s 7005 are each amended to read as follows:

The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by the department in Thurston county.

During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the Thurston county capital facilities account may be appropriated for costs associated with staffing to support capital budget and project activities and lease and facility oversight activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7013. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE.(1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.200 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least eighty percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2021-2023 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Except for art allocations made under K-3 class size reduction grants under section 5023 of this act, art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $200,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7014. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7015. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7016. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.

(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7017. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter . . ., Laws of 2021, (Z-0106/21 (State General Bonds and General Accounts)) for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account to the state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7018. (1) Minor works project lists are single line appropriations that include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000. Funds appropriated in this act for minor works may not be initially allotted until agencies submit project lists to the office of financial management for review and approval.

(2) Revisions to the project lists, including the addition of projects and the transfer of funds between projects, are allowed but must be submitted to the office of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee for review and comment, and must include an explanation of variances from prior approved lists. Any project list revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from the minor works appropriation.

(3)(a) All minor works projects should be completed within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided.

(b) Agencies are prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works projects.

(c) Minor works appropriations may not be used for the following: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works list; movable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; rolling stock; computers; or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized. The office of financial management may make an exception to the limitations described in this subsection (3)(c) for exigent circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

(d) Minor works preservation projects may include program improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual minor works preservation project cost.

(e) Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the minor works categories.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7019. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

(1) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer

to the drinking water assistance account, up to

$5,500,000 for fiscal year 2022 and up to $5,500,000 for

fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$11,000,000

(2) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer

to the statewide broadband account, $20,000,000 for fiscal

year 2022 and $20,000,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$40,000,000

(3) Public Works Assistance Account: For

transfer to the water pollution control revolving

account, up to $6,000,000 for fiscal year 2022 and

up to $6,000,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7020. To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7021. In order to accelerate the reduction of embodied carbon and improve the environmental performance of construction materials, agencies shall, whenever possible, review and consider embodied carbon reported in environmental product declarations when evaluating proposed structural materials for construction projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7022. Consistent with Z-0136/21 (Wage Freeze and Furlough), agencies must track and manage any savings resulting from furloughs and nonimplementation of wage increases. Agencies must report all such program and project savings for fiscal year 2022 to the office of financial management by September 1, 2020, and must report actual and projected program and project savings for fiscal year 2023 to the office of financial management by June 30, 2023. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, this section is void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7023. The joint legislative task force created in 2018 c 298 s 7011 (uncodified) is hereby reauthorized through June 30, 2023, subject to the requirements that studies and selection of scientists or organizations to implement the studies must be made by a sixty percent majority of the members of the task force and that if a member has not been designated for a position set forth in subsection (2) of 2018 c 298 s 7011 (uncodified), that position may not be counted for purposes of determining a quorum.

Sec. 7024. RCW 28B.15.210 and 2019 c 413 s 7023 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as follows:

One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account." The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(5). ((During the 2017-2019 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

Sec. 7025. RCW 28B.15.310 and 2019 c 413 s 7024 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the Washington State University building account.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University building account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings, equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. ((During the 2017-2019 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the legislature.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university, except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as authorized by law.

Sec. 7026. RCW 28B.20.725 and 2019 c 413 s 7025 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7027. RCW 28B.30.750 and 2019 c 413 s 7026 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7028. RCW 28B.35.370 and 2019 c 413 s 7027 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If in any twelve-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law. ((During the 2017-2019 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7029. RCW 28B.50.360 and 2019 c 413 s 7028 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all collected building fees of each such community and technical college shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board, if issuing bonds payable out of building fees, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the community and technical college capital projects account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall be devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and architectural services provided by the department of enterprise services, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. ((During the 2017-2019 biennium, sums in the capital projects account may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.)) During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums in the capital projects account may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums in the capital projects account may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.

(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital projects account may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7030. RCW 28B.77.070 and 2019 c 413 s 7029 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The council shall identify budget priorities and levels of funding for higher education, including the two and four-year institutions of higher education and state financial aid programs. It is the intent of the legislature for the council to make budget recommendations for allocations for major policy changes in accordance with priorities set forth in the ten-year plan, but the legislature does not intend for the council to review and make recommendations on individual institutional budgets. It is the intent of the legislature that recommendations from the council prioritize funding needs for the overall system of higher education in accordance with priorities set forth in the ten-year plan. It is also the intent of the legislature that the council's recommendations take into consideration the total per-student funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.

(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the council shall outline the council's fiscal priorities under the ten-year plan that it must distribute to the institutions, the state board for community and technical colleges, the office of financial management, and the joint higher education committee.

(a) Capital budget outlines for the two-year institutions shall be submitted to the office of financial management by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and shall include the prioritized ranking of the capital projects being requested, a description of each capital project, and the amount and fund source being requested.

(b) Capital budget outlines for the four-year institutions must be submitted to the office of financial management by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and must include: The institutions' priority ranking of the project; the capital budget category within which the project will be submitted to the office of financial management in accordance with RCW 43.88D.010; a description of each capital project; and the amount and fund source being requested.

(c) The office of financial management shall reference these reporting requirements in its budget instructions.

(3) The council shall submit recommendations on the operating budget priorities to support the ten-year plan to the office of financial management by October 1st each year, and to the legislature by January 1st each year.

(4)(a) The office of financial management shall develop one prioritized list of capital projects for the legislature to consider that includes all of the projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education that were scored by the office of financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW, including projects that were previously scored but not funded. The prioritized list of capital projects shall be based on the following priorities in the following order:

(i) Office of financial management scores pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW;

(ii) Preserving assets;

(iii) Degree production; and

(iv) Maximizing efficient use of instructional space.

(b) The office of financial management shall include all of the capital projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education, except for the minor works projects, in the prioritized list of capital projects provided to the legislature.

(c) The form of the prioritized list for capital projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education shall be provided as one list, ranked in priority order with the highest priority project ranked number "1" through the lowest priority project numbered last. The ranking for the prioritized list of capital projects may not:

(i) Include subpriorities;

(ii) Be organized by category;

(iii) Assume any state bond or building account biennial funding level to prioritize the list; or

(iv) Assume any specific share of projects by institution in the priority list.

(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges shall submit any supplemental capital budget requests and revisions to the office of financial management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st.

(6) For the ((2017-2019 fiscal biennium and the)) 2019-2021 fiscal biennium and the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the office of financial management may, but is not obligated to, develop one prioritized list of capital projects for the legislature to consider that includes all of the projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education that were scored by the office of financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW, including projects that were previously scored but not funded.

Sec. 7031. RCW 43.63A.750 and 2020 c 356 s 7008 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A competitive grant program to assist nonprofit organizations in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating performing arts, art museums, and cultural facilities is created.

(2)(a) The department shall submit a list of recommended performing arts, art museum projects, and cultural organization projects eligible for funding to the governor and the legislature in the department's biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2001-2003 biennium and thereafter. The list, in priority order, shall include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project list shall not exceed twelve million dollars, except that lists submitted during the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia may not exceed sixteen million dollars.

(b) The department shall establish a competitive process to prioritize applications for state assistance as follows:

(i) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications from nonprofit organizations, local governments, and other entities, as determined by the department. The department shall evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a citizen advisory committee, including a representative from the state arts commission, using objective criteria. The evaluation and ranking process shall also consider local community support for projects and an examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.

(ii) The department may establish the amount of state grant assistance for individual project applications but the amount shall not exceed twenty percent, or thirty-three and one-third percent for lists submitted during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, of the estimated total capital cost or actual cost of a project, whichever is less. The remaining portions of the project capital cost shall be a match from nonstate sources. The nonstate match may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions. The department is authorized to set matching requirements for individual projects. State assistance may be used to fund separate definable phases of a project if the project demonstrates adequate progress and has secured the necessary match funding.

(iii) The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

Sec. 7032. RCW 39.35D.030 and 2011 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All major facility projects of public agencies receiving any funding in a state capital budget, or projects financed through a financing contract as defined in RCW 39.94.020, must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard. This subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the design phase prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of building or facility. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, high-performance building certifications other than LEED silver standard are allowed where the legislature determines that the certification is at least equivalent to the LEED silver standard.

(2) All major facility projects of any entity other than a public agency or public school district receiving any funding in a state capital budget must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard. This subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the grant application process prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.

(3)(a) Public agencies, under this section, shall monitor and document ongoing operating savings resulting from major facility projects designed, constructed, and certified as required under this section.

(b) Public agencies, under this section, shall report annually to the department on major facility projects and operating savings.

(4) The department shall consolidate the reports required in subsection (3) of this section into one report and report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the department shall also report on the implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED standard was not used as required by RCW 39.35D.020(5)(b). The department shall make recommendations regarding the ongoing implementation of this chapter, including a discussion of incentives and disincentives related to implementing this chapter.

(5) For the purposes of determining compliance with the requirement for a project to be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard, the department must credit one additional point for a project that uses wood products with a credible third-party sustainable forest certification or from forests regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act. For projects that qualify for this additional point, and for which an additional point would have resulted in formal certification under the LEED silver standard, the project must be deemed to meet the standard under this section.

Sec. 7033. RCW 43.88D.010 and 2019 c 413 s 7032 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By October 1st of each even-numbered year, the office of financial management shall complete an objective analysis and scoring of all capital budget projects proposed by the public four-year institutions of higher education and submit the results of the scoring process to the legislative fiscal committees and the four-year institutions. Each project must be reviewed and scored within one of the following categories, according to the project's principal purpose. Each project may be scored in only one category. The categories are:

(a) Access-related projects to accommodate enrollment growth at all campuses, at existing or new university centers, or through distance learning. Growth projects should provide significant additional student capacity. Proposed projects must demonstrate that they are based on solid enrollment demand projections, more cost-effectively provide enrollment access than alternatives such as university centers and distance learning, and make cost-effective use of existing and proposed new space;

(b) Projects that replace failing permanent buildings. Facilities that cannot be economically renovated are considered replacement projects. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being replaced and may include additions to improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support space;

(c) Projects that renovate facilities to restore building life and upgrade space to meet current program requirements. Renovation projects should represent a complete renovation of a total facility or an isolated wing of a facility. A reasonable renovation project should cost between sixty to eighty percent of current replacement value and restore the renovated area to at least twenty-five years of useful life. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being renovated and may include additions to improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support space;

(d) Major stand-alone campus infrastructure projects;

(e) Projects that promote economic growth and innovation through expanded research activity. The acquisition and installation of specialized equipment is authorized under this category; and

(f) Other project categories as determined by the office of financial management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.

(2) The office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall establish a scoring system and process for each four-year project category that is based on the framework used in the community and technical college system of prioritization. Staff from the state board for community and technical colleges and the four-year institutions shall provide technical assistance on the development of a scoring system and process.

(3) The office of financial management shall consult with the legislative fiscal committees in the scoring of four-year institution project proposals, and may also solicit participation by independent experts.

(a) For each four-year project category, the scoring system must, at a minimum, include an evaluation of enrollment trends, reasonableness of cost, the ability of the project to enhance specific strategic master plan goals, age and condition of the facility if applicable, and impact on space utilization.

(b) Each four-year project category may include projects at the predesign, design, or construction funding phase.

(c) To the extent possible, the objective analysis and scoring system of all capital budget projects shall occur within the context of any and all performance agreements between the office of financial management and the governing board of a public, four-year institution of higher education that aligns goals, priorities, desired outcomes, flexibility, institutional mission, accountability, and levels of resources.

(4) In evaluating and scoring four-year institution projects, the office of financial management shall take into consideration project schedules that result in realistic, balanced, and predictable expenditure patterns over the ensuing three biennia.

(5) The office of financial management shall distribute common definitions, the scoring system, and other information required for the project proposal and scoring process as part of its biennial budget instructions. The office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall develop common definitions that four-year institutions must use in developing their project proposals and lists under this section.

(6) In developing any scoring system for capital projects proposed by the four-year institutions, the office of financial management:

(a) Shall be provided with all required information by the four-year institutions as deemed necessary by the office of financial management;

(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate information provided to the office of financial management by the four-year institutions; and

(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the joint legislative audit and review committee concerning the condition of higher education facilities.

(7) By August 1st of each even-numbered year each public four-year higher education institution shall prepare and submit prioritized lists of the individual projects proposed by the institution for the ensuing six-year period in each category. The lists must be submitted to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees. The four-year institutions may aggregate minor works project proposals by primary purpose for ranking purposes. Proposed minor works projects must be prioritized within the aggregated proposal, and supporting documentation, including project descriptions and cost estimates, must be provided to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.

(8) For the ((2017-2019 fiscal biennium and the)) 2019-2021 fiscal biennium and the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, by November 1, ((2020))2022, the office of financial management must score higher education capital project criteria with a rating scale that assesses how well a particular project satisfies those criteria. The office of financial management may not use a rating scale that weighs the importance of those criteria.

(9) For the ((2017-2019 fiscal biennium and the)) 2019-2021 fiscal biennium and the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section and in lieu of the requirements of subsection (7) of this section, by August 15, ((2020))2022, the institutions of higher education shall prepare and submit or resubmit to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees:

(a) Individual project proposals developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Individual project proposals scored in prior biennia pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and

(c) A prioritized list of up to five project proposals submitted pursuant to (a) and (b) of this subsection.

Sec. 7034. RCW 43.155.050 and 2019 c 415 s 972 and 2019 c 413 s 7033 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving fund and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Not more than twenty percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, the aviation revitalization loan program, the community economic revitalization board broadband program, and the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to the aviation revitalization board. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia. ((If chapter 365, Laws of 2019 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511, broadband service) is enacted by June 30, 2019, then during))During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the statewide broadband account.

Sec. 7035. RCW 43.185.050 and 2018 c 223 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department must use moneys from the housing trust fund and other legislative appropriations to finance in whole or in part any loans or grant projects that will provide housing for persons and families with special housing needs and with incomes at or below fifty percent of the median family income for the county or standard metropolitan statistical area where the project is located. At least thirty percent of these moneys used in any given funding cycle must be for the benefit of projects located in rural areas of the state as defined by the department. If the department determines that it has not received an adequate number of suitable applications for rural projects during any given funding cycle, the department may allocate unused moneys for projects in nonrural areas of the state.

(2) Activities eligible for assistance from the housing trust fund and other legislative appropriations include, but are not limited to:

(a) New construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of low and very low-income housing units;

(b) Rent subsidies;

(c) Matching funds for social services directly related to providing housing for special-need tenants in assisted projects;

(d) Technical assistance, design and finance services and consultation, and administrative costs for eligible nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organizations;

(e) Administrative costs for housing assistance groups or organizations when such grant or loan will substantially increase the recipient's access to housing funds other than those available under this chapter;

(f) Shelters and related services for the homeless, including emergency shelters and overnight youth shelters;

(g) Mortgage subsidies, including temporary rental and mortgage payment subsidies to prevent homelessness;

(h) Mortgage insurance guarantee or payments for eligible projects;

(i) Down payment or closing cost assistance for eligible first-time home buyers;

(j) Acquisition of housing units for the purpose of preservation as low-income or very low-income housing;

(k) Projects making housing more accessible to families with members who have disabilities; and

(l) Remodeling and improvements as required to meet building code, licensing requirements, or legal operations to residential properties owned and operated by an entity eligible under RCW 43.185A.040, which were transferred as described in RCW 82.45.010(3)(t) by the parent of a child with developmental disabilities.

(3) Preference must be given for projects that include an early learning facility.

(4) Legislative appropriations from capital bond proceeds may be used only for the costs of projects authorized under subsection (2)(a), (i), and (j) of this section, and not for the administrative costs of the department, except that during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may use up to three percent of the appropriations from capital bond proceeds for administrative costs associated with application, distribution, and project development activities of the housing assistance program.

(5) Moneys from repayment of loans from appropriations from capital bond proceeds may be used for all activities necessary for the proper functioning of the housing assistance program except for activities authorized under subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section.

(6) Administrative costs associated with application, distribution, and project development activities of the department may not exceed three percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance program. Reappropriations must not be included in the calculation of the annual funds available for determining the administrative costs.

(7) Administrative costs associated with compliance and monitoring activities of the department may not exceed one-quarter of one percent annually of the contracted amount of state investment in the housing assistance program.

Sec. 7036. RCW 90.94.090 and 2019 c 413 s 7035 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A joint legislative task force on water resource mitigation is established to review the treatment of surface water and groundwater appropriations as they relate to instream flows and fish habitat, to develop and recommend a mitigation sequencing process and scoring system to address such appropriations, and to review the Washington supreme court decision in Foster v. Department of Ecology, 184 Wn.2d 465, 362 P.3d 959 (2015).

(2) The task force must consist of the following members:

(a) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(b) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(c) A representative from the department, appointed by the director of the department;

(d) A representative from the department of fish and wildlife, appointed by the director of the department of fish and wildlife;

(e) A representative from the department of agriculture, appointed by the director of the department of agriculture;

(f) One representative from each of the following groups, appointed by the consensus of the cochairs of the task force:

(i) An organization representing the farming industry in Washington;

(ii) An organization representing Washington cities;

(iii) Two representatives from an environmental advocacy organization or organizations;

(iv) An organization representing municipal water purveyors;

(v) An organization representing business interests;

(vi) Representatives of two federally recognized Indian tribes, one invited by recommendation of the Northwest Indian fisheries commission, and one invited by recommendation of the Columbia river intertribal fish commission.

(3) If a member has not been designated for a position set forth in subsection (2) of this section, that position may not be counted for purposes of determining a quorum.

(4) One cochair of the task force must be a member of the majority caucus of one chamber of the legislature, and one cochair must be a member of the minority caucus of the other chamber of the legislature, as those caucuses existed as of January 19, 2018.

(5) The first meeting of the task force must occur by June 30, 2018.

(6) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of program research and senate committee services. The department and the department of fish and wildlife shall cooperate with the task force and provide information as the cochairs reasonably request.

(7) Within existing appropriations, the expenses of the operations of the task force, including the expenses associated with the task force's meetings, must be paid jointly and in equal amounts by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the house executive rules committee and the senate facility and operations committee. Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(8)(a) By November 15, 2019, and November 15, 2022, the joint legislative task force must make recommendations to the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036. ((The task force may update its November 15, 2019, recommendations by November 15, 2020, if a majority of the members of the task force determine that such an update is appropriate based on additional information developed as a result of the pilot projects established under subsection (9) of this section.))

(b) Recommendations of the joint legislative task force must be made by a sixty percent majority of the appointed members of the task force. The representatives of the departments of fish and wildlife, ecology, and agriculture are not eligible to vote on the recommendations. Minority recommendations that achieve the support of at least five of the appointed voting members of the task force may also be submitted to the legislature.

(9) The department shall issue permit decisions for up to five water resource mitigation pilot projects. It is the intent of the legislature to use the pilot projects to inform the legislative task force process while also enabling the processing of water right applications that address water supply needs. The department is authorized to issue permits in reliance upon water resource mitigation of impacts to instream flows and closed surface water bodies under the following mitigation sequence:

(a) Avoiding impacts by: (i) Complying with mitigation required by adopted rules that set forth minimum flows, levels, or closures; or (ii) making the water diversion or withdrawal subject to the applicable minimum flows or levels; or

(b) Where avoidance of impacts is not reasonably attainable, minimizing impacts by providing permanent new or existing trust water rights or through other types of replacement water supply resulting in no net annual increase in the quantity of water diverted or withdrawn from the stream or surface water body and no net detrimental impacts to fish and related aquatic resources; or

(c) Where avoidance and minimization are not reasonably attainable, compensating for impacts by providing net ecological benefits to fish and related aquatic resources in the water resource inventory area through in-kind or out-of-kind mitigation or a combination thereof, that improves the function and productivity of affected fish populations and related aquatic habitat. Out-of-kind mitigation may include instream or out-of-stream measures that improve or enhance existing water quality, riparian habitat, or other instream functions and values for which minimum instream flows or closures were established in that watershed.

(10) The department must monitor the implementation of the pilot projects, including all mitigation associated with each pilot project, approved under this section at least annually through December 31, 2028.

(11) The pilot projects eligible for processing under this section, based on criteria as of January 19, 2018, include:

(a) A city operating a group A water system in Kitsap county and water resource inventory area 15, with a population between 13,000 and 14,000;

(b) A city operating a group A water system in Pierce county and water resource inventory area 10, with a population between 9,500 and 10,500;

(c) A city operating a group A water system in Thurston county and water resource inventory area 11, with a population between 8,500 and 9,500;

(d) A nonprofit mutual water system operating a group A water system in Pierce county and water resource inventory area 12, with between 10,500 and 11,500 service connections; and

(e) An irrigation district located in Whatcom county and water resource inventory area 1, solely for the purpose of processing changes of water rights from surface water to groundwater, and implementing flow augmentation to benefit instream flows.

(12) Water right applicants eligible to be processed under this pilot project authority must elect to be included in the pilot project review by notifying the department by July 1, 2018. Once an applicant notifies the department of its intent to be processed under this pilot project authority, subsection (9) of this section applies to final decisions issued by the department, even if such a final decision is issued after the expiration of this section.

(13) By November 15, 2018, the department must furnish the task force with information on conceptual mitigation plans for each water resource mitigation pilot project application. By November 15, 2019, and November 15, 2022, the department must provide the task force with an update on the mitigation plans based on additional information developed after November 15, 2018.

(14) To ensure that the processing of pilot project applications can inform the task force process in a timely manner, the department must expedite processing of applications for water resource mitigation pilot projects. The applicant for each pilot project must reimburse the department for the department's costs of processing the applicant's application.

(15) The water resource mitigation pilot project authority granted to the department does not affect or modify any other procedural requirements of chapter 90.03, 90.44, or 90.54 RCW that apply to the processing of such applications.

(16) The joint legislative task force expires December 31, ((2020))2022. During the period from November 16, 2019, through December 31, ((2020))2022, the work of the task force is limited to:

(a) A review of any additional information that may be developed after November 15, 2019, as a result of the pilot projects established under subsection (9) of this section; and

(b) An update of the task force's November 15, 2019, recommendations ((under subsection (8) of this section)).

(17) This section expires January 1, 2029.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7037. The public use general aviation airport loan revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from moneys directed by law to the account must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes described in section 7038 of this act. Only the community aviation revitalization board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7038. (1)(a) The community aviation revitalization board is established to exercise the powers granted under this section.

(b) The board must consist of a representative from the department of transportation's aviation division, the public works board, and a nonlegislative member of the community economic revitalization board. The board must also consist of the following members appointed by the secretary of transportation: One port district official, one county official, one city official, one representative of airport managers, and one representative of a general aviation pilots organization within Washington that has an active membership and established location, chapter, or appointed representative within Washington. The appointive members must initially be appointed to terms as follows: Two members for two-year terms, and three members for three-year terms that must include the chair. Thereafter, each succeeding term must be for three years. The secretary of transportation must select the chair of the board. The members of the board must elect one of their members to serve as vice chair.

(c) The department of transportation must provide management services, including fiscal and contract services, to assist the board in implementing this section.

(d) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of appointive members of the board, the secretary of transportation must fill the vacancy for the unexpired term. Members of the board may be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges by the secretary of transportation, under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(e) A member appointed by the secretary of transportation may not be absent from more than 50 percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence limitation has withdrawn from the board and may be replaced by the secretary of transportation.

(f) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum.

(g) The board must meet three times a year or as deemed necessary by the department of transportation.

(h) The department of transportation must provide staff support as needed.

(2) In addition to other applicable provisions of law pertaining to conflicts of interest of public officials, any community aviation revitalization board member, appointive or otherwise, may not participate in any decision on any board contract in which the board member has any interests, direct or indirect, with any firm, partnership, corporation, or association that would be the recipient of any aid under this section. If such participation occurs, the board must void the transaction and the involved member is subject to further sanctions as provided by law. The board must adopt a code of ethics for its members, which must be designed to protect the state and its citizens from any unethical conduct by the board.

(3) The community aviation revitalization board may:

(a) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

(b) Adopt an official seal and alter the seal at its pleasure;

(c) Use the services of other governmental agencies;

(d) Accept from any federal agency loans or grants for the planning or financing of any project and enter into an agreement with the agency respecting the loans or grants;

(e) Conduct examinations and investigations and take testimony at public hearings of any matter material for its information that will assist in determinations related to the exercise of the board's lawful powers;

(f) Accept any gifts, grants, loans of funds, property, or financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms and conditions that are not in conflict with this section;

(g) Enter into agreements or other transactions with and accept grants and cooperation from any governmental agency in furtherance of this section;

(h) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of this section; and

(i) Perform all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted or implied under this section.

(4)(a)(i) The community aviation revitalization board may make direct loans to airport sponsors of public use airports in the state for the purpose of airport improvements that primarily support general aviation activities. The board may provide loans for the purpose of airport improvements only if the state is receiving commensurate public benefit, which must include, as a condition of the loan, a commitment to provide public access to the airport for a period of time equivalent to one and one-half times the term of the loan.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (4)(a), "public use airports" means all public use airports not listed as having more than $75,000 annual commercial air service passenger enplanements as published by the federal aviation administration.

(b) An application for loan funds under this section must be made in the form and manner that the board prescribes. When evaluating loan applications, the board must prioritize applications that provide conclusive justification that completion of the loan application project will create revenue-generating opportunities. The board is not limited to, but must also use, the following expected outcome conditions when evaluating loan applications:

(i) A specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the aviation facility improvement is made;

(ii) The loan application project results in the creation of jobs or private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(iii) The loan application project improves opportunities for the successful maintenance, operation, or expansion of an airport or adjacent airport business park;

(iv) The loan application project results in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities; and

(v) The loan application project results in leveraging additional federal funding for an airport.

(c)(i) If the board chooses to require a local match, the board must develop guidelines for local participation and allowable match and activities.

(ii) An application must:

(A) Be supported by the port district, city, or county in which the project is located; or

(B) Clearly identify the source of funds intended to repay the loan.

(5) The public use general aviation airport loan program, when authorized by the community aviation revitalization board, is subject to the following conditions:

(a) The moneys in the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account created in section 7037 of this act must be used only to fulfill commitments arising from loans authorized in this section. The total outstanding amount that the board must dispense at any time pursuant to this section must not exceed the moneys available from the account.

(b) On contracts made for public use general aviation airport loans, the board must determine the interest rate that loans must bear. The interest rate must not exceed the amount needed to cover the administrative expenses of the board and the loan program. The board may provide reasonable terms and conditions for the repayment of loans, with the repayment of a loan to begin no later than three years after the award date of the loan. The loans must not exceed 20 years in duration.

(c) The repayment of any loan made from the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account under the contracts for aviation loans must be paid into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account.

(6) All receipts from moneys collected under this section must be deposited into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7039. The legislature intends to consider predesign funding for the Washington state patrol crime laboratory I-5 consolidated facility in the 2022 supplemental capital budget. By December 1, 2021, the Washington state patrol must provide data to support the request for a consolidated crime lab. The agency must provide legislative fiscal staff with operating budget financial information including, but not limited to, a list of each leased facility that will be vacated when the consolidated lab is completed. For each facility, the Washington state patrol must provide at least the:

(1) Lease contract number;

(2) Lease contract term;

(3) Lease facility street address;

(4) Lease facility cost, by fund and by state fiscal year for fiscal years 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023;

(5) Lease facility and maintenance staffing levels and funding by state fiscal year for fiscal years 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023;

(6) The most current six year facilities plan;

(7) An estimated certificate of participation payback schedule; and

(8) A summary of how the operating costs from subsection (1) of this section will offset the certification of participation costs from subsection (3) of this section by state fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7040. The department of social and health services and the department of natural resources shall enter into long-term, revenue generating opportunities for underused portions of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center bounded by 15th Ave NE and NE 150th Street to benefit the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions account. Long-term, revenue generating opportunities may include, but are not limited to, land leases, land sales, and land swaps. It is the intent of the legislature that any revenue obtained from these opportunities be used for services for those with developmental disabilities. The department of social and health services and the department of natural resources must amend their lease if necessary to conform with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7041. (1) The department of natural resources shall convene a work group of trust land beneficiaries and stakeholders to develop a recommended process for the way trust land transfer proposals are developed and implemented. Consideration should be made for increasing the income value of the trusts, limiting impacts to trust lands not being considered for transfer, conservation value of lands that are a potential candidate for transfer, and use of the land bank for securing repositioned land that would result from any transferred projects, and any other items necessary for a well-supported program. The department of natural resources must report and make recommendations for the establishment of a new trust land transfer program, in the form of proposed legislation, to the fiscal committees of the legislature, by December 1, 2021.

(2) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department of natural resources may not trade, transfer, or sell any valuable material from the four parcels that comprised the proposed trust land transfer parcels in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, known as blakely island, devils lake, eglon, and morning star.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7042. (1) The department of enterprise services shall convene a construction industry work group to recommend how to apply successful carbon reduction strategies, incorporate necessary parameters of design and construction considerations, and allow for efficient and cost effective state construction projects. The work group must be comprised of construction industry professionals as recommended by a leading association on Washington business in design, specification, construction, and material supply and construction professionals that have successfully realized real and measurable results. The work group must also include a representative from the department of enterprise services, representatives from environmental groups, and someone of applicable expertise from the Washington academy of sciences.

(2) The work group shall identify and recommend carbon reduction strategies and environmental product declaration principles to successfully apply in state construction projects and:

(a) Clarify the definition of environmental product declaration to ensure that environmental product declarations (EPD) are applied properly, consistently, and as intended and provide a baseline of understanding based on accepted metrics to obtain measurable results for state construction projects;

(b) Suggest a pilot project or project review to apply construction industry recommendations and create an education and standards brief that accompanies the report required under subsection (3) of this section;

(c) Outline the environmental project review data collection process in functional detail and use existing data gathering resources such as EC3; and

(d) Identify measurable outcome criteria to establish a project baseline summary for use during design from estimated project material quantities using industry average environmental product declarations.

(3) The work group shall provide their recommendations in a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7043. The office of financial management must compile a list of 2021-2023 fiscal biennium capital budget grant programs managed by state agencies and the direct and indirect administrative fee percentages charged for each. For the purposes of this section, "administrative fee percentages" means rates charged by state agencies and the rates grant recipients are allowed to charge for direct and/or indirect administrative costs. The office of financial management must submit the list of capital budget grant programs and their associated administrative fee percentages to the house capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee by October 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7044. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7045. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---