BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several amounts specified in parts I through IX of this act, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries, wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2021, and ending June 30, 2023, except as otherwise provided, out of the several funds of the state hereinafter named.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this act.

(a) "ARPA" means funds attributable to the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(b) "CRF" means funds attributable to the coronavirus relief fund created by section 5001, the coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act, P.L. 116-136, division A.

(c) "CRRSA" means funds attributable to the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(d) "CRRSA/ESSER" means funds attributable to the elementary and secondary school emergency relief fund, as modified by the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(e) "Fiscal year 2022" or "FY 2022" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022.

(f) "Fiscal year 2023" or "FY 2023" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023.

(g) "FTE" means full time equivalent.

(h) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(i) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$45,445,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$46,775,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$92,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR THE SENATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$32,511,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$35,649,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$68,160,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the payment of membership dues to the council of state governments, the national conference of state legislatures, the pacific northwest economic region, the pacific fisheries legislative task force, and the western legislative forestry task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$441,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$260,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,343,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,044,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $244,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5405 (racial equity analyses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (developmental disability services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's 2021-2023 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,645,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,645,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$14,125,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$14,230,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$28,355,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts provided in this section, the joint legislative systems committee shall provide information technology support, including but not limited to internet service, for the district offices of members of the house of representatives and the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$367,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$382,000

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$250,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,080,000

School Employees' Insurance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$249,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,328,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$5,339,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$5,763,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$11,102,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$4,536,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$5,026,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$9,562,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109. FOR THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,633,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$22,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,655,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the payment of expenses associated with the cessation of the commission's operations. The secretary of the senate and chief clerk of the house of representatives may jointly authorize the expenditure of these funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110. LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES

In order to achieve operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, joint transportation committee, office of the state actuary, joint legislative systems committee, statute law committee, and office of legislative support services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111. FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$9,632,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$9,764,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$19,396,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112. FOR THE LAW LIBRARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,772,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,797,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113. FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,625,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,637,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,262,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$21,613,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$22,067,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$43,680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115. FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$100,792,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$83,676,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,209,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$681,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,692,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$60,664,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$254,714,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The distributions made under this section and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(2) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. The administrator for the courts shall develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.

(3)(a) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs administering the processing and case management of truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth referrals. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula must neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs nor penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(b) Each fiscal year during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(4) $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the statewide fiscal impact on Thurston county courts. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(5) $4,505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5160 (landlord-tenant relations), including the management of an eviction resolution pilot program. By June 30, 2022, the department shall provide to the legislature a detailed report of eviction resolution program expenditures and outcomes including but not limited to the number of dispute resolution centers participating in the program, the number of individuals served by dispute resolution centers in the program, the average cost of resolution proceedings, and the number of qualified individuals who applied but were unable to be served by dispute resolution centers due to lack of funding or other reasons. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5331 (early childhood court program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $67,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5122 (juvenile court jurisdictions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5226 (license suspensions/traffic). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to provide support to local courts to address impacts from the supreme court decision in State v. Blake. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to create a work group consisting of the superior court judges association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington defender association, the office of public defense, the superior courts, and other stakeholders to develop recommendations for strategies and processes to be implemented at the local level to expedite case reviews and hearings to implement the State v. Blake decision.

(b) $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for grants to the superior courts for excess court-related expenditures related to implementing the State v. Blake decision. The work group in (a) of this subsection must develop an equitable methodology to distribute grant funds. The methodology must favor superior courts adopting the recommendations of the work group or other methods that expedite the resolution of cases impacted by the State v. Blake decision. The work group must also consider the following non-exclusive factors in the distribution methodology:

(i) Volume of impacted cases;

(ii) Local court capacity to address impacted cases;

(iii) Financial capacity of the county; and

(iv) Additional local resources to be contributed by the county to address impacted cases.

(c) Grants under (b) of this subsection may not be distributed until the office provides the law and justice committees and the fiscal committees of the legislature with a report on the work group's recommendations developed in (a) of this subsection and the methodology to distribute grants in (b) of this subsection. Each local court receiving grants from (b) of this subsection must agree to provide the office with data related to the number of cases reviewed, the number of hearings requested and held, the number of cases resolved, and the cost per case. The office must compile and report this data on a quarterly basis to the legislative committees.

(10) $8,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for distribution to local courts for cost associated with the court-appointed attorney and visitor requirements set forth in the uniform guardianship act in chapter 11.130 RCW. If the amount provided in this subsection is insufficient to fully fund the local court costs, distributions must be reduced on a proportional basis to ensure that expenditures remain within the available funds provided in this subsection. No later than December 31, 2021, the administrative office of the courts will provide a report on distributions to local courts including, but not limited to, the amount provided to each court, the number of guardianship cases funded at each court, costs segregated by attorney appointments and court visitor appointments, the amount of any pro rata reductions, and a recommendation on how to forecast distributions for potential future funding by the legislature.

(11) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for costs to relocate staff from the temple of justice to another workspace if the omnibus capital appropriation act provides funding for improvements to the heating, ventilation, lighting, and plumbing improvements to the temple of justice. Staff from the administrative office of the courts shall work with the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management to acquire temporary space in a state owned facility that meets the needs of the supreme court. If a state facility cannot be found, the court may acquire temporary workspace as it chooses.

(12) $1,892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,892,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for distribution to counties to assist with costs of electronic monitoring with victim notification technology when an individual seeking a protection order requests electronic monitoring with victim notification technology from the court and the individual is unable to pay the cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116. FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$48,152,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$48,130,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,870,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$100,152,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a task force to review, make recommendations, and report to the legislature on the delivery and funding of indigent legal services provided or paid for through the state or local government.

(1) The advisory committee of the office created in RCW 2.70.030 will determine the membership of the task force. The office must provide staff support to the task force.

(2) The task force will address the following issues and topics:

(a) Provide an overview of how indigent legal services are delivered by case type, recognizing the significant investments made in the 2021 legislative session; whether the provision of the service is constitutionally or statutorily required or discretionary; and how each case type is funded;

(b) Develop methods to collect data, performance measures, and outcome metrics to assess the use and effectiveness of state funding for indigent legal services including, but not limited to, number of clients served; timeliness, quality, and effectiveness of service; and state cost or contribution per case;

(c) Examine different delivery and funding systems for the provision of indigent legal services by case type and make recommendations to improve effective use of state resources; and

(d) Examine the development of a more unified state administered system to deliver indigent legal services, or to deliver such services as an option for local jurisdictions, with local governments providing a direct financial contribution to the cost of the system. The examination must assess the appropriate method and measure of the local financial contribution when state delivery of an indigent legal service would relieve the local jurisdiction of a current obligation to deliver or fund the service, or both.

(3) The progress report of the activities and any preliminary recommendations is due to the law and justice and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, with a final report due by December 1, 2022.

(4) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of public defense to contract with a free legal clinic that has a medical-legal partnership and that currently provides parent representation to at-risk clients in dependency cases in Snohomish, Skagit, and King counties. Within amounts appropriated, the clinic must provide legal representation to parents who are pregnant or recently postpartum who are at risk of child abuse or neglect reports or investigations.

(5) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the purpose of improving the quality of trial court public defense services. The office of public defense must allocate these amounts so that $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to counties, and $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to cities, for grants under chapter 10.101 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117. FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$40,517,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$40,574,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,464,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$82,555,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

(2) The office of civil legal aid shall enter into an interagency agreement with the department of children, youth, and families to facilitate the use of federal title IV-E reimbursement for child representation services.

(3) $568,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to continue and expand civil legal representation for tenants in eviction cases.

(4) Up to $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 may be used to wind down the children's representation study authorized in section 28, chapter 20, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

(5) $5,440,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to continue civil legal assistance to individuals and families directly and indirectly affected by the COVID-19 pandemic and its related health, social, economic, legal, and related consequences.

(6) $10,772,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $11,478,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5160 (landlord-tenant relations), including representation of indigent tenants in unlawful detainer cases. By June 30, 2022, the department shall provide to the legislature a detailed report of program expenditures and outcomes including but not limited to the number of individuals served, the average cost of a representation case, and the number of qualified individuals who qualified for but were unable to receive representation for funding or other reasons. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$13,207,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$13,033,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$31,240,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.

(2) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the governor to contract with project management resources to assist the health care authority and department of social and health services to coordinate efforts to transform the behavioral health system transformation efforts and improve the collection and availability of data.

(3) $1,289,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,289,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement the provisions of chapter 332, Laws of 2020 (state equity office).

(4) $2,365,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,295,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5036 (total confinement release). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5119 (individuals in custody). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office of the education ombuds to support the language access work group that is reconvened and expanded in section 501(1)(t) of this act.

(8)(a) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state LGBTQ commission, in collaboration with the health care authority, department of health, advocates for people living with HIV in Washington, consumers, and medical professionals with expertise in serving the medicaid population living with HIV, to consider and develop recommendations regarding:

(i) Access to HIV antiretroviral drugs on the medicaid drug formulary, including short- and long-term fiscal implications of eliminating current fail-first requirements;

(ii) Impact of drug access on public health and the statewide goal of reducing HIV transmissions; and

(iii) Maximizing pharmaceutical drug rebates for HIV antiretroviral drugs.

(b) The commission shall submit a brief report with recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119. FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,847,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,581,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$90,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,518,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the legislative committee on economic development and international relations to conduct a business competitiveness analysis of the state's economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120. FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$5,630,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$5,467,000

Public Disclosure Transparency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,014,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$12,111,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $280,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff for business analysis and project management of information technology projects.

(2) No moneys may be expended from the appropriations in this section to establish an electronic directory, archive, or other compilation of political advertising unless explicitly authorized by the legislature.

(3) $424,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for information technology staffing to meet the demands of maintaining online filing and disclosure systems.

(4) $180,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated training and outreach staff to develop course materials and facilitate the creation of an expanded filer training program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$20,672,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$30,981,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,684,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,890,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$901,000

Washington State Library Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,562,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,984,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,368,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$101,042,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,498,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $12,196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $3,051,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,051,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of statewide significance during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations.

(5) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for election reconciliation reporting. Funding provides for one staff to compile county reconciliation reports, analyze the data, and to complete an annual statewide election reconciliation report for every state primary and general election. The report must be submitted annually on July 31, beginning July 31, 2021, to legislative policy and fiscal committees. The annual report must include statewide analysis and by county analysis on the reasons for ballot rejection and an analysis of the ways ballots are received, counted, rejected and cure data that can be used by policymakers to better understand election administration.

(6) $546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for staff dedicated to the maintenance and operations of the voter registration and election management system. These staff will manage database upgrades, database maintenance, system training and support to counties, and the triage and customer service to system users.

(7) $626,000 of the public records efficiency, preservation, and access account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional project staff to pack, catalog, and move the states archival collection in preparation for the move to the new library archives building that will be located in Tumwater.

(8) Within existing resources, the office of the secretary of state must research and evaluate availability of online trainings to include, but not be limited to, job-related, educational, and information technology trainings that are available free of charge. The office must compare those to the online trainings available from the Microsoft linked in academy. The office must report the comparative findings to fiscal committees of the legislature by September 1, 2022.

(9) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5034 (nonprofit corporations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $269,000 of the government archives account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5019 (recording standards commission). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for humanities Washington to provide grants to humanities organizations in Washington state pursuant to the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) Forty percent must be used for grants to state humanities organizations' programming and general operating expenses to cover up to 100 percent of the costs of the programs which the grants support, to prevent, prepare for, respond to, and recover from coronavirus; and

(b) Sixty percent must be used for direct grants, and relevant administrative expenses, that support humanities organizations' programming and general operating expenses to cover up to 100 percent of the costs of the programs which the grants support, to prevent, prepare for, respond to, and recover from coronavirus.

(12) $3,600,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for eligible museum services, pursuant to section 2023, American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,800,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the Washington state historical society; and

(b) $1,800,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the eastern Washington historical society.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122. FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$398,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$398,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$796,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123. FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$442,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$460,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$902,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124. FOR THE STATE TREASURER

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$250,000

State Treasurer's Service Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,108,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$20,358,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the state treasurer to complete the required study on the staffing and operational needs for the public cooperative contained in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5188 (public cooperative). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125. FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$28,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$32,000

Auditing Services Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,351,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,673,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$16,084,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,585,000 of the performance audit of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state-funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.

(2) Within existing resources of the performance audits of government account, the state auditor's office shall conduct a performance audit or accountability audit of Washington charter public schools to satisfy the requirement to contract for an independent performance audit pursuant to RCW 28A.710.030(2).

(3) $825,000 of the auditing services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for accountability and risk based audits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126. FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$248,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$278,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$526,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127. FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$18,063,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$22,863,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$18,226,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,114,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,708,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,862,000

Child Rescue Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$294,794,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,017,000

Local Government Archives Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
($20,000)

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$273,000

Consumer Privacy Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,241,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$368,221,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial management and the chairs and ranking members of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

(4) $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the civil rights unit to provide additional services in defense and protection of civil and constitutional rights for people in Washington.

(5) $8,392,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for child welfare and permanency staff.

(6) $617,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $617,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for multi-year arbitrations of the state's diligent enforcement of its obligations to receive amounts withheld from tobacco master settlement agreement payments.

(7) $1,600,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the office to compel the United States department of energy to meet Hanford cleanup deadlines.

(8) $28,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5022 (recycling, waste and litter). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $334,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5036 (total confinement release). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $584,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5051 (peace & correction officers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $1,241,000 of the consumer privacy account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5062 (data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $122,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5096 (capital gains tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $256,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5097 (paid leave coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $788,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5115 (health emergency/labor). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $120,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $395,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $1,198,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (conditionally released SVPs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $218,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (law enforcement data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $1,485,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $958,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of a program for receiving and responding to tips from the public regarding risks or potential risks to the safety or well-being of youth, called the YES tip line program. Risks to safety or well-being may include, but are not limited to, harm or threats of harm to self or others, sexual abuse, assault, rape, bullying or cyberbullying, substance use, and criminal acts. Any person contacting the YES tip line, whether for themselves or for another person, must receive timely assistance and not be turned away. The program must operate within the guidelines of this subsection.

(a) During the development and implementation of the YES tip line program the attorney general shall convene an advisory committee consisting of representatives from the Washington state patrol, the department of health, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the Washington association of educational service districts, and other participants the attorney general appoints.

(b) The attorney general shall develop and implement policies and processes for:

(i) Assessing tips based on the level of severity, urgency, and assistance needed using best triage practices including the YES tip line;

(ii) Risk assessment for referral of persons contacting the YES tip line to service providers;

(iii) Threat assessment that identifies circumstances requiring the YES tip line to alert law enforcement, mental health services, or other first responders immediately when immediate emergency response to a tip is warranted;

(iv) Referral and follow-up on tips to schools or postsecondary institution teams, local crisis services, law enforcement, and other entities;

(v) YES tip line information data retention and reporting requirements;

(vi) Ensuring the confidentiality of persons submitting a tip and to allow for disclosure when necessary to respond to a specific emergency threat to life; and

(vii) Systematic review, analysis, and reporting by the YES tip line program of YES tip line data including, but not limited to, reporting program utilization and evaluating whether the YES tip line is being implemented equitably across the state.

(c) The YES tip line shall be operated by a vendor selected by the attorney general through a competitive contracting process. The attorney general shall ensure that the YES tip line program vendor and its personnel are properly trained and resourced. The contract must require the vendor to be bound confidentiality policies developed by the office. The contract must also provide that the state of Washington owns the data and information produced from the YES tip line and that vendor must comply with the state's data retention, use, and security requirements.

(d) The YES tip line program must develop and maintain a reference and best practices tool kit for law enforcement and mental health officials that identifies statewide and community mental health resources, services, and contacts, and provides best practices and strategies for investigators to use in investigating cases and assisting youths and their parents and guardians.

(e) The YES tip line program must promote and market the program and YES tip line to youth, families, community members, schools, and others statewide to build awareness of the program's resources and the YES tip line. Youth perspectives must be included and consulted in creating marketing campaigns and materials required for the YES tip line program. The insights of youth representing marginalized and minority communities must be prioritized for their invaluable insight.

(20) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to support the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force created in section 989 of this act. Of the amounts provided:

(a) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to one tribal organization and one urban Indian organization; the American Indian health commission, the Seattle Indian health board, or other similar organization; for participating on the task force on an equal basis to provide facilitation services to the task force and report writing collaboration;

(b) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for costs related to task force authorized stipends and consultant services; managing, coordinating, and reporting task force meetings and summits; data analysis and research; and other goods and services as deemed necessary by the office and the task force facilitators; and

(c) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the annual task force summit. The Washington state office of the attorney general may contract as it deems necessary for the summit.

(21) $98,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $98,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to provide staff support to the joint legislative task force on jail standards created in section 978 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128. FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,057,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,158,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$326,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,541,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $314,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to forecast the caseload for the Washington college grant program.

(2) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5293 (mental health sentencing alternatives). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5122 (juvenile court jurisdiction). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (developmental disability services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) Within existing resources, and beginning with the November 2021 forecast, the caseload forecast council shall produce an unofficial forecast of the long-term caseload for juvenile rehabilitation as a courtesy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$178,352,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$162,077,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,333,152,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,852,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,064,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$110,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$17,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$658,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$77,822,000

Affordable Housing for All Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,825,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,670,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,400,000

Statewide Tourism Marketing Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,034,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,085,000

Growth Management Planning and Environmental Review

Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,785,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,919,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$66,002,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,220,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,650,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,650,000

Andy Hill Cancer Research Endowment Fund Match

Transfer Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,920,000

Community Preservation and Development Authority

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$267,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,884,157,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.

(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(3) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(4) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(5) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(6) $4,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086. The department must distribute the funding as follows:

(a) For associate development organizations serving urban counties, which are counties other than rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a locally matched allocation of up to $1.00 per capita, totaling no more than $300,000 per organization; and

(b) For associate development organizations in rural counties, as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a $1.00 per capita allocation with a base allocation of $75,000.

(7) $5,907,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(8) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(9) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(10) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.

(11) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the regulatory roadmap program for the construction industry and to identify and coordinate with businesses in key industry sectors to develop additional regulatory roadmap tools.

(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.

(13) $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.

(14) $1,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation, $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation, and $1,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.

(15) $2,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the administration of the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.

(16) $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for community beds for individuals with a history of mental illness. Currently, there is little to no housing specific to populations with these co-occurring disorders; therefore, the department must consider how best to develop new bed capacity in combination with individualized support services, such as intensive case management and care coordination, clinical supervision, mental health, substance abuse treatment, and vocational and employment services. Case-management and care coordination services must be provided. Increased case-managed housing will help to reduce the use of jails and emergency services and will help to reduce admissions to the state psychiatric hospitals. The department must coordinate with the health care authority and the department of social and health services in establishing conditions for the awarding of these funds. The department must contract with local entities to provide a mix of (a) shared permanent supportive housing; (b) independent permanent supportive housing; and (c) low and no-barrier housing beds for people with a criminal history, substance abuse disorder, and/or mental illness.

Priority for permanent supportive housing must be given to individuals on the discharge list at the state psychiatric hospitals or in community psychiatric inpatient beds whose conditions present significant barriers to timely discharge.

(17) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.

(18) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.

(19) $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the small business export assistance program. The department must ensure that at least one employee is located outside the city of Seattle for purposes of assisting rural businesses with export strategies.

(20) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.

(21) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide either legal representation or referral services for legal representation, or both, to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(22)(a) $18,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $18,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $20,000,000 of the housing trust fund account—state appropriation are provided solely for grants to support the building operation, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing projects or units within housing projects that have or will receive funding from the housing trust fund—state account or other public capital funding that:

(i) Is dedicated as permanent supportive housing units;

(ii) Is occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below thirty percent of the area median income; and

(iii) Requires a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operating, maintenance, and service expenses.

(b) Permanent supportive housing projects receiving federal operating subsidies that do not fully cover the operation, maintenance, and service costs of the projects are eligible to receive grants as described in this subsection.

(c) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.

(23)(a) $5,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $7,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $7,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:

(i) Expand outreach, services, and housing for homeless youth and young adults including but not limited to secure crisis residential centers, crisis residential centers, and HOPE beds, so that resources are equitably distributed across the state;

(ii) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and

(iii) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and enable providers to have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to build infrastructure and services to support a continuum of interventions including but not limited to prevention, crisis response, and long-term housing in reducing youth homelessness in communities identified as part of the anchor community initiative; and

(ii) $2,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to provide youth services and young adult housing on a multi-acre youth campus located in the city of Tacoma. Youth services include, but are not limited to, HOPE beds and crisis residential centers to provide temporary shelter and permanency planning for youth under the age of eighteen. Young adult housing includes, but is not limited to, rental assistance and case management for young adults ages eighteen to twenty-four. The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature on the use of the funds. The first report is due June 30, 2022, and each June 30 thereafter. The report shall include but is not limited to:

(A) A breakdown of expenditures by program and expense type, including the cost per bed;

(B) The number of youth and young adults helped by each program;

(C) The number of youth and young adults on the waiting list for programs, if any; and

(D) Any other metric or measure the department deems appropriate to evaluate the effectiveness of the use of the funds.

(24) $52,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $52,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the essential needs and housing support program.

(25) $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Aerospace; (b) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy; (c) wood products and other natural resource industries; (d) information and communication technology; (e) life sciences and global health; (f) maritime; and (g) military and defense. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.

(26) The department must develop a model ordinance for cities and counties to utilize for siting community based behavioral health facilities.

(27) $1,246,000 of the liquor excise tax account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide fiscal note assistance to local governments, including increasing staff expertise in multiple subject matter areas, including but not limited to criminal justice, taxes, election impacts, transportation, and land use, and providing training and staff preparation prior to legislative sessions.

(28) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to retain a behavioral health facilities siting administrator within the department to coordinate development of effective behavioral health housing options and provide technical assistance in siting of behavioral health treatment facilities statewide to aid in the governor's plan to discharge individuals from the state psychiatric hospitals into community settings. This position must work closely with the local government legislative authorities, planning departments, behavioral health providers, health care authority, department of social and health services, and other entities to facilitate linkages among disparate behavioral health community bed capacity-building efforts. This position must work to integrate building behavioral health treatment and infrastructure capacity in addition to ongoing supportive housing benefits.

(29) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with an entity located in the Beacon hill/Chinatown international district area of Seattle to provide low income housing, low income housing support services, or both. To the extent practicable, the chosen location must be colocated with other programs supporting the needs of children, the elderly, or persons with disabilities.

(30) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant program.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing targeted at those families who are chronically homeless and where at least one member of the family has a disability. The department will also connect these families to medicaid supportive services.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for diversion services for those families and individuals who are at substantial risk of losing stable housing or who have recently become homeless and are determined to have a high probability of returning to stable housing.

(31) $10,920,000 of the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used for grants and administration costs.

(32) $550,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the operations of the long-term care ombudsman program.

(33) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to produce the biennial report identifying a list of projects to address incompatible developments near military installations as provided in RCW 43.330.520.

(34) $8,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation and $26,500,000 of the housing trust fund account—state appropriation are provided solely for increasing local temporary shelter capacity. The amount provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) A city or county applying for grant funding shall submit a sheltering proposal that aligns with its local homeless housing plan under RCW 43.185C.050. This proposal must include at a minimum:

(i) A strategy for outreach to bring currently unsheltered individuals into shelter;

(ii) Strategies for connecting sheltered individuals to services including but not limited to: Behavioral health, chemical dependency, education or workforce training, employment services, and permanent supportive housing services;

(iii) An estimate on average length of stay;

(iv) An estimate of the percentage of persons sheltered who will exit to permanent housing destinations and an estimate of those that are expected to return to homelessness;

(v) An assessment of existing shelter capacity in the jurisdiction, and the net increase in shelter capacity that will be funded with the state grant; and

(vi) Other appropriate measures as determined by the department.

(b) The department shall not reimburse more than $56 per day per net additional person sheltered above the baseline of shelter occupancy prior to award of the funding. Eligible uses of funds include shelter operations, shelter maintenance, shelter rent, loan repayment, case management, navigation to other services, efforts to address potential impacts of shelters on surrounding neighborhoods, capital improvements and construction, and outreach directly related to bringing unsheltered people into shelter. The department shall coordinate with local governments to encourage cost-sharing through local matching funds.

(c) The department shall not reimburse more than $10,000 per shelter bed prior to occupancy, for costs associated with creating additional shelter capacity or improving existing shelters to improve occupancy rates and successful outcomes. Eligible costs prior to occupancy include acquisition, construction, equipment, staff costs, and other costs directly related to creating additional shelter capacity.

(d) For the purposes of this subsection "shelter" means any facility, the primary purpose of which is to provide space for individuals experiencing homelessness in general or for specific populations of individuals experiencing homelessness. The shelter must: Be structurally sound to protect occupants from the elements and not pose any threat to health or safety, have means of natural or mechanical ventilation, and be accessible to persons with disabilities, and the site must have hygiene facilities, which must be accessible but do not need to be in the structure.

(35) $1,007,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,007,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to administer a transitional housing pilot program for nondependent homeless youth. In developing the pilot program, the department will work with the adolescent unit within the department of children, youth, and families, which is focused on cross-system challenges impacting youth, including homelessness.

(36) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to establish representation in key international markets that will provide the greatest opportunities for increased trade and investment for small businesses in the state of Washington. Prior to entering into any contract for representation, the department must consult with associate development organizations and other organizations and associations that represent small business, rural industries, and disadvantaged business enterprises.

(37) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to create a centralized diversion fund to serve homeless or at-risk youth and young adults, including those who are unsheltered, exiting inpatient programs, or in school. Funding provided in this subsection may be used for short-term rental assistance, offsetting costs for first and last month's rent and security deposits, transportation costs to go to work, and assistance in obtaining photo identification or birth certificates.

(38) $100,000 of the model toxics control stormwater account—state appropriation is provided solely for planning work related to stormwater runoff at the aurora bridge and I-5 ship canal bridge. Planning work may include, but is not limited to, coordination with project partners, community engagement, conducting engineering studies, and staff support.

(39) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to assist people with limited incomes in urban areas of the state in starting and sustaining small businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization involving a network of microenterprise organizations and professionals to support micro entrepreneurship and access to economic development resources.

(40) $500,000 of the community preservation and development authority account—state/operating appropriation is provided solely for the operations of the Pioneer Square-International District community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.060.

(41) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department of commerce to contract with a nonprofit organization to establish and operate a center for child care retention and expansion. The nonprofit organization must be a Bellingham, Washington-based nonprofit community action agency with fifty years of experience serving homeless and low-income families and individuals.

(a) Funding provided in this subsection may be used for, but is not limited to, the following purposes:

(i) Creating a rapid response team trained to help child care businesses whose continuity of operations is threatened;

(ii) Developing business model prototypes for new child care settings; and

(iii) Assisting existing or new child care businesses in assessing readiness for expansion or acquisition.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for staffing at the center for child care; and

(ii) $380,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $380,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the nonprofit organization to distribute grants to third party child care providers and nongovernmental organizations. Nonprofit entities applying for funding as a statewide network must:

(A) Have an existing infrastructure or network of academic, innovation, and mentoring program grant-eligible entities;

(B) Provide after-school and summer programs with youth development services; and

(C) Provide proven and tested recreational, educational, and character-building programs for children ages six to eighteen years of age.

(42) $255,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to administer an emergency rental and utility assistance program pursuant to the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. The department shall distribute funding in the form of grants to local housing providers. In making distributions, the department must consider the number of unemployed persons and renters in each jurisdiction served by the provider as well as account for any funding that jurisdiction, including cities within each county, received directly from the federal government. A provider may use up to 10 percent of their grant award for administrative costs and the remainder must be used for financial assistance as defined in P.L. 117-2. The department may retain up to five percent of the funding provided in this subsection to administer the program.

(43) $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to provide grant funding to an organization that will create a digital navigator program in ten regions across the state, with two navigators in each region. The digital navigators will provide one-on-one assistance to individuals seeking work, families supporting students, individuals who are English language learners, and elders. The entity receiving the grant must facilitate a collaborative of stakeholders across the state with the objective of increasing digital access for black, indigenous, and other communities of color, low-income communities, students, and elders.

(44) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity located in Seattle that focuses on poverty reduction and racial equity to convene and staff a poverty reduction work group steering committee comprised of individuals that have lived experience with poverty. Funding provided in this section may be used to reimburse steering committee members for travel, child care, and other costs associated with participation in the steering committee.

(45) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to convene a task force to make recommendations regarding needed reforms to the state's growth policy framework, including the growth management act, state environmental policy act, and other statutes related to growth, change, economic development, housing, social equity, and environmental conservation. The process will build upon the findings, concepts, and recommendations in recent state-funded reports, including the "road map to Washington's future" issued by the William D. Ruckelshaus center in 2019, the report of the environmental justice task force issued in 2020, and "updating Washington's growth policy framework" issued by the University of Washington in 2021. The task force must involve diverse perspectives including but not limited to representatives of counties, cities, special districts, the real estate, building, and agricultural industries, planning and environmental organizations, tribal governments, and state agencies. Special effort must be made to include in these discussions the lived experiences and perspectives of people and communities who have too often been excluded from public policy decision-making and unevenly impacted by those decisions. The work group must report on its activities and recommendations prior to the 2022 and 2023 legislative sessions.

(46) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Seattle for providing resident services and on-site programming for affordable housing residents in Delridge, supporting local youth with leadership pathways, and other community development initiatives that improve the health and well-being of southwest Seattle residents.

(47) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for San Juan county health and community services to enter into an agreement with the United States geological survey to evaluate available groundwater, surface water, and meteorological data for the county, complete recharge estimations for the county, and update the water balance for the county.

(48) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to contract with businesses ending slavery and trafficking for a human trafficking initiative.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to extend job readiness services and employment opportunities for survivors of human trafficking and persons at risk of human trafficking, in near-airport communities in south King county.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to develop a national awareness campaign. The campaign will increase signage in seaports, airports, and near-airport communities so that people who are vulnerable to trafficking or experiencing human trafficking can access assistance through the national human trafficking hotline.

(49) $278,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $277,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization within the city of Tacoma for social services and educational programming to assist Latino and indigenous communities in honoring heritage and culture, becoming proficient in civic education, and overcoming barriers to social, political, racial, economic, and cultural community development.

(50) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to provide college accredited courses through alternative methods to disadvantaged adults, such as those experiencing homelessness, who are low-income, come from generational poverty, or have a disabling condition, including those that are further impacted by systemic racism, who do not believe they can be successful or have not yet contemplated college for their future with the intent of engaging these individuals in further education to increase their lifelong wage potential.

(51)(a) $351,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $332,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization with demonstrated expertise in the creative arts and strategic planning to establish a Washington state creative economy work group that within two years, and with the advice of the work group, develops a strategic plan to improve the Washington state creative economy that can be rolled out in incremental phases to reach identified economic, social justice, and business development goals.

(b) The goal of the strategic plan must be to ensure that the state of Washington is competitive with respect to attracting creative economy business, retaining talent within the state, and developing marketable content that can be exported for national and international consumption and monetization. The strategic plan must address support for the creative community within historically marginalized communities, as well as the creative economy at large, and take into account the diverse interests, strengths, and needs of Washington's population on both sides of the Cascade mountains.

(c) The chair of the work group must be the director of the nonprofit organization contracted with by the department or the director's designee, and must have significant experience working as an artist, producer, or director and in business development, including drafting business plans and multidisciplinary planning documents. The chair must appoint representatives to the work group who represent the range of demographic diversity across the state of Washington, including:

(i) A representative from the Washington state association of counties;

(ii) A representative from the association of Washington cities;

(iii) A representative from the Washington state arts commission;

(iv) A representative from the Washington state labor council;

(v) A representative from the banking industry with experience in matters involving the federal small business administration;

(vi) An appropriate number of representatives from the Washington state arts community including, but not limited to, the following sectors:

(A) Film, television, and video production;

(B) Recorded audio and music production;

(C) Animation production;

(D) Video game development;

(E) Live theater, orchestra, dance, and opera;

(F) Live music performance;

(G) Visual arts, including sculpture, painting, graphic design, and photography;

(H) Production facilities, such as film and television studios; and

(I) Live music or performing arts venues;

(vii) A representative from a certified public accounting firm or other company with experience in financial modeling and in the creative arts;

(viii) A representative selected by the Washington state commission on African American affairs, the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs, the governor's office of Indian affairs, and the Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs to represent the entities on the work group;

(ix) A representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe with a reservation located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(x) A representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe with a reservation located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains; and

(xi) Other state agency representatives or stakeholder group representatives, at the discretion of the work group, for the purpose of participating in specific topic discussions.

(d) In developing the strategic plan for the Washington state creative economy, the work group must:

(i) Identify existing studies of aspects affecting the creative economy, including studies relating to tax issues, legislation, finance, population and demographics, and employment;

(ii) Conduct a comparative analysis with other jurisdictions that have successfully developed creative economy plans and programs, including the states of Georgia and New Mexico, and the provinces of British Columbia and Ontario, Canada;

(iii) Conduct in-depth interviews to identify best practices for structuring a strategic plan for the state of Washington;

(iv) Evaluate existing banking models for financing creative economy projects in the private sector and develop a financial model to promote investment in Washington's creative economy;

(v) Evaluate existing state and county tax incentives and make recommendations for improvements to support the creative economy;

(vi) Identify the role that counties and cities play with respect to the strategic plan, and identify specific counties and cities that may need or want a stronger creative economy;

(vii) Identify opportunities for synergies with new business models and the integration of new technologies; and

(viii) Identify the role that state education programs in the creative arts play in the creative economy and with respect to advancing the strategic plan.

(e) The department of commerce shall facilitate the timely transmission of information and documents from all appropriate state departments and agencies to the nonprofit organization contracted under this subsection. The work group must report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022. The contracted nonprofit must administer the expenses of the work group.

(52) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization in King county to provide a hunger relief response to individuals in permanent supportive housing.

(53) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department of commerce to convene a work group to develop budgetary, administrative policy, and legislative recommendations regarding strategies to reduce racial disparities in Washington state homeownership rates.

(a) The work group shall assess perspective on housing and lending laws, policies, and practices and facilitate discussions amongst relevant stakeholders.

(b) Specifically, the study must:

(i) Evaluate the distribution of state affordable housing funds and its impact on the creation of homeownership units serving black, indigenous, and people of color;

(ii) Evaluate the distribution of state funded down payment assistance funds and their impact on reducing or exacerbating homeownership rate disparities; and

(iii) Evaluate the impact of municipal land use codes on the availability of land to develop ownership units and provide recommendations to increase ownership unit development.

(c) The work group must consist, at minimum, of the following members:

(i) A representative from the department of commerce;

(ii) A representative from the department of financial institutions;

(iii) A representative from the Washington state commission on African American affairs;

(iv) A representative from the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs;

(v) A representative from the Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs;

(vi) A representative from the office of equity;

(vii) A representative from the governor's office of Indian affairs;

(viii) A representative of the association of Washington cities;

(ix) A representative of Washington state association of counties;

(x) A representative of the association of Washington housing authorities;

(xi) A representative of the Washington realtors;

(xii) A representative of the Washington association of mortgage professionals;

(xiii) A representative of the housing development consortium;

(xiv) A representative of the Spokane low income housing consortium;

(xv) A representative of the Alaska, Oregon, and Washington state area conference of the NAACP;

(xvi) A representative of the urban league;

(xvii) A representative of the northwest community land trust coalition;

(xviii) A representative of habitat for humanity of Washington state;

(xix) A representative from the Washington state housing finance commission;

(xx) A representative of the community associations institute— Washington state chapter;

(xxi) A representative of the building industry association of Washington;

(xxii) A representative of the Washington state affordable housing advisory board;

(xxiii) A representative of the Washington credit union association;

(xxiv) A representative of the Washington bankers association;

(xxv) A representative of the Washington community bankers;

(xxvi) A representative of the governor's committee on disability issues and employment;

(xxvii) A representative of the office of rural and farmworker housing; and

(xxviii) Representatives from additional stakeholder groups which the department of commerce identifies as necessary to implementing the goals of this work group.

(d) The study must begin by August 1, 2021. The department of commerce must issue a final report, including the results of any facilitated agreed upon recommendations, to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2022.

(54) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a grant to the pacific science center for a maker and innovation lab and to develop and operate new experiential learning opportunities.

(55) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to contract with the Washington asset building coalition for programs to increase the financial stability of low-income Washingtonians adversely affected economically by COVID-19 through increasing participation in earned income tax credit refunds, the Washington retirement marketplace, and programs that build personal savings.

(56) $347,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $347,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the survivors FIRST program for flexible direct client assistance funds to pay direct advocate and outreach staff salaries, to contract for data analytic services, and for a part-time prosecutor salary to make diversion decisions on felony and misdemeanor cases.

(57) $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a single contract with the non-profit statewide tourism marketing organization that is party to the contract pursuant to RCW 43.384.020. The funds will be used to assist recovery for tourism-related businesses, generate tourism demand for Washington communities and businesses, and sustain recovery market share with competing Western states. The department and the contractor shall submit a report to the legislature June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023.

(58) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a nonprofit organization whose sole purpose is to provide grants, capacity building, and technical assistance support to a network of microenterprise development organizations. The microenterprise development organizations will support rural and urban Black, indigenous and people of color owned businesses, veteran owned businesses, and limited resourced and other hard to serve businesses with five or fewer employees throughout the state with business training, technical assistance, and microloans.

(59) $421,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to continue starting up the Washington state office of firearm safety and violence prevention, including the creation of a state and federal grant funding plan to direct resources to cities that are most impacted by community violence.

(60) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to administer a competitive grant process to award funding to licensed youth shelters, HOPE centers, and crisis residential centers to provide behavioral health support services for youth in crisis.

(61) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to conduct a study and report to the legislature on city and county implementation of the multifamily housing property tax exemption. The report must:

(a) Review whether cities have practices in three areas:

(i) Evaluating the financial feasibility of proposed developments;

(ii) Monitoring rent and occupancy of exempt housing; and

(iii) Identifying whether there will be displacement and change in income and rent distributions associated with new housing development, and plans and approaches;

(b) Identify at least five case studies on a range of cities and provide analysis:

(i) Comparing the rent in income restricted units to market rate units in the same development and to the surrounding area;

(ii) Comparing the anticipated impact on rents and project budgets under eight-year, 12-year, and 20-year property tax exemption scenarios;

(iii) Looking at permanent affordable rentals; and

(iv) Evaluating changes in income distribution, rent distribution, and commute/location in areas with exempt housing; and

(c) Estimate other state and local tax revenue generated by new housing developments and how it compares to the property tax exemption.

(62) $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a grant to Spokane county for costs related to redistricting activities required by chapter 36.32 RCW.

(63) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for C6 forest to farm for operational work towards a biochar research and demonstration project and initial efforts toward full-size operation of an industrial-sized facility in the Methow Valley.

(64) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization to provide tiny homes for veterans.

(65) $210,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to perform an analysis of the property operations and maintenance costs and tenant supportive services costs for affordable housing projects that receive funding from the Washington housing trust fund. The projects to be analyzed must include, but are not limited to, permanent supportive housing and youth housing taking into consideration housing projects that have been in service for a sufficient time that actual costs can be determined. The analysis shall include a categorized overview of the expenses and fund sources related to the maintenance, operations, and supportive services necessary for the affordable housing projects to be successful in housing the intended population, as well as identify other available funding sources for these costs. The analysis must also explore the timing and alignment challenges for pairing operational and supportive services funding with the initial capital investments, and make recommendations relating to any benchmarks that can be established regarding future costs that would impact the operating budget. The department may hire a consultant to conduct this study. The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(66) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to develop targeted equity strategies informed by community engagement, outreach, and research. The department shall convene an equity steering committee to identify investments, programs, and policy changes that increase access to opportunity and mitigate displacement of underserved communities. The department shall facilitate input from nonprofit community development organizations and community leaders throughout the state through a series of listening sessions, as well as engaging existing advisory committees that provide state capital program funding recommendations. The department shall consult with the equity office and the office of financial management on this work. By June 30, 2022, the department shall report to the office of financial management, the governor, and the appropriate committees of the legislature the results of these listening sessions, describe statutory, administrative, or operational barriers in existing state capital programs and procurement processes that have been identified, and recommend process changes that will help reduce disparities.

(67) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5383 (public telecom services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(68) $9,729,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,191,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5160 (landlord-tenant relations), including landlord mitigation grants. By June 30, 2022, the department shall provide to the legislature a detailed report of program expenditures and outcomes including but not limited to the amount of grants provided, the number of individuals receiving a grant, the average grant size, and the number of qualified individuals who applied but were unable to receive a grant. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(69) $1,555,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is appropriated solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(70) $946,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $921,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5368 (rural economic development). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(71) $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5287 (affordable housing incentives). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(72) $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5241 (economic inclusion grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(73) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5345 (industrial waste program). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to local industrial waste symbiosis projects as provided in the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(74) $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5353 (law enforcement community engagement). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants awarded under this bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(75) $187,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to assist current and prospective homeowners at risk of foreclosure, pursuant to section 3206 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. For purposes of this subsection, an eligible homeowner is one that has a household income at or below 100 percent of area median income or 100 percent of the United States median income. The department may contract with other foreclosure fairness program state partners to carry out this work.

(76) $80,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to administer a low-income home energy assistance program pursuant to section 2911 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. The department may designate local agencies to administer the program. The department shall not provide funds directly to home energy suppliers. In making distributions, the department must consider the number of unemployed persons and renters in each jurisdiction served by the provider as well as account for any funding that jurisdiction, including cities within each county, received directly from the federal government.

(77) $23,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for a HOME investment partnership program, pursuant to the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. The department shall prioritize housing projects that provide immediate relief for individuals experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness.

(78) $10,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for housing that serves people with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(79) $345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Port Gamble S'Klallam re-entry program.

(80) $29,525,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) and $230,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), not to exceed the amount appropriated in section 3, chapter 3, Laws of 2021, that were unobligated at the end of fiscal year 2021, are provided solely for rental assistance and housing and are subject to the same terms and conditions as the appropriation in section 3, chapter 3, Laws of 2021, as amended in section 1803 of this act.

(81) $4,800,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF), not to exceed the amount appropriated in section 4, chapter 3, Laws of 2021, that was unobligated at the end of fiscal year 2021, is provided solely for working Washington grants and is subject to the same terms and conditions as the appropriation in section 4, chapter 3, Laws of 2021.

(82) $138,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to administer a state small business credit initiative program pursuant to section 3301, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. The department is highly encouraged to use local nonprofit community development financial institutions to deliver access to credit to the maximum extent allowed by federal law, rules, and guidelines. The department must apply for the maximum possible allocation of federal funding under section 3301, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, including but not limited to funds set aside for extremely small businesses and business enterprises owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals. The funding provided in this section also includes federal funds allocated to the state for technical assistance to businesses.

(83) $244,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5022 (recycling, waste, and litter), including convening a stakeholder advisory committee for recommendations on the development of mandatory postconsumer recycled content requirements for plastics packaging. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(84) $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5183 (nonfatal strangulation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(85) $267,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5378 (real estate broker renewal). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(86) $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(87) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to establish a sector lead position for the creative industries including, but not limited to, the performing arts, literary arts, music, and film. The sector lead must work with interested parties to further the goals of creating economic development opportunities, retaining and growing jobs, and supporting small business development and expansion within the creative industries.

(88) $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to support implementation of the 2021 state energy strategy as it pertains to emissions from energy use in new and existing buildings, including measures to support local government emission reduction, workforce measures, and utility electrification benefits.

(89) $6,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $8,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of crime victims advocacy to continue providing financial support to community-based programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130. FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$897,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$964,000

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$14,165,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$14,122,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,507,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$531,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$329,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$24,748,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Statewide Information Technology System Development

Maintenance and Operations Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$97,461,000

Office of Financial Management Central Service

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$21,603,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$672,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$207,735,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;

(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;

(iii) Washington college grant recipients grade point averages; and

(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

(2) $100,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to the office of financial management to implement career connected learning.

(3)(a) $97,461,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation, $162,000 of the personnel services account—state appropriation, and $162,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation are provided solely for the one Washington enterprise resource planning statewide program. Of this amount:

(i) $15,513,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for an organizational change management pool to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials) state agency organizational change management resources. The office of financial management will manage the pool, authorize funds, and track costs by agency by fiscal month;

(ii) $22,000,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for a technology pool to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials) state agency costs due to work associated with impacted financial systems and interfaces. The office of financial management will manage the pool, authorize funds, and track costs by agency by fiscal month;

(iii) $1,326,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for three dedicated information technology consultant staff to be contracted from the office of the chief information officer. These staff will work with state agencies to ensure preparation and timely decommission of information technology systems that will no longer be necessary post implementation of phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials);

(iv) $4,609,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintenance and operations costs for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement—core financials), which will begin in fiscal year 2023;

(v) $4,577,000 of the information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for phase 1B (procurement and extended financials);

(vi) $162,000 of the personnel services account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated staff for phase 2 (human resources) coordination; and

(vii) $162,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated staff for phase 3 (budget) coordination.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2021, the office of financial management shall provide written quarterly reports, within 30 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter, to legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee to include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. All reporting must be separated by phase of one Washington subprojects. The written report must also include:

(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables accomplished and the associated expenditures by each deliverable by fiscal month;

(ii) A report on the contract full time equivalent charged compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan assumes by fiscal month;

(iii) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received organizational change management pool resources, the staffing equivalent used, and the cost by fiscal month by agency compared to budget spending plan;

(iv) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received technology pool resources, the staffing equivalent used, and the cost by fiscal month by agency compared to the budget spending plan;

(v) A report on budget spending plan by fiscal month by phase compared to actual spending by fiscal month; and

(vi) A report on current financial office performance metrics that at least 10 state agencies use, to include the monthly performance data, starting July 1, 2021.

(c) Prior to spending any funds, the director of financial management must agree to the spending and sign off on the spending.

(d) This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(4) $250,000 of the office of financial management central services account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated information technology budget staff for the work associated with statewide information technology projects that are under the oversight of the office of the chief information officer. The staff will be responsible for providing a monthly financial report after each fiscal month close to fiscal staff of the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees to reflect at least:

(a) Fund balance of the information technology pool account after each fiscal month close;

(b) Amount by information technology project, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(c) Amount by agency of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(d) Total amount approved to date, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, and for the last fiscal month;

(e) A projection for the information technology pool account by fiscal month through the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium close, and a calculation spent to date as a percentage of the total appropriation;

(f) A projection of each information technology project spending compared to budget spending plan by fiscal month through the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total project cost; and

(g) A list of agencies and projects that have not yet applied for nor been approved for funding by the office of financial management.

(5) $12,741,000 of the personnel service account—state appropriation is provided solely for administration of orca pass benefits included in the 2021-2023 collective bargaining agreements and provided to nonrepresented employees. The office of financial management must bill each agency for that agency's proportionate share of the cost of orca passes. The payment from each agency must be deposited into the personnel service account and used to purchase orca passes. The office of financial management may consult with the Washington state department of transportation in the administration of these benefits.

(6) Within existing resources, the labor relations section shall produce a report annually on workforce data and trends for the previous fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include a workforce profile; information on employee compensation, including salaries and cost of overtime; and information on retention, including average length of service and workforce turnover.

(7) $1,377,000 of the personnel services account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5082 (productivity board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)(a) The office of financial management statewide leased facilities oversight team must identify opportunities to reduce statewide leased facility space given the change in business practices since 2020 whereby many state employees were mostly working remotely and may continue to do so going forward, or at least more state employees are anticipated to work remotely than in calendar year 2019.

(b) The office of financial management will work to identify opportunities for downsizing space and increased collocation by state agencies, especially for any leases that will be up for renewal effective July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2024.

(c) The office of financial management must, in collaboration with the department of enterprise services, identify and make recommendations on reduction in leased facility space by agency for fiscal years 2024 and 2025. The analysis must include detailed information on any reduced costs, such as lease contract costs, facility maintenance, and utilities, and include at least:

(i) Agency name;

(ii) Lease contract number and term (start and end date);

(iii) Contract amount by fiscal year by fund source; and

(iv) Current and future projected collocated agency tenants.

(d) The office of financial management must submit a report responsive to (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection to fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(9) $72,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5036 (total confinement release). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (conditionally released sexually violent predators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for staffing for the sentencing guidelines commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132. FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$71,307,000

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$71,319,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $22,346,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for staffing to resolve unemployment insurance appeals. The funding is provided to meet the temporary increase in unemployment insurance hearing appeals, which began in fiscal year 2021, and to reduce the appeal to resolution wait time.

(2) $154,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5051 (peace & corrections officers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $86,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 2, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5061) (unemployment insurance).

(4) $12,000 of the administrative hearings account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5097 (paid leave coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $150,000 of the administrative hearings account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5172 (agricultural overtime). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $161,000 of the administrative hearings account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care and early development programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$29,594,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$29,594,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of gaming system capabilities that violate state law.

(2) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040, the commission shall take such action necessary to reduce retail commissions to an average of 5.1 percent of sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134. FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$434,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$458,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$892,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135. FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$415,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$429,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$844,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—OPERATIONS

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$69,865,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$69,865,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,238,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for pension system modernization, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(2) $619,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5367 (inactive retirement accounts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $7,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5399 (universal health care commission). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $286,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5021 (effects of expenditure reduction). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $197,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5352 (retirement system opt-out). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$158,259,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$154,474,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,278,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,249,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$162,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$118,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

Taxpayer Fairness Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$268,211,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$613,751,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,741,000 of the unclaimed personal property account—nonappropriated is provided solely for the unclaimed property system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(2) $711,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to facilitate a tax structure work group, initially created within chapter 1, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (SSB 5883) and hereby reauthorized. Membership of the tax structure work group is the same as the structure established in section 135, chapter 357, Laws of 2020 (ESSB 6168). The purpose of this reauthorization and funding is to enable the tax structure work group to complete its duties and activities during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(3) $292,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 4, Laws of 2021 (SHB 1095) (emergency assistance/tax).

(4) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1333 (rural public facilities/tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5000 (hydrogen/electric vehicles). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $2,489,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,189,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5096 (capital gains tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5220 (salmon recovery grants/tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5251 (tax and revenue laws). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5396 (farmworker housing/tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5417 (liquor licensee privileges). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5454 (prop. tax/natural disasters). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $18,211,000 of the taxpayer fairness account—state appropriation is provided solely for the administration of the working families tax exemption program.

(13) $250,000,000 of the taxpayer fairness account—state appropriation is provided solely for fiscal relief for working families under the working families tax exemption program.

(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must convene a stakeholder work group to analyze and develop recommendations on future taxation of digital products that are used in the electronic processing of prescriptions to avoid increases in the cost of providing prescription drugs to consumers. The analysis and recommendations must be submitted in a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138. FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,592,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,630,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139. FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$989,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$889,000

Minority and Women's Business Enterprises Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,388,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,266,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of minority and women's business enterprises shall consult with the Washington state office of equity on the Washington state toolkit for equity in public spending.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140. FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,633,000

Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$65,088,000

Insurance Commissioner's Fraud Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,586,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$73,307,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $234,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315 (captive insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $64,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5313 (health ins. discrimination). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $24,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5399 (universal health care commission). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $3,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377 (standardized health plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141. FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board Expense Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$64,991,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$64,991,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,464,000 of the state investment board expense account—state appropriation is provided solely for investment data software, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(2) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the Washington state investment board shall provide the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board use of the investment board main conference room. The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board must be allowed to use the board room for at least five hours on one day per month during regular business hours. Any additional direct costs incurred by the investment board due solely to the use of the conference room by the retirement board may be reimbursed by the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board, consistent with any investment board policies on reimbursement for this facility applied to other major clients and investment partners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142. FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$382,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$413,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,013,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$11,394,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$11,540,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$81,580,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$108,397,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The liquor and cannabis board may require electronic payment of the marijuana excise tax levied by RCW 69.50.535. The liquor and cannabis board may allow a waiver to the electronic payment requirement for good cause as provided by rule.

(2) Of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation, $4,939,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $2,065,000 for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the modernization of regulatory systems and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(3) $1,441,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5417 (liquor licensee privileges). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $58,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 6, Laws of 2021 (ESSB 5272) (liquor & cannabis board fees).

(5) $22,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5004 (medical marijuana tax ex.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143. FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$201,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$149,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$16,578,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$42,017,000

Public Service Revolving Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

Pipeline Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,421,000

Pipeline Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,140,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$65,606,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $800,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation in this section is for the utilities and transportation commission to supplement funds committed by a telecommunications company to expand rural broadband service on behalf of an eligible governmental entity. The amount in this subsection represents payments collected by the utilities and transportation commission pursuant to the Qwest performance assurance plan.

(2) $36,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $179,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5295 (gas & electric rates). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $201,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $149,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the utilities and transportation commission to conduct research and stakeholder outreach to develop emission reduction strategies related to regulated natural gas distribution companies, associated ratepayer protections, and other related measures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$9,872,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$9,099,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$120,157,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$53,834,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,690,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$286,903,000

Military Department Rent and Lease Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$994,000

Military Department Active State Service Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,040,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,832,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$517,821,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees by February 1st and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2021-2023 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $40,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.

(3) $11,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.

(4) $784,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.

(5) $200,000 of the military department rental and lease account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintenance staff.

(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for grants to assist eligible individuals and families with the purchase of household appliances. The maximum grant to an eligible individual or household is $2,500. Grants will be awarded on a first-come, first-serve basis subject to availability of amounts provided in this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, "household appliance" means a machine that assists with household functions such as cooking, cleaning and food preservation. To be eligible, an individual or family must:

(a) Be a resident of Douglas, Okanogan, Pierce, or Whitman county;

(b) Have suffered damage to their home or was displaced from a rental unit used as their primary residence due to a wildfire occurring in fiscal year 2021;

(c) Not have or have inadequate private insurance to cover the cost of household appliance replacement;

(d) Not qualify for individual assistance through the federal emergency management agency; and

(e) Meet one of the following criteria:

(i) Is disabled;

(ii) Has a household income equal to or less than 80 percent of county median household income;

(iii) The home qualified for the property tax exemption program in RCW 84.36.379 through 84.36.389; or

(iv) The home qualified for the property tax deferral program in chapter 84.38 RCW.

(7) $2,136,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to administer the emergency management performance grants according to federal laws and guidelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145. FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,387,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,366,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,367,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,404,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,524,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5055 (law enforcement grievances). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146. FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified Public Accountants' Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,419,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147. FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,956,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,956,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,930,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for a benefits management system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148. FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$752,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$752,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $250,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $30,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Adams county crime lab to investigate a double homicide that occurred in fiscal year 2021.

(2) $210,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$5,823,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$5,734,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,752,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$13,411,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,055,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges to include campus rent, utilities, parking, and contracts, public and historic facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, legislative support services, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.

(2) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written approval from the director of the department of enterprise services. Agencies that are exempted from the requirement are the Washington state patrol, Washington state department of transportation, and the department of natural resources.

(3) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2022 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2023.

(4) Within existing resources, beginning October 31, 2021, the department, in collaboration with consolidated technology services, must provide a report to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislative by October 31 of each calendar year that reflects information technology contract information based on a contract snapshot from June 30 of that same calendar year, and must also include any contract that was active since July 1 of the previous calendar year. The department will coordinate to receive contract information for all contracts to include those where the department has delegated authority so that the report includes statewide contract information. The report must contain a list of all information technology contracts to include the agency name, contract number, vendor name, contract term start and end dates, contract dollar amount in total, and contract dollar amounts by state fiscal year. The report must also include, by contract, the contract spending projections by state fiscal year for each ensuing state fiscal year through the contract term, and note the type of service delivered. The list of contracts must be provided electronically in Excel and be sortable by all field requirements. The report must also include trend analytics on information technology contracts, and recommendations for reducing costs where possible.

(5) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to waive rent fees and charges through June 30, 2023, for vendors who are blind business enterprise program licensees by the department of services for the blind and who lease space and operate food service businesses, inclusive of delis, cafeterias, and espresso stands, in state government buildings.

(6) Within existing resources, the state building code council, in collaboration with the LGBTQ commission, must develop a plan to incorporate into future Washington state building codes options for the design and construction of inclusive bathroom facilities that are consistent with a person's own gender expression or gender identity. Coordination must begin by September 1, 2021, and a preliminary report of the plan is due by September 1, 2022.

(7)(a) The department must work with the office of financial management to identify leases that will be up for renewal effective July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2024.

(b) The department must identify and make recommendations to the office of financial management on reduction in leased facility space by agency for fiscal years 2024 and 2025.

(8)(a) The department must work collaboratively with at least each state agency that has fleet vehicles to discuss the agency need for the number of fleet vehicles each agency has as of July 1, 2021. The department must identify and report, at least:

(i) The count of fleet vehicles by agency by type, and the cost by fund source by fiscal year for fiscal year 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023 for agency fleet vehicles;

(ii) The mileage data by agency by fleet vehicle for fiscal year 2019, 2020, and 2021, and the estimates for fiscal year 2022 and 2023; and

(iii) The business justification for the amount of fleet vehicles in fiscal year 2022 and 2023, by agency, given the change in business practice from in-person to remote work and video conferencing that began in 2020.

(b) The department must submit the report to fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(9)(a) The department must examine the motor pool fleet to determine the need for the number of vehicles. The department must identify, at least:

(i) The count of motor pool vehicles by type;

(ii) The cost recovery needed by fiscal year for fiscal year 2021, 2022, and 2023. This must include the anticipated recovery by fund source by fiscal year for fiscal year 2021, 2022, and 2023;

(iii) The mileage data by motor pool vehicle for fiscal year 2019, 2020, and 2021, and the estimates for 2022 and 2023; and

(iv) The business justification for the amount of motor vehicles in fiscal year 2022 and 2023, given the change in business practice from in-person to remote work and video conferencing.

(b) The department must report to fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,289,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,305,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,948,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,556,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for archaeological determinations and excavations of inadvertently discovered skeletal human remains, and removal and reinterment of such remains when necessary.

(2) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state main street program to ramp up direct recovery services to communities across the state, with an emphasis on organizational stability and small business retention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151. FOR THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$200,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$188,000

Consolidated Technology Services Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$51,393,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$51,781,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,957,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of the chief information officer. Of this amount:

(a) $1,663,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for experienced information technology project managers to provide critical support to agency IT projects that are under oversight from the office of the chief information officer. The staff or vendors will:

(i) Provide master level project management guidance to agency IT stakeholders;

(ii) Consider statewide best practices from the public and private sectors, independent review and analysis, vendor management, budget and timing quality assurance and other support of current or past IT projects in at least Washington state and share these with agency IT stakeholders and legislative fiscal staff at least quarterly and post these to the statewide IT dashboard; and

(iii) Provide independent recommendations to legislative fiscal committees by December of each calendar year on oversight of IT projects to include opportunities for accountability and performance metrics.

(b) $2,960,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of privacy and data protection.

(2) $11,424,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security.

(3) The consolidated technology services agency shall work with customer agencies using the Washington state electronic records vault (WASERV) to identify opportunities to:

(a) Reduce storage volumes and costs associated with vault records stored beyond the agencies' record retention schedules; and

(b) Assess a customized service charge as defined in chapter 304, Laws of 2017 for costs of using WASERV to prepare data compilations in response to public records requests.

(4)(a) In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures must include the following:

(i) The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request;

(ii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the current biennium;

(iii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the ensuing biennium;

(iv) The estimated total cost for the current and ensuing biennium;

(v) The total cost by fiscal year, by fund, and in total, of the information technology project since it began;

(vi) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund over all biennia through implementation and close out and into maintenance and operations;

(vii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for service level agreements once the project is implemented;

(viii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for agency staffing for maintenance and operations once the project is implemented; and

(ix) The expected fiscal year when the agency expects to complete the request.

(b) The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

(5) The consolidated technology services agency must not increase fees charged for existing services without prior approval by the office of financial management. The agency may develop fees to recover the actual cost of new infrastructure to support increased use of cloud technologies.

(6) Within existing resources, the agency must provide oversight of state procurement and contracting for information technology goods and services by the department of enterprise services.

(7) Within existing resources, the agency must host, administer, and support the state employee directory in an online format to provide public employee contact information.

(8) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(9) $4,303,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the creation and ongoing delivery of information technology services tailored to the needs of small agencies. The scope of services must include, at a minimum, full-service desktop support, service assistance, security, and consultation.

(10) $23,150,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the procurement and distribution of Microsoft 365 licenses which must include advanced security features and cloud-based private branch exchange capabilities for state agencies. The office must report annually to fiscal committees of the legislature beginning December 31, 2021, and each December 31 thereafter, on the count and type of licenses distributed by consolidated technology services to each state agency. The report must also separately report on the count and type of Microsoft 365 licenses that state agencies have in addition to those that are distributed by consolidated technology services so that the total count, type of license, and cost is known for statewide Microsoft 365 licenses.

(11)(a) The statewide information technology dashboard elements must include, at a minimum, the:

(i) Start date of the project;

(ii) End date of the project, when the project will close out and implementation will commence;

(iii) Term of the project in state fiscal years across all biennia to reflect the start of the project through the end of the project;

(iv) Total project cost from start date through the end date of the project in total dollars, and a subtotal of near general fund outlook;

(v) Near general fund outlook budget and actual spending in total dollars and by fiscal month for central service agencies that bill out project costs;

(vi) Start date of maintenance and operations;

(vii) Estimated annual state fiscal year cost of maintenance and operations after implementation and close out;

(viii) Actual spending by state fiscal year and in total for state fiscal years that have closed;

(ix) Date a feasibility study was completed; and

(x) A list of funding received by fiscal year by enacted session law, and how much was received citing chapter law as a list of funding provided by fiscal year.

(b) The office of the chief information officer may recommend additional elements to include but must have agreement with legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management prior to including additional elements.

(c) The agency must ensure timely posting of project data on the statewide information technology dashboard for at least each project funded in the budget and under oversight to include, at a minimum, posting on the dashboard:

(i) The budget funded level by project for each project under oversight within 30 calendar days of the budget being signed into law;

(ii) The project historical expenditures through fiscal year 2021, by December 31, 2021, for all projects that started prior to July 1, 2021;

(iii) The project historical expenditures through fiscal year 2022, by December 31, 2022, for all projects that started prior to July 1, 2022; and

(iv) Whether each project has completed a feasibility study.

(12) Within existing resources, consolidated technology services must collaborate with the department of enterprise services on the annual contract report that provides information technology contract information. Consolidated technology services will:

(a) Provide Apptio data to the department of enterprise services annually beginning September 1, 2021, and each September 1 of each year; and

(b) Provide analysis on contract information for all agencies comparing spending across state fiscal years by, at least, the contract spending towers.

(13) $129,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5062 (data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office of the chief information officer who must convene a work group to examine how automated decision making systems can best be reviewed before adoption and while in operation and be periodically audited to ensure that such systems are fair, transparent, accountable and do not improperly advantage or disadvantage Washington residents.

(a) The work group must be composed of:

(i) A representative of the department of children, youth, and families;

(ii) A representative of the department of corrections;

(iii) A representative of the department of social and health services;

(iv) A representative of the department of enterprise services;

(v) At least two representatives from universities or research institutions who are experts in the design and effect of an algorithmic system; and

(vi) At least five representatives from advocacy organizations that represent communities that are disproportionately vulnerable to being harmed by algorithmic bias, including but not limited to, African American, Hispanic American, Native American, and Asian American communities, religious minorities, people with disabilities, and other vulnerable communities.

(b) The purpose of the work group is to develop recommendations for changes in state law and policy regarding the development, procurement, and use of automated decision systems by public agencies. The work group must examine:

(i) When state agency use of automated decision making systems should be prohibited;

(ii) When state agency use of artificial intelligence-enabled profiling systems should be prohibited;

(iii) Changes in the procurement of automated decision systems, including when the procurement must receive prior approval by the office of chief information officer;

(iv) How to review, identify, and audit systems to ensure that the system prior to procurement and after placed into service does not discriminate against an individual, or treat an individual less favorably than another, in whole or in part, on the basis of one or more factors enumerated in RCW 49.60.010;

(v) How to provide public notice when an automated decision system is in use and how to appeal such decisions;

(vi) How automated decision system data should be stored and whether such data should be shared outside the system; and

(vii) Other issues determined by the office of chief information officer or the department of enterprise services that are necessary to govern state agency procurement and use of automated decision systems.

(c) To demonstrate the impacts of its recommendations, the work group must select one of following automated decision making systems and describe how their implementation would affect the procurement of a new system and the use the existing system:

(i) The department of children, youth, and families system used to determine risk in the family child welfare system;

(ii) The department of corrections system used to determine risk for purposes of evaluating early release and/or sentencing; or

(iii) The department of social and health services system used for hospital admissions.

(d) The work group shall meet at least four times, or more frequently to accomplish its work. The office of the chief information officer must lead the work group. Each of the state agencies identified in (a) of this subsection must provide staff support to the work group and its activities.

(e) The work group must submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the governor no later than December 1, 2021.

(f) For purposes of this subsection, "automated decision system" or "system" means any algorithm, including one incorporating machine learning or other artificial intelligence techniques, that uses data-based analysis or calculations to make or support government decisions, judgments, or conclusions that cause a Washington resident to be treated differently than another Washington resident in the nature or amount of governmental interaction with that individual including, without limitation, benefits, protections, required payments, penalties, regulations, timing, application, or process requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152. FOR THE BOARD OF REGISTRATION OF PROFESSIONAL ENGINEERS AND LAND SURVEYORS

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,186,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,186,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153. FOR THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS' AND FIREFIGHTERS' PLAN 2 RETIREMENT BOARD

Law Enforcement Officers' and Firefighters' Plan 2

Expense Nonappropriated Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$320,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$320,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for an additional full-time equivalent position to staff an ombuds services program. The ombuds services program will provide information and advice and assist members and survivors regarding the benefits and services for which they qualify.

(End of part)

PART II

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.

(7) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$433,674,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$426,584,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$140,299,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$18,700,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,019,257,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b) are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community service officer at the city of Lakewood. The department must collect data from the city of Lakewood on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.

(c) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(d) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas.

(e) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to hire an on-site safety compliance officer, stationed at Western State Hospital, to provide oversight and accountability of the hospital's response to safety concerns regarding the hospital's work environment.

(f) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to track compliance with RCW 71.05.365 requirements for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within fourteen days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must use these funds to track the following elements related to this requirement: (i) The date on which an individual is determined to no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (ii) the date on which the behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services for the person is notified of this determination; and (iii) the date on which either the individual is transitioned to the community or has been re-evaluated and determined to again require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must provide this information in regular intervals to behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services. The department must summarize the information and provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress toward meeting the fourteen day standard by December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022.

(g) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.

(i) The predictive modeling tool must be developed to leverage data from a variety of sources and identify factors that are strongly associated with future criminal justice involvement. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which describes the following: (A) The proposed data sources to be used in the predictive model and how privacy issues will be addressed; (B) modeling results including a description of measurable factors most strongly predictive of risk of future criminal justice involvement; (C) an assessment of the accuracy, timeliness, and potential effectiveness of the tool; (D) identification of interventions and strategies that can be effective in reducing future criminal justice involvement of high risk patients; and (E) the timeline for implementing processes to provide monthly lists of high-risk client to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health entities.

(ii) The model for civil and forensic state hospital bed need must be developed and updated in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities, which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for predicting the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. Factors should include identification of need for the services and analysis of the effect of community investments in behavioral health services and other types of beds that may reduce the need for long-term civil commitment needs. The department must submit a report to the legislature each November 1st through the end of the biennium. The department must continue to update the model on a calendar quarterly basis and provide updates to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature accordingly.

(h) $3,557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(i) $7,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to maintain and further increase implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to maintain increases in the number of competency evaluators that began in fiscal year 2016 and further increase the number of staff providing competency evaluation services. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department must use a portion of these amounts to increase the number of forensic evaluators pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(j) $63,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $63,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $4,060,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). These amounts must be used to maintain increases that began in fiscal year 2016 and further increase the number of forensic beds at western state hospital and eastern state hospital. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department must use a portion of these amounts to increase forensic bed capacity at the state hospitals pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(k) $86,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $86,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to continue to implement an acuity based staffing tool at western state hospital and eastern state hospital in collaboration with the hospital staffing committees.

(i) The staffing tool must be designed and implemented to identify, on a daily basis, the clinical acuity on each patient ward and determine the minimum level of direct care staff by profession to be deployed to meet the needs of the patients on each ward. The department must also continue to update, in collaboration with the office of financial management's labor relations office, the staffing committees, and state labor unions, an overall state hospital staffing plan that looks at all positions and functions of the facilities.

(ii) Within these amounts, the department must establish, monitor, track, and report monthly staffing and expenditures at the state hospitals, including overtime and use of locums, to the functional categories identified in the recommended staffing plan. The allotments and tracking of staffing and expenditures must include all areas of the state hospitals, must be done at the ward level, and must include contracted facilities providing forensic restoration services as well as the office of forensic mental health services.

(iii) Monthly staffing levels and related expenditures at the state hospitals must not exceed official allotments without prior written approval from the director of the office of financial management. In the event the director of the office of financial management approves an increase in monthly staffing levels and expenditures beyond what is budgeted, notice must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature within thirty days of such approval. The notice must identify the reason for the authorization to exceed budgeted staffing levels and the time frame for the authorization. Extensions of authorizations under this subsection must also be submitted to the director of the office of financial management for written approval in advance of the expiration of an authorization. The office of financial management must notify the appropriate committees of the legislature of any extensions of authorizations granted under this subsection within thirty days of granting such authorizations and identify the reason and time frame for the extension.

(l) $10,581,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,581,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement strategies to improve patient and staff safety at eastern and western state hospitals. These amounts must be used for implementing a new intensive care model program at western state hospital.

(m) $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to increase services to patients found not guilty by reason of insanity under the Ross v. Laswhay settlement agreement.

(n) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must develop and submit an annual state hospital performance report for eastern and western state hospitals. Each measure included in the performance report must include baseline performance data, agency performance targets, and performance for the most recent fiscal year. The performance report must include a one page dashboard as well as charts for each fiscal and quality of care measure broken out by hospital and including but not limited to (i) monthly FTE expenditures compared to allotments; (ii) monthly dollar expenditures compared to allotments; (iii) monthly FTE expenditures per ten thousand patient bed days; (iv) monthly dollar expenditures per ten thousand patient bed days; (v) percentage of FTE expenditures for overtime; (vi) average length of stay by category of patient; (vii) average monthly civil wait list; (viii) average monthly forensic wait list; (ix) rate of staff assaults per 10,000 bed days; (x) rate of patient assaults per 10,000 bed days; (xi) average number of days to release after a patient has been determined to be clinically ready for discharge; and (xii) average monthly vacancy rates for key clinical positions. The department must submit the state hospital performance report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature each December 1st through the end of fiscal year 2023, and provide annual updates each December 1st thereafter.

(o) $8,422,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $18,997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the operations of two newly constructed forensic competency restoration wards at western state hospital.

(p) $2,941,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $2,941,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operations of a 16 bed civil commitment regional treatment center located in Clark county. The department must prioritize serving otherwise hard-to-place civil commitment patients at this facility, including patients with high acuity symptoms, patients converted from the forensic mental health system, and other patients who cannot otherwise be committed to community providers.

(q) $1,382,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $5,092,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $5,092,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operations of a 16 bed civil commitment regional treatment center located at the Maple Lane campus. The department must prioritize serving otherwise hard-to-place civil commitment patients at this facility, including patients with high acuity symptoms, patients converted from the forensic mental health system, and other patients who cannot otherwise be committed to community providers.

(r) $4,316,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the operations of a 30 bed facility located on the Maple Lane campus serving individuals found not guilty by reason of insanity.

(2) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$5,613,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$5,618,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$366,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$11,597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$761,993,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$936,909,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,111,649,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$4,058,000

Developmental Disabilities Community Services

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$55,513,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,870,122,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 must be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023.

(c) $2,648,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $8,946,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $16,665,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 945 of this act.

(d) $291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $992,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,844,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(e) $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $860,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,881,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 947 of this act.

(f) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(g) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.

(h) Sufficient appropriations are provided to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(i) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.

(ii) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (h)(i) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(iii) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (h)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(iv) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(i) Sufficient appropriations are provided for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(j) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $23,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a cost of living adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

(k) The department will work with the health care authority and Washington state's managed care organizations to establish recommendations for clients who live in the community to access the developmental disabilities administration's facility-based professionals to receive care covered under the state plan. If feasible, these recommendations should detail how to enable facility-based professionals to deliver services at mobile or brick-and-mortar clinical settings in the community.

(l) $1,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,688,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,465,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for 13 enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her family home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report in January of each year that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(m) $2,025,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,006,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for 13 community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January of each year that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(n) $78,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $113,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5284 (subminimum wage/disabilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(o) $422,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $478,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $599,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (developmental disability services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(p) $3,490,000 of the general fund—local appropriation and $3,490,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 458, Laws of 2019 (residential services and supports). The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2022 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2023. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs. The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 220, Laws of 2020 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.

(q) $1,703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $3,397,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5258 (consumer directed employers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(r) Funding in this section is sufficient to implement chapter 352, laws of 2020 (developmental disabilities budgeting), including a review of the no-paid services caseload and to update the information to accurately reflect a current headcount of eligible persons and the number of persons contacted who are currently interested in receiving a paid service. It is the intent of the legislature that the department will, as required in chapter 252, laws of 2020 (developmental disabilities budgeting), submit a report of this information to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021. It is also the intent of the legislature that the necessary paid services identified with completion of this report will be adequately funded by the conclusion of fiscal year 2024.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$116,233,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$127,861,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$242,444,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$27,043,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$513,581,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(c) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(d) The department is directed to develop a plan to reduce the footprint of the Rainier residential habilitation center.

(i) The plan must include the following:

(A) Input from interested stakeholders to ensure a thoughtful, safe, and well-supported residential transition to the community.

(B) An outline for maintaining a state-operated safety net for individuals who transition to the community and who may later be in crisis or who need a greater level of care.

(C) Barriers to successful community transitions and how to mitigate those.

(D) Report of stakeholder feedback received and how it was incorporated or not into the plan.

(E) A proposed timeline to implement the plan and a target date for reducing the footprint of Rainier if the plan is followed.

(ii) The stakeholders must include, at a minimum: Individuals who reside or have resided at Rainier, families and guardians of individuals who reside or have resided at Rainier, and current or former staff at Rainier and their respective labor organizations.

(iii) The department must confer with and have approval from the governor's office prior to submission of the plan. A final plan shall be submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature no sooner than January 1, 2022, and no later than July 1, 2022.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,639,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,688,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,192,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,519,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$61,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$61,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,090,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,212,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,543,218,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,775,210,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,694,716,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$37,804,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,544,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$133,360,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,873,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,199,725,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate may not exceed $260.35 for fiscal year 2022 and may not exceed $270.20 for fiscal year 2023.

(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(2) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2022 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2023.

(3) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state-only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(4) $6,113,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $19,799,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $37,161,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 945 of this act.

(5) $1,941,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $6,439,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $12,064,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(6) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(7) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $900 for each facility.

(8) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department shall assist the legislature to continue the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues.

(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is continued, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, and four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;

(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;

(v) A member from disability rights Washington and a member from the office of long-term care ombuds;

(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and

(vii) Other agency directors or designees as necessary.

(b) The committee must make recommendations and continue to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington, including state budget and policy options, and may conduct, but are not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities to promote healthy living and palliative care planning;

(ii) Identify strategies and policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term service and supports that allow individuals and families to meet their needs for service;

(iii) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans;

(iv) Identify ways to promote advance planning and advance care directives and implementation strategies for the Bree collaborative palliative care and related guidelines;

(v) Identify ways to meet the needs of the aging demographic impacted by reduced federal support;

(vi) Identify ways to protect the rights of vulnerable adults through assisted decision-making and guardianship and other relevant vulnerable adult protections;

(vii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation; and

(viii) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation.

(c) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.

(d) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. Meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the rules of both the senate and the house of representatives. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(9) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(10) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund financial service specialists stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Financial service specialists will help to transition clients ready for hospital discharge into alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state hospitals.

(11) The department shall continue to administer initiative 2 of the medicaid transformation waiver that provides tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care described in initiative 2 of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. This initiative will be funded by the health care authority with the medicaid quality improvement program. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the health care authority shall report to the office of financial management all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures on this initiative.

(12) $3,378,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $5,561,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $11,980,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 947 of this act.

(13) $428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,520,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for case managers at the area agencies on aging to coordinate care for medicaid clients with mental illness who are living in their own homes. Work shall be accomplished within existing standards for case management and no requirements will be added or modified unless by mutual agreement between the department of social and health services and area agencies on aging.

(14) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient for the department to contract with an organization to provide educational materials, legal services, and attorney training to support persons with dementia. The funding provided in this subsection must be used for:

(a) An advance care and legal planning toolkit for persons and families living with dementia, designed and made available online and in print. The toolkit should include educational topics including, but not limited to:

(i) The importance of early advance care, legal, and financial planning;

(ii) The purpose and application of various advance care, legal, and financial documents;

(iii) Dementia and capacity;

(iv) Long-term care financing considerations;

(v) Elder and vulnerable adult abuse and exploitation;

(vi) Checklists such as "legal tips for caregivers," "meeting with an attorney," and "life and death planning;"

(vii) Standardized forms such as general durable power of attorney forms and advance health care directives; and

(viii) A selected list of additional resources.

(b) Webinars about the dementia legal and advance care planning toolkit and related issues and topics with subject area experts. The subject area expert presenters must provide their services in-kind, on a volunteer basis.

(c) Continuing legal education programs for attorneys to advise and assist persons with dementia. The continuing education programs must be offered at no cost to attorneys who make a commitment to participate in the pro bono program.

(d) Administrative support costs to develop intake forms and protocols, perform client intake, match participating attorneys with eligible clients statewide, maintain records and data, and produce reports as needed.

(15) Appropriation provided in this section are sufficient to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(a) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, assisted living facility beds, and specialized dementia beds.

(b) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(c) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(d) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(16) No later than December 31, 2021, the department of social and health services and the health care authority shall submit a waiver request to the federal department of health and human services to authorize presumptive medicaid eligibility determinations for clients preparing for acute care hospital discharge who may need long-term services and supports. The department and the authority shall hold stakeholder discussions, including opportunities for public review and comment, during development of the waiver request. Upon submission of the waiver request, the department and the authority shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees that describes the request and identifies any statutory changes that may be necessary if the federal government approves the request.

(17) $3,353,000 of the general fund—local appropriation and $1,055,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 458, Laws of 2019 (residential services and supports). The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2022 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2023. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.

(18) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 220, Laws of 2020 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.

(19) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department of social and health services must develop a statewide agency emergency preparedness plan with which to respond to future public health emergencies.

(20) The traumatic brain injury council shall collaborate with other state agencies in their efforts to address traumatic brain injuries to ensure that efforts are complimentary and continue to support the state's broader efforts to address this issue.

(21) $1,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding must be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.

(22) $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.

(23) $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the kinship navigator program in the Colville Indian reservation, Yakama Nation, and other tribal areas.

(24) Within available funds, the aging and long term support administration must maintain a unit within adult protective services that specializes in the investigation of financial abuse allegations and self-neglect allegations.

(25) $1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the kinship care support program.

(26) $10,797,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $11,477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $23,946,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for nursing home services and emergent building costs at the transitional care center of Seattle. No later than December 1, 2022, the department must submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a report that includes, but is not limited to:

(a) An itemization of the costs associated with providing direct care services to residents and managing and caring for the facility; and

(b) An examination of the impacts of this facility on clients and providers of the long-term care and medical care sectors of the state that includes, but is not limited to:

(i) An analysis of areas that have realized cost containment or savings as a result of this facility;

(ii) A comparison of individuals transitioned from hospitals to this facility compared to other skilled nursing facilities over the same period of time; and

(iii) Impacts of this facility on lengths of stay in acute care hospitals, other skilled nursing facility, and transitions to home and community-based settings.

(27) $3,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $7,925,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5258 (consumer directed employers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(28) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $90,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5229 (health equity continuing education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29) $114,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) and $140,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5294 (long-term care/epidemics). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(30) $84,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $98,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $167,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (conditionally released sexually violent predators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(31) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for fall prevention training. The department of social and health services will provide one-time grant funding to an association representing long-term care facilities to develop and provide fall prevention training for long-term care facilities. The training must include information about environmental modifications to help reduce falls, tools to assess an individual's risk for falling, and evidence-based interventions for reducing falls amongst individuals with dementia or cognitive impairments. The training must be offered at no cost and made available online for the general public to access at any time. The recipient of the grant funds must work with the department of social and health services and the department of health on developing and promoting the training.

(32) $4,504,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $9,072,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $452,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for behavioral health personal care services for individuals with exceptional care needs due to their psychiatric diagnosis as determined through the department's CARE assessment and for three full-time positions to coordinate with the health care authority and medicaid managed care organizations for the care of these individuals. Future caseload and per capita changes for behavioral health personal care services will be incorporated into the department's medicaid forecast. The department shall coordinate with the authority for purposes of developing and submitting to the centers for medicare and medicaid, a 1915(i) state plan.

(33) Within existing appropriations, and no later than December 31, 2021, the department of social and health services must work with stakeholders to consider modifications to current practices that address the current challenges adult family homes are facing with acquiring and maintaining liability insurance coverage. In consultation with stakeholders, the department of social and health services must:

(a) Transition language contained in citation and enforcement actions to plain talk language that helps insurers and consumers understand the nature of the regulatory citations; and

(b) Display the severity and resolution of citation and enforcement actions in plain talk language for consumers and insurers to better understand the nature of the situation.

(34) $395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to continue the current pilot project in Pierce county to provide personal care services to homeless seniors and people with disabilities from the time the person presents at a shelter to the time they become eligible for medicaid and to establish two new pilot project sites in King county, one site in Clark county, and one site in Spokane county. The department of social and health services shall submit a report by December 1, 2022, to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that addresses the following for each site:

(a) The number of people served in the pilot;

(b) The number of people served in the pilot who transitioned to medicaid personal care;

(c) The number of people served in the pilot who found stable housing; and

(d) Any additional information or data deemed relevant by the contractors or the department of social and health services.

(35) $3,063,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,517,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to offset COVID-19 related cost impacts on the in-home medicaid long-term care case management program operated by area agencies on aging.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$402,589,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$408,856,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,524,490,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,274,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,404,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$304,920,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,648,533,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $111,153,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $112,428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $859,678,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.

(b) $377,425,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b):

(i) $10,914,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $14,104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $27,227,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to increase the temporary assistance for needy family grant standard by 15 percent, effective July 1, 2021.

(ii) $7,386,000 is provided solely for the cost of benefits associated with the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 (economic assistance programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(iii) $217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $863,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for costs in state fiscal year 2022 that are associated with the temporary suspension of the mid-certification review and extension of the eligibility review between November 2020 and June 2021 for the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(c) $167,740,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c):

(i) The department shall implement the working family support program.

(ii) $2,430,000 of the amounts provided is for enhanced transportation assistance. The department must prioritize the use of these funds for the recipients most in need of financial assistance to facilitate their return to work. The department must not utilize these funds to supplant repayment arrangements that are currently in place to facilitate the reinstatement of drivers' licenses.

(iii) $378,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $568,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for WorkFirst services costs associated with the implementation of chapter 320, Laws of 2020 (revising economic assistance programs).

(iv) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $760,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,706,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for WorkFirst services costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 2020 (improving access to temporary assistance for needy families).

(v) $4,933,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the WorkFirst costs associated with the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 (economic assistance programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

(d) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $353,402,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020 within the department of children, youth, and families. The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal temporary assistance for needy families grant. A portion of this grant must be used to fund child care subsidies expenditures at the department of children, youth, and families.

(i) The department of social and health services shall work in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families.

(ii) Effective September 30, 2022, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.

(e) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $68,496,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families.

(f) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $116,195,000 is for WorkFirst administration and overhead. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(f):

(i) $43,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022 and $43,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for administrative and overhead costs associated with the implementation of chapter 320, Laws of 2020 (revising economic assistance programs).

(ii) $1,215,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for administrative and overhead costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 2020 (improving access to temporary assistance for needy families).

(iii) $707,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation costs associated with Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 (economic assistance programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g) The amounts in (b) through (e) of this subsection shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified. However, the department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between (b) through (f) of this subsection. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.

(h) On July 1, 2021, January 1, 2022, and every six months thereafter, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:

(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;

(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;

(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;

(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;

(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort;

(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements; and

(vii) Proposed and enacted federal law changes affecting maintenance of effort or the participation rate, what impact these changes have on Washington's temporary assistance for needy families program, and the department's plan to comply with these changes.

(i) In the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to provide appropriations from the state general fund for the purposes of (a) of this subsection if the department does not receive additional federal temporary assistance for needy families contingency funds in each fiscal year as assumed in the budget outlook.

(2) $2,545,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On January 1, 2022, and January 1, 2023, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be one hundred percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(7) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

(8) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.

(9) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a study, jointly with the poverty reduction work group, on the feasibility of implementing a universal basic income pilot program. The study must include research of other universal basic income programs, recommendations for a pilot in Washington, a cost-benefit analysis, operational costs, and an implementation plan that includes a strategy to ensure pilot participants who voluntarily quit a public assistance program to enroll in the universal basic income pilot will not experience gaps in service upon completion of the pilot. The department shall submit recommendations required by this section to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than June 1, 2022.

(10) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to assess the feasibility of expanding or creating social net programs to individuals regardless of their citizenship status. The department shall analyze existing programs to assess the legality of expansion to serve undocumented individuals and families, identify programmatic changes that would mitigate barriers to access and reduce fear of participation, and identify the operational and caseload costs associated with replication or expansion. If existing program expansion is not feasible or in compliance with federal law, the analysis shall assess the creation of similar programs and identify the associated operational and caseload costs. The department shall provide the completed analysis to the employment security department by October 1, 2021.

(11) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for costs in state fiscal year 2022 that are associated with the temporary suspension of mid-certification reviews and extension of the eligibility review between November 2020 and June 2021 for the aged, blind, or disabled program.

(12) $388,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for costs in fiscal year 2022 that are associated with the temporary suspension of mid-certification reviews and extension of the eligibility review between November 2020 and June 2021 for the food assistance program.

(13) $4,920,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to increase benefits for the food assistance program to maintain parity with benefits provided under the supplemental nutrition assistance program, for the period of July 1, 2021, through September 30, 2021.

(14) $300,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the Washington immigrant relief fund. At least 90 percent of the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for grants to eligible persons.

(a) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium and from the amount provided in this subsection, a person is eligible for a grant who:

(i) Has lived in Washington state since March 1, 2020;

(ii) Is at least 18 years of age;

(iii) Has been affected by the coronavirus pandemic during the period of January 1, 2021, through June 30, 2023, such as experiencing a loss of employment or reduction in work hours, contracting the coronavirus, having to self-quarantine as a result of exposure to the coronavirus, caring for a family member who contracted the coronavirus, or being unable to access child care for children impacted by school or child care closures; and

(iv) Is not eligible to receive federal economic impact (stimulus) payments or unemployment insurance benefits due to his or her immigration status.

(b) The department may not deny a grant to a person on the basis that another adult in the household is eligible for federal economic impact (stimulus) payments or unemployment insurance benefits or that the person previously received a grant under the program.

(c) The department must prioritize grants to persons who are most in need of financial assistance using factors that include, but are not limited to, having an income at or below 250 percent of federal poverty level, being the primary or sole income earner of household, and experiencing housing instability.

(d) The department may contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to administer the program. If the department engages in a competitive contracting process for administration of the program, experience in administering similar programs must be given weight in the selection process to expedite the delivery of benefits to eligible applicants.

(e) Grants provided in this section shall be available until funding is exhausted.

(15) $204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $22,635,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the department to provide a one-time or short-term cash benefit to families eligible for pandemic emergency assistance under section 9201 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, and to offer an equivalent benefit to eligible state family assistance or food assistance program recipients.

(16) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $89,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5068 (postpartum period/Medicaid). If the bill is not enacted by July 1, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$16,320,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$16,437,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$109,595,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$142,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$64,249,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$62,347,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$126,596,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(2) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,079,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for specialized equipment and additional medical staff to provide more capacity to deliver care to individuals housed at the total confinement facility. No later than November 1, 2023, the department shall report to the legislature on the number of individuals treated on the island that previously would have been transported off the island for treatment.

(3) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the increased costs for personal computers leased through the department of enterprise services.

(4) $7,367,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,095,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (conditionally released SVPs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$39,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$38,916,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$51,356,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$129,672,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2022, and February 1, 2023. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(2) $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $8,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall develop a plan to implement a complete electronic health records system using existing software where applicable. By October 1, 2021, the department must submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature detailing shortcomings of the previously funded electronic health records system and contract, the clinical validity of existing software, approaches to mitigate the shortcomings of previously funded system, and a recommended approach to establishing a comprehensive electronic health records system at state facilities in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$45,826,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$47,720,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$46,673,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$140,219,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must extend master property insurance to all buildings owned by the department valued over $250,000 and to all locations leased by the department with contents valued over $250,000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

(1)(a) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.

(b) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(2) The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3)(a) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) The health care authority must submit a report on November 1, 2021, and annually thereafter, to the fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include, at a minimum:

(i) A list of active coalition projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include all current and ongoing coalition projects, which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, and the funding being expended on each project, including in-kind funding. For each project, the report must include which federal requirements each coalition project is working to satisfy, and when each project is anticipated to satisfy those requirements; and

(ii) A list of coalition projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year. This must include which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, including the anticipated in-kind funding by agency, and if a budget request will be submitted for funding. This must reflect all funding required by fiscal year and by fund source and include the budget outlook period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,523,256,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,443,037,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,208,221,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$355,726,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,086,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$723,238,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$24,521,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$25,188,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$540,000

Telebehavioral Health Access Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,468,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$19,326,281,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The authority shall not accept or expend any federal funds received under a medicaid transformation waiver under healthier Washington except as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section until specifically approved and appropriated by the legislature. To ensure compliance with legislative directive budget requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the innovation waiver requires better analytic capability, transparency, consistency, timeliness, accuracy, and lack of redundancy with other established measures and that the patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. In order to effectuate these goals, the authority shall: (a) Require the Dr. Robert Bree collaborative and the health technology assessment program to reduce the administrative burden upon providers by only requiring performance measures that are nonduplicative of other nationally established measures. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen by the collaborative and the health technology assessment program for effectiveness and appropriateness; (b) develop a patient satisfaction survey with the goal to gather information about whether it was beneficial for the patient to use the center of excellence location in exchange for additional out-of-pocket savings; (c) ensure patients and health care providers have significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver, in order to ensure improved patient health outcomes; and (d) in cooperation with the department of social and health services, consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget, to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting waivers for federal approval. The authority shall submit an application to the centers for medicaid and medicare services to extend the duration of the medicaid transformation waiver under healthier Washington as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section by one year. If not extended, by federal standard, the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver shall not exceed the duration originally granted by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement.

(2)(a) No more than $63,052,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than $50,840,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for transformation through accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the medicaid transformation demonstration wavier under healthier Washington, including preventing youth drug use, opioid prevention and treatment, and physical and behavioral health integration. Under this initiative, the authority shall take into account local input regarding community needs. In order to ensure transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) No more than $243,047,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than $99,274,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation may be expended for the medicaid quality improvement program. Under federal regulations, the medicaid quality improvement program is authorized and allows states to design quality improvement programs for the medicaid population in ways that support the state's quality goals. Medicaid quality improvement program payments will not count against the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver spending limits and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation. Apple health managed care organizations and their partnering providers will receive medicaid quality improvement program payments as they meet designated milestones. Partnering providers and apple health managed care organizations will work together to achieve medicaid quality improvement program goals according to the performance period timelines and reporting deadlines as set forth by the authority. The authority shall only utilize the medicaid quality improvement program to support the transformation waiver and shall not pursue its use for other purposes. Any programs created or funded by the medicaid quality improvement program does not create an entitlement. The authority shall not increase general fund—state, federal, or private/local expenditures under this program. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight not less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(3) No more than $26,837,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $26,839,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care described in initiative 2 of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington as well as administrative expenses for initiative 3. The authority shall contract and provide funding to the department of social and health services to administer initiative 2. The director in cooperation with the secretary of the department of social and health services shall report to the office of financial management all of the expenditures of this section and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures on this initiative.

(4) No more than $50,389,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than $22,862,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third party administrator. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(5) The authority shall submit a plan to preserve the waiver that allows for the full cost of stays in institutions for mental diseases to be included in managed care rates by November 1, 2021, to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(6) The authority shall submit a plan to preserve the waiver allowing for full federal financial participation for medical clients in mental health facilities classified as institutions for mental diseases by November 1, 2021, to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(7) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).

(8) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(9) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(10) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(11) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(12) $3,997,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $8,786,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(14) $7,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(15) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2021, and by November 1, 2022, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2022 and fiscal year 2023, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2021-2023 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. $702,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $649,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.

(16) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(17) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(18) The authority shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2021, and no later than September 15, 2022, that delineate the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The reports should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.

(19) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(20) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.

(21) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(22) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.

(23) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program. By November 15, 2022, the authority shall submit a report to the appropriate committees to the legislature that provides, at a minimum, information about the number of calls received by the nonprofit organization in the previous year, the amount of time spent on each call, comparisons to previous years, where available, and information about what data is collected related to this service.

(24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(26) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.

(27) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated marijuana fund for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fund—state payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(28) Beginning no later than January 1, 2018, for any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority.

(29) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide a medicaid equivalent adult dental benefit to clients enrolled in the medical care service program.

(30) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to provide services identical to those services covered by the Washington state family planning waiver program as of August 2018 to individuals who:

(a) Are over nineteen years of age;

(b) Are at or below two hundred and sixty percent of the federal poverty level as established in WAC 182-505-0100;

(c) Are not covered by other public or private insurance; and

(d) Need family planning services and are not currently covered by or eligible for another medical assistance program for family planning.

(31) Sufficient amounts are appropriated within this section for the authority to incorporate the expected outcomes and criteria to measure the performance of service coordination organizations as provided in chapter 70.320 RCW into contracts with managed care organizations that provide services to clients. The authority is directed to:

(a) Contract with an external quality improvement organization to annually analyze the performance of managed care organizations providing services to clients under this chapter based on seven performance measures. The analysis required under this subsection must:

(i) Measure managed care performance in four common measures across each managed care organization, including:

(A) At least one common measure must be weighted towards having the potential to impact managed care costs; and

(B) At least one common measure must be weighted towards population health management, as defined by the measure; and

(ii) Measure managed care performance in an additional three quality focus performance measures specific to a managed care organization. Quality focus performance measures chosen by the authority must:

(A) Be chosen from the statewide common measure set;

(B) Reflect specific measures where a managed care organization has poor performance; and

(C) Be substantive and clinically meaningful in promoting health status.

(b) The authority shall set the four common measures to be analyzed across all managed care organizations.

(c) The authority shall set three quality focus performance measures specific to each managed care organization. The authority must determine performance measures for each managed care organization based on the criteria established in (a)(ii) of this subsection.

(d) By September 15, 2021, and annually thereafter, the authority shall notify each managed care organization of the performance measures for the organization for the subsequent plan year.

(e) Two percent of the total plan year funding appropriated to each managed care organization that provides services to clients under chapter 70.320 RCW shall be withheld. At least seventy-five percent of the withhold shall be held contingent on each managed care organization's performance on the seven performance measures identified in this section. Each managed care organization may earn back the annual withhold if the external quality improvement organization finds that the managed care organization:

(i) Made statistically significant improvement in the seven performance measures as compared to the preceding plan year; or

(ii) Scored in the top national medicaid quartile of the performance measures.

(f) The amount of withhold annually paid to each managed care organization shall be proportional to findings of statistically significant improvement or top national medicaid quartile scoring by a managed care organization.

(g) For no more than two of the four quality focus performance measures, the authority may use an alternate methodology to approximate top national medicaid quartile performance where top quartile performance data is unavailable.

(h) For the purposes of this subsection, "external quality improvement organization" means an organization that meets the competence and independence requirements under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.354, as it existed on the effective date of this section.

(32)(a) The authority shall ensure that appropriate resources are dedicated to implementing the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report. Additionally, the authority shall:

(i) Work to ensure the efficient operations of the managed care plans, including but not limited to, a deconflicting process for audits with and among the managed care plans and the medicaid fraud division at the attorney general's office, to ensure the authority staff perform central audits of cases that appear across multiple managed care plans, versus the audits performed by the individual managed care plans or the fraud division;

(ii) Remain accountable for operating in an effective and efficient manner, including performing program integrity activities that ensure high value in the medical assistance program in general and in medicaid managed care specifically;

(iii) Work with its contracted actuary and the medicaid forecast work group to develop methods and metrics related to managed care program integrity activity that shall be incorporated into annual rate setting; and

(iv) Work with the medicaid forecast work group to ensure the results of program integrity activity are incorporated into the rate setting process in a transparent, timely, measurable, quantifiable manner.

(b) The authority shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2021, that includes, but is not limited to:

(i) Specific, quantified actions that have been taken, to date, related to the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report; and

(ii) Specific, quantified information regarding the steps taken toward (a)(i), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection.

(33) No later than December 31, 2021, the health care authority, in partnership with the department of social and health services as described in section 204(16) of this act, shall submit a waiver request to the federal department of health and human services to authorize presumptive medicaid eligibility determinations for clients preparing for acute care hospital discharge who may need long-term services and supports. The department and the authority shall hold stakeholder discussions, including opportunities for public review and comment, during development of the waiver request. Upon submission of the waiver request, the department and the authority shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees that describes the request and identifies any statutory changes that may be necessary if the federal government approves the request.

(34) $2,786,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $3,714,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $11,009,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for behavioral health services through increased provider rates. The rate increases are effective October 1, 2021, and must be applied to the following codes for children and adults enrolled in the medicaid program: 90832, 90833, 90834, 90837, H0004, H0036, H2015, H2021, H0023, 90836, 90838, 96156, 96158, 96159, 96164, 96165, 96167, 96168, 96170, 96171, 90845, 90846, 90847, 90849, 90853, 90785, and 90791. The authority may use a substitute code in the event that any of the codes identified in this subsection are discontinued and replaced with an updated code covering the same service. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:

(a) Implement this rate increase in accordance with the process established in chapter 285, Laws of 2020 (EHB 2584) (behavioral health rates);

(b) Raise the state fee-for-service rates for these codes by up to 15 percent, except that the state medicaid rate may not exceed the published medicare rate or an equivalent relative value unit rate if a published medicare rate is not available;

(c) Require in contracts with managed care organizations that, beginning October 2021, managed care organizations pay no lower than the fee-for-service rate for these codes, and adjust managed care capitation rates accordingly; and

(d) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsections (35) and (36) of this section.

(35) $24,081,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $32,107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $89,475,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for primary care services for medicaid-enrolled patients through increased provider rates beginning October 1, 2021. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:

(a) Increase the medical assistance rates for adult primary care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 15 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2019;

(b) Increase the medical assistance rates for pediatric primary care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 30 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2019;

(c) Increase the medical assistance rates for pediatric critical care, neonatal critical care, and neonatal intensive care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 30 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2019;

(d) Apply reimbursement rates required under this subsection to payment codes in a manner consistent with the temporary increase in medicaid reimbursement rates under federal rules and guidance in effect on January 1, 2014, implementing the patient protection and affordable care act, except that the authority may not require provider attestations;

(e) Pursue state plan amendments to require medicaid managed care organizations to increase rates under this subsection through adoption of a uniform percentage increase for network providers pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.6(c)(1)(iii)(B), as existing on January 1, 2019; and

(f) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsections (34) and (36) of this section.

(36) $2,233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,977,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $10,871,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase provider rates to maintain and increase access for family planning services for patients seeking services through department of health sexual and reproductive health program family planning providers. The rate increases are effective October 1, 2021, and must be applied to the following codes for eligible apple health and family planning only clients seeking services through department of health sexual and reproductive health program providers: 36415, 36416, 55250, 57170, 58340, 58600, 58605, 58611, 58615, 58670, 58671, 59840, 59841, 59850, 59851, 59852, 59855, 59856, 59857, 76817, 81025, 84702, 84703, 86631, 86632, 86901, 87110, 87270, 87320, 87490, 87491, 87590, 87591, 87624, 87625, 87800, 87810, 88141, 88142, 88143, 88147, 88148, 88150, 88152, 88153, 88164, 88165, 88166, 88167, 88174, 88175, 96372, 99071, 99201, 99202, 99203, 99204, 99211, 99212, 99213, 99214, 99384, 99385, 99386, 99394, 99395, 99396, 99401, and S0199. The authority may use a substitute code if any of the codes identified in this subsection are discontinued and replaced with an updated code covering the same service. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:

(a) Increase the family planning rates for services that are included on and reimbursed solely at the existing family planning fee schedule on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 162 percent above family planning fee schedule rates in effect on January 1, 2021;

(b) Pursue state plan amendments to require medicaid managed care organizations to increase rates under this subsection through adoption of a uniform percentage increase for network providers pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.6(c)(1)(iii)(B), as existing on January 1, 2021; and

(c) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsections (34) and (35) of this section.

(37)(a) Beginning with fiscal year 2020, and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with rural health clinics.

(b) Beginning with fiscal year 2020, and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with rural health clinics during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.

(38)(a) The authority in collaboration with the office of financial management and representatives from fiscal committees of the legislature shall conduct an evaluation of the APM4 model to determine its cost effectiveness and impact on patient outcomes and report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2022.

(b) The authority shall not enter into any future value-based arrangements with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics prior to receiving approval from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(c) The authority shall require all managed care organizations to provide information to the authority to account for all payments to federally qualified health centers to include how payments are made, including any additional payments and whether there is a sub-capitation arrangement or value-based purchasing arrangement.

(d) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with federally qualified health centers contracting under APM4.

(e) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with federally qualified health centers contracting under APM4 during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.

(39) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority is to include allergen control bed and pillow covers as part of the durable medical equipment benefit for children with an asthma diagnosis enrolled in medical assistance programs.

(40) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for maternity services provided by doulas.

(41) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for evaluation of the Washington rural health access preservation pilot program.

(42) $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,440,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for health care interoperability costs and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(43) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $3,913,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for modular replacement costs of the ProviderOne pharmacy point of sale system and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(44) $484,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $466,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5399 (universal health care commission). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(45) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the authority to develop a public-private partnership with a state-based oral health foundation to connect medicaid patients to dental services and reduce barriers to accessing care. The authority shall submit a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2022.

(46) $654,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,154,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the nonemergency medical transportation broker administrative rate to ensure access to health care services for medicaid patients.

(47) $1,715,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,804,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $6,647,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid to rural hospitals that meet the criteria in (a) through (d) of this subsection. Payments for state and federal medical assistance programs for services provided by such a hospital, regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, must be increased to 150 percent of the hospital's fee-for-service rates. The authority must discontinue this rate increase after June 30, 2023, and return to the payment levels and methodology for these hospitals that were in place as of January 1, 2021. Hospitals participating in the certified public expenditures program may not receive increased reimbursement for inpatient services. Hospitals qualifying for this rate increase must:

(a) Be certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013;

(b) Have had less than 150 acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011;

(c) Have a level III adult trauma service designation from the department of health as of January 1, 2014; and

(d) Be owned and operated by the state or a political subdivision.

(48) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for pass through funding for a citizens of the compact of free association (COFA) community member led organization through a Washington state based organization contract as outlined in RCW 43.71A.030 to provide additional supports to COFA community members statewide who are seeking access to health coverage and health care services. The amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2022 must be distributed no later than October 1, 2021. The amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2023 must be distributed no later than October 1, 2022.

(49)(a) The authority shall ensure that HIV antiviral drugs available to apple health clients through the preferred drug list include only drugs reviewed by the pharmacy and therapeutics committee as being safe, efficacious, and effective at the time of review. The authority shall support access to all initial recommended HIV treatment regimens and shall not require patients on established regimens to change regimens. The authority shall follow evidence-based criteria in determining which drugs are available on the preferred drug list, and in the absence of established clinical conditions, patients must be required to begin treatment on equally effective, less costly alternatives prior to starting treatment on more costly HIV drugs. The authority shall provide exceptions to its established HIV policy and access to nonpreferred drugs on a case-by-case basis.

(b) The authority shall collaborate with the Washington state LGBTQ commission, the department of health, advocates for people living with HIV in Washington, consumers, and medical professionals with expertise in serving the medicaid population living with HIV, to consider and develop recommendations regarding:

(i) Access to HIV antiretroviral drugs on the medicaid drug formulary, including short- and long-term fiscal implications of eliminating current fail-first requirements;

(ii) Impact of drug access on public health and the statewide goal of reducing HIV transmissions; and

(iii) Maximizing pharmaceutical drug rebates for HIV antiretroviral drugs.

(50) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $134,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5157 (behavioral disorders/justice). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(51) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall extend the oral health connections pilot project in Spokane, Thurston, and Cowlitz counties. The authority shall continue to work in collaboration with Arcora foundation to jointly develop and implement the program. The purpose of the pilot is to test the effect that enhanced dental benefits for medicaid clients with diabetes and pregnant clients have on access to dental care, health outcomes, and medical care costs. The pilot program must continue to include enhanced reimbursement rates for participating dental providers, including denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW, and an increase in the allowable number of periodontal treatments to up to four per calendar year. The authority has the option of extending pilot program eligibility to dually eligible medicaid clients who are diabetic or pregnant and to pregnant medicaid clients under the age of 20. The authority has the option of adjusting the pilot program benefit design and fee schedule based on previous findings, within amounts appropriated in this section. Diabetic or pregnant medicaid clients who are receiving dental care within the pilot regions, regardless of location of the service within the pilot regions, are eligible for the increased number of periodontal treatments. The Arcora foundation shall continue to partner with the authority and provide wraparound services to link patients to care. The authority and foundation shall provide a joint report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on October 1, 2021, outlining the findings of the original three-year pilot program, and on December 1, 2022, outlining the progress of the extended pilot program.

(52) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracting with the office of equity to implement chapter 293, Laws of 2020 (baby, child dentistry access). By November 15, 2021, the authority shall submit a report to the appropriate committees to the legislature describing its progress implementing chapter 293, Laws of 2020 (baby, child dentistry access) and chapter 242, Laws of 2020 (access to baby and child dentistry for children with disabilities).

(53) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracting by the health care authority to further the development and implementation of its Washington primary care transformation initiative, intended to increase team-based primary care and the percentage of overall health care spending in the state devoted to primary care. By October 1, 2021, the authority must update the legislature on the status of the initiative, including any fiscal impacts of this initiative, potential implementation barriers, and needed legislation.

(54) Sufficient funds are provided to continue reimbursing dental health aid therapists for services performed in tribal facilities for medicaid clients. The authority must leverage any federal funding that may become available as a result of appeal decisions from the centers for medicare and medicaid services or the United States court of appeals for the ninth circuit.

(55) $149,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377 (standardized health plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(56) Within the amount appropriated within this section, the authority shall implement the requirements of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5068 (postpartum period/medicaid) and the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, in extending health care coverage during the postpartum period. The authority shall make every effort to expedite and complete eligibility determinations for individuals who are likely eligible to receive health care coverage under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act to ensure the state is receiving maximum federal match. This includes, but is not limited to, working with managed care organizations to provide continuous outreach in various modalities until the individual's eligibility determination is completed. Beginning June 1, 2022, the authority must submit quarterly reports to the caseload forecast work group on the number of individuals who are likely eligible to receive health care coverage under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act but are waiting for the authority to complete eligibility determination, the number of individuals who were likely eligible but are now receiving health care coverage with the maximum federal match under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act, and outreach activities including the work with managed care organizations.

(57) $10,695,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $10,695,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $54,656,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for adult dental services for medicaid enrolled patients through increased provider rates beginning July 1, 2021. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority must increase the medical assistance rates for adult dental services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis up to 100 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2019.

(58) $366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $679,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $3,012,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5195 (opioid overdose medication). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS PROGRAM

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$36,619,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$36,619,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Any savings from reduced claims costs must be reserved for funding employee benefits and may not be used for administrative expenses.

(2) Any changes to benefits must be approved by the public employees' benefits board. The board shall not make any changes to benefits without considering a comprehensive analysis of the cost of those changes, and shall not increase benefits, including making any change in retiree eligibility criteria that reestablishes eligibility for enrollment in benefits, unless savings achieved under subsection (4) of this section or offsetting cost reductions from other benefit revisions are sufficient to fund the changes.

(3) The health care authority shall analyze and report on the potential impacts of providing a one-time enrollment window for retirees to reestablish eligibility for enrollment in retiree benefits under the public employees' benefit board program. The authority shall submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022. At a minimum the report must include an estimate of the employer cost and a description of the assumptions used.

(4) Except as may be provided in a health care bargaining agreement, to provide benefits within the level of funding provided in part IX of this bill, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases increase in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.

(5) The board shall collect a surcharge payment of not less than $25 per month from members who use tobacco products, and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(6) $285,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for a customer service scheduling tool, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD

School Employees' Insurance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$25,638,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$25,638,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $15,000 of the school employees' insurance administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for a customer service scheduling tool, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$4,831,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$4,543,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$52,351,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$77,710,000

Health Care Affordability Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$239,435,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.

(2)(a) By July 15th and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of one-half the general fund—state appropriation, one-half the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation, and one-half the health care affordability account—state appropriation to the exchange.

(b) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.

(c) Payments made from general fund—state appropriation and health benefit exchange account—state appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.

(3) $136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $254,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation, and $274,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for pass through funding in the annual amount of $100,000 for the lead navigator organization in the four regions with the highest concentration of COFA citizens to:

(a) Support a staff position for someone from the COFA community to provide enrollment assistance to the COFA community beyond the scope of the current COFA program; and

(b) Support COFA community-led outreach and enrollment activities that help COFA citizens obtain and access health and dental coverage.

(4) $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $554,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the exchange to work with the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition) to develop a report on the next steps required for information technology solutions for an integrated health and human services eligibility solution and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(a) The proposed solution should include but is not limited to the following:

(i) A technical approach and architecture;

(ii) A roadmap and implementation plan for modernizing and integrating the information technology eligibility and enrollment system for including, but not limited to, medicaid, basic food, child care assistance, cash assistance, and other social program benefits; and

(iii) A conceptual prototype for the proposed system that demonstrates opportunities and improvements for both clients and caseworkers.

(b) The approach and prototype must:

(i) Be developed in a manner that enables a potential long-term state strategy for an enterprise-wide eligibility solution for health and human services;

(ii) Comply with federal requirements;

(iii) Maximize efficient use of staff time;

(iv) Support accurate and secure client eligibility information; and

(v) Improve the client enrollment experience.

(c) The final report must include:

(i) Which coalition agencies would be impacted by the proposed solution;

(ii) The investment plan required to complete the project, that includes in-kind funding; and

(iii) A draft technology budget, by agency, fiscal year, and fund source, including the budget outlook period.

(d) The exchange must submit this report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than January 15, 2022.

(5) $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $538,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5068 (postpartum period/medicaid). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $1,634,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $592,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for Healthplanfinder enhancement activities that were delayed in the 2019-2021 biennium and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(7) $1,324,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $2,740,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for modernizing and modularizing the exchange's information technology systems and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(8) $8,012,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377 (standardized health plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9)(a) No more than $100,000,000 of the health care affordability account—state appropriation is provided solely for the exchange to administer a premium assistance program, beginning no later than July 1, 2022, as established in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377 (standardized health plans).

(b) An individual is eligible for premium assistance provided during plan year 2022, if the individual:

(i) Has income up to 250 percent of the federal poverty level;

(ii) Is a resident of the state;

(iii) Is enrolled in a qualified health plan on the exchange;

(iv) Applies for and accepts all federal advance premium tax credits for which he or she may be eligible before receiving any state premium assistance;

(v) Is ineligible for minimum essential coverage through medicare, a federal or state medical assistance program administered by the authority under chapter 74.09 RCW, or for premium assistance under RCW 43.71A.020; and

(vi) Meets other eligibility criteria as established by the exchange.

(c) An individual is eligible for the premium assistance provided during plan year 2023 if the individual:

(i) Has income up to 250 percent of the federal poverty level; and

(ii) Meets other eligibility criteria as established in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377 (standardized health plans).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$763,409,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$651,611,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,639,190,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$37,325,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$21,988,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,963,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$28,493,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$28,493,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,172,472,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For the purposes of this section, "behavioral health entities" means managed care organizations and administrative services organizations in regions where the authority is purchasing medical and behavioral health services through fully integrated contracts pursuant to RCW 71.24.380, and behavioral health organizations in regions that have not yet transitioned to fully integrated managed care.

(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for implementation of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. In addition to amounts provided solely for implementation of the settlement agreement, class members must have access to supports and services funded throughout this section for which they meet eligibility and medical necessity requirements. The authority must include language in contracts that requires regional behavioral health entities to develop and implement plans for improving access to timely and appropriate treatment for individuals with behavioral health needs and current or prior criminal justice involvement who are eligible for services under these contracts.

(3) $22,745,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $27,372,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $7,408,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(4) $10,424,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $10,424,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $23,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health entities to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health entities with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health entities in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health entities which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under subsection (6) of this section. The authority and behavioral health entities shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(5) From the general fund—state appropriations in this section, the authority shall assure that behavioral health entities reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long-term support administration for the general fund—state cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled behavioral health entity consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(6) $84,376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $84,376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health entity spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health entities as follows:

(a) $3,939,000 of each fiscal year amounts must be distributed to behavioral health administrative service organizations. Of the remaining amount per fiscal year, 80 percent must be distributed to behavioral health administrative service organizations and 20 percent to managed care organizations. The percentage of funding provided to each behavioral health administrative services organization must be proportionate to the fiscal year 2021 regional allocation of flexible nonmedicaid funds.

(b) The authority must include the following language in medicaid contracts with behavioral health entities unless they are provided formal notification from the center for medicaid and medicare services that the language will result in the loss of federal medicaid participation: "The contractor may voluntarily provide services that are in addition to those covered under the state plan, although the cost of these services cannot be included when determining payment rates unless including these costs is specifically allowed under federal law or an approved waiver."

(7) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health entities for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(8) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting one hundred eighty-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(9) Behavioral health entities may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health entities may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with subsection (6) of this section to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(10) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health entities on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(11) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(12) The authority must ensure allocated reserves provided to behavioral health administrative services organizations are maintained in accordance with contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The authority must monitor revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health administrative services organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its unspent funding within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health administrative services organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the entity in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the entity has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan.

(13) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, any amounts provided in this section that are used for case management services for pregnant and parenting women must be contracted directly between the authority and providers rather than through contracts with behavioral health administrative services organizations.

(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the authority by request; and (b) indirect charges for administering the program must not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.

(15) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health entities must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health entities must require that behavioral health entities include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.

(16) No more than $1,535,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $810,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(17) $6,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $6,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $8,046,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain new crisis triage or stabilization centers. Services in these facilities may include crisis stabilization and intervention, individual counseling, peer support, medication management, education, and referral assistance. The authority shall monitor each center's effectiveness at lowering the rate of state psychiatric hospital admissions.

(18) $1,125,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant amount, is provided solely for the authority to develop a memorandum of understanding with the department of health for implementation of chapter 297, Laws of 2017 (opioid treatment programs). The authority must use these amounts to reimburse the department of health for costs incurred through the implementation of the bill.

(19) $9,795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $10,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $15,025,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operation of secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities. The authority may not use any of these amounts for services in facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions for mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities. Within these amounts, funding is provided to increase the fee for service rate for these facilities up to $650 per day. The authority must require in contracts with behavioral health entities that they pay no lower than the fee for service rate. The authority must coordinate with regional behavioral health entities to identify and implement purchasing strategies or regulatory changes that increase access to services for individuals with complex behavioral health needs at secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(20) $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $92,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain the enhancement of community-based behavioral health services that were initially funded in fiscal year 2019. 20 percent of the general fund—state appropriation amounts must be provided to behavioral health administrative services organizations to increase their nonmedicaid regional funding allocations and the remainder must be provided to the medicaid managed care organizations providing apple health integrated managed care. The medicaid funding is intended to increase rates for behavioral health services provided by licensed and certified community behavioral health agencies as defined by the department of health. For the behavioral health administrative services organizations, this funding must be allocated to each region based upon the population of the region. For managed care organizations, this funding must be provided through the behavioral health portion of the medicaid integrated managed care capitation rates. The authority must require managed care organizations to provide a report that details the methodology the managed care organization used to distribute this funding to their contracted behavioral health providers. The report submitted by behavioral health administrative service organizations and managed care organizations must include mechanisms employed to disperse the funding as well as estimated impacts to behavioral health providers in the community. The authority must submit a report to the legislature by December annually, summarizing the information provided by the managed care organizations regarding the distribution of the funding provided under this section.

(21)(a) $47,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $54,136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $81,511,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. Within these amounts, the authority must meet the requirements for reimbursing counties for the judicial services for patients being served in these settings in accordance with RCW 71.05.730. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in developing the contract requirements, selecting contractors, establishing processes for identifying patients that will be admitted to these facilities, and developing procedures for placing patients converted from the forensic system, and other patients with more severe symptoms, in community settings.

(b) Sufficient amounts are provided for the authority to reimburse providers serving medicaid clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 as follows:

(i) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that requires a hospital-specific medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients because the hospital has completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall analyze the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital after a minimum of 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days. The authority shall establish the inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at 100 percent of the allowable cost of care, based on the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital.

(ii) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that has not completed a medicare cost report with more than 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at the higher of:

(A) The hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or

(B) The annually updated statewide average of the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all acute care hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.

(iii) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW and currently providing long-term civil commitment services, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at $940 plus any adjustments that may be needed to capture any costs associating with long-term psychiatric patients that are not allowable on the medicare cost report. The hospital may provide the authority with supplemental data to be considered and used to make any appropriate adjustments to the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of the hospital. Adjustment of costs may include:

(A) Costs associated with professional services and fees;

(B) Costs associated with the hospital providing the long-term psychiatric patient access to involuntary treatment court services; and

(C) Other costs associated with caring for long-term psychiatric patients.

(iv) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW that requires an initial medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment services because it has not yet completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at the higher of:

(A) The hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or

(B) The annually updated statewide average of the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all freestanding psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.

(22)(a) $12,878,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $12,878,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for:

(i) A memorandum of understanding with the department of children, youth, and families to provide substance abuse treatment programs;

(ii) A contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit evaluation of the implementations of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502);

(iii) Designing and administering the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey;

(iv) Maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program;

(v) Grants to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for life skills training to children and youth;

(vi) Maintaining increased prevention and treatment service provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organization to children and youth;

(vii) Maintaining increased residential treatment services for children and youth;

(viii) Training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence-based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorder;

(ix) Expenditures into the home visiting services account; and

(x) Grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth.

(b) The authority must allocate the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection amongst the specific activities proportionate to the fiscal year 2019 allocation.

(23)(a) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Spokane behavioral health entities to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services must include:

(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

(b) At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health entities shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(24) $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $13,312,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for substance use disorder peer support services included in behavioral health capitation rates in accordance with section 213(5)(ss), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The authority shall require managed care organizations to provide access to peer support services for individuals with substance use disorders transitioning from emergency departments, inpatient facilities, or receiving treatment as part of hub and spoke networks.

(25) $1,256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,512,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the number of residential beds for pregnant and parenting women. These amounts may be used for startup funds and ongoing costs associated with two new sixteen bed pregnant and parenting women residential treatment programs.

(26) $1,393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $5,938,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement discharge wraparound services for individuals with complex behavioral health conditions transitioning or being diverted from admission to psychiatric inpatient programs. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in establishing the standards for these programs.

(27) $3,396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $3,396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $16,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for support of and to increase clubhouse facilities across the state. The authority shall work with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to review opportunities to include clubhouse services as an optional "in lieu of" service in managed care organization contracts in order to maximize federal participation. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of efforts to implement clubhouse programs and receive federal approval for including these services in managed care organization contracts as an optional "in lieu of" service.

(28) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,452,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement the recommendations of the state action alliance for suicide prevention, to include suicide assessments, treatment, and grant management.

(29) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The authority must collect information from the institute on the use of these funds and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(30) $396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $329,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $3,153,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to support the administrative costs associated with the application and implementation of a federal waiver allowing for full federal participation in mental health treatment facilities identified as institutions of mental diseases.

(31) As an element of contractual network adequacy requirements and reporting, the authority shall direct managed care organizations to make all reasonable efforts to develop or maintain contracts with provider networks that leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to enhance effectiveness of medicaid-funded integrated care services. These networks must promote medicaid clients' access to a system of services that addresses additional social support services and social determinants of health as defined in RCW 43.20.025 in a manner that is integrated with the delivery of behavioral health and medical treatment services.

(32) In establishing, re-basing, enhancing, or otherwise updating medicaid rates for behavioral health services, the authority and contracted actuaries shall use a transparent process that provides an opportunity for medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and behavioral health provider agencies, and their representatives, to review and provide data and feedback on proposed rate changes within their region or regions of service operation. The authority and contracted actuaries shall transparently incorporate the information gained from this process and make adjustments allowable under federal law when appropriate.

(33) The authority shall seek input from representatives of the managed care organizations (MCOs), licensed community behavioral health agencies, and behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop the format of a report which addresses revenues and expenditures for the community behavioral health programs. The report shall include, but not be limited to (i) revenues and expenditures for community behavioral health programs, including medicaid and nonmedicaid funding; (ii) access to services, service denials, and utilization by state plan modality; (iii) claims denials and record of timely payment to providers; (iv) client demographics; and (v) social and recovery measures and managed care organization performance measures. The authority shall submit the report for the preceding calendar year to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on or before July 1st of each year.

(34)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the authority to convene a work group to develop a recommended teaching clinic enhancement rate for behavioral health agencies training and supervising students and those seeking their certification or license. This work should include: Developing standards for classifying a behavioral health agency as a teaching clinic; a cost methodology to determine a teaching clinic enhancement rate; and a timeline for implementation. The work group must include representatives from:

(i) The department of health;

(ii) The office of the governor;

(iii) The Washington workforce training and education board;

(iv) The Washington council for behavioral health;

(v) Licensed and certified behavioral health agencies; and

(vi) Higher education institutions.

(b) By October 15, 2021, the health care authority must submit a report of the work group's recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(35) The criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with behavioral health entities to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b). Funding from the criminal justice treatment account may be used to provide treatment and support services through the conclusion of an individual's treatment plan to individuals participating in a drug court program as of February 24, 2021, if that individual wishes to continue treatment following dismissal of charges they were facing under RCW 69.50.4013(1). Such participation is voluntary and contingent upon substantial compliance with drug court program requirements. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which identifies the distribution of criminal justice treatment account funds by September 30, 2021.

(36) $9,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide funding for the setting up of new therapeutic courts for cities or counties or for the continuing operations of therapeutic courts created or expanded in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the expansion of services being provided to an already existing therapeutic court that engages in evidence based practices, to include medication assisted treatment in jail settings pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. Funding provided under this subsection shall not supplant existing funds utilized for this purpose.

(37) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $620,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and implementation of a statewide behavioral health treatment bed registry system to provide up-to-date bed availability information to first responders, emergency room services, crisis responders, mental health centers, and other participants in the inpatient behavioral health system. The registry system is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(38) $687,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $687,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program.

(39) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for grants to tribes to prevent opioid use and expand treatment for opioid use disorders.

(40) $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for maintaining and increasing support for youth prevention services.

(41) $881,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $881,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for maintaining and increasing resources for peer support programs for individuals with substance use disorders, as well as recruiting peer specialists.

(42) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for maintaining and increasing the capabilities of a tool to track medication assisted treatment provider capacity.

(43) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to support substance use disorder family navigators across the state.

(44) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to support recovery cafes across the state.

(45) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for short-term bridge subsidies to assist people exiting inpatient substance use disorder treatment and experiencing homelessness with move-in and housing costs.

(46) $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $198,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5071 (civil commitment transition). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection will lapse.

(47) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $755,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a grant program to award funding to fire departments in the state of Washington to implement safe station pilot programs. Programs that combine the safe station approach with fire department mobile integrated health programs such as the community assistance referral and education services program under RCW 35.21.930 are encouraged. Certified substance use disorder peer specialists may be employed in a safe station pilot program if the authority determines that a plan is in place to provide appropriate levels of supervision and technical support. Safe station pilot programs shall collaborate with behavioral health administrative services organizations, local crisis providers, and other stakeholders to develop a streamlined process for referring safe station clients to the appropriate level of care. Funding for pilot programs under this subsection shall be used for new or expanded programs and may not be used to supplant existing funding.

(48) $71,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $136,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5195 (opioid overdose medication). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection will lapse.

(49)(a) $6,134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to transition the costs for behavioral health personal care for individuals with exceptional care needs and for those who need additional support in long term care settings into the state's medicaid managed care rates and personal care services on an ongoing basis. The authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to develop and submit a 1915(i) state plan amendment to the centers for medicare and medicaid services to allow the delivery of wrap around supportive behavioral health services for individuals who also have a personal care need.

(b) By October 1, 2021, the authority must submit a report to the fiscal and health care committees of the legislature documenting:

(i) The scope, level, and amount of services provided by the medicaid managed care organization general fund—state wraparound contracts, including the amount of general fund—state dollars used for each component of care provided in the contracts and how the amount spent on each component of care has changed since the state moved fully into the integrated managed care model; and

(ii) The status of the state plan amendment required in this section.

(c) By October 1, 2022, the state must report on:

(i) How the change in service provision for behavioral health personal care funded and authorized in this section has improved access to care for patients, including information on patients served who are directly discharged from inpatient state hospital facilities and long-term civil commitments; and

(ii) The status of the state plan amendment required in this section.

(50) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the authority to evaluate options for a medicaid waiver to provide respite care for youth with behavioral health challenges while avoiding adverse impacts with respite waivers at the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration and the department of children, youth, and families.

(51) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for enhancements to mobile crisis teams through behavioral health administrative service organizations.

(52) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to law enforcement and other first responders to include a mental health professional on the team of personnel responding to emergencies.

(53) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the authority to contract for the following: (a) At least $150,000 biennially to the University of Washington autism center to provide telecommunication consultation with local physicians to discuss medications appropriate to patients who have developmental disability and behavioral issues; and (b) at least $50,000 biennially to contract for training to both behavioral health and developmental disabilities professionals to support individuals with both developmental disability and behavioral health needs. Funding is also provided for contract expansions to include training for behavioral health and developmental disabilities professionals to support and manage children and youth with challenging behaviors in the respite setting, expand training to providers across the state, add training for medical providers who have requested specialized training, and provide additional support for wraparound with intensive services and behavioral health staff to meet other training needs.

(54) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a statewide mental health non-profit serving consumers and families that provides free community and school-based mental health education and support programs. The grantee must provide access to programs tailored to peers living with mental illness as well as family members of people with mental illness and the community at large to provide education, support, reduce isolation, and help consumers and families understand what services are available in their communities.

(55) $4,374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $3,474,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,622,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to expand youth mobile crisis services statewide.

(56) $1,531,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,531,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $66,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to provide up to five sessions of intake and assessment in homes or other natural setting.

(57) $3,377,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to continue and expand two pilot programs for intensive outpatient services and partial hospitalization services for certain children and adolescents authorized in section 215(76) of chapter 357, Laws of 2020 (ESSB 6168), including the reporting requirements implemented in that section.

(58) $500,000 of the problem gambling account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract for a problem gambling adult prevalence study. The prevalence study must review both statewide and regional results about beliefs and attitudes toward gambling, gambling behavior and preferences, and awareness of treatment services. The study should also estimate the level of risk for problem gambling and examine correlations with broader behavioral and mental health measures. The health care authority shall submit results of the prevalence study to the problem gambling task force and the legislature by June 30, 2022.

(59) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Arlington in partnership with the North County regional fire authority for a mobile integrated health pilot project. The project shall provide mobile integrated health services for residents who cannot navigate resources through typical methods through brief therapeutic intervention, biopsychosocial assessment and referral, and community care coordination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,900,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,935,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,572,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,407,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5027 (television closed captions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,999,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,996,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$48,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$34,364,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$34,179,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,358,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,216,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,167,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$82,764,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.

(2) $602,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for 75 percent of the costs of providing two additional statewide basic law enforcement trainings in each fiscal year. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. At least three classes must be held in Spokane each year.

(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(4) $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $429,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for expenditure into the nonappropriated Washington internet crimes against children account for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.

(5) $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the mental health field response team program administered by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The association must distribute $7,000,000 in grants to the phase one and phase two regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The association must submit an annual report to the Governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year of the biennium. The report shall include best practice recommendations on law enforcement and behavioral health field response and include outcome measures on all grants awarded.

(6) $899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $899,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(7) $1,216,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide 240 hours of medicolegal forensic investigation training to coroners and medical examiners to meet the recommendations of the national commission on forensic science for certification and accreditation.

(8) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $12,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for an increase in vendor rates on the daily meals provided to basic law enforcement academy recruits during their training.

(9)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement chapter 378, Laws of 2019 (alternatives to arrest/jail).

(b) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for evaluation of grant-funded programs under chapter 378, Laws of 2019 (alternatives to arrest/jail).

(10) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to administer the sexual assault kit initiative project under RCW 36.28A.430, to assist multidisciplinary community response teams seeking resolutions to cases tied to previously unsubmitted sexual assault kits, and to provide support to survivors of sexual assault offenses. The commission must report to the governor and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations by June 30, 2022, on the number of sexual assault kits that have been tested, the number of kits remaining to be tested, the number of sexual assault cases that had hits to other crimes, the number of cases that have been reinvestigated, the number of those cases that were reinvestigated using state funding under this appropriation, and the local jurisdictions that were a recipient of a grant under the sexual assault kit initiative project.

(11) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to work with local law enforcement agencies and the Washington fire chiefs association to provide helmets to persons contacted by local law enforcement or an official of a local fire department for not wearing a helmet while riding a skateboard or bicycle in order to reduce traumatic brain injuries throughout the state. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall work in conjunction with the Washington fire chiefs association in administering the helmet distribution program.

(12) $307,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for chapter 294, Laws of 2020 (critical stress management programs).

(13) $727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $248,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for chapter 119, Laws of 2020 (correctional officer certification).

(14) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to establish a behavioral health support and suicide prevention program for law enforcement officers. The program will begin with grants to three pilot locations and will leverage access to mental health professionals, critical stress management, and resiliency training.

(15) $1,883,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,986,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5051 (peace officer oversight). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $474,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5066 (officer duty to intervene). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $151,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $148,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to support the participation of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in the joint legislative task force on jail standards created in section 978 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR THE OFFICE OF INDEPENDENT INVESTIGATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$9,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$17,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$26,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1267 (establishing an office of independent investigations), to create an office within the office of the governor for the purposes of investigating deadly force incidents involving peace officers. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$13,751,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$15,489,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,876,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$573,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$56,305,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

Construction Registration Inspection Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,716,000

Public Works Administration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$9,327,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$395,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$364,535,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,047,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$363,526,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,608,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,300,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,542,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$893,018,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,551,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $8,551,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the labor and industries workers' compensation information system replacement project. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. The department must:

(a) Submit a report by August 1, 2021, on the quantifiable deliverables accomplished in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 and the amount spent by each deliverable in each of the following subprojects:

(i) Business readiness;

(ii) Change readiness;

(iii) Commercial off the shelf procurement;

(iv) Customer access;

(v) Program foundations;

(vi) Independent assessment; and

(vii) In total by fiscal year;

(b) Submit quarterly data within 30 calendar days of the end of each quarter, effective July 1, 2021, on:

(i) All of the quantifiable deliverables accomplished by subprojects identified in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection and in total and the associated expenditures by each deliverable by fiscal month;

(ii) The contract full time equivalent charged by subprojects identified in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection, and in total, compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan by subprojects identified in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection, and in total, assumes by fiscal month;

(iii) The performance metrics by subprojects identified in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection, and in total, that are currently used, including monthly performance data; and

(iv) The risks identified independently by at least the quality assurance vendor and the office of the chief information officer, and how the project:

(A) Has mitigated each risk; and

(B) Is working to mitigate each risk, and when it will be mitigated;

(c) Submit the reports in (a) and (b) of this subsection to fiscal and policy committees of the legislature; and

(d) Receive an additional gated project sign off by the office of financial management, effective September 1, 2021. Prior to spending any project funding in this subsection each quarter, there is an additional gate of approval required for this project. The director of financial management must agree that the reporting data provided each quarter shows accountability, effective and appropriate use of the funding, and that risks are being mitigated to the spending and sign off on the spending for the ensuing quarter.

(2) $250,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $250,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must produce annual progress reports through the year 2022 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress report must be submitted to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year such report is due.

(3) $258,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $258,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment research for prevention program to conduct research to prevent the types of work-related injuries that require immediate hospitalization. The department will develop and maintain a tracking system to identify and respond to all immediate in-patient hospitalizations and will examine incidents in defined high-priority areas, as determined from historical data and public priorities. The research must identify and characterize hazardous situations and contributing factors using epidemiological, safety-engineering, and human factors/ergonomics methods. The research must also identify common factors in certain types of workplace injuries that lead to hospitalization. The department must submit a report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by August 30, 2021, and annually thereafter, summarizing work-related immediate hospitalizations and prevention opportunities, actions that employers and workers can take to make workplaces safer, and ways to avoid severe injuries.

(4)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in aerospace and aerospace related supply chain industries by: Expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and aerospace-related programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.

(b) Grants awarded under this section may be used for:

(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;

(ii) New training space and lab locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations;

(iii) Curriculum development and instructor training for industry experts;

(iv) Tuition assistance for degrees in engineering and high-demand degrees that support the aerospace industry; and

(v) Funding to increase capacity and availability of child care options for shift work schedules.

(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, aerospace-related degree programs, or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.

(5) $3,632,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $876,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the creation of an agriculture compliance unit within the division of occupational safety and health. The compliance unit will perform compliance inspections and provide bilingual outreach to agricultural workers and employers.

(6) $2,849,000 of the construction registration inspection account—state appropriation, $152,000 of the accident account—state appropriation, and $31,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the conveyance management system replacement project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(7)(a) $2,065,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the provider credentialing system project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) $510,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for the maintenance and operations of the provider credentialing project.

(8) $530,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $94,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to conduct infectious disease rule making to ensure the state has general guidelines to follow in the case of an infectious disease outbreak and to provide education and outreach.

(9) $334,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $60,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided for the maintenance and operating costs of the isolated worker protection information technology project.

(10) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to analyze patients who are maintained on chronic opioids. The department must submit a report of its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than October 1, 2023. The report shall include analysis of patient data, describing the characteristics of patients who are maintained on chronic opioids and their clinical needs, and a preliminary evaluation of potential interventions to improve care and reduce harms in this population.

(11) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to an organization in Pierce county experienced in providing peer-to-peer training, in order to develop and implement a program aimed at reducing workplace sexual harassment in the agricultural sector, with the following deliverables:

(a) Peer-to-peer training and evaluation of sexual harassment training curriculum; and

(b) The building of a statewide network of peer trainers as farmworker leaders whose primary purpose is to prevent workplace sexual harassment and assault through leadership, education, and other tools.

(12) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a work group to investigate how to make Washington's industrial insurance system easier to access for employers and hiring entities to provide industrial insurance coverage for domestic workers.

(a) Domestic workers include, but are not limited to: Housecleaners, nannies, gardeners, and day laborers, including but not limited to those who may perform maintenance or repair work in or about the private home of the employer or hiring entity.

(b) The work group shall make recommendations to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on legislative, regulatory, or other changes that would make the industrial insurance system easier for day laborers and their employers to access. This work group will also explore the possible role of intermediary nonprofit organizations that assist and refer domestic workers and day laborers.

(c) The work group shall be comprised of the following representatives, to be appointed by the governor by July 1, 2021:

(i) Two representatives who are directly impacted domestic workers who work for private home employers or hiring entities;

(ii) Two representatives who are directly impacted day laborers who work for private home employers or hiring entities;

(iii) Two representatives from unions, workers' centers, or intermediary nonprofit organizations that assist and/or refer such directly impacted workers;

(iv) Two employer or hiring entity representatives who directly employ or hire single domestic workers in private homes;

(v) One employer or hiring entity representative who directly employs or hires day laborers in a private home;

(vi) One representative from a nonprofit organization that educates and organizes household employers; and

(vii) Representatives from the department, serving in an ex officio capacity.

(d) The department shall convene the work group by August 1, 2021, and shall meet at least once every two months and may meet remotely in order to accommodate the involvement of domestic worker and day laborer representatives.

(e) The work group shall deliver its report and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 4, 2022.

(13) $508,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $507,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5115 (health emergency/labor). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $2,688,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $948,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5172 (agricultural overtime). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $760,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5183 (nonfatal strangulation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $841,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $840,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5190 (health care workers/benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $1,626,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $288,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for a temporary wage increase of seven and one-half percent for the department's safety and health compliance inspectors. This temporary increase will end June 30, 2023. Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this proviso.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response and not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. In response to any request by the department for general fund—state appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.

(2) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,721,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$3,767,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,498,000

(3) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$7,371,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$7,530,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,412,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$4,959,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$717,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$24,989,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $449,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $449,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for supporting the statewide plan to reduce suicide among service members, veterans, and their families. No later than December 1, 2022, the department must submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a report that describes how the funding provided in this subsection was spent, including the numbers of individuals served and the types of services provided.

(b) $233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $233,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the traumatic brain injury program to reduce homelessness, domestic violence, and intimate partner violence impacts to the behavioral health system and justice system. No later than December 1, 2022, the department must submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a report that describes how the funding provided in this subsection was spent, including the numbers of individuals served and the types of services provided.

(4) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$10,626,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$12,151,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$108,522,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$21,791,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$153,090,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: If the department receives additional unanticipated federal resources that are unrelated to the coronavirus response at any point during the remainder of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, an equal amount of general fund—state must be placed in unallotted status so as not to exceed the total appropriation level specified in this subsection. The department may submit as part of the policy level budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 a request to maintain the general fund—state resources that were unallotted as required by this subsection.

(5) CEMETERY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$85,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$101,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$710,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$896,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$89,224,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$88,561,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$588,272,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$232,756,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$364,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$142,399,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$633,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,053,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,958,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$16,706,000

Waterworks Operator Certification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,978,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,604,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$180,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,675,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,746,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,187,000

Secure Drug Take-Back Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,130,000

Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,222,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$10,538,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$10,562,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,619,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$348,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$53,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,217,768,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(2) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(3) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2022 and 2023 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.

(5) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2022 and 2023 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(6) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(7) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than five hundred twenty-five dollars annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.

(8) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.12.470, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 71.12.485.

(9) $26,855,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide core medical services, case management, and support services for individuals living with human immunodeficiency virus.

(10) $17,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5018 (acupuncture and eastern med.) If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5052 (health equity zones). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5062 (data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5119 (individuals in custody). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $1,333,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (env. justice task force recs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5195 (opioid overdose medication). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $74,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $74,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5229 (health equity continuing ed.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a dental therapy task force to examine how to bring the current practice of dental therapy on tribal lands to a statewide scale in Washington to increase access to oral health care.

(a) By December 1, 2021, the dental therapy task force shall submit a report to the fiscal and health care committees of the legislature detailing findings and evidence based recommendations on:

(i) Washington state oral health care workforce racial demographics;

(ii) Barriers to oral health care in underserved communities;

(iii) Inequitable oral health outcomes in underserved communities. For purposes of this task force, underserved communities include any populations living in HRSA dental health professional shortages areas, or populations showing the highest rates of untreated decay in the department's 2016 smile survey;

(iv) The number of oral health providers that accept medicaid and among those providers that do accept medicaid, data regarding what percentage of their patient base are medicaid enrollees;

(v) The impact on underserved communities, when health and oral health workforce demographics reflect the communities served, including an examination of results (both quantitative and qualitative) where dental therapists have been authorized and employed, including on tribal lands in Washington state;

(vi) Safety, productivity, and economic impact to patients, clinics, and providers where dental therapists are currently practicing;

(vii) Current commission on dental accreditation (CODA) standards for dental therapy education programs;

(viii) Scope of practice necessary to maximize effectiveness of dental therapy;

(ix) Practice settings where dental therapy services could increase access to care; and

(x) Optimal supervision levels for dental therapists.

(b) An entity with experience in facilitating and mediating matters of public policy shall provide staff support and facilitation services, with the option of mediation, to the task force. The entity may, when deemed necessary by the task force, contract with one or more appropriate consultants to provide data analysis, research, and other services to the task force for the purposes provided in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Legislative task force members shall include:

(i) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate; and

(ii) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

(d) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house shall each choose a task force cochair from among the legislative membership majority caucus.

(e) Nonlegislative task force members shall be appointed by task force cochairs and must include:

(i) Four or more representatives from different organizations that represent individuals or underserved communities, including but not limited to: Children, seniors, African American, Latino American, Native American, Pacific Islander American, low income, and rural communities;

(ii) One member of the dental quality assurance commission;

(iii) One member from the University of Washington school of dentistry;

(iv) One member from the Washington state dental association;

(v) One member from the Washington state dental hygienists' association;

(vi) One dental therapist;

(vii) One dentist who has or is currently supervising dental therapists;

(viii) One representative from a dental-only integrated delivery system;

(ix) One representative from an urban Indian health clinic;

(x) One representative from a federally qualified health center or the Washington association for community health;

(xi) One representative from a dental therapy education program;

(xii) One representative from a Washington tribe that currently employs dental therapists;

(xiii) One representative from a labor union representing racially and ethnically diverse care providers that has experience providing dental coverage and promoting dental care access among their members; and

(xiv) One expert who has been involved in the successful implementation of dental therapy through a statewide license.

(f) The task force must seek and facilitate strong public participation from communities facing higher rates of dental disease and barriers to care and input including but not limited to public comment at all meetings.

(g) If the task force requires any in person meetings, legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(18) $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with local health jurisdictions to establish and maintain comprehensive group B programs to ensure safe drinking water. These funds shall be used to support the costs of the development and adoption of rules, policies, and procedures, and for technical assistance, training, and other program-related costs.

(19) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for community outreach to prepare culturally and linguistically appropriate hepatitis B information in a digital format to be distributed to ethnic and cultural leaders and organizations to share with foreign-born and limited or non-English speaking community networks.

(20) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to continue the collaboration between local public health, accountable communities of health, and health care providers to reduce potentially preventable hospitalizations in Pierce county. This collaboration will build from year three planning to align care coordination efforts across health care systems and support the accountable communities of health initiatives, including innovative, collaborative models of care. Strategies include the following, to reduce costly hospitalizations: (a) Analyze heart failure data to identify subpopulations and risk factors and use this data to determine targeted interventions; (b) support provider and clinic implementation of screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment through immunizations and ensure other areas of the county and state can duplicate the strategies; and (c) provide resources to achieve results and support collaboration across local health care systems and providers.

(21)(a) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a task force, chaired by the secretary of the department, implemented by August 1, 2021, to assist with the development of a "parks Rx" health and wellness pilot program that can be implemented in the Puget Sound, eastern Washington, and southwest Washington regions of Washington state.

(b) Members of the task force must include:

(i) The secretary of health, or the secretary's designee;

(ii) The following members to be appointed by the secretary of health:

(A) Two representatives of local parks and recreation agencies, from recommendations by the Washington recreation and park association;

(B) Two representatives of health care providers and community health workers, from recommendations by the association of Washington healthcare plans from recommendations by the department community health worker training program;

(C) Two representatives from drug-free health care professions, one representing the interests of state associations representing chiropractors and one representing the interests of physical therapists and athletic trainers from recommendations by their respective state associations;

(D) Two representatives from hospital and health systems, from recommendations by the Washington state hospital association;

(E) Two representatives of local public health agencies, from recommendations by the Washington state association of local public health officials; and

(F) Two representatives representing health carriers, from recommendations from the association of Washington healthcare plans; and

(iii) A representative from the Washington state parks, as designated by the Washington state parks and recreation commission.

(c) The secretary of health or the secretary's designee must chair the task force created in this subsection. Staff support for the task force must be provided by the department of health.

(d) The task force shall establish an ad hoc advisory committee in each of the three pilot regions for purposes of soliciting input on the design and scope of the parks Rx program. Advisory committee membership may not exceed 16 persons and must include diverse representation from the pilot regions, including those experiencing significant health disparities.

(e) The task force must meet at least once bimonthly through June 2022.

(f) The duties of the task force are to advise the department of health on issues including but not limited to developing:

(i) A process to establish the pilot program described in this subsection around the state with a focused emphasis on diverse communities and where systematic inequities and discrimination have negatively affected health outcomes;

(ii) Model agreements that would enable insurers to offer incentives to public, nonprofit, and private employers to create wellness programs that offer employees a discount on health insurance in exchange for a certain usage level of outdoor parks and trails for recreation and physical activity; and

(iii) Recommendations on ways in which a public-private partnership approach may be utilized to fund the implementation of the pilot program described in this subsection.

(g) The members of the task force are encouraged to consider grant funding and outside funding options that can be used toward the pilot program.

(h) The department of health must report findings and recommendations of the task force to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 by September 1, 2022.

(22) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a work group to make recommendations concerning funding and policy initiatives to address the spread of sexually transmitted infections in Washington.

(a) The work group membership must include, but is not limited to, the following members appointed by the governor:

(i) A representative from the department of health office of infectious disease;

(ii) A representative from the pharmacy quality assurance commission;

(iii) A representative from the Washington medical commission;

(iv) A representative from an organization representing health care providers;

(v) A representative from a local health jurisdiction located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(vi) A representative from a local health jurisdiction located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(vii) At least one representative from an organization working to address health care access barriers for LGBTQ populations;

(viii) At least one representative from an organization working to address health care access barriers for communities of color; and

(ix) At least one representative from an organization working to address health care access barriers for justice involved individuals.

(b) Staff support for the work group shall be provided by the department of health.

(c) The work group shall submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2022, that includes recommendations to: (i) Eradicate congenital syphilis and hepatitis B by 2030; (ii) control the spread of gonorrhea, syphilis, and chlamydia; (iii) end the need for confirmatory syphilis testing by the public health laboratory; and (d) expand access to PrEP and PEP.

(d) Recommendations provided by the work group must be prioritized based on need and available funding.

(23) $1,745,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,745,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $754,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $18,117,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the ongoing operations and maintenance of public health data systems maintained by the department.

(24) $2,325,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement recommendations of the action alliance for suicide prevention regarding a multiagency suicide prevention system. This work must be coordinated with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and suicide prevention programs at the University of Washington, and include a public suicide prevention campaign.

(25) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the fruit and vegetable incentive program.

(26) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement the recommendations from the community health workers task force to provide statewide leadership, training, and integration of community health workers with insurers, health care providers, and public health systems.

(27) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for one-time grants to family planning clinics that are at risk of imminent closure, did not receive a paycheck protection program loan, and are ineligible for funding through the coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security (CARES) act or the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act of 2021 (CRRSA).

(28) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the nursing care quality assurance commission, in collaboration with the workforce training and education coordinating board and the department of labor and industries, to plan a home care aide to nursing assistant certified to licensed practical nurse (HCA-NAC-LPN) apprenticeship pathway. The plan must provide the necessary groundwork for the launch of at least three licensed practical nurse apprenticeship programs in the next phase of work. The plan for the apprenticeship programs must include programs in at least three geographically disparate areas of the state experiencing high levels of long-term care workforce shortages for corresponding health professions and incorporate the participation of local workforce development councils for implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$76,475,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$79,118,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$155,993,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $1,135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,731,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for expansion of reentry supports and transition services for incarcerated individuals including development and implementation of a coaching model approach to supervision.

(b) Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to develop an implementation plan for a community supervision coaching model to begin in fiscal year 2023. The department must solicit input from incarcerated individuals, family members of incarcerated individuals, experts in supervision and reentry, community stakeholder and advocacy groups, and impacted labor organizations. The plan shall propose appropriate policies and procedures for the coaching model, including ongoing training and organizational culture assessments. During development of the plan, the department must consider potential inequities that may arise from any changes or additional requirements of supervision resulting from the model and mitigate those concerns to the greatest extent possible in its final plan. This plan must be submitted to the office of financial management prior to implementation.

(c) Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $706,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of the plan to be developed under (b) of this subsection and for the department to submit an initial report to the legislature on the progress of implementation of the coaching supervision model by no later than February 1, 2023.

(d) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (providing reentry services to persons releasing from state and local institutions). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $187,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (law enforcement data). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(f) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5054 (impaired driving). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$603,869,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$595,242,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,300,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,939,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,203,350,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may contract for local jail beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender excluding the costs of department of corrections provided services, including evidence-based substance abuse programming, dedicated department of corrections classification staff on-site for individualized case management, and transportation of offenders to and from department of corrections facilities. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as close medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for offenders held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meets standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.

(b) $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester.

(c) Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the department to maintain the prison rape elimination act (PREA) coordinator positions at each of the prison facilities.

(d)(i) $7,152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $9,902,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the custody staff needed to provide on-site and off-site health care delivery to the residential population.

(ii) Funding in this subsection (d) is sufficient for the department to provide staff support for the operation of the body scanners located within prison facilities.

(e) Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the department to track and report to the legislature on the changes in working conditions and overtime usage as a result of increased funding provided for custody relief and health care delivery by December 1, 2022.

(f) $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the purchase of two body scanners. One scanner is to be deployed at Monroe correctional complex and one is to be deployed at the Washington corrections center for women.

(g) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $292,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5054 (impaired driving). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$245,957,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$285,170,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$531,127,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract rate increase may not exceed five percent each year. The department may negotiate to include medical care of offenders in the contract rate if medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff. If medical care of offender is included in the contract rate, the contract rate may exceed five percent to include the cost of that service.

(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.

(c) $7,394,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of the plan to be developed under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(d) Within existing resources the department must update the response to violations and new criminal activity policy to reflect the savings assumed in this section as related to mandatory minimum confinement sanctions.

(e) $327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for increased costs associated with the relocation of leased facilities. The department shall engage in ongoing strategies to reduce the need for relocating facilities and when necessary contract only with lessors with rates that align with comparable market rates in the area.

(f) $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5054 (impaired driving). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5071 (civil commitment transition). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$7,324,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$7,539,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$14,863,000

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$46,533,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$47,059,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$93,592,000

(6) OFFENDER CHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$72,369,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$76,219,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$148,588,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for offender programming. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(b) $3,106,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,106,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to provide an increased number of housing vouchers.

(7) HEALTH CARE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$171,721,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$170,373,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$343,494,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

(b) $183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (providing reentry services to persons releasing from state and local institutions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(c) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $222,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5054 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,465,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$3,560,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$25,456,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$32,541,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to consult with a food service architect to determine the feasibility and cost of remodels to select cafes owned by entrepreneurs participating in the business enterprise program, and to prepare a report that includes the results, recommendations, cost, and potential funding sources that could be used to assist with remodels. The report is due to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by November 1, 2021.

(2) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide individualized training to its blind, visually-impaired, deaf, and hearing-impaired staff in Microsoft 365 programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225. FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$910,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$910,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$384,464,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$36,211,000

Unemployment Compensation Administration Account—

Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$408,986,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,231,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$60,746,000

Family and Medical Leave Insurance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$139,190,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,895,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$30,458,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,295,001,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.

(2) $30,458,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the long-term services and support trust program. Of this amount, $10,932,833 is provided for implementation of the long-term services and support trust program information technology project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(3) Within existing resources, the department must reassess its ongoing staffing and funding needs for the paid family medical leave program and submit documentation of the updated need to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2021, and annually thereafter.

(4) $101,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for information technology enhancements necessary for implementation of job title reporting and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(5)(a) Within existing resources, the department shall coordinate outreach and education to paid family and medical leave benefit recipients with a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system that connects families with children prenatal through age five and residing in Washington state to appropriate services and community resources. This coordination shall include but is not limited to placing information about the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system on the paid family and medical leave program web site and in printed materials, and conducting joint events.

(b) Within existing resources, by December 1, 2021, and each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the ability for the paid family and medical leave program and a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system to provide integrated services to eligible beneficiaries. The report shall include an analysis of any statutory changes needed to allow information and data to be shared between the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system and the paid family and medical leave program.

(6) Within existing resources, the department shall report the following to the legislature and the governor by September 30, 2021, and each year thereafter:

(a) An inventory of the department's programs, services, and activities, identifying federal, state, and other funding sources for each;

(b) Federal grants received by the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years, and the applicable rules;

(c) State funding available to the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years;

(d) A history of staffing levels by line of business or activity, identifying sources of state or federal funding, for the most recent five fiscal years;

(e) A projected spending plan for the employment services administrative account and the administrative contingency account. The spending plan must include forecasted revenues and estimated expenditures under various economic scenarios.

(7) $3,264,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of the office of agricultural and seasonal workforce services.

(8) $476,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided for the department to implement chapter 2, Laws of 2021 (unemployment insurance). If the department does not receive adequate funding from the United States department of labor to cover these costs, the department may use funding made available to the state through section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act) in an amount not to exceed the amount provided in this subsection (8).

(9) $875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $6,885,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for career connected learning grants as provided in RCW 28C.30.050.

(10) $1,222,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation and $1,500,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the maintenance and operation of the disaster recovery continuity of operations information technology project.

(11) $80,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to produce a report on the feasibility of replicating the existing unemployment insurance program to serve individuals not eligible for unemployment insurance due to immigration status. The study shall identify programmatic differences that would mitigate barriers to access and reduce fear of participation and identify the operational and caseload costs associated with the replication. If using a replica of the unemployment insurance program conflicts with federal law, the study shall assess the operational and caseload costs of similar social net programs that serve individuals regardless of their citizenship status. The department shall:

(a) Work with the departments of labor and industries, social and health services, and commerce and the office of the governor;

(b) Convene and meet at least three times with a group of eight to ten external stakeholders comprised of representatives from geographically diverse immigrant advocacy groups, labor organizations with a state-wide presence, workers' rights groups, and legal and policy advocacy groups focused on immigration and employment law; and

(c) Hold at least one listening session with community members.

(12) $32,979,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) and $2,683,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) are provided solely for the department to address the impacts of COVID-19 on the state unemployment system in order to prevent and detect fraud, promote equitable access to the unemployment insurance system, and ensure the timely payment of unemployment insurance benefits. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $22,346,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to address an anticipated increase in the unemployment insurance appeals caseload.

(b) $5,768,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to ensure adequate security measures are in place to prevent unemployment insurance fraud.

(c) $4,465,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to migrate and upgrade the unemployment insurance customer call center phone system to a cloud-based system. Prior to executing a contract, the department shall consult with the office of the chief information officer. The department must ensure that the project plan, timeline with quantifiable deliverables, and budget by fiscal year by fund, to include ongoing costs by fiscal year, are adhered to. The department shall report on the status of the project to the office of financial management and the relevant committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(d) $400,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for translation of documents and letters and other improvements to ensure customer ease-of-access.

(e) $1,417,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for the department to contract with the national guard to assist the department with its unemployment insurance claims backlog.

(f) $1,267,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for the department to contract with a vendor to provide fact-finding services related to unemployment insurance claims.

(13) $10,000,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to make information technology improvements to improve user experience and increase security to prevent unemployment insurance fraud. If the department does not receive adequate funding from the United States department of labor to cover these costs, the department may use funding made available to the state through section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act) in an amount not to exceed the amount provided in this subsection. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(14) Within existing resources, the department shall report to the legislature by September 2, 2021, the following information pertaining to the unemployment insurance program:

(a) The number of full time equivalent employees of the department who were working in the unemployment insurance program, including those who were reassigned internally to the unemployment insurance program, the number of full time equivalent employees that were contracted by the department from other state agencies, and the number of contractors or consultants engaged by the department, on a monthly basis beginning March 1, 2020, through the latest available month;

(b) A projection of full-time equivalent staffing or contractor needs that would be affordable within anticipated base and above-base federal unemployment administrative revenues;

(c) A spending plan for anticipated federal unemployment revenues other than base or above-base revenues, including any proposed additional full-time equivalent staff, consultants, contractors, or other investments related to helping the department reduce the backlog of unemployment insurance claims, appeals, denials, overpayments, and other claimant issues; and

(d) A budget for the unemployment insurance program, showing expenditures by object and fund source, for fiscal years 2022 and 2023, along with any projected shortfalls in revenues.

(15) $656,000 of the family medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5097 (paid leave coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $90,000 of the unemployment account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5190 (health care workers/benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $7,939,000 of the unemployment account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5193 (unemployment ins. system). If the bill is not enacted by July 1, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $200,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1073 (paid leave coverage). Of the amount provided in this subsection, at least 95 percent is provided solely for grants and assistance awarded by the department pursuant to the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—GENERAL

(1) The appropriations to the department of children, youth, and families in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of children, youth, and families shall initially be allotted as required by this act. The department shall seek approval from the office of financial management prior to transferring moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act. Allotment modifications shall not permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(3) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—CHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$389,194,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$402,172,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$475,503,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,824,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,269,693,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(2) $453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $453,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the costs of hub home foster families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.

(3) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $110,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(4) $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.

(5) In fiscal year 2022 and in fiscal year 2023, the department shall provide a tracking report for social service specialists and corresponding social services support staff to the office of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. The report shall detail progress toward meeting the targeted 1:18 caseload ratio standard for child and family welfare services caseload-carrying staff and targeted 1:8 caseload ratio standard for child protection services caseload carrying staff. To the extent to which the information is available, the report shall include the following information identified separately for social service specialists doing case management work, supervisory work, and administrative support staff, and identified separately by job duty or program, including but not limited to intake, child protective services investigations, child protective services family assessment response, and child and family welfare services:

(a) Total full time equivalent employee authority, allotments and expenditures by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program;

(b) Vacancy rates by region, office, and classification and band; and

(c) Average length of employment with the department, and when applicable, the date of exit for staff exiting employment with the department by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program.

(6) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.

(7)(a) $539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $656,000 of the general fund private/local appropriation, and $252,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, or regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(b) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.

(8) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $112,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, implement, and expand strategies to improve the capacity, reliability, and effectiveness of contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care and their parents and siblings. Strategies may include, but are not limited to, increasing mileage reimbursement for providers, offering transportation-only contract options, and mechanisms to reduce the level of parent-child supervision when doing so is in the best interest of the child. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature regarding these strategies by November 1, 2022. The report shall include the number and percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation and the number and percentage of parents with unsupervised visitation, prior to reunification.

(9) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.

(10) $2,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $156,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the travel reimbursement for in-home service providers.

(11) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.

(12) $6,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $6,195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,188,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement and enhanced emergent placement contracts.

(a) The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments and shall submit as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 any costs associated with increases in the number of emergent placement contract beds after the effective date of this section that cannot be sustained within existing appropriations.

(b) Beginning October 1, 2021, and every quarter thereafter, the department shall publish on its website the rates or fees paid for emergent placement contracts, the number of beds retained, and the number of beds purchased. If the department determines that there is a need to increase the rates or fees paid or the number of beds retained or purchased under this subsection, the secretary shall request authorization from the office of financial management and notify the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(13)(a) The department shall modify the behavioral rehabilitation services rate structure to one that is based on placement setting rather than acuity level pursuant to the rate study submitted in December 2018.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2022, and continuing through the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department must provide semi-annual reports to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of in-state behavioral rehabilitation services providers and licensed beds, the number of out-of-state behavioral rehabilitation services placements, and a comparison of these numbers to the same metrics expressed as an average over the prior six months. The report shall identify separately beds with the enhanced behavioral rehabilitation services rate. Effective January 1, 2022, and to the extent the information is available, the report will include the same information for emergency placement services beds and enhanced emergency placement services beds.

(14) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementing the supportive visitation model that utilizes trained visit navigators to provide a structured and positive visitation experience for children and their parents.

(15) The department of children, youth, and families shall enter into interagency agreements with the office of public defense and office of civil legal aid to facilitate the use of federal Title IV-E reimbursement for parent representation and child representation services.

(16) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a contract with a national nonprofit organization to, in partnership with private matching funds, subcontract with a community organization for specialized, enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody. The contract must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children with high needs.

(17) The department of children, youth, and families shall make foster care maintenance payments to programs where children are placed with a parent in a residential program for substance abuse treatment. These maintenance payments are considered foster care maintenance payments for purposes of forecasting and budgeting at maintenance level as required by RCW 43.88.058.

(18) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations to purchase and deliver concrete goods to low-income families.

(19) $387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $93,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase all fees paid to child placing agencies by 7.5 percent, effective July 1, 2021.

(20) $451,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $662,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to contract with a community organization with expertise in the LifeSet case management model to serve youth and young adults currently being served or exiting the foster care, juvenile justice, and mental health systems to successfully transition into self-reliant adults.

(21) $499,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $499,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $310,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to expand the family connections program in two additional areas of the state, one west of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one east of the crest of the Cascade mountains. The program shall follow the model established in chapter 33, Laws of 2020. The department shall contract with a community-based organization with experience working with the foster care population and experience administering the family connections program.

(22) If the department receives an allocation of federal funding through an unanticipated receipt, the department shall not expend more than what was approved or for another purpose than what was approved by the governor through the unanticipated receipt process pursuant to RCW 43.79.280.

(23) The department is authorized to use the amounts provided in this section for services and maintenance payments to former dependent youth as authorized and directed in the supporting foster youth and families through the pandemic act, P.L. 116-260, division X.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$126,927,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$129,555,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,464,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,787,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$196,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$261,929,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(2) $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for the juvenile justice programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding for program-specific participation and the department shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.

(3) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for expansion of the juvenile justice treatments and therapies in department of children, youth, and families programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." The department may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(4)(a) $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority.

(b) The department of children, youth, and families shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service (CJS) funds, community juvenile accountability act (CJAA) grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative (CDDA), and suspended disposition alternative (SDA). The department of children, youth, and families shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the department of children, youth, and families and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(c) The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (d)(ii) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the department of children, youth, and families and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(5) $1,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(6) $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the juvenile detention alternatives initiative.

(7) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The department of children, youth, and families may award grants under this subsection. The department of children, youth, and families shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the department of children, youth, and families on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(8) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(9) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts to establish alternative detention facilities similar to the proctor house model in Jefferson county, Washington, that will provide less restrictive confinement alternatives to youth in their local communities. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding and each entity receiving funds must report to the department on the number and types of youth serviced, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(10) $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to provide housing services to clients releasing from incarceration into the community.

(11) $3,220,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,330,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a community transition services program and expanding community-based, less restrictive alternatives to total confinement through the use of electronic home monitoring as established in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1186 (concerning juvenile rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided is this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $2,387,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for increased staffing for community facilities.

(13) Within existing resources, the department shall evaluate the Martin hall juvenile detention facility located in Medical Lake as an option for increased capacity needs for the juvenile rehabilitation program.

(14) Sufficient funding is provided within this section for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (reentry services/state and local institutions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—EARLY LEARNING PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$295,207,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$378,675,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,052,125,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$86,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,127,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$21,438,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$29,776,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,482,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$414,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,894,330,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $80,273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $72,666,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $24,070,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account appropriation, and $25,452,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA-GEER) are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 15,412 slots in fiscal year 2022 and 16,412 slots in fiscal year 2023. Of the total slots in each fiscal year, 100 slots must be reserved for foster children to receive school-year-round enrollment.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $14,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $14,889,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA-GEER) are for a slot rate increase of ten percent beginning July 1, 2021. The funding provided in this subsection is sufficient for the department to increase rates according to inflation, pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.), beginning in fiscal year 2023 and annually thereafter.

(c) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.

(3) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies.

(4) $8,482,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for eliminating the work requirement under the working connections child care program for single parents who are pursuing a vocational education full-time at a community, technical, or tribal college as provided in RCW 43.216.136.

(5) The legislature recognizes that the federal government has provided substantial additional funding through the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M. and the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. The purpose of the additional federal funding is to ensure access to affordable child care and to stabilize and support child care providers from the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic. The legislature intends with the passage of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.) to implement these federal purposes by expanding eligibility for subsidized child care, reducing parent copayments, increasing provider base rates to recognize increased costs, and providing other financial support to stabilize the child care sector to remain open or to reopen. The legislature finds that the state lacked the fiscal capacity to make these investments and the additional federal funding has provided the opportunity to supplement state funding to expand and accelerate child care access, affordability, and provider support as the state navigates the COVID-19 pandemic and its aftermath.

(6) $23,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022, $54,698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023, $283,375,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $58,657,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES), $66,300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $97,874,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.135. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) The department of children, youth, and families shall work in collaboration with the department of social and health services to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families. Effective December 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.

(b) $6,390,000 is for the compensation components of the 2021-2023 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as provided in section 946 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $4,410,000 is for a 35 cent per hour per child rate increase for family, friends, and neighbor providers (FFNs) beginning July 1, 2022;

(ii) $854,000 is to increase the rate paid to providers who reach level 3.5 of the state's early achievers quality rating system by two percent beginning July 1, 2021; and

(iii) $1,126,000 is to increase the nonstandard hour care rate by $10.00 per child per month beginning July 1, 2021.

(c) $58,657,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES), $66,300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $97,874,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for enhancements to the working child care connections program, pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $27,523,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES), $11,350,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $34,049,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the implementation of reduced household child care monthly copayments.

(ii) $31,134,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES), $40,195,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $45,476,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market for child care providers. The state and the representative for family child care providers must enter into bargaining over the implementation of subsidy rate increases, and apply those increases consistent with the terms of this proviso and the agreement reached between the parties.

(iii) $4,580,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $5,660,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to waive work requirements for student parents utilizing the working connections child care program.

(iv) $10,175,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $12,690,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to expand eligibility for the working connections child care program to households at or below 60 percent of state median income.

(d) In order to not exceed the appropriated amount, the department shall manage the program so that the average monthly caseload does not exceed 33,000 households and the department shall give prioritized access into the program according to the following order:

(i) Families applying for or receiving temporary assistance for needy families (TANF);

(ii) TANF families curing sanction;

(iii) Foster children;

(iv) Families that include a child with special needs;

(v) Families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center;

(vi) Families with a child residing with a biological parent or guardian who have received child protective services, child welfare services, or a family assessment response from the department in the past six months, and have received a referral for child care as part of the family's case management;

(vii) Families that received subsidies within the last thirty days and:

(A) Have reapplied for subsidies; and

(B) Have household income of two hundred percent of the federal poverty level or below; and

(viii) All other eligible families.

(e) On July 1, 2021, and July 1, 2022, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(i) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;

(ii) The reason for each overpayment;

(iii) The total cost of overpayments;

(iv) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and

(v) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.

(7) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(8) $623,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $6,701,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program. If federal sequestration cuts are realized, cuts to the seasonal child care program must be proportional to other federal reductions made within the department.

(9) $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to contract with a countywide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a pilot project to prevent child abuse and neglect using nationally recognized models.

(a) The nonprofit organization must continue to implement a countywide resource and referral linkage system for families of children who are prenatal through age five.

(b) The nonprofit organization must offer a voluntary brief newborn home visiting program. The program must meet the diverse needs of Pierce county residents and, therefore, it must be flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive. The department, in collaboration with the nonprofit organization, must examine the feasibility of leveraging federal and other fund sources, including federal Title IV-E and medicaid funds, for home visiting provided through the pilot. The department must report its findings to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2022.

(10)(a) $6,963,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $9,446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall pursue opportunities to leverage other funding to continue and expand ECLIPSE services. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (10), $2,310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,783,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the expansion of ECLIPSE services, pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection (10)(b) shall lapse.

(11) The department shall place a ten percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. In a bi-annual report to the governor and the legislature, the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements.

(12) $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.

(13) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(14) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.

(15) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for contracting additional facilitated play groups offered statewide to family, friend, and neighbor child care providers.

(16) The department shall work with state and local law enforcement, federally recognized tribal governments, and tribal law enforcement to develop a process for expediting fingerprinting and data collection necessary to conduct background checks for tribal early learning and child care providers.

(17) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (children's mental health).

(18) Within existing resources, the department shall implement chapter 409, Laws of 2019 (early learning access).

(19) $773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 360, Laws of 2019 (children's mental health).

(20) $6,573,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $7,661,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $6,083,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) are provided solely for the department to migrate the social service payment system to a cloud-based payment system in order to implement child care stabilization grants, child care subsidy rate enhancements, and other payments intended to support child care providers during and after the COVID-19 public health emergency, and for other improvements necessary for the successful implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.). The amounts in this section are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(21)(a) $5,748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $9,356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $12,689,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $5,781,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. The legislature intends for the appropriations provided in this subsection to stabilize and support child care providers and early learning contractors and to expand families' access to affordable, quality child care and early learning during and after the COVID-19 public health emergency. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $2,274,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,274,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $4,549,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) are provided solely for the implementation of complex needs funds.

(ii) $912,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $1,673,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the implementation of trauma-informed care supports.

(iii) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,799,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement dual language rate enhancements.

(iv) $156,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $244,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) are provided solely for the implementation of equity grants.

(v) $1,555,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $941,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the implementation of six additional infant and early childhood mental health consultants.

(vi) $364,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $495,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the expansion of family, friend, and neighbor child care play and learn groups.

(vii) $669,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $751,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $2,570,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), and $1,690,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the implementation of trainings, early achievers scholarships, and other professional development activities.

(viii) $203,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to develop and implement a prenatal-to-three family engagement strategy.

(ix) $1,585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to expand the birth-to-three early childhood education and assistance program.

(x) $1,539,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) and $982,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for an infant rate enhancement for child care providers.

(b) The state and the representative for family child care providers must enter into bargaining over the implementation of grants and rate increases included in this proviso, and apply those increases consistent with the terms of this proviso and the agreement reached between the parties.

(22) $265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $265,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a statewide family resource and referral linkage system, with coordinated access point of resource navigators who will connect families with children prenatal through age five with services, programs, and community resources through a facilitated referral and linkage process.

(23) $5,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) is provided solely for the department to provide grants to child care providers for small capital purchases and minor renovations necessary for providers to meet safety and licensing standards. The grants are intended to provide financial support to child care providers so that they may maintain operations during and after the COVID-19 public health emergency, and to build the supply of child care providers during and after the COVID-19 public health emergency. The department shall work in collaboration with the department of commerce to administer the grants, and to track and report the number of grants awarded by child care program type.

(24)(a) $414,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a pilot project to determine the feasibility of a child care license category for multi-site programs operating under one owner or one entity. The department shall adopt rules to implement the pilot project and may waive or adapt licensing requirements when necessary to allow for the operation of a new license category. Pilot participants must include, at least:

(i) One governmental agency;

(ii) One nonprofit organization; and

(iii) One for-profit private business.

(b) New or existing license child care providers may participate in the pilot. When selecting and approving pilot project locations, the department shall aim to select a mix of rural, urban, and suburban locations. By July 1, 2024, the department shall submit to the relevant committees of the legislature recommendations on whether to permanently implement this license category and what, if any, changes are needed to law to accomplish this.

(25) $2,771,000 of the home visiting account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,771,000 of the home visiting account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided to expand home visiting services for up to 400 new families, enhance data collection, and support the local implementing agencies providing home visiting services. The department shall:

(a) Contract with local implementing agencies to expand home visiting services by October 1, 2021; and

(b) Provide semiannual updates to the home visiting advisory committee established in RCW 43.216.130 that includes an updated number of families served in home visiting programs and a status of the home visiting services account balance.

(c) The home visiting advisory committee established in RCW 43.216.130 shall make recommendations to the department and the legislature by June 1, 2022, containing strategies for supporting home visiting providers and serving additional families. Recommendations should include, but are not limited to, strategies in the 2019 report to the legislature Opportunities and Considerations for Expanding Home Visiting Services in Washington State, such as enhancing data system collections and reporting, professional development supports, and rate adjustments to reimburse for the true cost of service delivery.

(26) The appropriations in this section are sufficient funding to implement section 29 of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5151 (foster care & child care).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES—PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$138,989,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$140,808,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$169,678,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$394,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$180,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$458,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$380,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$450,887,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships providing technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

(2) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 944 of this act.

(3) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a full-time employee to coordinate policies and programs to support pregnant and parenting individuals receiving chemical dependency or substance use disorder treatment.

(4) $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $505,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to complete a report with options and recommendations for administrative efficiencies and long-term strategies that align and integrate high-quality early learning programs administered by both agencies and consistent with implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care dev. exp.). The report, due September 1, 2022, shall address capital needs, data collection and data sharing, licensing changes, quality standards, options for community-based and school-based settings, fiscal modeling, statutory changes needed to achieve administrative efficiencies, and all other requirements of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.).

(5) Within existing resources, the department shall submit a brief report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2022, outlining options for creating a new dedicated account for adoption support that will meet 42 U.S.C. Sec. 473 requirements. The report shall include a methodology for calculating savings in a manner that can be incorporated into the adoption support forecast budget process, statutory needs, and expenditure guidelines for the account.

(6) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5241 (economic inclusion). If the bill is not enacted by July 1, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a statewide nonprofit with demonstrated capability of partnering with state agencies and community organizations to develop public-facing regionalized data dashboards and reports to support the goals of the department and the early learning advisory council, pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early learning dev. exp.).

(8)(a) $986,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $937,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $482,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to create and implement a new approach to transition planning for young people preparing to exit the child welfare system and juvenile rehabilitation institutions, pursuant to the recommendations in the Improving Stability for Youth Exiting Systems of Care report submitted in January 2020, as required by RCW 43.330.720. The department must engage young people, caregivers, providers, and other stakeholders in the creation and implementation of the approach by:

(i) Providing one statewide adolescent transitions program manager and six adolescent liaisons, one in each region of the department, who are dedicated to supporting the transition planning approaches developed by the department, providing program oversight, and supporting improved outcomes for adolescents during the transition to adulthood; and

(ii) Strengthening the administration and competency of the independent living program and direct independent living services.

(b) No later than June 1, 2022, the department must centralize administration of its independent living program and develop a framework for service delivery, including best practice recommendations. The framework must be codesigned with adolescents, caregivers, providers, and stakeholders. No later than June 30, 2022, the department must develop and launch a competitive request for proposal process to solicit bidders to provide independent living services under the new framework.

(c) No later than November 30, 2022, the department must report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on the implementation of the new approach to transition planning, the new independent living framework, and the state's capacity to provide high-quality transition services, including independent living services, to youth and young adults exiting the child welfare system and juvenile rehabilitation institutions. The report must identify any remaining service gaps that prevent statewide implementation and address the additional resources needed to improve outcomes for young people exiting these systems of care.

(End of part)

PART III

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$748,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$820,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,351,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,951,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a land use planner to provide land use planning services dedicated to Klickitat county. Because the activities of the land use planner are solely for the benefit of Washington state, Oregon is not required to provide matching funds for this activity.

(2) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $213,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the access database replacement project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$47,424,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$45,813,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$98,760,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$26,999,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,266,000

Flood Control Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,518,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,548,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$204,000

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account—Water

Supply Facilities—State Appropriation
. . . .
$186,000

Water Rights Tracking System Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$48,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$582,000

Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$567,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,957,000

Water Rights Processing Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$46,124,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,850,000

Biosolids Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,581,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,325,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$22,163,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,109,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,378,000

Air Operating Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,759,000

Wastewater Treatment Plant Operator Certification

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$552,000

Oil Spill Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,076,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$268,430,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$499,000

Voluntary Cleanup Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$344,000

Paint Product Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$140,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$270,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$276,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,540,000

Clean Fuels Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$373,000

Climate Investment Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

Environmental Mitigation Settlement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,180,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$640,071,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(2) $204,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Executive Order No. 12-07, Washington's response to ocean acidification.

(3) $14,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to local governments for the purpose of supporting local solid waste and financial assistance programs.

(4) $150,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the state marine management plan and ongoing costs of the Washington coastal marine advisory council to serve as a forum and provide recommendations on coastal management issues.

(5) $588,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $662,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to address outstanding water rights issues. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for preparation and filing of adjudications of state water rights in the Nooksack (water resource inventory area 1) and lake Roosevelt and middle tributaries (water resource inventory area 58) watersheds. The department will not file an adjudication in water resource inventory area 1 prior to June 1, 2023; and

(b) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for Whatcom county to support a collaborative process among local water users and water right holders that can complement water rights adjudication in the Nooksack (water resources inventory area 1) watershed. Funding is provided for facilitation and mediation among parties, development of planning and technical information, and assessment of local solutions.

(6) $242,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for an equipment cache grant for the Jamestown S'klallam Tribe for a new response vehicle.

(7) $398,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for consumer product testing data validation services to support increases to the agency's product testing program.

(8) $2,305,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase the department's capacity to test for toxics in children's products and other general consumer goods, to implement needed policy changes resulting from product testing, to communicate results to the public, and to conduct a feasibility study to add an inorganics component to the plan for new laboratory space at the department's headquarters building in Lacey, Washington.

(9) $497,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $497,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to conservation organizations and certain tribes for the purpose of coordination, monitoring, and research related to Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery. Of the amounts provided in this subsection the department shall distribute grants as follows: $175,000 each fiscal year to the Northwest Straits commission; $72,000 each fiscal year to the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe; $100,000 each fiscal year to the Samish Indian Nation; and $150,000 each fiscal year to the Puget Sound Restoration Fund.

(10) $2,000,000 of the environmental mitigation settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Spokane river regional toxics task force to address elevated levels of polychlorinated biphenyls in the Spokane river.

(11) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to grant to Clark county for the purpose of designing the process for developing a long-term plan to restore and maintain the health of Vancouver lake, a category 5 303(d) status impaired body of water, as well as designing an institutional structure to take responsibility for the plan's implementation in a financially sustainable manner. The plan will build on existing work completed by the county, state agencies, and nonprofit organizations. The department will support the work of the county to include involvement by property owners around the lake and within the watersheds that drain to the lake, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, other state agencies and local governments with proprietary or regulatory jurisdiction, tribes, and nonprofit organizations advocating for the lake's health. The design should address timelines for plan development, roles and responsibilities of governmental and nonprofit entities, potential funding sources and options for plan implementation, including formation of a potential lake management district under chapter 36.61 RCW, and the management objectives to be included in the plan.

(12) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to work with the Guemes island planning advisory committee to follow on to a United States geologic survey study of the island's aquifer recharge areas, quantify an updated water budget, and provide an accurate water-level analysis and water-table map of the two aquifers on the island.

(13) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to support the Pierce county health department and the friends of Spanaway lake to treat and clean up elevated phosphorus and algae levels in Spanaway lake.

(14) $92,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to San Juan county for a study to build on the existing knowledge of the islands' water resources to gain a current understanding of the state of groundwater in the county, including hydrologic data evaluation, completing recharge estimates, and updating the water balance.

(15) $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to work with landowners, state agencies, and others to analyze the water quality of Deep lake.

(16) $195,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to carry out an assessment of potential hazards of 6PPD (CAS 793-24-8) and other chemicals or chemical classes and breakdown products used as anti-oxidants and/or antiozonants in tires and submit a technical memo to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(17) $523,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the department of transportation, University of Washington-Tacoma, and Washington State University-Puyallup to identify priority areas affected by 6PPD or other related chemicals toxic to aquatic life from roads and transportation infrastructure and on best management practices for reducing toxicity. This includes developing a standard method for the laboratory measurement of 6PPD-quinone and related chemicals. The department will submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2022.

(18) $2,180,000 of the environmental mitigation settlement account—state is provided solely for the department to create a database, monitoring program, and laboratory assessment method regarding polychlorinated biphenyls (PCB). Within the amount provided in this subsection, $440,000 is provided to enhance the environmental information management database; $1,200,000 is provided to create a long-term statewide PCB monitoring program; and $540,000 is provided for developing a PCB specific laboratory method for conducting analysis. The department must coordinate with the department of fish and wildlife on the implementation of this subsection and for recommending PCB clean-up projects for legislative funding in subsequent appropriations.

(19) $547,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5022 (recycling, waste, & litter). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $10,080,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $9,871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $22,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation, $83,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation, $11,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account—state appropriation, $11,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation, and $356,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force recommendations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $43,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5381 (fish passage project permits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $8,000 of the reclamation account—state appropriation, $8,000 of the flood control assistant account—state appropriation, $32,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation, $4,000 of the worker and community right-to-know account—state appropriation, $120,000 of the water quality permit account—state appropriation, $10,000 of the underground storage tank account—state appropriation, $6,000 of the bio solids permit account—state appropriation, $18,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account—state appropriation, $52,000 of the radioactive mixed waste account—state appropriation, $10,000 of the air pollution control account—state appropriation, $20,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation, $12,000 of the air operating permit account—state appropriation, $514,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation, and $80,000 of the water pollution control revolving administration account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to maintain and license the new eHub system. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(24) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to enter into a contract with a qualified third party to develop standards that provide a framework for assessing the quality of volume, validity, and durability of potential future carbon dioxide removal projects. The resulting product should be adequate to allow in-state entities to analyze proposed carbon removal project for conformity with state carbon reduction laws, rules, and goals. The selected vender should build upon previously completed analyses by the state of Washington and the federal government.

(25) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to:

(a)(i) Develop proposals to change the way water banks are created such that key information is made available to the public. The changes should consider requirements such as:

(A) A description of a proposed banking and operations plan, including the needs and customers the bank intends to serve, the geographic area to be served, the portfolio of available mitigating rights and their allowed uses, any anticipated change in use of available mitigating rights, any limitations the bank intends to impose in offering water rights for use, and anything else the department deems necessary to promote transparency and the public interest;

(B) Reporting requirements that include any changes in the intended customers or needs being serviced by the bank, any change in the geographic area to be served, any anticipated change in the use of available mitigating rights, any change in limitation the banks intends to impose in offering water right for use, and any other change the department deems necessary to promote transparency and the public interest; and

(C) Reporting requirements for publishing each change and providing notice to pertinent parties and soliciting public comment.

(ii) The proposals must be submitted in a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(26) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to establish and administer a grant program for implementing water banking strategies to meet local water needs. Grant awards must be limited to $1,500,000 or less per applicant and/or per county. One-third of any water right purchased with these funds must be for permanent instream flow rights benefiting fish and wildlife. In determining the one-third for permanent instream flow rights, only the portion of the acquisition funded by grants from this appropriation shall be subject to the calculation. Grants may only be used for:

(a) Acquisition of water rights appropriate for use in a water bank including all costs necessary to evaluate the water right for eligibility for its intended use;

(b) Activities necessary to facilitate the creation of a water bank;

(c) Development of a water bank that is intended to provide a local public benefit. Local public benefit is a beneficial use of water as defined by chapters 90.03 and 90.54 RCW and WAC 173-500-050 and provides economic benefit to the county of origin, preserves water rights for use in the county of origin, and provides instream flow benefits for fish and wildlife;

(d) Development of water banks in rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370(5) that have the headwaters of a major watershed within their borders and only for water banking strategies within the county of origin. A major watershed has the same meaning as shoreline of the state in RCW 90.58.030(2)(f)(v) (A) and (B).

(e) When prioritizing grants under this subsection (26), the department must also consider:

(i) Whether the grant recipient has sufficient expertise and capacity to develop and maintain a water bank consistent with the purposes of this appropriation;

(ii) Whether the grant recipient has secured a valid interest to purchase a water right;

(iii) Whether the water right appears to be adequate for the intended use;

(iv) The extent to which the applicant leverages other public or private funding; and

(v) That applicants from public entities or public/private partnerships shall have preference.

(27) $200,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to complete a feasibility study for the creation of soil banks and the remediation of pesticides in central Washington.

(28) $1,644,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $834,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $373,000 of the clean fuels program account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1091 (transportation fuel/carbon). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(29) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to designate a regional clean air agency to convene a stakeholder group to assess and develop recommendations for reducing and mitigating air quality impacts in the form of noxious odors resulting from asphalt plants in the Puget Sound region. The stakeholder group should include representatives from the asphalt industry, cities within a county in the region in which an asphalt plant is located, the Puget Sound clean air agency, local and state health departments, research institutions, and a community or environmental organization representative with expertise in air pollution, toxicology, or other relevant fields. The recommendations must address steps needed for asphalt production facilities to develop odor control plans and best management practices to reduce noxious odors that negatively impact neighboring residents, businesses and persons utilizing publicly owned recreational facilities. A report containing recommendations must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$638,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$957,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,374,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,969,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$30,659,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$28,922,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,058,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,303,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$369,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,645,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$367,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$124,968,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$420,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$201,711,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(2) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to pay assessments charged by local improvement districts.

(3) $406,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $322,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $88,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects funded in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(4) $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for an update to the Seashore conservation area survey and plan.

(5) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to hire a diversity, equity, and inclusion coordinator to expand the diversity of the agency's workforce.

(6) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the facilitation of a work group that includes representation from the state parks and recreation commission, the commission on African American affairs, and stakeholders with expertise of the black experience in outdoor recreation to identify barriers to inclusion and develop recommendations to increase participation of Black Washingtonians in the state parks system and other outdoor recreation spaces and public parks. The work group will be selected by the governor's office and will consist of at least twelve participants representing diverse geographic, socioeconomic, and experiential backgrounds. The parks commission will enter into an interagency agreement with the commission on African American affairs to procure a contractor to facilitate the work group and develop a report with recommendations. The amount provided in this subsection may also be used for a survey or focus group to assess the needs of Black Washingtonians related to state parks and outdoor recreation. The work group will submit a report to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature no later January 1, 2022.

(7) $3,765,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,177,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to accelerate work on preventative maintenance and improve the conditions of park facilities.

(8) $5,795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,663,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to increase customer service, conduct more custodial maintenance, expand interpretive services, and expand public safety.

(9) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (law enforcement data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,489,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$3,424,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,716,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$320,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,933,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,444,000

Youth Athletic Facility Nonappropriated Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$181,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$16,568,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $37,000 of the firearms range account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the firearms range grant program as described in RCW 79A.25.210.

(2) $3,933,000 of the recreation resources account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administrative and coordinating costs of the recreation and conservation office and the board as described in RCW 79A.25.080(1).

(3) $1,444,000 of the NOVA program account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program as described in chapter 46.09 RCW.

(4) $1,809,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,809,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization with a mission for salmon and steelhead restoration to install near-term solutions to prevent steelhead mortality at the Hood Canal bridge.

(5) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the governor's salmon recovery office to coordinate ongoing recovery efforts of southern resident orcas and monitor progress toward implementation of recommendations from the governor's southern resident killer whale task force.

(6) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to conduct a pilot study to reintroduce salmon above the Chief Joseph dam on the Columbia river.

(7) $175,000 of the youth athletic facility nonappropriated account—state appropriation is provided solely for a task force to consider ways to improve equitable access to K-12 schools' fields and athletic facilities and local parks agency facilities with the goal of increasing physical activity for youth and families. The task force shall be created and managed by the recreation and conservation office. A portion of the funds must be used to inventory K-12 school fields and athletic facilities and park agency facilities, and for joint use agreements for these facilities. The task force participants must represent geographic diversity and must include representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington association of school administrators, the association of Washington principals, and the Washington recreation and parks association; participants with a background in public health; and stakeholders who represent diverse communities and communities of color. The task force shall consider joint use agreements, partnerships, improved scheduling practices with local parks agencies including facility rental fees, and other strategies, and submit a report with best practices and policy recommendations to the recreation and conservation funding board. A final report from the board must be submitted to the governor's office and legislature no later than February 1, 2022.

(8) $209,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $209,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to contract for implementation of the Nisqually watershed stewardship plan.

(9) $112,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5063 (invasive species council exp). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office to facilitate the transfer of management authority over the project known as the beach lake conservation area from the current owner to a local public government entity. If the current owner does not accept the offer to transfer management authority, then the office must pursue all legal means to enforce the right of public access consistent with the deed restrictions as set forth in the contract PSAR #15-1045. The amount provided in this subsection is intended to secure daily public access, during daylight hours, with minimal closures to the beach lake conservation area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,662,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,714,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,376,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$12,841,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$12,834,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,482,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,450,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$37,607,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,410,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to continue to convene and facilitate a food policy forum.

(3) $2,135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5045 (meat & poultry inspection). Of the amounts appropriated, no less than $2,100,000 each fiscal year must be made available as grants, as specified in the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the commission to share evenly with conservation districts to increase assistance to landowners to achieve environmental stewardship and agricultural sustainability.

(5) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (pollinator health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$83,032,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$80,278,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$130,092,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$64,011,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$646,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,240,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,300,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,779,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$675,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$33,821,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,891,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$518,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,634,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$661,000

Ballast Water and Biofouling Management Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,163,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,037,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,969,000

Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$73,110,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$524,000

Environmental Mitigation Settlement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$630,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$503,022,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $503,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $503,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $440,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for county assessments.

(3) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers.

(4) $378,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $378,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects funded in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(5) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to develop conflict mitigation strategies for wolf recovery and staff resources in northeast Washington for response to wolf-livestock conflicts. The department must provide focus on minimizing wolf-livestock issues in the Kettle range. The department may not use firearms from helicopters for removing wolves.

(6) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for suppression, eradication, and monitoring of northern pike in the Columbia river. The department must work with the Spokane Tribe of Indians, the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation, and the Kalispel Tribe of Indians on identifying appropriate actions to reduce threats to anadromous salmon from invasive northern pike.

(7) $753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $753,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for expanded management of pinniped populations on the lower Columbia river and its tributaries with the goal of increasing chinook salmon abundance and prey availability for southern resident orcas.

(8) $1,262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the costs for the department to maintain shellfish sanitation activities necessary to implement its memorandum of understanding with the department of health to ensure the state is compliant with its federal obligations under the model ordinance of the national shellfish sanitation program.

(9) $452,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $452,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to create a statewide permittee assistance program as part of hydraulic project approvals, in which department staff collaborate with landowners during construction to help resolve risks of permit noncompliance.

(10) $470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to expand efforts to survey the diets of seals and sea lions in Puget Sound and identify lethal and non-lethal management actions to deter them from preying on salmon and steelhead.

(11) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a voluntary buyback of Columbia river-Willapa bay and Columbia river-Grays harbor commercial gill net licenses to mitigate for policy restrictions on the use of gill nets in the mainstem lower Columbia river. The department shall solicit offers from gill net license holders who wish to participate in the buyback program, and purchase gill net licenses in ranked, ascending order from lowest to the highest bid price based on their 2016-2020 average annual Columbia river landings. License holders that agree to the voluntary buyback shall have their license retired and be prohibited from future fishery participation with a Columbia river-Willapa bay or Columbia river-Grays harbor gill net license. The department may not purchase a gill net license for an amount exceeding 3.5 times the individual gill net license holder's average annual ex-vessel value from the salmon landed in Columbia river fisheries from 2016 through 2020. The purchase price shall be $3,000 for Grays harbor-Columbia river or Willapa bay-Columbia river salmon gill net licenses without Columbia river salmon landings in Washington from 2016-2020. Consistent with the mitigation purpose of the buyback and the intent of Columbia river fishery reforms, the department may only authorize mainstem gill and drift net fisheries in zones four and five targeting upriver bright fall chinook and allocate no more than 20 percent of allowable impacts to off-channel and mainstem fall commercial fisheries.

(12) $259,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $259,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to continue to provide policy and scientific support to the department of ecology regarding surface and groundwater management issues as part of implementing chapter 90.94 RCW streamflow restoration.

(13) $271,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $271,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2019 (southern resident orca whales–protection from vessels), contracts with nonprofit organizations to monitor vessel traffic and educate boaters to be whale wise, and participation in other orca recovery efforts.

(14) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department, in coordination with statewide law enforcement agencies, must provide a report to the legislature by January, 2022 on the number of cougars reported to the department as harvested by local government law enforcement agencies, training opportunities provided to local law enforcement agencies, and how cougar removals by local enforcement agencies impact the department's cougar management strategies.

(15) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement priority actions in the state pinto abalone recovery plan. Of the amounts provided, $85,000 each fiscal year must be used to locate, monitor, and safeguard wild populations of pinto abalone along the strait of Juan de Fuca, outer coast, and San Juan islands and the remaining amounts must be granted to the Puget Sound restoration fund to increase production, diversity, and resilience of out-planted abalone.

(16) $630,000 of the environmental mitigation settlement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to research and monitor the impacts of polychlorinated biphenyls (PCB) on indicator species. The department must coordinate with the department of ecology on implementation of this subsection.

(17) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to conduct an evaluation of the forest practices adaptive management program. The evaluation will be carried out generally consistent with the proposal provided to the timber, fish, and wildlife (TFW) policy committee in January 2020 titled Assessing Changes in Uncertainty During Adaptive Management: A Case Study of the Washington State Forest Practices Habitat Conservation Plan. To the extent practicable, the evaluation shall satisfy the cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research five-year peer review process as required in WAC 222-12-045(2)(f), and support other ongoing forest practices adaptive management program evaluation and improvement efforts. The department shall consult with TFW policy caucus participants during the evaluation and provide for public review and comment of the draft report. A progress report shall be delivered to TFW policy participants and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2022, and a final report by June 30, 2023.

(18) $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to restore shrubsteppe habitat and associated wildlife impacted by wildfires.

(a) This funding is intended for the restoration of habitat on public lands as well as private lands by landowners who are willing to participate. The restoration effort must be coordinated with other natural resource agencies and interested stakeholders.

(b) Restoration actions may include: (i) Increasing the availability of native plant materials; (ii) increasing the number of certified and trained personnel for implementation at scale; (iii) support for wildlife-friendly fencing replacement; (iv) support for private landowners/ranchers to defer wildland grazing and allow natural habitat regeneration; and (v) species-specific recovery actions.

(c) The department must submit a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the investments made under this subsection by December 1, 2022, with a final report submitted by September 1, 2023.

(d) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $250,000 must be used by the department to form a collaborative group process representing diverse stakeholders and facilitated by a neutral third-party to develop a long-term strategy for shrubsteppe conservation and fire preparedness, response, and restoration to meet the needs of the state's shrubsteppe wildlife and human communities. The collaborative may serve as providing expertise and advice to the wildland fire advisory committee administered by the department of natural resources and build from the wildland fire 10-year strategic plan. Components to be addressed by the collaborative include the restoration actions described in (b) of this subsection and on spatial priorities for shrubsteppe conservation, filling gaps in fire coverage, management tools to reduce fire-prone conditions on public and private lands, and identifying and making recommendations on any other threats. Any reports and findings resulting from the collaborative may be included in the report specified in (c) of this subsection.

(19) $167,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $114,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to complete a study of the impacts and extent of pinniped predation on populations of chinook salmon. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must provide a grant of $140,000 to the Washington academy of sciences to coordinate an independent science panel to review and evaluate the scientific understanding of the extent and effect of pinniped predation on chinook salmon in Puget Sound and Washington's outer coast. The department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the pinniped predation impacts and any recommendations by December 1, 2022.

(20) $137,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (pollinator health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5273 (shoreline armoring). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5381 (fish passage project permits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5452 (electric-assisted bicycles). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to conduct a pilot project to test New Zealand style elk fencing, similar to the style used by the United States Department of Agriculture at the Starkey Experimental Forest and Range, including materials and construction techniques, and determine the cost and effectiveness of the fence design in reducing damage to school property and agricultural lands within the range of the north Cascades elk herd. The department of fish and wildlife shall work with at least one agricultural property owner in Skagit county with property abutting state highway 20 and one school district located in Skagit county with enrollment of less than 650 students that volunteer to build and test the elk fence design and, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, report back to the natural resources committees of the legislature by November 1, 2022, on the results of the pilot project.

(25) $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for the department to implement strategies to control against chronic wasting disease in native species of the state.

(26) $1,682,000 of the fish, wildlife and conservation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with stakeholders to improve steelhead spawning estimates for improved fishing regulations such that enhanced conservation and equitable fisheries are established. Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department must develop a plan to protect native and hatchery produced steelhead for each river system of Grays harbor, Willapa bay and coastal Olympic peninsula. The plan must adequately protect those fisheries for healthy runs year-after-year as well as provide reasonable fishing opportunities. The plan must include active stakeholder input and include an outreach strategy sufficient to keep conservation and angler interests well informed of proposed changes in advance of annual fishing seasons. The plan must be reported to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(27) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to assist local jurisdictions in responding to cougar related public safety issues. The funding is available to a local jurisdiction if they have a signed agreement with the department that recognizes cougar management authority is vested in the department and provides criteria to determine if a cougar creates an actionable public safety risk eligible for financial assistance. For the purposes of this subsection, a cougar presence on private property alone does not create an actionable public safety risk.

(28) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to complete the final phase of the Cowlitz river salmon and steelhead hook mortality study. No less than $60,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided for the original contractor of the study to complete their work. A final report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309. FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$5,553,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$5,456,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,689,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,433,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$855,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$25,986,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By October 15, 2022, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor and appropriate legislative fiscal committees a single, prioritized list of state agency 2023-2025 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound recovery and restoration.

(2) $304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Puget Sound partnership to develop and implement an action plan that advances diversity, equity, and inclusion and environmental justice in Puget Sound recovery efforts.

(3) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided to the Puget Sound partnership to perform coordination and monitoring related to Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery.

(4) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided to the Puget Sound partnership to implement shipping noise-reduction initiatives and monitoring programs in the Puget Sound, in coordination with Canadian and United States authorities. The partnership must contract with Washington Maritime Blue in order to establish and administer the quiet sound program to better understand and reduce the cumulative effects of acoustic and physical disturbance from large commercial vessels on southern resident orcas throughout their range in Washington state. Washington Maritime Blue will support a quiet sound advisory committee that should include relevant federal and state agencies, ports, industry, research institutions, and nongovernmental organizations and consult early and often with relevant federally recognized tribes.

(5) $393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $295,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force recommendations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$128,682,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$146,685,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$42,660,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,161,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$53,563,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,993,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,092,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,311,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$127,040,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,077,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,063,000

Contract Harvesting Revolving Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$186,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,124,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$403,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$46,000

Forest Fire Protection Assessment Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$191,000

State Forest Nursery Revolving Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Access Road Revolving Nonappropriated Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$233,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,951,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$891,000

Forest Health Revolving Nonappropriated Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$240,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$21,285,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$767,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,986,000

Community Forest Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$52,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,114,000

Natural Resources Federal Lands Revolving

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$588,887,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,523,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(2) $20,668,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $20,668,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $16,050,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for emergency response, including fire suppression. The department shall provide a monthly report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature with an update of fire suppression costs incurred and the number and type of wildfires suppressed. The amounts provided in this subsection may not be used to fund the department's indirect and administrative expenses. The department's indirect and administrative costs shall be allocated among its remaining accounts and appropriations.

(3) $5,500,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $500,000 is contingent upon receipts under RCW 82.04.261 exceeding eight million dollars per biennium. If receipts under RCW 82.04.261 are more than eight million dollars but less than eight million five hundred thousand dollars for the biennium, an amount equivalent to the difference between actual receipts and eight million five hundred thousand dollars shall lapse.

(4) Consistent with the recommendations of the Wildfire Suppression Funding and Costs (18-02) report of the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022, describing the previous fire season. At a minimum, the report shall provide information for each wildfire in the state, including its location, impact by type of land ownership, the extent it involved timber or range lands, cause, size, costs, and cost-share with federal agencies and nonstate partners. The report must also be posted on the agency's website.

(5) $4,206,000 of the aquatic land enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the removal of creosote pilings and debris from the marine environment and to continue monitoring zooplankton and eelgrass beds on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department. Actions will address recommendations to recover the southern resident orca population and to monitor ocean acidification as well as help implement the Puget Sound action agenda.

(6) $448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $448,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with the Olympic natural resources center to study emerging ecosystem threats such as Swiss needlecast disease, conduct field trials for long-term ecosystem productivity and T3 watershed experiments, and engage stakeholders through learning-based collaboration. The department may retain up to $30,000 in one fiscal year to conduct Swiss needlecast surveys.

(7) $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for compensation to the trust beneficiaries and department for lost revenue from leases to amateur radio operators who use space on the department managed radio towers for their equipment. The department is authorized to lease sites at the rate of up to one hundred dollars per year, per site, per lessee. The legislature makes this appropriation to fulfill the remaining costs of the leases at market rate per RCW 79.13.510.

(8) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to increase technical assistance to small forestland owners.

(9) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to review its burn permit fee schedule, and to develop options and recommendations on changes to the fee schedule to meet the requirement in RCW 70A.15.5020. The agency must report on options and recommendations to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2021.

(10) $569,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement recommendations in the aerial herbicides in forestlands report submitted to the legislature in December 2019 from the aerial herbicide application working group. Specific work will include researching alternatives to chemicals for control of unwanted competing vegetation, compliance monitoring of aerial herbicides application, and updating the pesticide board manual.

(11) $925,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $779,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to undertake geologic research to understand the geology and hydrology of the Columbia basin with regard to geothermal and groundwater resources. Funding must also be used for outreach and education to industries and regional communities to increase awareness of underground resources, how to access and use them, and the regulatory processes for doing so.

(12) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $82,000 of the forest development account—state appropriation, $10,000 of the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account—state appropriation, $19,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation, $189,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation, $7,000 of the surface mining reclamation account—state appropriation, $9,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation, $43,000 of the forest fire protection assessment nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $13,000 of the state forest nursery revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $45,000 of the access road revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $26,000 of the forest health revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, and $9,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to move its data center currently located in the natural resources building to the state data center located in the Jefferson building as required by office of the chief information officer policy 184 and RCW 43.105.375. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(13) $466,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $364,000 of the forest development account—state appropriation, $254,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation, $754,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation, $27,000 of the surface mining reclamation account—state appropriation, $186,000 of the contract harvesting revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $148,000 of the forest fire protection assessment nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $62,000 of the state forest nursery revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $188,000 of the access road revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, $214,000 of the forest health revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation, and $16,000 of the natural resources federal lands revolving nonappropriated account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to replace the NaturE revenue and leasing administration system and integrate with the new One Washington financial system. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(14)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to maintain existing administrative facility infrastructure operated by the six regions of the department.

(b) The department's allocation of this appropriation and existing expenditure authority in certain other funds will be spread equitably across agency funds based on a model of positions by program or activity that utilize existing facility spaces within the agency's operating regions. The remaining costs at each site will remain the burden of existing management fund distribution. Department allocation of funds in this appropriation will be trackable by region and by project code.

(c) This appropriation is provided solely for the maintenance of existing administrative infrastructure, inclusive of ordinary maintenance, preventive maintenance, and maintenance services and inspections, minor repairs, system component replacement, and the delivery of utility and facility services.

(d) The department must provide a comparison of quarterly agency allotments and expenditures relating to this subsection, including a summary of the maintenance work for all regional facilities subject to this section to the office of financial management beginning in October 2021.

(15) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement a pilot project to evaluate the costs and benefits of marketing and selling specialty forest products including cedar salvage, alder, and other hardwood products. The pilot project must include: Identifying suitable areas for hardwood or cedar sales within the administrative areas of the Olympic and Pacific Cascade regions, preparing and conducting sales, and evaluating the costs and benefits from conducting the sales.

(a) The pilot project must include an evaluation that:

(i) Determines if revenues from the sales are sufficient to cover the costs of preparing and conducting the sales;

(ii) Identifies and evaluates factors impacting the sales, including regulatory constraints, staffing levels, or other limitations;

(iii) Compares the specialty sales to other timber sales that combine the sale of cedar and hardwoods with other species;

(iv) Evaluates the bidder pool for the pilot sales and other factors that impact the costs and revenues received from the sales; and

(v) Evaluates the current and future prices and market trends for cedar salvage and hardwood species.

(b) The department must work with affected stakeholders and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the results of the pilot project and make recommendation for any changes to statute by June 30, 2023.

(16) $112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5158 (utility wildland fire cmte.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $407,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to complete development of a programmatic safe harbor agreement, and the associated environmental analysis and draft enrollment language for inclusion in the forest practices rules. Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department must provide $182,000 to the department of fish and wildlife to assist in the development of the programmatic safe harbor agreement. The department must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2021, on the status of the rule making and the resources needed to implement the rule effective October 1, 2022.

(18) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department on behalf of the forest practices board must provide an update to the natural resource policy committees of the legislature on the progress of its projects, including progress made to address recommendations from the 2021 state auditor's report on the adaptive management program, by December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022.

(19) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to grant to local law enforcement agencies to assist in enforcing vessel registration laws. Funding is also provided for a pilot recycling project with a nonprofit maritime education center that has the capacity to coordinate with a local port and local businesses that can accommodate vessel waste material.

(20) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department, acting in its capacity as the agency responsible for implementing Washington state's section 10 permit under the endangered species act for aquatic species, and for ensuring maintenance of clean water act assurances granted by the department of ecology, must report to the legislature by no later than June 30, 2022, on the status of forest practices board activities related to: (a) Permanent water typing rulemaking and associated board manual development and (b) rulemaking and associated board manual development regarding the protection of type N streams.

(21) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department, in collaboration with motorized and nonmotorized outdoor recreation stakeholders, must submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations for the use of NOVA account appropriations, by September 30, 2022.

(22) $2,268,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force recommendations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (pollinator health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $34,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $8,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5452 (electric-assisted bicycles). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $1,765,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for the department to:

(a) Replace the statewide forest practices permit database system. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act; and

(b) Provide a recommendation for ways that the forest products industry could help cover the cost of the new forest practice online system. The recommendation must include proposed changes to the fees that are paid for forest practice applications and notifications, as well as a description and table that illustrates the operating costs of the program and how those costs are covered by fund source including fee revenue. The recommendation must be reported to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, and may be included as a decision package to the office of financial management for consideration in the governor's proposed 2022 supplemental operating budget.

(26) $53,217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $71,782,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement the provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1168 (long-term forest health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department to reimburse Clark county for costs associated with providing shelter to displaced livestock from 2020 wildfires.

(28) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement a pilot project to evaluate the costs and benefits of entering into such stewardship agreements with individual neighboring landowners who would take on the responsibility for protecting small segments of shared boundary with department managed lands. The pilot project must include identifying the legal limits and bounds of such stewardship agreements, identifying suitable areas, preparing and entering into shared stewardship agreements, and evaluating the costs and benefits of these agreements.

(a) The pilot project evaluation must include:

(i) A determination of an appropriate mechanism for the sale of valuable materials from state trust lands harvested under a stewardship agreement;

(ii) Identification of regulatory constraints, staffing levels necessary to administer a statewide program, and other limitations; and

(iii) Identification of legal risk and insurance and indemnification requirements that may be necessary on the part of private individuals entering into these agreements.

(b) The pilot project must include agreements on at least the Teanaway or Klickitat Community Forests and on state trust lands in the vicinity of the town of Darrington, Washington. The department of natural resources must work with affected stakeholders and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the results of the pilot project and any recommendations for changes and statewide implementation by July 1, 2023.

(29) $134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $134,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to grant non-tribal outcome-based performance participation grants for implementation of the forest practices adaptive management program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $54,000 per fiscal year is provided for grants to the Washington farm forestry association and $80,000 per fiscal year is provided for grants to the Washington state association of counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$24,532,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$24,047,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$48,365,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$193,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,670,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$73,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,034,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$621,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$627,000

Northeast Washington Wolf-Livestock Management

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$952,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$110,114,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,108,445 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $6,102,905 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementing the emergency food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(2) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to continue a shellfish coordinator position. The shellfish coordinator assists the industry with complying with regulatory requirements and will work with regulatory agencies to identify ways to streamline and make more transparent the permit process for establishing and maintaining shellfish operations.

(3) $194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $194,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,134,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing an Asian giant hornet eradication program.

(4) $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $169,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5045 (meat & poultry inspection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $952,000 of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct the following:

(a) Fund the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020, at $432,000 for fiscal year 2022 and fiscal year 2023. Funds from the grant program must be used only for the deployment of nonlethal deterrence, specifically with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves by deploying proactive, preventative methods that have a good probability of producing effective results. Grant proposals will be assessed partially on this intent. Grantees who use funds for range riders or herd monitoring must deploy this tool in a manner so that targeted areas with cattle are visited daily or near daily. Grantees must collaborate with other entities providing prevention efforts resulting in coordinated wolf-livestock conflict deterrence efforts, both temporally and spatially, therefore providing well-timed and placed preventative coverage on the landscape. The department retains the final decision-making authority over disbursement of funds. Annual reports from grantees will be assessed for how well grant objectives were met and used to decide whether future grant funds will be awarded to past grantees.

(b) Contract with the northeast Washington wolf-cattle collaborative, a nonprofit organization, for $320,000 for fiscal year 2022 and fiscal year 2023 for range riders to conduct proactive deterrence activities with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves. The contract must provide that the organization share all relevant information with the department of fish and wildlife in a timely manner to aid in wolf management decisions. Additionally, range riders must document their activities with geo-referenced photo points and provide written description of their efforts to the department of fish and wildlife by December 31, 2021, and December 31, 2022. Work is to be conducted solely on United States forest service grazing allotments and adjoining private lands in the Kettle mountains in Ferry county. This includes an area from the northern boundary of the Colville Confederated Tribes reservation, west of the Columbia river north to state route 20, and then west of United States route 395 to the Canadian border, and from the northern boundary of the Colville Confederated Tribes reservation east of state highway 21 to the Canadian border. Also included are federal grazing allotments and adjoining private lands in the Vulcan mountain area, an area which is north of the Kettle river where it enters the United States at Midway, British Columbia and leaves the United States near Danville, Washington.

(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must provide $120,000 in fiscal year 2022 and $80,000 in fiscal year 2023 to the sheriffs offices of Ferry and Stevens counties for providing a local wildlife specialist to aid the department of fish and wildlife in the management of wolves in northeast Washington.

(6) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to support the farm to food pantry initiative. A portion of these funds will be dedicated for procurement from minority and disadvantaged farmers, including veterans, women, tribes, and farmers of color. The department may retain up to five percent of these funds each year for administration, operations, and compliance oversight.

(7) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $12,506,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the department to fill gaps in the emergency food system through direct purchase of supplies, food and associated food processing costs, prioritizing Washington-grown as available, and for the provision of discretionary grants to hunger relief organizations to respond to emerging opportunities and targeted community needs, especially in communities of color and tribal communities. The department may retain up to five percent of these funds each year for administration, operations, and compliance oversight.

(8) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the department to implement the emergency food assistance program. The department may retain up to five percent of these funds each year for administration, operations, and compliance oversight.

(9) $1,400,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for research grants to assist with development of an integrated pest management plan to find a suitable replacement for imidacloprid to address burrowing shrimp in Willapa bay and Grays harbor and facilitate continued shellfish cultivation on tidelands. In selecting research grant recipients for this purpose, the department must incorporate the advice of the Willapa-Grays harbor working group formed from the settlement agreement with the department of ecology signed on October 15, 2019. Up to eight percent of the total amount provided may be used by the departments of agriculture, commerce, ecology, and natural resources to cover overhead expenses relating to their continued participation in the working group for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(10) $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force recommendations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (pollinator health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $2,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, not to exceed the amount appropriated in section 11, chapter 3, Laws of 2021, that were unobligated at the end of fiscal year 2021, is provided solely to assist hunger relief organizations to achieve food security and is subject to the same terms and conditions as the appropriation in section 11, chapter 3, Laws of 2021.

(End of part)

PART IV

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,861,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,583,000

Architects' License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,380,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,188,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,107,000

Real Estate Education Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$276,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,818,000

Business and Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$24,801,000

Real Estate Research Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$415,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$74,000

Landscape Architects' License Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Appraisal Management Company Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$256,000

Concealed Pistol License Renewal Notification

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$140,000

Geologists' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$149,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,000

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
($4,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$51,157,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Appropriations provided for the business and technology modernization project in this section are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(2) $140,000 of the concealed pistol license renewal notification account—state appropriation and $74,000 of the firearms range account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (concealed pistol license).

(3) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation, $13,000 of the architects' license account—state appropriation, $121,000 of the real estate commission account—state appropriation, $22,000 of the uniform commercial code account—state appropriation, $16,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account—state appropriation, and $227,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to redesign and improve its online services and website, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(4) The department shall inventory all business and professions fees and associated accounts including identification of all fees paid into each account, the amount and timing of the last fee increase, the estimated expenditures necessary to administer each fee based program, and the projected fee changes necessary to ensure positive account balances for each business and professions program account. The projection should include the period beginning with the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium through the 2025-2027 biennium. A report to the governor and legislature is due December 1, 2021.

(5) $157,000 of the uniform commercial code account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5355 (wage liens). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $267,000 of the real estate commission account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5378 (real estate broker renewal). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $808,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $551,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the continued implementation of the legacy firearms system until the modernization project is completed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$58,457,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$58,346,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,707,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,091,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,906,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,533,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,637,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,000,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,297,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$567,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,617,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,413,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,434,000

Washington Internet Crimes Against Children Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$190,255,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(2) $2,421,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,425,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state patrol to partner with multi-jurisdictional drug and gang task forces to detect, deter, and dismantle criminal organizations involved in criminal activity including diversion of marijuana from the legalized market and the illicit production and distribution of marijuana and marijuana-related products in Washington state.

(3) $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for addressing a backlog of toxicology tests in the toxicology laboratory.

(4) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $298,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriations are provided solely for increased supply and maintenance costs for the crime laboratory division and toxicology laboratory division.

(5) $510,000 of the county criminal justice assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to support local police, sheriffs' departments, and multiagency task forces in the prosecution of criminals. However, the office of financial management must reduce the allotment of the amount provided in this subsection if allotment of the full appropriation will put the account into deficit.

(6)(a) $700,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(b) The joint apprenticeship training committee shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022, describing how the funding appropriated in this section was spent during the biennium. At a minimum, the report shall include information about the number of individuals that completed the training, the level of training or type of training being taught, the total cost of training everyone through completion, the percentage of passage rate for trainees, and the geographic location of the fire department sponsoring the trainee.

(7) $316,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 and $1,000,000 of the Washington internet crimes against children account—state appropriation are provided solely for the missing and exploited children's task force within the patrol to help prevent possible abuse to children and other vulnerable citizens from sexual abuse.

(8) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5055 (law enforcement grievances), which changes methods for selecting an arbitrator for labor disputes involving law enforcement disciplinary matters. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $1,334,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for facility and staff costs associated with construction of a second toxicology laboratory facility in Federal Way. The Washington state patrol must provide a report on the progress of the toxicology lab construction semiannually to the fiscal committees of the legislature with a final report due 90 days after completion of the project. The report must include, but is not limited to:

(a) A detailed list of expenditures so far;

(b) A detailed list of expenditure yet to be made before the completion of the project;

(c) An updated project timeline with expected end date; and

(d) Other project details that the Washington state patrol finds important to relay.

(10) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to outsource death investigation cases to reduce the current backlog of cases awaiting toxicology testing.

(End of part)

PART V

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$29,067,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$29,000,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$105,917,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,060,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$265,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$520,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$533,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$213,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,812,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief

III—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,631,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$182,018,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) BASE OPERATIONS AND EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE

(a) $13,514,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $13,521,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(i) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(ii) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school, using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the superintendent.

(iii) By October 31st of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in section 501, chapter 415, Laws of 2019 and sections 513 and 520 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(iv) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the secretary of state, shall update the program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.

(v) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (A) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (B) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(vi) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide statewide oversight and coordination to the regional nursing corps program supported through the educational service districts.

(b) $1,217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for maintenance of the apportionment system, including technical staff and the data governance working group.

(c) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(d) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(e) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(f) $266,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(g) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education shall adopt a rule that the minimum number of students to be used for public reporting and federal accountability purposes is ten.

(h) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(i) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178, Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).

(j) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 242, Laws of 2013 (state-tribal education compacts).

(k) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $210,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform on-going program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(l) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (computer science).

(m) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators).

(n) $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government. The professional development must be done in collaboration with school district administrators and school directors. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the office, the Washington state school directors' association government-to-government task force, and the association of educational service districts to collaborate with the tribal leaders congress on education to develop a tribal consultation training and schedule. The tribal consultation training and schedule must be developed by January 1, 2022.

(o) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.

(p) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state.

(q) $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(r) Districts shall report to the office the results of each collective bargaining agreement for certificated staff within their district using a uniform template as required by the superintendent, within thirty days of finalizing contracts. The data must include but is not limited to: Minimum and maximum base salaries, supplemental salary information, and average percent increase for all certificated instructional staff. Within existing resources by December 1st of each year, the office shall produce a report for the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee summarizing the district level collective bargaining agreement data.

(s) $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $249,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the development and implementation of a language access technical assistance program for school districts and to reconvene the work group created in chapter 256, Laws of 2019. The activities of and resources provided by the language access technical assistance program must align with the recommendations in the October 2020 report from the language access work group in order to improve awareness and fulfillment of language access rights for families in educational settings. The workgroup under this subsection shall, by December 1, 2021, report to the appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations for standards, training, testing, and credentialing for spoken and sign language interpreters for students' families and for collecting information related to language access services in schools and school districts. The report shall include, at a minimum, information regarding the different languages in which students and students' families prefer to communicate by each school district.

(t) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to provide statewide coordination towards multicultural, culturally responsive, and anti-racist education to support academically, socially, and culturally literate learners. The office must meaningfully engage community members and key stakeholders to develop a clear definition and framework for African American studies to guide instruction in grades seven through twelve, develop a plan for aligning African American studies across all content areas, and identify professional development opportunities for educators and administrators to build capacity in creating high-quality learning environments centered in belonging and racial equity, anti-racist approaches, and asset-based methodologies that pull from all students' cultural funds of knowledge.

(u) $4,631,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the office to update the apportionment and accounting systems and to oversee grant administration. The office shall contract with an organization which specializes in developing tools to combine internal and external data sets and provide data analytics and visualizations and custom workflows to match existing data processes, without requiring data science or technical expertise by the end user to provide accurate reporting and accountability regarding use of federal emergency relief funds. The organization must have demonstrated experience providing such tools to state education agencies in the past five years. The contract must provide access to the developed tools to the state education agency, selected educational service districts, and up to five local education agencies.

(2) DATA SYSTEMS

(a) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(b) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(c) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.

(3) WORK GROUPS

(a) $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 206, Laws of 2018 (career and college readiness).

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act).

(c) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 75, Laws of 2018 (dyslexia).

(d) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 386, Laws of 2019 (social emotional learning).

(e) $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to support the children and youth behavioral health work group created in chapter 130, Laws of 2020 (child. mental health wk. grp).

(f) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to complete a report with options and recommendations for administrative efficiencies and long-term strategies that align and integrate high-quality early learning programs administered by both agencies. The report, due September 1, 2022, shall address capital needs, data collection and data sharing, licensing changes, quality standards, options for community-based and school-based settings, fiscal modeling, any statutory changes needed to achieve administrative efficiencies.

(g) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to convene a K-12 basic education compensation advisory committee to develop recommendations to the governor and the legislature that supports recruiting and retaining a multicultural and multilingual educator workforce.

(i) Recommendations must include but are not limited to:

(A) Compensation updates to K-12 basic education salaries based on a comparable wage data analysis;

(B) Updates to regionalization data, including consideration of a hedonic wage model and other improvements to better reflect regional differences, address differences in recruiting and retention, incorporate data from neighboring communities in other states where appropriate, and mitigate boundary effects of regionalization policies;

(C) Adjustments to inflationary factors used in state budgeting if the inflation documented through the comparable wage analysis is significantly different than the inflation that had been funded in state budgets since the last comparable wage analysis;

(D) Analysis of workforce needs, including identification of hard to recruit/retain positions and strategies to address those workforce needs;

(E) Compensation adjustments to promote equity considerations, which could include additional compensation to attract and retain educators in school districts with fewer resources from combined state and local dollars per student, adjustments to institutional education compensation, and additional compensation tied to complex need factors of schools; and

(F) Additional compensation targeted to recruit and retain a more diverse workforce and to recognize the additional work of educators who serve on multiple committees and assume mentoring responsibilities to support new educators and students.

(ii) The advisory committee shall consist of:

(A) The superintendent of public instruction, or their designee to serve as chair of the committee; and

(B) Twelve members, appointed by the superintendent, after consulting with the state ethnic commissions, who represent African American, Hispanic American, Asian American, and Pacific Islander American populations, comprised of representatives from organizations that represent the following groups:

(I) One representing school administrators;

(II) One representing school business officials;

(III) One representing school district human resources professionals;

(IV) Three representing teachers and educational staff associates;

(V) Three representing classified staff;

(VI) One representing parents;

(VII) One representing students; and

(VIII) A representative of federally recognized Indian tribes whose traditional lands and territories lie within the borders of Washington state, designated by the federally recognized tribes.

(4) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS

(a) $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080.

(b) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (educational opportunity gap).

(c) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (biliteracy seal).

(e)(i) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for school bullying and harassment prevention activities.

(ii) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2016 (school safety).

(iii) $570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide support and coordination for the regional network of behavioral health, school safety, and threat assessment established in chapter 333, Laws of 2019 (school safety and well-being). Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (4)(e)(iii), $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for grants to schools or school districts for planning and integrating tiered suicide prevention and behavioral health supports. Grants must be awarded first to districts demonstrating the greatest need and readiness. Grants may be used for intensive technical assistance and training, professional development, and evidence-based suicide prevention training.

(iv) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(A) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iv), $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a school safety program to provide school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety.

(B) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iv), $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for administration of the school safety center. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training, and maintain a school safety information web site.

(f)(i) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for youth suicide prevention activities.

(ii) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 64, Laws of 2018 (sexual abuse of students).

(g)(i) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $1,060,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. Students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, $530,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, and $530,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the building bridges statewide program.

(ii) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090.

(iii) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2017 (truancy reduction efforts).

(h) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a process and provide assistance to school districts in planning for future implementation of the summer knowledge improvement program grants.

(i) $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 221, Laws of 2019 (CTE course equivalencies).

(j) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 252, Laws of 2019 (high school graduation reqs.).

(k) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for title II SEA state-level activities to implement section 103, chapter 295, Laws of 2019 relating to the regional recruiters program.

(l) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a tribal liaison at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to facilitate access to and support enrollment in career connected learning opportunities for tribal students, including career awareness and exploration, career preparation, and career launch programs, as defined in RCW 28C.30.020, so that tribal students may receive high school or college credit to the maximum extent possible.

(m) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 288, Laws of 2020 (school meals at no cost).

(n) $269,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 353, Laws of 2020 (innovative learning pilot).

(o) $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (school counseling programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(p) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5044 (schools/equity training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(q) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5202 (school depreciation subfunds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(r) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (child care & early dev. exp.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) CAREER CONNECTED LEARNING

(a) $850,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for expanding career connected learning as provided in RCW 28C.30.020.

(b) $960,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for increasing the funding per full-time equivalent for career launch programs as described in RCW 28A.700.130. In the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, for career launch enrollment exceeding the funding provided in this subsection, funding is provided in section 503 of this act.

(c)(i) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for regional apprenticeship pathways programs.

(ii) Of the amount provided in this subsection (5)(c), $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Federal Way school district to establish pre-apprenticeship pathways and career connected learning programs in the skilled trades in Federal Way and $1,500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Marysville school district to collaborate with Arlington school district, Everett Community College, other local school districts, local labor unions, local Washington state apprenticeship and training council registered apprenticeship programs, and local industry groups to continue the regional apprenticeship pathways program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,501,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,503,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$322,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,326,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to the state board of education for the following: Continuation of the mastery-based learning work group (chapter 252, Laws of 2019), expansion of ongoing pathways research, and rule making.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. FOR THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$16,627,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$19,173,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$35,800,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,638,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,638,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board including implementation of chapter 172, Laws of 2017 (educator prep. data/PESB).

(2)(a) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants to improve preservice teacher training and funding of alternate routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (2), up to $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and up to $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs.

(3) $622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided for the recruiting Washington teachers program with priority given to programs that support bilingual teachers, teachers from populations that are underrepresented, and English language learners. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3), $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation and expansion of the bilingual educator initiative pilot project established under RCW 28A.180.120.

(4) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply).

(5) $13,499,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $16,076,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators). Funding in this subsection is for grants to reimburse school districts that provide two days of training in the paraeducator certificate program during 2020-21 and the 2021-22 school years.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to develop an online course to train educators on effective community, family, and student engagement.

(6) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to develop standards for two specialty endorsements in computer science, one in elementary computer science and one in secondary computer science. The professional educator standards board shall consult with the superintendent of public instruction to confirm that the specialty endorsements reflect the appropriate content necessary to teach computer science in the classroom, as defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction with industry input. The computer science specialty endorsements must be available to all certificated teachers who hold a valid license and who demonstrate sufficient content knowledge in computer science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$10,205,206,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$9,513,283,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,198,115,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief

III—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$9,700,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$20,926,304,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 504 and 505 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.

(c) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 503 and 504, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(e)(i) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the agency rules defining a full-time equivalent student with the increase in the minimum instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220, as amended by the legislature in 2014.

(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.

(g) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, school districts must report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the monthly actual average district-wide class size across each grade level of kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade classes. The superintendent of public instruction shall report this information to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30th of each year.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school, including those at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

Grade K

17.00

17.00

Grade 1

17.00

17.00

Grade 2

17.00

17.00

Grade 3

17.00

17.00

Grade 4

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 20.0.

(ii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(iii) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii)(A) For the twenty schools with the lowest overall school score for all students in the 2018-19 school year, as determined by the Washington school improvement framework among elementary schools, middle schools, and other schools not serving students up to twelfth grade, having enrollments greater than one hundred fifty students, in addition to the allocation under (d)(i) of this subsection the superintendent shall allocate additional funding for guidance counselors for each level of prototypical school in the 2021-22 school year as follows:

Elementary

Middle

Guidance counselors

0.307

0.512

To receive additional allocations under this subsection (2)(d)(ii)(A), a school eligible to receive the allocation must have demonstrated actual staffing for guidance counselors for its prototypical school level that meets or exceeds the staffing for guidance counselors in (d)(i) of this subsection and this subsection (2)(d)(ii)(A) for its prototypical school level. School districts must distribute the additional guidance counselors allocation in this subsection to the schools that generate the allocation. The enhancement within this subsection is not part of the state's program of basic education.

(B) For qualifying high-poverty elementary schools in the 2022-23 school year, at which more than 50 percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, in addition to the allocation under (d)(i) of this subsection, the superintendent shall allocate additional funding for guidance counselors for each level of prototypical school as follows:

Elementary

Guidance counselors

0.500

(C) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

Career and Technical Education

3.07

3.07

Skill Center

3.41

3.41

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

1.253

Middle School

1.353

High School

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors:

Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.48 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 12.52 percent in the 2021-22 school year and 12.54 percent in the 2022-23 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.86 percent in the 2021-22 school year and 17.87 percent in the 2022-23 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 22.71 percent in the 2021-22 school year and 22.71 percent in the 2022-23 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 22.75 percent in the 2021-22 school year and 22.75 percent in the 2022-23 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the rates specified in section 506 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows: Except for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts, the number of calculated benefit units determined below. Calculated benefit units are staff units multiplied by the benefit allocation factors established in the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 942 of this act. These factors are intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent employees may be calculated on the basis of 630 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent. The number of benefit units is determined as follows:

(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.02; and

(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.43.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a)(i) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

Technology

$140.84

$143.10

Utilities and Insurance

$382.70

$388.82

Curriculum and Textbooks

$151.22

$153.64

Other Supplies

$299.50

$304.29

Library Materials

$21.54

$21.89

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$23.39

$23.76

Facilities Maintenance

$189.59

$192.62

Security and Central Office

$131.35

$133.45

TOTAL MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$1,340.13

$1,361.57

(ii) For the 2021-22 school year and 2022-23 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (A) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii) exceeds (B) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,585.55 for the 2021-22 school year and $1,610.92 for the 2022-23 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,585.55 for the 2021-22 school year and $1,610.92 for the 2022-23 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at the following rate:

MSOC Component

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

Technology

$40.50

$41.15

Curriculum and Textbooks

$44.18

$44.89

Other Supplies

$86.06

$87.43

Library Materials

$5.99

$6.09

Instructional Professional Development for Certified

and Classified Staff

$7.36

$7.48

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$184.09

$187.04

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

Funding in this section is sufficient to fund all day kindergarten programs in all schools in the 2021-22 school year and 2022-23 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315.

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (13) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2022 and 2023 as follows:

(a) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.2 FTE enrollment for career launch students pursuant to RCW 28A.700.130. Expenditures for this purpose must come first from the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act; funding for career launch enrollment exceeding those appropriations is provided in this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022. The report must include the total FTE enrollment for career launch students, the FTE enrollment for career launch students that exceeded the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act, and the amount expended from this section for those students.

(18) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.

(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (13) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(21) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. For the 2021-2023 biennium, general apportionment payments are not reduced for school districts receiving federal forest revenues.

(22)(a) $9,700,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the bridge year pilot program established in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5265 (bridge year pilot program) for the purpose of addressing learning loss pursuant to section 2001(1)(f)(1), American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined full time equivalent experience of students participating in the bridge year pilot program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.

(23) $197,929,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to ensure that school districts receive at least $1,500 per pupil for COVID-19 relief funding when combined with federal relief dollars. These funds are one-time allocations to school districts and may be used according to the allowable uses defined in section 2001(2)(e) of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. Prior to receiving funds, a school district must submit an academic and student well-being recovery plan to the office of the superintendent of public instruction as required in section 12(3), chapter 3, Laws of 2021, and must also report progress on implementing the plan in a manner identified by the superintendent.

(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must calculate a relief per pupil amount for each district defined as: The quotient from dividing the total funding allocated to each district from the federal relief funds, as defined in (b) of this subsection, by a school district's total enrollment as defined in (c) of this subsection. A school district with a relief per pupil amount less than $1,500 shall receive the difference between $1,500 and the relief per pupil amount, multiplied by the school district's total enrollment.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, federal relief funds allocated to school districts include:

(i) Subgrants authorized under section 18003, the coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act, P.L. 116-136;

(ii) Subgrants authorized under section 313, the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260; and

(iii) Subgrants authorized under section 2001, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection, a school district's total enrollment means the district's 2019-20 school year annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment, excluding full-time equivalent student enrollments for which funds are separately calculated and allocated under RCW 28A.232.020, 28A.600.310(4), 28A.245.020, and 28A.175.110.

(d) For the purposes of this subsection, this subsection applies to state-tribal compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW.

(e) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $8,439,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide a one-time payment to each skill center established under chapter 28A.245 RCW equal to that skill center's 2019-20 school year annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment multiplied by $1,500.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 504 of this act: For the 2021-22 school year and the 2022-23 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.

Statewide Minimum Salary Allocation

Staff Type

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

Certificated Instructional

$68,937

$70,040

Certificated Administrative

$102,327

$103,964

Classified

$49,453

$50,244

(2) For the purposes of this section, "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on February 1, 2021, at 5:17 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 22.07 percent for school year 2021-22 and 22.07 percent for school year 2022-23 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.25 percent for school year 2021-22 and 19.25 percent for the 2022-23 school year for classified staff.

(4) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$102,002,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$310,111,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$412,113,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The salary increases provided in this section are 2.0 percent for the 2021-22 school year, and 1.6 percent for the 2022-23 school year, the annual inflationary adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.

(2)(a) In addition to salary allocations, the appropriations in this section include funding for professional learning as defined in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434. Funding for this purpose is calculated as the equivalent of three days of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(b) Of the funding provided for professional learning in this section, the equivalent of one day of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in school year 2022-23 must be used to train school district staff on racial literacy, ethnic studies, cultural responsiveness, and stereotype threat for purposes of closing persistent opportunity gaps.

(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 22.07 percent for the 2021-22 school year and 22.07 percent for the 2022-23 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.25 percent for the 2021-22 school year and 19.25 percent for the 2022-23 school year for classified staff.

(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 504, 505, and 506 of this act.

(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(4) The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 942 of this act and reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates as follows: For the 2021-22 school year, $968 per month and for the 2022-23 school year, $1,032 per month.

(5) When bargaining for funding for school employees health benefits for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, any proposal agreed upon must assume the imposition of a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(6) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$640,514,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$649,872,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,290,386,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 506, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.

(4) A maximum of $939,000 of this fiscal year 2022 appropriation and a maximum of $939,000 of the fiscal year 2023 appropriation may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(5) Subject to available funds under this section, school districts may provide student transportation for summer skills center programs.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(8) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW 28A.305.141.

(9) $58,613,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5128 (student transportation funds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—SCHOOL FOOD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$7,230,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$7,230,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$551,378,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$565,838,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $14,200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) is provided solely for school meal programs, as authorized in section 722, the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,450,154,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,519,337,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$567,113,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,694,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief

III—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,615,298,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 504 and 506 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 504 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 507, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 13.5 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) $63,338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $82,671,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $29,574,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, and $48,720,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (education).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $931,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $214,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(12) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support professional development in inclusionary practices for classroom teachers. The primary form of support to public school classroom teachers must be for mentors who are experts in best practices for inclusive education, differentiated instruction, and individualized instruction. Funding for mentors must be prioritized to the public schools with the highest percentage of students with individualized education programs aged three through 21 who spend the least amount of time in general education classrooms.

(13) $24,000,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide an allocation to school districts for extension of transition services for students with disabilities who turned age 21 during the 2019-20 or 2020-21 school years, did not graduate with a regular diploma, and require recovery services on or after July 1, 2021, as determined by the individualized education program team. The funds in this subsection are for the purpose of addressing learning loss pursuant to section 2001(1)(f)(1), American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. The allocation shall be based on a per student amount to be determined by the superintendent. If total requests for these funds exceed the amount appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent shall prorate requests so that each district receives a proportionate share of their original request. The extension of these services does not reduce nor supplant any other services the individual would be eligible to receive as determined by the individualized education program team.

(14) $4,279,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for providing preschool services to qualifying special education students under section 619 of the federal individuals with disabilities education act, pursuant to section 2002, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must expend all available federal funds for this purpose before expending state funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$21,053,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$21,053,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$42,106,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) Funding in this section is provided for regional professional development related to English language arts curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(4) Funding in this section is provided for regional technical support for the K-20 telecommunications network to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(5) Funding in this section is provided for a corps of nurses located at the educational service districts, to be dispatched in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(6) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide a network of support for school districts to develop and implement comprehensive suicide prevention and behavioral health supports for students.

(7) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide assistance to school districts with comprehensive safe schools planning, conducting needs assessments, school safety and security trainings, coordinating appropriate crisis and emergency response and recovery, and developing threat assessment and crisis intervention teams.

(8) Funding in this section is provided for regional English language arts coordinators to provide professional development of teachers and principals around the new early screening for dyslexia requirements.

(9) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$271,870,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$247,305,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$519,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$16,424,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$17,373,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$33,797,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) $2,443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,470,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to increase the capacity of institutional education programs to differentiate instruction to meet students' unique educational needs. Those needs may include but are not limited to one-on-one instruction, enhanced access to counseling for social emotional needs of the student, and services to identify the proper level of instruction at the time of student entry into the facility.

(7) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to support three student records coordinators to manage the transmission of academic records for each of the long-term juvenile institutions. One coordinator is provided for each of the following: The Issaquah school district for the Echo Glen children's center, the Chehalis school district for Green Hill academic school, and the Naselle-Grays River Valley school district for Naselle youth camp school.

(8) Ten percent of the funds allocated for the institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$33,262,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$33,711,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$66,973,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 511, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR MISCELLANEOUS—EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,802,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$137,813,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$141,081,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$96,598,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,450,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,638,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$378,580,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ACCOUNTABILITY

(a) $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.

(b) $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013 (K-12 education - failing schools).

(2) EDUCATOR CONTINUUM

(a) $75,374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $78,547,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,705 per teacher in the 2021-22 school year and a bonus of $5,796 per teacher in the 2022-23 school year;

(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;

(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(iv) During the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after fully exhausting all years of candidacy as set by the national board for professional teaching standards are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(b) $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(c) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(d) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(e) $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program (BEST). The program shall prioritize first year educators in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning educator aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new educators to work together; and educator observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

(f) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$228,658,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$233,390,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$102,242,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$564,290,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2021-22 and 2022-23; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2021-22 and 2022-23 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 1.77 percent for school year 2021-22 and 1.76 percent for school year 2022-23.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

(6) $1,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2022 and $1,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$446,816,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$455,435,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$533,481,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,435,732,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2021, to August 31, 2021, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 515, chapter 357, Laws of 2020, as amended.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the prior school year. The prior school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(5) Within existing resources, during the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—PER PUPIL ALLOCATIONS

Statewide Average Allocations

Per Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent Student

Basic Education Program

2021-22

School Year

2022-23

School Year

General Apportionment

$9,414

$9,626

Pupil Transportation

$640

$595

Special Education Programs

$9,841

$10,165

Institutional Education Programs

$20,273

$20,665

Programs for Highly Capable Students

$611

$623

Transitional Bilingual Programs

$1,430

$1,442

Learning Assistance Program

$961

$967

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocations purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.

(2) When adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek legislative approval through the budget request process.

(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.

(4) Appropriations in sections 504 and 506 of this act for insurance benefits under chapter 41.05 RCW are provided solely for the superintendent to allocate to districts for employee health benefits as provided in section 942 of this act. The superintendent may not allocate, and districts may not expend, these amounts for any other purpose beyond those authorized in section 942 of this act.

(5) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 520. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR CHARTER SCHOOLS

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$140,739,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$140,739,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(2) $338,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5128 (student transportation funds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 521. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$23,000

Charter Schools Oversight Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,404,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,427,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation in this section is provided to the superintendent of public instruction solely for the operations of the Washington state charter school commission under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 522. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GRANTS AND PASS THROUGH FUNDING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$64,525,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$36,967,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$990,510,000

Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief

III—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,826,170,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,918,172,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $2,752,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,752,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008, including parts of programs receiving grants that serve students in grades four through six. If equally matched by private donations, $1,075,000 of the 2022 appropriation and $1,075,000 of the 2023 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs in grades four through twelve. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $800,000 of the fiscal year 2022 appropriation and $800,000 of the fiscal year 2023 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(b) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(c) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2022, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2020-21 school year. The 2022 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2021-22 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2023, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2021-22 school year. The 2023 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2022-23 school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(d) $2,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in maritime, construction, aerospace, and advanced manufacturing programs. To be eligible for funding to startup, maintain, or expand programs under (i) through (iii) of this subsection, the skills center and high schools must be selected through a competitive grant process administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the advisory committee established in (vi) of this subsection. The office and the education research and data center shall report annually student participation and long-term outcome data. Within the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs.

(ii) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in construction programs.

(iii) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of core plus programs in maritime programs.

(iv) For (i) through (iii) of this subsection, when the grant demand does not align with the specified allocation, funding may be allocated toward sector areas that meet criteria based on agreement from all industry sector representatives.

(v) $527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to administer, evaluate, and promote programs under (i) through (iii) of this subsection based on industry sector recommendations including contracts with sector specific entities to expand sector specific employer engagement programs, increase work placement opportunities, validate credentials necessary for direct employment, and provide professional development to support schools, teachers, and students. The office may also contract with an entity with experience promoting core plus programming across industry sectors and education providers to expand awareness and adoption of core plus programs.

(vi) The office shall convene and manage an advisory committee of industry sector leadership from the core plus program areas and a representative from a statewide business and manufacturing association to inform the administration and continual improvement of core plus programs, including grant determinations, reviewing data and outcomes, recommending program improvements, and ensuring the use of qualified contractors. The committee will advise the superintendent on appropriate credentials, industry-based competencies, and programs of study for high-demand sectors represented in these program areas.

(2)(a) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for project citizen and we the people: The citizen and the constitution programs sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle and high school students. Of the amounts provided, $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for awarding a travel grant to the winner of the we the people: The citizen and the constitution state competition.

(b) $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 127, Laws of 2018 (civics education). Of the amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b), $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grant programs to school districts to help cover travel costs associated with civics education competitions.

(3)(a) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation of career and technical education course equivalency frameworks authorized under RCW 28A.700.070 for math and science. This may include development of additional equivalency course frameworks, course performance assessments, and professional development for districts implementing the new frameworks.

(b) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure career and technical education courses are aligned with high-demand, high-wage jobs. The superintendent shall verify that the current list of career and technical education courses meets the criteria established in RCW 28A.700.020(2). The superintendent shall remove from the list any career and technical education course that no longer meets such criteria.

(c) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide grants to school districts and educational service districts for science teacher training in the next generation science standards including training in the climate science standards. At a minimum, school districts shall ensure that teachers in one grade level in each elementary, middle, and high school participate in this science training. Of the amount appropriated $1,000,000 is provided solely for community based nonprofits including tribal education organizations to partner with public schools for next generation science standards.

(4) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The superintendent of public instruction shall award grants consistent with RCW 28A.300.410.

(5) $5,895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for demonstration sites to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to chapter 71, Laws of 2016 (foster youth edu. outcomes). The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(a) Of the amount provided in this subsection (5), $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, section 202(10), chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection (5), $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act, section 501(43)(b), chapter 4, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (5), $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the demonstration site established with funding provided in the 2017-2019 omnibus appropriations act, chapter 1, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(6)(a) $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (homeless students).

(b) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for chapter 212, Laws of 2014 (homeless student educational outcomes).

(7) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a nonviolence and ethical leadership training and professional development program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(8) $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for dual language grants to grow capacity for high quality dual language learning. Grant funding may be used for new and existing dual language programs, heritage language programs for immigrant and refugee students, and indigenous language programs for native students. Each grant recipient must convene an advisory board to guide the development and continuous improvement of its dual language program including but not limited to deciding which school and languages will be prioritized, how to conduct outreach to the community, enrollment, hiring of staff etc. At least half the members of the board must be parents of English learner students or current/former English learner students. The other members of the board must represent teachers, students, school leaders, governing board members, youth, and community-based organizations that support English learners.

(9)(a) $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship and Washington higher education readiness program. The funds shall be used to: Support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars; and to identify and reduce barriers to college for low-income and underserved middle and high school students. Of the amounts provided: $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the college success foundation to establish programming in new regions throughout the state. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(b) $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(c) $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 180, Laws of 2017 (Washington Aim program).

(10)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(b)(i) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a statewide information technology academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as information technology certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools for the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years only. The office must evaluate other options that may be available in the state for a future public-private partnership to deliver similar services to students and staff of public schools at no cost to the state.

(ii) The office must require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework. The report must include the number of students served disaggregated by gender, race, ethnicity, and free-and-reduced lunch eligibility as well as the number of industry certificates attained by type of certificate.

(c) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(d)(i) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the computer science and education grant program to support the following three purposes: Train and credential teachers in computer sciences; provide and upgrade technology needed to learn computer science; and, for computer science frontiers grants to introduce students to and engage them in computer science. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use the computer science learning standards adopted pursuant to chapter 3, Laws of 2015 (computer science) in implementing the grant, to the extent possible. Additionally, grants provided for the purpose of introducing students to computer science are intended to support innovative ways to introduce and engage students from historically underrepresented groups, including girls, low-income students, and minority students, to computer science and to inspire them to enter computer science careers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may award up to $500,000 each year, without a matching requirement, to districts with greater than fifty percent of students eligible for free and reduced-price meals. All other awards must be equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.

(ii) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for grants to support teachers with costs associated with becoming certified, endorsed, or licensed in computer science including, but not limited to, professional development, training, licensure exams, courses in pedagogy, and courses in computer science content. Entities eligible for these funds include, but are not limited to, individual teachers, local education agencies, approved professional learning providers, and institutions of higher education located in Washington state.

(e) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a qualified 501(c)(3) nonprofit community-based organization physically located in Washington state that has at least seventeen years of experience collaborating with the office and school districts statewide to integrate the state learning standards in English language arts, mathematics, and science with FieldSTEM outdoor field studies and project-based and work-based learning opportunities aligned with the environmental, natural resource, and agricultural sectors. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(f) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(i) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(ii) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(g) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(11) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

(12) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for contracts with Washington state based nonprofit organizations that provide a career-integrated one-to-one mentoring program for disadvantaged high school students facing academic and personal challenges with the goal of keeping them on track for graduation and post-high school success. The mentoring must include a focus on college readiness, career exploration and social-emotional learning. An applicant requesting funding for these dollars must successfully demonstrate to the department that it currently provides a career-integrated one-to-one volunteer mentoring program and has been mentoring high school youth for at least twenty years in the state prior to application.

(13) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to contract with an organization to create an after-school and summer learning program in the city of Federal Way. The program shall provide comprehensive, culturally competent academic support and cultural enrichment for primarily latinx, spanish-speaking, low-income sixth, seventh, and eighth grade students. The department must contract with an organization with over forty years of experience that serves the latino community in Seattle and King county and has previously established an after-school and summer learning program.

(14) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the office to contract with a statewide nonprofit organization to promote equitable access in science, technology, engineering, and math education for migrant and bilingual students. At least 50 percent of the funding provided must serve schools and school districts in eastern Washington.

(15) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the south Kitsap school district to continue the work co-developing a strategy to increase completion rates for the free application for federal student aid (FAFSA).

(16) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the northwest education access program to ensure students on nontraditional educational pathways have the mentorship and technical assistance needed to navigate higher education and financial aid. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(17) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Highline school district to contract with an organization to offer pre-apprenticeship opportunities for two cohorts of students in south King county during the summer months of 2021.

(18) $27,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $80,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER), and $92,625,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants for the purposes of learning recovery and acceleration. Allowable uses of the funds are limited to:

(a) One-time contracts for classified, certificated, or administrative staff who will provide tiered academic and social-emotional supports to students most impacted by the disruption of in-person learning, including locating and reengaging students who have disengaged from school, one-on-one and small-group instruction, and other intensive learning supports;

(b) Professional learning for educators focused on learning recovery and acceleration, including assessing student learning and social-emotional needs, transitioning to standards-based curricula and grading, adopting competency or mastery-based options specifically for credit retrieval purposes, and family and student engagement strategies;

(c) Procuring assessment or data systems that provide actionable just-in-time data regarding student progress throughout the school year; and

(d) Direct supports to students to improve school engagement and accelerate learning.

(19) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to provide broadband internet connections through agreements with internet providers to qualifying students for the 2021-22 school year and the 2022-23 school year. Qualifying students must meet the following conditions: (a) They do not currently have internet connectivity in their home; (b) they are able to demonstrate that they are eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(20) $199,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $247,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the grant program established in Senate Bill No. 5242 (media literacy & digital citizenship). Total grant awards may not exceed $150,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 for fiscal year 2023. $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for two regional conferences. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the continuation of the math improvement pilot program. The entirety of the funds appropriated for fiscal year 2022 must be disbursed by the office to the recipients of the grants no later than August 1, 2021, and the entirety of the funds appropriated for fiscal year 2023 must be disbursed by the office to the recipients of the grants no later than August 1, 2022. Of the amounts provided in the subsection:

(a) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Spokane school district.

(b) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Chehalis school district.

(c) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Bremerton school district.

(22) $18,000,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for grants to entities or organizations to provide outdoor education summer enrichment programs to youth.

(23) Within existing resources, the office shall develop recommendation to the legislature to merge the grant programs and specific appropriations of pass-through funding for certain activities or entities in this section into a competitive grant funding process in future biennia. A competitive process must allocate funding using the following five separate categories:

(a) Student supports and safety. Programs under this category will support the mental, social-emotional, and physical safety of students;

(b) Educator growth and development. Programs under this category will support the recruitment and retention of educators, and support their continual professional growth;

(c) Curricula development, dissemination, and supports. Programs under this category will support the development, implementation, and continuous improvement of curricula and other programs specific to state learning standards and content areas;

(d) Eliminating inequitable student outcomes. Programs under this category will increase outcomes for specific student groups, including students experiencing homelessness or foster care; and

(e) Graduation success and preparation for postsecondary pathways. Programs under this category will increase access to graduation pathways aligned with students' postsecondary goals and support for each student to graduate ready to achieve those goals. These may include dual credit programs; dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs; core plus programs; and other high demand career and technical education programs.

(24) $74,237,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER) is provided solely for allocations from federal funding in response to the COVID-19 pandemic as authorized in section 313, the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M. The superintendent of public instruction must allocate the entire amount as subgrants to local education agencies consistent with timing and provisions of section 313, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(25) $1,667,251,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for allocations from federal funding in response to the COVID-19 pandemic as authorized in section 2001, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. The superintendent of public instruction must allocate the entire amount as subgrants to local education agencies consistent with timing and provisions of section 2001, P.L. 117-2.

(26) $43,708,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for emergency assistance to nonpublic schools, as authorized in section 2002, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(27) $46,263,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA), not to exceed the amount appropriated in section 13, chapter 3, Laws of 2021, that was unobligated at the end of fiscal year 2021, is provided solely for emergency assistance to nonpublic schools, subject to the same terms and conditions of section 13, chapter 3, Laws of 2021.

(28) $78,172,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CARES), not to exceed the amount approved by the governor on June 15, 2020, through the unanticipated receipts process for distribution to local education agencies, that was unobligated at the end of fiscal year 2021, is provided solely for allocations from federal funding in response to the COVID-19 pandemic as authorized in section 18003, the coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act, P.L. 116-136.

(29) $668,130,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA/ESSER), not to exceed the amount appropriated in section 12, chapter 3, Laws of 2021, that was unobligated at the end of fiscal year 2021, is provided solely for allocations local educational agencies subject to the same terms and conditions of section 12, chapter 3, Laws of 2021.

(30) $17,769,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create and administer a grant program for the purpose of creating a summer reengagement program for students to reengage in learning, physical activity, and social interaction prior to the start of the 2021-22 school year pursuant to section 2001(1)(f)(2), American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(a) School districts participating in this program shall prioritize activities or programs that:

(i) Promote students connecting socially with their classmates;

(ii) Encourage students to engage in physical activity; and

(iii) Support families who have struggled with child care needs.

(b) Grants allocated for the purposes of this subsection must be allocated in proportion to student enrollment.

(c) Nothing in this subsection modifies instructional requirements under RCW 28A.150.220 nor shall any activity or program provided under this section count towards meeting minimum instructional requirements under state law.

(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules necessary for the effective and efficient implementation of this subsection.

(31) $18,525,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants to the community learning center program as created in RCW 28A.215.060 for the purpose of supporting afterschool programs pursuant to section 2001(1)(f)(3), American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules necessary for the effective and efficient implementation of this subsection.

(32) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial management, and legislative fiscal staff from the house of representatives office of program research and senate committee services must collaborate on the data, quantification, and report required to demonstrate the state's maintenance of effort requirement for elementary and secondary school emergency relief funding from the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M and the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, and to determine if the state should seek a waiver from the requirement. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may not submit maintenance of effort data, supporting materials, reports, or a waiver to the United States department of education without the review and approval of the office of financial management.

(33) $12,000,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account—federal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(b), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for the purposes of identifying children and youth experiencing homelessness and providing children and youth experiencing homelessness with:

(a) Wrap-around services due to the challenges of the COVID-19 public health emergency; and

(b) Assistance needed to enable children and youth experiencing homelessness to attend school and participate fully in school activities.

(34) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the south Kitsap school district for the controls programmer apprenticeship program.

(End of part)

PART VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. The appropriations in sections 605 through 611 of this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 605 through 611 of this act.

(2) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes. Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the office of financial management for inclusion in the agency's data warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the office of financial management's office of the state human resources director for use by the reporting institutions, including provisions for common job classifications and common definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts, number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently reported for employees under contract.

(3) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.

(4)(a) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 or 41.80 RCW, salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.

(b) For each institution of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 605 through 611 of this act:

(i) The only allowable salary increases are those associated with normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and staff retention and as provided in Part IX of this act.

(ii) Institutions may provide salary increases from sources other than general fund appropriations and tuition revenues to instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under chapter 41.80 RCW. It is the intent of the legislature that salary increases provided under this subsection (4)(b)(ii) not increase state general fund support or impact tuition expenditures by an institution unless the legislature so determines.

(iii) Funding for salary increases provided under (b)(ii) of this subsection and RCW 41.76.035 and 28B.52.035 on or after July 1, 2019, must be excluded from the general fund and tuition salary base when calculating state funding for future general wage or other salary increases on or after July 1, 2019. In order to facilitate this funding policy, each institution shall report to the office of financial management on the details of locally authorized salary increases granted under (b)(ii) of this subsection and RCW 41.76.035 and 28B.52.035 with its 2023-2025 biennium budget submittal. At a minimum, the report must include the total cost of locally authorized increases by fiscal year, a description of the locally authorized provision, and the long-term source of funds that is anticipated to cover the cost.

(5) Within funds appropriated to institutions in sections 605 through 611 of this act, teacher preparation programs shall meet the requirements of RCW 28B.10.710 to incorporate information on the culture, history, and government of American Indian people in this state by integrating the curriculum developed and made available free of charge by the office of the superintendent of public instruction into existing programs or courses and may modify that curriculum in order to incorporate elements that have a regionally specific focus.

(6) Each institution of higher education must include the phone number of a campus, local, state, or national suicide, crisis, or counseling hotline on the back of newly issued student and faculty identification cards.

(7)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;

(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;

(iii) Washington college grant recipient grade point averages; and

(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. (1) Within the amounts appropriated in this act, each institution of higher education shall seek to:

(a) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment opportunities at campuses;

(b) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment opportunities at university centers and other partnership programs that enable students to earn baccalaureate degrees on community college campuses; and

(c) Eliminate and consolidate programs of study for which there is limited student or employer demand, or that are not areas of core academic strength for the institution, particularly when such programs duplicate offerings by other in-state institutions.

(2) For purposes of monitoring and reporting statewide enrollment, the University of Washington and Washington State University shall notify the office of financial management of the number of full-time student equivalent enrollments for each of their campuses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS

(1) The state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College must accept the transfer of college-level courses taken by students under RCW 28A.600.290 or 28A.600.300 if a student seeking a transfer of the college-level courses has been admitted to the state university, the regional university, or The Evergreen State College, and if the college-level courses are recognized as transferrable by the admitting institution of higher education.

(2) Appropriations in sections 606 through 611 of this act are sufficient to implement 2021-23 collective bargaining agreements at institutions of higher education negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW.

(3) Within amounts appropriated to institutions in sections 606 through 611 of this act, institutions shall employ at least one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience working with active members of the military or military veterans, to work with student, faculty, and staff veterans, as well as their spouses and dependents, through the institution's veteran resource center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

Appropriations in section 605 of this act are sufficient to implement 2021-23 collective bargaining agreements at institutions of higher education negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW and as set forth in part IX of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$734,178,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$761,476,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
($10,000)

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$159,208,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$221,259,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$22,436,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,898,547,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2022 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2023.

(2) $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation and $10,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.

(3) $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, and $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.

(4) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.

(5) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:

(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;

(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and

(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.

(6) $20,759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $21,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(7) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(8) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Wenatchee Valley college wildfire prevention program.

(9) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Puget Sound welcome back center at Highline College to create a grant program for internationally trained individuals seeking employment in the behavioral health field in Washington state.

(10)(a) The state board must provide quality assurance reports on the ctcLink project at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(b) The state board must develop a technology budget using a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, funding sources, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project initiation to implementation. The budget must be updated at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(c) The office of the chief information officer may suspend the ctcLink project at any time if the office of the chief information officer determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated performance measures, implementation timelines, or budget estimates. Once suspension or termination occurs, the state board shall not make additional expenditures on the ctcLink project without approval of the chief information officer. The ctcLink project funded through the community and technical college innovation account created in RCW 28B.50.515 is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(11) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education at North Seattle College.

(12) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for Highline College to implement the Federal Way higher education initiative in partnership with the city of Federal Way and the University of Washington Tacoma campus.

(13) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for Peninsula College to maintain the annual cohorts of the specified programs as follows:

(a) Medical assisting, 40 students;

(b) Nursing assistant, 60 students; and

(c) Registered nursing, 32 students.

(14) $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state labor education and research center at South Seattle College.

(15) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the aerospace and advanced manufacturing center of excellence hosted by Everett Community College to develop a semiconductor and electronics manufacturing branch in Vancouver.

(16) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for Seattle Central College's expansion of allied health programs.

(17) $15,220,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for college operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(18) $15,220,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.

(19) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $75,847,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for statewide implementation of guided pathways at each of the state's community and technical colleges or similar programs designed to improve student success, including, but not limited to, academic program redesign, student advising, and other student supports.

(20) $40,800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue to fund nurse educator salaries.

(21) $40,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided to continue to fund high-demand program faculty salaries, including but not limited to nurse educators, other health-related professions, information technology, computer science, and trades.

(22) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to expand high-demand and career launch enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (22):

(a) $6,000,000 of the amounts in this subsection (22) are provided for expansion of career launch enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020.

(b) $2,000,000 of the amounts in this subsection (22) are provided for expansion of enrollments in high demand programs. These programs include, but are not limited to, allied health, computer and information science, manufacturing, and other fields identified by the state board for community and technical colleges.

(c) The state board for community and technical colleges may transfer amounts between (a) and (b) of this subsection (22) if either program does not have sufficient demand to spend the allocated funding. Any transfer must be approved by the state board for community and technical colleges and the office of financial management.

(23) $2,112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $15,848,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5194 (equity and access in higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to coordinate with the Washington student achievement council task force as described in section 612(5) of this act to provide the following running start data for fiscal year 2019, fiscal year 2020, and fiscal year 2021, for each community and technical college:

(a) The total number of running start students served by headcount and full-time equivalent;

(b) The total amount of running start revenue received through apportionment as allocated with the running start rate by the office of the superintendent of public instruction through local school districts;

(c) The total amount of revenue received directly from local school districts that is not provided through the running start allocation described in (b) of this subsection;

(d) The total amount of fee revenue generated directly from running start students and families, broken out by fee name, fee type, or both;

(e) Expenditures by object, sub-object, program, and fund for all running start revenues from state apportionment and fees;

(f) Any transfers of running start revenue between funds;

(g) Course completion rates for running start students;

(h) A list of courses by two-digit classification of instructional program code and the number of running start students in each course;

(i) A list of career and technical education area courses and the number of running start students in each course;

(j) The number of students at each community or technical college receiving complete fee waivers as required by RCW 28A.600.310(3)(a);

(k) The total dollar value of fee waivers provided to running start students;

(l) A total allocation of additional funds provided to cover fee waivers; and

(m) The method used by each college to determine running start fee waiver eligibility, including any policies adopted by the college or its program.

(26)(a) $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.

(b) By December 1, 2021, the state board for community and technical colleges must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature an update on the student achievement initiative including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Annual change in student achievement initiative funds by institution;

(ii) Student achievement initiative funds awarded by college by performance funding category including basic skills, first 15 and 30 credits, retention, and completion;

(iii) Impact of guided pathways implementation on student achievement initiative awards; and

(iv) Any additional private or foundation dollars invested in the student achievement initiative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$392,552,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$401,586,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,619,000

University of Washington Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,546,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$36,708,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,094,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$605,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$263,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$263,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,874,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$7,468,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$46,453,000

Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$900,046,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $43,087,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $43,905,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for labor archives of Washington. The university shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(3) $8,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to maintain the number of residency slots available in Washington.

(4) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(5) $3,062,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account—state appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.

(6) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(7) $1,201,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the psychiatry residency program at the University of Washington to offer additional residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education.

(8)(a) $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $20,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to support the operations and teaching mission of the Harborview medical center and the University of Washington medical center.

(b) By December 1, 2022, the University of Washington must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature the impact of the funding in (a) of this subsection on the fiscal position of Harborview medical center and the University of Washington medical center in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. To ensure transparency, consistency, accuracy, and clarity, the report must:

(i) Follow generally accepted accounting principles;

(ii) Use generally accepted terms and define those terms;

(iii) Provide data on revenue and expenses, using standard formats already in existence, such as comprehensive hospital abstract reporting system (CHARS) data, and delineated by functional areas of state government;

(iv) Incorporate wherever possible publicly available data, as a public institution including, but not limited to, the following sources:

(A) CHARS;

(B) Comprehensive annual financial reports; and

(C) The most recent independent auditor report, including financial statements connected to the report; and

(v) Provide supporting documentation.

(9) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the University of Washington's psychiatry integrated care training program.

(10) $427,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $640,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for child and adolescent psychiatry residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education, as provided in RCW 28B.20.445.

(11) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the University of Washington School of Dentistry to support its role as a major oral health provider to individuals covered by medicaid and the uninsured.

(12) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Latino center for health.

(13) $463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.

(14) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment to provide an updated climate impacts risk assessment designed to inform future updates to the statewide climate resilience strategy. The group must coordinate with the office of the governor to refine the scope of assessment. The final report and associated deliverables must be completed and submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2022.

(15) $600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the college of education to collaborate with teacher preparation programs and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop open access climate science educational curriculum for use in teacher preparation programs.

(16) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Harry Bridges center for labor studies. The center shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(17) $21,461,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(18) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.

(19) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree production in the college of engineering at the Seattle campus.

(20) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the Washington state academic redshirt program.

(21) $2,700,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree capacity and undergraduate enrollments in engineering, mathematics, and science programs to support the biomedical innovation partnership zone at the Bothell campus.

(22) $3,268,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain bachelor of science programs in mechanical and civil engineering to support increased student and local employer demand for graduates in these fields at the Tacoma campus.

(23) $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $9,636,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the continued operations and expansion of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.

(24) $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $69,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5194 (equity and access in higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5141 (environmental justice task force recs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $422,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 6, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272).

(28) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5228 (medical training/equity).

(29) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the department of environmental and occupational health sciences to provide an air quality report. The report will study the relationship between indoor and outdoor ultrafine particle air quality at sites with vulnerable populations, such as schools or locations underneath flight paths within 10 miles of Sea-Tac airport. The report recommendations must include an item addressing filtration systems at select locations with vulnerable populations. The report shall be submitted to the house environment and energy committee and the senate environment, energy and technology committee by December 15, 2021.

(30) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Burke museum of natural history and culture to make education programs offered by the museum accessible to more students across Washington, especially students in underserved schools and locations. The funding shall be used for:

(a) Increasing the number of students who participate in Burke education programs at reduced or no cost;

(b) Providing bus reimbursement for students visiting the museum on field trips and to support travel to bring museum programs across the state; and

(c) Staff who will form partnerships with school districts to serve statewide communities more efficiently and equitably through the Burkemobile program.

(31)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the center for cannabis research at the university to collaborate with the Washington State University collaboration on cannabis policy, research, and outreach to create frameworks for future studies. Each framework will include the length of time to complete, research licenses necessary, cost, literature review of national and international research, and a scope of work to be completed. The following frameworks shall be compiled in a report:

(i) Measuring and assessing impairment due to marijuana use; and

(ii) Correlation between age of use, dosage of use, and appearance of occurrence of cannabis induced psychosis.

(b) The report on the frameworks must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(32) $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university's center for human rights. The appropriation must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the center for human rights.

(33) $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the establishment and operation of the state forensic anthropologist. The university shall work in conjunction with and provide the full funding directly to the King county medical examiner's office to support the statewide work of the state forensic anthropologist.

(34) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to the University of Washington school of medicine for the development of simulation training devices at the Harborview medical center's paramedic training program.

(35) $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(36) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the creation of the center for environmental forensic science.

(37) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the college of education to partner with school districts to continue the math improvement pilot program.

(38) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university to conduct monitoring and research related to Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery.

(39) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for Washington mathematics, engineering, science achievement to implement programs that provide enrichment opportunities in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) to students who are traditionally underrepresented in the STEM fields.

(40) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to expand online tutorial and link to web-based, continuing education funded by the centers for disease control for training for the primary care health workforce regarding the protocols for perinatal monitoring, birth-dose immunization, early diagnosis, linkage to care, and treatment for persons diagnosed with chronic hepatitis B or hepatitis using a telehealth model operated by the University of Washington.

(a) Training shall:

(i) Focus on increased provider proficiency and increased number of trained providers in areas with high rates of reported cases of hepatitis B or hepatitis, including regions with high incidence of drug use or upward trend of children who have not received hepatitis B virus vaccinations according to centers for disease control recommendations; and

(ii) Provide access to:

(A) University of Washington medicine specialists in infectious diseases, hepatology, and addiction medicine;

(B) Brief updates on evidence-based strategies to diagnose, treat, and manage acute and chronic hepatitis B, acute and chronic hepatitis C, or coinfections;

(C) Continuing medical education credits per hour of participation; and

(D) Phone consultation with specialists during nonscheduled time for patients who experience complications.

(b) All digital and hardcopy training, educational, and outreach materials for this program must be culturally relevant and linguistically diverse.

(41) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,694,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(42) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.

(43) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the pre-law pipeline and social justice program at the University of Washington-Tacoma.

(44) To ensure transparency and accountability, in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium the University of Washington shall comply with any and all financial and accountability audits by the Washington state auditor including any and all audits of university services offered to the general public, including those offered through any public-private partnership, business venture, affiliation, or joint venture with a public or private entity, except the government of the United States. The university shall comply with all state auditor requests for the university's financial and business information including the university's governance and financial participation in these public-private partnerships, business ventures, affiliations, or joint ventures with a public or private entity. In any instance in which the university declines to produce the information to the state auditor, the university will provide the state auditor a brief summary of the documents withheld and a citation of the legal or contractual provision that prevents disclosure. The summaries must be compiled into a report by the state auditor and provided on a quarterly basis to the legislature.

(45) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a firearm policy research program. The program will:

(a) Support investigations of firearm death and injury risk factors;

(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of state firearm laws and policies;

(c) Assess the consequences of firearm violence; and

(d) Develop strategies to reduce the toll of firearm violence to citizens of the state.

(46) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university's center for international trade in forest products.

(47) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the University of Washington to support youth and young adults experiencing homelessness in the university district of Seattle. Funding is provided for the university to work with community service providers and university colleges and departments to plan for and implement a comprehensive one-stop center with navigation services for homeless youth; the university may contract with the department of commerce to expand services that serve homeless youth in the university district.

(48)(i) $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance to conduct a boater safety analysis, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) The prevalence of boating fatalities and rescues in Washington state;

(B) A comparison of Washington's rates of fatalities and rescues to other states; and

(C) Recommendations of effective and collective ways to increase boater safety in the state.

(ii) The Evans school may convene stakeholders to analyze data and make recommendations. By December 31, 2022, the Evans school must submit a report of findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$245,861,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$252,503,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Washington State University Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$792,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,995,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2022)
. . . .
$138,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2023)
. . . .
$138,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$29,680,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$331,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$563,938,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

(3) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $22,800,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the continued development and operations of a medical school program in Spokane.

(4) $30,628,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $31,210,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(5) $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 36, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (renewable energy, tax incentives).

(6) $1,038,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,038,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university's soil health initiative and its network of long-term agroecological research and extension (LTARE) sites. The network must include a Mount Vernon REC site.

(7) $6,880,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(8) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for Washington State University's energy program to launch a least-conflict priority solar siting pilot project in the Columbia basin of eastern and central Washington. This program shall engage all relevant stakeholders to identify priority areas where there is the least amount of potential conflict in the siting of utility scale PV solar and to develop a map highlighting these areas. The program shall also compile the latest information on opportunities for dual-use and colocation of PV solar with other land values. The appropriation is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(9) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(10) $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5045 (meat and poultry inspection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $101,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $101,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 6, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272).

(13) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5228 (medical training/equity).

(14) $224,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (pollinator health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15)(a) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to conduct a situation assessment to gauge the prospects for a collaborative approach to integration of leadership, aligning roles and responsibilities, and increasing efficiency and responsiveness of the state's K-12 education governance structure. The assessment must:

(i) Identify issues, challenges, and opportunities related to administration and governance of K-12 education in Washington state;

(ii) Consist of interviews with representatives of state-funded K-12 education agencies, boards, commissions, and other relevant entities identified by the center;

(iii) Explore potential opportunities for the integration, alignment, and/or consolidation of roles and responsibilities of entities; and

(iv) Identify key areas of focus.

(b) The center must report the assessment's findings and recommendations to the education committees of the legislature by March 31, 2022, with a preliminary report by February 1, 2022, as to whether circumstances support the convening and facilitation of a collaborative work group.

(16)(a) $220,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $111,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the university to conduct an organic waste study to:

(i) Assess local and state government compost usage in projects and buy-back programs under RCW 43.19A.120 and 43.19A.130 including but not limited to participation, effectiveness, and amount and types of usage of compost; and

(ii) Develop a model to estimate carbon sequestration from organic waste-derived soil amendment application to soil, and identify technologies, methods, and potential funding for carbon sequestration from Washington's organic wastes including but not limited to the potential inclusion of these materials in carbon markets and trading.

(b) The university must submit a report on the assessment's findings and model development to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2022.

(17) $1,718,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5126 (climate commitment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) is provided solely to support farm stress programs in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, as authorized in section 766, division N, consolidated appropriations act, 2021, P.L. 116-260.

(19) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(20) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.

(21) $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(22) $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2017 (2SSB 5474) (elk hoof disease).

(23) By December 1, 2021, the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the center's research grant program, including but not limited to the following:

(a) The annual amount of funding available for the grant program, including any private or foundation dollars;

(b) The average award amount per project;

(c) The educational impact of funded projects on high schools and community and technical colleges; and

(d) The impact of project findings on technologies in Washington using earth-abundant materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$57,175,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$58,223,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,838,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,430,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$138,666,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $11,002,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $11,211,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(5) $56,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a comprehensive analysis of the deep lake watershed involving land owners, ranchers, lake owners, one or more conservation districts, the department of ecology, and the department of natural resources.

(6) $2,274,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(7) $2,636,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain a computer engineering degree program in the college of science, technology, engineering, and math.

(8) $109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(10) $300,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a center for inclusive excellence for faculty and staff.

(11) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to expand dual credit options for high school students.

(12) $220,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a new summer bridge program to support students before the first of college.

(13) At least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and at least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$59,460,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$60,825,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,076,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,794,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$145,231,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $12,401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $12,636,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(5) $2,236,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(6) $1,050,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase the number of certified K-12 teachers.

(7) $736,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain mental health counseling positions.

(8) $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $121,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (law enforcement data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(11) $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to implement chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply).

(12) $552,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish a multicultural student center.

(13) $740,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a faculty mentoring program to improve retention of faculty of color.

(14) $480,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for two psychologists to increase access to mental health counseling for students of color.

(15) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely to establish a bachelor of science in computer science at the university's Des Moines center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$31,608,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$31,414,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,450,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,128,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$73,680,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,772,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,843,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the college is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(4) $2,887,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to initiate, sponsor, conduct, and publish research that is directly useful to policymakers and manage reviews and evaluations of technical and scientific topics as they relate to major long-term issues facing the state. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4):

(a) $1,391,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $1,399,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided for administration and core operations.

(b) $828,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $937,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for ongoing and continuing studies on the Washington state institute for public policy's work plan.

(c)(i) $175,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to partner with a context expert to conduct a wilderness therapy research review. The University of Washington evidence-based practice institute and Washington State University impact center must assist the institute in identifying a content expert. For the review, the institute must:

(A) Identify wilderness therapy program models related to behavioral health which have a treatment approach which is well defined or definable and have a strong evidence base to be added to reporting guides for being identified as an evidence-based practice for mental health, including identification of target populations for these programs;

(B) Identify wilderness/adventure program models available for prevention services which are cost beneficial; and

(C) Assess the interest and likelihood of support for programs of this nature among relevant interest groups, such as state prevention coalitions and tribes, if such programs were listed as approved cost beneficial prevention programs by the division of behavioral health and recovery and the Washington state health care authority.

(ii) The institute must submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a report on (c)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection by December 31, 2021, and a report on (c)(i)(C) of this subsection by June 30, 2022.

(d) $272,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $98,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (reentry services/state and local institutions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(d) shall lapse.

(e) $71,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2022 and $66,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5194 (equity and access in higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e) shall lapse.

(f)(i) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit analysis for an exclusive or partial American steel requirement for future contracts and subcontracts authorized in the capital budget. The cost-benefit analysis must, to the extent feasible:

(A) Compare existing types and uses of steel to America made steel alternatives, including evaluation of quality;

(B) Examine benefits to Washington workers and the Washington economy;

(C) Examine lifecycle and embodied carbon greenhouse gas emissions;

(D) Identify requirements for purchasing American steel that minimize costs and maximize benefits; and

(E) Evaluate American steel requirements or preferences in other states.

(ii) The institute may solicit input for the analysis from representatives of interested parties to include, but not be limited to, the construction and manufacturing sectors, organized labor in the construction and manufacturing sectors, cities, counties, American steel manufacturing companies, environmental advocacy organizations, and appropriate state agencies.

(iii) The institute must submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(g) Notwithstanding other provisions in this subsection, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2021-23 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(5) $2,636,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(6) $670,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain enrollment capacity in psychology programs.

(7) $600,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase student success by maintaining support for a student precollege immersion program and The Evergreen first-year experience.

(8) $230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $214,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(10) $832,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for four faculty positions to support Native American and indigenous programs.

(11) $170,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to support the native pathways program.

(12) $220,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for a tribal liaison position.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$82,572,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$84,190,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,424,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,831,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,998,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$190,015,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $17,116,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $17,441,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(5) $2,256,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.

(6) $3,426,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain access to science, technology, engineering, and mathematics degrees.

(7) $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.

(8) $341,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $141,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5227 (diversity, etc./higher education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (law enforcement data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $1,016,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to establish an academic curriculum in ethnic studies.

(11) $300,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for graduate teaching assistantship stipend increases.

(12) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional student support services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612. FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$7,002,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$6,926,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,928,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,765,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$20,621,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement a marketing and communications agenda as required in RCW 28C.30.040(1)(c).

(2) $124,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student loan refinancing program as provided in chapter 28B.94 RCW.

(3) $1,150,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided to increase the number of high school seniors and college bound scholars that complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid through digital engagement tools, expanded training, and increased events for high school students.

(4) The student achievement council must ensure that all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW provide the data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs. This data must be promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible.

(5) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to convene and coordinate a task force to propose strategies to eliminate financial and nonfinancial barriers to low-income students participating in running start, college in the high school, advanced placement, international baccalaureate, Cambridge, and career and technical education dual credit programs. The task force shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021. The report must include:

(a) Strategies to address the following financial and nonfinancial barriers to students:

(i) Per credit tuition fees and any other fees charged for college in the high school and career and technical education dual credit courses;

(ii) Books, fees, and any other direct costs charged to running start students when enrolling in college courses; and

(iii) Exam fees and other charges to students enrolling in exam-based dual credit courses;

(b) Recommendations on student supports to close equity gaps in dual credit access, participation, and success;

(c) Recommendations to improve and increase communication with students and families regarding the awareness, access, and completion of dual credit;

(d) Expanding access to dual credit opportunities for students in career and technical education pathways; and

(e) Running start data for fiscal year 2019, fiscal year 2020, and fiscal year 2021 for each community and technical college as described in section 605(25) of this act.

(6) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5249 (mastery-based learning). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613. FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$265,583,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$261,971,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,056,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$85,488,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$164,598,000

Aerospace Training Student Loan Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$216,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$308,349,000

Health Professionals Loan Repayment and Scholarship

Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,100,281,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,834,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $7,835,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state work study program, including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.

(2) $258,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $258,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $297,865,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation, $69,639,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $103,300,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington college grant program as provided in RCW 28B.92.200.

(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.

(4) $1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $1,165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, $15,849,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $16,944,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education shall not consider awards made by the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award amount under RCW 28B.118.010.

(5) $2,759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $2,759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $8,480,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The council shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2022 and 2023 for this purpose.

(6) $2,981,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely to meet state match requirements associated with the opportunity scholarship program. The legislature will evaluate subsequent appropriations to the opportunity scholarship program based on the extent that additional private contributions are made, program spending patterns, and fund balance.

(7) $3,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $3,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for expenditure into the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account. These amounts must be used to increase the number of licensed primary care health professionals to serve in licensed primary care health professional critical shortage areas. Contracts between the office and program recipients must guarantee at least three years of conditional loan repayments. The office of student financial assistance and the department of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the health professional loan repayment and scholarship fund for conditional loan repayment contracts with psychiatrists and with advanced registered nurse practitioners for work at one of the state-operated psychiatric hospitals. The office and department shall designate the state hospitals as health professional shortage areas if necessary for this purpose. The office shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to effectively incorporate three conditional loan repayments into the department's advanced psychiatric professional recruitment and retention strategies. The office may use these targeted amounts for other program participants should there be any remaining amounts after eligible psychiatrists and advanced registered nurse practitioners have been served. The office shall also work to prioritize loan repayments to professionals working at health care delivery sites that demonstrate a commitment to serving uninsured clients. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to maintain the current number and amount of awards for the program in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium on the basis of these contractual obligations.

(8) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the future teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program established in chapter 28B.102 RCW.

(9) $1,279,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the Washington award for vocational excellence.

(10) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for behavioral health loan repayment program grants, pursuant to chapter 302, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1668) (Washington health corps).

(11) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 is provided solely for a state match associated with the rural jobs program. The legislature will evaluate appropriations in future biennia to the rural jobs program based on the extent that additional private contributions are made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614. FOR THE WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,319,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,059,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$55,483,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$212,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$60,223,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the health workforce council of the state workforce training and education coordinating board. In partnership with the office of the governor, the health workforce council shall continue to assess workforce shortages across behavioral health disciplines and incorporate the recommended action plan completed in 2020.

(2) $150,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for staffing costs to support the workforce education investment accountability and oversight board established in RCW 28C.18.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$9,137,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$9,350,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$18,521,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades six through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus or online with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$14,618,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$14,925,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$29,543,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer students ages three through twenty-one enrolled at Washington School for the Deaf the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,597,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,644,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,156,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,447,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022 and $79,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023 are provided solely for the creative districts program.

(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for grants to arts organizations for programing and general operating expenses pursuant to section 2021 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,904,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$3,941,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,277,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$3,382,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,659,000

(End of part)

PART VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT POOL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$10,601,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$5,052,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,481,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$92,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$16,863,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$35,089,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the information technology investment revolving account created in RCW 43.41.433. Funds in the account are provided solely for the information technology projects shown in LEAP omnibus document, IT-2021, dated March 25, 2021, which is hereby incorporated by reference. To facilitate the transfer of money from other funds and accounts that are associated with projects contained in LEAP omnibus document IT-2021, dated March 25, 2021, the state treasurer is directed to transfer money from other funds and accounts to the information technology investment revolving account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management. Restricted federal funds may be transferred only to the extent permitted by law, and will otherwise remain outside the information technology investment account. The projects affected remain subject to the other provisions of this section.

(2) Agencies must apply to the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer to receive funding from the information technology investment revolving account. The office of financial management must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the receipt of each application and may not approve a funding request for ten business days from the date of notification.

(3)(a) Allocations and allotments of information technology investment revolving account must be made for discrete stages of projects as determined by the technology budget approved by the office of the chief information officer and office of financial management.

(b) Fifteen percent of total funding allocated by the office of financial management, or another amount as defined jointly by the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer, will be retained in the account, but remain allocated to that project. The retained funding will be released to the agency only after successful completion of that stage of the project. For the one Washington project, the amount retained is increased to at least twenty percent of total funding allocated for any stage of that project.

(4)(a) Each project must have a technology budget. The technology budget must have the detail by fiscal month for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The technology budget must use a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, each fund source, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the entire project investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project onset through implementation and close out, as well as at least five years of maintenance and operations costs.

(b) As part of the development of a technology budget and at each request for funding, the agency shall submit an updated technology budget, if changes occurred, to include detailed financial information to the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer. The technology budget must describe the total cost of the project, as well as maintenance and operations costs, to include and identify at least:

(i) Fund sources:

(A) If the project is funded from the information technology revolving account, the technology budget must include a worksheet that provides the fund sources that were transferred into the account by fiscal year;

(B) If the project is by a central service agency, and funds are driven out by the central service model, the technology budget must provide a statewide impact by agency by fund as a worksheet in the technology budget file;

(ii) Full time equivalent staffing level to include job classification assumptions;

(iii) Discreet financial budget codes to include at least the appropriation index and program index;

(iv) Object and subobject codes of expenditures;

(v) Anticipated deliverables;

(vi) Historical budget and expenditure detail by fiscal year; and

(vii) Maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year for at least five years as a separate worksheet.

(c) If a project technology budget changes and a revised technology budget is completed, a comparison of the revised technology budget to the last approved technology budget must be posted to the dashboard, to include a narrative rationale on what changed, why, and how that impacts the project in scope, budget, and schedule.

(5)(a) Each project must have an investment plan that includes:

(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities;

(ii) The office of the chief information officer staff assigned to the project;

(iii) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project;

(iv) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product;

(v) Ongoing maintenance and operations cost of the project post implementation and close out delineated by agency staffing, contracted staffing, and service level agreements; and

(vi) Financial budget coding to include at least discreet financial coding for the project.

(6) Projects with estimated costs greater than one hundred million dollars from initiation to completion and implementation may be divided into discrete subprojects as determined by the office of the chief information officer, except for the one Washington project which must be divided into the following discrete subprojects: Core financials, expanding financials and procurement, budget, and human resources. Each subproject must have a technology budget and investment plan as provided in this section.

(7)(a) The office of the chief information officer shall maintain an information technology project dashboard that provides updated information each fiscal month on projects subject to this section. This includes, at least:

(i) Project changes each fiscal month;

(ii) Noting if the project has a completed market requirements document, and when it was completed;

(iii) Financial status of information technology projects under oversight;

(iv) Coordination with agencies;

(v) Monthly quality assurance reports, if applicable;

(vi) Monthly office of the chief information officer status reports;

(vii) Historical project budget and expenditures through fiscal year 2021;

(viii) Budget and expenditures each fiscal month;

(ix) Estimated annual maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year; and

(x) Posting monthly project status assessments on scope, schedule, budget, and overall by the:

(A) Office of the chief information officer;

(B) Agency project team; and

(C) Quality assurance vendor, if applicable to the project.

(b) The dashboard must retain a roll up of the entire project cost, including all subprojects, that can display subproject detail. This includes coalition projects that are active.

(8) If the project affects more than one agency:

(a) A separate technology budget and investment plan must be prepared for each agency; and

(b) The dashboard must contain a statewide project technology budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.

(9) For any project that exceeds two million dollars in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:

(a) Quality assurance for the project must report independently to the office of the chief information officer;

(b) The office of the chief information officer must review, and, if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;

(c) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;

(d) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed; and

(e) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements.

(10) The office of the chief information officer must evaluate the project at each stage and certify whether the project is planned, managed, and meeting deliverable targets as defined in the project's approved technology budget and investment plan.

(11) The office of the chief information officer may suspend or terminate a project at any time if it determines that the project is not meeting or not expected to meet anticipated performance and technology outcomes. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall unallot any unused funding and shall not make any expenditure for the project without the approval of the office of financial management. The office of the chief information officer must report on July 1 and December 1 each calendar year any suspension or termination of a project in the previous six month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(12) The office of the chief information officer, in consultation with the office of financial management, may identify additional projects to be subject to this section, including projects that are not separately identified within an agency budget. The office of the chief information officer must report on July 1 and December 1 each calendar year any additional projects to be subjected to this section that were identified in the previous six month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(13) Any cost to administer or implement this section for projects listed in subsection (1) of this section, must be paid from the information technology investment revolving account. For any other information technology project made subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section, the cost to implement this section must be paid from the funds for that project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,282,572,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,377,171,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,323,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$181,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$467,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$511,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,673,238,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$57,954,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$57,954,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,466,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$94,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EMERGENCY FUND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$850,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$850,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EMERGENCY FUND ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,500,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for the governor's emergency fund for individual assistance consistent with RCW 38.52.030(9) during an emergency proclaimed by the governor, as defined in RCW 38.52.010(9). The office of financial management must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the receipt of each application or request for individual assistance from the governor's emergency fund by the governor or the adjutant general. The office of financial management may not approve, nor release, funding for 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$9,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$9,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$18,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the education technology revolving account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—O'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,588,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,581,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,169,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the enterprise services account for payment of principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for the O'Brien building improvement, project number 20081007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CHERBERG BUILDING REHABILITATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$556,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$556,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,112,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the enterprise services account for payment of principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for the Cherberg building improvements, project number 2002-1-005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$36,386,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$36,386,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$72,772,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the amounts designated to support public health services, including public health nursing:

Health District

FY 2022

FY 2023

2021-2023 Biennium

Adams County Integrated Health Care Services

$121,213

$121,213

$242,426

Asotin County Health District

$159,890

$159,890

$319,780

Benton-Franklin Health District

$1,614,337

$1,614,337

$3,228,674

Chelan-Douglas Health District

$399,634

$399,634

$799,268

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department

$291,401

$291,401

$582,802

Clark County Public Health

$1,767,341

$1,767,341

$3,534,682

Skamania County Community Health

$111,327

$111,327

$222,654

Columbia County Health District

$119,991

$119,991

$239,982

Cowlitz County Health and Human Services

$477,981

$477,981

$955,962

Garfield County Health District

$93,154

$93,154

$186,308

Grant County Health District

$297,761

$297,761

$595,522

Grays Harbor Public Health and Social Services

$335,666

$335,666

$671,332

Island County Health Department

$255,224

$255,224

$510,448

Jefferson County Public Health

$184,080

$184,080

$368,160

Public Health - Seattle & King County

$12,685,521

$12,685,521

$25,371,042

Kitsap Public Health District

$997,476

$997,476

$1,994,952

Kittitas County Public Health

$198,979

$198,979

$397,958

Klickitat County Public Health

$153,784

$153,784

$307,568

Lewis County Public Health and Social Services

$263,134

$263,134

$526,268

Lincoln County Health Department

$113,917

$113,917

$227,834

Mason County Public Health and Human Services

$227,448

$227,448

$454,896

Okanogan County Public Health

$169,882

$169,882

$339,764

Pacific County Health and Human Services

$169,075

$169,075

$338,150

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department

$4,143,169

$4,143,169

$8,286,338

San Juan County Health and Community Services

$126,569

$126,569

$253,138

Skagit County Health Department

$449,745

$449,745

$899,490

Snohomish Health District

$3,433,291

$3,433,291

$6,866,582

Spokane Regional Health District

$2,877,318

$2,877,318

$5,754,636

Northeast Tri-County Health District

$249,303

$249,303

$498,606

Thurston County Public Health and Social Services

$1,046,897

$1,046,897

$2,093,794

Wahkiakum County Health and Human Services

$93,181

$93,181

$186,362

Walla Walla County Department of Community Health

$302,173

$302,173

$604,346

Whatcom County Health Department

$1,214,301

$1,214,301

$2,428,602

Whitman County Health Department

$189,355

$189,355

$378,710

Yakima Health District

$1,052,482

$1,052,482

$2,104,964

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS

$36,386,000

$36,386,000

$72,772,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—COUNTY CLERK LEGAL FINANCIAL OBLIGATION GRANTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$541,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$441,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$982,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By October 1st of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following county clerk offices in the amounts designated as grants for the collection of legal financial obligations pursuant to RCW 2.56.190:

County Clerk

FY 2022

FY 2023

Adams County Clerk

$2,103

$1,714

Asotin County Clerk

$2,935

$2,392

Benton County Clerk

$18,231

$14,858

Chelan County Clerk

$7,399

$6,030

Clallam County Clerk

$5,832

$4,753

Clark County Clerk

$32,635

$26,597

Columbia County Clerk

$384

$313

Cowlitz County Clerk

$16,923

$13,792

Douglas County Clerk

$3,032

$2,471

Ferry County Clerk

$422

$344

Franklin County Clerk

$5,486

$4,471

Garfield County Clerk

$243

$198

Grant County Clerk

$10,107

$8,237

Grays Harbor County Clerk

$8,659

$7,057

Island County Clerk

$3,059

$2,493

Jefferson County Clerk

$1,859

$1,515

King County Court Clerk

$119,290

$97,266

Kitsap County Clerk

$22,242

$18,127

Kittitas County Clerk

$3,551

$2,894

Klickitat County Clerk

$2,151

$1,753

Lewis County Clerk

$10,340

$8,427

Lincoln County Clerk

$724

$590

Mason County Clerk

$5,146

$4,194

Okanogan County Clerk

$3,978

$3,242

Pacific County Clerk

$2,411

$1,965

Pend Oreille County Clerk

$611

$498

Pierce County Clerk

$77,102

$62,837

San Juan County Clerk

$605

$493

Skagit County Clerk

$11,059

$9,013

Skamania County Clerk

$1,151

$938

Snohomish County Clerk

$38,143

$31,086

Spokane County Clerk

$44,825

$36,578

Stevens County Clerk

$2,984

$2,432

Thurston County Clerk

$22,204

$18,096

Wahkiakum County Clerk

$400

$326

Walla Walla County Clerk

$4,935

$4,022

Whatcom County Clerk

$20,728

$16,893

Whitman County Clerk

$2,048

$1,669

Yakima County Clerk

$25,063

$20,426

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS

$541,000

$441,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712. BELATED CLAIMS

The agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COMMON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$600,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,200,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the common school construction account—state on July 1, 2021, and July 1, 2022, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—NATURAL RESOURCES REAL PROPERTY REPLACEMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the natural resources real property replacement account—state on July 1, 2021, and July 1, 2022, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$226,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$226,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$452,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are provided solely for expenditure into the county criminal justice assistance account—state. The treasurer shall make quarterly distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account of the amounts provided in this section in accordance with RCW 82.14.310 for the purposes of reimbursing local jurisdictions for increased costs incurred as a result of the mandatory arrest of repeat offenders pursuant to chapter 35, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. The appropriations and distributions made under this section constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of services for the purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$133,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$133,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$266,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for expenditure into the municipal criminal justice assistance account. The treasurer shall make quarterly distributions from the municipal criminal justice assistance account of the amounts provided in this section in accordance with RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330, for the purposes of reimbursing local jurisdictions for increased costs incurred as a result of the mandatory arrest of repeat offenders pursuant to chapter 35, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. The appropriations and distributions made under this section constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of services for the purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—HOME VISITING SERVICES ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$6,025,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$8,333,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$14,358,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account for the home visiting program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ANDY HILL CANCER RESEARCH ENDOWMENT FUND MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$951,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$951,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account per RCW 43.348.080 to fund the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Matching funds using the amounts appropriated in this section may not be used to fund new grants that exceed two years in duration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(2) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$82,800,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$86,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$168,800,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,100,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$6,700,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$13,800,000

(4) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720. FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS AND RESERVE OFFICERS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

There is appropriated for state contributions to the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund:

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,777,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,777,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount provided in this section is the maximum amount that may be expended. In addition the office of financial management must reduce the allotment of the amount provided in this section if allotment of the full appropriation will put the account into deficit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—FOUNDATIONAL PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$62,728,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$112,484,000

Foundational Public Health Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,788,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$178,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $62,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2022, $112,484,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2023, and $2,788,000 of the foundational public health services account—state appropriation are appropriated solely for distribution as provided in RCW 43.70.515.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COMMUNITY SERVICES ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the developmental disabilities community services account (Dan Thompson memorial community services account) for the purposes identified in RCW 71A.20.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—NORTHEAST WASHINGTON WOLF-LIVESTOCK MANAGEMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$496,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$456,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$952,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account for the deployment of nonlethal wolf deterrence resources as provided in chapter 16.76 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$19,618,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$19,618,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the long-term services and supports account pursuant to chapter 98, Laws of 2020 and chapter 363, Laws of 2019. This constitutes a loan from the general fund and must be repaid, with interest, to the general fund by June 30, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—INDIAN HEALTH IMPROVEMENT REINVESTMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$708,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$708,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,416,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Indian health improvement reinvestment account created in RCW 43.71B.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OUTDOOR EDUCATION ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$3,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the outdoor education and recreation program account for the purposes identified in RCW 79A.05.351.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—HORSE RACING COMMISSION OPERATING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$340,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$340,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the horse racing commission operating account created in RCW 67.16.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MEDICAID FRAUD PENALTY ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,300,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the medicaid fraud penalty account created in RCW 74.09.215.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$73,300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$73,300,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the disaster response account created in RCW 38.52.105 to ensure the account is not in deficit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—UNIVERSAL COMMUNICATIONS SERVICES ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$5,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the universal communications services account created in RCW 80.36.690.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONS ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,500,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$3,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the business and professions account created in RCW 43.24.150.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 732. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—IMPAIRED DRIVING ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$250,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$707,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$957,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the impaired driving safety account created in RCW 46.68.260 for local government costs related to Senate Bill No. 5054 (impaired driving). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts appropriated in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 733. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONSUMER PRIVACY ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$548,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$548,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the consumer privacy account created in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5062 (data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount appropriated in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 734. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SECRETARY OF STATE ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$157,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$165,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$96,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$157,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$587,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the secretary of state's billing authority for archives and records management. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92C-2021, dated March 25, 2021, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 735. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE AUDITOR AUDIT SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$15,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$39,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$21,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$96,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section reflects adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the state auditor's billing authority for state agency auditing services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92D-2021, dated March 25, 2021, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 736. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL LEGAL SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$2,202,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,748,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,209,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$1,688,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$7,863,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the attorney general's billing authority for legal services. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92E-2021, dated March 25, 2021, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 737. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$116,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$503,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$381,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$982,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,982,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of administrative hearings' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92G-2021, dated March 25, 2021, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 738. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$4,169,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$5,736,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,989,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$262,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$4,333,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$17,489,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the consolidated technology services' billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92J-2021, dated March 25, 2021, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 739. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,183,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$949,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$369,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$21,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$1,233,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,755,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the department of enterprise services' billing authority for archived and records management. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92K-2021, dated March 25, 2021, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 740. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT CENTRAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$30,241,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$2,766,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$396,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$663,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$10,601,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$44,667,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the office of financial management billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92R-2021, dated March 25, 2021, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 741. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$28,543,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$28,525,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,609,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$61,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$4,425,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$75,163,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect adjustments in agency appropriations related to corresponding adjustments in the self-insurance premium liability billing authority. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments in the amounts specified, and to the state agencies specified, in LEAP omnibus document 92X-2021, dated March 25, 2021, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 742. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—LEASED FACILITIES POOL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,836,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,605,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,222,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,663,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the state agency office relocation pool account created in RCW 43.41.455.

(2) Funds in the account are provided solely for the leased facility projects shown in LEAP omnibus document LEAS-2021, dated March 25, 2021, which is hereby incorporated by reference, to facilitate the transfer of money from other funds and accounts that are associated with projects contained in moneys from other funds and accounts to the state agency relocation pool account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

(3) Agencies may apply to the office of financial management to receive funds from the state agency office relocation pool account, in an amount not to exceed the amount identified in the LEAP omnibus document LEAS-2021, dated March 25, 2021.

(a) Prior to applying, agencies must submit a current relocation plan that identifies estimated one-time project costs by state fiscal year by lease contract and city, and include how the lease aligns to the agency's six year leased facility plan, to the office of financial management statewide oversight office.

(b) The office of financial management must copy legislative fiscal staff on the approval notice sent to agencies that specifies the amount approved by state fiscal year. The approval notice must include a copy of the materials submitted by the agency in their request for funds from the state agency office relocation pool.

(c) The office of financial management must track the approved amounts by agency and report the state agency office relocation pool account fund balance and the amounts approved by agency to legislative fiscal staff each fiscal month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 743. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ASSOCIATION OF WASHINGTON ASSISTANT ATTORNEYS GENERAL/WFSE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$578,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$601,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$110,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$7,228,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,517,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for eliminating the furlough days in the agreement reached with the association of Washington assistant attorneys general and approved in part IX of this act. Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 2021-compensation, dated March 25, 2021, to fund the provisions of this section upon execution of the memorandum of understanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 744. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WASHINGTON FEDERATION OF STATE EMPLOYEES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$40,604,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$40,985,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$38,200,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$2,341,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$61,716,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$183,846,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for eliminating the furlough days in the agreement reached with the Washington federation of state employees—general government and approved in part IX of this act. Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 2021-compensation, dated March 25, 2021, to fund the provisions of this section upon execution of the memorandum of understanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 745. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WFSE ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGES

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,013,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,013,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for eliminating the furlough days in the agreement reached with the Washington federation of state employees—administrative law judges and approved in part IX of this act. Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus 2021-compensation, dated March 25, 2021, to fund the provisions of this section upon execution of the memorandum of understanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 746. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WAFWP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,136,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,147,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,657,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$688,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$1,529,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$6,157,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for eliminating the furlough days in the agreement reached with the Washington association of fish and wildlife professionals and approved in part IX of this act. Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 2021-compensation, dated March 25, 2021, to fund the provisions of this section upon execution of the memorandum of understanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 747. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—WASHINGTON PUBLIC EMPLOYEES ASSOCIATION GENERAL GOVERNMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$4,438,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$4,470,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$537,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$4,022,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$13,477,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for eliminating the furlough days in the agreement reached with the Washington public employees association—general government and approved in part IX of this act. Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 2021-compensation, dated March 25, 2021, to fund the provisions of this section upon execution of the memorandum of understanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 748. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—PTE LOCAL 17

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$8,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$9,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$17,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for eliminating the furlough days in the agreement reached with the professional and technical employees local 17 and approved in part IX of this act. Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 2021-compensation, dated March 25, 2021, to fund the provisions of this section upon execution of the memorandum of understanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 749. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COALITION OF UNIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,750,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,756,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$690,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$493,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$3,350,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$8,039,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for eliminating the furlough days in the agreement reached with the coalition of unions and approved in part IX of this act. Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 2021-compensation, dated March 25, 2021, to fund the provisions of this section upon execution of the memorandum of understanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 750. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—SEIU HEALTHCARE 1199NW

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$1,062,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$1,068,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,732,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$284,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$114,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$4,260,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for eliminating the furlough days in the agreement reached with the service employees international union healthcare 1199nw and approved in part IX of this act. Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section. Appropriations for state agencies are increased by the amounts specified in LEAP omnibus document 2021-compensation, dated March 25, 2021, to fund the provisions of this section upon execution of the memorandum of understanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 751. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE HEALTH CARE AFFORDABILITY ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$50,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$50,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$100,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the state health care affordability account created in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5377 (standardized health plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts appropriated in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 752. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—STATE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE RELIEF ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$500,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$500,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the state unemployment insurance relief account created in Senate Bill No. 5478 (concerning unemployment insurance relief for certain employers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount appropriated in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 753. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—ENVIRONMENTAL MITIGATION SETTLEMENT ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$60,657,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$60,657,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the environmental mitigation settlement account created in section 961 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 754. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TEACHERS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM PLAN 1 FUND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$800,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$800,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for expenditure on June 30, 2023, into the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund, to be applied to the unfunded actuarial accrued liability. The legislature intends to appropriate additional general fund moneys into the account on June 30, 2025, to further reduce the unfunded actuarial accrued liability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 755. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COVID-19 PUBLIC HEALTH RESPONSE ACCOUNT—RESPONSE

General Fund—Federal Appropriation (ARPA)
. . . .
$900,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$900,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA), received pursuant to section 2401 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for expenditure into the COVID-19 public health response account, from which the department of health may make expenditures from this sum solely for the statewide response to the COVID-19 pandemic, including diagnostic testing, case investigation and contract tracing, care coordination, outbreak response, data collection and analysis, and other activities required to support the response.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 756. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COVID-19 PUBLIC HEALTH RESPONSE ACCOUNT—VACCINES

General Fund—Federal Appropriation (ARPA)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$100,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA), received pursuant to section 2301 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for expenditure into the COVID-19 public health response account, from which the department of health may make expenditures from this sum solely to plan for, prepare, and deploy the COVID-19 vaccine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 757. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—COVID-19 PUBLIC HEALTH RESPONSE ACCOUNT—WORKFORCE

General Fund—Federal Appropriation (ARPA)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$100,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA), received pursuant to section 2501 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, is provided solely for expenditure into the COVID-19 public health response account, from which the department of health may make expenditures from this sum solely to maintain and expand the state's public health workforce in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 758. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—PUBLIC COOPERATIVE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2023)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$10,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided solely for a loan to the public cooperative created in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5188 (public cooperative) for its start-up costs and short-term operational and administrative needs once the cooperative is activated. This constitutes a loan from the state to the public cooperative and must be repaid, with interest, to the state by June 30, 2024. The state treasurer must enter into a loan agreement with the public cooperative for this purpose with such terms the state treasurer deems appropriate. The legislature intends to make a financial contribution of $200 million dollars general fund—state into the public cooperative in fiscal year 2024, contingent on the public cooperative demonstrating the membership of at least 20 local or tribal governments in the public cooperative and membership deposits, contributions, or financial investment of at least $50 million dollars from the membership. If this contingency is met, the state treasurer will make the financial contribution to the public cooperative on behalf of the state. With the appropriation in this section and the funding committed in the four-year balanced budget outlook, the legislature has provided sufficient funding to capitalize the cooperative to issue debt with a competitive rating. If Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5188 (public cooperative) is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amounts appropriated in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 759. FOR THE GAMBLING COMMISSION—GAMBLING REVOLVING FUND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2022)
. . . .
$3,600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,600,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the gambling revolving fund created in RCW 9.46.100.

(End of part)

PART VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premium distributions
. . . .
$9,757,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorney

distributions
. . . .
$9,284,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and

education distributions
. . . .
$4,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for public utility

district excise tax distributions
. . . .
$66,759,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution to counties for publicly funded

autopsies
. . . .
$3,303,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for

harbor improvement revenue distributions
. . . .
$140,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for

distribution to "timber" counties
. . . .
$73,911,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$114,428,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$45,073,000

City-County Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
$39,939,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise tax distribution
. . . .
$76,474,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville

Reservation
. . . .
$8,612,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians
. . . .
$5,975,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor

profits distribution
. . . .
$98,876,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax

distributions
. . . .
$80,000

General Fund Appropriation for Marijuana Excise Tax

distributions
. . . .
$30,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for Habitat Conservation

Program distributions
. . . .
$5,754,000

General Fund Appropriation for payment in-lieu of

taxes to counties under Department of Fish and

Wildlife Program
. . . .
$4,040,000

Manufacturing and Warehousing Job Centers Account

Appropriation for cities under streamlined

sales tax mitigation program
. . . .
$12,150,000

Puget Sound Taxpayer Accountability Account

Appropriation for distribution to counties in

amounts not to exceed actual deposits into the

account and attributable to those counties'

share pursuant to RCW 43.79.520. If a county

eligible for distributions under RCW 43.79.520

has not adopted a sales and use tax under RCW

82.14.460 before July 1, 2019, then to prevent

these distributions from supplanting existing

local funding for vulnerable populations, the

distributions are subject to the procedural

requirements in this section. Before the county

may receive distributions, it must provide a

final budget for the distributions, submit the

final budget to the department of commerce, and

publish the final budget on its web site. To

develop this final budget, under RCW 36.40.040

the county must develop and hold hearings on a

preliminary budget that is separate from other

appropriations ordinances or resolutions, and

it must consult stakeholders, including

community service organizations, and must

consider input received during this process.

Before holding a hearing on the preliminary

budget, the county must notify local

governments in the county that are within the

borders of the regional transit authority, and

legislators whose districts are within those

borders. The county must then adopt a final

budget under RCW 36.40.080 for the

distributions that is separate from other

appropriations ordinances or resolutions. After

the county submits its final budget for the

distributions to the department of commerce,

the department must notify the state treasurer,

who may then make the distributions to the

county
. . . .
$33,460,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$642,015,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
$3,125,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$3,125,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions); and Senate Bill No. 5054 (impaired driving).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety Appropriation
. . . .
$2,083,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,083,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions); and Senate Bill No. 5054 (impaired driving).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control

funds distribution
. . . .
$64,000

General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees

distribution
. . . .
$50,000

General Fund Appropriation for federal military fees

distribution
. . . .
$160,000

Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest

reserve fund distribution
. . . .
$27,978,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to the

basic health plan trust account, the lesser of

the amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540

or this amount for fiscal year 2022,

$246,000,000 and this amount for fiscal year

2023, $252,000,000
. . . .
$498,000,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, the lesser of the amount

determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or this

amount for fiscal year 2022, $185,000,000 and

this amount for fiscal year 2023, $192,000,000
. . . .
$377,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the annual base payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2022
. . . .
$90,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the annual base payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2023
. . . .
$90,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the tobacco arbitration

payment to the tobacco settlement account,

$11,000,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $8,000,000

for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$19,000,000

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, $5,000,000 for fiscal

year 2022 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the fair fund under

RCW 15.76.115, $2,750,000 for fiscal year 2022

and $2,750,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$5,500,000

Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account: For

transfer to the aquatic lands enhancement

account, up to $40,000 for fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$40,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account: For transfer to the water pollution

control revolving account, $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$6,000,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account: For

transfer to the general fund as repayment for

start-up costs for the long-term services

program, the lesser of the amount determined by

the treasurer for full repayment of the

$17,040,000 transferred from the general fund

in the 2019-2021 biennium and $19,618,000

transferred from the general fund in fiscal

year 2022, which totals $36,658,000 transferred

from the general fund in the 2019-2021

biennium and fiscal year 2022 for start-up

costs with any related interest, or this amount

for fiscal year 2022, $40,000,000
. . . .
$40,000,000

Gambling Revolving Account: For transfer to the

state general fund as repayment of the loan

pursuant to chapter 127, Laws of 2020 (sports

wagering/compacts), $6,000,000 for fiscal year

2023
. . . .
$6,000,000

School Employees' Insurance Account: For transfer to

the state general fund as repayment of the

loan pursuant to section 704, chapter 299, Laws

of 2018 (operating budget--supplemental),

$16,587,000 for fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$16,587,000

General Fund: For transfer to the Washington housing

trust fund, $10,000,000 for fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the disaster response

account, to be available for appropriation in

the case of unanticipated disaster and recovery

efforts, for fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$800,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the developmental

disabilities community services account,

$50,000,000 for fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$50,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the manufacturing and

warehousing job centers account, $6,750,000 for

fiscal year 2022 and $5,400,000 for fiscal

year 2023
. . . .
$12,150,000

General Fund: For transfer to the taxpayer fairness

account, $5,083,000 for fiscal year 2022 and

$137,128,000 for fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$142,211,000

General Fund: For transfer to the forest resiliency

account, $26,000,000 for fiscal year 2022
. . . .
$26,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the workforce

education investment account, $9,000,000 for

fiscal year 2023
. . . .
$9,000,000

(End of part)

PART IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS

The appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed from the treasury during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902. EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS

Whenever allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance in the fund or funds which finance the agency. An appropriation is not necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903. STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS

In addition to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 and bond retirement and interest, including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94, 39.96, and 39.98 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904. BOND EXPENSES

In addition to such other appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905. VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT AND SEPARATION

(1) As a management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies may implement either a voluntary retirement or separation program, or both, that is cost neutral or results in cost savings, including costs to the state pension systems, over a two-year period following the commencement of the program, provided that such a program is approved by the director of financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization may offer voluntary retirement and/or separation incentives and options according to procedures and guidelines established by the office of financial management in consultation with the department of retirement systems. The options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for voluntary separation or retirement. An employee does not have a contractual right to a financial incentive offered under this section. The office of financial management and the department of retirement systems may review and monitor incentive offers. Agencies are required to submit a report by the date established by the office of financial management in the guidelines required in this section to the legislature and the office of financial management on the outcome of their approved incentive program. The report should include information on the details of the program, including the incentive payment amount for each participant, the total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings over the two-year period.

(2) The department of retirement systems may collect from employers the actuarial cost of any incentive provided under this program, or any other incentive to retire provided by employers to members of the state's pension systems, for deposit in the appropriate pension account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED

Nothing in this act prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS

The following sections represent the results of the 2021-2023 collective bargaining process required under the provisions of chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 74.39A RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in this part IX of this act are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements. The collective bargaining agreements contained in this part IX of this act may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases, but does include 24 furlough days for employees in positions that do not require the position to be backfilled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WAFWP

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington association of fish and wildlife professionals under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases, but does include 24 furlough days for employees in positions that do not require the position to be backfilled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—PTE LOCAL 17

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the professional and technical employees local 17 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases, but does include 24 furlough days for employees in positions that do not require the position to be backfilled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—SEIU HEALTHCARE 1199NW

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 1199nw under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases, but does include 24 furlough days for employees in positions that do not require the position to be backfilled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—COALITION OF UNIONS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the coalition of unions under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which includes 24 furlough days for employees in positions that do not require the position to be backfilled. Funding is also provided for a 2.5 percent wage increase for fiscal year 2022 and a 2.5 percent wage increase for fiscal year 2023 for the department of corrections marine vessel operators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—ASSOCIATION OF WASHINGTON ASSISTANT ATTORNEYS GENERAL/WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the association of Washington assistant attorneys general/Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which includes some minor modifications but does not include wage increases. In addition, the agreement includes 24 furlough days for designated positions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WFSE ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGES

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees administrative law judges under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. This is the first agreement since the grant of collective bargaining rights in the 2020 legislative session. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which includes the implementation of the Washington general government standard progression salary schedule that includes periodic increments that begin July 1, 2022. In addition, the agreement includes 24 furlough days for designated positions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—DFW SERGEANTS ASSOCIATION/TEAMSTERS 760

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the department of fish and wildlife sergeants association/teamsters 760 under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. This is the first stand-alone agreement for this unit since its separation from the coalition of unions under chapter 41.80 RCW provided in the 2020 legislative session. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases but does allow the agreement to be reopened to negotiate compensation for fiscal year 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—FISH AND WILDLIFE ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS GUILD

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the fish and wildlife enforcement officers guild through an interest arbitration award under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. This is the first stand-alone agreement for this unit since its separation from the coalition of unions under chapter 41.80 RCW provided in the 2020 legislative session. Funding is provided to fund the award, which does not include wage increases but does allow the agreement to be reopened to negotiate base rate of pay for fiscal year 2023. The arbitration award also includes and funding is provided for an education incentive for employees who have obtained an associate's degree (2 percent of base pay) or bachelor's degree (4 percent of base pay), increased opportunities to work on holidays and receive holiday pay, and workers compensation top-off pay equivalent to the LEOFF II supplement. Finally, funding is provided for an increase in the clothing allowance for qualifying employees by $100 per year per employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WFSE HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITY COLLEGE COALITION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees community college coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WPEA HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITY COLLEGE COALITION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington public employees association community college coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol troopers association under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include general wages increases but does provide the ability to request to reopen the compensation article for the purpose of bargaining base rate of pay for fiscal year 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 920. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WSP LIEUTENANTS AND CAPTAINS ASSOCIATION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol lieutenants and captains association under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include general wages increases but does provide the ability to request to reopen the compensation article for the purpose of bargaining base rate of pay for fiscal year 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 921. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WPEA

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington public employees association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include wage increases, but does include 24 furlough days for employees in positions that do not require the position to be backfilled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 922. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—TEAMSTERS LOCAL 117

An agreement has not been reached between the governor and the international brotherhood of teamsters local 117 pursuant to chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 41.80.010(6), funding is provided for fiscal year 2022 to fund the terms of the 2019-2021 agreement and for fiscal year 2023 to fund the terms according to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 923. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—SEIU 925

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the service employees international union local 925 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The agreement includes and funding is provided for an extension of the 2019–2021 collective bargaining agreement. The agreement does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 924. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—SEIU 1199 RESEARCH/HALL HEALTH

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the service employees international union local 1199 research/hall health under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The agreement includes and funding is provided for an extension of the 2019–2021 collective bargaining agreement. The agreement does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 925. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—TEAMSTERS LOCAL 117 POLICE

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and teamster local 117 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The agreement includes and funding is provided for an extension of the 2019–2021 collective bargaining agreement. The agreement does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 926. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—WFSE POLICE MANAGEMENT

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the Washington federation of state employees police management under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The agreement includes and funding is provided for an extension of the 2019–2021 collective bargaining agreement. The agreement does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 927. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The agreement includes and funding is provided for an extension of the 2019–2021 collective bargaining agreement, and an expansion of the Harborview and University of Washington Medical Center EVS custodians weekend premium. The agreement does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 928. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between the Washington State University and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include changes to compensation or benefits. In addition, the agreement does not include mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 929. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY—WSU POLICE GUILD BARGAINING UNIT 4

An agreement has been reached between the Washington State University and the WSU police guild bargaining unit 4 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include changes to compensation or benefits. In addition, the agreement does not include mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 930. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY—INTERNATIONAL UNION OF OPERATING ENGINEERS

An agreement has not been reached between the Washington State University and the international union of operating engineers under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 41.80.010(6), funding is provided for fiscal year 2022 to fund the terms of the 2019-2021 agreement and for fiscal year 2023 to fund the terms according to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 931. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between Central Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 932. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—PSE

An agreement has been reached between Central Washington University and the public school employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 933. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between The Evergreen State College and the Washington federation of state employees supervisory and nonsupervisory units under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 934. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between Western Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining units A, B, and E under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 935. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—PSE

An agreement has not been reached between Western Washington University and the public school employees bargaining units D and PT under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 41.80.010(6), funding is provided for fiscal year 2022 to fund the terms of the 2019-2021 agreement and for fiscal year 2023 to fund the terms according to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 936. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY—WFSE

An agreement has been reached between Eastern Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 937. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—YAKIMA VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE—WPEA

An agreement has been reached between Yakima Valley Community College and the Washington public employees association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 938. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT—HIGHLINE COMMUNITY COLLEGE—WPEA

An agreement has been reached between Highline Community College and the Washington public employees association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to fund the agreement, which does not include either a general wage increase or mandatory employee furloughs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 939. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—ELIMINATING FURLOUGH DAYS

(1) Appropriations in part VII of this act provide sufficient funding to eliminate the furlough days required in the following collective bargaining agreements for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium:

(a) Washington federation of state employees;

(b) Washington association of fish and wildlife professionals;

(c) Professional and technical employees local 17;

(d) Service employees international union healthcare 1199nw;

(e) The coalition of unions;

(f) Association of Washington assistant attorneys general/Washington federation of state employees;

(g) Washington federation of state employees administrative law judges; and

(h) Washington public employees association general government.

(2) Expenditure of the amounts provided for this purpose is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 940. COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—HEALTH CARE COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2021-2023 biennium between the governor and the health care coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2021-2023 collective bargaining agreement, which maintains the provisions of the prior agreement, other than provision of gift cards through the wellness program, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $936 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2022. For fiscal year 2023, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1,091 per eligible employee. These rates are sufficient to cover the cost of contributions to the flexible spending accounts of eligible employees, as provided in the health care coalition agreement.

The board shall collect a $25 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment if directed by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 941. COMPENSATION—REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE HEALTH CARE COALITION—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the coalition for health benefits, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, may not exceed $936 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2022. For fiscal year 2023, the monthly employer funding rate may not exceed $1,091 per eligible employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 942. COMPENSATION—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

An agreement was reached for the 2021-2023 biennium between the governor and the school employee coalition under the provisions of chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW. Appropriations in this act for allocations to school districts are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2021-2023 collective bargaining agreement, which maintains the provisions of the prior agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, school employees' benefits board administration, retiree remittance, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $1,000 per eligible employee in July and August 2021. Beginning September 1, 2021, through August 30, 2022, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $968 per eligible employee. Beginning September 1, 2022, through August 30, 2023, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1,032 per eligible employee.

(2) For the purposes of distributing insurance benefits, certificated staff units as determined in section 504 of this act will be multiplied by 1.02 and classified staff units as determined in section 504 of this act will be multiplied by 1.43.

(3) Except as provided by the parties' health care agreement, in order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the school employees' benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.740. The board shall collect a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment if directed by the legislature.

(4) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the school employees' medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the school employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts may not be used for administrative expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 943. COMPENSATION—NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES—INSURANCE BENEFITS

Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The employer monthly funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $936 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2022. For fiscal year 2023, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1,091 per eligible employee. These rates assume the use of plan surplus in both fiscal years.

(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2022 and 2023, the subsidy shall be up to $183 per month. Funds from reserves accumulated for future adverse claims experience, from past favorable claims experience, or otherwise, may not be used to increase this retiree subsidy beyond what is authorized by the legislature in this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 944. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—WFSE LANGUAGE ACCESS PROVIDERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for an in-person interpreting rate increase of $0.12 per hour for each of fiscal year 2022 and fiscal year 2023. In addition, other terms of the agreement that are funded include a continuation of the social service mileage premium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 945. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—SEIU LOCAL 775 HOME CARE WORKERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union local 775 through an interest arbitration award under the provisions of chapter 74.39A RCW and 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the arbitration award that includes increases to wages and benefits and certain improvements in the second year of the agreement. Wages are increased approximately 3 percent over the biennium. Health care contributions are increased 5 percent each year of the agreement. Beginning July 1, 2022, individual providers will receive credit on the wage scale for verifiable hours worked for a related home care agency and time and one-half pay for hours worked on two holidays (Independence Day and New Year's Eve).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 946. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—SEIU LOCAL 925 CHILDCARE WORKERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union local 925 under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for an increase in the hourly rate of care provided by family, friends, and neighbor providers (FFNs) in fiscal year 2023 from $2.65 to $3.00. The agreement maintains the current subsidy rates for licensed providers for fiscal year 2022 and includes an agreement to bargain over possible adjustments to rates for fiscal year 2023. In addition, the agreement includes and funding is provided to increase the rate paid to providers who reach level 3.5 of the state's early achievers quality rating system by 2 percent, bringing the rate to 15 percent above the base subsidy rate. Lastly, the agreement includes and funding is provided to increase the nonstandard hour care rate from $80.00 to $90.00 per child per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 947. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES—ADULT FAMILY HOME COUNCIL

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a 3 percent increase to the wages and administrative component of the base daily rate adult family home providers receive for CARE classifications A through D beginning July 1, 2021, and a 3 percent increase in E classifications beginning July 1, 2022. The agreement also includes and funds are provided for a one-time, 3 percent increase to the health care and mandatory training components of the rates beginning July 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 948. FOREGONE GENERAL WAGE INCREASES

Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to provide a three percent or two percent general wage increase, effective July 1, 2021, for employees that were scheduled to receive a general wage increase of either of those amounts on July 1, 2020, that was forgone due to COVID-19 emergency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 949. COMPENSATION—REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION RATES

The appropriations in this act for school districts and state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are adjusted to reflect changes to agency appropriations to reflect pension contribution rates adopted by the pension funding council and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 950. JUNETEENTH HOLIDAY

Funding is provided for the cost to agencies of additional staff necessary to provide coverage in positions that require continual presence, as a result of implementing House Bill No. 1016 (making Juneteenth a legal holiday).

Sec. 951. 2020 c 127 s 14 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The sum of six million dollars is appropriated from the general fund—state for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, and is provided solely for expenditure into the gambling revolving account. The gambling commission may expend from the gambling revolving account from moneys attributable to the appropriation in this section solely for enforcement actions in the illicit market for sports wagering and for implementation of this act. The appropriation in this section constitutes a loan from the general fund to the gambling revolving account that must be repaid with net interest by June 30, ((2021))2023.

Sec. 952. RCW 28B.115.070 and 2019 c 415 s 954, 2019 c 406 s 72, and 2019 c 302 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) After June 1, 1992, the department, in consultation with the office and the department of social and health services, shall:

(((1)))(a) Determine eligible credentialed health care professions for the purposes of the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program and the behavioral health loan repayment program authorized by this chapter. Eligibility shall be based upon an assessment that determines that there is a shortage or insufficient availability of a credentialed profession so as to jeopardize patient care and pose a threat to the public health and safety. The department shall consider the relative degree of shortages among professions when determining eligibility. The department may add or remove professions from eligibility based upon the determination that a profession is no longer in shortage. Should a profession no longer be eligible, participants or eligible students who have received scholarships shall be eligible to continue to receive scholarships or loan repayments until they are no longer eligible or until their service obligation has been completed;

(((2)))(b) Determine health professional shortage areas for each of the eligible credentialed health care professions; and

(((3)))(c) Determine underserved behavioral health areas for each of the eligible credentialed health care professions.

(2) For the 2017-2019((and)), 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, consideration for eligibility shall also be given to registered nursing students who have been accepted into an eligible nursing education program and have declared an intention to teach nursing upon completion of the nursing education program.

(3) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, eligibility for loan repayment shall also be given to chiropractors.

Sec. 953. RCW 38.52.105 and 2020 c 7 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The disaster response account is created in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in the account from legislative appropriations and transfers, federal appropriations, or any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for support of state agency and local government disaster response and recovery efforts, including response by state and local government and federally recognized tribes to the novel coronavirus pursuant to the gubernatorial declaration of emergency of February 29, 2020, and to reimburse the workers' compensation funds and self-insured employers under RCW 51.16.220. During the 2017-2019 ((and)), 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, expenditures from the disaster response account may be used for military department operations and to support wildland fire suppression preparedness, prevention, and restoration activities by state agencies and local governments. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the disaster response account to the state general fund. It is the intent of the legislature that these policies will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

Sec. 954. RCW 41.06.280 and 2019 c 415 s 957 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury, designated as the "personnel service fund," to be used by the office of financial management as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and operations required for the administration of the provisions of this chapter, applicable provisions of chapter 41.04 RCW, and chapter 41.60 RCW. An amount not to exceed one and one-half percent of the salaries and wages for all positions in the classified service in each of the agencies subject to this chapter, except the institutions of higher education, shall be charged to the operations appropriations of each agency and credited to the personnel service fund as the allotments are approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, the amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to be fixed by the director from time to time which, together with income derived from services rendered under RCW 41.06.080, will provide the office of financial management with funds to meet its anticipated expenditures during the allotment period, including the training requirements in RCW 41.06.500 and 41.06.530. All revenues, net of expenditures, previously derived from services provided by the department of enterprise services under RCW 41.06.080 must be transferred to the enterprise services account.

(2) The director shall fix the terms and charges for services rendered by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 41.06.080, which amounts shall be credited to the personnel service fund and charged against the proper fund or appropriation of the recipient of such services on a monthly basis. Payment for services so rendered under RCW 41.06.080 shall be made on a monthly basis to the state treasurer and deposited in the personnel service fund.

(3) Moneys from the personnel service fund shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the office of financial management.

(4) During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the office of financial management may use the personnel service fund to administer an employee transit pass program. The office of financial management must bill state agencies for the total cost of administering the program and payments received from agencies must be deposited in the personnel service fund.

(5) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the office of financial management may use the personnel service fund to administer an employee flexible spending arrangement. The office of financial management must bill state agencies for the total cost of administering the program and payments received from agencies must be deposited in the personnel service fund.

Sec. 955. RCW 41.45.230 and 2019 c 415 s 959 are each amended to read as follows:

The pension funding stabilization account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for payment of state government employer contributions for members of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the public safety employees' retirement system, and during the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia for the judicial retirement system. The account may not be used to pay for any new benefit or for any benefit increase that takes effect after July 1, 2005. An increase that is provided in accordance with a formula that is in existence on July 1, 2005, is not considered a benefit increase for this purpose. Moneys in the account shall be for the exclusive use of the specified retirement systems and may be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to RCW 43.84.080. For purposes of RCW 43.135.034, expenditures from the pension funding stabilization account shall not be considered a state program cost shift from the state general fund to another account.

Sec. 956. RCW 41.80.010 and 2020 c 77 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of negotiating collective bargaining agreements under this chapter, the employer shall be represented by the governor or governor's designee, except as provided for institutions of higher education in subsection (4) of this section.

(2)(a)(i) Except as otherwise provided, if an exclusive bargaining representative represents more than one bargaining unit, the exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate with each employer representative as designated in subsection (1) of this section one master collective bargaining agreement on behalf of all the employees in bargaining units that the exclusive bargaining representative represents.

(ii) For those exclusive bargaining representatives who represent fewer than a total of five hundred employees each, negotiation shall be by a coalition of all those exclusive bargaining representatives. The coalition shall bargain for a master collective bargaining agreement covering all of the employees represented by the coalition. The governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative or representatives are authorized to enter into supplemental bargaining of agency-specific issues for inclusion in or as an addendum to the master collective bargaining agreement, subject to the parties' agreement regarding the issues and procedures for supplemental bargaining. Exclusive bargaining representatives that represent employees covered under chapter 41.06 RCW and exclusive bargaining representatives that represent employees exempt under chapter 41.06 RCW shall constitute separate coalitions and must negotiate separate master collective bargaining agreements. This subsection does not prohibit cooperation and coordination of bargaining between two or more exclusive bargaining representatives.

(b) This subsection does not apply to exclusive bargaining representatives who represent employees of institutions of higher education, except when the institution of higher education has elected to exercise its option under subsection (4) of this section to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(c) If five hundred or more employees of an independent state elected official listed in RCW 43.01.010 are organized in a bargaining unit or bargaining units under RCW 41.80.070, the official shall be consulted by the governor or the governor's designee before any agreement is reached under (a) of this subsection concerning supplemental bargaining of agency specific issues affecting the employees in such bargaining unit.

(d) For assistant attorneys general, the governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement.

(3) The governor shall submit a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreement or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement. Requests for funds necessary to implement the provisions of bargaining agreements shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(a) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(b) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the request for funds as a whole. The legislature shall not consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement unless the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement or the exclusive bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in RCW 41.80.090.

(4)(a)(i) For the purpose of negotiating agreements for institutions of higher education, the employer shall be the respective governing board of each of the universities, colleges, or community colleges or a designee chosen by the board to negotiate on its behalf.

(ii) A governing board of a university or college may elect to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section, except that:

(A) The governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units of employees of a university or college that the representative represents; or

(B) If the parties mutually agree, the governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units of employees of more than one university or college that the representative represents.

(iii) A governing board of a community college may elect to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(b) Prior to entering into negotiations under this chapter, the institutions of higher education or their designees shall consult with the director of the office of financial management regarding financial and budgetary issues that are likely to arise in the impending negotiations.

(c)(i) In the case of bargaining agreements reached between institutions of higher education other than the University of Washington and exclusive bargaining representatives agreed to under the provisions of this chapter, if appropriations are necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the bargaining agreements, the governor shall submit a request for such funds to the legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, except as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection.

(ii) In the case of bargaining agreements reached between the University of Washington and exclusive bargaining representatives agreed to under the provisions of this chapter, if appropriations are necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of a bargaining agreement, the governor shall submit a request for such funds to the legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, except as provided in this subsection (4)(c)(ii) and as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection.

(A) If appropriations of less than ten thousand dollars are necessary to implement the provisions of a bargaining agreement, a request for such funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless the request has been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the request is to be considered.

(B) If appropriations of ten thousand dollars or more are necessary to implement the provisions of a bargaining agreement, a request for such funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless the request:

(I) Has been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the request is to be considered; and

(II) Has been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

(C) If the director of the office of financial management does not certify a request under (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection as being feasible financially for the state, the parties shall enter into collective bargaining solely for the purpose of reaching a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement necessary to address the absence of those requested funds. The legislature may act upon the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the modified collective bargaining agreement if those provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.

(iii) In the case of a bargaining unit of employees of institutions of higher education in which the exclusive bargaining representative is certified during or after the conclusion of a legislative session, the legislature may act upon the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the unit's initial collective bargaining agreement if those provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.

(5) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

(6) After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter, all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement, not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

(7)(a) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may approve funding for a collective bargaining agreement negotiated by a higher education institution and the Washington federation of state employees and ratified by the exclusive bargaining representative before final legislative action on the omnibus appropriations act by the sitting legislature.

(b) Subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section do not apply to requests for funding made pursuant to this subsection.

(8)(a) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may approve funding for a collective bargaining agreement negotiated by the governor or governor's designee and the Washington public employees association for community college coalition and the general government agencies and ratified by the exclusive bargaining representative before final legislative action on the omnibus appropriations act by the sitting legislature.

(b) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may approve funding for a collective bargaining agreement negotiated between Highline Community College and the Washington public employees association and ratified by the exclusive bargaining representative before final legislative action on the omnibus appropriations act by the sitting legislature.

(c) Subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section do not apply to requests for funding made pursuant to this subsection.

Sec. 957. RCW 43.08.190 and 2019 c 415 s 962 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be known as the "state treasurer's service fund." Such fund shall be used solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation and administration of the state treasurer's office.

Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and accounts specified in RCW 43.79A.040(4)(c). The allocation shall precede the distribution of the remaining earnings as prescribed under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer shall establish a uniform allocation rate for all funds and accounts; except that the state treasurer may negotiate a different allocation rate with any state agency that has independent authority over funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury or in the custody of the state treasurer. In no event shall the rate be less than the actual costs incurred by the state treasurer's office. If no rate is separately negotiated, the default rate for any funds held shall be the rate set for funds held pursuant to statute.

During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent biennia. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund.

Sec. 958. RCW 43.09.475 and 2019 c 415 s 963 are each amended to read as follows:

The performance audits of government account is hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Revenue identified in RCW 82.08.020(5) and 82.12.0201 shall be deposited in the account. Money in the account shall be used to fund the performance audits and follow-up performance audits under RCW 43.09.470 and shall be expended by the state auditor in accordance with chapter 1, Laws of 2006. Only the state auditor or the state auditor's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. During the 2017-2019 ((and)), 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the performance audits of government account may be appropriated for the joint legislative audit and review committee, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the office of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction, the department of fish and wildlife, and audits of school districts. In addition, during the 2017-2019 ((and)), 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia the account may be used to fund the office of financial management's contract for the compliance audit of the state auditor and audit activities at the department of revenue.

Sec. 959. RCW 43.43.839 and 2019 c 415 s 964 are each amended to read as follows:

The fingerprint identification account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from incremental charges of fingerprint checks requested for noncriminal justice purposes and electronic background requests shall be deposited in the account. Receipts for fingerprint checks by the federal bureau of investigation may also be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the cost of record checks. Only the chief of the state patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. The account shall be subject to appropriation. During the 2017-2019 ((and)), 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, funds in the account may be used for expenditures related to the upgrade of the state patrol's criminal history system. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the account may be used for building the sexual assault kit tracking system. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

Sec. 960. RCW 43.79.195 and 2020 c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The workforce education investment account is created in the state treasury. All revenues from the workforce investment surcharge created in RCW 82.04.299 and those revenues as specified under RCW 82.04.290(2)(c) must be deposited directly into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for higher education programs, higher education operations, higher education compensation, and state-funded student aid programs. For the 2019-2021 ((biennium))and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, expenditures from the account may be used for kindergarten through twelfth grade if used for career connected learning as provided for in chapter 406, Laws of 2019.

(2) Expenditures from the workforce education investment account must be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funding for higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 961. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The environmental mitigation settlement account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other funding directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account are dedicated to activities that include but are not limited to mitigation actions, studies, and monitoring of impacts related to the use and spread of chemicals and toxics such as polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs).

(2) This section expires December 31, 2031.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 962. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account consist of federal funding from the elementary and secondary school emergency relief fund created by section 2001, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the authorized purposes of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief fund. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 963. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The coronavirus state fiscal recovery account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account consist of federal funding from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund created by section 9901, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 964. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The forest resiliency account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other funding directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account are dedicated to activities that include but are not limited to forest health, carbon sequestration, and any other activity that helps protect the forests of Washington.

Sec. 965. RCW 43.79.270 and 2005 c 319 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Whenever))Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, whenever any money, from the federal government, or from other sources, which was not anticipated in the budget approved by the legislature has actually been received and is designated to be spent for a specific purpose, the head of any department, agency, board, or commission through which such expenditure shall be made is to submit to the governor a statement which may be in the form of a request for an allotment amendment setting forth the facts constituting the need for such expenditure and the estimated amount to be expended: PROVIDED, That no expenditure shall be made in excess of the actual amount received, and no money shall be expended for any purpose except the specific purpose for which it was received. A copy of any proposal submitted to the governor to expend money from an appropriated fund or account in excess of appropriations provided by law which is based on the receipt of unanticipated revenues shall be submitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee and also to the standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate if the legislature is in session at the same time as it is transmitted to the governor.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, whenever money from any source that was not anticipated in the transportation budget approved by the legislature has actually been received and is designated to be spent for a specific purpose, the head of a department, agency, board, or commission through which the expenditure must be made shall submit to the governor a statement, which may be in the form of a request for an allotment amendment, setting forth the facts constituting the need for the expenditure and the estimated amount to be expended. However, no expenditure may be made in excess of the actual amount received, and no money may be expended for any purpose except the specific purpose for which it was received. A copy of any proposal submitted to the governor to expend money from an appropriated transportation fund or account in excess of appropriations provided by law that is based on the receipt of unanticipated revenues must be submitted, at a minimum, to the standing committees on transportation of the house and senate at the same time as it is transmitted to the governor.

(3) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, whenever any money in the amount of $5,000,000 or more, from the federal government, or from other sources, which was not anticipated in the operating or capital budget approved by the legislature has been awarded or has actually been received when the legislature is not in session and the use of the money is unrestricted or provides discretion to use the moneys for more than one agency, program, or purpose, the governor must:

(a) Submit a copy of the proposed allotment amendment to the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee;

(b) Provide an explanation of the timing, source, and availability of such funds and why the need for the expenditure could not have been anticipated in time for such expenditure to have been approved as part of a budget act for that particular fiscal year; and

(c) Provide the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee 14 calendar days from submittal to provide the committee the opportunity to review and comment on the proposed allotment amendment before approving under RCW 43.79.280.

Sec. 966. RCW 43.79.280 and 2009 c 549 s 5150 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((If))Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, if the governor approves such estimate in whole or part, he or she shall endorse on each copy of the statement his or her approval, together with a statement of the amount approved in the form of an allotment amendment, and transmit one copy to the head of the department, agency, board, or commission authorizing the expenditure. An identical copy of the governor's statement of approval and a statement of the amount approved for expenditure shall be transmitted simultaneously to the joint legislative audit and review committee and also to the standing committee on ways and means of the house and senate of all executive approvals of proposals to expend money in excess of appropriations provided by law.

(2) If the governor approves an estimate with transportation funding implications, in whole or part, he or she shall endorse on each copy of the statement his or her approval, together with a statement of the amount approved in the form of an allotment amendment, and transmit one copy to the head of the department, agency, board, or commission authorizing the expenditure. An identical copy of the governor's statement of approval of a proposal to expend transportation money in excess of appropriations provided by law and a statement of the amount approved for expenditure must be transmitted simultaneously to the standing committees on transportation of the house and senate.

(3) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, before the governor may approve a proposed allotment amendment impacting the operating or capital budget as provided in RCW 43.79.270(3), the governor must provide the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee 14 calendar days from submittal to review and comment on the proposal. If the governor approves a proposed allotment amendment that committee rejected or is not modified to reflect the committee's alternative allotment amendment, the governor must submit a written explanation of the reasoning of such action to the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee within 5 days of approval. To change the amount, use, or purpose of an approved allotment amendment under this subsection, the head of any department, agency, board, or commission must request the change using the process provided in RCW 43.79.270(3). For all other changes, if the governor approves the change, a copy of the statement of approval must be sent to the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee.

Sec. 967. RCW 43.88C.010 and 2020 c 352 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers as the members deem necessary.

(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.

(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by the council.

(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions specified by the member.

(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means:

(a) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the services of public assistance programs, state correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support;

(b) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college bound scholarship program and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(c) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college grant program under RCW 28B.92.200 and 28B.92.205 and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030; and

(d) The number of children who are eligible, as defined in RCW 43.216.505, to participate in, and the number of children actually served by, the early childhood education and assistance program.

(8) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the temporary assistance for needy families and the working connections child care programs as a courtesy.

(9) The caseload forecast council shall present the number of individuals who are assessed as eligible for and have requested a service through the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver administered by the developmental disabilities administration as a courtesy. The caseload forecast council shall be presented with the service request list as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 to aid in development of this information.

(10) The caseload forecast council shall forecast youth participating in the extended foster care program pursuant to RCW 74.13.031 separately from other children who are residing in foster care and who are under eighteen years of age.

(11) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the number of youth expected to receive behavioral rehabilitation services while involved in the foster care system and the number of screened in reports of child abuse or neglect.

(12) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

(13) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and beginning with the November 2021 forecast, the caseload forecast council shall produce an unofficial forecast of the long-term caseload for juvenile rehabilitation as a courtesy.

Sec. 968. RCW 43.99N.060 and 2009 c 497 s 6026 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The stadium and exhibition center account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.0494 and distributions under RCW 67.70.240(((5)))(1)(d) shall be deposited into the account. Only the director of the office of financial management or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is not required for expenditures from this account.

(2) Until bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, up to five million dollars per year beginning January 1, 1999, shall be used for the purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section, all remaining moneys in the account shall be transferred to the public stadium authority, created under RCW 36.102.020, to be used for public stadium authority operations and development of the stadium and exhibition center.

(3) After bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, all moneys in the stadium and exhibition center account shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in the following priority:

(a) On or before June 30th of each year, the office of financial management shall accumulate in the stadium and exhibition center account an amount at least equal to the amount required in the next succeeding twelve months for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020;

(b) An additional reserve amount not in excess of the expected average annual principal and interest requirements of bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be accumulated and maintained in the account, subject to withdrawal by the state treasurer at any time if necessary to meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, and, following any withdrawal, reaccumulated from the first tax revenues and other amounts deposited in the account after meeting the requirements of (a) of this subsection; and

(c) The balance, if any, shall be transferred to the youth athletic facility account under subsection (4) of this section.

Any revenues derived from the taxes authorized by RCW 36.38.010(5) and 36.38.040 or other amounts that if used as provided under (a) and (b) of this subsection would cause the loss of any tax exemption under federal law for interest on bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be deposited in and used exclusively for the purposes of the youth athletic facility account and shall not be used, directly or indirectly, as a source of payment of principal of or interest on bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020, or to replace or reimburse other funds used for that purpose.

(4) Any moneys in the stadium and exhibition center account not required or permitted to be used for the purposes described in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section shall be deposited in the youth athletic facility account hereby created in the state treasury. Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of grants or loans to cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations for community outdoor athletic facilities. Only the director of the recreation and conservation office or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The athletic facility grants or loans may be used for acquiring, developing, equipping, maintaining, and improving community outdoor athletic facilities. Funds shall be divided equally between the development of new community outdoor athletic facilities, the improvement of existing community outdoor athletic facilities, and the maintenance of existing community outdoor athletic facilities. Cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations must submit proposals for grants or loans from the account. To the extent that funds are available, cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations must meet eligibility criteria as established by the director of the recreation and conservation office. The grants and loans shall be awarded on a competitive application process and the amount of the grant or loan shall be in proportion to the population of the city or county for where the community outdoor athletic facility is located. Grants or loans awarded in any one year need not be distributed in that year. In the 2009-2011 biennium, if there are not enough project applications submitted in a category within the account to meet the requirement of equal distribution of funds to each category, the director of the recreation and conservation office may distribute any remaining funds to other categories within the account. The director of the recreation and conservation office may expend up to one and one-half percent of the moneys deposited in the account created in this subsection for administrative purposes. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the youth athletic facility account to support a task force to consider ways to improve equitable access to K-12 schools' fields and athletic facilities and local parks agency facilities with the goal of increasing physical activity for youth and families. A portion of the appropriation must be used to inventory K-12 school fields and athletic facilities and park agency facilities.

Sec. 969. RCW 43.101.200 and 2019 c 415 s 969 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All law enforcement personnel, except volunteers, and reserve officers whether paid or unpaid, initially employed on or after January 1, 1978, shall engage in basic law enforcement training which complies with standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080. For personnel initially employed before January 1, 1990, such training shall be successfully completed during the first fifteen months of employment of such personnel unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission and shall be requisite to the continuation of such employment. Personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990, shall commence basic training during the first six months of employment unless the basic training requirement is otherwise waived or extended by the commission. Successful completion of basic training is requisite to the continuation of employment of such personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission shall provide the aforementioned training together with necessary facilities, supplies, materials, and the board and room of noncommuting attendees for seven days per week, except during the 2017-2019 ((and)), 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia when the employing, county, city, or state law enforcement agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel. Additionally, to the extent funds are provided for this purpose, the commission shall reimburse to participating law enforcement agencies with ten or less full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training: PROVIDED, That such reimbursement shall include only the actual cost of temporary replacement not to exceed the total amount of salary and benefits received by the replaced officer during his or her training period.

Sec. 970. RCW 43.101.220 and 2020 c 119 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The corrections personnel of the state and all counties and municipal corporations initially employed on or after January 1, 1982, shall engage in basic corrections training which complies with standards adopted by the commission. The standards adopted must provide for basic corrections training of at least ten weeks in length for any corrections officers subject to the certification requirement under RCW 43.101.096 who are hired on or after July 1, 2021, or on an earlier date set by the commission. The training shall be successfully completed during the first six months of employment of the personnel, unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission, and shall be requisite to the continuation of employment.

(2) The commission shall provide the training required in this section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room and board for noncommuting attendees, except during the 2017-2019 ((and)), 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, when the employing county, municipal corporation, or state agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel.

(3)(a) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the Washington state department of corrections prisons division. The Washington state department of corrections is responsible for identifying training standards, designing curricula and programs, and providing the training for those corrections personnel employed by it. In doing so, the secretary of the department of corrections shall consult with staff development experts and correctional professionals both inside and outside of the agency, to include soliciting input from labor organizations.

(b) The commission and the department of corrections share the responsibility of developing and defining training standards and providing training for community corrections officers employed within the community corrections division of the department of corrections.

Sec. 971. RCW 43.155.050 and 2019 c 415 s 972 and 2019 c 413 s 7033 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving fund and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Not more than twenty percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, the aviation revitalization loan program, the community economic revitalization board broadband program, and the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia. If chapter 365, Laws of 2019 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511, broadband service) is enacted by June 30, 2019, then during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the statewide broadband account. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the public works assistance account for activities related to the voluntary stewardship program, rural economic development, and the growth management act.

Sec. 972. RCW 43.185C.060 and 2020 c 357 s 915 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The home security fund account is created in the state treasury, subject to appropriation. The state's portion of the surcharge established in RCW 36.22.179 and 36.22.1791 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for homeless housing programs as described in this chapter.

(2) The department must distinguish allotments from the account made to carry out the activities in RCW 43.330.167, 43.330.700 through 43.330.715, 43.330.911, 43.185C.010, 43.185C.250 through 43.185C.320, and 36.22.179(1)(b).

(3) The office of financial management must secure an independent expenditure review of state funds received under RCW 36.22.179(1)(b) on a biennial basis. The purpose of the review is to assess the consistency in achieving policy priorities within the private market rental housing segment for housing persons experiencing homelessness. The independent reviewer must notify the department and the office of financial management of its findings. The first biennial expenditure review, for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, is due February 1, 2020. Independent reviews conducted thereafter are due February 1st of each even-numbered year.

(4) During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, expenditures from the account may also be used for shelter capacity grants.

Sec. 973. RCW 43.320.110 and 2019 c 415 s 973 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created in the custody of the state treasurer a local fund known as the "financial services regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the divisions of the department of financial institutions, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The division of securities shall deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115 and subsection (3) of this section, and which shall be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.

(3) The division of securities shall deposit one hundred percent of all moneys received that are attributable to increases in fees implemented by rule pursuant to RCW 21.20.340(15).

(4) Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

(5) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund. During the 2017-2019 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, moneys from the financial services regulation fund may be appropriated for the family prosperity account program at the department of commerce and for the operations of the department of revenue.

(6)(a) Beginning in the 2020-2021 fiscal year, the state treasurer shall annually transfer from the fund to the student loan advocate account created in RCW 28B.77.008, the greater of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars or twenty percent of the annual assessment derived from student education loan servicing.

(b) The department must provide information to the state treasurer regarding the amount of the annual assessment derived from student education loan servicing.

(7) The director's obligations or duties under chapter 62, Laws of 2018 are subject to section 21, chapter 62, Laws of 2018.

(8) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, moneys in the financial services regulation fund may be appropriated for the operations of the department of revenue. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in subsequent biennia.

(9) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the financial services regulation ((account [fund]))fund to the general fund.

Sec. 974. RCW 43.380.020 and 2019 c 415 s 976 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington statewide reentry council is created and located within the department for the purpose of promoting successful reentry of offenders after incarceration.

(2) Through the executive director that may be appointed by the council, the department shall administer the council by:

(a) Providing the council and its executive director use of the department's facilities; and

(b) Managing grants and other funds received, used, and disbursed by the council.

(3) Except during the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the department may not designate additional full-time staff to the administration of the council beyond the executive director.

Sec. 975. RCW 46.09.520 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state treasurer must refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.38 RCW, based on: (a) A tax rate of: (i) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (ii) twenty cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; (iii) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009; (iv) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; (v) twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2011, through July 31, 2015; (vi) thirty cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from August 1, 2015, through June 30, 2016; and (vii) thirty-four and nine-tenths cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2031; and (b) beginning July 1, 2031, and thereafter, the state's motor vehicle fuel tax rate in existence at the time of the fuel purchase, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.

(2) The treasurer must place these funds in the general fund as follows:

(a) Thirty-six percent must be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway roads;

(b) Three and one-half percent must be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;

(c) Two percent must be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and

(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent must be credited to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be administered by the board for planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities and for education, information, and law enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection must be expended in accordance with the following limitations:

(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education, information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;

(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:

(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the board receives under RCW 46.68.045, may be expended for ORV recreation facilities;

(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection (2)(d)(ii)(B) are known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation facilities funds; and

(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway road recreation facilities;

(iii) The board may waive the minimum percentage cited in (d)(ii) of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or projects that score low in the board's project evaluation. Funds remaining after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with board policy.

(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW 46.68.045, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter.

(4) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the NOVA account to the department of natural resources to install consistent off-road vehicle signage at department-managed recreation sites, and to implement the recreation opportunities on department-managed lands in the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest, and to the state parks and recreation commission. The legislature finds that the appropriation of funds from the NOVA account during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium for maintenance and operation of state parks or to improve accessibility for boaters and off-road vehicle users at state parks will benefit boaters and off-road vehicle users and others who use nonhighway and nonmotorized recreational facilities. The appropriations under this subsection are not required to follow the specific distribution specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(5) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the NOVA account to the department of natural resources to support programs that benefit ORV, nonhighway road and nonmotorized recreational facilities.

Sec. 976. RCW 67.16.100 and 1998 c 345 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All sums paid to the commission under this chapter, including those sums collected for license fees and excluding those sums collected under RCW 67.16.102 and 67.16.105(3), shall be disposed of by the commission as follows: One hundred percent thereof shall be retained by the commission for the payment of the salaries of its members, secretary, clerical, office, and other help and all expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. ((No))Except during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, no salary, wages, expenses, or compensation of any kind shall be paid by the state in connection with the work of the commission.

(2) Any moneys collected or paid to the commission under the terms of this chapter and not expended at the close of the fiscal biennium shall be paid to the state treasurer and be placed in the fair fund created in RCW 15.76.115. The commission may, with the approval of the office of financial management, retain any sum required for working capital.

Sec. 977. RCW 69.50.540 and 2020 c 357 s 916 and 2020 c 236 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The legislature must annually appropriate moneys in the dedicated marijuana account created in RCW 69.50.530 as follows:

(1) For the purposes listed in this subsection (1), the legislature must appropriate to the respective agencies amounts sufficient to make the following expenditures on a quarterly basis or as provided in this subsection:

(a) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the health care authority to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and board. The survey must be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(b) Fifty thousand dollars to the health care authority for the purpose of contracting with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluation and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This appropriation ends after production of the final report required by RCW 69.50.550;

(c) Five thousand dollars to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(d)(i) An amount not less than one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the board for administration of this chapter as appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act;

(ii) One million three hundred twenty-three thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020 to the health professions account established under RCW 43.70.320 for the development and administration of the marijuana authorization database by the department of health;

(iii) Two million four hundred fifty-three thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020 and two million seven hundred ninety-three thousand dollars for fiscal year 2021 to the Washington state patrol for a drug enforcement task force. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium; and

(iv) Ninety-eight thousand dollars for fiscal year 2019 to the department of ecology for research on accreditation of marijuana product testing laboratories;

(e) Four hundred sixty-five thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020 and four hundred sixty-four thousand dollars for fiscal year 2021 to the department of ecology for implementation of accreditation of marijuana product testing laboratories;

(f) One hundred eighty-nine thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020 to the department of health for rule making regarding compassionate care renewals;

(g) Eight hundred eight thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020 and eight hundred eight thousand dollars for fiscal year 2021 to the department of health for the administration of the marijuana authorization database;

(h) Six hundred thirty-five thousand dollars for fiscal year 2020 and six hundred thirty-five thousand dollars for fiscal year 2021 to the department of agriculture for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in marijuana;

(i) One million one hundred thousand dollars annually to the department of commerce to fund the marijuana social equity technical assistance competitive grant program under RCW 43.330.540; ((and))

(j) One million one hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2021 to the department of commerce to fund the marijuana social equity technical assistance competitive grant program under Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2870 (marijuana retail licenses); ((and))

(k) $619,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $619,000 for fiscal year 2023 to the department of agriculture for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in marijuana;

(l) $292,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $292,000 for fiscal year 2023 to the department of ecology for implementation and accreditation of marijuana product testing laboratories; and

(m) $808,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $808,000 for fiscal year 2023 to the department of health for the administration of the marijuana database.

(2) From the amounts in the dedicated marijuana account after appropriation of the amounts identified in subsection (1) of this section, the legislature must appropriate for the purposes listed in this subsection (2) as follows:

(a)(i) Up to fifteen percent to the health care authority for the development, implementation, maintenance, and evaluation of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle school and high school-age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation, mental health services for children and youth, and services for pregnant and parenting women; PROVIDED, That:

(A) Of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services, at least eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based or research-based programs and practices that produce objectively measurable results and, by September 1, 2020, are cost-beneficial; and

(B) Up to fifteen percent of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services may be directed to proven and tested practices, emerging best practices, or promising practices.

(ii) In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the director of the health care authority must consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute.

(iii) For each fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-five million five hundred thirty-six thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(a);

(b)(i) Up to ten percent to the department of health for the following, subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection (2):

(A) Creation, implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana education and public health program that contains the following:

(I) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(II) A grants program for local health departments or other local community agencies that supports development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of marijuana use by youth; and

(III) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use; and

(B) The Washington poison control center.

(ii) For each fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(b);

(c)(i) Up to six-tenths of one percent to the University of Washington and four-tenths of one percent to Washington State University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use, to include but not be limited to formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairment, and for the dissemination of such research.

(ii) For each fiscal year, except for the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one million twenty-one thousand dollars to the University of Washington. For each fiscal year, except for the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of six hundred eighty-one thousand dollars to Washington State University under this subsection (2)(c). It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium;

(d) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(e) Five percent to the Washington state health care authority to be expended exclusively through contracts with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(f)(i) Up to three-tenths of one percent to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW.

(ii) For each fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of five hundred eleven thousand dollars to the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection (2)(f); and

(g) At the end of each fiscal year, the treasurer must transfer any amounts in the dedicated marijuana account that are not appropriated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and this subsection (2) into the general fund, except as provided in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(i) Beginning in fiscal year 2018, if marijuana excise tax collections deposited into the general fund in the prior fiscal year exceed twenty-five million dollars, then each fiscal year the legislature must appropriate an amount equal to thirty percent of all marijuana excise taxes deposited into the general fund the prior fiscal year to the treasurer for distribution to counties, cities, and towns as follows:

(A) Thirty percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns where licensed marijuana retailers are physically located. Each jurisdiction must receive a share of the revenue distribution under this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A) based on the proportional share of the total revenues generated in the individual jurisdiction from the taxes collected under RCW 69.50.535, from licensed marijuana retailers physically located in each jurisdiction. For purposes of this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A), one hundred percent of the proportional amount attributed to a retailer physically located in a city or town must be distributed to the city or town.

(B) Seventy percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns ratably on a per capita basis. Counties must receive sixty percent of the distribution, which must be disbursed based on each county's total proportional population. Funds may only be distributed to jurisdictions that do not prohibit the siting of any state licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer.

(ii) Distribution amounts allocated to each county, city, and town must be distributed in four installments by the last day of each fiscal quarter.

(iii) By September 15th of each year, the board must provide the state treasurer the annual distribution amount, if any, for each county and city as determined in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(iv) The total share of marijuana excise tax revenues distributed to counties and cities in (g)(i) of this subsection (2) may not exceed fifteen million dollars in fiscal years 2018, 2019, 2020, and 2021, and twenty million dollars per fiscal year thereafter. ((It is the intent of the legislature that the policy for the maximum distributions in the subsequent fiscal biennia will be no more than fifteen million dollars per fiscal year.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 978. A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A joint legislative task force on jail standards is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(c) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint 13 members representing the interests of: Prosecutors, defense attorneys, law enforcement, counties, cities, jail administrators, superior courts, district and municipal courts, a state designated protection and advocacy agency, medical and mental health service providers, a statewide civil legal aid organization, persons with lived experience, and other entities involved with or interested in the operation of local jails.

(2) The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the task force. The task force shall choose its chair from among its legislative membership.

(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of the attorney general.

(4)(a) Legislative members of the task force may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(b) Nonlegislative members of the task force who demonstrate financial hardship must be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, as well as other expenses as needed for each day a nonlegislative task force member attends a task force meeting to provide consultative assistance.

(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) The task force shall review the following issues:

(a) The adequacy of standards adopted and used by jails including, but not limited to, standards for conditions and operations, inspections, enforcement, and oversight;

(b) Current data on jails in the state including, but not limited to, square footage of living space per individual, jail capacity, average daily population over the previous five years, medical and dental services, mental health services, treatment programming options, accreditation status, use of force incidents over the previous five years, and in-custody deaths and the causes of those deaths;

(c) How the jails in the state compare to jail standards and practices in other states regarding safety and physical conditions; health and welfare; access to medical, mental health, dental care, and substance use disorder treatment; food quality and quantity; use of force; use of solitary confinement; and recreational activities and programming;

(d) The revenue sources and funding mechanisms used by other states to pay for local jails and the kinds of services that are provided to inmates in jails in other states, including identifying the entity that is responsible for financing those services;

(e) Inmate's access to jail telecommunication, electronic media, and commissary services, including the rates and fees charged by the jail for these services that are often borne by families of incarcerated individuals; and

(f) Other issues the task force deems relevant to the conditions of jails.

(7) The task force shall make recommendations regarding:

(a) Statewide minimum jail standards, oversight, or other policy changes to ensure jail conditions meet state and federal constitutional and statutory standards and include adequate safety and welfare safeguards for incarcerated persons and staff; and

(b) Restoration of a statewide authority to set mandatory minimum jail standards and conduct inspections of jails for compliance and enforcement of those standards.

(8) The task force shall consult with organizations and entities with interest or experience in jail standards and operations including, but not limited to, treatment providers, victims' advocates, inmate advocates, organizations representing jail employees and officers, and other community organizations.

(9) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and representatives from county, city, and regional jails must provide any data or information that is requested by the task force to perform its duties under this section.

(10) The task force shall report findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2023.

Sec. 979. RCW 70A.200.140 and 2020 c 20 s 1076 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to be known as the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account shall be used as follows:

(a) Forty percent to the department of ecology, primarily for use by the departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for litter collection programs under RCW 70A.200.170. The amount to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central coordination function for litter control efforts statewide; to support employment of youth in litter cleanup as intended in RCW 70A.200.020, and for litter pick up using other authorized agencies; and for statewide public awareness programs under RCW 70A.200.150(7). The amount to the department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for waste reduction, litter control, recycling, and composting so that local governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;

(b)(i) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding programs for waste reduction, litter control, recycling activities, and composting activities by cities and counties under RCW 70A.200.190, to be administered by the department of ecology; (ii) any unspent funds under (b)(i) of this subsection may be used to create and pay for a matching fund competitive grant program to be used by local governments for the development and implementation of contamination reduction and outreach plans for inclusion in comprehensive solid waste management plans or by local governments and nonprofit organizations for local or statewide education programs designed to help the public with litter control, waste reduction, recycling, and composting of primarily the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW. Recipients under this subsection include programs to reduce wasted food and food waste that are designed to achieve the goals established in RCW 70A.205.715(1) and that are consistent with the plan developed in RCW 70A.205.715(3). Grants must adhere to the following requirements: (A) No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars; (B) grant recipients shall match the grant funding allocated by the department by an amount equal to twenty-five percent of eligible expenses. A local government's share of these costs may be met by cash or contributed services; (C) the obligation of the department to make grant payments is contingent upon the availability of the amount of money appropriated for this subsection (1)(b); and (D) grants are managed under the guidelines for existing grant programs; and

(c) Forty percent to the department of ecology to: (i) Implement activities under RCW 70A.200.150 for waste reduction, recycling, and composting efforts; (ii) provide technical assistance to local governments and commercial businesses to increase recycling markets and recycling and composting programs primarily for the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW designed to educate citizens about waste reduction, litter control, and recyclable and compostable products and programs; (iii) increase access to waste reduction, composting, and recycling programs, particularly for food packaging and plastic bags and appropriate composting techniques; and (iv) for programs to reduce wasted food and food waste that are designed to achieve the goals established in RCW 70A.205.715(1) and that are consistent with the plan developed in RCW 70A.205.715(3).

(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs, including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed among state agencies and local governments according to the same criteria provided in RCW 70A.200.170 for the remainder of the funds, so that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, recycling, and composting programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of reaching a zero litter goal.

(4) Funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, must be prioritized for the products identified under RCW 82.19.020 solely for the purposes of recycling, composting, and litter collection, reduction, and control programs.

(5) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, Washington State University may use funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, to conduct an organic waste study.

Sec. 980. RCW 71.24.580 and 2020 c 357 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a) Substance use disorder treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder that, if not treated, would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of substance use disorder treatment services and treatment support services for nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; and (c) the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court. Amounts provided in this subsection must be used for treatment and recovery support services for criminally involved offenders and authorization of these services shall not be subject to determinations of medical necessity. During the 2019-2021 and the 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, funding from the criminal justice treatment account may be used to provide treatment and support services through the conclusion of an individual's treatment plan to individuals participating in a drug court program as of February 24, 2021, if that individual wishes to continue treatment following dismissal of charges they were facing under RCW 69.50.4013(1). Such participation is voluntary and contingent upon substantial compliance with drug court program requirements. During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account to the state general fund. During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may appropriate from the account for municipal drug courts and increased treatment options, and may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account to the home security fund account created in RCW 43.185C.060. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's successful completion of his or her substance use disorder treatment program, including but not limited to the recovery support and other programmatic elements outlined in RCW 2.30.030 authorizing therapeutic courts; and

(b) "Treatment support" includes transportation to or from inpatient or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.

(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(4)(a) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a) of this subsection to the department for the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.

(5) Moneys appropriated to the authority from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The authority may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.

(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the authority from the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The authority, in consultation with the department of corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives of substance use disorder treatment providers, and any other person deemed by the authority to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the authority from the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting attorney. The authority shall appoint a panel of representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges' association, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, and substance use disorder treatment providers. The panel shall review county or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.

(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority, and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b) of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account within that county. The submitted plan should incorporate current evidence-based practices in substance use disorder treatment. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance use disorder treatment pursuant to RCW 71.24.560 and treatment support services. No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment support services.

(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under this section.

(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.

(9) If a region or county uses criminal justice treatment account funds to support a therapeutic court, the therapeutic court must allow the use of all medications approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder as deemed medically appropriate for a participant by a medical professional. If appropriate medication-assisted treatment resources are not available or accessible within the jurisdiction, the health care authority's designee for assistance must assist the court with acquiring the resource.

(10) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW 2.30.030(3).

(11) The authority shall annually review and monitor the expenditures made by any county or group of counties that receives appropriated funds distributed under this section. Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with the requirements of its contract with the authority.

Sec. 981. RCW 74.46.561 and 2020 c 357 s 918 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature adopts a new system for establishing nursing home payment rates beginning July 1, 2016. Any payments to nursing homes for services provided after June 30, 2016, must be based on the new system. The new system must be designed in such a manner as to decrease administrative complexity associated with the payment methodology, reward nursing homes providing care for high acuity residents, incentivize quality care for residents of nursing homes, and establish minimum staffing standards for direct care.

(2) The new system must be based primarily on industry-wide costs, and have three main components: Direct care, indirect care, and capital.

(3) The direct care component must include the direct care and therapy care components of the previous system, along with food, laundry, and dietary services. Direct care must be paid at a fixed rate, based on one hundred percent or greater of statewide case mix neutral median costs, but shall be set so that a nursing home provider's direct care rate does not exceed one hundred eighteen percent of its base year's direct care allowable costs except if the provider is below the minimum staffing standard established in RCW 74.42.360(2). Direct care must be performance-adjusted for acuity every six months, using case mix principles. Direct care must be regionally adjusted using countywide wage index information available through the United States department of labor's bureau of labor statistics. There is no minimum occupancy for direct care. The direct care component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(4) The indirect care component must include the elements of administrative expenses, maintenance costs, and housekeeping services from the previous system. A minimum occupancy assumption of ninety percent must be applied to indirect care. Indirect care must be paid at a fixed rate, based on ninety percent or greater of statewide median costs. The indirect care component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(5) The capital component must use a fair market rental system to set a price per bed. The capital component must be adjusted for the age of the facility, and must use a minimum occupancy assumption of ninety percent.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2016, the fair rental rate allocation for each facility must be determined by multiplying the allowable nursing home square footage in (c) of this subsection by the RSMeans rental rate in (d) of this subsection and by the number of licensed beds yielding the gross unadjusted building value. An equipment allowance of ten percent must be added to the unadjusted building value. The sum of the unadjusted building value and equipment allowance must then be reduced by the average age of the facility as determined by (e) of this subsection using a depreciation rate of one and one-half percent. The depreciated building and equipment plus land valued at ten percent of the gross unadjusted building value before depreciation must then be multiplied by the rental rate at seven and one-half percent to yield an allowable fair rental value for the land, building, and equipment.

(b) The fair rental value determined in (a) of this subsection must be divided by the greater of the actual total facility census from the prior full calendar year or imputed census based on the number of licensed beds at ninety percent occupancy.

(c) For the rate year beginning July 1, 2016, all facilities must be reimbursed using four hundred square feet. For the rate year beginning July 1, 2017, allowable nursing facility square footage must be determined using the total nursing facility square footage as reported on the medicaid cost reports submitted to the department in compliance with this chapter. The maximum allowable square feet per bed may not exceed four hundred fifty.

(d) Each facility must be paid at eighty-three percent or greater of the median nursing facility RSMeans construction index value per square foot. The department may use updated RSMeans construction index information when more recent square footage data becomes available. The statewide value per square foot must be indexed based on facility zip code by multiplying the statewide value per square foot times the appropriate zip code based index. For the purpose of implementing this section, the value per square foot effective July 1, 2016, must be set so that the weighted average fair rental value rate is not less than ten dollars and eighty cents per patient day. The capital component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(e) The average age is the actual facility age reduced for significant renovations. Significant renovations are defined as those renovations that exceed two thousand dollars per bed in a calendar year as reported on the annual cost report submitted in accordance with this chapter. For the rate beginning July 1, 2016, the department shall use renovation data back to 1994 as submitted on facility cost reports. Beginning July 1, 2016, facility ages must be reduced in future years if the value of the renovation completed in any year exceeds two thousand dollars times the number of licensed beds. The cost of the renovation must be divided by the accumulated depreciation per bed in the year of the renovation to determine the equivalent number of new replacement beds. The new age for the facility is a weighted average with the replacement bed equivalents reflecting an age of zero and the existing licensed beds, minus the new bed equivalents, reflecting their age in the year of the renovation. At no time may the depreciated age be less than zero or greater than forty-four years.

(f) A nursing facility's capital component rate allocation must be rebased annually, effective July 1, 2016, in accordance with this section and this chapter.

(g) For the purposes of this subsection (5), "RSMeans" means building construction costs data as published by Gordian.

(6) A quality incentive must be offered as a rate enhancement beginning July 1, 2016.

(a) An enhancement no larger than five percent and no less than one percent of the statewide average daily rate must be paid to facilities that meet or exceed the standard established for the quality incentive. All providers must have the opportunity to earn the full quality incentive payment.

(b) The quality incentive component must be determined by calculating an overall facility quality score composed of four to six quality measures. For fiscal year 2017 there shall be four quality measures, and for fiscal year 2018 there shall be six quality measures. Initially, the quality incentive component must be based on minimum data set quality measures for the percentage of long-stay residents who self-report moderate to severe pain, the percentage of high-risk long-stay residents with pressure ulcers, the percentage of long-stay residents experiencing one or more falls with major injury, and the percentage of long-stay residents with a urinary tract infection. Quality measures must be reviewed on an annual basis by a stakeholder work group established by the department. Upon review, quality measures may be added or changed. The department may risk adjust individual quality measures as it deems appropriate.

(c) The facility quality score must be point based, using at a minimum the facility's most recent available three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data. Point thresholds for each quality measure must be established using the corresponding statistical values for the quality measure point determinants of eighty quality measure points, sixty quality measure points, forty quality measure points, and twenty quality measure points, identified in the most recent available five-star quality rating system technical user's guide published by the ((center[s]))centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(d) Facilities meeting or exceeding the highest performance threshold (top level) for a quality measure receive twenty-five points. Facilities meeting the second highest performance threshold receive twenty points. Facilities meeting the third level of performance threshold receive fifteen points. Facilities in the bottom performance threshold level receive no points. Points from all quality measures must then be summed into a single aggregate quality score for each facility.

(e) Facilities receiving an aggregate quality score of eighty percent of the overall available total score or higher must be placed in the highest tier (tier V), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between seventy and seventy-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the second highest tier (tier IV), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between sixty and sixty-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the third highest tier (tier III), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between fifty and fifty-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the fourth highest tier (tier II), and facilities receiving less than fifty percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the lowest tier (tier I).

(f) The tier system must be used to determine the amount of each facility's per patient day quality incentive component. The per patient day quality incentive component for tier IV is seventy-five percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V, the per patient day quality incentive component for tier III is fifty percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V, and the per patient day quality incentive component for tier II is twenty-five percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V. Facilities in tier I receive no quality incentive component.

(g) Tier system payments must be set in a manner that ensures that the entire biennial appropriation for the quality incentive program is allocated.

(h) Facilities with insufficient three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data must be assigned to the tier corresponding to their five-star quality rating. Facilities with a five-star quality rating must be assigned to the highest tier (tier V) and facilities with a one-star quality rating must be assigned to the lowest tier (tier I). The use of a facility's five-star quality rating shall only occur in the case of insufficient centers for medicare and medicaid services minimum data set information.

(i) The quality incentive rates must be adjusted semiannually on July 1 and January 1 of each year using, at a minimum, the most recent available three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data.

(j) Beginning July 1, 2017, the percentage of short-stay residents who newly received an antipsychotic medication must be added as a quality measure. The department must determine the quality incentive thresholds for this quality measure in a manner consistent with those outlined in (b) through (h) of this subsection using the centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data.

(k) Beginning July 1, 2017, the percentage of direct care staff turnover must be added as a quality measure using the centers for medicare and medicaid services' payroll-based journal and nursing home facility payroll data. Turnover is defined as an employee departure. The department must determine the quality incentive thresholds for this quality measure using data from the centers for medicare and medicaid services' payroll-based journal, unless such data is not available, in which case the department shall use direct care staffing turnover data from the most recent medicaid cost report.

(7) Reimbursement of the safety net assessment imposed by chapter 74.48 RCW and paid in relation to medicaid residents must be continued.

(8)(a) The direct care and indirect care components must be rebased in even-numbered years, beginning with rates paid on July 1, 2016. Rates paid on July 1, 2016, must be based on the 2014 calendar year cost report. On a percentage basis, after rebasing, the department must confirm that the statewide average daily rate has increased at least as much as the average rate of inflation, as determined by the skilled nursing facility market basket index published by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, or a comparable index. If after rebasing, the percentage increase to the statewide average daily rate is less than the average rate of inflation for the same time period, the department is authorized to increase rates by the difference between the percentage increase after rebasing and the average rate of inflation.

(b) It is the intention of the legislature that direct and indirect care rates paid in fiscal year 2022 will be rebased using the calendar year 2019 cost reports and that direct and indirect care rates paid in fiscal year 2023 will be rebased using the calendar year 2020 cost reports. For fiscal year 2021, in addition to the rates generated by (a) of this subsection, an additional adjustment is provided as established in this subsection (8)(b). Beginning May 1, 2020, and through June 30, 2021, the calendar year costs must be adjusted for inflation by a twenty-four month consumer price index, based on the most recently available monthly index for all urban consumers, as published by the bureau of labor statistics. It is also the intent of the legislature that, starting in fiscal year 2022, a facility-specific rate add-on equal to the inflation adjustment that facilities received solely in fiscal year 2021, must be added to the rate. Beginning July 1, 2021, and through June 30, 2023, the calendar year costs must be adjusted for inflation by a 24 month consumer price index, based on the most recently available monthly index for all urban consumers, as published by the bureau of labor statistics. It is also the intent of the legislature that, starting in fiscal year 2024, a facility-specific rate add-on equal to the inflation adjustment that facilities received solely in fiscal year 2022 and fiscal year 2023, must be added to the rate.

(c) To determine the necessity of regular inflationary adjustments to the nursing facility rates, by December 1, 2020, the department shall provide the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature with a report that provides a review of rates paid in 2017, 2018, and 2019 in comparison to costs incurred by nursing facilities.

(9) The direct care component provided in subsection (3) of this section is subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6). Beginning July 1, 2016, pursuant to rules established by the department, funds that are received through the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6) must be used for technical assistance, specialized training, or an increase to the quality enhancement established in subsection (6) of this section. The legislature intends to review the utility of maintaining the reconciliation and settlement process under a price-based payment methodology, and may discontinue the reconciliation and settlement process after the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(10) Compared to the rate in effect June 30, 2016, including all cost components and rate add-ons, no facility may receive a rate reduction of more than one percent on July 1, 2016, more than two percent on July 1, 2017, or more than five percent on July 1, 2018. To ensure that the appropriation for nursing homes remains cost neutral, the department is authorized to cap the rate increase for facilities in fiscal years 2017, 2018, and 2019.

Sec. 982. RCW 76.04.610 and 2019 c 415 s 981 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If any owner of forestland within a forest protection zone neglects or fails to provide adequate fire protection as required by RCW 76.04.600, the department shall provide such protection and shall annually impose the following assessments on each parcel of such land: (i) A flat fee assessment of seventeen dollars and fifty cents; and (ii) twenty-seven cents on each acre exceeding fifty acres.

(b) Assessors may, at their option, collect the assessment on tax exempt lands. If the assessor elects not to collect the assessment, the department may bill the landowner directly.

(2) An owner who has paid assessments on two or more parcels, each containing fewer than fifty acres and each within the same county, may obtain the following refund:

(a) If all the parcels together contain less than fifty acres, then the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the total of (i) seventeen dollars and (ii) the total of the amounts retained by the county from such assessments under subsection (5) of this section.

(b) If all the parcels together contain fifty or more acres, then the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the total of (i) seventeen dollars, (ii) twenty-seven cents for each acre exceeding fifty acres, and (iii) the total of the amounts retained by the county from such assessments under subsection (5) of this section.

Applications for refunds shall be submitted to the department on a form prescribed by the department and in the same year in which the assessments were paid. The department may not provide refunds to applicants who do not provide verification that all assessments and property taxes on the property have been paid. Applications may be made by mail.

In addition to the procedures under this subsection, property owners with multiple parcels in a single county who qualify for a refund under this section may apply to the department on an application listing all the parcels owned in order to have the assessment computed on all parcels but billed to a single parcel. Property owners with the following number of parcels may apply to the department in the year indicated:

Year

Number of Parcels

2002

10 or more parcels

2003

8 or more parcels

2004 and thereafter

6 or more parcels

The department must compute the correct assessment and allocate one parcel in the county to use to collect the assessment. The county must then bill the forest fire protection assessment on that one allocated identified parcel. The landowner is responsible for notifying the department of any changes in parcel ownership.

(3) Beginning January 1, 1991, under the administration and at the discretion of the department up to two hundred thousand dollars per year of this assessment shall be used in support of those rural fire districts assisting the department in fire protection services on forestlands.

(4) For the purpose of this chapter, the department may divide the forestlands of the state, or any part thereof, into districts, for fire protection and assessment purposes, may classify lands according to the character of timber prevailing, and the fire hazard existing, and place unprotected lands under the administration of the proper district. Amounts paid or contracted to be paid by the department for protection of forestlands from funds at its disposal shall be a lien upon the property protected, unless reimbursed by the owner within ten days after October 1st of the year in which they were incurred. The department shall be prepared to make statement thereof, upon request, to a forest owner whose own protection has not been previously approved as to its adequacy, the department shall report the same to the assessor of the county in which the property is situated. The assessor shall extend the amounts upon the tax rolls covering the property, and upon authorization from the department shall levy the forest protection assessment against the amounts of unimproved land as shown in each ownership on the county assessor's records. The assessor may then segregate on the records to provide that the improved land and improvements thereon carry the millage levy designed to support the rural fire protection districts as provided for in RCW 52.16.170.

(5) The amounts assessed shall be collected at the time, in the same manner, by the same procedure, and with the same penalties attached that general state and county taxes on the same property are collected, except that errors in assessments may be corrected at any time by the department certifying them to the treasurer of the county in which the land involved is situated. Assessments shall be known and designated as assessments of the year in which the amounts became reimbursable. Upon the collection of assessments the county treasurer shall place fifty cents of the total assessments paid on a parcel for fire protection into the county current expense fund to defray the costs of listing, billing, and collecting these assessments. The treasurer shall then transmit the balance to the department. Collections shall be applied against expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this section, including necessary and reasonable administrative costs incurred by the department in the enforcement of these provisions. The department may also expend sums collected from owners of forestlands or received from any other source for necessary administrative costs in connection with the enforcement of RCW 76.04.660. During the 2017-2019 ((and)), 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for department of natural resources wildfire response and forest health activities.

(6) When land against which forest protection assessments are outstanding is acquired for delinquent taxes and sold at public auction, the state shall have a prior lien on the proceeds of sale over and above the amount necessary to satisfy the county's delinquent tax judgment. The county treasurer, in case the proceeds of sale exceed the amount of the delinquent tax judgment, shall immediately remit to the department the amount of the outstanding forest protection assessments.

(7) All nonfederal public bodies owning or administering forestland included in a forest protection zone shall pay the forest protection assessments provided in this section and the special forest fire suppression account assessments under RCW 76.04.630. The forest protection assessments and special forest fire suppression account assessments shall be payable by nonfederal public bodies from available funds within thirty days following receipt of the written notice from the department which is given after October 1st of the year in which the protection was provided. Unpaid assessments are not a lien against the nonfederal publicly owned land but shall constitute a debt by the nonfederal public body to the department and are subject to interest charges at the legal rate.

(8) A public body, having failed to previously pay the forest protection assessments required of it by this section, which fails to suppress a fire on or originating from forestlands owned or administered by it, is liable for the costs of suppression incurred by the department or its agent and is not entitled to reimbursement of costs incurred by the public body in the suppression activities.

(9) The department may adopt rules to implement this section, including, but not limited to, rules on levying and collecting forest protection assessments.

Sec. 983. RCW 79.64.040 and 2019 c 415 s 984 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases, sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way issued by the department and affecting state lands and aquatic lands, except as provided in RCW 79.64.130, provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds from agricultural college lands.

(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150 prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, the deductions authorized under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in connection with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and aquatic lands other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the department pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable waters.

(4) In the event that the department sells logs using the contract harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.

(5) During the 2015-2017, 2017-2019, ((and)) 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the board may increase the twenty-five percent limitation up to thirty-two percent.

Sec. 984. RCW 79.64.110 and 2019 c 415 s 985 and 2019 c 309 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any moneys derived from the lease of state forestlands or from the sale of valuable materials, oils, gases, coal, minerals, or fossils from those lands, except as provided in RCW 79.64.130, or the appraised value of these resources when transferred to a public agency under RCW 79.22.060, except as provided in RCW 79.22.060(4), must be distributed as follows:

(a) For state forestlands acquired through RCW 79.22.040 or by exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040:

(i) The expense incurred by the state for administration, reforestation, and protection, not to exceed twenty-five percent, which rate of percentage shall be determined by the board, must be returned to the forest development account created in RCW 79.64.100. During the 2017-2019 ((and)), 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the board may increase the twenty-five percent limitation up to twenty-seven percent.

(ii) Any balance remaining must be paid to the county in which the land is located or, for counties participating in a land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as determined by the board. Payments made under this subsection are to be paid, distributed, and prorated, except as otherwise provided in this section, to the various funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment. However, in order to test county flexibility in distributing state forestland revenue, a county may in its discretion pay, distribute, and prorate payments made under this subsection of moneys derived from state forestlands acquired by exchange between July 28, 2019, and June 30, 2020, for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040, within the same county, in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment for the former state forestlands that were subject to the exchange.

(iii) Any balance remaining, paid to a county with a population of less than sixteen thousand, must first be applied to the reduction of any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of the county during the year of payment.

(iv) With regard to moneys remaining under this subsection (1)(a), within seven working days of receipt of these moneys, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed to the counties. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment date.

(b) For state forestlands acquired through RCW 79.22.010 or by exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010, except as provided in RCW 79.64.120:

(i) Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development account.

(ii) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools, to the county in which the land is located or, for counties participating in a land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as determined by the board, and according to the relative proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in the county. The portion to be distributed to the state general fund shall be based on the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 (1) and (2) and the levy rate for any maintenance and operation special school levies. With regard to the portion to be distributed to the counties, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed within seven working days of receipt of the money. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment date. The money distributed to the county must be paid, distributed, and prorated to the various other funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment.

(2) A school district may transfer amounts deposited in its debt service fund pursuant to this section into its capital projects fund as authorized in RCW 28A.320.330.

Sec. 985. RCW 79.105.150 and 2019 c 415 s 986 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. During the 2017-2019 ((and)), 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the aquatic lands enhancement account may be used to support the shellfish program, the ballast water program, hatcheries, the Puget Sound toxic sampling program and steelhead mortality research at the department of fish and wildlife, the knotweed program at the department of agriculture, actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification, which may include the creation of a center on ocean acidification, the Puget SoundCorps program, and support of the marine resource advisory council and the Washington coastal marine advisory council. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the geoduck aquaculture research account for research related to shellfish aquaculture. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the marine resources stewardship trust account.

(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the recreation and conservation funding board shall:

(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications;

(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration, except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the development and statewide availability of model evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030 in its prioritization and selection process; and

(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.

(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies as defined in RCW 43.41.270.

(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in implementing this section.

(5) Any project designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 986. RCW 79A.25.210 and 2019 c 415 s 987 are each amended to read as follows:

The firearms range account is hereby created in the state general fund. Moneys in the account shall be subject to legislative appropriation and shall be used for purchase and development of land, construction or improvement of range facilities, including fixed structure construction or remodeling, equipment purchase, safety or environmental improvements, noise abatement, and liability protection for public and nonprofit firearm range training and practice facilities.

Grant funds shall not be used for expendable shooting supplies, or normal operating expenses. In making grants, the board shall give priority to projects for noise abatement or safety improvement. Grant funds shall not supplant funds for other organization programs.

The funds will be available to nonprofit shooting organizations, school districts, and state, county, or local governments on a match basis. All entities receiving matching funds must be open on a regular basis and usable by law enforcement personnel or the general public who possess Washington concealed pistol licenses or Washington hunting licenses or who are enrolled in a firearm safety class.

Applicants for a grant from the firearms range account shall provide matching funds in either cash or in-kind contributions. The match must represent one dollar in value for each one dollar of the grant except that in the case of a grant for noise abatement or safety improvements the match must represent one dollar in value for each two dollars of the grant. In-kind contributions include but are not limited to labor, materials, and new property. Existing assets and existing development may not apply to the match.

Applicants other than school districts or local or state government must be registered as a nonprofit or not-for-profit organization with the Washington secretary of state. The organization's articles of incorporation must contain provisions for the organization's structure, officers, legal address, and registered agent.

Organizations requesting grants must provide the hours of range availability for public and law enforcement use. The fee structure will be submitted with the grant application.

Any nonprofit organization or agency accepting a grant under this program will be required to pay back the entire grant amount to the firearms range account if the use of the range facility is discontinued less than ten years after the grant is accepted.

Entities receiving grants must make the facilities for which grant funding is received open for hunter safety education classes and firearm safety classes on a regular basis for no fee.

Government units or school districts applying for grants must open their range facility on a regular basis for hunter safety education classes and firearm safety classes.

The board shall adopt rules to implement chapter 195, Laws of 1990, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, expenditures from the firearms range account may be used to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1100) (concealed pistol licenses) and chapter 282, Laws of 2017 (SB 5268) (concealed pistol license notices). During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the firearms range account may be used to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1100) (concealed pistol licenses).

Sec. 987. RCW 82.14.310 and 2019 c 415 s 988 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county criminal justice assistance account is created in the state treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer must transfer into the county criminal justice assistance account from the general fund the sum of twenty-three million two hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer must increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in November of the preceding year.

(2) The moneys deposited in the county criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsections (4) and (5) of this section, must be distributed at such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150 and on the relative basis of each county's funding factor as determined under this subsection.

(a) A county's funding factor is the sum of:

(i) The population of the county, divided by one thousand, and multiplied by two-tenths;

(ii) The crime rate of the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and

(iii) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court, for each one thousand in population, multiplied by five-tenths.

(b) Under this section and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:

(i) The population of the county or city is as last determined by the office of financial management;

(ii) The crime rate of the county or city is the annual occurrence of specified criminal offenses, as calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, for each one thousand in population;

(iii) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court must be determined by the most recent annual report of the courts of Washington, as published by the administrative office of the courts;

(iv) Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the 1989-1991 biennium must be based on 1988 figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of this subsection. Future distributions must be based on the most recent figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of this subsection.

(3) Moneys distributed under this section must be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes and may not be used to replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the civil or juvenile justice system occurs, and which includes (a) domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020, and (b) during the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, juvenile dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth, truancy, and children in need of services. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the county criminal justice assistance account may be available for appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements may not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

(5) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the sum of one hundred fifty-three thousand dollars, and during the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the sum of five hundred ten thousand dollars, may be appropriated for the Washington state patrol to provide investigative assistance and report services to assist local law enforcement agencies to prosecute criminals. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

Sec. 988. RCW 83.100.230 and 2019 c 415 s 990 are each amended to read as follows:

The education legacy trust account is created in the state treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for support of the common schools, and for expanding access to higher education through funding for new enrollments and financial aid, and other educational improvement efforts. During the 2015-2017, 2017-2019, ((and)) 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia appropriations from the account may be made for support of early learning programs. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 989. The Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force is established.

(1) The task force is composed of 23 members as provided in this subsection.

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(c) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint the following:

(i) Four tribal chairs, councils, or designees from a Washington federally recognized Indian tribe appointed and recommended by the Washington association of tribes;

(ii) Two members, each representing an urban Indian organization with an interest in gender-based violence;

(iii) Two members, each representing a tribal epidemiology center serving tribal or urban American Indian or Alaska native communities in Washington state;

(iv) One member representing the American Indian health commission;

(v) Two indigenous women or family members of indigenous women that have experienced gender-based violence;

(vi) One member representing the governor's office of Indian affairs;

(vii) The chief of the Washington state patrol or his or her representative;

(viii) One member representing the office of the attorney general;

(ix) One member representing the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(x) One member representing the Washington state association of counties;

(xi) One member representing the association of Washington cities;

(xii) One member representing the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys; and

(xiii) One representative of the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers.

(d) Where feasible, the task force may invite and consult with: (i) An agent representing the federal bureau of investigation; (ii) an agent representing the office of the United States attorneys; and (iii) any experts or professionals involved and having expertise in the topic of missing and murdered indigenous women and people.

(2) The legislative members shall convene the initial meeting of the task force no later than the end of calendar year 2021 and thereafter convene: (a) A minimum of two subsequent meetings annually; and (b) one summit annually with the state agencies involved with the taskforce under subsection (1)(c) of this section, Washington tribes, and tribal and urban Indian organizations. The summit must be jointly coordinated with the office of attorney general, the Washington association of tribes, the governor's office of Indian affairs, and the centennial accord.

(3) The membership shall select the task force's co-chairs, which must include one legislator and one nonlegislative member.

(4) The task force shall review the laws and policies relating to missing and murdered American Indian and Alaska native people. The task force shall review current policies and develop recommendations for the purpose of:

(a) Assessing systemic causes behind gender-based violence including patterns and underlying historical, social, economic, institutional, and cultural factors which may contribute to disproportionately high levels of gender-based violence that occur against American Indian and Alaska native people;

(b) Assessing data tracking and reporting practices relating to gender-based violence against American Indian and Alaska native people in Washington state;

(c) Making recommendations and best practices for improving:

(i) The collection and reporting of data by tribal, local, and state law enforcement agencies, and to the extent feasible federal law enforcement agencies, to more effectively understand and address issues of gender-based violence facing American Indian and Alaska native people; and

(ii) Jurisdictional and data sharing issues on tribal reservation land and urban areas that impact gender-based violence against American Indian and Alaska native people;

(d) Reviewing prosecutorial trends and practices relating to crimes of gender-based violence against American Indian and Alaska native people in Washington state;

(e) Identifying barriers to providing more state resources in tracking gender-based violence against American Indian and Alaska native people and reducing the incidences of gender-based violence;

(f) Assessing and identifying state resources to support programs and services for survivors, families of survivors, and tribal and urban Indian service providers working with American Indian and Alaska native people that have experienced gender-based violence; and

(g) Identifying and making recommendations for increasing state resources for trainings on culturally attuned best practices for working with American Indian and Alaska native communities for tribal, local, federal, and state law enforcement personnel in Washington state.

(4) The task force, with the assistance of the Washington state office of the attorney general, must consult with Washington tribes and engage with urban Indian organizations to submit a status report including any initial findings, recommendations, and progress updates to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2022, and a final report by June 1, 2023.

(5)(a) The office of the attorney general shall administer and provide staff support to the task force, organize the summit, and oversee the development of the two task force reports. The office of the attorney general may contract for the summit.

(b) The Washington state office of the attorney general may contract with the Seattle Indian health board, the American Indian health commission, or a similar organization for consulting and facilitation services. The Washington state office of the attorney general may, when deemed necessary by the task force, retain consultants to provide data analysis, research, recommendations, and other services to the task force for the purposes provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(c) The Washington state office of the attorney general may share and exchange information received or created on behalf of the task force with other states, tribes, urban Indian organizations, and other national groups working on missing and murdered indigenous women and people issues.

(d) On issues not defined in this section, the task force shall consult with the Washington state office of the attorney general for further interpretation.

(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW and subsection (7) of this section.

(7) To ensure that the task force has diverse and inclusive representation of those affected by its work, task force members whose participation in the task force may be hampered by financial hardship may apply for a stipend in an amount not to exceed $100 for each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the task force or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the office of attorney general. A person shall not receive compensation for a day of service under this section if the person: (a) Occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any compensation from such government for working that day. The office of attorney general, by staffing the task force, is authorized to assess eligibility for the stipend as limited by available financial resources.

Sec. 990. RCW 43.70.--- and 2021 c 3 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The COVID-19 public health response account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall consist of funds appropriated by the legislature and grants received by the department of health for activities in response to the coronavirus pandemic (COVID-19). Only the secretary, or the secretary's designee, may authorize expenditures from the account for costs related to the public health response to COVID-19, subject to any limitations imposed by grant funding deposited into the account. The COVID-19 public health response account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2)(a) The legislature finds that a safe, efficient, and effective delivery of vaccinations is of the utmost importance for restoring societal and economic functions. As we learn more about the virus, the vaccine, and challenges to vaccine allocation and distribution, it is anticipated that the state's COVID-19 vaccination distribution plan will evolve. To that end, the legislature has provided flexibility by funding vaccine expenditure at the discretion of the secretary and without an appropriation. However, to maintain fiscal control and to ensure spending priorities align, the department is required to collaborate and communicate with the chairs and ranking members of the health care and fiscal committees of the legislature and local health jurisdictions in advance of any significant revision of the state's COVID-19 vaccination plan and to provide regular updates on its implementation and spending.

(b) As part of the public health response to COVID-19, the expenditures from the account must be used to effectively administer the vaccine for COVID-19 and conduct testing and contact tracing. The department must ensure that COVID-19 outreach is accessible, culturally and linguistically appropriate, and that it includes community-driven partnerships and strategies.

(c) When making expenditures for administering the vaccine for COVID-19, the department must focus on identifying persons for vaccination, prioritizing hard-to-reach communities, making the vaccine accessible, and providing support to schools for safe reopening.

(d) When making expenditures regarding testing and contact tracing, the department must provide equitable access, prioritize hard-to-reach communities, and provide support and resources to facilitate the safe reopening of schools while minimizing community spread of the virus.

(e) The department may also make expenditures from the account related to developing the public health workforce using funds granted by the federal government for that purpose in section 2501, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(3) When making expenditures from the account, the department must include an emphasis on public communication regarding the availability and accessibility of the vaccine and testing, and the importance of vaccine and testing availability to the safe reopening of the state.

(4)(a) The department must report to the fiscal and health care committees of the legislature on a monthly basis regarding its COVID-19 response.

(b) To the extent that it is available, the report must include data regarding vaccine distribution, testing, and contact tracing, as follows:

(i) The number of vaccines administered per day, including regional data regarding the location and age groups of persons receiving the vaccine, specifically identifying hard-to-reach communities in which vaccines were administered; and

(ii) The number of tests conducted per week, including data specifically addressing testing conducted in hard-to-reach communities.

(c) The first monthly report is due no later than one month from the effective date of this section. Monthly reports are no longer required upon the department's determination that the remaining balance of the COVID-19 response account is less than $100,000.

Sec. 991. RCW 41.26.450 and 2019 c 415 s 958 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Port districts established under Title 53 RCW and institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall contribute both the employer and state shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are law enforcement officers.

(2) Institutions of higher education shall contribute both the employer and the state shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are firefighters.

(3) During fiscal years 2018 and 2019 and during the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal ((biennium))biennia:

When an employer charges a fee or recovers costs for work performed by a plan member where:

(a) The member receives compensation that is includable as basic salary under RCW 41.26.030(4)(b); and

(b) The service is provided, whether directly or indirectly, to an entity that is not an "employer" under RCW 41.26.030(14)(b);

the employer shall contribute both the employer and state shares of the cost of the retirement system contributions for that compensation. Nothing in this subsection prevents an employer from recovering the cost of the contribution from the entity receiving services from the member.

Sec. 992. 2019 c 415 s 729 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE GAMBLING COMMISSION—PROBLEM GAMBLING TASK FORCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$100,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the gambling revolving account for the gambling commission to contract for a facilitator to staff and assist with a joint legislative task force on problem gambling as provided in subsection (2) of this section. At a minimum, the contract must provide for the facilitation of meetings, to moderate the discussion, provide objective facilitation and negotiation between work group members, ensure participants receive information and guidance to assist in their preparation and timely response for meetings, and to synthesize agreements and recommendations ensuring the task force meets its reporting requirements.

(2) A joint legislative task force on problem gambling is created. The task force membership is composed of:

(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(c) A representative from the health care authority;

(d) A representative from the department of health;

(e) A representative from the gambling commission;

(f) A representative from the state lottery;

(g) A representative from the horse racing commission;

(h) A representative from a nonprofit organization with experience in problem gambling treatment and recovery services;

(i) Two representatives with experience in problem gambling treatment and recovery services, at least one of whom must be from a federally recognized Indian tribe;

(j) A member of the public who is impacted by a gambling problem or gambling disorder;

(k) A representative from a problem gambling recovery group or organization;

(l) A representative from a mental health provider group or organization;

(m) A representative from a licensed gambling business or organization;

(n) A representative from a federally recognized tribal gaming operation, group, or organization; and

(o) Other representatives from federally recognized Indian tribes, state agency representatives, or stakeholder group representatives, at the discretion of the task force, for the purpose of participating in specific topic discussions or subcommittees.

(3) The task force shall engage in the following activities:

(a) Review findings of the gambling commission's problem gambling study and report completed in 2018-2019;

(b) Review existing prevention, treatment, and recovery services to address problem gambling and gambling disorders in this state by public, private, and nonprofit entities;

(c) Review existing programs, services, and treatment to address problem gambling and gambling disorders in other states and the federal government;

(d) Make recommendations to the legislature regarding:

(i) How to proceed forward with a state prevalence study measuring the adult participation in gambling and adult problem gambling in this state;

(ii) Whether this state should expand state funding for prevention, treatment, and recovery services to address the need for these programs; and

(iii) What steps the state should take to improve the current licensing and certification of problem gambling providers to meet the current and projected future demand for services; and

(e) Identify additional problem gambling areas for consideration and any actions needed to ensure the state and/or regulatory agencies are effectively addressing problem gambling in an attempt to reduce the number of persons impacted by this disorder.

(5) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the agencies, departments, and commissions identified in subsection (2)(c) through (g) of this section. The state agencies, departments, and commissions identified in subsection (2)(c) through (g) of this section may enter into an interagency agreement related to the provision of staff support for the task force. Unless it is expressly provided for in the agreement between the agencies, departments, and commissions, nothing in this subsection requires staff of each of the agencies, departments, and commissions identified in subsection (1)(c) through (g) of this section to provide staff support to the task force.

(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The task force shall submit a preliminary report of recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2020, and a final report by November 30, ((2021))2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 993. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created a joint select committee to be known as the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee with the following eight members:

(a) The majority and minority leaders of the senate;

(b) The speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives;

(c) Two additional members of the senate with one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate appointed by their respective leaders. These senators must be current members of the ways and means committee; and

(d) Two additional members of the house of representatives with one member from each of the major caucuses of the house of representatives appointed by their respective leaders. These representatives must be current members of the appropriations or capital budget committees.

(2) The cochairs of the committee are the leaders of the two largest caucuses of the senate in even-numbered years and the leaders of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives in odd-numbered years.

(3) Staff support for the committee is provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(4) Members of the committee serve without additional compensation, but must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. The expenses of the committee are paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives and expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(5) The purpose of the committee is to review requests for proposed allotment amendments to spend unanticipated and unbudgeted moneys from federal and nonstate sources pursuant to RCW 43.79.270(3). The committee is necessary to provide oversight of the legislature's delegation of state fiscal authority to the governor while the legislature is not in session and to prevent infringement on the legislature's constitutional power to appropriate state funds.

(6) The committee shall meet as necessary to review requests from the governor pursuant to RCW 43.79.270(3) and to provide comment within 14 calendar days. The committee may conduct its meetings and hold public hearings by conference telephone call, videoconference, or using similar technology equipment so that all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time. The committee shall adopt rules and procedures for its orderly operation. The activities of the committee are suspended during regular or special legislative sessions.

(7) If the committee chooses to conduct a public hearing on a proposed allotment amendment, the committee must provide the office of financial management with 5 calendar days notice of the public hearing. The office of financial management, or its designee, must appear before the committee to present the proposed allotment amendment and respond to questions. The committee may also require the state agency, department, board, or commission proposing the allotment amendment to appear before the committee, submit additional information, or engage in other activities necessary for the committee to review and comment on proposed allotment amendments.

(8) Action of the committee is limited to the review and comment on requests submitted by the governor under RCW 43.79.270(3). Action by the committee requires the majority vote of members of the committee in attendance at the meeting. Action may take the form of a recommendation approving the proposed allotment amendment, rejecting the proposed allotment amendment or proposing an alternative allotment amendment for governor consideration prior to approval under RCW 43.79.280. The committee's action is not binding on the governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 994. The president of the United States proposed the American jobs plan on March 31, 2021, and has requested the United States congress to provide additional federal funding to the states to rebuild the economy including, but not limited to, funding for infrastructure projects, building and utilities improvements, economic stimulus and jobs, and access to care and services for the aging and persons with disabilities. The legislature anticipates the receipt of this new federal funding and intends to appropriate any federal funds with an operating or capital budget impact in a future budget or appropriation act. The new federal funding may not be expended through the unanticipated process provided in RCW 43.79.270 and 43.79.280 or through any appropriation authority provided in this omnibus operating appropriations act or the omnibus capital appropriations act.

(End of part)

PART X

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1001. 2020 c 357 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($40,403,000))

$40,378,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($44,256,000))

$42,560,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,266,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($88,925,000))

$87,204,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (((1))) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2018 (harassment/legislature). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1002. 2020 c 357 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SENATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($28,736,000))

$28,711,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($33,869,000))

$32,417,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,932,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($65,537,000))

$64,060,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2018 (harassment/legislature). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(2) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a human resource officer consistent with the implementation of the senate's appropriate workplace conduct policy.

Sec. 1003. 2020 c 357 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,844,000))

$9,240,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($9,844,000))

$9,240,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's 2019-2021 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(2) $266,000 of the performance audit of governments account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (school safety & well-being). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(3) $17,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025 (self-help housing development and taxes). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(4)(a) $342,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct a performance audit of the department of health's ambulatory surgical facility regulatory program. The study must explore:

(i) A comparison of state survey requirements and process and the centers for medicare and medicaid services survey requirements and process;

(ii) The licensing fees required of ambulatory surgical facilities as they relate to actual department of health costs for regulating the facilities;

(iii) Payments received by the department of health from the centers for medicare and medicaid services for surveys conducted on behalf of the centers for medicare and medicaid services; and

(iv) Staffing for the survey program, including any need for an increase or reduction of staff.

(b) The audit must be completed and provided to the legislature by January 1, 2021.

(5) $100,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct a performance audit of the health care authority's budget structure, including its chart of accounts. The study must:

(a) Include a comparison of other state medicaid agency budget structures of similar size; and

(b) Be completed and provided to the legislature by September 1, 2021.

Sec. 1004. 2020 c 357 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,585,000))

$4,538,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,585,000))

$4,538,000

Sec. 1005. 2020 c 357 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$12,086,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($13,946,000))

$13,721,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$822,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($26,854,000))

$26,629,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts provided in this section, the joint legislative systems committee shall provide information technology support, including but not limited to internet service, for the district offices of members of the house of representatives and the senate.

Sec. 1006. 2020 c 357 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$333,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($347,000))

$344,000

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($471,000))

$470,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,721,000))

$5,652,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($6,900,000))

$6,827,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for a benchmark analysis of the value of public employee benefits and how those benefits compare to other employers.

(2) During the 2020 legislative interim, the select committee on pension policy shall study the consistency of administrative practices under the portability provisions of chapter 41.54 RCW. In conducting this study, the select committee on pension policy shall:

(a) Convene a study group including representatives of the department of retirement systems, the office of the state actuary, the state institutions of higher education, and the cities of Seattle, Tacoma, and Spokane. The purpose of this study group is to facilitate the sharing of information and data needed for the select committee on pension policy to conduct the analysis and draft its report;

(b) Review and compare written policies of each of the entities in (a) of this subsection enacted pursuant to carrying out dual membership provisions under chapter 41.54 RCW, as well as any participant data needed to make reasonable comparisons of administrative practices;

(c) Identify differences in administrative practices, and consider the implications for making those practices consistent between entities; and

(d) Report any findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2020.

Sec. 1007. 2020 c 357 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$5,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($5,520,000))

$5,417,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$566,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,086,000))

$10,983,000

Sec. 1008. 2020 c 357 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$4,213,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($4,694,000))

$4,608,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$436,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($9,343,000))

$9,257,000

Sec. 1009. 2020 c 357 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$64,580,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($72,151,000))

$70,825,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,203,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$681,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,692,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,572,000

Judicial Information Systems Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$63,233,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($214,112,000))

$212,786,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(2) $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. The administrator for the courts shall develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.

(3)(a) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula must neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(b) Each fiscal year during the 2019-21 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than forty-five days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than sixty days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(4) $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1517 (domestic violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse))

(5) $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for DNA testing for alleged fathers in dependency and termination of parental rights cases.

(6) $237,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,923,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the expansion of the state interpreter reimbursement program.

(7) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $360,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of public guardianship for guardianship fees, initial assessments, average annual legal fees, and for less restrictive options to support decision-making.

(8) $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the statewide fiscal impact on Thurston county courts. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(9) $25,808,000 of the judicial information systems account—state appropriation is provided solely for judicial branch information technology projects. Expenditures from the judicial information systems account shall not exceed available resources. Judicial branch information technology project prioritization shall be determined by the judicial information system committee.

(10) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,077,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5604 (uniform guardianship, etc.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(11) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5149 (monitoring w/victim notif.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(12) $298,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5450 (adding superior court judges). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(13) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5720 (involuntary treatment act). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(14) $207,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the development and implementation of a statewide online training system for court staff and judicial officers.

(15) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6268 (abusive litigation/partners). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(16) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6641 (sex offender treatment avail). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(17) $333,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to implement a statewide text notification system. The court date notification texting services must provide subscribers with criminal court date notifications and reminders by short message service or text message that includes but is not limited to the court date, session changes, and a court date reminder in advance of the scheduled court date.

(18) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to reimburse counties affected by extraordinary judicial costs arising from a long-term leave of absence by a superior court judge in the Asotin-Columbia-Garfield tri-county judicial district. An affected county may apply to the office for reimbursement for the reasonable costs of expenses incurred since April 24, 2019, for: Travel, lodging, and subsistence of visiting elected judges holding court in the tri-county district under RCW 2.08.140; the state and local shares of pro tempore judge compensation in the tri-county district under RCW 2.08.180; the state and local shares of pro tempore judge compensation under RCW 2.08.180 for a county that has provided a visiting elected judge; and similar county-borne extraordinary expenses that arise directly from the leave of absence. Where appropriate, the office must apportion reimbursement among the district's counties in accordance with RCW 2.08.110.

(((20)))(19) $666,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2467 (firearm background checks). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21)))(20) $112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2277 (youth solitary confinement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22) $1,214,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2793 (vacating criminal records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23)))(21) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to develop a domestic violence risk assessment instrument that:

(a) Uses information from relevant court records and prior offenses to predict the likelihood of a domestic violence incident; and

(b) Determines whether law enforcement risk data and domestic violence supplemental forms are useful in determining reoffense.

Sec. 1010. 2020 c 357 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$20,949,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($22,951,000))

$22,283,000

Judicial Stabilization Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,464,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$44,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($45,408,000))

$44,740,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.

(2) $759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office to continue implementation of the civil justice reinvestment plan.

(3) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $105,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the children's representation study authorized in chapter 20, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. The report of initial findings to the legislature must be submitted by December 31, 2020.

(4) The office of civil legal aid shall enter into an interagency agreement with the department of children, youth, and families to facilitate the use of federal title IV-E reimbursement for child representation services.

(5) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with the international families justice coalition to expand private capacity to provide legal services for indigent foreign nationals in contested domestic relations and family law cases. Amounts provided in this section may not be expended for direct private legal representation of clients in domestic relations and family law cases.

(6) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5651 (kinship care legal aid). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for closing compensation differentials between volunteer legal aid programs and the northwest justice project.

(8) $1,205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,881,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a vendor rate increase resulting from a collective bargaining agreement between the northwest justice project and its staff union.

(9) (($307,500))$57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $317,500 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for a research-based controlled comparative study of the differences in outcomes for tenants facing eviction who receive legal representation and tenants facing eviction without legal representation in unlawful detainer cases filed under the residential landlord tenant act. Funding must be used to underwrite both the research and the costs of legal representation provided to tenants associated with the study. Researchers will identify four counties to study. A preliminary report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 31, 2021, and a final report on the study, which includes findings on demographics and outcomes, must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021.

(10) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for expenditures made to address fiscal year 2019 caseload driven shortfalls in the children's representation program and the children's representation study.

(11) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $193,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to wind down the children's representation study authorized in section 28, chapter 20, Laws of 2017 3rd sp.s.

(12) $492,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to establish a statewide reentry legal aid project. The office of civil legal aid shall enlist support from the statewide reentry council to identify an appropriate nonprofit entity to establish and operate the statewide reentry legal aid project, establish initial priority areas of focus, and determine client service objectives, benchmarks, and intended outcomes. The office of civil legal aid and the statewide reentry council shall provide the relevant legislative committees with an initial status report by December 2021.

(13) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the automation, deployment, and hosting of an automated family law document assembly system provided for in chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(14) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to provide funding to King county organizations that provide legal services. Of this amount:

(a) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a nonprofit organization to develop an updated kinship legal services guide based on continuing changes in laws and practices.

(b) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a bar association to operate a kinship legal services program that trains kinship caregivers about recent enacted guardianship laws.

Sec. 1011. 2020 c 357 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$9,858,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($10,454,000))

$8,463,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$674,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($27,986,000))

$25,995,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.

(2) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1130 (pub. school language access).

(3) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $301,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5356 (LGBTQ commission).

(4) $397,000 of the general fund state—appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $353,000 of the general fund state—appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for the office to contract with a neutral third party to establish a process for local, state, tribal, and federal leaders and stakeholders to address issues associated with the possible breaching or removal of the four lower Snake river dams in order to recover the Chinook salmon populations that serve as a vital food source for southern resident orcas. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.

(5) $110,000 of the general fund—stateappropriation in fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the office of regulatory innovations and assistance to convene agencies and stakeholders to develop a small business bill of rights. Of this amount, a report must be submitted to appropriate legislative policy and fiscal committees by November 1, 2019, to include:

(a) Recommendations of rights and protections for small business owners when interacting with state agencies, boards, commissions, or other entities with regulatory authority over small businesses; and

(b) Recommendations on communication plans that state regulators should consider when communicating these rights and protections to small business owners in advance or at the time of any audit, inspection, interview, site visit, or similar oversight or enforcement activity.

(6) $966,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for executive protection unit costs.

(7) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the clemency and pardons board to expedite the review of applications where the petitioner indicates an urgent need for the pardon or commutation, including, but not limited to, a pending deportation order or deportation proceeding.

(8) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the education ombuds, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington state office of equity, to develop a plan to implement a program to promote skills, knowledge, and awareness concerning issues of diversity, equity, and inclusion among families with school-age children. The office of education ombuds shall submit a report with recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees in the legislature by September 1, 2020.

Sec. 1012. 2020 c 357 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,313,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,545,000))

$1,553,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$90,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,002,000))

$3,010,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $180,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the continuation of the complete Washington program and to add new pathways, such as the healthcare industry, to the program.

(2) $195,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the Washington world fellows program.

Sec. 1013. 2020 c 357 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$5,532,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($5,456,000))

$5,344,000

Public Disclosure Transparency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$714,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$260,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,962,000))

$11,850,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $45,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5861 (legislature/code of conduct).

(2) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to develop a training course for individuals acting as treasurers or deputy treasurers for candidates pursuant to RCW 42.17A.210. Out of this amount:

(a) The course must provide, at a minimum, a comprehensive overview of:

(i) The responsibilities of treasurers and deputy treasurers;

(ii) The reporting requirements necessary for candidate compliance with chapter 42.17A RCW, including triggers and deadlines for reporting;

(iii) Candidate campaign contribution limits and restrictions under chapter 42.17A RCW;

(iv) The use of the commission's electronic filing system;

(v) The consequences for violation of chapter 42.17A RCW; and

(vi) Any other subjects or topics the commission deems necessary for encouraging effective compliance with chapter 42.17A RCW.

(b) The commission must make the course available to all interested individuals no later than September 1, 2019. The course must be provided in a format able to be used both in person and remotely via the internet.

(3) $140,000 of the public disclosure transparency account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff for business analysis and project management of information technology projects.

(4) No moneys may be expended from the appropriations in this section to establish an electronic directory, archive, or other compilation of political advertising unless explicitly authorized by the legislature.

Sec. 1014. 2020 c 357 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$34,997,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($19,562,000))

$19,449,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,098,000))

$8,046,000

Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,677,000))

$9,619,000

Charitable Organization Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$900,000

Washington State Library Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,516,000))

$11,426,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,027,000))

$9,742,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$960,000

Election Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,800,000

Election Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,687,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($112,224,000))

$110,626,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,801,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2)(a) $2,932,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,011,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of statewide significance during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.

(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.

(4) $13,600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for operation of the presidential primary election, including reimbursement to counties for the state's share of presidential primary election costs.

(5) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations to expand programming in underserved areas of the state.

(6) $2,295,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,526,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5063 (ballots, prepaid postage).

(7) $1,227,000 of the local government archives account—state appropriation and $28,000 of the public records efficiency, preservation, and access account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1667 (public records request administration).

(8) $114,000 public records efficiency, preservation, and access account—state appropriation and $114,000 local government archives account—state appropriation are provided solely for digital archives functionality and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(9) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $500,000 of the election account—federal appropriation are provided solely for election security improvements.

(10) $82,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for election reconciliation reporting. Funding provides for one staff to compile county reconciliation reports, analyze the data, and to complete an annual statewide election reconciliation report for every state primary and general election. The report must be submitted annually on July 31, beginning July 31, 2020, to legislative policy and fiscal committees. The annual report must include reasons for ballot rejection and an analysis of the ways ballots are received, counted, and rejected that can be used by policymakers to better understand election administration.

(11) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for civic engagement. The secretary of state and county auditors will collaborate to increase voter participation and educate voters about improvements to state election laws that will impact the 2019 and 2020 elections.

(12) $1,800,000 of the election account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $8,800,000 of the election account—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to enhance election technology and make election security improvements. The office of the secretary of state will provide one-time grant funding to county auditors for election security improvements. Election security improvements may include but are not limited to installation of multi-factor authentication, emergency generators, vulnerability scanners, facility access control enhancements, and alarm systems. Funding will be prioritized based on demonstrated need.

(13) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $520,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for dedicated staffing for maintenance and operations of the voter registration and election management system. These staff will manage database upgrades, database maintenance, system training and support to counties, and the triage and customer service to system users.

(14) $300,000 of the public records efficiency, preservation, and access account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional project staffing to pack, catalog, and move the states archival collection in preparation for the move to the new library archives building that will be located in Tumwater.

(15) $674,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6313 (young voters). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for general election costs for Substitute Senate Joint Resolution No. 8212 (investment of LTC funds). If the resolution is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the secretary of state to support the capacity for the retention and transition of historical and archived records from the national archives and records administration located at Sandpoint. The secretary of state may explore options, including building storage and access capacity by working with universities, tribes, and museums that have engaged with the Smithsonian institution.

Sec. 1015. 2020 c 357 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$380,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($420,000))

$406,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($828,000))

$814,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

(2) $33,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1713 (Native American women).

(3) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the governor's office of Indian affairs for a task force to evaluate and propose a plan for tribal extradition in Washington.

Sec. 1016. 2020 c 357 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$332,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($425,000))

$413,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($783,000))

$771,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5023 (ethnic studies).

Sec. 1017. 2020 c 357 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,045,000))

$19,704,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($20,045,000))

$19,704,000

Sec. 1018. 2020 c 357 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$238,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($270,000))

$266,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($538,000))

$534,000

Sec. 1019. 2020 c 357 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$15,564,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($16,531,000))

$16,165,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$17,801,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,228,000))

$4,214,000

New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,693,000))

$1,690,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,584,000))

$5,471,000

Child Rescue Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($500,000))

$80,000

Legal Services Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($291,952,000))

$283,127,000

Local Government Archives Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($356,000))

$681,000

((Local Government Archives Account—Local
. . . .
$330,000))

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,602,000

Tobacco Prevention and Control Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$273,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($356,414,000))

$346,668,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.

(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

(4) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1166 (sexual assault kits).

(5) $63,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1399 (paid family and medical leave).

(6) $44,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1224 (rx drug cost transparency).

(7) $79,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2052 (marijuana product testing).

(8) $330,000 of the local government archives account—local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1667 (public records request admin).

(9) $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the civil rights unit to provide additional services in defense and protection of civil and constitutional rights for people in Washington.

(10) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $344,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5297 (assistant AG bargaining).

(11) $700,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(12) $592,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation and $47,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy).

(13) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for a work group to study and institute a statewide program for receiving reports and other information for the public regarding potential self-harm, potential harm, or criminal acts including but not limited to sexual abuse, assault, or rape. Out of this amount:

(a) The work group must review the aspects of similar programs in Arizona, Michigan, Colorado, Idaho, Nevada, Oregon, Utah, Wisconsin, and Wyoming; and must incorporate the most applicable aspects of those programs to the program proposal;

(b) The program proposal must include a plan to implement a twenty-four hour hotline or app for receiving such reports and information; and

(c) The program proposal and recommendations must be submitted to legislative fiscal committees by July 31, 2020.

(14) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the attorney general to develop an implementation plan to collect and disseminate data on the use of force by public law enforcement agencies and private security services.

(a) The plan must identify how to effectively collect data on the occasions of justifiable homicide or uses of deadly force by a public officer, peace officer, or person aiding under RCW 9A.16.040 by all general authority Washington law enforcement agencies and the department of corrections. The plan must address any necessary statutory changes, possible methods of collection, and any other needs that must be addressed to collect the following information:

(i) The number of tort claims filed and moneys paid in use of force cases;

(ii) The number of incidents in which peace officers discharged firearms at citizens;

(iii) The demographic characteristics of the officers and citizens involved in each incident, including sex, age, race, and ethnicity;

(iv) The agency or agencies employing the involved officers and location of each incident;

(v) The particular weapon or weapons used by peace officers and citizens; and

(vi) The injuries, if any, suffered by officers and citizens.

(b) The implementation plan must also identify how to effectively collect data on the occasions of the use of force requiring the discharge of a firearm by any private security guard employed by any private security company licensed under chapter 18.170 RCW. The plan must address any necessary statutory changes, possible methods of collection, and any other needs that must be addressed to collect the following information:

(i) The number of incidents in which security guards discharged firearms at citizens;

(ii) The demographic characteristics of the security guards and citizens involved in each incident, including sex, age, race, and ethnicity;

(iii) The company employing the involved security guards and the location of each incident;

(iv) The particular weapon or weapons used by security guards and citizens; and

(v) The injuries, if any, suffered by security guards and citizens.

(c) The attorney general must compile reports received pursuant to this subsection and make public the data collected.

(d) The department of licensing, department of corrections, Washington state patrol, and criminal justice training commission must assist the attorney general as necessary to complete the implementation plan.

(15) $4,220,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $1,407,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation are provided solely for additional staffing and program operations in the medicaid fraud control division.

(16) $8,392,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for child welfare and permanency staff.

(17) $141,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5035 (prevailing wage laws).

(18) $751,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $82,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $32,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation, $27,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account—state appropriation, $4,529,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation, and $8,000 of the local government archives account—state appropriation are provided solely for the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 902 of this act.

(19) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $616,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for multi-year arbitrations of the state's diligent enforcement of its obligations to receive amounts withheld from tobacco master settlement agreement payments.

(20) $605,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for defending challenges to chapter 354, Laws of 2019 that set vapor pressure limits for in-state receipt of crude oil by rail.

(21) $1,069,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the office to compel the United States department of energy to meet Hanford cleanup deadlines.

(22) $1,563,000 of the legal services revolving fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to defend the state in the Wolf vs State Board for Community and Technical Colleges case.

(23) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6158 (model sexual assault protocols). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24) $192,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2467 (firearm background checks). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2511 (domestic workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26) $244,000 of the legal services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2638 (sports wagering/compacts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2662 (total cost of insulin). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(28) $394,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for two additional investigators and a data consultant for the homicide investigation tracking system (HITS).

Sec. 1020. 2020 c 357 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,040,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,063,000))

$1,965,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$168,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,271,000))

$4,173,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $43,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the caseload forecast council to provide information, data analysis, and other necessary assistance upon the request of the task force established in section 952 of this act.

Sec. 1021. 2020 c 357 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$96,462,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($146,437,000))

$143,059,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($327,896,000))

$327,810,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,112,000))

$9,098,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,212,000))

$8,177,000

Lead Paint Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($251,000))

$110,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,291,000))

$1,289,000

Home Security Fund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($120,425,000))

$87,411,000

((Energy Freedom Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000))

Affordable Housing for All Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,895,000))

$12,198,000

Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes

Investigation and Prosecution Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,325,000

Low-Income Weatherization and Structural

Rehabilitation Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,399,000))

$699,000

Statewide Tourism Marketing Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,028,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,200,000))

$4,104,000

Growth Management Planning and Environmental Review

Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,800,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,616,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,918,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($67,947,000))

$67,586,000

Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,076,000))

$1,071,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

((Dedicated Marijuana Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,100,000))

Andy Hill Cancer Research Endowment Fund Match

Transfer Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,454,000))

$14,335,000

Community Preservation and Development Authority

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($827,041,000))

$793,288,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.

(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.

(3) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.

(4) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.

(5) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.

(6) $3,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2019-2021 biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086.

(7) $5,907,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.

(8) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.

(9) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.

(10) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.

(11) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the regulatory roadmap program for the construction industry and to identify and coordinate with businesses in key industry sectors to develop additional regulatory roadmap tools.

(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.

(13) $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.

(14) $1,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation, $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation, and $1,000,000 of the affordable housing for all account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.

(15) $2,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for the administration of the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.

(16) $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,980,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for community beds for individuals with a history of mental illness. Currently, there is little to no housing specific to populations with these co-occurring disorders; therefore, the department must consider how best to develop new bed capacity in combination with individualized support services, such as intensive case management and care coordination, clinical supervision, mental health, substance abuse treatment, and vocational and employment services. Case-management and care coordination services must be provided. Increased case-managed housing will help to reduce the use of jails and emergency services and will help to reduce admissions to the state psychiatric hospitals. The department must coordinate with the health care authority and the department of social and health services in establishing conditions for the awarding of these funds. The department must contract with local entities to provide a mix of (a) shared permanent supportive housing; (b) independent permanent supportive housing; and (c) low and no-barrier housing beds for people with a criminal history, substance abuse disorder, and/or mental illness.

Priority for permanent supportive housing must be given to individuals on the discharge list at the state psychiatric hospitals or in community psychiatric inpatient beds whose conditions present significant barriers to timely discharge.

(17) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.

(18) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.

(19) $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 $1,070,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the small business export assistance program. The department must ensure that at least one employee is located outside the city of Seattle for purposes of assisting rural businesses with export strategies.

(20) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.

(21) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide either legal representation or referral services for legal representation, or both, to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.

(22)(a) $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to support the building operation, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing projects or units within housing projects that have or will receive funding from the housing trust fund—state account or other public capital funding that:

(i) Is dedicated as permanent supportive housing units;

(ii) Is occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below thirty percent of the area median income; and

(iii) Requires a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operating, maintenance, and service expenses.

(b) Permanent supportive housing projects receiving federal operating subsidies that do not fully cover the operation, maintenance, and service costs of the projects are eligible to receive grants as described in this subsection.

(c) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.

(23)(a) $2,091,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $3,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $7,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:

(i) Expand outreach, services, and housing for homeless youth and young adults including but not limited to secure crisis residential centers, crisis residential centers, and HOPE beds, so that resources are equitably distributed across the state;

(ii) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and

(iii) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and enable providers to have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to build infrastructure and services to support a continuum of interventions including but not limited to prevention, crisis response, and long-term housing in reducing youth homelessness in four identified communities as part of the anchor community initiative; and

(ii) $91,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to provide youth services and young adult housing on a multi-acre youth campus located in the city of Tacoma. Youth services include, but are not limited to, HOPE beds and crisis residential centers to provide temporary shelter and permanency planning for youth under the age of eighteen. Young adult housing includes, but is not limited to, rental assistance and case management for young adults ages eighteen to twenty-four.

(24) $36,650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $51,650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the essential needs and housing support program.

(25) $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Aerospace; (b) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy; (c) wood products and other natural resource industries; (d) information and communication technology; (e) life sciences and global health; (f) maritime; and (g) military and defense. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.

(26) $1,237,000 of the liquor excise tax account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide fiscal note assistance to local governments, including increasing staff expertise in multiple subject matter areas, including but not limited to criminal justice, taxes, election impacts, transportation and land use, and providing training and staff preparation prior to legislative session.

(27) The department must develop a model ordinance for cities and counties to utilize for siting community based behavioral health facilities.

(28) $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to retain a behavioral health facilities siting administrator within the department to coordinate development of effective behavioral health housing options and provide technical assistance in siting of behavioral health treatment facilities statewide to aide in the governor's plan to discharge individuals from the state psychiatric hospitals into community settings. This position must work closely with the local government legislative authorities, planning departments, behavioral health providers, health care authority, department of social and health services, and other entities to facilitate linkages among disparate behavioral health community bed capacity-building efforts. This position must work to integrate building behavioral health treatment and infrastructure capacity in addition to ongoing supportive housing benefits.

(29)(a) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must revise its agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(i) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(ii) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(A) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(B) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(C) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(b) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the department or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(c) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(30)(a) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with a consultant to study the current and ongoing impacts of the SeaTac international airport. The general fund—state funding provided in this subsection serves as a state match and may not be spent unless $150,000 of local matching funds is transferred to the department. The department must seek feedback on project scoping and consultant selection from the cities listed in (b) of this subsection.

(b) The study must include, but not be limited to:

(i) The impacts that the current and ongoing airport operations have on quality of life associated with air traffic noise, public health, traffic, congestion, and parking in residential areas, pedestrian access to and around the airport, public safety and crime within the cities, effects on residential and nonresidential property values, and economic development opportunities, in the cities of SeaTac, Burien, Des Moines, Tukwila, Federal Way, Normandy Park, and other impacted neighborhoods; and

(ii) Options and recommendations for mitigating any negative impacts identified through the analysis.

(c) The department must collect data and relevant information from various sources including the port of Seattle, listed cities and communities, and other studies.

(d) The study must be delivered to the legislature by June 1, 2020.

(31) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection must make recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2019, regarding rights that all unaccompanied homeless youth and young adults should have for appropriate care and treatment in licensed and unlicensed residential runaway and homeless youth programs.

(32) $787,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $399,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1344 (child care access work group).

(33) $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization with offices located in the cities of Maple Valley, Enumclaw, and Auburn to provide street outreach and connect homeless young adults ages eighteen through twenty-four to services in south King county.

(34) $218,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1444 (appliance efficiency).

(35) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1114 (food waste reduction).

(36) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with the city of Federal Way to support after-school recreational and educational programs.

(37) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department to convene a work group regarding the development of Washington's green economy based on the state's competitive advantages. The work group must focus on developing economic, education, business, and investment opportunities in energy, water, and agriculture. The work group must consist of at least one representative from the department, the department of natural resources, the department of agriculture, the Washington state department of transportation, a four-year research university, a technical college, the private sector, an economic development council, a city government, a county government, a tribal government, a non-government organization, a statewide environmental advocacy organization, and up to two energy utility providers. The work group must:

(a) Develop an inventory of higher education resources including research, development, and workforce training to foster green economic development in energy, water, and agriculture;

(b) Identify investment opportunities in higher education research, development, and workforce training to enhance and accelerate green economic development;

(c) Make recommendations for green economic development investment opportunities and how state government may serve as a clearing house, or economic center, to support private investments and build the green economy in Washington to serve national and global markets;

(d) Identify opportunities for integrating technology in energy, water, natural resources, and agriculture, and create resource efficiencies including water and energy conservation and smart grid technologies;

(e) Recommend policies at the state and local government level to promote and accelerate development of the green economy in Washington state;

(f) Submit an interim report with the work group recommendations to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2019; and

(g) Submit a final report with the work group recommendations to the appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2020.

(38) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization focused on supporting pregnant women and single mothers who are homeless or at risk of being homeless throughout Pierce county. The grant must be used for providing classes relating to financial literacy, renter rights and responsibilities, parenting, and physical and behavioral health.

(39) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide capacity-building grants through the Latino community fund for educational programs and human services support for children and families in rural and underserved communities.

(40) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the city of Bothell to complete the canyon park regional growth center subarea plan.

(41) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington statewide reentry council for operational staff support, travel, and administrative costs.

(42) $964,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,045,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1257 (energy efficiency).

(43) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 16, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (E2SSB 5254).

(44) General fund—federal appropriations provided in this section assume continued receipt of the federal Byrne justice assistance grant for state and local government drug and gang task forces.

(45) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for an initiative to advance affordable housing projects and education centers on public or tax-exempt land in Washington state. The department must award the grant to an organization with an office located in a city with a population of more than six hundred thousand that partners in equitable, transit-oriented development. The grant must be used to:

(a) Produce an inventory of potentially developable public or tax-exempt properties;

(b) Analyze the suitability of properties for affordable housing, early learning centers, or community space;

(c) Organize community partners and build capacity to develop sites, as well as coordinate negotiations among partners and public owners;

(d) Facilitate collaboration and co-development between affordable housing, early learning centers, or community space;

(e) Catalyze the redevelopment of ten sites to create approximately fifteen hundred affordable homes; and

(f) Subcontract with the University of Washington to facilitate public, private, and non-profit partnerships to create a regional vision and strategy for building affordable housing at a scale to meet the need.

(46) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal 2021 is provided solely for the department to contract with an entity located in the Beacon hill/Chinatown international district area of Seattle to provide low income housing, low income housing support services, or both. To the extent practicable, the chosen location must be colocated with other programs supporting the needs of children, the elderly, or persons with disabilities.

(47) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant for a criminal justice diversion center pilot program in Spokane county.

(a) Spokane county must report collected data from the pilot program to the department. The report must contain, at a minimum:

(i) An analysis of the arrests and bookings for individuals served in the pilot program;

(ii) An analysis of the connections to behavioral health services made for individuals who were served by the pilot program;

(iii) An analysis of the impacts on housing stability for individuals served by the pilot program; and

(iv) The number of individuals served by the pilot program who were connected to a detoxification program, completed a detoxification program, completed a chemical dependency assessment, completed chemical dependency treatment, or were connected to housing.

(b) No more than fifty percent of the funding provided in this subsection may be used for planning and predevelopment activities related to site readiness and other startup expenses incurred before the pilot program becomes operational.

(48)(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for one or more better health through housing pilot project. The department must contract with one or more accountable communities of health to work with hospitals and permanent supportive housing providers in their respective accountable community of health regions to plan for and implement the better health through housing pilot project. The accountable communities of health must have established partnerships with permanent supportive housing providers, hospitals, and community health centers.

(b) The pilot project must prioritize providing permanent supportive housing assistance to people who:

(i) Are homeless or are at imminent risk of homelessness;

(ii) Have complex physical health or behavioral health conditions; and

(iii) Have a medically necessary condition, risk of death, negative health outcomes, avoidable emergency department utilization, or avoidable hospitalization without the provision of permanent supportive housing, as determined by a vulnerability assessment tool.

(c) Permanent supportive housing assistance may include rental assistance, permanent supportive housing service funding, or permanent supportive housing operations and maintenance funding. The pilot program shall work with permanent supportive housing providers to determine the best permanent supportive housing assistance local investment strategy to expedite the availability of permanent supportive housing for people eligible to receive assistance through the pilot project.

(d) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must contract with the Washington state department of social and health services division of research and data analysis to design and conduct a study to evaluate the impact of the better health through housing pilot project or projects. The division shall submit a final study report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021. The study objectives must include:

(i) Baseline data collection of the physical health conditions, behavioral health conditions, housing status, and health care utilization of people who receive permanent supportive housing assistance through the pilot project;

(ii) The impact on physical health and behavioral health outcomes of people who receive permanent supportive housing assistance through the pilot project as compared to people with similar backgrounds who did not receive permanent supportive housing assistance; and

(iii) The impact on health care costs and health care utilization of people who receive permanent supportive housing assistance through the pilot project as compared to people with similar backgrounds who did not receive permanent supportive housing assistance.

(e) A reasonable amount of the amounts provided in this subsection may be used to pay for costs to administer the pilot contracts and housing assistance.

(f) Amounts provided in this subsection do not include funding provided under title XIX or title XXI of the federal social security act, funding from the general fund—federal appropriation, or funding from the general fund—local appropriation for transformation through accountable communities of health, as described in initiative one of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington.

(g) The accountable communities of health must annually report the progress and impact of the better health through housing pilot project or projects to the joint select committee on health care oversight by December 1st of each year.

(49) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract for the promotion of leadership development, community building, and other services for the Native American community in south King county.

(50)(a) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $38,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide to Chelan county to collaborate with the department of fish and wildlife and the Stemilt partnership on the following activities:

(i) Identifying and evaluating possible land exchanges in the Stemilt basin that provide mutual benefits to outdoor recreation and the mission of a public agency; and

(ii) Completing independent appraisals of all properties that may be included in a possible land exchange by January 1, 2021.

(b) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to provide to the department of fish and wildlife to complete technical studies, assessments, environmental review, and due diligence for lands included in any potential exchange and for project review for near-and long-term facility replacement and expansion of the mission ridge ski and board resort.

(c) The department must require the department of fish and wildlife, in collaboration with Chelan county, to submit recommendations for potential land exchange and supporting appraisals and environmental analysis to the Chelan county board of commissioners and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 1, 2021.

(51) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant program.

(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,500,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing targeted at those families who are chronically homeless and where at least one member of the family has a disability. The department will also connect these families to medicaid supportive services.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for diversion services for those families and individuals who are at substantial risk of losing stable housing or who have recently become homeless and are determined to have a high probability of returning to stable housing.

(52) $1,275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,227,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy).

(53) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5223 (electrical net metering).

(54) $81,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5324 (homeless student support).

(55) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(56) $264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $676,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511 (broadband service). Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must translate survey materials used to gather information on broadband access into a minimum of three languages and include demographic data in the report associated with the bill.

(57) $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $272,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the lead based paint enforcement activities within the department.

(58) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for a one-time grant to the port of Port Angeles for a stormwater management project to protect ancient tribal burial sites and to maintain water quality.

(59) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to municipalities using a labor program model designed for providing jobs to individuals experiencing homelessness to lead to full-time employment and stable housing.

(60) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of the recommendations by the joint transportation committee's Washington state air cargo movement study to support an air cargo marketing program and assistance program. The department must coordinate promotion activities at domestic and international trade shows, air cargo events, and other activities that support the promotion, marketing, and sales efforts of the air cargo industry.

(61) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit for a smart buildings education program to educate building owners and operators on smart building practices and technologies, including the development of onsite and digital trainings that detail how to operate residential and commercial facilities in an energy efficient manner. The grant recipient must be located in a city with a population of more than seven hundred thousand and serve anyone within Washington with an interest in better understanding energy efficiency in commercial and institutional buildings.

(62) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization to assist fathers transitioning from incarceration to family reunification. The grant recipient must have experience contracting with:

(a) The department of corrections to support offender betterment projects; and

(b) The department of social and health services to provide access and visitation services.

(63) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to promote public education around wildfires to public school students of all ages and to expand outreach on issues related to forest health and fire suppression. The grant recipient shall sponsor projects including, but not limited to, a multi-media traveling presentation.

(64) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to help reduce crime and violence in neighborhoods and school communities. The grant recipient must promote safe streets and community engagement in the city of Tacoma through neighborhood organizing, law enforcement-community partnerships, neighborhood watch programs, youth mobilization, and business engagement.

(65) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to increase the financial stability of low income Washingtonians through participation in children's education savings accounts, earned income tax credits, and the Washington retirement marketplace. The grant recipient must be a statewide association of local asset building coalitions that promotes policies and programs in Washington to assist low-and-moderate income residents build, maintain, and preserve assets through investments in education, homeownership, personal savings and entrepreneurship.

(66) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to catalyze a market for mass timber and promote forest health, workforce development, and updates to building codes. The grant recipient must have at least twenty-five years of experience in land acquisition and program management to conserve farmland, create jobs, revitalize small towns, reduce wildfires, and reduce greenhouse emissions.

(67) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to assist people with limited incomes in nonmetro areas of the state start and sustain small businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization involving a network of microenterprise organizations and professionals to support micro entrepreneurship and access to economic development resources.

(68) $270,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization within the city of Tacoma for social services and educational programming to assist Latino and indigenous communities in honoring heritage and culture through the arts, and overcoming barriers to social, political, economic, and cultural community development. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to provide a public policy fellowship program that offers training in grassroots organizing, leadership development, civic engagement, and policy engagement focused on Latino and indigenous community members.

(69) $5,800,000 of the growth management planning and environmental review fund—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1923 (urban residential building). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants to cities for costs associated with the bill;

(b) $500,000 is provided solely for administration costs to the department; and

(c) $300,000 is provided solely for a grant to the Washington real estate research center.

(70) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department to produce a proposal and recommendations for establishing an industrial waste coordination program by December 1, 2019.

(71) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to develop a comprehensive analysis of statewide emissions reduction strategies. This technical analysis must: (a) Identify specific strategies that are likely to be most effective in achieving necessary emissions reductions for key energy uses and customer segments; and (b) be performed by one or more expert consultants, with administrative and policy support provided by the department.

(72)(($7,454,000))$15,096,000 of the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used for grants and administration costs.

(73) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to law enforcement agencies to implement group violence intervention strategies in areas with high rates of gun violence. Grant funding will be awarded to two sites, with priority given to Yakima county and south King county. The sites must be located in areas with high rates of gun violence, include collaboration with the local leaders and community members, use data to identify the individuals most at risk to perpetrate gun violence for interventions, and include a component that connects individuals to services. Priority is given to sites meeting these criteria who also can demonstrate leveraging existing local or federal resources.

(74) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to facilitate research on nontraditional workers across the regulatory continuum, including convening cross-agency partners. The purpose of the research is to recommend policies and practices regarding the state's worker and small business programs, address changes in the labor market, and continue work initiated by the independent contractor employment study funded in section 127(47), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The department must submit a report of its findings to the governor by November 1, 2020.

(75) $1,343,000 of the financial fraud and identity theft crimes investigation and prosecution account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6074 (financial fraud/theft crimes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(76) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the operations of the long-term care ombudsman program.

(77) $607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to a statewide nonprofit resource center to assist current and prospective homeowners, and homeowners at risk of foreclosure. Funding must be used for activities to prevent mortgage or tax lien foreclosure, housing counselors, foreclosure prevention hotlines, low-income legal services, mediation, and other activities that promote homeownership.

(78) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations that primarily serve communities of color and poor rural communities in community planning, technical assistance, and predevelopment as part of the development of capital assets and programs that help reduce poverty and build stronger and more sustainable communities. The funds will be used to further the goal of equitable development of all Washington communities.

(((80)))(79) $391,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Pacific county to operate or participate in a drug task force to enhance coordination and intelligence while facilitating multijurisdictional criminal investigations.

(((82)))(80) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to produce the biennial report identifying a list of projects to address incompatible developments near military installations as provided in RCW 43.330.520.

(((83)))(81) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the formation of a healthy energy workers board. The board must conduct an unmet health care needs assessment for Hanford workers and develop recommendations on how these health care needs can be met. The board must also review studies on how to prevent worker exposure, summarize existing results and recommendations, develop key indicators of progress in meeting unmet health care needs, and catalogue the health surveillance systems in use at the Hanford site. The workers board must submit a report to the legislature by June 1, 2021, documenting recommendations on meeting health care needs, progress on meeting key indicators, and, if necessary, recommendations for the establishment of new health surveillance systems at Hanford.

(((84)))(82) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for curriculum development and training sessions for a veteran's certified peer counseling pilot program in Lewis county delivered in partnership with a Lewis county veterans museum.

(((85) $60,000,000))(83) $25,000,000 of the home security fund—state appropriation is provided solely for increasing local temporary shelter capacity. The amount provided in this subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) A city or county applying for grant funding shall submit a sheltering proposal that aligns with its local homeless housing plan under RCW 43.185C.050. This proposal must include at a minimum:

(i) A strategy for outreach to bring currently unsheltered individuals into shelter;

(ii) Strategies for connecting sheltered individuals to services including but not limited to: Behavioral health, chemical dependency, education or workforce training, employment services, and permanent supportive housing services;

(iii) An estimate on average length of stay;

(iv) An estimate of the percentage of persons sheltered who will exit to permanent housing destinations and an estimate of those that are expected to return to homelessness;

(v) An assessment of existing shelter capacity in the jurisdiction, and the net increase in shelter capacity that will be funded with the state grant; and

(vi) Other appropriate measures as determined by the department.

(b) The department shall not reimburse more than $56 per day per net additional person sheltered above the baseline of shelter occupancy prior to award of the funding. Eligible uses of funds include shelter operations, shelter maintenance, shelter rent, loan repayment, case management, navigation to other services, efforts to address potential impacts of shelters on surrounding neighborhoods, capital improvements and construction, and outreach directly related to bringing unsheltered people into shelter. The department shall coordinate with local governments to encourage cost-sharing through local matching funds.

(c) The department shall not reimburse more than $10,000 per shelter bed prior to occupancy, for costs associated with creating additional shelter capacity or improving existing shelters to improve occupancy rates and successful outcomes. Eligible costs prior to occupancy include acquisition, construction, equipment, staff costs, and other costs directly related to creating additional shelter capacity.

(d) For the purposes of this subsection "shelter" means any facility, the primary purpose of which is to provide space for homeless in general or for specific populations of homeless. The shelter must: Be structurally sound to protect occupants from the elements and not pose any threat to health or safety, have means of natural or mechanical ventilation, and be accessible to persons with disabilities, and the site must have hygiene facilities, which must be accessible but do not need to be in the structure.

(((86)))(84) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6430 (industrial waste program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for industrial waste coordination grants.

(((88)))(85) $421,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6288 (office of firearm violence). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((89)))(86)(a) $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to support the operation, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing projects or permanent supportive housing units within housing projects that have or will receive funding from the housing trust fund—state account or other public capital funding where the projects or units:

(i) Are dedicated as permanent supportive housing units;

(ii) Are occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below thirty percent of the area median income; and

(iii) Require a supplement to rental income to cover ongoing property operating, maintenance, and service expenses.

(b) The department may use a maximum of five percent of the appropriations in this subsection to administer the grant program.

(((90)))(87) $1,007,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to administer a transitional housing pilot program for nondependent homeless youth. In developing the pilot program, the department will work with the adolescent unit within the department of children, youth, and families, which is focused on cross-system challenges impacting youth, including homelessness.

(((91)))(88) $420,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6495 (housing & essential needs). The amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for essential needs and housing support assistance to individuals newly eligible for housing and essential needs support under Substitute Senate Bill No. 6495. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((92)))(89) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to make recommendations on a sustainable, transparent, and reactive funding model for the operation of the long-term care ombuds program.

(a) The department must recommend a plan that:

(i) Serves all residents in long term care equally;

(ii) Is reactive to changes in service costs; and

(iii) Is reactive to changes in number of residents and types of facilities served.

(b) The department shall convene not more than three stakeholder meetings that includes representatives from the department of social and health services, the department of commerce, the department of health, the office of financial management, the office of the governor, the long-term care ombuds program, representatives of long term care facilities, representatives for the area agencies on aging, and other stakeholders as appropriate. The department must submit a report with recommendations to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(((93)))(90) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to establish representation in key international markets that will provide the greatest opportunities for increased trade and investment for small businesses in the state of Washington. Prior to entering into any contract for representation, the department must consult with associate development organizations and other organizations and associations that represent small business, rural industries, and disadvantaged business enterprises. By June 1, 2021, the department must transmit a report to the economic development committees of the legislature providing the following information, metrics, and private investment resulting from the department's engagement with international markets:

(a) An overview of the international markets in which the department has established representation and activities and contracts funded with amounts provided in this subsection;

(b) Additional funding invested in Washington companies;

(c) The number of jobs created in Washington; and

(d) The number of partnerships established and maintained by the department with international governments, businesses, and organizations.

(((94)))(91) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to establish an identification assistance and support program to assist homeless persons in collecting documentation and procuring an identicard issued by the department of licensing. This program may be operated through a contract for services. The program shall operate in one county west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of one million or more and one county east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of five hundred thousand or more.

(((95)))(92) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of homeless youth to administer a competitive grant process to award funding to licensed youth shelters, HOPE centers, and crisis residential centers to provide behavioral health support services for youth in crisis.

(((96)))(93) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department of commerce to co-lead a prevention workgroup with the department of children, youth, and families. The workgroup shall focus on preventing youth and young adult homelessness and other related negative outcomes. The workgroup shall consist of members representing the department of social and health services, the employment security department, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the interagency workgroup on youth homelessness, community-based organizations, and young people and families with lived experience of housing instability, child welfare involvement or justice system involvement.

(a) The workgroup must develop a preliminary strategic plan to be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2020 that details:

(i) How existing efforts in this area are coordinated;

(ii) The demographics of youth involved in homelessness and other related negative outcomes;

(iii) Recommendations on promising interventions and policy improvements; and

(iv) Detail and descriptions of current prevention funding streams.

(b) The department of commerce shall solicit private funding to support this workgroup. It is the intent of the legislature that this study be supported by a minimum of a one-to-one match with private funds.

(((98)))(94) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants and associated technical assistance and administrative costs to foster collaborative partnerships that expand child care capacity in communities. Eligible applicants include nonprofit organizations, school districts, educational service districts, and local governments. These funds may be expended only after the approval of the director of the department of commerce and must be used to support activities and planning that helps communities address the shortage of child care, prioritizing partnerships serving in whole or in part areas identified as child care access deserts.

(((100)))(95) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization formed in 2018 that provides a shared housing and living environment for pregnant women, single mothers, and their children who are homeless or at risk of being homeless throughout Pierce county. The nonprofit organization must have persons in executive leadership who have experienced family homelessness. The grant must be used for providing classes at the shared housing location on topics such as financial literacy, renter rights and responsibilities, parenting, and physical and behavioral health.

(((102)))(96) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to Clallam county to conduct an assessment of the needs of the county's homeless population. The assessment must include an analysis of the impacts of substance abuse treatment at the county's substance abuse treatment facilities on the county's homeless population. The assessment must also provide recommendations for improvements of the county's local homeless housing program. Funding provided in this subsection may also be used to implement recommendations from the assessment or to provide shelter, services, and relocation assistance for homeless individuals.

(((103)))(97) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to create a centralized diversion fund to serve homeless or at-risk youth and young adults, including those who are unsheltered, exiting inpatient programs, or in school. Funding provided in this subsection may be used for short-term rental assistance, offsetting costs for first and last month's rent and security deposits, transportation costs to go to work, and assistance in obtaining photo identification or birth certificates.

(((104)))(98) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit located in King county that serves homeless and at-risk youth and young adults. The grant must be used for a pre-apprenticeship program for youth and young adults experiencing homelessness to prepare and obtain employment in the construction trades by building affordable housing and to earn a high school diploma or equivalent, college credits, or industry certifications.

(((105)))(99) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nongovernment organization whose primary focus is the economic development of the city of Federal Way. The contract must be for economic development activities with a focus on business expansion, retention, and attraction, job creation, and workforce development in the south Puget Sound.

(((106)))(100) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a pilot program to address the immediate housing needs of low or extremely low-income elderly or disabled adults receiving federal supplemental security, federal social security disability, or federal social security retirement income who have an immediate housing need and live in King, Snohomish, Thurston, Kitsap, Pierce, or Clark counties.

(((107)))(101) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to the King county drainage district number 5 for extraordinary audit costs and to perform deferred maintenance on drainage ditches located within the district.

(((108)))(102) $150,000 of the model toxics control stormwater account—state appropriation is provided solely for planning work related to stormwater runoff at the aurora bridge and I-5 ship canal bridge. Planning work may include, but is not limited to, coordination with project partners, community engagement, conducting engineering studies, and staff support.

(((109)))(103) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to the south King fire and rescue fire protection district located in King county to purchase a maritime emergency response vessel.

(((110)))(104) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit to provide technical assistance to manufactured home community resident organizations who wish to convert the park in which they reside to resident ownership, pursuant to RCW 59.22.039.

(((111)))(105) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2342 (comprehensive plan updates). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((113)))(106) $1,100,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2870 (marijuana retail licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((114)))(107) $297,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit provider of sexual assault services located in Renton. The grant must be used for information technology system improvements.

(((115)))(108) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to assist people with limited incomes in urban areas of the state start and sustain small businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization involving a network of microenterprise organizations and professionals to support micro entrepreneurship and access to economic development resources.

(((116)))(109) $1,000,000 of the community preservation and development authority account—state/operating appropriation is provided solely for the operations of the Pioneer Square-International District community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.060.

(((117)))(110)(a) (($40,000,000))$2,349,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for production and preservation of affordable housing.

(b) In evaluating projects in this subsection, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(c) The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the reporting requirements in section 1029 (3) and (4), chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(((118)))(111)(a) (($10,000,000))$210,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the preservation of affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing.

(b) Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department must implement necessary procedures no later than July 1, 2020, to enable rapid commitment of funds on a first-come, first-served basis to qualifying project proposals that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state.

(c) The department must adhere to the following award terms and procedures for the rapid response program created under (b) of this subsection:

(i) The funding is not subject to the ninety-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.

(ii) Awards must be in the form of a recoverable grant with a forty-year low income housing covenant on the land.

(iii) If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.

(iv) Awards may be used for acquisition or for acquisition and rehabilitation of properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond existing use restrictions and keep them in Washington's housing portfolio.

(v) No single award may exceed $2,500,000, although the department must consider waivers of this award cap if an applicant demonstrates sufficient need.

(vi) The award limit in (c)(v) of this subsection may only be applied to the use of awards provided under this subsection. The amount awarded under this subsection may not be calculated in award limitations for other housing trust fund awards.

(vii) If the department receives simultaneous applications for funding under this program, proposals that reach the greatest public benefit, as defined by the department, must be prioritized. For purposes of this subsection, "greatest public benefit" includes, but is not limited to:

(A) The greatest number of units that will be preserved;

(B) Whether the project has federally funded rental assistance tied to it;

(C) The scarcity of the affordable housing applied for compared to the number of available affordable housing units in the same geographic location; and

(D) The program's established funding priorities under RCW 43.185.070(5).

(d) The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the reporting requirements in section 1029 (3) and (4), chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(((119)))(112)(a) $5,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively.

(b) The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment to be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property.

(c) To allocate preservation funds, the department must review applications and evaluate projects based on the following criteria:

(i) The age of the property, with priority given to buildings that are more than fifteen years old;

(ii) The population served, with priority given to projects with at least fifty percent of the housing units being occupied by families and individuals at or below fifty percent area median income;

(iii) The degree to which the applicant demonstrates that the improvements will result in a reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both;

(iv) The potential for additional years added to the affordability period of the property; and

(v) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(d) The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the reporting requirements in section 1029 (3) and (4), chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(((120)))(113) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year ((2020 [2021]))2021 is provided solely for the department of commerce to contract with a nonprofit organization to establish and operate a center for child care retention and expansion. The nonprofit organization must be a Bellingham, Washington-based nonprofit community action agency with fifty years of experience serving homeless and low-income families and individuals.

(a) Funding provided in this subsection may be used for, but is not limited to, the following purposes:

(i) Creating a rapid response team trained to help child care businesses whose continuity of operations is threatened;

(ii) Developing business model prototypes for new child care settings; and

(iii) Assisting existing or new child care businesses in assessing readiness for expansion or acquisition.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for staffing at the center for child care; and

(ii) $380,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the nonprofit organization to distribute grants to third party child care providers and nongovernmental organizations. Nonprofit entities applying for funding as a statewide network must:

(A) Have an existing infrastructure or network of academic, innovation, and mentoring program grant-eligible entities;

(B) Provide after-school and summer programs with youth development services; and

(C) Provide proven and tested recreational, educational, and character-building programs for children ages six to eighteen years of age.

Sec. 1022. 2020 c 357 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$874,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($914,000))

$892,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,940,000))

$1,918,000

Sec. 1023. 2020 c 357 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$29,306,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($13,799,000))

$12,859,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,013,000))

$32,828,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,526,000))

$5,513,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($330,000))

$317,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($35,360,000))

$35,144,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,497,000

Statewide Information Technology System Development

Maintenance and Operations Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$32,921,000

Office of Financial Management Central Service

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,118,000))

$20,543,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,446,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($678,000))

$650,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($175,994,000))

$174,024,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:

(i) The number of ((state need))Washington college grant and college bound recipients;

(ii) ((The number of students on the unserved waiting list of the state need grant;

(iii))) Persistence and completion rates of ((state need))Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients ((as well as students on the state need grant unserved waiting list)), disaggregated by institution of higher education;

(((iv) State need))(iii) Washington college grant recipients ((and students on the state need grant unserved waiting list)) grade point averages; and

(((v) State need))(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.

(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.

(c) The education data center shall enter data sharing agreements with the joint legislative audit and review committee and the Washington state institute for public policy to ensure that legislatively directed research assignments regarding state financial aid programs may be completed in a timely manner.

(2)(a) $29,623,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the one Washington program agency financial reporting system replacement, phase 1A core financials. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $7,082,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for organizational enterprise resource planning, organizational change management, and procurement contracts in fiscal year 2020.

(ii) $459,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for staff in fiscal year 2020.

(iii) $1,000,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for other contractual services or project staffing in fiscal year 2020.

(iv) $1,366,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for program staff in fiscal year 2021.

(v) $442,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for dedicated integration development staffing in fiscal year 2021. This staff will work to expand the states integration layer.

(vi) $140,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated statewide accounting consultant in fiscal year 2021. This staff will work with state agencies to standardize workflow and work with the systems integrator to configure the agency financial reporting system replacement. The staff will also update applicable state administrative and accounting manual chapters to document new standardized workflows.

(vii) $19,576,000 of the statewide information technology system development revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for other contractual services or project staffing in fiscal year 2021.

(b) Beginning September 30, 2019, the office of financial management shall provide written quarterly reports on the one Washington program to the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee to include how funding was spent for the prior quarter and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. The written report must also include:

(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables accomplished and the expenditures by deliverable by fiscal month;

(ii) A report on the contract full time equivalent charged and paid to each vendor by fiscal month; and

(iii) A report identifying each state agency that received change management vendor work from the information technology pool by fiscal month.

(c) Prior to spending any funds, the director of the office of financial management must agree to the spending and sign off on the spending.

(d) This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(e) Financial reporting for the agency change management funding must be coded and charged discretely in the agency financial reporting system each fiscal month so that it can be differentiated from the noninformation technology pool change management budget and costs.

(3) Within existing resources, the labor relations section shall produce a report annually on workforce data and trends for the previous fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include a workforce profile; information on employee compensation, including salaries and cost of overtime; and information on retention, including average length of service and workforce turnover.

(4) $12,741,000 of the personnel service account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for administration of orca pass benefits included in the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreements and provided to nonrepresented employees as identified in section 996 of this act. The office of financial management must bill each agency for that agency's proportionate share of the cost of orca passes. The payment from each agency must be deposited in to the personnel service account and used to purchase orca passes. The office of financial management may consult with the Washington state department of transportation in the administration of these benefits.

(5) $12,485,000 of the personnel service fund appropriation is provided solely for the administration of a flexible spending arrangement (FSA) plan. Agencies shall pay their proportional cost for the program as determined by the office of financial management. Total amounts billed by the office of financial management for this purpose may not exceed the amount provided in this subsection. The office of financial management may, through interagency agreement, delegate administration of the program to the health care authority.

(6) $1,536,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5741 (all payer claims database), and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(7) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1949 (firearm background checks).

(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1497 (foundational public health).

(9) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the office of financial management to determine annual primary care medical expenditures in Washington, by insurance carrier, in total and as a percentage of total medical expenditure. Where feasible, this determination must also be broken down by relevant characteristics such as whether expenditures were for in-patient or out-patient care, physical or mental health, by type of provider, and by payment mechanism.

(a) The determination must be made in consultation with statewide primary care provider organizations using the state's all payer claims database and other existing data.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(i) "Primary care" means family medicine, general internal medicine, and general pediatrics.

(ii) "Primary care provider" means a physician, naturopath, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or other health professional licensed or certified in Washington state whose clinical practice is in the area of primary care.

(iii) "Primary care medical expenditures" means payments to reimburse the cost of physical and mental health care provided by a primary care provider, excluding prescription drugs, vision care, and dental care, whether paid on a fee-for-service basis or as a part of a capitated rate or other type of payment mechanism.

(iv) "Total medical expenditure" means payments to reimburse the cost of all health care and prescription drugs, excluding vision care and dental care, whether paid on a fee-for-service basis or as part of a capitated rate or other type of payment mechanism.

(c) By December 1, 2019, the office of financial management shall report its findings to the legislature, including an explanation of its methodology and any limits or gaps in existing data which affected its determination.

(10) $1,200,000 of the office of financial management central services—state appropriation is provided solely for the education research and data center to set up a data enclave and to work on complex data sets. This is subject to the conditions, limitations and review requirements of section 701 of this act. The data enclave for customer access must include twenty-five users, to include one user from each of the following entities:

(a) The house;

(b) The senate;

(c) The legislative evaluation and accountability program committee;

(d) The joint legislative audit and review committee; and

(e) The Washington state institute for public policy.

(11) $250,000 of the office of financial management central service—state appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated budget staff for the work associated with the information technology cost pool projects. The staff will be responsible for providing a monthly financial report after each fiscal month close to fiscal staff of the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees to reflect at least:

(a) Fund balance of the information technology pool account;

(b) Amount by project of funding approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(c) Amount by agency of funding approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(d) Total amount approved to date and for the last fiscal month;

(e) Amount of expenditure on each project by the agency to date and for the last fiscal month;

(f) A projection for the information technology pool account by fiscal month through the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium close, and as a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total appropriation;

(g) A projection of each project by fiscal month through the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium close, and a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total project cost; and

(h) A list of agencies and projects that have not yet been approved for funding by the office of financial management.

(12) $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $5,000,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the office of financial management to prepare for the 2020 census. No funds provided under this subsection may be used for political purposes. The office must:

(a) Complete outreach and a communication campaign that reaches the state's hardest to count residents;

(b) Perform frequent outreach to the hard-to-count population both in person through community messengers and through various media avenues;

(c) Establish deliverable-based outreach contracts with nonprofit organizations and local and tribal contracts;

(d) Consider the recommendations of the statewide complete count committee;

(e) Prepare documents in multiple languages to promote census participation;

(f) Provide technical assistance with the electronic census forms; and

(g) Hold in reserve $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—private/local appropriation, until January 1, 2020, for contracting with community based organizations with historical access to and credibility with hard-to-count people to support outreach to the hardest to count and last-mile efforts.

(13) Within existing resources and in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial management shall review and report on the pupil transportation funding system for K-12 education. The report shall include findings and recommendations and shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2020. This report shall include review of the following:

(a) The formula components and modeling approach in RCW 28A.160.192;

(b) The data used in the analysis for completeness, validity, and appropriateness;

(c) The timing requirements and whether they could be changed;

(d) The STARS model for appropriateness, functionality, and alignment with statute; and

(e) The capacity and resources of the office of the superintendent of public instruction to produce the transportation analysis.

(14) $192,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $288,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for the office of financial management to contract for project management and fiscal modeling to support collaborations with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and department of children, youth, and families to complete a report with options and recommendations for administrative efficiencies and long-term strategies which align and integrate high-quality early learning programs administered by both agencies. The report is due to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2020.

(((16)))(15) The office shall consult with agencies of the state, including but not limited to the department of natural resources, state parks and recreation commission, department of fish and wildlife, conservation commission, Puget Sound partnership, recreation and conservation office, and department of ecology, to prioritize actions and investments that mitigate the effects of climate change and strengthen the resiliency of communities and the natural environment. The recommended prioritization list shall be submitted to the governor and the legislature by November 1, 2020, to be considered for funding from the climate resiliency account created in section 924 of this act.

(((18)))(16) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of financial management to review and report on vendor rates for services provided to low-income individuals at the department of children, youth, and families, the department of corrections, and the department of social and health services. The report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020, and must include review of, at least:

(a) The current rates for services by vendor;

(b) A history of increases to the rates since fiscal year 2010 by vendor;

(c) A comparison of how the vendor increases and rates compare to inflation; and

(d) A summary of the billing methodology for the vendor rates.

(((20)))(17) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $350,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to contract with one or more research or actuarial entities to examine the delivery of behavioral and physical health care services for which the health care authority contracts with a risk-bearing fiscal intermediary, excluding any contracts for employee benefit programs. A report must be provided to the legislature no later than September 1, 2021, and must include:

(a) A description of the types of payment methods currently used by risk-bearing fiscal intermediaries to establish provider payments. The report must identify, and, to the extent practicable, quantify, instances of case payment rates, broad encounter rates, value-based purchasing, subcapitation, or similar methodologies;

(b) Options available to the legislature and the governor to ensure that risk-bearing fiscal intermediaries meet standards for quality and access to care; and

(c) Options available to the legislature and the governor to modify payment rates to providers that offer services under medicaid managed care. To the extent practicable, for each option the report must discuss the potential implications to federal funding and client access to care for both state-funded and private pay patients and identify whether the option could be restricted to particular types of service, provider specializations, client characteristics, care settings, geographic areas, or other relevant, identified demographic criteria.

(((21)))(18) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the education research and data center to expand its higher education finance report on the education research and data center web site to include budget, expenditure, and revenue data for institutions of higher education. The budget, expenditure, and revenue data must be by fund for each institution and for all appropriated, nonappropriated, and nonallotted funds, including the source and use of tuition and fee revenue. Expenditure data must include program and activity information. Revenue data must include source of funds.

(((22)))(19) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided on a one-time basis solely for the office to work with a correctional facility located in Des Moines, Washington serving the confinement needs of multiple member cities and a number of contract agencies to study and review the most cost effective delivery options for providing medication assisted treatment to individuals located in local jails and state correctional facilities. The office shall provide a report to the legislature and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by November 10, 2020, which includes recommendations for and the costs associated with providing safe, effective treatment and coordination of care. The study and report must include identification of alternative revenue sources.

(((23)))(20) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the education research and data center to conduct a statewide study of opportunity youth. The center shall provide a report of its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2020. The study must include:

(a) The number of people in Washington between the ages of sixteen and twenty-nine who have enrolled in Washington schools or participated in the Washington workforce between 2015 and 2019 before completely opting out, including:

(i) The rate of young people without a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate who are disconnected from high school;

(ii) The rate of young people with a high school diploma, but without a postsecondary credential, who are disconnected from postsecondary education and may or may not be working;

(iii) The rate of young people with a postsecondary credential, but not enrolled in postsecondary education, who are disconnected from the Washington workforce; and

(iv) The rate of young people disconnected from the Washington workforce and not enrolled in Washington schools.

(b) The education levels for each of the following age bands: 16-18, 19-21, 22-24, 25-29. The education levels include:

(i) No diploma;

(ii) High school diploma or high school equivalency certificate;

(iii) Some higher education but no degree;

(iv) Associates degree;

(v) Bachelor's degree;

(vi) Graduate degree or higher; and

(vii) Degree (associates or higher).

(c) The employment levels for each of the following age bands: 16-18, 19-21, 22-24, 25-29. The employment levels include:

(i) Not employed;

(ii) Part-time; and

(iii) Full-time.

(d) Disaggregation of data to the extent possible by race, gender, native or foreign born, income above or below 200 percent of the poverty line, average salary, and job industry.

Sec. 1024. 2020 c 357 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($47,550,000))

$46,936,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($47,550,000))

$46,936,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $173,000 of the administrative hearing revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 13, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1399).

(2) $46,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1645 (parental improvement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1025. 2020 c 357 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,858,000))

$29,458,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($29,858,000))

$29,458,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of gaming system capabilities that violate state law.

(2) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040, the commission shall take such action necessary to reduce retail commissions to an average of 5.1 percent of sales.

Sec. 1026. 2020 c 357 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$438,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($465,000))

$454,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($929,000))

$918,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5023 (ethnic studies).

Sec. 1027. 2020 c 357 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$321,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($408,000))

$394,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($755,000))

$741,000

Sec. 1028. 2020 c 357 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—OPERATIONS

Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($61,964,000))

$61,308,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($61,964,000))

$61,308,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $166,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1661 (higher education retirement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $106,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with implementation of Senate Bill No. 5350 (optional life annuity).

(3) $139,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1308 or Senate Bill No. 5360 (retirement system defaults).

(4) $44,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with implementation of House Bill No. 1408 (survivorship benefit options).

(5) $53,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6417 (survivor option change). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $48,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1390 (public employees retirement systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $44,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with ongoing implementation and administrative costs associated with House Bill No. 2189 (PSERS/comp restoration work). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $144,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with ongoing implementation of ((chapter 259 [chapter 295]))chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (E2SHB 1139).

(9) $38,000 of the department of retirement systems—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with ongoing implementation and administrative costs associated with Substitute House Bill No. 2544 (definition of veteran). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1029. 2020 c 357 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$150,901,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($153,625,000))

$148,105,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,368,000))

$7,289,000

Business License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,666,000))

$20,534,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$168,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($119,000))

$118,000

Financial Services Regulation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,486,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($351,333,000))

$345,601,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1059 (B&O return filing due date).

(2)(a) $4,268,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,238,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to implement 2019 revenue legislation.

(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, sufficient funding is provided for the department to implement section 11 of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5183 (manufactured/mobile homes).

(c)(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $711,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to facilitate a tax structure work group, initially created within chapter 1, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (SSB 5883) and hereby reauthorized.

(ii) In addition to the membership as set forth in chapter 1, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess., the tax structure work group is expanded to include voting members as follows:

(A) The president of the senate must appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(B) The speaker of the house of representatives must appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and

(C) The governor must appoint one member who represents the office of the governor.

(iii) The work group must include the following nonvoting members:

(A) One representative of the department;

(B) One representative of the association of Washington cities; and

(C) One representative of the Washington state association of counties.

(iv) All voting members of the work group must indicate, in writing, their interest in serving on the tax structure work group and provide a statement of understanding that the commitment to serve on the tax structure work group is through December 31, 2024. Elected officials not reelected to their respective offices may be relieved of their responsibilities on the tax structure work group. Vacancies on the tax structure work group must be filled within sixty days of notice of the vacancy. The work group must choose a chair or cochairs from among its legislative membership. The chair is, or cochairs are, responsible for convening the meetings of the work group no less than quarterly each year. Recommendations and other decisions of the work group may be approved by a simple majority vote. All work group members may have a representative attend meetings of the tax structure work group in lieu of the member, but voting by proxy is not permitted. Staff support for the work group must be provided by the department. The department may engage one or more outside consultants to assist in providing support for the work group. Members of the work group must serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120, 43.03.050, and 43.03.060.

(v) The duties of the work group are to:

(A) By December 1, 2019, convene no less than one meeting to elect a chair, or cochairs, and conduct other business of the work group;

(B) By December 31, 2020, the department and technical advisory group must prepare a summary report of their preliminary findings and alternatives described in (c)(vii) of this subsection;

(C) By May 1, 2021, the work group must:

(I) Hold no less than one meeting in Olympia to review the preliminary findings described in (c)(vii) of this subsection. At least one meeting must engage stakeholder groups, as described in (c)(vi)(A) of this subsection;

(II) Begin to plan strategies to engage taxpayers and key stakeholder groups to encourage participation in the public meetings described in (c)(vii) of this subsection;

(III) Present the summary report described in (c)(vii) of this subsection in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 to the appropriate committees of the legislature;

(IV) Be available to deliver a presentation to the appropriate committees of the legislature including the elements described in (c)(vi)(B) of this subsection; and

(V) Finalize the logistics of the engagement strategies described in (c)(v)(D) of this subsection; and

(D) After the conclusion of the 2021 legislative session, the work group must:

(I) Hold no less than five public meetings in geographically dispersed areas of the state;

(II) Present the findings described in (c)(vii) of this subsection and alternatives to the state's current tax structure at the public meetings;

(III) Provide an opportunity at the public meetings for taxpayers to engage in a conversation about the state tax structure including, but not limited to, providing feedback on possible recommendations for changes to the state tax structure and asking questions about the report and findings and alternatives to the state's current tax structure presented by the work group;

(IV) Utilize methods to collect taxpayer feedback before, during, or after the public meetings that may include, but is not limited to: Small group discussions, in-person written surveys, in-person visual surveys, online surveys, written testimony, and public testimony;

(V) Encourage legislators to inform their constituents about the public meetings that occur within and near their legislative districts;

(VI) Inform local elected officials about the public meetings that occur within and near their communities; and

(VII) Summarize the feedback that taxpayers and other stakeholders communicated during the public meetings and other public engagement methods, and submit a final summary report, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature. This report may be submitted as an appendix or update to the summary report described in (c)(vii) of this subsection.

(vi)(A) The stakeholder groups referenced by (c)(v)(C)(I) of this subsection must include, at a minimum, organizations and individuals representing the following:

(I) Small, start-up, or low-margin business owners and employees or associations expressly dedicated to representing these businesses, or both; and

(II) Individual taxpayers with income at or below one hundred percent of area median income in their county of residence or organizations expressly dedicated to representing low-income and middle-income taxpayers, or both;

(B) The presentation referenced in (c)(v)(C)(IV) of this subsection must include the following elements:

(I) The findings and alternatives included in the summary report described in (c)(vii) of this subsection; and

(II) The preliminary plan to engage taxpayers directly in a robust conversation about the state's tax structure including, presenting the findings described in (c)(vii) of this subsection and alternatives to the state's current tax structure, and collecting feedback to inform development of recommendations.

(vii) The duties of the department, with assistance of one or more technical advisory groups, are to:

(A) With respect to the final report of findings and alternatives submitted by the Washington state tax structure study committee to the legislature under section 138, chapter 7, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.:

(I) Update the data and research that informed the recommendations and other analysis contained in the final report;

(II) Estimate how much revenue all the revenue replacement alternatives recommended in the final report would have generated for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium if the state had implemented the alternatives on January 1, 2003;

(III) Estimate the tax rates necessary to implement all recommended revenue replacement alternatives in order to achieve the revenues generated during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as reported by the economic and revenue forecast council;

(IV) Estimate the impact on taxpayers, including tax paid as a share of household income for various income levels, and tax paid as a share of total business revenue for various business activities, for (c)(vii)(A)(II) and (III) of this subsection; and

(V) Estimate how much revenue would have been generated in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, if the incremental revenue alternatives recommended in the final report would have been implemented on January 1, 2003, excluding any recommendations implemented before the effective date of this section;

(B) With respect to the recommendations in the final report of the 2018 tax structure work group:

(I) Conduct economic modeling or comparable analysis of replacing the business and occupation tax with an alternative, such as corporate income tax or margins tax, and estimate the impact on taxpayers, such as tax paid as a share of total business revenue for various business activities, assuming the same revenues generated by business and occupation taxes during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as reported by the economic and revenue forecast council; and

(II) Estimate how much revenue would have been generated for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium if the one percent revenue growth limit on regular property taxes was replaced with a limit based on population growth and inflation if the state had implemented this policy on January 1, 2003;

(C) To analyze our economic competitiveness with border states:

(I) Estimate the revenues that would have been generated during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, had Washington adopted the tax structure of those states, assuming the economic tax base for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium as reported by the economic and revenue forecast council; and

(II) Estimate the impact on taxpayers, including tax paid as a share of household income for various income levels, and tax paid as a share of total business revenue for various business activities for (c)(vii)(C)(I) of this subsection;

(D) To analyze our economic competitiveness in the context of a national and global economy, provide comparisons of the effective state and local tax rate of the tax structure during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and various alternatives under consideration, as they compare to other states and the federal government, as well as consider implications of recent changes to federal tax law;

(E) To the degree it is practicable, conduct tax incidence analysis of the various alternatives under consideration to account for the impacts of tax shifting, such as business taxes passed along to consumers and property taxes passed along to renters;

(F) To the degree it is practicable, present findings and alternatives by geographic area, in addition to statewide; and

(G) Conduct other analysis as directed by the work group.

(3) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(4) Within existing resources, the department must compile a report on the annual amount of state retail sales tax collected under chapter 82.08 RCW on sales occurring at area fairs and county fairs as described in RCW 15.76.120. The report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(5) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to implement 2020 revenue legislation.

(6) $47,000 of the business license account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6632 (business licensing services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) By January 1, 2021, and by January 1st of each year thereafter, the department must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the amount of taxes collected on qualified transactions and paid to each compacting tribe in the prior fiscal year under Substitute Senate Bill No. 6601 or Substitute House Bill No. 2803 (Indian tribes compact/taxes).

(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall update the document titled "Washington Action Plan - FAA Policy Concerning Airport Revenue" to reflect changes to Washington tax code regarding hazardous substances. The department, in consultation with the aviation division of the Washington state department of transportation, shall develop and recommend a methodology to segregate and track actual amounts collected from the hazardous substance tax under chapter 82.21 RCW and the petroleum products tax under chapter 82.23A RCW as imposed on aviation fuel. The department must submit a report, including the recommended methodology, to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 11, 2021.

(9) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to evaluate long-term funding options to support the operations of the Pioneer Square-International District community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.060. The department must provide a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021, with recommendations for funding options including but not limited to an impact fee on tickets sold for events held in major public facilities located adjacent to the geographic area established by the authority. In developing its recommendations, the department must consult with the authority, King county, the city of Seattle, and the owners and operators of major public facilities projects located adjacent to the geographic area established by the authority.

Sec. 1030. 2020 c 357 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,543,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,598,000))

$2,509,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$162,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,303,000))

$5,214,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the board to continue maintaining its legacy case management software and conduct a feasibility study to determine how best to update or replace the case management software.

Sec. 1031. 2020 c 357 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$109,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$760,000

Minority and Women's Business Enterprises Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,352,000))

$5,272,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($6,221,000))

$6,141,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of minority and women's business enterprises to enter into an interagency agreement with the Washington state department of transportation for the department to write a surety bonding program report. This report is due to the governor by December 1, 2020.

Sec. 1032. 2020 c 357 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board Expense Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($60,101,000))

$56,504,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($60,101,000))

$56,504,000

Sec. 1033. 2020 c 357 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$355,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($566,000))

$378,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,035,000))

$3,018,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$11,649,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
(($12,148,000))

$10,846,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Liquor Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($74,902,000))

$71,919,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($102,810,000))

$98,320,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The liquor and cannabis board may require electronic payment of the marijuana excise tax levied by RCW 69.50.535. The liquor and cannabis board may allow a waiver to the electronic payment requirement for good cause as provided by rule.

(2) The traceability system is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(3) $70,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 61, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1034) (restaurant/soju endorsement).

(4) $23,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $23,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1794 (marijuana business agreements).

(5) $722,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $591,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5318 (marijuana license compliance).

(6) $350,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $350,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the board to hire additional staff for cannabis enforcement and licensing activities.

(7) $100,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the board to convene a work group to determine the feasibility of and make recommendations for varying the marijuana excise tax rate based on product potency. The work group must submit a report of its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(8) $71,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5006 (sale of wine by microbrewery). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $178,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5549 (distillery marketing and sales). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $56,000 of the liquor revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6392 (local wine industry license). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $42,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6206 (marijuana compliance certification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) $65,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2826 (marijuana vapor products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $348,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2870 (marijuana retail licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6254 (vapor products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $30,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the board to convene a task force on marijuana odor with members as provided in this subsection.

(a) The governor shall appoint seven members, who must include a representative from the following:

(i) The state liquor and cannabis board;

(ii) The department of ecology;

(iii) The department of health;

(iv) The Washington state department of agriculture;

(v) A state association of counties;

(vi) A state association of cities; and

(vii) A representative from the recreational marijuana community or a marijuana producer, processor, or retailer licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board.

(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its membership. The state liquor and cannabis board shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.

(c) The task force shall review the following issues: The available and most appropriate ways or methods to mitigate, mask, conceal, or otherwise address marijuana odors and emissions and the potentially harmful impact of marijuana odors and emissions on people who live, work, or are located in close proximity to a marijuana production or processing facility, including but not limited to: (a) Filtering systems; (b) natural odor masking mechanisms or odor concealing mechanisms; (c) zoning and land use controls and regulations; and (d) changes to state laws and regulations including, but not limited to, laws and regulations related to nuisance and public health.

(d) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the board.

(e) Members of the task force are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(f) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the majority and minority leaders of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives and the senate by ((December 31, 2020))June 30, 2021.

Sec. 1034. 2020 c 357 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$173,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$123,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,642,000))

$16,594,000

Public Service Revolving Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($42,054,000))

$41,459,000

Public Service Revolving Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$230,000

Pipeline Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,571,000))

$2,544,000

Pipeline Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,163,000))

$4,134,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($65,956,000))

$65,257,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $800,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation in this section is for the utilities and transportation commission to supplement funds committed by a telecommunications company to expand rural broadband service on behalf of an eligible governmental entity. The amount in this subsection represents payments collected by the utilities and transportation commission pursuant to the Qwest performance assurance plan.

(2) $330,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1257 (energy efficiency).

(3) $95,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1512 (transportation electrification).

(4) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the commission to convene a work group on preventing underground utility damage. The work group is subject to the following requirements:

(a) The utilities and transportation commission shall contract with an independent facilitator for the work group to facilitate and moderate meetings, provide objective facilitation and negotiation between work group members, ensure participants receive information and guidance so that they respond in a timely manner, and synthesize agreements and points under negotiation.

(b) The work group shall discuss topics such as, but not limited to: How facility operators and excavators schedule meeting times and places; new requirements for marking locatable underground facilities; a definition of "noninvasive methods"; the procedures that must take place when an excavator discovers (and may or may not damage) an underground facility; positive response procedures; utility identification procedures for newly constructed and replacement underground facilities; the membership composition of the dig law safety committee; liability for damage occurring from an excavation when either the excavator or the facility operator fails to comply with the statutory requirements relating to notice requirements or utility marking requirements; and ensuring consistency with the pipeline and hazardous materials safety administration towards a uniform national standard.

(c) The work group shall include, but is not limited to, members representing cities, counties, public and private utility companies, construction and excavator communities, water-sewer districts, and other government entities with underground facilities.

(d) The work group shall meet a minimum of four times and produce a report with recommendations to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2019.

(5) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $814,000 of the public services revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy).

(6) $14,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1112 (hydrofluorocarbons emissions).

(7) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511 (broadband service).

(8) $580,000 of the public service revolving account—state appropriation and $15,000 of the pipeline safety account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2518 (natural gas transmission). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1035. 2020 c 357 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$10,101,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($11,403,000))

$10,946,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($119,228,000))

$118,866,000

Enhanced 911 Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($43,746,000))

$43,688,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($49,998,000))

$52,385,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($134,058,000))

$134,048,000

Military Department Rent and Lease Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,066,000

Military Department Active State Service Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,040,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,849,000))

$1,814,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,244,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($374,133,000))

$375,598,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees by February 1st and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2019-2021 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $40,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.

(3) $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for the conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.

(4) $11,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.

(5) $784,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.

(6) $100,000 of the enhanced 911 account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with a representative group of counties, public service answering points, and first responder organizations, to submit a report on the 911 system to the appropriate legislative committees by October 1, 2020. The report must include:

(a) The actual cost per fiscal year for the state, including all political subdivisions, to operate and maintain the 911 system including, but not limited to, the ESInet, call handling equipment, personnel costs, facility costs, contractual costs, administrative costs, and legal fees.

(b) The difference between the actual state and local costs and current state and local 911 funding.

(c) Potential cost-savings and efficiencies through the consolidation of equipment, regionalization of services or merging of facilities, positive and negative impacts on the public, legal or contractual restrictions, and appropriate actions to alleviate these constraints.

(7) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5012 (governmental continuity).

(8) $659,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,087,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to procure and install thirty-nine all-hazard alert broadcast sirens to increase inundation zone coverage to alert individuals of an impending tsunami or other disaster.

(9) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to procure and install seismic monitoring stations and global navigation satellite systems that integrate with the early warning system known as ShakeAlert.

(10) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to support an education and public outreach program in advance of the new early earthquake warning system known as ShakeAlert.

(11) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing Substitute Senate Bill No. 5106 (natural disaster mitigation).

(12) $200,000 of the military department rental and lease account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintenance staffing.

(13) $251,000 of the military department rental and lease account—state appropriation is provided solely for the maintenance and operation, including equipment replacement, of the communications infrastructure at camp Murray.

Sec. 1036. 2020 c 357 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,237,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,291,000))

$2,238,000

Personnel Service Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,343,000))

$4,291,000

Higher Education Personnel Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,412,000))

$1,394,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$228,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($10,511,000))

$10,388,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1575 (collective bargaining/dues).

(2) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5022 (granting interest arbitration to certain higher education uniformed personnel).

(3) $56,000 of the personnel service account—state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with ongoing implementation and administrative costs associated with Substitute House Bill No. 2017 (admin. law judge bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1037. 2020 c 357 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified Public Accountants' Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,833,000))

$3,786,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,833,000))

$3,786,000

Sec. 1038. 2020 c 357 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,121,000))

$1,118,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,121,000))

$1,118,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for legal and consultation fees and services necessary for the board for volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers to address issues related to plan qualification with the federal internal revenue service. The board shall report on the measures taken, and the results to that point, to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by December 15, 2020.

Sec. 1039. 2020 c 357 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$4,810,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($6,324,000))

$6,361,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$102,000

Building Code Council Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,966,000))

$1,945,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($13,202,000))

$13,218,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,343,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges to include campus rent, utilities, parking, and contracts, public and historic facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, legislative support services, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.

(2) In accordance with RCW 46.08.172 and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase parking fees in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 as necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business.

(3) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written approval from the director of the department of enterprise services. Agencies that are exempted from the requirement are the Washington state patrol, Washington state department of transportation, and the department of natural resources.

(4) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2021.

(5) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the agency to procure cyber incident insurance on behalf of forty-three small to medium sized agencies that are currently without this coverage.

(6)(a) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must revise its master contracts with vendors, including cooperative purchasing agreements under RCW 39.26.060, to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(i) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(ii) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(A) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(B) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(C) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(b) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the public entity using the contract or agreement of the department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(c) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(d) Any cost for the implementation of this section must be recouped from the fees charged to master contract vendors.

(7) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department to query and inventory all state agency use and amounts of glyphosate. Within amounts provided, the department must offer to pay to state agencies the difference in costs for using alternatives for vegetation control. A report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the findings of the query and inventory must be made by December 31, 2019.

(8)(a) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for a legislative work group to study and make recommendations on a monument on the capital campus to honor residents who died in the global war in terror. The department of enterprise services must staff the work group, which shall be composed of:

(i) One member from each of the four major caucuses of the legislature;

(ii) The director of the department of veterans affairs or his or her designee;

(iii) The director of the Washington state parks and recreation commission or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the department of enterprise services or his or her designee;

(v) The director of the Washington state military department or his or her designee;

(vi) The secretary of state or his or her designee;

(vii) The state archivist or his or her designee;

(viii) A representative of the capitol campus design advisory committee that is not the secretary of state or a legislative member already designated to be part of the work group; and

(ix) Two representatives from veterans organizations appointed by the governor.

(b) The work group shall choose two cochairs from among its legislative membership. The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the work group before November 1, 2019.

(c) The work group shall:

(i) Conduct a study of the feasibility of establishing a new memorial on the capitol campus to honor fallen service members from the global war on terrorism;

(ii) Provide the names of the recommended individuals to be honored at the memorial;

(iii) Recommend locations where the memorial could be constructed on the capitol campus and provide any permit requirements or other restrictions that may exist for each location;

(iv) Provide potential draft designs that could be used for the memorial;

(v) Provide information regarding the anticipated funding needed for:

(A) The design, construction, and placement of the memorial;

(B) Any permits that may be required;

(C) Anticipated ongoing maintenance cost for the memorial based on potential materials used and historical maintenance of other memorials on campus; and

(D) An unveiling ceremony or other expenses that may be necessary for the memorial;

(vi) Make recommendations regarding the funding sources that may be available, which may include solicitation of private funds or a method for obtaining the necessary funds; and

(vii) Make recommendations regarding an agency, committee, or commission to coordinate the design, construction, and placement of a memorial on the capitol campus.

(d) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.

(e) The work group shall submit a report of its recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by June 30, 2021.

(9)(a) Within existing resources, beginning October 31, 2019, the department, in collaboration with consolidated technology services, must provide a report to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31st of each calendar year that reflects information technology contract information based on a contract snapshot from June 30 of that calendar year. The department will coordinate to receive contract information for all contracts to include those where the department has delegated authority so that the report includes statewide contract information. The report must contain a list of all information technology contracts to include the agency name, contract number, vendor name, the contract term start and end dates, the contract dollar amount in total, contract dollar amount by state fiscal year to include contract spending projections for each ensuing state fiscal year through the contract term, and type of service delivered. The list of contracts must be provided electronically in excel and sortable by all fields.

(b) In determining the type of service delivered, groupings must include agreed upon items by the department, the office of the chief information officer, senate fiscal staff, and house fiscal staff. This grouping criteria must be agreed upon by August 31, 2019.

(10) The department must use any new resources provided for civic education solely for the free-to-schools civic education program.

(11) Within existing resources, the department must study the increase in tort claims filed generally and with a specific focus on the increase in tort claims filed and payouts made against the department of children, youth, and families. The study must include an assessment of the source of the payouts, such as jury awards, court judgments, mediation, and arbitration awards. The department should determine the root cause for these increases and develop recommendations on how to reduce the number of tort claims filed and payouts made. The department must coordinate its work with the department of children, youth, and families and the office of the attorney general. A report must be provided to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2020.

(12) In collaboration with the office of the governor, the department will add a diversity, equity, and inclusion training module to the learning management system by June 30, 2021.

(13) $447,000 of the building code council account—state appropriation is provided solely for an economic study, additional staffing for the council, and to upgrade the web site. Upgrading the web site is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(14) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for costs incurred due to additional security on the capitol campus in January 2021.

(15) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a contract to study security enhancements on the west capitol campus and the governor's residence.

Sec. 1040. 2020 c 357 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,133,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,328,000))

$2,286,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,300,000))

$2,284,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$136,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($6,911,000))

$6,853,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for archaeological determinations and excavations of inadvertently discovered skeletal human remains, and removal and reinterment of such remains when necessary.

Sec. 1041. 2020 c 357 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$188,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$188,000

Consolidated Technology Services Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,522,000))

$29,238,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($29,898,000))

$29,614,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $11,468,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of the chief information officer. Of this amount:

(a) $1,663,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for experienced information technology project managers to provide critical support to agency IT projects that are subject to the provisions of section 701 of this act or under oversight from the office of the chief information officer. The staff or vendors will:

(i) Provide master level project management guidance to agency IT stakeholders;

(ii) Consider statewide best practices from the public and private sectors, independent review and analysis, vendor management, budget and timing quality assurance and other support of current or past IT projects in at least Washington state and share these with agency IT stakeholders and legislative fiscal staff at least quarterly, beginning July 1, 2020; and

(iii) Beginning December 31, 2019, provide independent recommendations to legislative fiscal committees by December of each calendar year on oversight of IT projects.

(b)(i) $250,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely to ensure that the state has a more nimble, extensible information technology dashboard. Dashboard elements must include at the minimum:

(A) Start date of the project;

(B) End date of the project when the project will close out and implementation will occur;

(C) Term of the project in fiscal years across all biennia to reflect the start of the project through the end of the project;

(D) Total project cost from start date through end date in total dollars, and a subtotal of near general fund outlook;

(E) Estimated annual fiscal year cost for maintenance and operations after implementation and close out;

(F) Actual spend by fiscal year and in total for fiscal years that are closed; and

(G) Date a feasibility study was completed.

(ii) The office of the chief information officer may recommend additional elements be included but must have agreement with legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management prior to including the additional elements.

(c) The agency must ensure timely posting of project data on the information technology dashboard for at least each project funded in the budget to include, at a minimum, posting on the new dashboard:

(i) The budget funded level by project for each project within thirty calendar days of the budget being signed into law;

(ii) The project historical expenditures through fiscal year 2019, by June 30, 2020, for all projects that started prior to July 1, 2019; and

(iii) Whether each project has completed a feasibility study, by June 30, 2020.

(2) $13,001,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security. Of this amount:

(a) $800,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the computer emergency readiness to review security designs of computer systems and to complete security evaluations of state agency systems and applications to identify vulnerabilities and opportunities for system hardening.

(b) $768,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security to decrypt network traffic to identify and evaluate network traffic for malicious activity and threats, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(c) $608,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security to complete cyber security designs for new platforms, databases, and applications.

(3) The consolidated technology services agency shall work with customer agencies using the Washington state electronic records vault (WASERV) to identify opportunities to:

(a) Reduce storage volumes and costs associated with vault records stored beyond the agencies' record retention schedules; and

(b) Assess a customized service charge as defined in chapter 304, Laws of 2017 for costs of using WASERV to prepare data compilations in response to public records requests.

(4)(a) In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures must include the following:

(i) The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request;

(ii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the current biennium;

(iii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the ensuing biennium;

(iv) The estimated total cost for the current and ensuing biennium;

(v) The total cost by fiscal year, by fund, and in total, of the information technology project since it began;

(vi) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund over all biennia through implementation and close out and into maintenance and operations;

(vii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for service level agreements once the project is implemented;

(viii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for agency staffing for maintenance and operations once the project is implemented; and

(ix) The expected fiscal year when the agency expects to complete the request.

(b) The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

(5) The consolidated technology services agency must not increase fees charged for existing services without prior approval by the office of financial management. The agency may develop fees to recover the actual cost of new infrastructure to support increased use of cloud technologies.

(6) Within existing resources, the agency must provide oversight of state procurement and contracting for information technology goods and services by the department of enterprise services.

(7) Within existing resources, the agency must host, administer, and support the state employee directory in an online format to provide public employee contact information.

(8) $750,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided for the office to conduct a statewide cloud computing readiness assessment to prepare for the migration of core services to cloud services, including ways it can leverage cloud computing to reduce costs. The assessment must:

(a) Inventory state agency assets, associated service contracts, and other relevant information;

(b) Identify impacts to state agency staffing resulting from the migration to cloud computing including:

(i) Skill gaps between current on-premises computing practices and how cloud services are procured, secured, administered, maintained, and developed; and

(ii) Necessary retraining and ongoing training and development to ensure state agency staff maintain the skills necessary to effectively maintain information security and understand changes to enterprise architectures;

(c) Identify additional resources needed by the agency to enable sufficient cloud migration support to state agencies; and

(d) Be submitted as a report, by June 30, 2020, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that summarizes statewide cloud migration readiness and makes recommendations for migration goals.

(9) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the coalition's plan for projects affecting the coalition organizations. The report must include any information technology projects impacting coalition organizations and, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, provide: (a) The status of any information technology projects currently being developed or implemented that affect the coalition; (b) funding needs of these current and future information technology projects; and (c) next steps for the coalition's information technology projects. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(10) $4,303,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the creation and ongoing delivery of information technology services tailored to the needs of small agencies. The scope of services must include, at a minimum, full-service desktop support, service assistance, security, and consultation.

Sec. 1042. 2020 c 357 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF REGISTRATION OF PROFESSIONAL ENGINEERS AND LAND SURVEYORS

Professional Engineers' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,534,000))

$5,494,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,534,000))

$5,494,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($4,172,000))$4,014,000 of the professional engineers' account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1176 (businesses and professions).

(2) $1,480,000 of the professional engineers' account—state appropriation is provided solely for the business and technology modernization project pursuant to an interagency agreement with the department of licensing and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(End of part)

PART XI

HUMAN SERVICES

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1101. 2020 c 357 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.

(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.

(7) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the coalition's plan for projects affecting the coalition organizations. The report must include any information technology projects impacting coalition organizations and, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, provide: (a) The status of any information technology projects currently being developed or implemented that affect the coalition; (b) funding needs of these current and future information technology projects; and (c) next steps for the coalition's information technology projects. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(8)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2020))2021, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2020))2021 among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year ((2020))2021 in response to the COVID-19 pandemic or caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care, developmental disabilities, and public assistance programs, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(c) The department may not transfer appropriations from any other program or subprogram to the mental health program. Within the mental health program, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose as needed to fund actual expenditures through the end of fiscal year ((2020))2021.

(d) The department may not transfer appropriations for the developmental disabilities program to any other program or subprograms of the department of social and health services.

(e) The department may not transfer appropriations for the aging and adult services program to any other program or subprograms of the department of social and health services.

Sec. 1102. 2020 c 357 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$423,815,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($440,131,000))

$436,973,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($119,930,000))

$124,515,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,965,000))

$21,758,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$33,300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,044,141,000))

$1,040,361,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b) $311,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b) are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community service officer at the city of Lakewood. The department must collect data from the city of Lakewood on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.

(c) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(d) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas. The city must submit a proposal to the department for a community policing program for eastern state hospital and adjacent areas by September 30, 2019.

(e) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to hire an on-site safety compliance officer, stationed at Western State Hospital, to provide oversight and accountability of the hospital's response to safety concerns regarding the hospital's work environment.

(f) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to track compliance with RCW 71.05.365 requirements for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within fourteen days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must use these funds to track the following elements related to this requirement: (i) The date on which an individual is determined to no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (ii) the date on which the behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services for the person is notified of this determination; and (iii) the date on which either the individual is transitioned to the community or has been re-evaluated and determined to again require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must provide this information in regular intervals to behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services. The department must summarize the information and provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress toward meeting the fourteen day standard by December 1, 2019 and December 1, 2020.

(g) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.

(i) The predictive modeling tool must be developed to leverage data from a variety of sources and identify factors that are strongly associated with future criminal justice involvement. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which describes the following: (A) The proposed data sources to be used in the predictive model and how privacy issues will be addressed; (B) modeling results including a description of measurable factors most strongly predictive of risk of future criminal justice involvement; (C) an assessment of the accuracy, timeliness, and potential effectiveness of the tool; (D) identification of interventions and strategies that can be effective in reducing future criminal justice involvement of high risk patients; and (E) the timeline for implementing processes to provide monthly lists of high-risk client to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health entities.

(ii) The model for civil and forensic state hospital bed need must be developed and updated in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities, which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for predicting the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. Factors should include identification of need for the services and analysis of the effect of community investments in behavioral health services and other types of beds that may reduce the need for long-term civil commitment needs. The department must submit a report to the legislature by October 1, 2019, with an update of the model and the estimated civil and forensic state hospital bed need by November 1, 2020, and each November 1st thereafter through the end of fiscal year 2027. The department must continue to update the model on a calendar quarterly basis and provide updates to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature accordingly.

(h) $2,097,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,084,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(i) $6,450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to maintain and further increase implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5889) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to maintain increases in the number of competency evaluators that began in fiscal year 2016 and further increase the number of staff providing competency evaluation services. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must use a portion of these amounts to increase the number of forensic evaluators pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(j) $56,441,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $63,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $2,127,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (SSB 5889) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). These amounts must be used to maintain increases that began in fiscal year 2016 and further increase the number of forensic beds at western state hospital and eastern state hospital. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (2E2SSB 5177) (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must use a portion of these amounts to increase forensic bed capacity at the state hospitals pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(k) $86,601,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $86,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to continue to implement an acuity based staffing tool at western state hospital and eastern state hospital in collaboration with the hospital staffing committees.

(i) The staffing tool must be designed and implemented to identify, on a daily basis, the clinical acuity on each patient ward and determine the minimum level of direct care staff by profession to be deployed to meet the needs of the patients on each ward. The department must also continue to update, in collaboration with the office of financial management's labor relations office, the staffing committees, and state labor unions, an overall state hospital staffing plan that looks at all positions and functions of the facilities and that is informed by a review of the Oregon state hospital staffing model.

(ii) Within these amounts, the department must establish, monitor, track, and report monthly staffing and expenditures at the state hospitals, including overtime and use of locums, to the functional categories identified in the recommended staffing plan. The allotments and tracking of staffing and expenditures must include all areas of the state hospitals, must be done at the ward level, and must include contracted facilities providing forensic restoration services as well as the office of forensic mental health services. By December 1, 2019, the department and hospital staffing committees must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes the following: (A) Progress in implementing the acuity based staffing tool; (B) a comparison of average monthly staffing expenditures to budgeted staffing levels and to the recommended state hospital staffing plan by function and at the ward level; and (C) metrics and facility performance for the use of overtime and extra duty pay, patient length of stay, discharge management, active treatment planning, medication administration, patient and staff aggression, and staff recruitment and retention. The department must use information gathered from implementation of the clinical staffing tool and the hospital-wide staffing model to provide budget oversight and accountability and inform and prioritize future budget requests for staffing at the state hospitals.

(iii) The department must submit calendar quarterly reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that include monitoring of monthly spending, staffing levels, overtime and use of locums compared to allotments and to the recommended state hospital staffing model. The format for these reports must be developed in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The reports must include an update from the hospital staffing committees.

(iv) Monthly staffing levels and related expenditures at the state hospitals must not exceed official allotments without prior written approval from the director of the office of financial management. In the event the director of the office of financial management approves an increase in monthly staffing levels and expenditures beyond what is budgeted, notice must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature within thirty days of such approval. The notice must identify the reason for the authorization to exceed budgeted staffing levels and the time frame for the authorization. Extensions of authorizations under this subsection must also be submitted to the director of the office of financial management for written approval in advance of the expiration of an authorization. The office of financial management must notify the appropriate committees of the legislature of any extensions of authorizations granted under this subsection within thirty days of granting such authorizations and identify the reason and time frame for the extension.

(l) $11,285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,581,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to implement strategies to improve patient and staff safety at eastern and western state hospitals. These amounts must be used for implementing a new intensive care model program at western state hospital. Remaining amounts may be used for enclosure of nursing stations, increasing the number of security guards, and provision of training on patient and staff safety. The department must provide implementation reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature as follows:

(i) A report must be submitted by December 1, 2019, which includes a description of the intensive care model being implemented, a profile of the types of patients being served at the program, the staffing model being used for the program, and preliminary information on outcomes associated with the program. The outcomes section should include tracking data on facility wide metrics related to patient and staff safety as well as individual outcomes related to the patients served on the unit.

(ii) A report must be submitted by December 1, 2020, which provides an update on the implementation of the intensive care model, any changes that have occurred, and updated information on the outcomes associated with implementation of the program.

(m) (($4,262,000))$2,658,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 ((and $2,144,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are))is provided solely to open a new unit at the child study treatment center which shall serve up to eighteen children.

(n) $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to increase services to patients found not guilty by reason of insanity under the Ross v. Laswhay settlement agreement.

(((p)))(o) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must develop and submit an annual state hospital performance report for eastern and western state hospitals. Each measure included in the performance report must include baseline performance data, agency performance targets, and performance for the most recent fiscal year. The performance report must include a one page dashboard as well as charts for each fiscal and quality of care measure broken out by hospital and including but not limited to (i) monthly FTE expenditures compared to allotments; (ii) monthly dollar expenditures compared to allotments; (iii) monthly FTE expenditures per ten thousand patient bed days; (iv) monthly dollar expenditures per ten thousand patient bed days; (v) percentage of FTE expenditures for overtime; (vi) average length of stay by category of patient; (vii) average monthly civil wait list; (viii) average monthly forensic wait list; (ix) rate of staff assaults per 10,000 bed days; (x) rate of patient assaults per 10,000 bed days; (xi) average number of days to release after a patient has been determined to be clinically ready for discharge; and (xii) average monthly vacancy rates for key clinical positions. The department must submit the state hospital performance report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2020, and provide annual updates thereafter.

(((q)))(p) $1,660,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to repair, replace, or upgrade failing infrastructure at western and eastern state hospitals.

(((r)))(q) $1,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a cost of living adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

(2) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$5,812,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($5,736,000))

$5,828,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($315,000))

$309,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($11,863,000))

$11,949,000

Sec. 1103. 2020 c 357 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this section must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this section. However, after May 1, ((2020))2021, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer appropriations for fiscal year ((2020))2021 among programs and subprograms of this section after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year ((2020))2021 in response to the COVID-19 pandemic or caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the developmental disabilities program, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(2) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$732,559,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($810,256,000))

$727,940,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,579,826,000))

$1,625,134,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$4,024,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,364,000

Developmental Disability Community Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,134,029,000))

$3,097,021,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 must be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(c) $7,527,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $16,092,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $29,989,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(d) $1,058,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,203,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(e) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(f) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.

(g) $1,705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,688,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,465,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the development and implementation of thirteen enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her family home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report in January of each year that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(h) $2,025,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,006,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the development and implementation of thirteen community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January of each year that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.

(i) $4,005,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $6,084,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $9,826,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(i) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.

(ii) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (i)(i) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(iii) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (i)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(iv) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(j) $1,029,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for state-operated behavioral health group training homes for clients with developmental disabilities who require a short-term placement for crisis stabilization following a hospital stay. The developmental disabilities administration shall research and assess options to claim federal medicaid funds for state-operated behavioral health group training homes and report its findings to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2019.

(k) $605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,627,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,797,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for expanding the number of clients receiving services under the basic plus medicaid waiver. Approximately three hundred fifty additional clients are anticipated to graduate from high school during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium and will receive employment services under this expansion.

(l) $20,243,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $44,855,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $63,822,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for community residential service providers offering supported living, group home, and licensed staff residential services to individuals with development disabilities. The amounts in this subsection (1)(l) include funding to increase the rate by 13.5 percent effective January 1, 2020, and by 1.8 percent effective January 1, 2021. The amounts provided in this subsection must be used to improve the recruitment and retention of quality direct care staff to better protect the health and safety of clients with developmental disabilities.

(m) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to establish parent-to-parent programs for parents of children with developmental disabilities in Ferry, Pend Oreille, Stevens, San Juan, and Wahkiakum counties.

(n) $401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $424,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,043,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to assist home care agencies with implementing electronic visit verification systems that are compliant with the federal 21st century cures act no later than January 1, 2020.

(o) $3,626,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $4,757,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $10,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(p) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $106,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to begin implementing an asset verification system that is compliant with the federal medicaid extenders act by January 1, 2021 and is subject to the conditions, limitation, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(q) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $23,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 70, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1199).

(r) $153,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $643,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for assisted living facility providers consistent with chapter 225, Laws of 2018 (SHB 2515) and for a rate add-on to providers that serve sixty percent or more medicaid clients.

(s) $193,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $654,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a ten percent rate increase, effective January 1, 2020, for nurse delegation, private duty nursing, and supported living nursing services.

(t) $3,490,000 of the general fund—local appropriation and $3,490,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5359 (residential services and supports). The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $847 per client in fiscal year 2020 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2021. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.

(u) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5672 (adult family homes specialty services).

(v) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $195,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(w) $4,886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $7,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $11,894,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to complete the three-year phase in of forty-seven clients from residential habilitation centers to state operated living alternatives.

(x) $2,279,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,279,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,558,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for additional staffing resources for the transition of clients living in the intermediate care facilities at Rainier school, Fircrest school, and Lakeland village to state operated living alternatives to address deficiencies identified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(y) $51,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $203,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by five cents per hour effective July 1, 2019, and by an additional five cents per hour effective July 1, 2020.

(z) $1,798,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,422,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,219,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for state-operated living alternative homes.

(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $480,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $646,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,125,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to place residents in transition from the Rainier PAT A intermediate care facility.

(ii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $420,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $565,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $985,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to place developmental disability administration clients upon discharge from a hospital stay when the clients' previous providers are unable to manage the clients' care needs.

(aa) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $96,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2380 (home care agencies). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(bb) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $120,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6419 (habilitation center clients). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(cc) $145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $214,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to review the no-paid services caseload pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6040 (developmental disability budgeting).

(dd) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $4,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a cost of living adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$119,274,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($120,754,000))

$107,173,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($233,430,000))

$238,957,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$27,041,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$11,396,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($511,895,000))

$503,841,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.

(b) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.

(c) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(d) $830,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $135,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the loss of federal revenue and the transition of residents due to the decertification of the Rainier school PAT A intermediate care facility by the centers for medicare and medicaid services in calendar year 2019. It is the intent of the legislature that the developmental disabilities administration complete the transitions of Rainier PAT A residents by September 2019.

(e) $3,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $3,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $6,910,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for additional staffing resources for clients living in the intermediate care facilities at Rainier school, Fircrest school, and Lakeland village to address deficiencies identified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and to gather information for the 2020 legislative session that will support appropriate levels of care for residential habilitation center clients.

(i) The department of social and health services must contract with the William D. Ruckelshaus center or other neutral third party to continue the facilitation of meetings and discussions about how to support appropriate levels of care for residential habilitation center clients based on the clients' needs and ages. The options explored in the meetings and discussions must include, but are not limited to, the longer-term issues identified in the January 2019 report to the legislature, including shifting care and staffing needs, crisis stabilization, alternative uses of residential habilitation center campus, and transforming adult family homes. An agreed-upon preferred longer term vision must be included within a report to the office of financial management and appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature before December 1, 2019. The report must describe the policy rationale, implementation plan, timeline, and recommended statutory changes for the preferred long-term vision.

(ii) The parties invited to participate in the meetings and discussions must include:

(A) One member from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate, who shall be appointed by the majority leader and minority leader of the senate;

(B) One member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives, who shall be appointed by the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives;

(C) One member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(D) One member from the developmental disabilities council;

(E) One member from the ARC of Washington;

(F) One member from the Washington federation of state employees;

(G) One member from the service employees international union 1199;

(H) One member from the developmental disabilities administration within the department of social and health services;

(I) One member from the aging and long term support administration within the department of social and health services; and

(J) Two members who are family members or guardians of current residential habilitation center residents.

(K) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the department of social and health services.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,536,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,640,000))

$2,600,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,203,000))

$3,180,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$270,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,649,000))

$8,586,000

(5) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$62,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($62,000))

$65,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,092,000))

$1,095,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,220,000))

$1,226,000

Sec. 1104. 2020 c 357 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,320,605,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,482,768,000))

$1,320,498,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,457,726,000))

$3,553,846,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$37,729,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,558,000

Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$133,360,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,392,000

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,937,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($6,452,075,000))

$6,385,925,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this section must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this section. However, after May 1, 2021, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer appropriations for fiscal year 2021 among programs and subprograms of this section after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2021 in response to the COVID-19 pandemic or caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the aging and adult services program, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(2)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate may not exceed $229.10 for fiscal year 2020 and may not exceed $250.71 for fiscal year 2021.

(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.

(((2)))(3) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.

(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2020 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2021.

(((3)))(4) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state-only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.

(((4)))(5) $1,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding must be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.

(((5)))(6) $15,748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $33,024,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $62,298,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(((6)))(7) $6,320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $13,142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $24,768,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity impacts of the agreement between the governor and the service employees international union healthcare 775nw.

(((7)))(8) $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,094,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.

(((8)))(9) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.

(((9)))(10) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $900 for each facility.

(((10)))(11) $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the kinship navigator program in the Colville Indian reservation, Yakama Nation, and other tribal areas.

(((11)))(12) Within available funds, the aging and long term support administration must maintain a unit within adult protective services that specializes in the investigation of financial abuse allegations and self-neglect allegations.

(((12)))(13) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department shall assist the legislature to continue the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues.

(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is continued, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, and four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;

(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;

(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;

(v) A member from disability rights Washington and a member from the office of long-term care ombuds;

(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and

(vii) Other agency directors or designees as necessary.

(b) The committee must make recommendations and continue to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington, including state budget and policy options, and may conduct, but are not limited to, the following tasks:

(i) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities to promote healthy living and palliative care planning;

(ii) Identify strategies and policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term service and supports that allow individuals and families to meet their needs for service;

(iii) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans;

(iv) Identify ways to promote advance planning and advance care directives and implementation strategies for the Bree collaborative palliative care and related guidelines;

(v) Identify ways to meet the needs of the aging demographic impacted by reduced federal support;

(vi) Identify ways to protect the rights of vulnerable adults through assisted decision-making and guardianship and other relevant vulnerable adult protections;

(vii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation; and

(viii) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation.

(c) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.

(d) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. Meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the rules of both the senate and the house of representatives. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.

(((13)))(14) $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $315,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $630,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(((14)))(15) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $270,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for financial service specialists stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Financial service specialists will help to transition clients ready for hospital discharge into alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state hospitals.

(((15)))(16)(a) No more than $79,799,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care described in initiative 2 of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures on this initiative. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the health care authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) No more than $2,525,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the department and the health care authority shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its providers third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The department shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes.

The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(((16)))(17) $13,303,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $15,891,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $36,390,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(((17)))(18) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $80,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department, in partnership with the department of health and the health care authority, to assist a collaborative public-private entity with implementation of recommendations in the state plan to address alzheimer's disease and other dementias.

(((18)))(19) $428,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,761,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $2,520,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for case managers at the area agencies on aging to coordinate care for medicaid clients with mental illness who are living in their own homes. Work shall be accomplished within existing standards for case management and no requirements will be added or modified unless by mutual agreement between the department of social and health services and area agencies on aging.

(((19)))(20) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $116,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with an organization to provide educational materials, legal services, and attorney training to support persons with dementia. The funding provided in this subsection must be used for:

(a) An advance care and legal planning toolkit for persons and families living with dementia, designed and made available online and in print. The toolkit should include educational topics including, but not limited to:

(i) The importance of early advance care, legal, and financial planning;

(ii) The purpose and application of various advance care, legal, and financial documents;

(iii) Dementia and capacity;

(iv) Long-term care financing considerations;

(v) Elder and vulnerable adult abuse and exploitation;

(vi) Checklists such as "legal tips for caregivers," "meeting with an attorney," and "life and death planning;"

(vii) Standardized forms such as general durable power of attorney forms and advance health care directives; and

(viii) A selected list of additional resources.

(b) Webinars about the dementia legal and advance care planning toolkit and related issues and topics with subject area experts. The subject area expert presenters must provide their services in-kind, on a volunteer basis.

(c) Continuing legal education programs for attorneys to advise and assist persons with dementia. The continuing education programs must be offered at no cost to attorneys who make a commitment to participate in the pro bono program.

(d) Administrative support costs to develop intake forms and protocols, perform client intake, match participating attorneys with eligible clients statewide, maintain records and data, and produce reports as needed.

(((20)))(21) $18,000 of the traumatic brain injury account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1532 (domestic violence TBIs).

(((21)))(22) $543,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,038,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to begin implementing an asset verification system that is compliant with the federal medicaid extenders act by January 1, 2021 and is subject to the conditions, limitation, and review provided in section 701 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a feasibility study of information technology solutions for an asset verification system. The feasibility study shall consider the department's existing case management systems that may be required to interface with the asset verification system. The department shall work with the health care authority to develop a long-term strategy for an asset verification system that complies with federal requirements, maximizes efficient use of staff time, supports accurate client financial eligibility determinations, and incorporates relevant findings from the feasibility study, and shall report its findings and recommendation to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than December 1, 2019.

(((22)))(23) $2,937,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1087 (long-term services and support). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $717,000 is provided solely for a contract with the state actuary.

(((23)))(24) $2,373,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,459,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $6,215,000 of the general fund-federal appropriation are provided solely to assist home care agencies with implementing electronic visit verification systems that are compliant with the federal 21st century cures act no later than January 1, 2020.

(((24)))(25) $727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $2,469,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a ten percent rate increase, effective January 1, 2020, for in-home skilled nursing services, nurse delegation, in-home private duty nursing, and adult family home private duty nursing.

(((25)))(26) $3,353,000 of the general fund—local appropriation and $1,055,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5359 (residential services and supports). The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $847 per client in fiscal year 2020 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2021. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.

(((26)))(27) $17,481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $28,471,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $41,031,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.

(a) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, assisted living facility beds, and specialized dementia beds.

(b) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.

(c) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.

(d) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.

(((27)))(28) $1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the kinship care support program.

(((28)))(29) $306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $794,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by five cents per hour effective July 1, 2019.

(((29)))(30) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to establish a pilot project to provide personal care services to homeless seniors and persons with disabilities from the time the person presents at a shelter to the time the person becomes eligible for medicaid personal care services.

(a) The department shall contract with a single nonprofit organization that provides personal care services to homeless persons and operates a twenty-four hour homeless shelter, and that is currently partnering with the department to bring medicaid personal care services to homeless seniors and persons with disabilities.

(b) The department shall submit a report by December 1, 2020, to the governor and appropriate legislative committees. The report shall address findings and outcomes of the pilot and recommendations.

(((30)))(31) $3,669,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $8,543,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $15,434,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for assisted living facility providers consistent with chapter 225, Laws of 2018 (SHB 2515) and to provide a rate add-on to providers that serve sixty percent or more medicaid clients.

(((31)))(32) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $637,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,016,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for adult day health and adult day care providers effective July 1, 2019, and to increase rates by 6 percent effective July 1, 2020.

(((32)))(33) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5672 (adult family homes specialty services).

(((33)))(34) No later than December 31, 2021, the department of social and health services and the health care authority shall submit a waiver request to the federal department of health and human services to authorize presumptive medicaid eligibility determinations for clients preparing for acute care hospital discharge who may need long-term services and supports. The department and the authority shall hold stakeholder discussions, including opportunities for public review and comment, during development of the waiver request. Upon submission of the waiver request, the department and the authority shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees that describes the request and identifies any statutory changes that may be necessary if the federal government approves the request.

(35) $439,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $559,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2380 (home care agencies). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(36) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1023 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $455 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.

(((39)))(37) $77,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $76,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6205 (long-term care workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((40)))(38) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $12,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for a cost of living adjustment to the personal needs allowance pursuant to RCW 74.09.340.

(39) $17,160,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $9,240,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for costs associated with COVID-19 testing at skilled nursing facilities.

Sec. 1105. 2020 c 357 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$354,021,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($364,531,000))

$330,542,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,460,971,000))

$1,457,868,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$5,416,000

Domestic Violence Prevention Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,404,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$26,349,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,939,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,217,692,000))

$2,185,539,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $67,875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($68,063,000))$48,298,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, (($835,701,000))$871,322,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, $4,000,000 of the administrative contingency account—state appropriation, and $5,585,000 of the pension funding stabilization account—state appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.

(b)(i) (($265,980,000))$307,614,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance.

(ii) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $1,213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $989,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1603 (economic assistance programs).

(iii) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $2,553,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the temporary suspension of mid-certification reviews and extension of eligibility reviews between November 2020 and June 2021 for the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(c)(i) (($155,622,000))$138,872,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures. Within amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), the department shall implement the working family support program.

(ii) (($2,430,000))$1,819,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c) is for enhanced transportation assistance. The department must prioritize the use of these funds for the recipients most in need of financial assistance to facilitate their return to work. The department must not utilize these funds to supplant repayment arrangements that are currently in place to facilitate the reinstatement of drivers' licenses.

(iii) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $649,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1603 (economic assistance programs).

(d) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $353,402,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020 within the department of children, youth, and families. The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal temporary assistance for needy families grant. A portion of this grant must be used to fund child care subsidies expenditures at the department of children, youth, and families. The department shall work in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type including the child care development fund, general fund—state, and the temporary assistance for needy families grant for the purpose of estimating the monthly temporary assistance for needy families grant reimbursement.

(e) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $68,496,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is for child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families.

(f)(i) (($137,723,000))$128,696,000 of the amounts in (1)(a) of this section is for WorkFirst administration and overhead.

(ii) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $218,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $39,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1603 (economic assistance programs).

(iii) Of the amount in (f) of this subsection, $284,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6478 (economic assistance programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(iv) Of the amount in (f) of this subsection, $291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2441 (TANF access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(g) The amounts in subsections (1)(b) through (e) of this section shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified. However, the department may transfer up to ten percent of funding between subsections (1)(b) through (f) of this section. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.

(h) Each calendar quarter, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:

(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;

(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;

(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;

(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;

(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort;

(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements; and

(vii) Proposed and enacted federal law changes affecting maintenance of effort or the participation rate, what impact these changes have on Washington's temporary assistance for needy families program, and the department's plan to comply with these changes.

(j) In the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to provide appropriations from the state general fund for the purposes of (b) through (f) of this subsection if the department does not receive additional federal temporary assistance for needy families contingency funds in each fiscal year as assumed in the budget outlook.

(2) $2,545,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,546,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for naturalization services.

(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.

(4) On January 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.

(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be one hundred percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.

(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.

(7)(a) $3,682,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020((, $1,344,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021,)) and (($10,333,000))$7,485,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the continuation of the ESAR project and implementation of a disaster recovery plan.

(b) $898,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,803,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the termination of the ESAR project.

(c) The funding in this section is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(8) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

(9) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.

(10) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($2,930,000))$2,155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and (($576,000))$1,074,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement an asset verification system that is compliant with the federal medicaid extenders act by January 1, 2021 and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(11) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department must conduct a comprehensive study of the WorkFirst transportation pilot. The department must submit a report by November 1, 2020, to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees that includes a cost benefit analysis of the transportation pilot. At a minimum, the report must include the total annual cost of the pilot since implementation, total annual number of clients accessing transportation services through the pilot, impacts to sanctions and the participation rate, employment outcomes, caseload impacts, department recommendations, and lessons learned.

(12) $2,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $44,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to eliminate the supplied shelter grant standard for the pregnant women assistance, refugee cash assistance, and the aged, blind, or disabled assistance programs.

(13) $164,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute Senate Bill No. 5164 (trafficking victims assist.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15) $1,121,000))(14) $354,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and (($1,107,000))$341,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5144 (child support pass-through). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)))(15) $228,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided to eliminate the mid-certification review for aged participants in the aged, blind, and disabled program.

(16) $4,939,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided to continue offering the maximum food benefit to recipients of the state's food assistance program contingent upon the state receiving a corresponding federal waiver from the food and nutrition services for the supplemental nutrition assistance program.

(17) $2,450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $2,950,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the ACES stabilization project, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(18) $698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the temporary suspension of mid-certification reviews and extension of eligibility reviews between November 2020 and June 2021 for the aged, blind, or disabled program.

(19) $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the temporary suspension of mid-certification reviews and extension of eligibility reviews between November 2020 and June 2021 for the food assistance program.

(20) $342,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $342,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided for the implementation of a federally mandated interstate matching system for the supplemental nutrition assistance program. The funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

Sec. 1106. 2020 c 357 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$16,663,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($17,632,000))

$14,874,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$109,595,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,024,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($145,914,000))

$143,156,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of social and health services vocational rehabilitation program shall participate in the development of an implementation plan to build statewide capacity among school districts to improve transition planning for students in special education who meet criteria for services from the developmental disabilities administration, pursuant to section 501(3)(c) of this act.

(2) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for supported employment services for additional eligible clients with the most significant disabilities who would otherwise be placed on the federally required order of selection waiting list.

Sec. 1107. 2020 c 357 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$52,711,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($53,921,000))

$52,060,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,580,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($111,212,000))

$109,351,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(2) $705,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($784,000))$322,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to expand its King county secure transition facility from six beds to twelve beds beginning January 1, 2020.

(3) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $210,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to hire staff to provide medical transportation and hospital watch services for individuals in need of medical care outside the main facility.

(4) $158,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to hire an administrator to coordinate siting efforts for new secure community transition facilities to house individuals transitioning to the community from the main facility.

Sec. 1108. 2020 c 357 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$31,806,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($36,863,000))

$35,689,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($48,142,000))

$47,865,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,449,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($123,260,000))

$121,809,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2020, and February 1, 2021. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(2) $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $142,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 1109. 2020 c 357 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.

Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the coalition's plan for projects affecting the coalition organizations. The report must include any information technology projects impacting coalition organizations and, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, provide: (1) The status of any information technology projects currently being developed or implemented that affect the coalition; (2) funding needs of these current and future information technology projects; and (3) next steps for the coalition's information technology projects. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

The appropriations to the health care authority in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2020))2021, unless prohibited by this act, the authority may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2020))2021 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. The authority must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature prior to receiving approval from the director of the office of financial management. To the extent that appropriations in sections 211 through 215 are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecast and utilization assumptions, the authority may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2020))2021 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The authority may also transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year 2020 that are provided solely for a specified purpose within section 215 of this act to cover any deficits in section 215 of this act resulting from assumptions related to the return of $35,000,000 in general fund—state behavioral health organization reserves in fiscal year ((2020))2021. The authority may not transfer funds, including for expenses in response to the COVID-19 pandemic in fiscal year 2021, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications and transfers.

Sec. 1110. 2020 c 357 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($2,378,633,000))

$2,378,525,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,440,100,000))

$2,250,052,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,319,236,000))

$13,205,104,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($246,218,000))

$271,639,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$15,086,000

Hospital Safety Net Assessment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($715,909,000))

$710,856,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,208,000))

$762,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$20,870,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
(($20,953,000))

$26,267,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,544,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($538,000))

$537,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($18,172,295,000))

$18,884,242,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The authority shall not accept or expend any federal funds received under a medicaid transformation waiver under healthier Washington except as described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section until specifically approved and appropriated by the legislature. To ensure compliance with legislative directive budget requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the innovation waiver requires better analytic capability, transparency, consistency, timeliness, accuracy, and lack of redundancy with other established measures and that the patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. In order to effectuate these goals, the authority shall: (a) Require the Dr. Robert Bree collaborative and the health technology assessment program to reduce the administrative burden upon providers by only requiring performance measures that are nonduplicative of other nationally established measures. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen by the collaborative and the health technology assessment program for effectiveness and appropriateness; (b) develop a patient satisfaction survey with the goal to gather information about whether it was beneficial for the patient to use the center of excellence location in exchange for additional out-of-pocket savings; (c) ensure patients and health care providers have significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver, in order to ensure improved patient health outcomes; and (d) in cooperation with the department of social and health services, consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget, to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting waivers for federal approval. By federal standard, the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver shall not exceed the duration originally granted by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement. Beginning May 15, 2019, and continuing through December 15, 2019, by the 15th of each month, the director in consultation with the secretary shall report to the fiscal chair of the appropriate committees of the legislature in the manner and form requested the status of the medicaid transformation waiver, including any anticipated or proposed changes to accruals or expenditures.

(2) No more than (($153,357,000))$165,082,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than (($86,190,000))$112,949,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for transformation through accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the medicaid transformation demonstration wavier under healthier Washington, including preventing youth drug use, opioid prevention and treatment, and physical and behavioral health integration. Under this initiative, the authority shall take into account local input regarding community needs. In order to ensure transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees. By December 15, 2019, the authority in collaboration with each accountable community of health shall demonstrate how it will be self-sustaining by the end of the demonstration waiver period, including sources of outside funding, and provide this reporting to the joint select committee on health care oversight. If by the third year of the demonstration waiver there are not measurable, improved patient outcomes and financial returns, the Washington state institute for public policy will conduct an audit of the accountable communities of health, in addition to the process set in place through the independent evaluation required by the agreement with centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(3)(a) No more than (($79,829,000))$67,896,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third party administrator. The authority and the department in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(b) No more than (($89,476,000))$105,283,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and no more than (($36,548,000))$43,004,000 of the general fund—local appropriation may be expended for the medicaid quality improvement program. Under federal regulations, the medicaid quality improvement program is authorized and allows states to design quality improvement programs for the medicaid population in ways that support the state's quality goals. Medicaid quality improvement program payments will not count against initiative 1 of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver spending limit and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation. Apple health managed care organizations and their partnering providers will receive medicaid quality improvement program payments as they meet designated milestones. Partnering providers and apple health managed care organizations will work together to achieve medicaid quality improvement program goals according to the performance period timelines and reporting deadlines as set forth by the authority. The authority shall only utilize the medicaid quality improvement program to support the transformation waiver and shall not pursue its use for other purposes. Any programs created or funded by the medicaid quality improvement program do not create an entitlement. The authority shall not increase general fund—state, federal, or local expenditures under this program. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight not less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(4) Annually, no later than November 1st, the authority shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature: (a) Savings attributed to behavioral and physical integration in areas that are scheduled to integrate in the following calendar year, and (b) savings attributed to behavioral and physical health integration and the level of savings achieved in areas that have integrated behavioral and physical health.

(5) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).

(6) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.

(7) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.

(8) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(9) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(10) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.

(11) $4,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($4,261,000))$3,733,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and (($8,522,000))$9,050,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.

(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.

(13)(a) $7,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.

(b) The authority, in consultation with the department of social and health services and the nursing homes operated by public hospitals in (a) of this subsection, must develop a plan with recommendations for an upper payment limit calculation and the supplemental payment model for nursing homes operated by a public hospital district. The group must consider how to restructure payments under (a) of this subsection, taking into consideration alternate upper payment limit calculation. If upon completion of the plan, the authority determines it can implement the recommendations of the group within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, the authority must submit a state plan amendment, if necessary, and submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than September 30, 2020.

(c) $193,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the authority to provide a one-time grant to a standalone skilled nursing facility operated by a public hospital district in Grant county. This grant is provided as a one-time offset to address the impact of the recoupment requirements of this subsection (13).

(14) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2020, and by November 1, 2021, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2020 and fiscal year 2021, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2019-2021 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested. $759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($740,000))$698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.

(15) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.

(16) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.

(17) The authority shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2020, and no later than September 15, 2021, that delineate the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The reports should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.

(18) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.

(19) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.

(20) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.

(21) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.

(22) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $180,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.

(23) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.

(24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.

(25) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.

(26) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated marijuana fund for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fund—state payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.

(27) Beginning no later than January 1, 2018, for any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority.

(28) ((Sufficient funds are provided for the authority to remove payment and billing limitations identified during the review process required for implementation of chapter 226, Laws of 2017 (behavioral health care – primary care integration) for health and behavior codes, psychotherapy codes, and to continue to offer face-to-face tobacco cessation counseling only for pregnant individuals. Additional funding is provided to increase the rates for the health and behavior codes and psychotherapy codes identified through the stakeholder work group process required under chapter 226, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5779) by ten percent.

(29)))(a) $34,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $5,898,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the compromise of claims in the reconciliation process for rural health clinics for the calendar years 2014-2017. The authority may not recover the state portion of rural health clinic reconciliations for calendar years 2014-2017 for which no state accrual was made. If the authority determines there are unliquidated prior period accrual balances available to refund the federal government for these years, these amounts must be used prior to the amounts provided under this subsection.

(b) By October 15, 2019, the authority shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature the status of rural health clinic reconciliations for calendar years 2011-2013, including any use of available unliquidated prior period accrual balances to refund the federal government for those calendar years. Additionally, the report shall include the status of rural health clinic reconciliations for calendar years 2014-2017, including anticipated amounts owed to or from rural health clinics from the reconciliation process for those fiscal years. The authority shall not recover the state portion of rural health reconciliations for calendar years 2011-2013 for which no general fund state accrual was made. The authority shall not pursue recoveries for calendar years 2014-2017 until after the legislature has an opportunity to take action during the 2020 legislative session. If the legislature does not take any action on rural health clinic reconciliations for calendar years 2014-2017, recoveries shall commence per administrative rule.

(c) Beginning with fiscal year 2020, and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with rural health centers.

(d) Beginning with fiscal year 2020, and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with rural health centers during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.

(((30)))(29) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide a medicaid equivalent adult dental benefit to clients enrolled in the medical care service program.

(((31)))(30) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Bree collaborative to support collaborative learning and targeted technical assistance for quality improvement initiatives. The collaborative must use these amounts to hire one full-time staff person to promote the adoption of Bree collaborative recommendations and to hold two conferences focused on the sharing of best implementation practices.

(((32)))(31) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for maternity services provided by doulas. The authority and the department of health must consult with stakeholders and develop methods to secure approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services for reimbursement for doulas. The authority will report the group's recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(((33)))(32) The authority shall facilitate a home health work group consisting of home health provider associations, hospital associations, managed care organizations, the department of social and health services, and the department of health to develop a new medicaid payment methodology for home health services. The authority must submit a report with final recommendations and a proposed implementation timeline to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 30, 2019. The work group must consider the following when developing the new payment methodology:

(a) Reimbursement for telemedicine;

(b) Reimbursement for social work for clients with behavioral health needs;

(c) An additional add-on for services in rural or underserved areas;

(d) Quality metrics for home health providers serving medical assistance clients including reducing hospital readmission;

(e) The role of home health in caring for individuals with complex, physical, and behavioral health needs who are able to receive care in their own home, but are unable to be discharged from hospital settings; and

(f) Partnerships between home health and other community resources that enable individuals to be served in a cost-effective setting that also meets the individual's needs and preferences.

(((34)))(33) $969,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,607,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,268,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to create and operate a tele-behavioral health video call center staffed by the University of Washington's department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences. The center must provide emergency department providers, primary care providers, and county and municipal correctional facility providers with on-demand access to psychiatric and substance use disorder clinical consultation. When clinically appropriate and technically feasible, the clinical consultation may also involve direct assessment of patients using tele-video technology. The center must be available from 8 a.m. to 5 p.m. in fiscal year 2020 and twenty-four hours a day in fiscal year 2021. Of the federal amounts provided in this subsection, $700,000 is from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant and is to support addiction medicine services through the call center.

(((35)))(34) $300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation, from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant amount, is provided solely for medication interaction services through the Washington state poison center.

(((36)))(35) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall review the current diagnosis-related group high outlier claim policies and examine the impact of increasing the current high outlier threshold. To the extent necessary, the authority shall seek actuarial support for this work. The authority must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2019, that:

(a) Outlines several options for increasing the threshold;

(b) Describes the impact of these options on hospitals, the state, and medicaid managed care organizations; and

(c) Identifies any technical challenge or limitations of changes to the threshold.

(((37)))(36) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority to include allergen control bed and pillow covers as part of the durable medical equipment benefit for children with an asthma diagnosis enrolled in medical assistance programs.

(((38)))(37) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to increase the hourly rate by ten percent for registered nurses and licensed practical nurses providing skilled nursing services for children who require medically intensive care in a home setting. This rate increase begins on January 1, 2020.

(((39)))(38) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to increase the daily rate by ten percent for registered nurses and licensed practical nurses providing skilled nursing services to medically intensive children's program clients who reside in a group home setting. This rate increase begins on January 1, 2020.

(((40)))(39) $439,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5526 (individual health insurance market).

(((41)))(40) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $181,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1199 (health care/disability).

(((42)))(41) $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1224 (Rx drug cost transparency) with up to an additional year for initial reporting due within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(((43)))(42) $1,053,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,222,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5741 (all payer claims database).

(((44)))(43) $2,374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,374,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the kidney disease program.

(((45)))(44) The authority shall work with the department of health, other state agencies, and other hepatitis C virus medication purchasers to establish a comprehensive procurement strategy. As part of this work, the authority shall estimate, by program, any savings that will result from lower medication costs. It is the intent of the legislature to evaluate reinvesting any savings to expand treatment for individuals enrolled in state covered groups and to further the public health elimination effort during the 2020 legislative session. By October 31, 2019, the authority and department shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature on:

(a) The progress of the procurement;

(b) The estimated savings resulting from lower medication costs;

(c) Funding needed for public health interventions to eliminate the hepatitis C virus;

(d) The current status of treatment; and

(e) A plan to implement the elimination effort.

(((46)))(45) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $533,000 for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5274 (pacific islanders dental). Open enrollment periods and special enrollment periods must be consistent with the enrollment periods for the COFA medical program, through the health benefit exchange, and program administration must be consistent with the pacific islander medical program. The first open-enrollment period for the COFA dental program must begin no later than November 1, 2020. The dental services must be consistent with the adult medicaid dental coverage, including state payment of premiums, out-of-pocket costs for covered benefits under the qualified dental plan, and costs for noncovered qualified dental plan benefits consistent with, but not to exceed, the medicaid adult dental coverage.

(((47)))(46) During the 2019-2021 biennium, sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to provide services identical to those services covered by the Washington state family planning waiver program as of August 2018 to individuals who:

(a) Are over nineteen years of age;

(b) Are at or below two hundred and sixty percent of the federal poverty level as established in WAC 182-505-0100;

(c) Are not covered by other public or private insurance; and

(d) Need family planning services and are not currently covered by or eligible for another medical assistance program for family planning.

(((48)))(47) $282,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $754,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5415 (Indian health improvement).

(((49)))(48) $3,150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to reimburse dental health aid therapists for services performed in tribal facilities for medicaid clients. The authority must leverage any federal funding that may become available as a result of appeal decisions from the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(((50)))(49) Sufficient amounts are appropriated within this section for the authority to incorporate the expected outcomes and criteria to measure the performance of service coordination organizations as provided in chapter 70.320 RCW into contracts with managed care organizations that provide services to clients. The authority is directed to:

(a) Contract with an external quality improvement organization to annually analyze the performance of managed care organizations providing services to clients under this chapter based on seven performance measures. The analysis required under this subsection must:

(i) Measure managed care performance in four common measures across each managed care organization, including:

(A) At least one common measure must be weighted towards having the potential to impact managed care costs; and

(B) At least one common measure must be weighted towards population health management, as defined by the measure; and

(ii) Measure managed care performance in an additional three quality focus performance measures specific to a managed care organization. Quality focus performance measures chosen by the authority must:

(A) Be chosen from the statewide common measure set;

(B) Reflect specific measures where a managed care organization has poor performance; and

(C) Be substantive and clinically meaningful in promoting health status.

(b) By September 1, 2019, the authority shall set the four common measures to be analyzed across all managed care organizations.

(c) By September 1, 2019, the authority shall set three quality focus performance measures specific to each managed care organization. The authority must determine performance measures for each managed care organization based on the criteria established in (a)(ii) of this subsection.

(d) By September 15, 2019, and annually thereafter, the authority shall notify each managed care organization of the performance measures for the organization for the subsequent plan year.

(e) Beginning in plan year 2020, two percent of the total plan year funding appropriated to each managed care organization that provides services to clients under chapter 70.320 RCW shall be withheld. At least seventy-five percent of the withhold shall be held contingent on each managed care organization's performance on the seven performance measures identified in this section. Each managed care organization may earn back the annual withhold if the external quality improvement organization finds that the managed care organization:

(i) Made statistically significant improvement in the seven performance measures as compared to the preceding plan year; or

(ii) Scored in the top national medicaid quartile of the performance measures.

(f) The amount of withhold annually paid to each managed care organization shall be proportional to findings of statistically significant improvement or top national medicaid quartile scoring by a managed care organization.

(g) For no more than two of the four quality focus performance measures, the authority may use an alternate methodology to approximate top national medicaid quartile performance where top quartile performance data is unavailable.

(h) For the purposes of this subsection, "external quality improvement organization" means an organization that meets the competence and independence requirements under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.354, as it existed on the effective date of this section.

(((51)))(50) $1,805,727,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,876,135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the authority to implement the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report. The authority is directed to:

(a) Organize all program integrity activities into a centralized unit or under a common protocol addressing provider enrollment, fraud and abuse detection, investigations, and law enforcement referrals that is more reflective of industry standards;

(b) Ensure appropriate resources are dedicated to prevention, detection, investigation, and suspected provider fraud at both the authority and at contracted managed care organizations;

(c) Ensure all required federal regulations are being followed and are incorporated into managed care contracts;

(d) Directly audit managed care encounter data to identify fraud, waste, and abuse issues with managed care organization providers;

(e) Initiate data mining activities in order to identify fraud, waste, and abuse issues with manage care organization providers;

(f) Implement proactive data mining and routine audits of validated managed care encounter data;

(g) Assess liquidated damages to managed care organizations when fraud, waste, or abuse with managed care organization providers is identified;

(h) Require managed care organizations submit accurate reports on overpayments, including the prompt reporting of overpayments identified or recovered, specifying overpayments due to fraud, waste, or abuse;

(i) Implement processes to ensure integrity of data used for rate setting purposes;

(j) Refine payment suspension policies; and

(k) Ensure all federal database exclusion checks are performed at the appropriate intervals. The authority shall update managed care contracts as appropriate to reflect these requirements.

(((52)))(51) $96,130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,476,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for fee-for-service dental services. The authority must provide these services through fee-for-service and may not proceed with either a carved-out or carved-in managed care dental option. Any contracts that have been procured or that are in the process of being procured shall not be entered into or implemented. By November 15, 2019, the authority shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature a plan to improve access to dental services for medicaid clients. This plan should address options for carve-in, carve-out, fee-for-service, and other models that would improve access and outcomes for adults and children. The plan should also include the cost for any options provided.

(((53)))(52) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the authority must revise its agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(a) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(b) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(i) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(ii) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(iii) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(c) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the authority or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(d) The authority must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(((54) The authority is prohibited to direct any funds to safe-injection sites for the illicit use of drugs.

(55)))(53) $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $7,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid to rural hospitals that meet the criteria in (a) through (d) of this subsection. Payments for state and federal medical assistance programs for services provided by such a hospital, regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, must be increased to one hundred fifty percent of the hospital's fee-for-service rates. The authority must discontinue this rate increase after June 30, 2021, and return to the payment levels and methodology for these hospitals that were in place as of January 1, 2018. Hospitals participating in the certified public expenditures program may not receive increased reimbursement for inpatient services. Hospitals qualifying for this rate increase must:

(a) Be certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013;

(b) Have had less than one hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011;

(c) Have a level III adult trauma service designation from the department of health as of January 1, 2014; and

(d) Be owned and operated by the state or a political subdivision.

(((56)))(54) Within the amounts appropriated within this section the authority shall conduct an evaluation of purchasing arrangements and paid claims or encounter data for prescription drugs under managed care contracts for plan years 2017 and 2018 and compare these to contract purchasing agreements under the same years for the prescription drug consortium and identify any cost differences. The authority shall report its findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2019.

(((57)))(55) The health care authority is directed to convene a work group on establishing a universal health care system in Washington. $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the health care authority to contract with one or more consultants to perform any actuarial and financial analyses necessary to develop options under (b)(vi) of this subsection.

(a) The work group must consist of a broad range of stakeholders with expertise in the health care financing and delivery system, including but not limited to:

(i) Consumers, patients, and the general public;

(ii) Patient advocates and community health advocates;

(iii) Large and small businesses with experience with large and small group insurance and self-insured models;

(iv) Labor, including experience with Taft-Hartley coverage;

(v) Health care providers that are self-employed and health care providers that are otherwise employed;

(vi) Health care facilities such as hospitals and clinics;

(vii) Health insurance carriers;

(viii) The Washington health benefit exchange and state agencies, including the office of financial management, the office of the insurance commissioner, the department of revenue, and the office of the state treasurer; and

(ix) Legislators from each caucus of the house of representatives and senate.

(b) The work group must study and make recommendations to the legislature on how to create, implement, maintain, and fund a universal health care system that may include publicly funded, publicly administered, and publicly and privately delivered health care that is sustainable and affordable to all Washington residents including, but not limited to:

(i) Options for increasing coverage and access for uninsured and underinsured populations;

(ii) Transparency measures across major health system actors, including carriers, hospitals, and other health care facilities, pharmaceutical companies, and provider groups that promote understanding and analyses to best manage and lower costs;

(iii) Innovations that will promote quality, evidence-based practices leading to sustainability, and affordability in a universal health care system. When studying innovations under this subsection, the work group must develop recommendations on issues related to covered benefits and quality assurance and consider expanding and supplementing the work of the Robert Bree collaborative and the health technology assessment program;

(iv) Options for ensuring a just transition to a universal health care system for all stakeholders including, but not limited to, consumers, businesses, health care providers and facilities, hospitals, health carriers, state agencies, and entities representing both management and labor for these stakeholders;

(v) Options to expand or establish health care purchasing in collaboration with neighboring states; and

(vi) Options for revenue and financing mechanisms to fund the universal health care system. The work group shall contract with one or more consultants to perform any actuarial and financial analyses necessary to develop options under this subsection.

(c) The work group must report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2020. Preliminary reports with findings and preliminary recommendations shall be made public and open for public comment by November 15, 2019, and May 15, 2020.

(((58)))(56) $23,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $36,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(((59)))(57) $1,667,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $855,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,867,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the Washington rural health access preservation pilot program.

(((61) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the authority to develop a public-private partnership with a state-based oral health foundation to connect medicaid patients to dental services and reduce barriers to accessing care. The authority shall submit a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021.

(62)))(58)(a) $1,192,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,970,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for reconciliation of payment under alternate payment methodology four (APM4) for federally qualified health centers (FQHC) for state fiscal year 2020. The authority shall use unliquidated prior accrual balances to reconcile state fiscal years 2018 and 2019.

(b) By August 1, 2020, the authority shall convene representatives from FQHCs participating in the APM4 methodology, the FQHC association, the office of financial management, and fiscal committees of the legislature to evaluate and amend the APM4 model and memorandum of understanding.

(c) The authority in collaboration with the representatives in (b) of this subsection must develop an updated APM4 model and memorandum of understanding that:

(i) Complies with budget neutrality requirements and spending limits as required under the omnibus appropriations act;

(ii) Identifies predictable spending targets;

(iii) Clearly defines quality performance standards for participating FQHCs;

(iv) Requires progressively increasing standards of quality performance for participating FQHCs;

(v) Clearly defines financial performance expectations for participating FQHCs;

(vi) Requires progressively increasing standards of financial performance for participating FQHCs; and

(vii) Requires that reconciliation payments made under APM4 may not fall below the payment level required by the federal law for qualifying face-to-face encounters.

(d) The authority in collaboration with the office of financial management and representatives from fiscal committees of the legislature shall conduct an evaluation of the APM4 model to determine its cost effectiveness and impact on patient outcomes and report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2022.

(e) The authority shall not enter into any future value-based arrangements with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics prior to receiving approval from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(f) The authority shall require all managed care organizations to provide information to the authority to account for all payments to FQHCs to include how payments are made, including any additional payments and whether there is a sub-capitation arrangement or value-based purchasing arrangement.

(g) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with FQHCs contracting under APM4.

(h) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with FQHCs contracting under APM4 during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.

(((63)))(59) $70,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 2755 (air ambulance cost transp.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(64)))(60) $611,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2457 (health care cost board). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(65)))(61) $259,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2662 (total cost of insulin). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(66)))(62) The health care authority shall submit a state plan amendment to the centers for medicare and medicaid services to maintain children's health insurance program coverage as secondary payer for eligible child dependents of employees eligible for school employee or public employee benefit coverage. The intent of the legislature for this option is to provide children the best access to health care coverage while prioritizing efficient use of state funds. No later than October 15, 2020, the authority shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on the status of the state plan amendment and the impact to the state. The health care authority shall implement the amendment in calendar year 2020, once approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

(((67)))(63) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid to provide education and clinical training for dental professionals and students in the care of persons with developmental or acquired disabilities, or both.

(((69)))(64) $510,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $76,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to collaborate with the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and Seattle children's hospital to extend the partnership access line for moms and partnership access line for kids referral assistance service programs, as described in RCW 71.24.061(3)(a), until June 30, 2021.

(((70)))(65) $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $66,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to identify, analyze, and address health equity disparities in access and outcomes for individuals in the medicaid population.

(((71) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracting with the office of equity to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2905 (baby, child dentistry access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(72)))(66) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the development of a system to address individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities who present in an emergency in crisis. The system must include crisis plans to be available to emergency room providers; and education and training for emergency room providers in how to best serve this population to provide immediate intervention to prevent acute care admissions and support the individual to return to their current living arrangements.

(((73)))(67) $187,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a full-time employee to coordinate client assessments and implement plans for patients who are hospitalized and likely to need post discharge services including placement in community or out of state settings. Client assessments must include information regarding the individual's specific care needs, whether medical, behavioral, or cognitive, and ability to perform activities of daily living. The coordinator must collaborate with the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, and health care organizations to promote the transition of patients to postacute care settings.

(((75)))(68) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $120,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to identify ways to maximize federal financial participation and any new opportunities to leverage federal funding. In collaboration with the department of health, the authority must explore options to leverage federal funding for foundational public health. The authority may use the amounts in this subsection for staff support and one-time contracting.

(((77)))(69) No later than December 31, 2021, the health care authority, in partnership with the department of social and health services as described in section 204(33) of this act, shall submit a waiver request to the federal department of health and human services to authorize presumptive medicaid eligibility determinations for clients preparing for acute care hospital discharge who may need long-term services and supports. The department and the authority shall hold stakeholder discussions, including opportunities for public review and comment, during development of the waiver request. Upon submission of the waiver request, the department and the authority shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees that describes the request and identifies any statutory changes that may be necessary if the federal government approves the request.

(((80)))(70) $770,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $800,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase home health rates beginning January 1, 2021.

(((82)))(71)(a) Within the amounts appropriated within this section, the authority shall implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6534 (ambulance quality assurance fee). The authority is directed to submit a state plan amendment (SPA) pursuant to the terms of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6534 without delay once the bill becomes effective. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b) The authority, in collaboration with an association representing private emergency ambulance providers and an organization representing employees of private emergency ambulance providers, shall develop reporting requirements prior to June 30, 2021, to account for how funds from the quality assurance fee program and base rate increase are spent. The reporting requirements should include, but not be limited to, the percent of the add-on fee and base rate increase used to increase wages; to which category of workers' wages these increases apply, specifically whether wage increases are being used to increase wages for emergency medical technicians whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $25 per hour in calendar year 2020; and, whether the add-on and base rate increase are being used to address resulting wage compression for related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to emergency medical technicians.

(((83)))(72) The health care authority shall work with the department of social and health services to assess a Katie Beckett waiver and a tax equity and fiscal responsibility act (TEFRA) waiver to expand coverage for children with significant disabilities who meet federal requirements for such services. No later than October 15, 2020, the authority shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial management the number of children who would be eligible if such waivers were approved, the services for which they would be eligible, and the potential impact to the state budget.

(((85)))(73) $2,362,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $4,132,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid to low volume, small rural hospitals that meet the criteria in (a) through (d) of this subsection. Payments for state and federal medical assistance programs for services provided by such a hospital, regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, must be increased to one hundred fifty percent of the hospital's fee-for-service rates beginning July 1, 2020. The authority must discontinue this rate increase after June 30, 2021, and return to the payment levels and methodology for these hospitals that were in place as of June 30, 2020. A hospital qualifying for this rate increase must:

(a) Have fewer than seventy available acute beds as reported in the hospital's 2018 department of health year-end report;

(b) Not be currently designated as a critical access hospital, and not meet the current federal eligibility requirements for designation as a critical access hospital;

(c) Not be a certified public expenditure hospital;

(d) Have combined medicare and medicaid inpatient days greater than eighty percent as reported in the hospital's 2018 cost report.

Sec. 1111. 2020 c 357 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS PROGRAM

State Health Care Authority Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($37,604,000))

$37,144,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($37,604,000))

$37,144,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Any savings resulting from reduced claims costs or other factors identified after March 1, 2019, must be reserved for funding employee benefits in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan resulting from rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys received as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. The authority may, however, conduct a request for information about a diabetes disease management program.

(2) Any changes to benefits must be approved by the public employees' benefits board. The board shall not make any changes to benefits without considering a comprehensive analysis of the cost of those changes, and shall not increase benefits unless savings achieved under subsection (3) of this section or offsetting cost reductions from other benefit revisions are sufficient to fund the changes. However, the funding provided anticipates that the public employees' benefits board may increase the availability of nutritional counseling in the uniform medical plan by allowing a lifetime limit of up to twelve nutritional counseling visits, and may increase hearing aid benefits to reflect the provisions of chapter 159, Laws of 2018, for the plan year beginning January 1, 2021. Provided further, that within the amount provided, the health care authority may update the public employees benefits board benefits enrollment process. The board may also, within the amounts provided, use cost savings to enhance the basic long-term disability benefit.

(3) Except as may be provided in a health care bargaining agreement, to provide benefits within the level of funding provided in part IX of this bill, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases increase in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.

(4) The board shall collect a surcharge payment of not less than twenty-five dollars per month from members who use tobacco products, and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(5) $7,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(6) $1,705,000 of the state health care authority administrative account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6189 (SEBB coverage eligibility). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1112. 2020 c 357 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—SCHOOL EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD

School Employees' Insurance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,766,000))

$34,045,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($27,766,000))

$34,045,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By February 5, 2020, the health care authority shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the total amount by school district, educational service district, and charter school billed for January benefits and a detailed list of school districts, educational service districts, and charter schools that have not remitted payment for January coverage as of January 31, 2020.

(2) $2,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(3) The health care authority must study the potential cost savings and improved efficiency in providing insurance benefits to the employers and employees participating in the public employees' and school employees' benefits board systems that could be gained by consolidating the systems. The consolidation options studied must maintain separate risk pools for medicare-eligible and non-medicare eligible employees and retirees, assume a consolidation date of January 1, 2022, and incorporate the experiences gained by health care authority during the initial implementation and operation of the school employees' benefits board program. The study must be submitted to the committees of the house of representatives and the senate overseeing health care and the omnibus operating budget by November 15, 2020.

(4) $2,002,000 of the school employees' insurance administrative account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6189 (SEBB coverage eligibility). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1113. 2020 c 357 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$6,407,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($5,659,000))

$5,368,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($50,055,000))

$45,106,000

Health Benefit Exchange Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($60,117,000))

$65,172,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($122,238,000))

$122,053,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.

(2)(a) By July 15th and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of one-half the general fund—state appropriation and one-half the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation to the exchange.

(b) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.

(c) Payments made from general fund—state appropriation and health benefit exchange account—state appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.

(3) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,048,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5526 (individual health insurance market).

(4) $1,173,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided for the exchange to enhance Washington healthplanfinder so eligible COFA citizens can obtain dental coverage. Open enrollment periods and special enrollment periods for the COFA dental program shall be consistent with the enrollment periods for the COFA medical program. The first open-enrollment period for the COFA dental program must begin no later than November 1, 2020.

(5) $426,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $874,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for cloud platform costs and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(6) $968,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation and $1,978,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for system integrator reprocurement and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(7) $152,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2554 (health plan exclusions). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $172,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2662 (total cost of insulin). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10)))(9) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal 2021 is provided solely for the exchange to contract with an independent actuarial consultant to conduct an assessment of the impact of a state requirement that individuals enroll in health coverage. The assessment shall consider the effects of this requirement on revenue, individual market enrollment, individual market premiums, and the uninsured rate. The exchange shall submit assessment findings to the chairs of the health committees of the legislature no later than December 15, 2020.

(10) $34,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $32,000 of the health benefit exchange account—state appropriation, and $34,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided for pass-through funding in the amount of $25,000 for each lead navigator organization in the four geographic regions with the highest density of compact of free association citizens. These amounts are provided solely for lead organizations to recruit, hire, and train a representative of the citizens of the compact of free association (COFA) nations community to:

(a) Provide outreach and enrollment assistance to COFA citizens leading up to the July 2021 transition of COFA citizens from qualified health and dental plan coverage to medicaid coverage; and

(b) Promote continuous access to needed health services beyond the scope of the current COFA program.

Sec. 1114. 2020 c 357 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY—COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$579,402,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($652,344,000))

$602,729,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,076,337,000))

$2,234,755,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$36,513,000

Criminal Justice Treatment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$17,486,000

Problem Gambling Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,961,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($51,000))

$20,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$28,490,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
(($28,493,000))

$28,490,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,714,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,422,791,000))

$3,531,560,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For the purposes of this section, "behavioral health entities" means managed care organizations and administrative services organizations in regions where the authority is purchasing medical and behavioral health services through fully integrated contracts pursuant to RCW 71.24.380, and behavioral health organizations in regions that have not yet transitioned to fully integrated managed care.

(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for implementation of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. In addition to amounts provided solely for implementation of the settlement agreement, class members must have access to supports and services funded throughout this section for which they meet eligibility and medical necessity requirements. The authority must include language in contracts that requires regional behavioral health entities to develop and implement plans for improving access to timely and appropriate treatment for individuals with behavioral health needs and current or prior criminal justice involvement who are eligible for services under these contracts.

(3) $15,605,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $15,754,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,789,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.

(4) $7,657,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $11,544,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $20,197,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health entities to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health entities with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health entities in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health entities which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under subsection (7) of this section. The authority and behavioral health entities shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.

(5) From the general fund—state appropriations in this section, the authority shall assure that behavioral health entities reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long term support administration for the general fund—state cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled behavioral health entity consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(6) $3,520,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain a pilot project to incorporate peer bridging staff into behavioral health regional teams that provide transitional services to individuals returning to their communities.

(7) $81,930,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,122,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health entity spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health entities as follows:

(a) Of the amount provided for fiscal year 2020, seventy percent must be distributed to behavioral health administrative service organizations and thirty percent to managed care organizations. The percentage of funding provided to each behavioral health administrative services organization must be proportionate to the fiscal year 2019 regional allocation of flexible nonmedicaid funds.

(b) $3,939,000 of the fiscal year 2021 amounts must be distributed to behavioral health administrative service organizations. Of the remaining amount for fiscal year 2021, eighty percent must be distributed to behavioral health administrative service organizations and twenty percent to managed care organizations. The percentage of funding provided to each behavioral health administrative services organization must be proportionate to the fiscal year 2020 regional allocation of flexible nonmedicaid funds.

(c) The authority must include the following language in medicaid contracts with behavioral health entities unless they are provided formal notification from the center for medicaid and medicare services that the language will result in the loss of federal medicaid participation: "The contractor may voluntarily provide services that are in addition to those covered under the state plan, although the cost of these services cannot be included when determining payment rates unless including these costs are specifically allowed under federal law or an approved waiver."

(8) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health entities for children's long-term inpatient facility services.

(9) $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting one hundred eighty-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.

(10) Behavioral health entities may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health entities may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with subsection (7) of this section to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.

(11) $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health entities on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.

(13) The authority must establish minimum and maximum funding levels for all reserves allowed under behavioral health organization and administrative services organization contracts and include contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The authority must monitor and ensure that behavioral health organization and administrative services organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The authority must monitor revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health organization or administrative services organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health organization or administrative services organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the entity in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the entity has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan.

(14) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, any amounts provided in this section that are used for case management services for pregnant and parenting women must be contracted directly between the authority and providers rather than through contracts with behavioral health organizations.

(15) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the authority by request; and (b) indirect charges for administering the program must not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.

(16) $3,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.

(17) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health entities must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health entities must require that behavioral health entities include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.

(18) The criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with behavioral health entities to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b). The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which identifies the distribution of criminal justice treatment account funds by September 30, 2019.

(19) No more than $27,844,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation may be expended for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the medicaid transformation demonstration waiver under healthier Washington. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fund—state expenditures under this initiative. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.

(20) $6,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $6,858,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $8,046,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain new crisis triage or stabilization centers. Services in these facilities may include crisis stabilization and intervention, individual counseling, peer support, medication management, education, and referral assistance. The authority shall monitor each center's effectiveness at lowering the rate of state psychiatric hospital admissions.

(21) $1,125,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to develop a memorandum of understanding with the department of health for implementation of chapter 297, Laws of 2017 (opioid treatment programs). The authority must use these amounts to reimburse the department of health for costs incurred through the implementation of the bill.

(22) $6,655,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($10,015,000))$9,074,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and (($12,965,000))$12,024,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the operation of secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities. The authority may not use any of these amounts for services in facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions for mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities. Within these amounts, funding is provided to increase the fee for service rate for these facilities up to $650 per day. The authority must require in contracts with behavioral health entities that, beginning in calendar year 2020, they pay no lower than the fee for service rate. The authority must coordinate with regional behavioral health entities to identify and implement purchasing strategies or regulatory changes that increase access to services for individuals with complex behavioral health needs at secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(23) $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $23,090,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $92,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain the enhancement of community-based behavioral health services that was funded in fiscal year 2019. Twenty percent of the general fund—state appropriation amounts for each regional service area must be contracted to the behavioral health administrative services organizations and used to increase their nonmedicaid funding and the remainder must be used to increase medicaid rates above FY 2018 levels. Effective January 2020, the medicaid funding is intended to increase rates for behavioral health services provided by licensed and certified community behavioral health agencies as defined by the department of health. This funding must be allocated to the managed care organizations proportionate to their medicaid enrollees. The authority must require the managed care organizations to provide a report on their implementation of this funding. The authority must submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2020, summarizing how this funding was used and provide information for future options of increasing behavioral health provider rates through directed payments. The report must identify different mechanisms for implementing directed payment for behavioral health providers including but not limited to minimum fee schedules, across the board percentage increases, and value-based payments. The report must provide a description of each of the mechanisms considered, the timeline that would be required for implementing the mechanism, and whether and how the mechanism is expected to have a differential impact on different providers. The report must also summarize the information provided by managed care organizations in implementing the funding provided under this section.

(24) $27,917,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($36,095,000))$21,366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and (($46,889,000))$35,451,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. Within these amounts, the authority must meet the requirements for reimbursing counties for the judicial services for patients being served in these settings in accordance with RCW 71.05.730. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in developing the contract requirements, selecting contractors, and establishing processes for identifying patients that will be admitted to these facilities.

(a) Sufficient amounts are provided in fiscal year 2020 for the authority to reimburse community hospitals serving medicaid clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 at a rate of $1,171 per day, or the hospital's current psychiatric inpatient per diem rate, whichever is higher. In fiscal year 2020, the rate paid to hospitals in this subsection cannot exceed one-hundred percent of the hospitals eligible costs based on their most recently completed medicare cost report.

(b) Sufficient amounts are provided in fiscal year 2021 for the authority to reimburse providers serving medicaid clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 as follows: (i) Community hospitals whose costs exceed their current rates based on their most recently filed medicare cost report at one hundred percent of the hospital's eligible costs documented in the most recently filed medicare cost report; (ii) community hospitals that do not have a filed medicare cost report on file with the authority at the statewide average rate based on the average of provider specific long-term inpatient care rates or the provider's current per diem rate, whichever is higher; (iii) community hospitals whose costs do not exceed their current rates based on their most recently filed medicare cost report at a rate of $940 per day; and (iv) nonhospital residential treatment centers certified to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 at a rate that reflects a five percent increase from their fiscal year 2020 rate for serving medicaid clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025.

(((e)))(c) The authority in collaboration with the Washington state hospital association must convene a work group to further refine the methodology for reimbursing community hospitals serving these clients. The authority must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020. The report must include options for incorporating additional factors into future rate adjustments and identify where there may be overlap within the different options. The report must include the following areas and provide a description of the option and the methodology and implementation costs associated with each option:

(i) Acuity adjustments for providers serving individuals with higher levels of behavioral health or physical health care needs;

(ii) Retroactive reconciliation adjustments for providers whose total costs for serving clients under this subsection are higher or lower than payments received by the authority and any additional payers.

(25) $1,455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020((, $1,401,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $3,210,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are))is provided solely for the implementation of intensive behavioral health treatment facilities within the community behavioral health service system pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1394 (behavioral health facilities).

(26) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $173,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 70, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1199) (health care/disability).

(27)(a) $12,878,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $12,878,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for:

(i) A memorandum of understanding with the department of children, youth, and families to provide substance abuse treatment programs;

(ii) A contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit evaluation of the implementations of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502);

(iii) Designing and administering the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey;

(iv) Maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program;

(v) Grants to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for life skills training to children and youth;

(vi) Maintaining increased prevention and treatment service provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organization to children and youth;

(vii) Maintaining increased residential treatment services for children and youth;

(viii) Training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence-based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorder;

(ix) Expenditures into the home visiting services account; and

(x) Grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth.

(b) The authority must allocate the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection amongst the specific activities proportionate to the fiscal year 2019 allocation.

(28)(a) $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Spokane behavioral health entities to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services must include:

(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;

(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;

(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and

(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.

(b) At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health entities shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.

(29) $29,288,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to assist behavioral health entities with the costs of providing services to medicaid clients receiving services in psychiatric facilities classified as institutions of mental diseases. The authority must distribute these amounts proportionate to the number of bed days for medicaid clients in institutions for mental diseases that were excluded from behavioral health entity calendar year 2019 capitation rates because they exceeded the amounts allowed under federal regulations. The authority must also use these amounts to directly pay for costs that are ineligible for medicaid reimbursement in institutions of mental disease facilities for American Indian and Alaska Natives who opt to receive behavioral health services on a fee-for-service basis. The amounts used for these individuals must be reduced from the allocation of the behavioral health entities where the individual resides. If a behavioral health entity receives more funding through this subsection than is needed to pay for the cost of their medicaid clients in institutions for mental diseases, they must use the remainder of the amounts to provide other services not covered under the medicaid program. The authority must submit an application for a waiver to allow, by July 1, 2020, for full federal participation for medicaid clients in mental health facilities classified as institutions of mental diseases. The authority must submit a report on the status of the waiver to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(30) The authority must require all behavioral health organizations transitioning to full integration to either spend down or return all reserves in accordance with contract requirements and federal and state law. Behavioral health organization reserves may not be used to pay for services to be provided beyond the end of a behavioral health organization's contract or for startup costs in full integration regions except as provided in this subsection. The authority must ensure that any increases in expenditures in behavioral health reserve spend-down plans are required for the operation of services during the contract period and do not result in overpayment to providers. If the nonfederal share of reserves returned during fiscal year 2020 exceeds $35,000,000, the authority shall use some of the amounts in excess of $35,000,000 to support the final regions transitioning to full integration of physical and behavioral health care. These amounts must be distributed proportionate to the population of each regional area covered. The maximum amount allowed per region is $3,175 per 1,000 residents. These amounts must be used to provide a reserve for nonmedicaid services in the region to stabilize the new crisis services system.

(31) $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $13,312,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement a medicaid state plan amendment which provides for substance use disorder peer support services to be included in behavioral health capitation rates beginning in fiscal year 2020 in accordance with section 213(5)(ss), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The authority shall require managed care organizations to provide access to peer support services for individuals with substance use disorders transitioning from emergency departments, inpatient facilities, or receiving treatment as part of hub and spoke networks.

(32) $1,256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,686,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the number of residential beds for pregnant and parenting women. These amounts may be used for startup funds and ongoing costs associated with two new sixteen bed pregnant and parenting women residential treatment programs.

(33) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority must maintain a rate increase for community hospitals that provide a minimum of 200 medicaid psychiatric inpatient days pursuant to the methodology adopted to implement section 213(5)(n), chapter 299, Laws of 2018 (ESSB 6032) (partial veto).

(34) $1,393,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,423,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $5,938,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement discharge wraparound services for individuals with complex behavioral health conditions transitioning or being diverted from admission to psychiatric inpatient programs. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in establishing the standards for these programs.

(35) $850,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely to contract with a nationally recognized recovery residence organization and to create a revolving fund for loans to operators of recovery residences seeking certification in accordance with Second Substitute House Bill No. 1528 (recovery support services).

(36) $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $124,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1874 (adolescent behavioral health). Funding is provided specifically for the authority to provide an online training to behavioral health providers related to state law and best practices in family-initiated treatment, adolescent-initiated treatment, and other services and to conduct an annual survey to measure the impacts of implementing policies resulting from the bill.

(37) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement a memorandum of understanding with the criminal justice training commission to provide funding for community grants pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1767 (alternatives to arrest).

(38) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for provision of crisis stabilization services to individuals who are not eligible for medicaid in Whatcom county. The authority must coordinate with crisis stabilization providers, managed care organizations, and behavioral health administrative services organizations throughout the state to identify payment models that reflect the unique needs of crisis stabilization and crisis triage providers. The report must also include an analysis of the estimated gap in nonmedicaid funding for crisis stabilization and triage facilities throughout the state. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the estimated nonmedicaid funding gap and payment models by December 1, 2019.

(39) The authority must conduct an analysis to determine whether there is a gap in fiscal year 2020 behavioral health entity funding for services in institutions for mental diseases and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2019. The report must be developed in consultation with the office of financial management and staff from the fiscal committees of the legislature and must include the following elements: (a) The increase in the number of nonmedicaid bed days in institutions for mental diseases from fiscal year 2017 to fiscal year 2019 by facility and the estimated annual cost associated with these increased bed days in FY 2020; (b) the increase in the number of medicaid bed days in institutions for mental diseases from fiscal year 2017 to fiscal year 2019 by facility and the estimated annual cost associated with these increased bed days in FY 2020; (c) the amount of funding assumed in current behavioral health entity medicaid capitation rates for institutions for mental diseases bed days that are currently allowable under medicaid regulation or waivers; (d) the amounts provided in subsection (29) of this section to assist with costs in institutions for mental diseases not covered in medicaid capitation rates; and (e) any remaining gap in behavioral health entity funding for institutions for mental diseases for medicaid or nonmedicaid clients.

(40) $1,968,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($3,396,000))$1,968,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and (($12,150,000))$8,100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for support of and to increase clubhouse facilities across the state. The authority shall work with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to review opportunities to include clubhouse services as an optional "in lieu of" service in managed care organization contracts in order to maximize federal participation. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of efforts to implement clubhouse programs and receive federal approval for including these services in managed care organization contracts as an optional "in lieu of" service.

(41) $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (from the substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the University of Washington behavioral health institute to develop and disseminate model programs and curricula for inpatient and outpatient treatment for individuals with substance use disorder and co-occurring disorders. The behavioral health institute will provide individualized consultation to behavioral health agencies in order to improve the delivery of evidence-based and promising practices and overall quality of care. The behavioral health institute will provide training to staff of behavioral health agencies to enhance the quality of substance use disorder and co-occurring treatment delivered.

(42) The number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health entities at eastern state hospital shall be one hundred ninety two per day. The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by behavioral health entities at western state hospital shall be five hundred twenty-seven per day. During fiscal year 2020, the authority must reduce the number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health entities at western state hospital by sixty beds to allow for the repurposing of two civil wards at western state hospital to provide forensic services. During fiscal year 2021, the authority must reduce the number of beds allocated for use by behavioral health entities at eastern state hospital by 30 beds to reflect the closure of one ward in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Contracted community beds provided under subsection (24) of this section shall be allocated to the behavioral health entities in lieu of beds at western state hospital and be incorporated in their allocation of state hospital patient days of care for the purposes of calculating reimbursements pursuant to RCW 71.24.310. It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of expanding community based alternatives for long-term civil commitment services that allow for state hospital beds to be prioritized for forensic patients.

(43) $190,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $947,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,023,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to develop a statewide plan to implement evidence-based coordinated specialty care programs that provide early identification and intervention for psychosis in behavioral health agencies in accordance with Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5903 (children's mental health).

(44) $708,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $799,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementing mental health peer respite centers and a pilot project to implement a mental health drop-in center beginning July 1, 2020, in accordance with Second Substitute House Bill No. 1394 (behavioral health facilities).

(45) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided on a one-time basis solely for a licensed youth residential psychiatric substance abuse and mental health agency located in Clark county to invest in staff training and increasing client census. This amount must be allocated subject to a contract with the authority concerning staffing levels, critical action plans, and client services.

(46) $509,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,823,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for diversion grants to establish new law enforcement assisted diversion programs outside of King county consistent with the provisions of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5380 (opioid use disorder).

(47) The authority must compile all previous reports and collaborate with any work groups created during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium for the purpose of establishing the implementation plan for transferring the full risk of long-term inpatient care for mental illness into the behavioral health entity contracts by January 1, 2020.

(48) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely to continue funding one pilot project in Pierce county to promote increased utilization of assisted outpatient treatment programs. The authority shall provide a report to the legislature by October 15, 2020, which must include the number of individuals served, outcomes to include changes in use of inpatient treatment and hospital stays, and recommendations for further implementation based on lessons learned from the pilot project.

(49) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020((, $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021,)) and (($36,000))$18,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5181 (involuntary treatment procedures).

(50) $814,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,466,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement the recommendations of the state action alliance for suicide prevention, to include suicide assessments, treatment, and grant management.

(51) Within existing appropriations, the authority shall prioritize the prevention and treatment of intravenous opiate-based drug use.

(52) $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $178,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The authority must collect information from the institute on the use of these funds and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.

(53) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the authority to provide a one-time grant to the city of Maple Valley to support a pilot project for a community resource coordinator position for the city of Maple Valley, Tahoma school district, and the greater Maple Valley area. This amount must be used to develop programs, projects, and training that specifically address mental health awareness and education and facilitate access to school-based and community resources. The grant must require a report be submitted by the city of Maple Valley to the authority and the Maple Valley city council which summarizes the services provided and the perceived value of the community resource coordinator position for the community. The authority must submit the report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021.

(54) $215,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for provision of crisis stabilization services in Island county. The authority must use this amount to contract for start-up and treatment services that are not reimbursable under medicaid provided in a crisis stabilization center in Island county. The authority must continue to coordinate with crisis stabilization providers and behavioral health entities to identify funding gaps for non-Medicaid services and payment models that reflect the unique needs of these facilities.

(55) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to contract with a family-centered substance use disorder treatment program which provides behavioral health services to families engaged in the foster system in Spokane county. This amount must be used to provide wraparound behavioral health services to individuals enrolled in the program.

(((57)))(56) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $50,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to work with the actuaries responsible for establishing behavioral health capitation rates, the University of Washington behavioral health institute, managed care organizations, and community mental health and substance use disorder providers to develop strategies for enhancing behavioral health provider reimbursement to promote behavioral health workforce development efforts. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020, that identifies: (a) A description of the actuarial assumptions related to clinical supervision included in the development of calendar year 2020 managed care behavioral health capitation rates and the relative dollar value of these assumptions; (b) available information on whether and to what extent managed care organizations are accounting for clinical supervision in establishing behavioral health provider reimbursement methodologies and rates; (c) identification of provider reimbursement models through managed care organizations that effectively incentivize the expansion of internships and entry level opportunities for clinicians; and (d) recommendations for accountability mechanisms to demonstrate that amounts included in behavioral health capitation rates for clinical supervision are passed on to mental health and substance abuse agencies that provide internships and entry level opportunities for clinicians.

(((58)))(57) $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $259,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,285,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to support the administrative costs associated with the application and implementation of a federal waiver allowing for full federal participation in mental health treatment facilities identified as institutions of mental diseases.

(((59)))(58) $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $123,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2584 (behavioral health rates). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((60)))(59) $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2737 (children's mental health work group). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((61)))(60) $766,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,526,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2642 (substance use disorder coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((62)))(61) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $125,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to conduct an analysis on the impact of changing policy in the apple health program to match best practices for mental health assessment and diagnosis for infants and children from birth through five years of age. The analysis must include cost estimates from the authority and the actuaries responsible for establishing medicaid managed care rates on the annual impact associated with policy changes in assessment and diagnosis of infants and children from birth through age five that at a minimum: (a) Allow reimbursement for three to five sessions for intake and assessment; (b) allow reimbursement for assessments in home or community settings, including reimbursement for clinician travel; and (c) require clinician use of the diagnostic classification of mental health and developmental disorders of infancy and early childhood. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the results of the analysis and cost estimates by December 1, 2020.

(((63)))(62) As an element of contractual network adequacy requirements and reporting, the authority shall direct managed care organizations to make all reasonable efforts to develop or maintain contracts with provider networks that leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to enhance effectiveness of medicaid-funded integrated care services. These networks must promote medicaid clients' access to a system of services that addresses additional social support services and social determinants of health as defined in RCW 43.20.025 in a manner that is integrated with the delivery of behavioral health and medical treatment services.

(((64)))(63) $864,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,788,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5720 (involuntary treatment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((65)))(64) $200,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6191 (adverse childhood experience). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((66)))(65) Within existing resources, the authority shall implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6259 (Indian behavioral health sys).

(((67)))(66) $1,260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $840,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase rates to parent-child assistance program providers in an effort to stabilize the workforce and increase training and evaluation.

(((68)))(67) $2,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to ensure a smooth transition to integrated managed care for behavioral health regions and to maintain the existing level of regional behavioral health crisis and diversion programs, and other required behavioral health administrative service organization services. These amounts must be used to support the regions transitioning to full integration of physical and behavioral health care beginning January 1, 2020. These amounts must be distributed proportionate to the population of each regional area covered. The maximum amount allowed per region is $2,494 per one thousand residents. These amounts must be used to provide a reserve for nonmedicaid services in the region and to stabilize the new crisis services system.

(((70)))(68) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $15,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to develop a value-based case rate payment model for comprehensive community behavioral health services. It is the intent of the legislature to strengthen the community behavioral health system in order to promote recovery and whole person care, avoid unnecessary institutionalization and ensure access to care in the least restrictive setting possible, and incentivize value-based alternative payment models. Therefore, the authority in collaboration with the Washington council for behavioral health must convene a work group to develop a case rate payment model for comprehensive community behavioral health services. The authority must submit a report to the legislature by October 31, 2020. The report must: (a) Identify a comprehensive package of services to be provided by community behavioral health agencies that are licensed and certified by the department of health as defined in RCW 71.24.025; (b) describe the methodology used to develop an actuarially sound case rate model for this comprehensive package of services, and propose a medicaid case rate or range of rates; and (c) identify key quality performance metrics focused on health and recovery as well as quality incentive payment mechanisms that reinforce value over volume.

(((71)))(69) $500,000 of the problem gambling account—state appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract for a problem gambling adult prevalence study. The prevalence study must review both statewide and regional results about beliefs and attitudes toward gambling, gambling behavior and preferences, and awareness of treatment services. The study should also estimate the level of risk for problem gambling and examine correlations with broader behavioral and mental health measures. The health care authority shall submit results of the prevalence study to the problem gambling task force and the legislature by ((June 30, 2021))June 30, 2022.

(((72)))(70) $4,500,000 of the criminal justice treatment account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the authority to provide funding for the setting up of new therapeutic courts for cities or counties or for the expansion of services being provided to an already existing therapeutic court that engages in evidence-based practices, to include medication assisted treatment in jail settings pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. Funding provided under this subsection shall not supplant existing funds utilized for this purpose.

(((73)))(71) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the authority to contract with a statewide mental health nonprofit serving consumers and families that provides free community and school-based mental health education and support programs. Funding shall be used to provide access to programs tailored to peers living with mental illness, family members of people with mental illness, and the community.

(((74)))(72) In establishing, re-basing, enhancing, or otherwise updating medicaid rates for behavioral health services, the authority and contracted actuaries shall use a transparent process that provides an opportunity for medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and behavioral health provider agencies, and their representatives, to review and provide data and feedback on proposed rate changes within their region or regions of service operation. The authority and contracted actuaries shall consider the information gained from this process and make adjustments allowable under federal law when appropriate.

(((75)))(73) The authority shall seek input from representatives of the managed care organizations (MCOs), licensed community behavioral health agencies, and behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop the format of a report which addresses revenues and expenditures for the community behavioral health programs. The report shall include, but not be limited to (i) revenues and expenditures for community behavioral health programs, including medicaid and nonmedicaid funding; (ii) access to services, service denials, and utilization by state plan modality; (iii) claims denials and record of timely payment to providers; (iv) client demographics; and (v) social and recovery measures and managed care organization performance measures. The authority shall submit the report for the preceding calendar year to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on or before July 1st of each year.

(((76)))(74) $1,801,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the authority to implement two pilot programs for intensive outpatient services and partial hospitalization services for certain children and adolescents.

(a) The effective date of the pilot sites is January 1, 2021.

(b) The two pilots must be contracted with a hospital that provides psychiatric inpatient services to children and adolescents in a city with the largest population east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and a hospital that provides psychiatric inpatient services to children and adolescents in a city with the largest population west of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(c) The authority must establish minimum standards, eligibility criteria, authorization and utilization review processes, and payment methodologies for the pilot programs in contract.

(d) Eligibility for the pilot sites is limited pursuant to the following:

(i) Children and adolescents discharged from an inpatient hospital treatment program who require the level of services offered by the pilot programs in lieu of continued inpatient treatment;

(ii) Children and adolescents who require the level of services offered by the pilot programs in order to avoid inpatient hospitalization; and

(iii) Services may not be offered if there are less costly alternative community based services that can effectively meet the needs of an individual referred to the program.

(((f)))(e) The authority must collect data on the pilot sites and work with the actuaries responsible for establishing managed care rates for medicaid enrollees to develop and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. A preliminary report must be submitted by December 1, 2021, and a final report must be submitted by December 1, 2022. The reports must include the following information:

(i) A narrative description of the services provided at each pilot site and identification of any specific gaps the sites were able to fill in the current continuum of care;

(ii) Clinical outcomes and estimated reductions in psychiatric inpatient costs associated with each of the pilot sites;

(iii) Recommendations for whether either or both of the pilot models should be expanded statewide; whether modifications should be made to the models to better address gaps in the continuum identified through the pilot sites, and whether statewide implementation should be achieved through a state plan amendment or some other mechanism for leveraging federal medicaid match; and

(iv) Actuarial projections on the statewide need for services related to the pilot sites and estimated costs of adding each of the services to the medicaid behavioral health benefit for children and adolescents and adults.

(75) $7,071,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for behavioral health personal care funding for individuals with exceptional care needs or who need additional supports in long term care settings through the program managed by the department of social and health services.

Sec. 1115. 2020 c 357 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,630,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($3,007,000))

$2,978,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,614,000))

$2,572,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$190,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($8,441,000))

$8,370,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $103,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5602 (reproductive health care).

(2) $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6034 (pregnancy discrim. complaints). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1116. 2020 c 357 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,437,000))

$24,152,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,438,000))

$24,153,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($48,885,000))

$48,315,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $114,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $114,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2409 (industrial insur./employers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1117. 2020 c 357 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$27,447,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($31,639,000))

$29,599,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,339,000))

$7,328,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$682,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,167,000

24/7 Sobriety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$460,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($76,214,000))

$74,163,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.

(2) $2,768,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,789,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for seventy-five percent of the costs of providing eleven additional statewide basic law enforcement trainings in each fiscal year. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. At least three classes must be held in Spokane each year.

(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.

(4) $1,179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for expenditure into the nonappropriated Washington internet crimes against children account for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.

(5) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the mental health field response team program administered by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The association must distribute $3,000,000 in grants to the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The association must submit an annual report to the Governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year of the biennium. The report shall include best practice recommendations on law enforcement and behavioral health field response and include outcome measures on all grants awarded.

(6) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $449,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.

(7) $534,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to update and expand the medicolegal forensic investigation training currently provided to coroners and medical examiners from eighty hours to two-hundred forty hours to meet the recommendations of the national commission on forensic science for certification and accreditation. Funding is contingent on the death investigation account receiving three dollars of the five dollar increase in vital records fees from the passage of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5332 (vital statistics).

(8) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $10,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for an increase in vendor rates on the daily meals provided to basic law enforcement academy recruits during their training.

(9) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1767 (alternatives to arrest/jail).

(10) $397,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $397,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a vendor rate increase for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(11) (($2,000,000))$500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to administer the sexual assault kit initiative project under RCW 36.28A.430, to assist multidisciplinary community response teams seeking resolutions to cases tied to previously unsubmitted sexual assault kits, and to provide support to survivors of sexual assault offenses. The commission must report to the governor and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations by June 30, 2021, on the number of sexual assault kits that have been tested, the number of kits remaining to be tested, the number of sexual assault cases that had hits to other crimes, the number of cases that have been reinvestigated, the number of those cases that were reinvestigated using state funding under this appropriation, and the local jurisdictions that were a recipient of a grant under the sexual assault kit initiative project.

(12) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to work with local law enforcement agencies and the Washington fire chiefs association to provide helmets to persons contacted by local law enforcement or an official of a local fire department for not wearing a helmet while riding a skateboard or bicycle in order to reduce traumatic brain injuries throughout the state. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall work in conjunction with the Washington fire chiefs association in administering the helmet distribution program.

(13) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2318 (criminal investigatory practices). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(14) $316,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for House Bill No. 2926 (critical stress management programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(15) $830,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $155,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for Second Substitute House Bill No. 2499 (correctional officer certification). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(16) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to develop and finalize the curriculum for the de-escalation law enforcement training as required under Initiative 940, the law enforcement training and community safety act.

Sec. 1118. 2020 c 357 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$14,426,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($26,698,000))

$26,964,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,876,000

Asbestos Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($590,000))

$587,000

Electrical License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($58,124,000))

$58,038,000

Farm Labor Contractor Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$28,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,039,000))

$1,036,000

Construction Registration Inspection Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($25,453,000))

$25,187,000

Public Works Administration Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,001,000))

$10,921,000

Manufactured Home Installation Training Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($412,000))

$403,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,434,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($396,164,000))

$361,942,000

Accident Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,439,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($399,802,000))

$365,341,000

Medical Aid Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,650,000

Plumbing Certificate Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,401,000))

$3,384,000

Pressure Systems Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,672,000))

$4,620,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($975,209,000))

$906,276,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($40,988,000))$9,002,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and (($40,986,000))$9,002,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the labor and industries workers' compensation information system replacement project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(2) $250,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation and $250,000 of the accident account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must issue an initial report to the legislature, by June 30, 2020, assessing the physical capacity of workers in the context of the industry's economic environment and ascertain usable support tools for employers and workers to decrease risk of injury. After the initial report, the department must produce annual progress reports, beginning in 2021 through the year 2022 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress reports must be submitted to the legislature by December 1st of each year such reports are due.

(3) $1,700,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $300,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for a contract with a permanently registered Washington sector intermediary to provide supplemental instruction for information technology apprentices. Funds spent for this purpose must be matched by an equal amount of funding from the information technology industry members, except small and mid-sized employers. Up to $1,000,000 may be spent to provide supplemental instruction for apprentices at small and mid-sized businesses. "Small and mid-sized businesses" means those that have fewer than one hundred employees or have less than five percent annual net profitability. The sector intermediary will collaborate with the state board for community and technical colleges to integrate and offer related supplemental instruction through one or more Washington state community or technical colleges by the 2020-21 academic year.

(4) $1,360,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $240,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries to establish a health care apprenticeship program.

(5) $273,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $273,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment research for prevention program to conduct research to prevent the types of work-related injuries that require immediate hospitalization. The department will develop and maintain a tracking system to identify and respond to all immediate in-patient hospitalizations and will examine incidents in defined high-priority areas, as determined from historical data and public priorities. The research must identify and characterize hazardous situations and contributing factors using epidemiological, safety-engineering, and human factors/ergonomics methods. The research must also identify common factors in certain types of workplace injuries that lead to hospitalization. The department must submit an initial report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by August 30, 2020, and annually thereafter, summarizing work-related immediate hospitalizations and prevention opportunities, actions that employers and workers can take to make workplaces safer, and ways to avoid severe injuries.

(6) $666,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $243,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5175 (firefighter safety).

(7) $2,257,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5035 (prevailing wage laws). Of this amount, $464,100 is provided to incorporate information technology changes to the complaint activity tracking system, public works suite, accounts receivable collections, and the pay accounts receivable collections systems, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(8) $37,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $33,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(9) $52,000 of the accident account—state appropriation is provided solely for the complaint activity tracking system adjustment project, which will add functionality related to conducting company-wide wage investigations. This funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(10) $850,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $850,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for issuing and managing contracts with customer-trusted groups to develop and deliver information to small businesses and their workers about workplace rights, regulations and services administered by the agency.

(11) $5,721,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($504,000))$854,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for increasing rates for medical and health care service providers treating persons in the crime victim compensation program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided ((solely)) for the crime victims compensation program to pay for medical exams related to victims of suspected child abuse. No later than September 30, 2020, the department shall report to the legislature the following information, for each fiscal year from fiscal year 2016 through fiscal year 2020:

(a) The type of claims received by victims of suspected child abuse;

(b) The total number of claims received by victims of suspected child abuse;

(c) The type of claims paid to victims of suspected child abuse;

(d) The total number of claims paid to victims of suspected child abuse; and

(e) The total amounts of claims paid to victims of suspected child abuse.

(12) $744,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $744,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for customer service staffing at field offices.

(13) $3,432,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $606,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the division of occupational safety and health to add workplace safety and health consultants, inspectors, and investigators.

(14) $788,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $140,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for apprenticeship staffing to respond to inquiries and process registrations.

(15) $2,608,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $3,541,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for claims management staffing to reduce caseloads.

(16) $1,072,000 of the public works administration account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1295 (public works contracting).

(17) $695,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $124,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1817 (high hazard facilities).

(18) $67,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $66,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1909 (industrial ins. claim records).

(19) $273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy).

(20) $683,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $683,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2409 (industrial insur./employers). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $176,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $176,000 medical aid account—state appropriation are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(21) $1,507,000 of the construction registration inspection account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional staff to conduct and facilitate additional elevator inspections.

(22) $320,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $75,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 296, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1155).

(23) $1,393,000 of the plumbing certificate account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6170 (plumbing registration and licenses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(24) $150,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $26,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6421 (farm internship program extension). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(25) (($625,000))$276,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and (($625,000))$543,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6440 (workers' compensation medical exams). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(26) $255,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $45,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for two additional crane inspectors to work in King county.

(27) $280,000 of the accident account—state appropriation and $50,000 of the medical aid account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6473 (asbestos building materials). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(28) $918,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6181 (crime victim compensation program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) The department shall report to the legislature no later than July 31, 2021, the following information for fiscal year 2021 regarding the benefits available under Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6181:

(a) The number of claims received by month;

(b) The number of claims rejected by month;

(c) The number and amounts of claims paid by month; and

(d) The average processing time for claims.

(29) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in Seattle whose primary mission is to empower vulnerable workers in low-wage industries and from marginalized communities to provide peer training to similar workers in order to prevent sexual harassment and assault of workers in low-wage industries.

(30)(a) $15,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in aerospace and aerospace related supply chain industries by: Expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and aerospace-related programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.

(b) Grants awarded under this section may be used for:

(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;

(ii) New training space and lab locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations;

(iii) Curriculum development and instructor training for industry experts;

(iv) Tuition assistance for degrees in engineering and high-demand degrees that support the aerospace industry; and

(v) Funding to increase capacity and availability of child care options for shift work schedules.

(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, aerospace-related degree programs, or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.

(31) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to provide staff support to the aerospace workforce council created in ((House Bill No. 2945 (aerospace business and occupation taxes and world trade compliance) or)) Senate Bill No. 6690 (aerospace business and occupation taxes and world trade compliance). ((If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1119. 2020 c 357 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. By December 31, 2020, the department must: (i) Develop and implement a sustainable staffing model for the institutional services program to keep expenditures commensurate with the program revenue; and (ii) report to the legislature regarding its expenditures. In response to any request by the department for general fund—state appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.

(2) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,369,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($4,173,000))

$4,017,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$185,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($7,737,000))

$7,581,000

(3) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$6,602,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($7,029,000))

$6,912,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,253,000))

$5,224,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,324,000))

$5,285,000

Veteran Estate Management Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($708,000))

$698,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($444,000))

$435,000

Veterans Stewardship Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Veterans Innovation Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($25,760,000))

$25,556,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $1,338,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $120,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely for the expansion of the transitional housing program at the Washington soldiers home.

(b) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $100,000 of the veterans innovation account—state appropriation are provided solely for veterans innovation program grants.

(c) $300,000 of the veterans stewardship nonappropriated account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's traumatic brain injury program.

(d) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1448 (veterans service officers).

(e)(i) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to develop a statewide plan to reduce suicide among service members, veterans, and their families. In developing the plan, the department shall:

(A) Collaborate with government and nongovernment agencies and organizations to establish promising best practices for suicide awareness and prevention materials, training, and outreach programs targeted to service members, veterans, and their families;

(B) Cultivate peer-led organizations serving veterans in transition and recovery;

(C) Create statewide suicide awareness and prevention training programs with content specific to service members, veterans, and their families; and

(D) Provide safer homes materials and distribute safe firearms storage devices, to the Washington national guard, the Washington state patrol, allied veteran groups, and other organizations serving or employing veterans, following the recommendations of the suicide-safer homes task force.

(ii) The department must report to the legislature regarding the development of the plan no later than December 1, 2020.

(f) $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5900 (LGBTQ coordinator/veterans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g) $128,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6626 (military spouse liaison). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$13,155,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($14,453,000))

$14,172,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($101,679,000))

$113,956,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,744,000))

$20,458,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,464,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($151,495,000))

$163,205,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The amounts provided in this subsection include a general fund—state backfill for a revenue shortfall at the Washington soldiers home in Orting and the Walla Walla veterans home.

(b) If the department receives additional unanticipated federal resources at any point during the remainder of the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, an equal amount of general fund—state must be placed in unallotted status so as not to exceed the total appropriation level specified in this subsection. The department may submit as part of the policy level budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 a request to maintain the general fund—state resources that were unallotted as required by this subsection.

(5) CEMETERY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$100,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$100,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$688,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$888,000

Sec. 1120. 2020 c 357 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$79,582,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($85,728,000))

$82,886,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($579,457,000))

$579,244,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($192,631,000))

$213,695,000

Hospital Data Collection Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$362,000

Health Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($147,610,000))

$148,885,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$633,000

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,091,000))

$10,089,000

Safe Drinking Water Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,057,000))

$6,045,000

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($17,000,000))

$16,980,000

Waterworks Operator Certification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,990,000))

$1,988,000

Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,628,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($183,000))

$181,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,694,000))

$1,691,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,468,000

Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,374,000))

$697,000

Medical Test Site Licensure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,233,000))

$3,316,000

Secure Drug Take-Back Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,008,000

Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,237,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$10,786,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
(($10,616,000))

$10,615,000

Public Health Supplemental Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,237,000))

$5,234,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,816,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($362,000))

$361,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,169,837,000))

$1,188,481,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(2) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.

(3) In accordance with RCW 43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.20B.110 and 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.

(5) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090, 71.24.035, 43.20B.110, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.

(6) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the coalition's plan for projects affecting the coalition organizations. The report must include any information technology projects impacting coalition organizations and, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, provide: (a) The status of any information technology projects currently being developed or implemented that affect the coalition; (b) funding needs of these current and future information technology projects; and (c) next steps for the coalition's information technology projects. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(7)(a) $285,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the governor's interagency coordinating council on health disparities to establish a task force to develop a proposal for the creation of an office of equity. The purpose of the office of equity is to promote access to equitable opportunities and resources that reduce disparities, including racial and ethnic disparities, and improve outcomes statewide across all sectors of government. The council must provide staff support and coordinate community and stakeholder outreach for the task force.

(b) The task force shall include:

(i) The chair of the interagency coordinating council on health disparities, or the chair's designee, who shall serve as the chair of the task force;

(ii) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(iii) Two members from the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(iv) A representative from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;

(v) A representative from the office of financial management's diversity, equity, and inclusion council, appointed by the governor;

(vi) A representative from the office of minority and women's business enterprises, appointed by the director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises;

(vii) A representative from each ethnic commission, appointed by the director of each respective commission;

(viii) A representative from the women's commission, appointed by the director of the commission;

(ix) A representative from the human rights commission, appointed by the director of the commission;

(x) The director of the governor's office of Indian affairs, or the director's designee;

(xi) A member of the disability community, appointed by the chair of the governor's committee on disability issues and employment; and

(xii) A member of the lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer community, appointed by the office of the governor.

(c) The task force must submit a preliminary report to the governor and legislature by December 15, 2019. The task force must submit a final proposal to the governor and the legislature by July 1, 2020. The final proposal must include the following recommendations:

(i) A mission statement and vision statement for the office;

(ii) A definition of "equity," which must be used by the office to guide its work;

(iii) The organizational structure of the office, which must include a community liaison for the office;

(iv) A plan to engage executive level management from all agencies;

(v) Mechanisms for facilitating state policy and systems change to promote equity, promoting community outreach and engagement, and establishing standards for the collection, analysis, and reporting of disaggregated data regarding race and ethnicity;

(vi) Mechanisms for accountability to ensure that performance measures around equity are met across all agencies, including recommendations on audits of agencies and other accountability tools as deemed appropriate; and

(vii) A budget proposal including estimates for costs and staffing.

(d) Nonlegislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative members must be reimbursed for expenses incurred in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.

(8) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with a community-based nonprofit organization located in Yakima valley to develop a Spanish-language public radio media campaign aimed at preventing opioid use disorders through education outreach programs. The goal of the radio media campaign is reaching underserved populations, who may have limited literacy and who may experience cultural and informational isolation, to address prevention, education, and treatment for opioid users or those at risk for opioid use. The nonprofit organization must coordinate with stakeholders who are engaged in promoting healthy and educated choices about drug use and abuse to host four workshops and two conferences that present the latest research and best practices. The department, in coordination with the nonprofit, must provide a preliminary report to the legislature no later than December 31, 2020. A final report must be submitted to the legislature no later than June 30, 2021. Both reports must include: (a) A description of the outreach programs and their implementation; (b) a description of the workshops and conferences held; (c) the number of individuals who participated in or received services in relation to the outreach programs; and (d) any relevant demographic data regarding those individuals.

(9)(a) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the nursing care quality assurance commission to continue the work group on nurses in long-term care settings.

(b) The work group must base its work on the assessment of long-term care workforce needs required by chapter 299, Laws of 2018, and included in the long-term care workforce development report to the governor and the legislature submitted in December 2018. The commission shall maintain existing membership of the work group, may add additional stakeholder representation, and may create such technical advisory committees as may be necessary to accomplish its purposes.

(c) Work group priorities for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium include:

(i) Identifying data sources necessary to ensure workers are achieving timely training, testing, and certification;

(ii) Working with regional workforce development councils to project worker shortages and on-going demands;

(iii) Establishing revised nursing assistant training that aligns directly with the learning outcomes of the competency-based common curriculum, and improves access, reduces costs, increases consistency across evaluators, increases pass rates, and provides support for languages other than English;

(iv) Recommending requirements to improve skilled nursing facility staffing models and address deficiencies in resident care; and

(v) Creating a competency-based common curriculum for nursing assistant training that includes knowledge and skills relevant to current nursing assistant practices; integrated specialty training on mental health, developmental disabilities, and dementia; and removing or revising outdated content. The curriculum must not unnecessarily add additional training hours, and must meet all applicable federal and state laws. The curriculum must be designed with seamless progression from or toward any point on the educational continuum.

(d) The commission must provide an interim report on the activities of the work group and its findings and recommendations for statutory and regulatory changes to the governor and legislature by November 15, 2019, and a final report to the governor and legislature by November 15, 2020.

(10) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5425 (maternal mortality reviews).

(11) $399,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5332 (vital statistics).

(12) $52,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $11,000 of the general fund—local appropriation, and $107,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5380 (opioid use disorder).

(13) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $32,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(14) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5550 (pesticide application safety).

(15) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5846 (international medical graduates).

(16) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than five hundred twenty-five dollars annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.

(17)(a) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the King county local health jurisdiction, as part of the foundational public health services, to conduct a study on the population health impact of the SeaTac airport communities.

(b) By December 1, 2020, the King county local health jurisdiction shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that must include:

(i) An analysis of existing data sources and an oversample of the best start for kids child health survey to produce airport community health profiles within a one mile, five mile, and ten mile radius of the airport;

(ii) A comprehensive literature review concerning the community health effects of airport operations, including a strength of evidence analysis;

(iii) The findings of the University of Washington school of public health study on ultrafine particulate matter at the airport and surrounding areas; and

(iv) Any recommendations to address health issues related to the impact of the airport on the community.

(18) $1,000,000 of the youth tobacco and vapor products prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely, as part of foundational public health services, for the department to support local health jurisdictions to provide youth tobacco and vapor prevention programs, including the necessary outreach and education for Engrossed House Bill No. 1074 (tobacco and vapor/age).

(19) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy).

(20) The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019, and December 1, 2020, if it anticipates that the amounts raised by ambulatory surgical facility licensing fees will not be sufficient to defray the cost of regulating ambulatory surgical facilities. The report shall identify the amount of state general fund money necessary to compensate for the insufficiency.

(21) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to create a statewide data system to provide early intervention services for all children appropriately screened for developmental delays, to track developmental screenings and delays identified in children, and to assist with care coordination and early intervention; and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(22) $420,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for a work group to develop policy and practice recommendations to increase access to clinical training and supervised practice for the behavioral health workforce. The work group shall include representatives from the department, the workforce training and education coordinating board, and other appropriate stakeholders. The recommendations of the work group must address the following potential barriers: (a) reimbursement and incentives for supervision of interns and trainees; (b) supervision requirements; (c) competency-based training; (d) licensing reciprocity or the feasibility of an interstate licensing compact, or both; and (e) background checks, including barriers to work related to an applicant's criminal history or substance use disorder. The board must convene and facilitate the work group, and recommendations may be presented in two phases. Recommendations presented in the first phase must be provided by December 1, 2019. Recommendations presented in the second phase must be provided by December 1, 2020.

(23) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington poison center. This funding is provided in addition to funding provided pursuant to RCW 69.50.540.

(24) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the development of a palliative care road map to provide information and guidance to providers, patients, families, and caregivers of individuals living with a serious or life-threatening illness. The department must work in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, including but not limited to, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and hospital-based, outpatient, and community-based palliative care providers. The department must complete the document and make hard copies available for distribution no later than September 30, 2020.

(25) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided to continue the collaboration between local public health, accountable communities of health, and health care providers to reduce potentially preventable hospitalizations in Pierce county. This collaboration will build from year two planning to align care coordination efforts across health care systems and support the accountable communities of health initiatives, including innovative, collaborative models of care. Strategies include the following, to reduce costly hospitalizations: (a) Analyze heart failure data to identify sub populations and risk factors and use this data to determine targeted interventions; (b) support provider and clinic implementation of screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment through immunizations and ensure other areas of the county and state can duplicate the strategies; and (c) provide resources to achieve results and support collaboration across local health care systems and providers.

(26) $55,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1768 (substance use disorder professionals).

(27) $14,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1865 (acupuncture and Eastern medicine).

(28)(a) $257,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $304,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the suicide-safer homes task force defined in RCW 43.70.445 to:

(i) Expand support to industries, professions, and workplaces impacted by high rates of suicide, develop and provide online resources to disseminate best practices in workplace mental health and suicide prevention, and provide trainings for industries with the highest suicide rates and who are unable to pay for trainings;

(ii) Conduct a workplace suicide summit;

(iii) Deliver the task force's SAFER intervention and firearms and medication locking devices in partnership with nongovernment organizations in twelve rural communities across Washington; and

(iv) Develop and distribute a tool kit for suicide prevention and curriculum for firearms safety instructors for their inclusion in firearms safety courses.

(b) The task force shall distribute to all firearms dealers in the state suicide awareness and prevention materials tailored to firearms owners that are developed. Firearms dealers are strongly encouraged to post on the premises and make available to firearms purchasers and transferees the suicide awareness and prevention materials.

(c) The task force shall provide a report to the legislature regarding the directives of this subsection, and the report shall be included in the task force's final report to the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(29) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $8,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the pharmacy quality assurance commission to:

(a) Distribute or make available through electronic means to all licensed pharmacies suicide awareness and prevention materials developed by the suicide-safer homes task force, and each licensed pharmacy shall, when deemed appropriate through patient evaluation, make available to patients at the point of care the suicide awareness and prevention materials distributed by the commission; and

(b) Survey each pharmacist licensed under this chapter on methods to bridge the gap between practice and suicide awareness and prevention training, including identifying barriers that exist in putting the training into practice. The commission shall consult with the suicide-safer homes task force in developing the survey. The commission may distribute the survey as part of each pharmacist's license renewal. The commission shall compile and analyze the survey data and report the results to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2020.

(30) $1,310,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington medical commission for clinical health care investigators.

(31) $3,210,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for the nursing care quality assurance commission to address increased complaints.

(32) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.12.470, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 71.12.485.

(33) $18,000,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide core medical services, case management, and support services for individuals living with human immunodeficiency virus.

(34) $1,606,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for staff, equipment, testing supplies, and materials necessary to add Pompe disease and MPS-I to the mandatory newborn screening panel. The department is authorized to increase the newborn screening fee by $10.50.

(35) $332,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for testing supplies necessary to perform x-linked adrenoleukodystrophy newborn screening panel testing. The department is authorized to increase the newborn screening fee by $1.90.

(36) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to conduct formative research and development regarding dementia and the value and importance of early detection, diagnosis, and planning for the public, including racial and ethnic groups who are at increased risk. Qualified department staff or contracted experts must: (a) Investigate existing evidence-based messages and public awareness campaign strategies; and (b) develop, place, and evaluate messages through a short-term digital awareness campaign in at least two, but no more than four, targeted areas of the state.

(37) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization that provides support and education for adults, children, and families impacted by cancer. The nonprofit must provide programs and services that include, but are not limited to, adult support groups, camps for children impacted by cancer, education programs for teens to reduce future risk of cancer, and emotional and social support to families dealing with cancer.

(38) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the state producing generic prescription drugs, with a priority on insulin. By December 1, 2019, the department shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the legislature.

(39) $2,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1587 (increasing access to fruits and vegetables).

(40) The department must submit an application for an extension or renewal of its current grant pursuant to the federal food insecurity incentives program. If an extension or renewal of the current grant is not permitted, the department must apply for a new grant under the same program, which was reauthorized in December 2018.

(41) $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $22,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 1638 (vaccine preventable diseases).

(42) $207,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 69, Laws of 2019 (SHB 1198) (sexual misconduct notification).

(43) $203,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $66,000 of the general fund—local appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1394 (behavioral health facilities).

(44) $36,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1554 (dental hygienists).

(45) $189,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1094 (medical marijuana renewals).

(46) $200,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 68, Laws of 2019 (HB 1177) (dental laboratory registry).

(47) $88,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for an online tutorial and link to web-based, continuing education funded by the centers for disease control for training for the primary care health workforce regarding the protocols for perinatal monitoring, birth-dose immunization, early diagnosis, linkage to care, and treatment for persons diagnosed with chronic hepatitis B or hepatitis using the project ECHO telehealth model operated by the University of Washington. Training shall focus on increased provider proficiency and increased number of trained providers in areas with high rates of reported cases of hepatitis B or hepatitis, including regions with high incidence of drug use or upward trend of children who have not received hepatitis B virus vaccinations according to centers for disease control recommendations. All digital and hardcopy training, educational, and outreach materials for this program must be culturally relevant and linguistically diverse.

(48) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to the department of health for a task force established to recommend strategies for incorporating environmental justice principles into how state agencies discharge their responsibilities.

(a) The membership of the task force established under this section is as follows:

(i) The director of the department of commerce, or the director's designee;

(ii) The director of the department of ecology, or the director's designee;

(iii) The executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, or the executive director's designee;

(iv) The secretary of the department of transportation, or the secretary's designee;

(v) The secretary of the department of health, or the secretary's designee;

(vi) The chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, or the chair's designee;

(vii) The chair of the governor's interagency council on health disparities, or the chair's designee;

(viii) The commissioner of public lands, or the commissioner's designee;

(ix) A member from an organization representing statewide environmental justice issues, appointed by the governor;

(x) Three members from community-based organizations, appointed by the cochairs specified under (b) of this subsection, the nominations of which are based upon maintaining a balanced and diverse distribution, of representation from census tracts that are ranked at an eight or higher on the cumulative impact analysis and of ethnic, geographic, gender, sexual orientation, age, socioeconomic status, and occupational representation, where practicable;

(xi) A tribal leader, invited by the governor;

(xii) One member from an association representing business interests, appointed by the governor;

(xiii) One member from a union or other organized labor association representing worker interests, appointed by the governor;

(xiv) The director of the department of agriculture, or the director's designee; and

(xv) One member from an organization representing statewide agricultural interests, appointed by the governor.

(b) The representative of statewide environmental justice interests, and the chair of the governor's interagency council on health disparities, or the chair's designee, must cochair the task force.

(c) The governor's interagency council on health disparities shall provide staff support to the task force. The interagency council may work with other agencies, departments, or offices as necessary to provide staff support to the task force.

(d) The task force must submit a final report of its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by October 31, 2020, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036. The goal of the final report is to provide guidance to agencies, the legislature, and the governor, and at a minimum must include the following:

(i) Guidance for state agencies regarding how to use a cumulative impact analysis tool developed by the department of health. Guidance must cover how agencies identify highly impacted communities and must be based on best practices and current demographic data;

(ii) Best practices for increasing public participation and engagement by providing meaningful opportunities for involvement for all people, taking into account barriers to participation that may arise due to race, color, ethnicity, religion, income, or education level;

(iii) Recommendations for establishing measurable goals for reducing environmental health disparities for each community in Washington state and ways in which state agencies may focus their work towards meeting those goals;

(iv) Model policies for prioritizing highly impacted communities and vulnerable populations for the purpose of reducing environmental health disparities and advancing a healthy environment for all residents.

(e) If time and resources permit, the task force may also include in its final report:

(i) Recommendations for creating and implementing equity analysis into all significant planning, programmatic and policy decision making, and investments. The equity analysis methods may include a process for describing potential risks to, benefits to, and opportunities for highly impacted communities and vulnerable populations;

(ii) Best practices and needed resources for cataloging and cross-referencing current research and data collection for programs within all state agencies relating to the health and environment of people of all races, cultures, and income levels, including minority populations and low-income populations of the state.

(f) Members of the task force who are not state employees must be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and are entitled to reimbursement individually for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the task force in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The expenses of the task force must be paid by the governor's interagency council on health disparities.

(g) The task force must hold four regional meetings to seek input from, present their work plan and proposals to, and receive feedback from communities throughout the state. The following locations must be considered for these meetings: Northwest Washington, central Puget Sound region, south Puget Sound region, southwest Washington, central Washington, and eastern Washington.

(h) Reports submitted under this section must be available for public inspection and copying through the governor's interagency council on health disparities and must be posted on its web site.

(49) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for testing of lead in public schools. The department must determine which school districts have the highest priority and test those districts first. The department and the school districts for which tests are conducted must provide to parents, educators, school staff, and the public clear communications regarding the test results, the consequences of even low levels of exposure or ingestion, such as cognitive deficits, reduction in IQ, and neurological development, and the information that no level of lead in drinking water is safe. The communications must include a comparison of the results to the recommendation of the American academy of pediatrics (August 2017) and the national toxicology program of the national institutes of health and the center for disease control, regardless of whether the level exceeds the standard for action pursuant to the federal lead and copper rule. Communications regarding test results where levels exceed the level recommended by the American academy of pediatricians must be accompanied by examples of actions districts may take to prevent exposure, including automated flushing of water fountains and sinks, and installation of certified water filters or bottle filling stations.

(50) $68,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2378 (physician assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(51) $88,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2411 (suicide prevention/providers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(52) $724,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2426 (psychiatric patient safety). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(53) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2731 (student head injury reports). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(54) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2755 (air ambulance cost transp.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((57)))(55) $1,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for farmers market and grocery store basic food incentives for participants in the supplemental nutrition assistance program.

(((60)))(56) Within amounts provided in this section, the department shall:

(a) Keep a monthly record of the wait times for processing applications for certification as an emergency medical technician, starting with the time the application is received until the certification is approved or denied. The record shall include the number of applications processed and the median and average wait times per month. The department shall provide a summary of the monthly wait times to the legislature no later than December 1, 2020.

(b) Conduct a review of the levels of emergency medicine competency applicable to military personnel and determine the equivalency of such levels to the standards required by the department for certification as an emergency medical technician in Washington state. The department shall report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(((62)))(57) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of:

(a) Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6309 (WIC fruit & veg. benefit);

(b) Substitute Senate Bill No. 6086 (opioid use/medications);

(c) Substitute Senate Bill No. 6526 (prescription drug reuse); and

(d) ((Senate Bill No. 6038 (acupuncture and eastern med.); and

(e))) Substitute Senate Bill No. 6663 (eating disorders & diabetes).

(((64)))(58) $19,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6143 (podiatric medical board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((65)))(59) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6570 (law enforce. mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((66)))(60) $83,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6551 (international medical grads). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((67)))(61) $20,000 of the health professions account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6641 (sex offender treatment avail). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((69)))(62) $1,223,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to improve behavioral health and suicide prevention through any of the following: Implementation of the recommendations of the agricultural industry task force; providing support to tribes in developing and implementing culturally appropriate, evidence-based programs and tribal best practices to support youth and adults; developing continuing education for mental health professionals and partnering with agencies and organizations serving high-risk populations; and developing and implementing postvention aftercare programs, developing a community health worker training module, and creating a safer homes community campaign on suicide prevention.

(((70)))(63) Within its existing resources, the department shall work with a stakeholder group to review current statutes, certification of practices in other states, and qualification standards regarding colon hydrotherapy and produce recommendations for implementation of a certification program for colon hydrotherapists in the state of Washington. The department must submit recommendations to the legislature no later than October 20, 2020.

(((71)))(64) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $360,000 of the general fund—local appropriation is provided solely for staff, equipment, testing supplies, and materials necessary to add spinal muscular atrophy to the mandatory newborn screening panel. The department is authorized to increase the newborn screening fee by $4.30 for this purpose. The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020, if it anticipates that the amounts raised by the screening fee will not be sufficient to cover the costs of administering the program. The report shall identify the amount of any fee increase necessary to cover such costs.

(((72)))(65) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to cover increased costs for the child profile health promotion notification system. The department shall review its processes for efficiencies and possible technological advances to reduce costs in future biennia. The department should review at least the following: (a) Use of technology; (b) frequency of communication; (c) available alternative funding sources; and (d) use of the system for other public awareness campaigns that might create new funding streams. The department shall report its findings and any recommendations to the legislature by December 15, 2020.

(((73)))(66) Sufficient funding is provided in this section to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2576 (private detention facilities).

(67) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for one-time grants to family planning clinics that are at risk of imminent closure, did not receive a paycheck protection program loan, and are ineligible for funding through the coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security (CARES) act or the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act of 2021 (CRRSA).

Sec. 1121. 2020 c 357 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2020))2021, after approval by the director of financial management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2020))2021 between programs. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. To the extent that transfers under this section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures made as a response to the COVID-19 pandemic, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$68,583,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($74,332,000))

$74,756,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$7,616,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($150,931,000))

$151,355,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (a) Within the funds appropriated in the subsection the department shall review and update the necessary business requirements for implementation of a comprehensive electronic health records system. The department will utilize its feasibility study from 2013 and the health informatics roadmap completed in 2017 to update its business requirements and complete a request for information process by May 31, 2021. The department shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature outlining the system specifications and a cost model for implementation no later than June 30, 2021. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.

(b) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1517 (domestic violence).

(c)(i) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must revise its agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(A) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(B) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(I) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(II) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(III) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(ii) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the department or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(iii) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract. (d) The appropriations in this subsection include sufficient funding for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5021 (DOC/interest arbitration).

(e) $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1521 (government contracting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(f) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for costs incurred during the department's emergency response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$564,329,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($599,334,000))

$636,064,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$818,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,679,000))

$2,339,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$62,920,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,232,080,000))

$1,266,470,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may contract for local jail beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. ((The))Except as provided in (j) of this subsection, the department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender excluding the costs of department of corrections provided services, including evidence-based substance abuse programming, dedicated department of corrections classification staff on-site for individualized case management, transportation of offenders to and from department of corrections facilities, and gender responsive training for Yakima jail staff assigned to the unit. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as close medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for offenders held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meet standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.

(b) $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $501,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester.

(c) The appropriations in this subsection include sufficient funding for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5492 (motor vehicle felonies).

(d) $1,861,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $1,861,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for the department to contract for the costs associated with use of offender bed capacity in lieu of prison beds for a therapeutic community program in Yakima county. The department shall provide a report to the legislature by December 15, 2019, outlining the program, its outcomes, and any improvements made over the previous contracted beds.

(e) $3,314,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,014,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to increase custody staffing in its prison facilities to provide watch staff for hospital stays, mental health needs, and suicide watches to reduce overtime hours. The department shall track and report to the legislature on the changes in working conditions and overtime usage for nursing services by November 15, 2019.

(f) $1,071,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,567,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement the settlement agreement in Disability Rights Washington v. Inslee, et al., U.S. District Court for the Western District of Washington, cause No. 18-5071, for the portions of the agreement that require additional staff necessary to supervise individuals with greater out-of-cell time and to facilitate access to programming, treatment, and other required activities. If the settlement agreement is not fully executed and approved by the court before September 1, 2019, this appropriation shall lapse.

(g) $663,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department for payment of debt service associated with a certificate of participation for the equipment at the coyote ridge corrections center and its security electronics network project.

(h) $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Third Substitute House Bill No. 1504 (impaired driving). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(j)))(i) $97,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476 (correctional services access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(j) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to pay for local jail beds to house individuals for the eighth and subsequent days following sentencing due to delays in transport to state institutions related to COVID-19 response. For this purpose, the department shall not pay a rate greater than $93.71 per day.

(k) Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the department to maintain the prison rape elimination act coordinator positions at each of the prison facilities.

(l) $31,700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for costs incurred during the department's emergency response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(m) $9,902,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for custody staff needed to provide on- and off-site health care delivery to the residential population. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the department to provide staff support for the operation of the body scanner located at the Washington corrections center for women.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$227,667,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($242,885,000))

$220,838,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,632,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,800,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($486,984,000))

$464,937,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $1,320,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department of corrections to negotiate annual contract rate increases with local and tribal governments for jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision and must include increases for a regional jail serving the south King county area for providing enhanced medical services. A contract rate increase may not exceed five percent each year. The department may negotiate to include medical care of offenders in the contract rate if medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff. If medical care of offender is included in the contract rate, the contract rate may exceed five percent to include the cost of that service.

(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators. (c) $984,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $8,066,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to create two hundred work release beds in the community by the end of fiscal year 2021. The department shall create an implementation plan and provide a report to the legislature by September 1, 2019, that outlines when and where the work release facilities will be implemented.

(d) $143,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1517 (domestic violence).

(e) Amounts provided in this subsection include additional funding for improving services to persons under community supervision. The savings from caseload reductions as a result of Substitute House Bill No. 2393 (community custody), Substitute House Bill No. 2394 (community custody), and Substitute House Bill No. 2417 (community custody terms) allow for investments as recommended by the sentencing guidelines commission and the criminal sentencing task force, in evidence-based supervision and reentry practices that support accountability and successful reintegration into the community. The department of corrections must report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on how additional funds are expended by June 30, 2021.

(f) $5,879,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for costs incurred during the department's emergency response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$6,471,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($6,580,000))

$8,209,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$510,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($13,561,000))

$15,190,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $911,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for costs incurred during the department's emergency response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$47,835,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($49,181,000))

$49,763,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($97,016,000))

$97,598,000

(6) OFFENDER CHANGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$59,452,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($62,460,000))

$63,297,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,430,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($126,342,000))

$127,179,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for offender programming. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.

(b) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $924,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for additional rental vouchers for individuals released from prison facilities or to increase the value of the rental voucher.

(c) $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5433 (DOC/post secondary education).

(d)(i) $1,156,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for costs relating to a pilot program for expanding educational programming to include postsecondary degrees and secure internet connections at up to three correctional institutions. The institutions chosen must be participating in the federal second chance Pell program. The internet connections are limited to the following purposes:

(A) Adult basic education;

(B) Completion of the free application for federal student aid or the Washington application for state financial aid; and

(C) Postsecondary education and training.

(ii) A report shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021, including:

(A) A description of how the secure internet connections were implemented, including any barriers or challenges;

(B) How many inmates participated in the programs that used the secure internet connections and a description of how the internet connection changed existing practices; and

(C) Data on whether the secure internet connection increased general education development or high school equivalency certificate completions; free application for federal student aid or Washington application for state financial aid filings; access to Pell grants or other state financial aid; and postsecondary education and training credit, certificate, and degree completions.

(e) $136,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for costs incurred during the department's emergency response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(f) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to provide rapid reentry services to incarcerated individuals releasing early as a result of the supreme court decision in State v. Blake.

(7) HEALTH CARE SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$164,516,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($174,549,000))

$178,081,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($340,465,000))

$343,997,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.

(b) $895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $895,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to increase on call nursing and overtime staff in order to cover required nursing posts in its prison facilities. The department shall track and report to the legislature on the changes in working conditions and overtime usage for nursing services by December 21, 2019.

(c) $108,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $164,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement the settlement agreement in Disability Rights Washington v. Inslee, et. al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 18-5071, for the portions of the agreement that require additional staff necessary to supervise individuals with greater out-of-cell time and to facilitate access to programming, treatment and other required activities. If the settlement agreement is not fully executed and approved by the court before September 1, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476 (correctional services access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(e) $3,292,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for costs incurred during the department's emergency response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

Sec. 1122. 2020 c 357 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,611,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($3,971,000))

$3,771,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($25,492,000))

$25,209,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$172,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($33,306,000))

$32,823,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for vocational rehabilitation supported employment services for additional eligible clients with visual disabilities who would otherwise be placed on the federally required order of selection waiting list.

(2) $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $115,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the independent living program.

Sec. 1123. 2020 c 357 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$35,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$910,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($252,209,000))

$248,152,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,421,000))

$36,408,000

Unemployment Compensation Administration Account—

Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($278,678,000))

$383,814,000

Administrative Contingency Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,256,000))

$26,250,000

Employment Service Administrative Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($66,060,000))

$65,982,000

Family and Medical Leave Insurance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($129,563,000))

$129,489,000

. . . .

Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$14,103,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($804,235,000))

$905,143,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.

(2) $70,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(3) $3,516,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5438 (ag & seasonal workforce srv).

(4) $4,636,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the statewide reentry initiative to connect incarcerated individuals to employment resources prior to and after release.

(5) $14,103,000 of the long-term services and supports trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1087 (long-term services and support). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $7,426,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(6) $162,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1399 (paid family and medical leave).

(7) $875,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to expand career connected learning program intermediary grants.

(8) $50,948,000 of the family and medical leave insurance account—state appropriation is provided solely to increase staffing levels and funding for the paid family medical leave program in order to align with projected business needs. The department must reassess its ongoing staffing and funding needs for the paid family medical leave program and submit documentation of the updated need to the office of financial management by September 1, 2020.

(9) $491,000 of the employment service administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2308 (job title reporting). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $208,000 of employment service administrative account—state appropriation is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(10)(a) Within existing resources, the department shall coordinate outreach and education to paid family and medical leave benefit recipients with a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system that connects families with children prenatal through age five and residing in Washington state to appropriate services and community resources. This coordination shall include but is not limited to placing information about the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system on the paid family and medical leave program web site and in printed materials, and conducting joint events.

(b) Within existing resources, by December 1, 2020, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the ability for the paid family and medical leave program and a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system to provide integrated services to eligible beneficiaries. The report shall include an analysis of any statutory changes needed to allow information and data to be shared between the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system and the paid family and medical leave program.

(11) $11,019,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for increased compensation and other administrative costs that federal grant dollars are insufficient to cover. The department shall report the following to the legislature and the governor by September 30, 2020:

(a) An inventory of the department's programs, services, and activities, identifying federal, state, and other funding sources for each;

(b) Federal grants received by the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for each fiscal year from fiscal year 2014 through fiscal year 2020, and the applicable rules;

(c) State funding available to the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for each fiscal year from fiscal year 2014 through fiscal year 2020;

(d) A history of staffing levels by line of business or activity, identifying sources of state or federal funding, for each fiscal year from fiscal year 2014 through fiscal year 2020; and

(e) A projected spending plan for the employment services administrative account and the administrative contingency account. The spending plan must include forecasted revenues and estimated expenditures under various economic scenarios.

(12)(a) $35,000 of the employment services administrative account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to begin conducting a study, jointly with the department of social and health services, on the feasibility of replicating the unemployment insurance program for and expanding other social net programs to individuals regardless of their citizenship status.

(b) In preparation for the study, the department shall analyze existing programs to assess the legality of expansion to serve undocumented individuals and families, identify programmatic changes that would mitigate barriers to access and reduce fear of participation, and identify the operational and caseload costs associated with replication or expansion. If existing program expansion is not feasible or in compliance with federal law, the study shall assess the creation of similar programs and identify the associated operational and caseload costs.

(c) The departments shall begin to develop recommendations to expand existing programs or create similar programs to serve undocumented individuals.

(13) $1,983,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for the department to contract with the national guard to assist in reducing the backlog of claimant issues and other work that the department has experienced due to the high volume and extended length of unemployment insurance claims related to the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(14) $633,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for the department to contract with one or more experienced fact-finding services, to assist with adjudication and other efforts related to the high volume and extended length of unemployment insurance claims related to the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(15) $2,110,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the department to migrate and upgrade the customer call center phone system to a cloud-based system, in order to promote equitable access and ensure the timely payment of unemployment insurance benefits. Prior to executing any contract, the department shall consult with the office of the chief information officer. The department, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, must develop a project plan, timeline with quantifiable deliverables, and budget. The budget must include base funding in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium for the existing customer call center phone system, and project ongoing costs by fiscal year and by fund for the upgraded phone system. The department must report this to the office of financial management and the relevant committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021.

(16) $240,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for the translation of letters and documents, and other enhancements to improve unemployment insurance customer access and ensure the timely payment of unemployment insurance benefits.

(17) $303,000 of the unemployment compensation account—federal appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the implementation of chapter 2, Laws of 2021 (concerning unemployment insurance).

Sec. 1124. 2020 c 357 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

(1)(a) The appropriations to the department of children, youth, and families in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2020))2021, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund—state appropriations for fiscal year ((2020))2021 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. The department must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature prior to receiving approval from the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year ((2020))2021 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the foster care, adoption support, child protective services, working connections child care, and the juvenile rehabilitation programs or in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose.

(2) CHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$401,235,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($411,209,000))

$356,844,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($458,790,000))

$457,031,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,824,000))

$2,822,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($24,916,000))

$24,769,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,298,974,000))

$1,242,701,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $748,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(b) $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $662,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the costs of hub home foster families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.

(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the costs of existing hub home foster family constellations.

(ii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of hub home constellations and provide technical assistance for existing constellations.

(iii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a contract with an organization with expertise in implementing the hub home model with fidelity to identify and train organizations serving kinship caregivers in eastern and western Washington with the goal of establishing additional hub home constellations to provide respite, training, and support to kinship caregivers. The department of children, youth, and families shall make available to the contracted organization information about the rates of placement of children with relative caregivers in order for the contracted organization to identify appropriate locations for expanding the model.

(c) $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $579,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $110,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.

(d) $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,245,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for an expansion to child advocacy center services.

(e) $1,884,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $533,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,049,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to expand performance-based contracts through network administrators.

(f) $2,799,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $1,754,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $5,444,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for social worker and related staff to receive, refer, and respond to screened-in reports of child abuse and neglect pursuant to chapter 208, Laws of 2018.

(g) Beginning October 1, 2019, and each calendar quarter thereafter, the department shall provide a tracking report for social service specialists and corresponding social services support staff to the office of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. To the extent to which the information is available, the report shall include the following information identified separately for social service specialists doing case management work, supervisory work, and administrative support staff, and identified separately by job duty or program, including but not limited to intake, child protective services investigations, child protective services family assessment response, and child and family welfare services:

(i) Total full time equivalent employee authority, allotments and expenditures by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program;

(ii) Vacancy rates by region, office, and classification and band; and

(iii) Average length of employment with the department, and when applicable, the date of exit for staff exiting employment with the department by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program.

(h) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.

(i) $3,910,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,910,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $2,336,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to reduce the caseload ratios of social workers serving children in foster care, to promote decreased lengths of stay and to make progress towards achievement of the Braam settlement caseload outcomes.

(j)(A) $539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $656,000 of the general fund private/local appropriation, and $252,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, or regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.

(B) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.

(k) The department shall continue to implement policies to reduce the percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation, including clarification of the threshold for transition from supervised to unsupervised visitation prior to reunification.

(l) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $112,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, implement, and expand strategies to improve the capacity, reliability, and effectiveness of contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care and their parents and siblings. Strategies may include, but are not limited to, increasing mileage reimbursement for providers, offering transportation-only contract options, and mechanisms to reduce the level of parent-child supervision when doing so is in the best interest of the child.

(m) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.

(n) $1,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($2,230,000))$1,230,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $156,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the travel reimbursement for in-home service providers.

(o) The department is encouraged to control exceptional reimbursement decisions so that the child's needs are met without excessive costs.

(p) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.

(q) $5,040,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 $6,051,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $846,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement contracts. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (2)(q), $1,037,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $115,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for contracts with enhanced therapeutic services and greater staff-to-child ratios. The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments and shall submit as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 any costs associated with increases in the number of emergent placement contract beds after the effective date of this section that cannot be sustained within existing appropriations.

(r) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for continued implementation of Chapter 80, Laws of 2018 (2SSB 6453) (kinship caregiver legal support).

(s)(i) $10,828,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $10,993,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $13,365,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for rate increases for behavioral rehabilitation services providers. The department shall modify the rate structure to one that is based on placement setting rather than acuity level pursuant to the rate study submitted in December 2018.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2020, and continuing through the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must provide semi-annual reports to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of in-state behavioral rehabilitation services providers and licensed beds, the number of out-of-state behavioral rehabilitation services placements, and a comparison of these numbers to the same metrics expressed as an average over the first six months of calendar year 2019. Beginning in state fiscal year 2021, the report shall identify beds with the behavioral rehabilitation services-plus services rate in (ii) of this subsection.

(t) Within existing resources, the department shall implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (confinement alts./children).

(((v)))(u) $1,533,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 328, Laws of 2019 (2SSB 5718). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $767,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to provide short-term housing assistance to families that must not result in ongoing expenditures after June 30, 2021, consistent with the requirements of chapter 328, Laws of 2019 (2SSB 5718).

(((w)))(v) $413,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $513,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $826,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase family reconciliation services. The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2873 (families in conflict).

(((x)))(w) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing the supportive visitation model that utilizes trained visit navigators to provide a structured and positive visitation experience for children and their parents.

(((y)))(x) The department of children, youth, and families shall enter into interagency agreements with the office of public defense and office of civil legal aid to facilitate the use of federal Title IV-E reimbursement for parent representation and child representation services.

(((z)))(y) $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $147,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5955 (DCYF/statewide system).

(((aa)))(z) $15,046,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to leverage federal title IV-E funds available under the family first prevention services act for qualifying services and families.

(i) In fiscal year 2020, the department shall work with the department of social and health services to complete an evaluation of kinship navigator services that would enable establishment of a well-supported, supported, or promising practice model.

(ii) No later than December 1, 2019, the department shall report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on the feasibility of claiming federal title IV-E reimbursement in fiscal year 2021 for home visiting services and kinship navigator services. The report shall include the estimated share of the current population receiving home visiting services whom the department would consider candidates for foster care for the purposes of title IV-E reimbursement under the family first prevention services act, and the estimated workload impacts for the department to identify and document the candidacy of populations receiving home visiting services.

(((bb)))(aa) $443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $818,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for ten child and family welfare services case workers.

(((cc)))(bb) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a contract with a national nonprofit organization to, in partnership with private matching funds, subcontract with a community organization for specialized, enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody. The contract must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children with high needs.

(((dd)))(cc) $666,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $74,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1645 (parental improvement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((ee)))(dd) $937,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $66,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1775 (sexually exploited children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((hh)))(ee) $5,159,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,870,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to increase the basic foster care maintenance rate by an average of $110 per month per child for all age groups effective July 1, 2020.

(((ii)))(ff) $3,175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $2,117,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to establish behavioral rehabilitation services-plus contracts to serve dependent youth whose needs cannot be met in regular behavioral rehabilitation services, and who may be transitioning from a hospital or other inpatient treatment, emergent placement services, a hotel stay, or an out-of-state placement. Contracts for behavioral rehabilitation services-plus must offer enhanced rates that support therapeutic services, appropriate staff-to-child ratios, and placement stabilization.

(((kk)))(gg) The department of children, youth, and families shall make foster care maintenance payments to programs where children are placed with a parent in a residential program for substance abuse treatment. These maintenance payments are considered foster care maintenance payments for purposes of forecasting and budgeting at maintenance level as required by RCW 43.88.058.

(((mm) $1,080,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $720,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to engage with a behavioral rehabilitation services or behavioral rehabilitation services-plus provider or providers who previously provided behavioral rehabilitation services to the state but who do not have a contract with the department on the effective date of this section, and who can serve dependent youth whose needs require a staff-to-child ratio that is higher than one staff to three children. The funding in this subsection is provided on a one-time basis for fiscal year 2021 only.

(nn)))(hh) $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $26,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (confinement alts./children). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(ii) The department is authorized to use the amounts provided in this section for services and maintenance payments to former dependent youth as authorized and directed in the supporting foster youth and families through the pandemic act, P.L. 116-260, division X.

(3) JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$100,445,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($111,895,000))

$109,588,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,464,000))

$3,411,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,790,000

Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$196,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$8,362,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($226,152,000))

$223,792,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $331,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(b) $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,841,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for the juvenile justice programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding for program-specific participation and the department shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.

(c) $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,537,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for expansion of the juvenile justice treatments and therapies in department of children, youth, and families programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." The department may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.

(d)(i) $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $6,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority.

(ii) The department of children, youth, and families shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service (CJS) funds, community juvenile accountability act (CJAA) grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative (CDDA), and suspended disposition alternative (SDA). The department of children, youth, and families shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (A) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (B) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (C) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (D) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (E) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (F) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the department of children, youth, and families and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.

(iii) The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (d)(ii) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.

(iv) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the department of children, youth, and families and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.

(e) $557,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $707,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.

(f) $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the juvenile detention alternatives initiative.

(g) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The department of children, youth, and families may award grants under this subsection. The department of children, youth, and families shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the department of children, youth, and families on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(h) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(i) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts to establish alternative detention facilities similar to the proctor house model in Jefferson county, Washington, that will provide less restrictive confinement alternatives to youth in their local communities. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding and each entity receiving funds must report to the department on the number and types of youth serviced, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.

(j) $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide housing services to clients releasing from incarceration into the community.

(k) $4,179,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,516,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1646 (juvenile rehabilitation confinement).

(l) $80,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for a contract with a non-governmental entity to research youth violence prevention strategies and explore new and existing resources to implement evidence-based youth prevention strategies in the city of Federal Way.

(m) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided for the department to measure the fidelity of the evidence-based interventions incorporated into the integrated treatment model. By July 1, 2020, the department must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the results of the assessment of the integrated treatment model.

(n) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for community-based violence prevention and intervention services to individuals identified through the King county shots fired social network analysis. The department must complete an evaluation of the program and provide a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by September 15, 2021.

(o) $800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of juvenile justice to establish a grant program for evidence-based services to youth who are at high risk to perpetrate gun violence and who reside in areas with high rates of gun violence.

(i) Priority shall be given to one site serving in south King county and one site in Yakima county.

(ii) Priority for funding shall be given to sites who partner with the University of Washington to deliver family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger advocates.

(p) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract with a cultural-based education, rehabilitation, and positive identity formation program to host music, dance, therapeutic African drumming, and cultural awareness workshops at Naselle youth camp.

(q) $1,059,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Second Substitute House Bill No. 2277 (youth solitary confinement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(r) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to fund an educational advocate for the city of Yakima. The advocate will provide intervention services to youth identified as most at risk to engage in firearm violence.

(4) EARLY LEARNING PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$206,082,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($347,513,000))

$282,317,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($412,831,000))

$415,289,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,115,000))

$1,110,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($28,156,000))

$28,150,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,926,000))

$14,803,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$28,523,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,900,000

. . . .

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,123,046,000))

$1,060,174,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a)(i) $80,273,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $97,570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, (($24,070,000))$23,970,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 14,000 slots in fiscal year 2020 and 14,662 slots in fiscal year 2021. Of the 14,662 slots in fiscal year 2021, 50 slots must be reserved for foster children to receive school-year-round enrollment.

(ii) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to develop and provide culturally relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.

(c) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies.

(d) $51,815,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020, (($80,265,000))$30,829,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021, and $283,375,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.135. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) (($78,101,000 of the general fund—state appropriation shall))The department will coordinate with the department of social and health services to determine the amount of state funding for state fiscal year 2021 to be claimed toward the state's temporary assistance for needy families federal maintenance of effort requirement. The department shall work in collaboration with the department of social and health services to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fund—state appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the monthly temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement.

(ii) $44,103,000 is for the compensation components of the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as provided in section 943 of this act.

(iii) $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,359,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1303 (child care/higher education).

(iv) $526,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $519,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1603 (economic assistance programs).

(v) $1,901,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2456 (working connect. eligibility). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(vi) $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $645,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2455 (high school/child care). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(vii) $133,354,000 is for subsidy rate increases for child care center providers. Funding in this subsection is sufficient to achieve the 55th percentile of market at a level 3 standard of quality in fiscal year 2020 and the 65th percentile of market for both centers and licensed family homes at a level 2 standard of quality and providers of care for school aged children in fiscal year 2021. The state and the representative for family child care providers must enter into bargaining over the implementation of subsidy rate increases, and apply those increases consistent with the terms of this proviso and the agreement reached between the parties.

(((vi) (ix)))(viii) In order to not exceed the appropriated amount, the department shall manage the program so that the average monthly caseload does not exceed 33,000 households and the department shall give prioritized access into the program according to the following order:

(A) Families applying for or receiving temporary assistance for needy families (TANF);

(B) TANF families curing sanction;

(C) Foster children;

(D) Families that include a child with special needs;

(E) Families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center;

(F) Families with a child residing with a biological parent or guardian who have received child protective services, child welfare services, or a family assessment response from the department in the past six months, and have received a referral for child care as part of the family's case management;

(G) Families that received subsidies within the last thirty days and:

(I) Have reapplied for subsidies; and

(II) Have household income of two hundred percent of the federal poverty level or below; and

(H) All other eligible families.

(((x)))(ix) The department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must submit a follow-up report by December 1, 2019, to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on quality control measures for the working connections child care program. The report must include:

(A) An updated narrative of the procurement and implementation of an improved time and attendance system, including an updated and detailed accounting of the final costs of procurement and implementation;

(B) An updated and comprehensive description of all processes, including computer algorithms and additional rule development, that the department and the department of social and health services have implemented and that are planned to be implemented to avoid overpayments. The updated report must include an itemized description of the processes implemented or planned to be implemented to address each of the following:

(I) Ensure the department's auditing efforts are informed by regular and continuous alerts of the potential for overpayments;

(II) Avoid overpayments, including the billing of more regular business days than are in a month, to the maximum extent possible and expediently recover overpayments that have occurred;

(III) Withhold payment from providers when necessary to incentivize receipt of the necessary documentation to complete an audit;

(IV) Establish methods for reducing future payments or establishing repayment plans in order to recover any overpayments;

(V) Sanction providers, including termination of eligibility, who commit intentional program violations or fail to comply with program requirements, including compliance with any established repayment plans;

(VI) Consider pursuit of prosecution in cases with fraudulent activity; and

(VII) Ensure two half-day rates totaling more than one hundred percent of the daily rate are not paid to providers; and

(C) A description of the process by which fraud is identified and how fraud investigations are prioritized and expedited.

(((xi)))(x) Beginning July 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(A) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;

(B) The reason for each overpayment;

(C) The total cost of overpayments;

(D) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and

(E) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.

(e) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.

(f) $1,560,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $1,560,000)), $310,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and (($13,424,000))$8,046,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program. If federal sequestration cuts are realized, cuts to the seasonal child care program must be proportional to other federal reductions made within the department.

(g) $379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $871,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to contract with a countywide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a pilot project to prevent child abuse and neglect using nationally recognized models. Of the amounts provided:

(i) $323,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $333,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the nonprofit organization to convene stakeholders to implement a countywide resource and referral linkage system for families of children who are prenatal through age five.

(ii) $56,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $539,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the nonprofit organization to offer a voluntary brief newborn home visiting program. The program must meet the diverse needs of Pierce county residents and, therefore, it must be flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive. The department, in collaboration with the nonprofit organization, must examine the feasibility of leveraging federal and other fund sources, including federal Title IV-E and medicaid funds, for home visiting provided through the pilot. The department must report its findings to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2019.

(h) $4,653,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $3,587,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,076,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall ensure that contracted providers pursue receipt of federal funding associated with the early support for infants and toddlers program. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.

(i) $38,622,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $38,095,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $33,908,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely to maintain the requirements set forth in chapter 7, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess. The department shall place a ten percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. In a bi-annual report to the governor and the legislature, the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,728,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.

(ii) $17,955,000 is for quality improvement awards, of which $1,650,000 is to provide a $500 increase for awards for select providers rated level three to five in accordance with the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as set forth in section 943 of this act.

(iii) $1,283,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $417,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1391 (early achievers program).

(((v)))(j) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.

(k) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.

(l) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.

(m)(i)(A) The department is required to provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.

(B) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry starting in the 2015-16 school year, and every school year thereafter. By October 2017, and every October thereafter, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.

(C) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.

(D) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data every March for the previous school year.

(ii) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

(n) The department shall work with state and local law enforcement, federally recognized tribal governments, and tribal law enforcement to develop a process for expediting fingerprinting and data collection necessary to conduct background checks for tribal early learning and child care providers.

(o) $5,157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,938,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for components of the 2019-2021 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as set forth in section 943 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $1,302,000 is for the family child care provider 501(c)(3) organization for board-approved training;

(ii) $230,000 is for increasing training reimbursement up to $250 per person;

(iii) $115,000 is for training on the electronic child care time and attendance system;

(iv) $3,000,000 is to maintain the career development fund;

(v) $5,223,000 is for up to five days of substitute coverage per provider per year through the state-administered substitute pool.

(vi) $226,000 is to provide an increase to monthly health care premiums.

(p) $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $219,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 236, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1445) (dual language in early learning & K-12).

(q) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(r) $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $317,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to continue a four year pilot for implementation of chapter 162, Laws of 2017 (SSB 5357) (outdoor early learning programs).

(s) Within existing resources, the department shall implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5089 (early learning access).

(t) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for additional facilitated play groups offered statewide to family, friend, and neighbor child care providers.

(u)(i) The department of children, youth, and families, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial management, and the caseload forecast council must develop a proposal to transfer the annual allocations appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act for early intervention services for children with disabilities from birth through two years of age, from the superintendent of public instruction to the department of children, youth, and families beginning July 1, 2020. The department must submit a model detailing how allocations for this program will be determined and identifying the necessary statutory changes to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than September 1, 2019.

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2019, there shall be an administrative limit of five percent on all state funds allocated to school districts for early intervention services for children with disabilities from birth through two years of age.

(v) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the expanded learning opportunity quality initiative pursuant to RCW 43.216.085(3)(d). No later than December 1, 2020, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the outcomes of this pilot program and recommendations for future implementation that includes phasing-out the need for ongoing state support.

(w) $3,779,000 of the home visiting services—state appropriation and $3,779,000 of the home visiting services—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract for additional home visiting slots. To maximize the use of available federal funding, to the greatest extent possible, the department shall use these additional slots to serve families where one or more children are candidates for foster care. The federal amount in this subsection is contingent on the services and children being eligible under the federal family first prevention services act, P.L. 115-123. The department may not allocate the federal funds to contractors unless the federal funding requirements are met.

(x) $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $9,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1344 (child care access work group).

(y) $773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $773,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5903 (children's mental health).

(z) $231,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $144,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to complete a report with options and recommendations for administrative efficiencies and long-term strategies that align and integrate high-quality early learning programs administered by both agencies. The report shall address capital needs, data collection and data sharing, licensing changes, quality standards, options for community-based and school-based settings, fiscal modeling, and any statutory changes needed to achieve administrative efficiencies. The report is due to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2020.

(aa) $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to contract with the Walla Walla school district to repurpose an elementary school into an early learning center to serve as a regional prekindergarten facility. The early learning center must provide birth to five services such as parent education and supports, child care, and early learning programs.

(bb) $3,523,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to provide one-time scholarships for licensed family homes, child care center providers, and interested early learning providers to meet licensing requirements or meet ECEAP staff qualifications. Scholarships must support early childhood education associate degrees offered at state community and technical colleges or the early childhood education stackable certificates. The department shall administer the scholarship program and leverage the infrastructure established with early achievers grants.

(((dd)))(cc) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2556 (early learning provider regs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(ee)))(dd) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2619 (early learning access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(ff)))(ee) $91,991,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for payments to providers for the early support for infants and toddlers program to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2787 (infants and toddlers program). Beginning September 1, 2020, funding for this purpose is transferred from the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Funding and eligibility are associated with the 0-2 special education caseload prepared by the caseload forecast council.

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$118,341,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($119,408,000))

$128,825,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($162,520,000))

$159,355,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$195,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$180,000

Home Visiting Services Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$472,000

Home Visiting Services Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$354,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,990,000))

$3,137,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($404,460,000))

$410,859,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. By October 31, 2019, the coalition must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the coalition's plan for projects affecting the coalition organizations. The report must include any information technology projects impacting coalition organizations and, in collaboration with the office of the chief information officer, provide: (i) The status of any information technology projects currently being developed or implemented that affect the coalition; (ii) funding needs of these current and future information technology projects; and (iii) next steps for the coalition's information technology projects. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(b) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships providing technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.

(c) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $16,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(d) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(e) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a full-time employee to coordinate policies and programs to support pregnant and parenting individuals receiving chemical dependency or substance use disorder treatment.

(f)(i) All agreements and contracts with vendors must include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:

(A) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed;

(B) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for its workers based in good faith on any of the following:

(I) A seniority system; a merit system; a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; a bona fide job-related factor or factors; or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.

(II) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but not be limited to, education, training, or experience, that is: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and accounts for the entire differential.

(III) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be: Consistent with business necessity; not based on or derived from a gender-based differential; and account for the entire differential.

(ii) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the department or department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.

(iii) The department must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.

(g) The department must submit an agency budget request for the 2020 supplemental budget that identifies the amount of administrative funding to be transferred from appropriations in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section to this subsection (5).

(h) $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office to participate in the work group established in section 922 of this act to create a family engagement framework for early learning through high school. At a minimum, the work group must review family engagement policies and practices in Washington and in other states, with a focus on identifying best practices that can be adopted throughout Washington.

(i) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to create a plan to merge servers and build infrastructure to connect the child welfare, early learning, and juvenile rehabilitation programs on a single network. The implementation plan must be completed and provided to the legislature by January 1, 2021.

(j) The department shall use funding provided in the information technology pool to develop and implement the following, subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act:

(i) A web-based reporting portal accessible to mandated reporters for reporting child abuse and neglect as required by RCW 26.44.030; and

(ii) A call-back option for callers placed on hold to provide a phone number for the department to return a call to complete the report of child abuse and neglect.

(End of part)

PART XII

NATURAL RESOURCES

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1201. 2020 c 357 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$605,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($668,000))

$657,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,158,000))

$1,147,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$46,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,509,000))

$2,487,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a land use planner to conduct compliance monitoring on approved development projects and develop and track measures on the commission's effectiveness in implementing the national scenic area management plan.

(2) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a land use planner to provide land use planning services dedicated to Klickitat county. Because the activities of the land use planner are solely for the benefit of Washington state, Oregon is not required to provide matching funds for this activity.

Sec. 1202. 2020 c 357 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($30,696,000))

$30,665,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($31,396,000))

$25,804,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($110,069,000))

$109,417,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,066,000))

$27,007,000

Reclamation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,919,000))

$4,886,000

Flood Control Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,184,000))

$4,152,000

State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000

Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,052,000))

$25,943,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$204,000

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account—Water

Supply Facilities—State Appropriation
. . . .
$183,000

Aquatic Algae Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$528,000

Water Rights Tracking System Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($48,000))

$798,000

Site Closure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$582,000

Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($577,000))

$576,000

Worker and Community Right to Know Fund—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,996,000))

$1,978,000

Water Rights Processing Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($257,389,000))

$248,961,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$499,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($48,068,000))

$47,491,000

Underground Storage Tank Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,976,000))

$3,924,000

Biosolids Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,709,000))

$2,683,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,170,000))

$7,076,000

Radioactive Mixed Waste Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,239,000))

$20,998,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,463,000))

$4,411,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,179,000))

$9,058,000

Air Operating Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,692,000))

$4,644,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,497,000))

$1,489,000

Oil Spill Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,576,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$465,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
$464,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,920,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,220,000))

$4,172,000

Paint Product Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$182,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($616,287,000))

$600,815,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(2) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Executive Order No. 12-07, Washington's response to ocean acidification.

(3) $726,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($1,742,000))$1,432,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,600,000 of the flood control assistance account—state appropriation are provided solely for the continued implementation of the streamflow restoration program provided in chapter 90.94 RCW. Funding must be used to develop watershed plans, oversee consultants, adopt rules, and develop or oversee capital grant-funded projects that will improve instream flows statewide.

(4) $1,259,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the increased costs for Washington conservation corp member living allowances, vehicles used to transport crews to worksites, and costs unsupported by static federal AmeriCorps grant reimbursement.

(5) $3,482,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement recommendations that come from chemical action plans (CAP), such as the interim recommendations addressing PFAS (per- and polyfluorinated alkyl substances) contamination in drinking water and sources of that contamination, to monitor results, and to develop new CAPs.

(6) $592,000 of the reclamation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to assess and explore opportunities to resolve water rights uncertainties and disputes through adjudications in selected basins where tribal senior water rights, unquantified claims, and similar uncertainties about the seniority, quantity, and validity of water rights exist.

(7) $2,147,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to address litter prevention and recycling programs, and in response to new China-imposed restrictions on the import of recyclable materials. Activities funded from this increased appropriation include litter pickup by ecology youth crews, local governments, and other state agencies, and litter prevention public education campaigns.

(8) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $569,000)), $67,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $502,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy).

(9) $1,286,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5135 (toxic pollution).

(10) $392,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5397 (plastic packaging).

(11) $1,450,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1543 (concerning sustainable recycling).

(12) $342,000 of the air pollution control account—state appropriation and $619,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1112 (hydrofluorocarbons emissions).

(13) $1,374,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1578 (oil transportation safety).

(14) $264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to contract with the Walla Walla watershed management partnership board of directors to develop a thirty-year integrated water resource management strategic plan and to provide partnership staffing, reporting, and operating budget costs associated with new activities as described in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5352 (Walla Walla watershed pilot).

(15) $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $455,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to grant to the northwest straits commission to distribute equally among the seven Puget Sound marine resource committees.

(16) $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $290,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for rule making to change standards to allow for a higher volume of water to be spilled over Columbia river and Snake river dams to increase total dissolved gas for the benefit of Chinook salmon and other salmonids.

(17) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the agency to convene a stakeholder work group to identify actions to decrease loading of priority pharmaceuticals into Puget Sound, contract for technical experts to provide literature review, conduct an analysis and determine best practices for addressing pharmaceutical discharges, and carry out laboratory testing and analysis.

(18) $319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($319,000))$119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to increase coordination in reviewing shoreline armoring proposals to better protect forage fish.

(19) $247,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($435,000))$260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for monitoring nutrient cycling and ocean acidification parameters at twenty marine stations in Puget Sound and Hood canal.

(20) $250,000 of the flood control assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington conservation corps to carry out emergency activities to respond to flooding by repairing levees, preventing or mitigating an impending flood hazard, or filling and stacking sandbags. This appropriation is also for grants to local governments for emergency response needs, including the removal of structures and repair of small-scale levees and tidegates.

(21) $500,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Spokane river regional toxics task force to address elevated levels of polychlorinated biphenyls in the Spokane river.

(22) $244,000 of the model toxics control operating—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5579 (crude oil volatility/rail).

(23) $432,000 of the model toxics control operating—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1290 (voluntary cleanups/has waste).

(((25)))(24) $10,000,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to local governments for the purpose of supporting local solid waste and financial assistance programs.

(25) $100,000 of the oil spill prevention account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to produce a synopsis of current maritime vessel activity, navigation lanes, and anchorages in the northern Puget Sound and the strait of Juan de Fuca, including vessel transit in Canadian portions of transboundary waters. Consistent with RCW 43.372.030, the synopsis must compile key findings and baseline information on the spatial and temporal distribution of and intensity of current maritime vessel activity. The department may collect new information on vessel activity, including information on commercial and recreational fishing, where relevant to the synopsis. In producing the synopsis, the department must invite the participation of Canadian agencies and first nations, and must coordinate with federal agencies, other state agencies, federally recognized Indian tribes, commercial and recreational vessel operators and organizations representing such operators, and other stakeholders. The department must provide a draft of the synopsis to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021.

(26) $500,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1114 (food waste reduction).

(27) $465,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $464,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2052 (marijuana product testing).

(28) $182,000 of the paint product stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1652 (paint stewardship).

(29) $535,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to develop a Puget Sound nutrients general permit for wastewater treatment plants in Puget Sound to reduce nutrients in wastewater discharges to Puget Sound.

(((34)))(30) $75,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department and the recycling development center, created in RCW 70.370.030, to provide financial and technical assistance to women and minority-owned businesses and small businesses which manufacture or process single-use plastic packaging products in order to help transform these businesses to processors and producers of sustainable packaging.

(((35)))(31) $283,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5323 (plastic bags), including the education and outreach activities required under section 5, chapter . . ., Laws of 2020 (ESSB 5323). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((36)))(32) $149,000 of the ((general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021))model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5811 (clean car standards & prog.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(37)))(33)(a) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to convene a work group of affected entities to study the design and use of the state water trust, water banking, and water transfers, and present its findings, including a summary of discussions and any recommendations on policy improvements, to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate. The department of ecology shall invite representatives to serve on the work group from organizations including, but not limited to:

(i) Federally recognized Indian tribes;

(ii) Local governments including cities, counties, and special purpose districts;

(iii) Environmental advocacy organizations;

(iv) The farming industry in Washington;

(v) Business interests; and

(vi) Entities that have been directly involved with the establishment of water banks.

(b) In addition to an invitation to participate in the work group, the department shall also consult with affected federally recognized tribal governments upon request.

(c) By December 1, 2020, the department of ecology must present its findings, including a summary of discussions and any recommendations on policy improvements, to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate and to the governor's office.

(((38)))(34) $750,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide funding to local governments to help address stormwater permit requirements and provide assistance to small businesses, as well as local source control monitoring to address toxic hotspots that impact Puget Sound.

(((39)))(35) $748,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to add continuous freshwater monitoring at the mouth of the seven largest rivers discharging into Puget Sound.

(((40)))(36) $2,339,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to use its authority under chapter 43.21C RCW to strengthen and standardize the consideration of climate change risks, vulnerability, and greenhouse gas emissions in environmental assessments for major projects with significant environmental impacts. To provide clarity for the public, governmental agencies and project proponents, the work conducted under this subsection must be uniform and apply to all branches of government, including state agencies, public and municipal corporations, and counties. It is the intent of the legislature that the department should carefully consider any potential overlap with other policies to reduce or regulate greenhouse gas emissions from major projects with significant environmental impacts, in order to avoid duplicative obligations.

(((41)))(37) $654,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional staff to process clean water act certifications in the event that a sixty-day processing requirement is implemented for all United States army corps of engineers permitted projects in Washington. If such a requirement is not imposed, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1203. 2020 c 357 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$16,270,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($20,906,000))

$21,209,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,080,000))

$7,077,000

Winter Recreation Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,310,000))

$3,309,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($403,000))

$358,000

Snowmobile Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,657,000))

$5,655,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$367,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($126,881,000))

$126,835,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$420,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,496,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($182,790,000))

$182,996,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $129,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.

(2) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to pay assessments charged by local improvement districts.

(3) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5918 (whale watching guidelines).

(4) $916,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $915,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $169,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for the commission to replace major equipment with an emphasis on fire response equipment and law enforcement vehicles that have over fifteen years of useful life.

(5) $252,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $322,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects funded in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(6) $154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $146,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for hiring new park rangers and park aides.

(7) $3,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $3,750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $2,500,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation are provided solely for maintaining current service levels for core functions such as customer service, facility maintenance, and law enforcement.

(8) $382,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $567,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to conduct forest health treatments on 500 acres of forestland each year, add stewardship staff capacity in the northwest region, and conduct vegetation surveys to identify rare and sensitive plants. One-time funding is also provided to replace a fire truck in the eastern region.

(9) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to hire construction and maintenance staff to address the backlog of preventive maintenance at state parks.

(10) $428,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for increased technology costs associated with providing field staff with access to the state government network, providing law enforcement personnel remote access to law enforcement records, and providing public wi-fi services at dry falls, pacific beach, and potholes state parks.

(11) $204,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintaining the state parks' central reservation system, the law enforcement records management system, and discover pass automated pay stations.

(12) $1,100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the commission to carry out operation and maintenance of the state parks system.

(13) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the commission to supply each public library in the state with two Discover passes, to be made available to the public to check out through the library system, as described in Substitute Senate Bill No. 6670 (discover pass/libraries).

(14) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $65,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to collaborate with the city of Issaquah to prepare an environmental impact statement at Lake Sammamish state park to identify impacts of the next phase of park development and assist with obtaining regulatory permits.

(((15) $120,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2587 (scenic bikeway). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1204. 2020 c 357 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,168,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,003,000))

$1,505,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,778,000))

$3,746,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$24,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($333,000))

$330,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,000

Recreation Resources Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,071,000))

$3,966,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,107,000))

$1,093,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($12,601,000))

$11,949,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $109,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the aquatics lands enhancement account grant program as described in RCW 79.105.150.

(2) $37,000 of the firearms range account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the firearms range grant program as described in RCW 79A.25.210.

(3) (($4,071,000))$3,966,000 of the recreation resources account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administrative and coordinating costs of the recreation and conservation office and the board as described in RCW 79A.25.080(1).

(4) (($1,107,000))$1,093,000 of the NOVA program account—state appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program as described in chapter 46.09 RCW.

(5) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to contract for implementation of the Nisqually watershed stewardship plan.

(6) $275,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization with a mission for salmon and steelhead restoration to continue mortality assessment work and to design solutions to mitigate steelhead mortality at the Hood Canal bridge.

(((8)))(7) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the governor's salmon recovery office to coordinate ongoing recovery efforts of southern resident orcas and monitor progress toward implementation of recommendations from the governor's southern resident killer whale task force.

(((9) $68,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2311 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1205. 2020 c 357 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,758,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,641,000))

$2,465,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$254,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,653,000))

$5,477,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $140,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 452, Laws of 2019 (growth management board/indexing).

(2) $4,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6574 (GMHB & ELUHO powers, duties). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1206. 2020 c 357 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$7,845,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($8,540,000))

$7,242,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,482,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,456,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,226,000))

$1,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$254,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($28,803,000))

$27,279,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission and conservation districts to increase landowner participation in voluntary actions that protect habitat to benefit salmon and southern resident orcas.

(2) $8,456,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(3) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the commission to continue to convene and facilitate a food policy forum and to implement recommendations identified through the previous work of the food policy forum.

(a) The commission shall coordinate implementation of the forum with the department of agriculture and the office of farmland preservation.

(b) The director of the commission and the director of the department of agriculture shall jointly appoint members of the forum, and no appointment may be made unless each director concurs in the appointment.

(c) In addition to members appointed by the directors, four legislators may serve on the food policy forum in an ex officio capacity. Legislative participants may be reimbursed for travel expenses by the senate or house of representatives as provided in RCW 44.04.120. Legislative participants must be appointed as follows:

(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and

(ii) The majority leader and minority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(d) Meetings of the forum may be scheduled by either the director of the commission or the director of the department of agriculture.

(e) Staffing for the forum must be provided by the commission working jointly with staff from the department of agriculture.

(f) The commission and the department of agriculture shall jointly develop the agenda for each forum meeting as well as a report from the food policy forum. The report must contain recommendations and a workplan to implement the recommendations and must be delivered to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by June 30, 2021.

(4) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the following activities:

(a) The commission and the department of agriculture must produce a gap analysis reviewing existing conservation grant programs and completed voluntary stewardship program plans to identify what technical assistance and cost-share resources are needed to meet the requirements placed on those activities by the legislature.

(b)(i) The commission, in collaboration with the department of agriculture, must develop recommendations for legislation or additional work that may be needed to implement a sustainable farms and fields grant program that prioritizes funding based on net reduction of greenhouse gas emissions on farm, aquatic, or ranch lands, including carbon sequestration.

(ii) The recommendations must incorporate the gap analysis required by this section. The recommendations must include information about how the grant program can complement and avoid competing with existing conservation programs, and provide cost share benefits to existing and new programs designed to improve water quality, critical habitats, and soil health and soil-health research on farm, aquatic or timber lands.

(iii) The recommendations must be developed with input from stakeholder meetings with representatives from the environmental and agricultural communities.

(c) The commission and the department of agriculture must provide an update to the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2019, and final recommendations by November 1, 2019.

(((6)))(5) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6091 (WA food policy forum). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((7)))(6) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6306 (soil health initiative). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((8)))(7) $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5947 (sustainable farms and fields). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2311 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1207. 2020 c 357 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$76,116,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($87,539,000))

$85,234,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($140,234,000))

$139,304,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($69,619,000))

$69,289,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($701,000))

$626,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,873,000))

$11,871,000

Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,333,000))

$3,323,000

Warm Water Game Fish Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,825,000))

$2,810,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$675,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($115,447,000))

$115,153,000

Special Wildlife Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,904,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$517,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,653,000))

$3,647,000

Wildlife Rehabilitation Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$361,000

Ballast Water and Biofouling Management Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,947,000))

$2,924,000

Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery

Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,001,000

Oil Spill Prevention Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,199,000))

$1,183,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,906,000))

$1,237,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,186,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$524,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($513,141,000))

$527,895,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $467,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($467,000))$767,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

(2) $415,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $415,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $440,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for county assessments.

(3)(a) A legislative task force is established to recommend a group or entity to review the department's budget requests in place of the hatchery scientific review group. The task force is comprised of two members from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, and two members from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house. The task force shall be staffed by the office of program research and senate committee services. The task force must consult with tribes.

(b) The task force must review the purpose and activities of the hatchery scientific review group and develop recommendations for the legislature to establish a replacement group or entity that will analyze state spending and projects related to hatcheries that are proposed in state operating and capital budgets. Among other things, the task force shall recommend a process by which the replacement organization or entity, starting with the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, contracts with the department to review the department's proposed agency biennial operating and capital budget requests related to state fish hatcheries prior to submission to the office of financial management. This review shall: (i) Examine if the proposed requests are consistent with independent scientific review standards using best available science; (ii) evaluate the components of the request based on the independent needs of each particular watershed and the return of salmonids including naturally spawning, endangered, and hatchery stocks; and (iii) evaluate whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost-effective manner. This process must require the department to provide a copy of the review to the office of financial management and the legislature with its agency budget proposal.

(c) The task force shall report to the legislature on its findings and recommendations by December 1, 2019.

(4) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers.

(5) $762,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $24,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5577 (orca whales/vessels).

(6) $156,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $155,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects funded in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(7) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to develop a pinto abalone recovery plan, expand field work, conduct genetics and disease assessments, and establish three satellite grow-out facilities. $150,000 of the appropriation per fiscal year is for competitive grants to nonprofit organizations to assist in recovery and restoration work of native shellfish.

(8) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, are provided solely for the department to increase the work of regional fisheries enhancement groups.

(9) $457,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $457,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $110,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to pay for costs to maintain upgraded network infrastructure and pay the debt service on purchased equipment.

(10) $165,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $166,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $495,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation are provided solely for new service or vendor costs, including PC leases, mobile devices, a remote management system, IT issue tracking technology, and virtual private network services.

(11) $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are appropriated for the department to increase hatchery production of salmon throughout the Puget Sound, coast, and Columbia river. Increases in hatchery production must be prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas. The department shall work with federal partners, tribal co-managers, and other interested parties when developing annual hatchery production plans. These increases shall be done consistent with best available science, most recent hatchery standards, and endangered species act requirements, and include adaptive management provisions to ensure the conservation and enhancement of wild stocks. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 in fiscal year 2020 is for wells and generators at the Samish hatchery.

(12) $2,257,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,785,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to grant to the northwest Indian fisheries commission to grant to tribes for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,535,000 in each fiscal year is for additional hatchery production in the following amounts per fiscal year: $150,000 for the Quinault Indian Nation, $169,000 for the Tulalip Tribes, $268,000 for the Quileute Tribe, $186,000 for the Puyallup Tribe, $112,000 for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, $23,000 for the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, $207,000 for the Squaxin Island Tribe, $142,000 for the Skokomish Indian Tribe, and $278,000 for the Lummi Nation.

(b) $472,000 in fiscal year 2020 is for improvements to hatchery facilities that support additional hatchery production in the following amounts: $98,000 for the Tulalip Tribes, $38,000 for the Puyallup Tribe, $14,000 for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, $25,000 for the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, $200,000 for the Squaxin Island Tribe, $24,000 for the Skokomish Indian Tribe, and $73,000 for the Lummi Nation.

(13) $771,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide to tribes for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $76,000 in each fiscal year is for the Yakama Nation for additional hatchery production, $195,000 in fiscal year 2020 is for the Yakama Nation for improvements to hatchery facilities, and $500,000 in fiscal year 2020 is for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation for improvements to hatchery facilities.

(14) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to grant to public utility districts for additional hatchery production that is prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas and other species that are critical to the marine food web. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $250,000 in fiscal year 2021 is for Puget Sound energy for water supply system improvements at the Baker river fish hatchery.

(15) $1,201,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,520,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the following activities to increase the availability of salmon for southern resident orcas: Surveying forage fish populations, conducting rulemaking for fish screens, reducing salmon predation by nonnative fish, prioritizing fish barrier removal, developing a strategy to reestablish salmon runs above dams, and increasing review of shoreline armoring proposals to protect forage fish.

(16) $710,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to migrate to the state data center and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(17) $278,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $278,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to the Lummi Nation to increase salmon production at the Skookum creek hatchery and the Lummi bay hatchery.

(18) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2097 (statewide wolf recovery).

(19) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department for elk management in the Skagit valley in cooperation with affected tribes and landowners. Authorized expenditures include, but are not limited to, elk fencing and replacement hay to mitigate the impacts of elk on agricultural crop production.

(20) $49,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $47,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $37,000 of the state wildlife account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1579 (chinook abundance).

(21) $357,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for suppression, eradication, and monitoring of northern pike in the Columbia river. The department must work with the Spokane Tribe of Indians, the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation, and the Kalispel Tribe of Indians on identifying appropriate actions to reduce threats to anadromous salmon from invasive northern pike.

(((23)))(22) $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely as matching funds for a federal grant to purchase two law enforcement vessels and equip them with optic system equipment to conduct marine patrols including vessel enforcement patrols related to southern resident orcas.

(((24)))(23) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to increase enforcement of commercial and recreational vessel regulations for the protection of southern resident orcas in central and southern Puget Sound.

(((29) $252,000))(24) $516,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5481 (collective bargaining/WDFW). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(30)))(25) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to conduct a master planning process, to result in a plan, to assess and prioritize hatchery improvements based on the recommendations of the southern resident killer whale task force, including prioritization given for a new Cowlitz river salmon hatchery. The plan must include prioritized capital budget projects. The plan shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 15, 2021.

(((31)))(26) $462,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for expanded management of pinniped populations on the lower Columbia river and its tributaries with the goal of increasing chinook salmon abundance and prey availability for southern resident orcas. The department may only expend funds in this subsection after receiving necessary permits from the national marine fisheries service.

(((32)))(27) $112,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2311 (greenhouse gas emissions). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(33)))(28) $1,262,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the costs for the department to maintain shellfish sanitation activities necessary to implement its memorandum of understanding with the department of health to ensure the state is compliant with its federal obligations under the model ordinance of the national shellfish sanitation program.

(((34)))(29) $142,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for work addressing fish passage barriers, including data analysis and mapping to identify streams and barriers that have the greatest potential benefit to listed salmon populations, southern resident orca whales, and fisheries. In conducting this work, the department must consult with tribes and coordinate with the department of transportation's fish barrier work plans.

(((35)))(30) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $166,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington academy of sciences to complete the following activities:

(a) By December 1, 2020, and consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the department must submit a report to the legislature that assesses how to incorporate a net ecological gain standard into state land use, development, and environmental laws and rules to achieve a goal of better statewide performance on ecological health and endangered species recovery, including the recovery of salmon in order to fulfill tribal treaty obligations and achieve the delisting of threatened or endangered runs. The report must address each environmental, development, or land use law or rule where the existing standard is less protective of ecological integrity than the standard of net ecological gain, including the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW; the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW; and construction projects in state waters regulated under 77.55 RCW.

(b) In developing the report under this subsection, the department must consult with the appropriate local governments, state agencies, federally recognized Indian tribes, and stakeholders with subject matter expertise on environmental, land use, and development laws including, but not limited to, cities, counties, ports, the department of ecology, and the department of commerce. The department's consultation process under this subsection must include a total of at least two meetings at which local governments, state agencies, federally recognized Indian tribes, and stakeholders may provide input.

(c) The report must include:

(i) The development of a definition, goals, objectives, and measurable performance metrics for the standard of net ecological gain;

(ii) An assessment and analysis of opportunities and challenges, including legal issues and costs for state and local governments to achieve net ecological gain through both:

(A) Implementation of a standard of net ecological gain under different environmental, development, and land use laws; and

(B) An enhanced approach to implementing and monitoring no net loss in existing environmental, development, and land use laws;

(iii) Recommendations on funding, incentives, technical assistance, legal issues, monitoring, and use of scientific data, and other applicable considerations to the integration of net ecological gain into each environmental, developmental, and land use law or rule;

(iv) Assessments of how applying a standard of net ecological gain in the context of each environmental, land use, or development law is likely to achieve substantial additional environmental or social co-benefits; and

(v) Assessments of why existing standards of ecological protectiveness, such as no net loss standards, have been sufficient or insufficient to protect ecological health and achieve endangered species recovery.

Sec. 1208. 2020 c 357 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$98,897,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($67,682,000))

$109,620,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($34,980,000))

$48,644,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,534,000))

$3,411,000

Forest Development Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($54,238,000))

$53,859,000

ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,174,000))

$8,104,000

Surveys and Maps Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,598,000))

$2,582,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,249,000))

$14,075,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($128,545,000))

$127,552,000

Surface Mining Reclamation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,113,000))

$4,086,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,068,000

Park Land Trust Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($750,000))

$671,000

Forest and Fish Support Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,356,000))

$16,347,000

Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$402,000

Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$39,000

Forest Fire Protection Assessment Nonappropriated

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,896,000))

$5,721,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,433,000))

$6,013,000

Forest Practices Application Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,018,000))

$2,005,000

Air Pollution Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($901,000))

$899,000

NOVA Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($781,000))

$775,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,240,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,001,000))

$1,992,000

Community Forest Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$52,000

Agricultural College Trust Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,183,000))

$3,160,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$325,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($481,455,000))

$535,539,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,583,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,515,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(2) $41,514,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($16,546,000))$59,612,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $16,050,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation are provided solely for emergency response, including fire suppression and COVID-19. The appropriations provided in this subsection may not be used to fund the department's indirect and administrative expenses. The department's indirect and administrative costs shall be allocated among its remaining accounts and appropriations. The department shall provide a monthly report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature with an update of fire suppression costs incurred and the number and type of wildfires suppressed.

(3) $5,500,000 of the forest and fish support account—state appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $500,000 is contingent upon receipts under RCW 82.04.261 exceeding eight million dollars per biennium. If receipts under RCW 82.04.261 are more than eight million dollars but less than eight million five hundred thousand dollars for the biennium, an amount equivalent to the difference between actual receipts and eight million five hundred thousand dollars shall lapse.

(4) $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board. The forest practices board shall submit a report to the legislature following review, approval, and solicitation of public comment on the cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research master project schedule, to include: Cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science and related adaptive management expenditure details, accomplishments, the use of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research science in decision-making, and funding needs for the coming biennium. The report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2020.

(5) Consistent with the recommendations of the Wildfire Suppression Funding and Costs (18-02) report of the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2019, and December 1, 2020, describing the previous fire season. At a minimum, the report shall provide information for each wildfire in the state, including its location, impact by type of land ownership, the extent it involved timber or range lands, cause, size, costs, and cost-share with federal agencies and nonstate partners. The report must also be posted on the agency's web site.

(6) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $27,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy).

(7) $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $12,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5550 (pesticide application safety).

(8) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5330 (small forestland).

(9) $42,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5106 (natural disaster mitigation).

(10) $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $26,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5597 (aerial herbicide application).

(11) $4,486,000 of the aquatic land enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for the removal of creosote pilings and debris from the marine environment and to continue monitoring zooplankton and eelgrass beds on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department. Actions will address recommendations to recover the southern resident orca population and to monitor ocean acidification as well as help implement the Puget Sound action agenda.

(12) $304,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the cleanup of the Fairview avenue site near Lake Union in Seattle. The aquatic site is contaminated with lead, chromium, and arsenic. This will be the department's final payment toward remediation costs.

(13) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to identify priority kelp restoration locations in central Puget Sound, based on historic locations, and monitor the role of natural kelp beds in moderating pH conditions in Puget Sound.

(14) $188,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $187,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with the Olympic natural resources center to study emerging ecosystem threats such as Swiss needlecast disease, conduct field trials for long-term ecosystem productivity and T3 watershed experiments, and engage stakeholders. The department must contract with the Olympic natural resources center for at least $187,000 per fiscal year. The department may retain up to $30,000 per fiscal year to conduct Swiss needlecast surveys and research. Administrative costs may be taken and are limited to twenty-seven percent of the amount of appropriation retained by the department.

(15) $22,843,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $11,364,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $4,000,000 of the forest fire protection assessment nonappropriated account—state appropriation are provided solely for wildfire response, to include funding full time fire engine leaders, increasing the number of correctional camp fire crews in western Washington, purchasing two helicopters, providing dedicated staff to conduct fire response training, creating a fire prevention outreach program, forest health administration, landowner technical assistance, conducting forest health treatments on federal lands and implementing the department's twenty-year forest health strategic plan, post-wildfire landslide assessments, and other measures necessary for wildfire suppression and prevention.

(16) $186,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for compensation to the trust beneficiaries and department for lost revenue from leases to amateur radio operators who use space on the department managed radio towers for their equipment. The department is authorized to lease sites at the rate of up to one hundred dollars per year, per site, per lessee. The legislature makes this appropriation to fulfill the remaining costs of the leases at market rate per RCW 79.13.510.

(17) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to conduct post wildfire landslide hazard assessments and reports.

(18) $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $266,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for paving the road access to Leader lake in northeast Washington.

(19) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to conduct an analysis of revenue impacts to the state forestlands taxing district beneficiaries as a result of the proposed long-term conservation strategy for the marbled murrelet. The department shall consult with state forestlands taxing district beneficiary representatives on the analysis. The department shall make the analysis available to state forestlands taxing districts and submit it to the board of natural resources by September 30, 2019.

(20) $150,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for continued facilitation and support services for the marine resources advisory council.

(21) $217,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the state marine management plan and ongoing costs of the Washington coastal marine advisory council to serve as a forum and provide recommendations on coastal management issues.

(22) $485,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $485,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1784 (wildfire prevention).

(23)(a) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the following activities:

(i) Conducting carbon inventories to build on existing efforts to understand carbon stocks, flux, trends, emissions, and sequestration across Washington's natural and working lands, including harvested wood products, wildfire emissions, land management activities, and sawmill energy use and emissions. Where feasible, the department shall use available existing data and information to conduct this inventory and analysis. For the purposes of this section, natural and working land types include forests, croplands, rangelands, wetlands, grasslands, aquatic lands, and urban green space.

(ii) Compiling and providing access to information on existing opportunities for carbon compensation services and other incentive-based carbon reducing programs to assist owners of private and other nonstate owned or managed forestland interested in voluntarily engaging in carbon markets.

(b) By December 1, 2020, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the results of the inventories required under this section, and assessing actions that may improve the efficiency and effectiveness of carbon inventory activities on natural and working lands, including carbon sequestration in harvested forest products. The department must also describe any barriers, including costs, to the use of voluntary, incentive-based carbon reducing or sequestering programs. The department may also include recommendations for additional work or legislation that may be advisable resulting from the advisory group created in this subsection as part of this report.

(c) The department must form a natural and working lands carbon sequestration advisory group to help guide the activities provided in this section. The advisory group must be composed of a balance of representatives reflecting the diverse interests and expertise involved on the subject of carbon sequestration on natural and working lands.

(24) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to increase technical assistance to small forestland owners.

(((26) $93,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation and $93,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6027 (floating residences). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27)))(25) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by July 2020 information on those parcels currently used for commercial or nonresource use purposes and those identified by the department as transition lands likely to be sold or redeveloped for nonresource use. By January 2021 the department shall bring to the legislature for its consideration a modernization package in the form of request legislation to update and remove performance barriers to the long-term management of state trust lands, considering both market and nonmarket values, ensuring intergenerational equity, and long term benefits for the trust beneficiaries and the public. The appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature shall be kept informed of all proposed transactions, land sales, and exchanges involving trust lands prior to approval by the board, and all related financial and legal documents shall be available as public records immediately following the transaction's completion, as allowed under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(((29)))(26) $325,000 of the performance audit of state government account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in cooperation with the wildland fire advisory committee established under RCW 76.04.179 and the office of financial management, to conduct a zero-based budget and performance review of its resource protection program. The review shall be specifically focused on the wildfire program operating budget and activities. Throughout the review process the department shall submit monthly updates of actual and estimated fire expenditures, and obligated cost related to fire suppression to the fiscal committees of the legislature. A report of the review shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020. The report shall contain a description of findings, list of changes made, and recommendations and options for accounting structure changes. The review under this subsection shall include:

(a) A statement of the statutory basis or other basis for the creation of each subprogram within the resource protection program and the history of each subprogram that is being reviewed;

(b) A description of how each subprogram fits within the strategic plan and goals of the agency and an analysis of the quantified objectives of each subprogram within the agency;

(c) Any available performance measures indicating the effectiveness and efficiency of each subprogram program;

(d) A description with supporting cost and staffing data of each program and the populations served by each program, and the level of funding and staff required to accomplish the goals of the subprogram program if different than the actual maintenance level;

(e) An analysis of the major costs and benefits of operating each subprogram and the rationale for specific expenditure and staffing levels;

(f) An analysis estimating each subprogram's administrative and other overhead costs;

(g) An analysis of the levels of services provided;

(h) An analysis estimating the amount of funds or benefits that actually reach the intended recipients;

(i) An analysis of terminology used to describe wildfire suppression, prevention, preparedness, forest health, pre-suppression, and any other term used to describe program activities and provide definitions for each. This should include cross reference to federal definitions and federal funding;

(j) An analysis of inconsistencies and increased costs associated with the decentralized nature of organizational authority and operations, including recommendations for the creation of policy and procedures and subsequent oversight for dispersed operations;

(k) An analysis of the department's budgeting and accounting processes, including work done at the central, program, and region levels, with specific focus on efficiencies to be gained by centralized budget control; and

(l) A review of the progress and findings of the ongoing internal department fire business transformation team related to current practices in wildfire business and the development of an organizational structure governing fire business practices across the department which complies with all state and federal statutes and agreements and which meets the needs of the department as a whole.

(((30)))(27) $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $9,000 of the forest development account—state appropriation, and $15,000 of the resource management cost account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1521 (government contracting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(31)))(28) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2311 (greenhouse gas emissions). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1209. 2020 c 357 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$19,030,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($20,514,000))

$19,955,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($32,646,000))

$32,859,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$193,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,533,000))

$2,518,000

Northeast Washington Wolf-Livestock Management

Nonappropriated Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$320,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,930,000))

$6,591,000

Water Quality Permit Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$73,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$635,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
$635,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,036,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($84,545,000))

$83,845,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,108,445 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $6,102,905 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing the food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

(2) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $59,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5550 (pesticide application safety).

(3) The appropriations in this section includes sufficient funding for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5959 (livestock identification).

(4) $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $18,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5597 (aerial herbicide application).

(5) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5447 (dairy milk assessment fee).

(6) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department's regional markets program, which includes the small farm direct marketing program under RCW 15.64.050 and the farm-to-school program under RCW 15.64.060.

(7) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the northwest Washington fair youth education programs.

(8) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $202,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5552 (pollinators).

(9) $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $52,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to migrate to the state data center and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(10) $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to continue to convene and facilitate a food policy forum and to implement recommendations identified through the previous work of the food policy forum.

(a) The department shall coordinate implementation of the forum with the conservation commission and the office of farmland preservation.

(b) The director of the department and the director of the conservation commission shall jointly appoint members of the forum, and no appointment may be made unless each director concurs in the appointment.

(c) In addition to members appointed by the directors, four legislators may serve on the food policy forum in an ex officio capacity. Legislative participants must be appointed as follows:

(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and

(ii) The majority leader and minority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(d) Meetings of the forum may be scheduled by either the director of the department or the director of the conservation commission.

(e) Staffing for the forum must be provided by the department working jointly with staff from the conservation commission.

(f) The department and conservation commission shall jointly develop the agenda for each forum meeting as well as a report from the food policy forum. The report must contain recommendations and a workplan to implement the recommendations and must be delivered to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by June 30, 2021.

(11) $212,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5276 (hemp production).

(12) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to review and assist with agricultural economic development in southwest Washington. Funding is provided for the department to perform or contract for agricultural economic development services, including but not limited to grant application assistance, permitting assistance and coordination, and development of a food hub.

(13) $250,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue a shellfish coordinator position. The shellfish coordinator assists the industry with complying with regulatory requirements and will work with regulatory agencies to identify ways to streamline and make more transparent the permit process for establishing and maintaining shellfish operations.

(14) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the following activities:

(a) The department and the conservation commission must produce a gap analysis reviewing existing conservation grant programs and completed voluntary stewardship program plans to identify what technical assistance and cost-share resources are needed to meet the requirements placed on those activities by the legislature.

(b)(i) The department, in collaboration with the conservation commission, must develop recommendations for legislation or additional work that may be needed to implement a sustainable farms and fields grant program that prioritizes funding based on net reduction of greenhouse gas emissions on farm, aquatic, or ranch lands, including carbon sequestration.

(ii) The recommendations must incorporate the gap analysis required by this section. The recommendations must include information about how the program can complement and avoid competing with existing conservation programs, and provide cost share benefits to existing and new programs designed to improve water quality, critical habitats, and soil health and soil-health research on farm, aquatic, or timber lands.

(iii) The recommendations must be developed with input from stakeholder meetings with representatives from the environmental and agricultural communities.

(c) The department and the conservation commission must provide an update to the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2019, and final recommendations by November 1, 2019.

(15) $650,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for research grants to assist with development of an integrated pest management plan to address burrowing shrimp in Willapa bay and Grays harbor and facilitate continued shellfish cultivation on tidelands. In selecting research grant recipients for this purpose, the department must incorporate the advice of the Willapa-Grays harbor working group formed from the settlement agreement with the department of ecology signed on October 15, 2019.

(16) $58,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6091 (WA food policy forum). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17) $87,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct the following:

(a) The department must work with the departments of natural resources, labor and industries, health, and ecology, as well as local health jurisdictions and the state poison center, and consult with nongovernmental stakeholders including, but not limited to, tribal and environmental representatives, to evaluate pesticide investigation rules and processes. By June 30, 2021, the work group must report back to the legislature with any recommended changes, including how complaints should be reported and ensuring that complaints are properly referred.

(b) The department in coordination with the department of natural resources, in consultation with stakeholders, shall review how the state environmental policy act is used for aerial application of herbicides and provide recommendations to the forest practices board and the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives, including any recommendations for revisions to statute, rule, or guidance by October 31, 2020.

(18) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5947 (sustainable farms and fields). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(19) (($299,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6518 (pesticide, chlorpyrifos). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20))) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6306 (soil health initiative). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((21)))(20) $320,000 of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of agriculture to contract with the northeast Washington wolf cattle collaborative, a nonprofit organization, for range riders to conduct proactive deterrence activities with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves on United States forest service grazing allotments and adjoining private lands in the Kettle mountains in Ferry county north of United States highway 20. The contract must provide that the organization must share all relevant information with the department of fish and wildlife in a timely manner to aid in wolf management decisions. Additionally, range riders must document their activities with geo-referenced photo points and provide written description of their efforts to the department of fish and wildlife by December 31, 2020.

(((22)))(21) $17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $64,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2524 (ag. product negotiations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24)))(22) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for infrastructure and equipment grants to food banks and meal programs for the safe storage and distribution of perishable food. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $10,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $5,000 in fiscal year 2021 are for the department to administer the grants and to convene a community stakeholder group to review the grant applications described in (b)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection. The community stakeholder group must include representatives from food banks and meal programs that are not applying for grants, community advocates, and people that use food banks or meal programs.

(b) $40,000 in fiscal year 2020 and $445,000 in fiscal year 2021 are for grants, divided into the following three categories:

(i) Thirty-five percent is for a rebate program for smaller food pantries and meal programs to purchase equipment costing up to $2,000. To increase efficiency, the department may pass funding for this rebate program to larger food banks to administer the rebates;

(ii) Thirty percent is for requests for proposals for larger projects costing up to $75,000, and which require a community match of at least thirty percent; and

(iii) Thirty-five percent is for larger projects that are collaborations between organizations and have a proposed impact to improve efficiency and capacity for a regional or statewide emergency food system, and which require a community match of at least fifty percent.

(((25)))(23) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the department to provide to the sheriff's departments of Ferry county and Stevens county to cooperate with the department and the department of fish and wildlife on wolf management activities. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $20,000 is for the Ferry county sheriff's department and $20,000 is for the Stevens county sheriff's department.

(((26)))(24) $38,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($63,000))$153,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing an Asian giant hornet eradication program.

(((28)))(25) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding for the department to work with representatives from Canada and other stakeholders to develop labeling standards regarding country of origin for beef and other meat products. The standards are for the purpose of clearly displaying the country of origin for beef or other meat products sold to the public. The department shall report and propose any legislation and administrative changes that may be needed to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2020.

Sec. 1210. 2020 c 357 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($881,000))

$892,000

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,749,000))

$1,737,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,630,000))

$2,629,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $71,000 of the pollution liability insurance program trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6257 (underground storage tanks). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $144,000 of the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6256 (heating oil insurance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1211. 2020 c 357 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$4,717,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($4,798,000))

$4,483,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,728,000))

$12,638,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,444,000))

$1,432,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($755,000))

$837,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$276,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($24,718,000))

$24,383,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By October 15, 2020, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor and appropriate legislative fiscal committees a single, prioritized list of state agency 2021-2023 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound restoration.

(2) $1,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the partnership to implement a competitive, peer-reviewed process for soliciting, prioritizing, and funding research projects designed to advance scientific understanding of Puget Sound recovery. Solicitations and project selection for effectiveness monitoring will be organized and overseen by the Puget Sound ecosystem monitoring program. Initial projects will focus on implementation and effectiveness of Chinook recovery efforts, effectiveness of actions to restore shellfish beds, and implementation of priority studies of the Salish Sea marine survival project. Monitoring reports must be provided in context to the overall success and progress of Puget Sound recovery efforts.

(3) $237,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $263,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for coordinating updates to the outdated Puget Sound chinook salmon recovery plan, provide support for adaptive management of local watershed chapters, and advance regional work on salmon and ecosystem recovery through local integrating organizations.

(4) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $500,000)), $404,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $96,000 model toxics control operating account—state appropriation are provided solely for additional monitoring and accountability actions in response to recommendations from the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(End of part)

PART XIII

TRANSPORTATION

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1301. 2020 c 357 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,805,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($6,109,000))

$3,121,000

Architects' License Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,641,000))

$1,631,000

Real Estate Commission Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,422,000))

$13,273,000

Uniform Commercial Code Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,979,000))

$2,614,000

Real Estate Education Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$276,000

Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,707,000))

$1,575,000

Business and Professions Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($26,855,000))

$24,597,000

Real Estate Research Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$415,000

Firearms Range Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$74,000

Landscape Architects' License Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($126,000))

$124,000

Appraisal Management Company Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($442,000))

$435,000

Concealed Pistol License Renewal Notification

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$140,000

Geologists' Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($114,000))

$113,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$96,000

Derelict Vessel Removal Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($59,234,000))

$52,322,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Appropriations provided for the business and technology modernization project in this section are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(2) $72,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5480 (real estate appraisers).

(3) $144,000 of the business and professions account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5641 (uniform law on notarial acts).

(4) $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to mail vessel registration renewal reminders.

(5) $1,003,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($3,050,000))$90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the department to procure a commercial off-the-shelf solution to replace the legacy firearms system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(6) $72,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $601,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2555 (other firearms/background). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) $22,000 of the uniform commercial code account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6074 (financial fraud/theft crimes). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(8) $19,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6528 (derelict vessel prevention). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1302. 2020 c 357 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$57,529,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($58,775,000))

$58,305,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,690,000))

$16,641,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,091,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,098,000))

$8,505,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,550,000))

$4,488,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,644,000))

$1,618,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$119,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$18,470,000

Washington Internet Crimes Against Children Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,765,000))

$10,023,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($588,000))

$584,000

((Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000))

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,447,000))

$15,639,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,453,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,793,000))

$2,423,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,300,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($198,527,000))

$204,819,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($8,000,000))$18,470,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(2) $2,878,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for the completion of the state patrol's plan to upgrade the criminal history system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(3) $2,453,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($2,793,000))$2,423,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state patrol's drug enforcement task force. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for the following:

(a) $2,423,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,423,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state patrol to partner with multi-jurisdictional drug and gang task forces to detect, deter, and dismantle criminal organizations involved in criminal activity including diversion of marijuana from the legalized market and the illicit production and distribution of marijuana and marijuana-related products in Washington state.

(b) $30,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and $370,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are))is provided solely for a case management system to serve as a repository for all information regarding criminal cases. This system must allow state patrol investigators to enter information and to search to provide patterns, trends, and links which will allow the state patrol to identify connections on criminal investigations including efforts to dismantle marijuana and other drug trafficking organizations by identifying their established networks, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(4) $479,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5181 (invol. treatment procedures).

(5) $13,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(6) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5605 (marijuana misdemeanors).

(7) $679,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $643,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for addressing a backlog of toxicology tests in the toxicology laboratory.

(8) $1,500,000 of the Washington internet crimes against children account—state appropriation is provided solely for the missing and exploited children's task force within the patrol to help prevent possible abuse to children and other vulnerable citizens from sexual abuse.

(9) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $298,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriations are provided solely for increased supply and maintenance costs for the crime laboratory division and toxicology laboratory division.

(10) $5,770,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $3,243,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,277,000 of the death investigations account—state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1166 (sexual assault).

(11) $282,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $263,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1713 (Native American women).

(12) $510,000 of the county criminal justice assistance account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to support local police, sheriffs' departments, and multiagency task forces in the prosecution of criminals. However, the office of financial management must reduce the allotment of the amount provided in this subsection if allotment of the full appropriation will put the account into deficit.

(13) $1,000,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(14) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state patrol to develop a plan for implementation of a centralized firearm background check system. Funding is sufficient to fund a consultant to design an information technology system to conduct firearm background checks through a centralized system and a Washington state patrol project manager to design the implementation plan. The design should include recommendations to comply with the direction in RCW 9.41.139 and leverage the new firearms database system currently being procured by the department of licensing to create one streamlined system. The Washington state patrol shall convene an interagency work group to inform the centralized firearm background check system implementation plan, to include but not limited to the department of licensing, administrative office of the courts, health care authority, and office of financial management. Reports on the information technology system and the implementation plan shall be provided to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(15) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for collaboration with Washington State University to produce the report in section 604 of this act.

(16) $34,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2318 (criminal investigatory practices). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(17) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2793 (criminal records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18) $1,045,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for costs associated with enhanced security measures on the capitol campus from January 6, 2021, through January 21, 2021.

(19) $1,379,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for costs associated with enhanced security measures on the capitol campus from January 21, 2021, through June 30, 2021. Upon completion of the 2021 legislative session, the Washington state patrol will assess whether additional security is needed on the capitol campus and reduce security measures as appropriate.

(20) Funding is provided in this section for facility and staff costs associated with construction of a second toxicology laboratory facility in Federal Way. The Washington state patrol must provide a report on the progress of the toxicology lab construction semiannually to the fiscal committees of the legislature with a final report due 90 days after completion of the project. The report must include, but is not limited to:

(a) A detailed list of expenditures to date of the report;

(b) A detailed list of expenditure yet to be made before the completion of the project;

(c) An updated project timeline with expected end date; and

(d) Other project details that the Washington state patrol finds important to relay.

(End of part)

PART XIV

EDUCATION

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1401. 2020 c 357 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$31,265,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($30,350,000))

$28,815,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($99,355,000))

$104,201,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$8,060,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,265,000))

$265,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$522,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
$530,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,126,000

Performance Audits of Government Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$213,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($176,686,000))

$175,997,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) BASE OPERATIONS AND EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE

(a) $11,109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($11,883,000))$12,891,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(i) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.

(ii) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school, using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the superintendent.

(iii) By October 31st of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in section 501, chapter 415, Laws of 2019 and sections 513 and 520 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements.

(iv) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the secretary of state, shall update the program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.

(v) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (A) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (B) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(vi) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide statewide oversight and coordination to the regional nursing corps program supported through the educational service districts.

(b) $857,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,217,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for maintenance of the apportionment system, including technical staff and the data governance working group.

(c) $2,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for activities associated with the implementation of chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education) within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), up to $300,000 is for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to review the use of local revenues for compliance with enrichment requirements, including the preballot approval of enrichment levy spending plans approved by the superintendent of public instruction, and any supplemental contracts entered into under RCW 28A.400.200.

(d) $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $494,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.

(e)(i) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

(ii) Within amounts provided in this subsection, the committee must review the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills, including professional development available to educators and other assessment materials and tools, and make recommendations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education committees of the legislature on the following topics:

(A) Opportunities for reducing bias in the observational assessment process and materials; and

(B) Barriers to implementation of the inventory.

(iii) The committee shall seek feedback from relevant stakeholders, including but not limited to:

(A) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(B) The department of children, youth, and families;

(C) Kindergarten teachers who are representative of or who teach in schools with diverse student subgroups;

(D) A representative from a tribal school who is currently using the inventory;

(E) Principals who are currently using the inventory;

(F) Parents who are representative of student populations that have historically scored low on the inventory, and who are recommended by an organization that serves parents of color;

(G) District assessment coordinators; and

(H) Early childhood providers.

(f) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).

(g) $265,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation is provided solely for activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(h) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education shall adopt a rule that the minimum number of students to be used for public reporting and federal accountability purposes is ten.

(i) $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $123,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.

(j) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178, Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).

(k) $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $14,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 242, Laws of 2013 (state-tribal education compacts).

(l) $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $131,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $213,000 of the performance audits of government account—state appropriation are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform on-going program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(m) $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $117,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (computer science).

(n) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators).

(o) $235,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for professional learning and technical assistance to support the ongoing implementation of since time immemorial tribal sovereignty curriculum, tribal consultation and engagement, government to government training, and data collection and identification of American Indian and Alaska Native students. The professional development must be done in collaboration with school district administrators and school directors. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the office, the Washington state school directors' association government-to-government task force, and the association of educational service districts to collaborate with the tribal leaders congress on education to develop a tribal consultation training and schedule. The tribal consultation training and schedule must be developed by January 1, 2022.

(p) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $205,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.

(q) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state.

(r) $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $481,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.

(s) The superintendent of public instruction must study and make recommendations for how Washington can make dual credit enrollment cost-free to students who are enrolled in running start, college in the high school, advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or other qualifying dual credit programs within existing basic education apportionments. While developing recommendations, the superintendent must collaborate and consult with K-12 and higher education stakeholders with expertise in dual credit instruction, transcription, and costs. The superintendent shall report the recommendations to the education policy and operating budget committees of the legislature by November 1, 2019. The recommendations must, at a minimum, consider:

(i) How to increase dual credit offerings and access for students that aligns with the student's high school and beyond plan and provides a pathway to education and training after high school, including careers, professional-technical education, apprenticeship, a college degree, or military service, among others.

(ii) How to ensure transfer of college credits earned by dual credit students to/among institutions of higher education.

(iii) How basic education funding will be used to provide for fees, books, and other direct costs charged by institutions of higher education and K-12 districts.

(iv) How K-12 and postsecondary institutions will equitably expand dual credit opportunities for students.

(v) How K-12 and postsecondary institutions will ensure coordinated advising and support services for students enrolled in, or considering enrollment in, dual credit programs.

(t) $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $44,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to pay for services for space in the state data center and networking charges.

(u) $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $46,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a new server and backup application due to the move to the state data center.

(v) $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the consolidated technology services to host the office's web site and for web site maintenance and support services.

(w) Districts shall report to the office the results of each collective bargaining agreement for certificated staff within their district using a uniform template as required by the superintendent, within thirty days of finalizing contracts. The data must include but is not limited to: Minimum and maximum base salaries, supplemental salary information, and average percent increase for all certificated instructional staff. Within existing resources by December 1st of each year, the office shall produce a report for the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee summarizing the district level collective bargaining agreement data.

(x) The office shall review and update the guidelines "prohibiting discrimination in Washington public schools," which must include religious accommodations. Students' sincerely held religious beliefs and practices must be reasonably accommodated with respect to all examinations and other requirements to successfully complete coursework.

(y) In section 116(8) of this act, the office of the education ombuds is directed to develop a plan to implement a program to promote skills, knowledge, and awareness concerning issues of diversity, equity, and inclusion among families with school-age children, with a report due to the governor and the appropriate committees in the legislature by September 1, 2020. Within amounts provided in this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate on the plan and report.

(z) In section 129(13) of this act, the office of financial management is directed to review and report on the pupil transportation funding system for K-12 education, the report is due to the governor and the appropriate committees in the legislature by August 1, 2020. Within amounts provided in this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate on this review.

(aa) $2,485,000 of the general fund—federal (CRRSA/ESSER) appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office to update the apportionment and accounting systems and to oversee grant administration. The office shall contract with an organization which specializes in developing tools to combine internal and external data sets and provide data analytics and visualizations and custom workflows to match existing data processes, without requiring data science or technical expertise by the end user to provide accurate reporting and accountability regarding use of federal emergency relief funds. The organization must have demonstrated experience providing such tools to state education agencies in the past five years. The contract must provide access to the developed tools to the state education agency, selected educational service districts, and up to five local education agencies.

(2) DATA SYSTEMS

(a) $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,802,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).

(b) $1,221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $281,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(c) $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $450,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.

(3) WORK GROUPS

(a) $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 206, Laws of 2018 (career and college readiness).

(b) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act).

(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration and division of vocational rehabilitation, shall explore the development of an implementation plan to build statewide capacity among school districts to improve transition planning for students in special education who meet criteria for services from the developmental disabilities administration, and shall provide all school districts with an opportunity to participate. The plan shall be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 by November 1, 2018, and the final report must be submitted by November 1, 2020, to the governor and appropriate legislative committees. The final report must include the following:

(i) An examination of whether a data share agreement between the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration, division of vocational rehabilitation, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction would improve coordination among the three agencies;

(ii) Defined roles for the associated stakeholders involved with the transition of students potentially eligible for services from the developmental disabilities administration, including but not limited to:

(A) The department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration;

(B) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(C) The division of vocational rehabilitation at the department of social and health services;

(D) School districts across the state of Washington; and

(E) Counties coordinating employment and day services.

(iii) An examination of the feasibility of a statewide developmental disabilities transition council, including representative positions, roles and responsibilities, costs, and data collection; and

(iv) Recommendations for supporting seamless transition from school to post-school life, up to and including potential legislation and funding, regional interagency transition networks, and coordination between counties, schools, and other partners for transition supports.

(d) $40,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the legislative youth advisory council. The council of statewide members advises legislators on issues of importance to youth.

(e) $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $118,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 75, Laws of 2018 (dyslexia).

(f) $183,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $48,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1130 (pub. school language access).

(g) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5082 (social emotional learning).

(h) (((i))) (i) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene a work group to develop recommendations for integrating, in a regular and ongoing basis, African American history, examinations of racism, and the history of the civil rights movement into curriculum provided to students in grades seven through twelve. Recommendations developed in accordance with this subsection must be preceded by a work group review of pertinent curriculum that is available to school districts, and must include recommendations for the professional development needed to support educators in providing the instruction to students.

(ii) The work group must consist of one representative from each of the following: (A) The Washington state commission on African American affairs; (B) the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee; and (C) a statewide organization representing teachers. The work group may also include other persons with unique and specific expertise, including but not limited to, Washington state historians and persons representing teacher preparation programs.

(iii) The office must report the findings and recommendations required by this subsection to the education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2020.

(((j)))(i) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office to participate in the work group established in section 922 of this act to create a family engagement framework for early learning through high school. At a minimum, the work group must review family engagement policies and practices in Washington and in other states, with a focus on identifying best practices that can be adopted throughout Washington.

(((l)))(j)(i)(A) Within amounts provided in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a work group to:

(I) Review provisions related to sexual health education in the health and physical education learning standards adopted in 2016;

(II) Review existing sexual health education curricula in use in the state for the purpose of identifying gaps or potential inconsistencies with the health and physical education learning standards;

(III) Consider revisions to sexual health education provisions in statute; and

(IV) Consider the merits and challenges associated with requiring all public schools offer comprehensive sexual health education to students in all grades by September 1, 2022. For purposes of this subsection (((h)))(j), "comprehensive sexual health education" means instruction in sexual health that, at a minimum, is evidence-informed, medically and scientifically accurate, age appropriate, and inclusive for all students.

(B) In meeting the requirements of this subsection (h), the work group shall consult with a broad array of stakeholders representing diverse opinions.

(ii) The work group shall consist of the following members:

(A) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee;

(B) Three representatives of school districts recommended by the Washington state school directors' association. To the extent possible, the school district representatives must reflect a diversity of student enrollment, geographic location, and urban, suburban, and rural locations;

(C) Three school principals recommended by an association of Washington school principals, one each representing an elementary school, a middle school, and a high school. The three principals must represent the geographic diversity of urban, suburban, and rural locations;

(D) Three public school health educators recommended by an association of Washington educators, one each representing grades kindergarten through five, grades six through eight, and grades nine through twelve. The three public school health educators must represent the geographic diversity of urban, suburban, and rural locations;

(E) Three public health officials, at least two of whom are local public health officials with expertise in developing or presenting comprehensive sexual health education materials and resources, as recommended by the Washington state department of health. The three public health officials must represent the geographic diversity of urban, suburban, and rural locations; and

(F) Three parents recommended in accordance with this subsection (3)(((h)))(j)(ii)(F), one with a child enrolled in a public school west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range, one with a child enrolled in a public school east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range, and one with a child enrolled in a public school who is also receiving special education services. The recommendation for a parent of a public school student receiving special education services must be made by an association of parents, teachers, and students that focuses on the needs of students receiving special education services. The recommendation for the other parents under this subsection must be made by an association of parents, teachers, and students.

(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit findings and recommendations required by this section to the state board of education, the department of health, and, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2019.

(iv)(A) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington state school directors' association, shall collaborate with department of health to conduct a data survey of the availability of sexual health education in public schools and relevant health measures in those schools. All school districts shall submit to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, through the Washington school health profiles survey, or other reporting mechanisms, the curricula used in the district to teach sexual health education. The data survey must include a list of the schools within the boundaries of each school district that offer sexual health education and in which grade levels, and the curricula used to teach sexual health education, as reported according to RCW 28A.300.475(7). In addition, the data shall include, for each school district and inclusive of any charter schools that may be within the boundaries of the school district, the rate of teen pregnancy, sexually transmitted infections, suicide, depression, and adverse childhood experiences in each of the previous five years for which data is available. To the extent that the data allows, the information shall be collected by school district, inclusive of any charter schools that may be within the boundaries of the school district. To the extent allowed by existing data sources, the information must be disaggregated by age, race, ethnicity, free and reduced lunch eligibility, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, and geography, including school district population density, and conveyed, to the maximum extent possible, in a manner that complies with WAC 392-117-060. The data survey may combine multiple years of data if necessary to comply with student privacy requirements.

(B) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the information collected from the data survey to inform the work group established in (((f)))(i) of this subsection. The office, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, shall submit the data survey to the committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over matters related to education and health care and the governor by December 1, 2019.

(((m)))(k) $107,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office to support the children and youth behavioral health work group created in Second Substitute House Bill No. 2737 (child. mental health wk. grp). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS

(a) $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080.

(b) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (educational opportunity gap).

(c) $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $950,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) $909,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $909,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to implement chapter 18, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. (strengthening student educational outcomes).

(e) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (biliteracy seal).

(f)(i) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for school bullying and harassment prevention activities.

(ii) $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2016 (school safety).

(iii) $1,268,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to educational service districts for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (school safety and well-being).

(iv) $570,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide support and coordination for the regional network of behavioral health, school safety, and threat assessment established in chapter 333, Laws of 2019 (school safety and well-being). Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (4)(f)(iv), $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to schools or school districts for planning and integrating tiered suicide prevention and behavioral health supports. Grants must be awarded first to districts demonstrating the greatest need and readiness. Grants may be used for intensive technical assistance and training, professional development, and evidence-based suicide prevention training.

(v) $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(A) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(f) (v), $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a school safety program to provide school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety.

(B) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(f) (v), $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for administration of the school safety center. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training, and maintain a school safety information web site.

(g)(i) $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $162,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for youth suicide prevention activities.

(ii) $204,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (children's mental health).

(iii) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 175, Laws of 2018 (children's mental health services).

(iv) $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $76,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 64, Laws of 2018 (sexual abuse of students).

(h)(i) $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $280,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $1,052,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. Students in the foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, $522,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, and $530,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the building bridges statewide program.

(ii) $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $293,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090.

(iii) $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $178,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2017 (truancy reduction efforts).

(i) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a process and provide assistance to school districts in planning for future implementation of the summer knowledge improvement program grants.

(j) $369,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $358,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1424 (CTE course equivalencies).

(k) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $196,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1599 (high school graduation reqs.).

(l) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1139 (educator workforce supply). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $680,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for title II SEA state-level activities to implement section 103 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1139 relating to the regional recruiters program.

(m) $66,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to evaluate and implement best practices and procedures for ensuring that student lunch periods include a seated lunch duration of at least twenty minutes. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall, through an application-based process, select six public schools to serve as demonstration sites. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual grant awards of $5,000 each provided to the six school districts selected to serve as school demonstration sites;

(ii) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to hire a consultant with expertise in nutrition programs to oversee the demonstration projects and provide technical support;

(iii) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide technical support to the demonstration sites and report its findings and recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by June 30, 2021; and

(iv) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the Washington state school directors' association, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to adopt and make publicly available by February 14, 2020, a model policy and procedure that school districts may use to ensure that student lunch periods include a seated lunch duration of at least twenty minutes. In developing the model policy and procedure, the Washington state school directors' association shall, to the extent appropriate and feasible, incorporate pertinent recommendations from the office of the state auditor.

(n) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to publish a list of schools and districts that are not complying with RCW 28A.325.010 and 28A.325.050. The office must publish the list no later than December 30, 2020. Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must:

(i) Collaborate with associated student body executive boards statewide regarding district policies to reduce the extracurricular opportunity gap.

(ii) Require school districts to collect and report to the associated student body executive board the 2018-19 school year data related to students in possession of associated student body cards and student participation in school-based athletic programs by January 15, 2020. School districts with more than one high school must provide each high school's associated student body executive board only the data from each associated student body executive board's respective high school.

(A) Each school district with a high school must collect and publish on its website the following school-level data from each high school for the 2018-19 school year by January 15, 2020, for the 2019-20 school year by April 15, 2020, and for the 2020-21 school year by April 15, 2021:

(I) The number of high school students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program;

(II) The purchase amount of an associated student body card for high school students;

(III) The discounted purchase amount of an associated student body card for high school students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program;

(IV) Athletic program participation fees and any discounted fees for high school students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program;

(V) The number of high school students who possess an associated student body card;

(VI) The number of high school students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program and possess an associated student body card;

(VII) The number of high school students participating in an athletic program; and

(VIII) The number of high school students participating in an athletic program who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program.

(B) The data for the April 2020 and April 2021 reports must include at least two weeks of data from the beginning of spring athletics season.

(C) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide support to ensure that all districts comply with the data reporting requirements in this subsection.

(D) No later than January 15, 2020, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must publish a list of schools and districts that are not complying with RCW 28A.325.050.

(o) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to collect and monitor restraint and isolation data pursuant to chapter 206, Laws of 2015, and to provide training, technical assistance, and other support to schools and districts to reduce the use of restraint and isolation.

(p) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop or expand a mentoring program for persons employed as educational interpreters in public schools. Funds provided under this section may only be used for recruiting, hiring, and training persons to be employed by Washington sensory disability services who must provide mentoring services in different geographic regions of the state, with the dual goals of: Providing services, beginning with the 2019-20 school year, to any requesting school district; and assisting persons in the timely and successful achievement of performance standards for educational interpreters.

(q) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a series of articles, videos, and educational curriculum on the history of agriculture in Washington state, including the role and impact of indigenous and immigrant farmers. The materials must be made available for free to schools, educators, and students. The office may collaborate with other agencies or entities in order to create the educational materials.

(r) $61,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5023 (ethnic studies).

(s) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5497 (immigrants in the workplace).

(t) Within existing resources, the office shall consult with the Washington student achievement council to adopt rules pursuant to Senate Bill No. 5088 (computer science).

(u) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct a pilot program in five school districts of a dropout early warning and intervention data system as defined in RCW 28A.175.074, to identify students beginning in grade eight who are at risk of not graduating from high school and require additional supports. The system at a minimum must measure attendance, behavior, and course performance. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature the progress of all participating schools by December 15, 2020.

(v) (((y))) Within existing resources, the office shall implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5324 (homeless student support).

(((z)))(w) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a tribal liaison at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to facilitate access to and support enrollment in career connected learning opportunities for tribal students, including career awareness and exploration, career preparation, and career launch programs, as defined in RCW 28C.30.020, so that tribal students may receive high school or college credit to the maximum extent possible.

(((bb)))(x) $57,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2660 (school meals at no cost). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((cc)))(y) $872,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2864 (running start summer pilot). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((ff)))(z) $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the four-year institutions as defined in RCW 28B.76.020, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training and education coordinating board, to review and report on potential adjustments or alterations to the standardized high school transcript created under RCW 28A.230.125, including, but not limited to, granting the option of using a weighted grade point average to recognize accelerated coursework. The report shall include findings and recommendations and shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2021.

(((hh)))(aa) $385,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $349,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6521 (innovative learning pilot). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((ii)))(bb) $6,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6263 (data sharing/schools, tribes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1402. 2020 c 357 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$8,449,996,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($8,942,348,000))

$8,531,759,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,955,730,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($19,348,074,000))

$18,937,485,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 504 and 505 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.

(c) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 502 and 503, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(e)(i) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the agency rules defining a full-time equivalent student with the increase in the minimum instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220, as amended by the legislature in 2014.

(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.

(g) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, school districts must report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the monthly actual average district-wide class size across each grade level of kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade classes. The superintendent of public instruction shall report this information to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30th of each year.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.

(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school, including those at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade

RCW 28A.150.260

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Grade K

17.00

17.00

Grade 1

17.00

17.00

Grade 2

17.00

17.00

Grade 3

17.00

17.00

Grade 4

27.00

27.00

Grades 5-6

27.00

27.00

Grades 7-8

28.53

28.53

Grades 9-12

28.74

28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 20.0.

(ii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and

(iii) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and

(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii)(A) For the twenty schools with the lowest overall school score for all students in the 2018-19 school year, as determined by the Washington school improvement framework among elementary schools, middle schools, and other schools not serving students up to twelfth grade, having enrollments greater than one hundred fifty students, in addition to the allocation under (d)(i) of this subsection the superintendent shall allocate additional funding for guidance counselors for each level of prototypical school ((in the 2019-20 school year)) as follows:

Elementary

Middle

Guidance counselors

0.307

0.512

To receive additional allocations under (((d)(ii)(A) of)) this subsection, a school eligible to receive the allocation must have demonstrated actual staffing for guidance counselors for its prototypical school level that meets or exceeds the staffing for guidance counselors in (d)(i) of this subsection and this subsection (2)(d)(ii)(A) for its prototypical school level. School districts must distribute the additional guidance counselors allocation in this subsection to the schools that generate the allocation. The enhancement within this subsection is not part of the state's program of basic education.

(B) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Career and Technical Education

3.07

3.07

Skill Center

3.41

3.41

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS

(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School

1.253

Middle School

1.353

High School

1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors: Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025

Skill Center students. . . .1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS

Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS

In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:

(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.

(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.48 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.

(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 12.50 percent in the 2019-20 school year and ((12.52))12.62 percent in the 2020-21 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.83 percent in the 2019-20 school year and ((17.85))17.96 percent in the 2020-21 school year for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 23.80 percent in the 2019-20 school year and 24.03 percent in the 2020-21 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 24.33 percent in the 2019-20 school year and 24.44 percent in the 2020-21 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS

Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the rates specified in section 506 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) Until December 31, 2019 and for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts for the 2020-21 school year:

(i) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and

(ii) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2020, and except for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts for the 2020-21 school year, the number of calculated benefit units determined below. Calculated benefit units are staff units multiplied by the benefit allocation factors established in the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 907 of this act. These factors are intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent employees may be calculated on the basis of 630 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent. The number of benefit units is determined as follows:

(i) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.02; and

(ii) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.43.

(c) For health benefits payments to the health care authority for benefits provided to school employees in January 2020, school districts must provide payment to the health care authority within three business days of receiving the January 2020 allocation for insurance benefits. The health care authority and office of the superintendent of public instruction must coordinate with school districts to enable timely payment to the health care authority consistent with this subsection.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS

Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.

(a)(i) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Technology

$135.91

$138.08

Utilities and Insurance

$369.29

$375.20

Curriculum and Textbooks

$145.92

$148.26

Other Supplies

$289.00

$293.62

Library Materials

$20.79

$21.12

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated

and Classified Staff

$22.57

$22.93

Facilities Maintenance

$182.94

$185.87

Security and Central Office

$126.74

$128.77

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$1,293.16

$1,313.85

(ii) For the 2019-20 school year and 2020-21 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (A) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii) exceeds (B) of this subsection (8)(a)(ii), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,529.98 for the 2019-20 school year and $1,554.46 for the 2020-21 school year.

(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,529.98 for the 2019-20 school year and $1,554.46 for the 2020-21 school year.

(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at the following rate:

MSOC Component

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Technology

$39.08

$39.70

Curriculum and Textbooks

$42.63

$43.32

Other Supplies

$83.04

$84.37

Library Materials

$5.78

$5.87

Instructional Professional Development for Certified

and Classified Staff

$7.11

$7.22

TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE

$177.64

$180.48

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS

For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING

(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 299, Laws of 2018 (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM

The superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS

Funding in this section is sufficient to fund all day kindergarten programs in all schools in the 2019-20 school year and 2020-21 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315.

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTS

For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.

(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:

(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;

(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:

(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;

(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;

(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;

(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and

(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (13) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.

(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2020 and 2021 as follows:

(a) $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.

(b) $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $436,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.

(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.2 FTE enrollment for career launch students pursuant to RCW 28A.700.130. Expenditures for this purpose must come first from the appropriations provided in section 521 of this act; funding for career launch enrollment exceeding those appropriations is provided in this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022. The report must include the total FTE enrollment for career launch students, the FTE enrollment for career launch students that exceeded the appropriations provided in section 521 of this act, and the amount expended from this section for those students.

(18) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.

(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, the following apply:

(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (13) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.

(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(21) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. For the 2019-2021 biennium, general apportionment payments are not reduced for school districts receiving federal forest revenues.

Sec. 1403. 2020 c 357 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$387,359,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($644,562,000))

$621,918,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,031,921,000))

$1,009,277,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The salary increases provided in this section are 2.0 percent for the 2019-20 school year, and 1.6 percent for the 2020-21 school year, the annual inflationary adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.

(2)(a) In addition to salary allocations, the appropriations in this section include funding for professional learning as defined in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434. Funding for this purpose is calculated as the equivalent of two days of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in school year 2019-20, and three days of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in school year 2020-21. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(b) Of the funding provided for professional learning in this section, the equivalent of one day of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in school year 2020-21 must be used to train school district staff on racial literacy, cultural responsiveness, and stereotype threat for purposes of closing persistent opportunity gaps.

(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 23.16 percent for the 2019-20 school year and 23.39 percent for the 2020-21 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 20.83 percent for the 2019-20 school year and 20.94 percent for the 2020-21 school year for classified staff.

(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in sections 503 and 504 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 503 and 504 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 504, 505, and 506 of this act.

(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(4) The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 907 of this act and reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates as follows:

(a) For the 2019-20 school year, $973.00 per month from September 1, 2019, to December 31, 2019, $994 per month from January 1, 2020, to June 30, 2020, and $1,056 per month from July 1, 2020, to August 31, 2020; and

(b) For the 2020-21 school year, $1,000 per month.

(5) When bargaining for funding for school employees health benefits for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, any proposal agreed upon must assume the imposition of a twenty-five dollar per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than fifty dollars per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than ninety-five percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.

(6) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

(7)(a) $1,226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5091 (special education funding).

(b) Within amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for fiscal year 2021 for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in chapter 387, Laws of 2019 (special education funding).

Sec. 1404. 2020 c 357 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$646,545,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($626,529,000))

$595,571,000

((Education Legacy Trust Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$29,500,000))

Public Schools Emergency Transportation Relief

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,302,574,000))

$1,342,116,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 505, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.

(4) A maximum of $939,000 of this fiscal year 2020 appropriation and a maximum of $939,000 of the fiscal year 2021 appropriation may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(5) Subject to available funds under this section, school districts may provide student transportation for summer skills center programs.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.

(8) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW 28A.305.141.

(9) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

(((11)))(10) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must subtract pupil transportation amounts carried over from the 2018-19 school year to the 2019-20 school year from the prior year's expenditures used to determine the student transportation allocation for the 2020-21 school year.

(((12)))(11) $21,508,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for one-time hold harmless pupil transportation payments to school districts to address lower pupil transportation payments for the 2019-2020 school year that were the result of corrections to the pupil transportation allocation methodology as implemented by the superintendent.

(12) $197,886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $100,000,000 of the public schools emergency transportation relief account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5128 (student transportation funds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1405. 2019 c 415 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$7,230,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($7,230,000))

$7,229,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$537,178,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($551,638,000))

$551,637,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,111,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids program through the following allowable uses:

(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades kindergarten through third grade who are eligible for reduced-price lunch;

(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income areas;

(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served to students eligible for free and reduced-price lunch, pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and

(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding school breakfast programs.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual expenditures in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the department of health with the following data, where available, for all nutrition assistance programs that are funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2020, and February 1, 2021. The report must provide:

(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;

(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;

(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;

(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and

(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.

(4) $119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 271, Laws of 2018 (school meal payment) to increase the number of schools participating in the federal community eligibility program and to support breakfast after the bell programs authorized by the legislature that have adopted the community eligibility provision.

Sec. 1406. 2020 c 357 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,406,767,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,463,248,000))

$1,380,605,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$514,008,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$54,694,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,438,737,000))

$3,356,094,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 503 and 505 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.

(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:

(i) Special education students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and

(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390 as amended by chapter 266, Laws of 2018 (basic education), except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 503 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 507, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund—state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 13.5 percent.

(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(7) $63,609,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($91,500,000))$94,630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $29,574,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.

(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (education).

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.

(8) A maximum of $931,000 may be expended from the general fund—state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.

(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(11) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $100,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(12) $30,746,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5091 (special education funding).

(13) Within amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for fiscal year 2021 for changes to the special education cost multiplier as specified in chapter 387, Laws of 2019 (special education funding).

(14) $5,200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $19,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support professional development in inclusionary practices for classroom teachers. The primary form of support to public school classroom teachers must be for mentors who are experts in best practices for inclusive education, differentiated instruction, and individualized instruction. Funding for mentors must be prioritized to the public schools with the highest percentage of students with individualized education programs aged six through twenty-one who spend the least amount of time in general education classrooms.

(15) Beginning September 1, 2020, funding for payments to providers for the early support for infants and toddlers program is transferred to the department of children, youth, and families to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2787 (infants and toddlers program). The amount of the transfer and related funding requirements are included in section 225(4)(ff) of this act.

Sec. 1407. 2020 c 357 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$12,869,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($18,930,000))

$22,230,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($31,799,000))

$35,099,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(3) Funding in this section is provided for regional professional development related to English language arts curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.

(4) For fiscal year 2021, funding in this section is provided for regional technical support for the K-20 telecommunications network to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.

(5) For fiscal year 2021, funding in this section is provided for a corps of nurses located at the educational service districts, to be dispatched in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(6) For fiscal year 2021, funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide a network of support for school districts to develop and implement comprehensive suicide prevention and behavioral health supports for students.

(7) For fiscal year 2021, funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide assistance to school districts with comprehensive safe schools planning, conducting needs assessments, school safety and security trainings, coordinating appropriate crisis and emergency response and recovery, and developing threat assessment and crisis intervention teams.

(8) For fiscal year 2021, funding in this section is provided for regional English language arts coordinators to provide professional development of teachers and principals around the new early screening for dyslexia requirements.

(9) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

(10) $3,300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the educational services districts for unanticipated increased costs that have resulted from the COVID-19 pandemic.

Sec. 1408. 2020 c 357 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$353,213,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($332,158,000))

$348,926,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($685,371,000))

$702,139,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

$25,170,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($20,593,000))$13,098,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a one-time hold harmless for local effort assistance in calendar year 2020.

Sec. 1409. 2020 c 357 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$15,501,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($16,707,000))

$14,678,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($32,208,000))

$30,179,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund—state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.

(5) $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.

(6) $999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,113,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to increase the capacity of institutional education programs to differentiate instruction to meet students' unique educational needs. Those needs may include but are not limited to one-on-one instruction, enhanced access to counseling for social emotional needs of the student, and services to identify the proper level of instruction at the time of student entry into the facility.

(7)(a) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 is provided solely to support one student records coordinator in the Issaquah school district to manage the transmission of academic records with the Echo Glen children's center.

(b) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to support three student records coordinators to manage the transmission of academic records for each of the long-term juvenile institutions. One coordinator is provided for each of the following: The Issaquah school district for the Echo Glen children's center, the Chehalis school district for Green Hill academic school, and the Naselle-Grays River Valley school district for Naselle youth camp school.

(8) Ten percent of the funds allocated for the institution may be carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 1410. 2020 c 357 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$30,504,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($31,696,000))

$30,541,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($62,200,000))

$61,045,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 511, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

Sec. 1411. 2020 c 357 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$131,298,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($135,955,000))

$135,126,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$96,576,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,450,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,636,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$765,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($367,680,000))

$366,851,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ACCOUNTABILITY

(a) $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $26,975,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.

(b) $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $14,352,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013 (K-12 education - failing schools).

(2) EDUCATOR CONTINUUM

(a) $69,237,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($73,797,000))$73,034,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,505 per teacher in the 2019-20 school year and a bonus of $5,593 per teacher in the 2020-21 school year;

(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;

(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and

(iv) During the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after fully exhausting all years of candidacy as set by the national board for professional teaching standards are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.

(b) $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,418,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).

(c) $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $477,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(d) $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $810,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.

(e) $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program (BEST). The program shall prioritize first year educators in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning educator aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new educators to work together; and educator observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

(f) $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.

Sec. 1412. 2020 c 357 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$205,270,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($216,650,000))

$208,065,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$102,242,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($524,166,000))

$515,581,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2019-20 and 2020-21; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2019-20 and 2020-21 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.

(b) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 1.93 percent for school year 2019-20 and ((1.89))1.99 percent for school year 2020-21.

(4) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.

(5) $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $35,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.

(6) $1,023,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $1,185,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 1413. 2020 c 357 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$416,973,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($430,591,000))

$430,191,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$533,481,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,381,045,000))

$1,380,645,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—state appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(b)(i) For the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.

(ii) From July 1, 2019, to August 31, 2019, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 515, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the prior school year. The prior school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.

(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.

(3) The general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.

(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fund—state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(5) Within existing resources, during the 2019-20 and 2020-21 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.

Sec. 1414. 2020 c 357 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—PER PUPIL ALLOCATIONS

Statewide Average Allocations

Per Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent Student

Basic Education Program

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

General Apportionment

$9,176

(($9,398))$9,332

Pupil Transportation

$586

(($586))$344

Special Education Programs

$9,611

(($10,107))$10,097

Institutional Education Programs

$19,186

(($20,540))$21,354

Programs for Highly Capable Students

$598

$609

Transitional Bilingual Programs

$1,365

(($1,390))$1,397

Learning Assistance Program

$932

(($950))$890

Sec. 1415. 2020 c 357 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocations purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.

(2) When adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek legislative approval through the budget request process.

(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2020))2021, unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2020 among the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional education programs; transitional bilingual programs; highly capable; and learning assistance programs.

(5) The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(6) Appropriations in sections 503 and 505 of this act for insurance benefits under chapter 41.05 RCW are provided solely for the superintendent to allocate to districts for employee health benefits as provided in section 907 of this act. The superintendent may not allocate, and districts may not expend, these amounts for any other purpose beyond those authorized in section 907 of this act. (7) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.

Sec. 1416. 2020 c 357 s 518 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR CHARTER SCHOOLS

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($93,986,000))

$88,106,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($93,986,000))

$88,106,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(2) $1,163,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5128 (student transportation funds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2021, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1417. 2020 c 357 s 519 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($294,000))

$324,000

Charter Schools Oversight Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,454,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,748,000))

$2,778,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation in this section is provided to the superintendent of public instruction solely for the operations of the Washington state charter school commission under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

Sec. 1418. 2020 c 357 s 520 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—FOR GRANTS AND PASS THROUGH FUNDING

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$35,491,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($36,704,000))

$35,391,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($72,195,000))

$70,882,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,894,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($4,894,000))$4,890,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants for implementation of dual credit programs and subsidized advanced placement exam fees, international baccalaureate class fees, and exam and course fees for low-income students.

For expenditures related to subsidized exam fees, the superintendent of public instruction shall report: The number of students served; the demographics of the students served; and how the students perform on the exams.

(2)(a) $2,052,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,052,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008, including parts of programs receiving grants that serve students in grades four through six. If equally matched by private donations, $1,075,000 of the 2020 appropriation and $1,075,000 of the 2021 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST robotics programs in grades four through twelve. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $100,000 of the fiscal year 2020 appropriation and $100,000 of the fiscal year 2021 appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide supervision activities for career and technical education student leadership organizations.

(b) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.

(c) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2020, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2018-19 school year. The 2020 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2019-20 school year. To be eligible for funding in 2021, a high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the 2019-20 school year. The 2020 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2020-21 school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center at the office of financial management shall track student participation and long-term outcome data. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(d) $2,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,127,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in maritime, construction, aerospace, and advanced manufacturing programs. To be eligible for funding, the skills center and high schools must agree to engage in developing local business and industry partnerships for oversight and input regarding program components. Program instructors must also agree to participate in professional development leading to student employment or certification in maritime, construction, aerospace, or advanced manufacturing industries, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research and data center shall report annually student participation and long-term outcome data. Within the amounts provided in this subsection:

(i) $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $900,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in aerospace and advanced manufacturing programs.

(ii) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in construction programs.

(iii) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for annual startup, expansion, or maintenance of existing programs in maritime programs.

(iv) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit entity to expand the current employer engagement program to support schools, teachers, and students.

(v) $427,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $427,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit entity to provide management, development, assessment, and outreach of the programs.

(3)(a) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for project citizen and we the people: The citizen and the constitution programs sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the center for civic education to promote participation in government by middle and high school students. Of the amounts provided, $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $15,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for awarding a travel grant to the winner of the we the people: The citizen and the constitution state competition.

(b) $384,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($373,000))$371,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 127, Laws of 2018 (civics education). Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(b), $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $10,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grant programs to school districts to help cover travel costs associated with civics education competitions.

(c) $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop civics education materials for grades K-5. The office must contract for the production of the materials with an experienced Washington state organization that produces civics education materials currently posted as an open education resource at the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(4)(a) $31,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $55,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for statewide implementation of career and technical education course equivalency frameworks authorized under RCW 28A.700.070 for math and science. This may include development of additional equivalency course frameworks, course performance assessments, and professional development for districts implementing the new frameworks.

(b) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure career and technical education courses are aligned with high-demand, high-wage jobs. The superintendent shall verify that the current list of career and technical education courses meets the criteria established in RCW 28A.700.020(2). The superintendent shall remove from the list any career and technical education course that no longer meets such criteria.

(c) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($3,000,000))$2,998,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide grants to school districts and educational service districts for science teacher training in the next generation science standards including training in the climate science standards. At a minimum, school districts shall ensure that teachers in one grade level in each elementary, middle, and high school participate in this science training. Of the amount appropriated $1,000,000 is provided solely for community based nonprofits including tribal education organizations to partner with public schools for next generation science standards.

(5) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program. The superintendent of public instruction shall award grants consistent with RCW 28A.300.410.

(6) $3,145,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,395,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for demonstration sites to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to chapter 71, Laws of 2016 (foster youth edu. outcomes). The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(a) Of the amount provided in this subsection (6), $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $446,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, section 202(10), chapter 4, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess.

(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection (6), $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,015,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the demonstration site established pursuant to the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act, section 501(43)(b), chapter 4, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (6), $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $684,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the demonstration site established with funding provided in the 2017-2019 omnibus appropriations act, chapter 1, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess., as amended.

(7) $2,541,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(8)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($1,200,000))$1,198,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (homeless students).

(b) $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $36,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for chapter 212, Laws of 2014 (homeless student educational outcomes).

(9) $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a nonviolence and ethical leadership training and professional development program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(10) $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for dual language grants to grow capacity for high quality dual language learning. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 236, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1445) (dual language/early learning & K-12). In selecting recipients of the K-12 dual language grant, the superintendent of public instruction must prioritize districts that received grants under section 501(33), chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(b) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to establish a new dual language program.

(c) $225,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to expand an existing dual language program.

(d) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to create heritage language programs for immigrant and refugee students.

(e) $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to create indigenous language programs for native students.

(11)(a) $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $4,940,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers scholarship and Washington higher education readiness program. The funds shall be used to: Support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars; and to identify and reduce barriers to college for low-income and underserved middle and high school students. Of the amounts provided: $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the college success foundation to establish programming in new regions throughout the state. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(b) $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,454,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for contracting with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(c) $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $181,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 180, Laws of 2017 (Washington Aim program).

(12)(a) $356,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership activities, including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional development, and school and community engagement events. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(b) $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a statewide information technology academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as information technology certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools. The office must require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework. The report must include the number of students served disaggregated by gender, race, ethnicity, and free-and-reduced lunch eligibility as well as the number of industry certificates attained by type of certificate.

(c) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with professional development training for implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.

(d) (($1,000,000))$999,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the computer science and education grant program to support the following three purposes: Train and credential teachers in computer sciences; provide and upgrade technology needed to learn computer science; and, for computer science frontiers grants to introduce students to and engage them in computer science. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use the computer science learning standards adopted pursuant to chapter 3, Laws of 2015 (computer science) in implementing the grant, to the extent possible. Additionally, grants provided for the purpose of introducing students to computer science are intended to support innovative ways to introduce and engage students from historically underrepresented groups, including girls, low-income students, and minority students, to computer science and to inspire them to enter computer science careers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may award up to $500,000 each year, without a matching requirement, to districts with greater than fifty percent of students eligible for free and reduced-price meals. All other awards must be equally matched by private sources for the program, including gifts, grants, or endowments.

(e) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a qualified 501(c)(3) nonprofit community-based organization physically located in Washington state that has at least seventeen years of experience collaborating with the office and school districts statewide to integrate the state learning standards in English language arts, mathematics, and science with FieldSTEM outdoor field studies and project-based and work-based learning opportunities aligned with the environmental, natural resource, and agricultural sectors. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(f) $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $62,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both of the following grants:

(i) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or

(ii) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.

(g) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and low-income communities.

(13) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

(14) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide learning experiences for student-athletes in the science, technology, engineering, and math sectors. The office must contract with a nonprofit to offer student-athlete classes, programs, and scholarships to improve school performance and advancement across diverse communities.

(15) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create and administer a grant program for districts to reduce associated student body fees for students who are eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program. The office must distribute grants for the 2020-21 school year to school districts by August 10, 2020.

(a) Grant awards must be prioritized in the following order:

(i) High schools implementing the United States department of agriculture community eligibility provision;

(ii) High schools with the highest percentage of students in grades nine through twelve eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price means program; and

(iii) High schools located in school districts enrolling five thousand or fewer students.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award grants of up to five thousand dollars per high school per year. The office may award additional funding if:

(i) The appropriations provided are greater than the total amount of funding requested at the end of the application cycle; and

(ii) The applicant shows a demonstrated need for additional support.

(16) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for contracts with state-based nonprofit organizations that provide direct services to military- connected students exclusively through one-to-one volunteer mentoring. The goal of the mentoring is to build resiliency in military connected students and increase their ability to cope with the stress of parental deployment and frequent moves, which will help promote good decision-making by youth, help increase attachment and a positive attitude toward school, and develop positive peer relationships. An applicant requesting funding for these dollars must successfully demonstrate to the department that it currently provides direct one-to-one volunteer mentoring services to military connected elementary students in the state and has been providing military mentoring to students in the state for at least twenty-four months prior to application.

(17) $83,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5612 (holocaust education).

(18) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation in fiscal year 2020 and $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a grant to the pacific science center to continue providing science on wheels activities in schools and other community settings. Funding is provided to develop a new computer science program and outfit a van with program resources in order to expand statewide outreach.

(19) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for contracts with Washington state based nonprofit organizations that provide a career-integrated one-to-one mentoring program for disadvantaged high school students facing academic and personal challenges with the goal of keeping them on track for graduation and post-high school success. The mentoring must include a focus on college readiness, career exploration and social-emotional learning. An applicant requesting funding for these dollars must successfully demonstrate to the department that it currently provides a career-integrated one-to-one volunteer mentoring program and has been mentoring high school youth for at least twenty years in the state prior to application.

(20) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for grants to school districts to provide school resource officer training, as required in Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (student mental health and well-being).

(21) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Bethel school district to expand post-secondary education opportunities at Graham-Kapowsin high school.

(22) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the south Kitsap school district to develop pathways for high school diplomas and post-secondary credentials through controls programmer apprenticeships.

(23) $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $255,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a math improvement pilot program for school districts to improve math scores. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Spokane school district to improve math scores.

(b) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Chehalis school district to improve math scores.

(c) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Bremerton school district to improve math scores.

(24) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office to establish the media literacy grant program.

(25) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Seattle education access program to ensure students on nontraditional educational pathways have the mentorship and technical assistance needed to navigate higher education and financial aid. The office may require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.

(((29)))(26) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office to contract with an organization to create an after-school and summer learning program in the city of Federal Way. The program shall provide comprehensive, culturally competent academic support and cultural enrichment for primarily latinx, spanish-speaking, low-income sixth, seventh, and eighth grade students. The department must contract with an organization with over forty years of experience that serves the latino community in Seattle and King county and has previously established an after-school and summer learning program.

(((30)))(27) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the office to contract with the Yakama nation for a feasibility study to determine the scope, design, planning, and budget for the construction of a new state-tribal compact school.

(((31)))(28) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to school districts to create systems, policies, and practices to address racial discipline gaps consistent with RCW 28A.415.410. The office of superintendent of public instruction, in coordination with a state association representing both certificated and classified staff, an association representing principals, an association representing school superintendents, the Washington state school directors association, and an association representing parents, will guide grant recipients using existing training materials and resources. Grant recipients must develop systems that provide tiered supports for intervention, restorative approaches to behavior, and eliminate zero-tolerance policies that contribute to racial disparities.

(((32)))(29) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the south Kitsap school district to co-develop a pilot strategy to increase completion rates for the free application for federal student aid (FAFSA).

(((33)))(30) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely to the Renton school district to expand early learning opportunities with the Somali parent's education board.

(31) $878,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the Washington school principals' education foundation to continue student outdoor education services. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (31):

(a) $512,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the Cispus learning center to continue services to provide outdoor education to the students of Washington state.

(b) $366,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the associate of Washington student leaders to continue services for student leadership programs within Washington state.

(End of part)

PART XV

HIGHER EDUCATION

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1501. 2020 c 357 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$678,312,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($709,756,000))

$701,905,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,505,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($158,532,000))

$158,499,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$67,784,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,637,889,000))

$1,630,005,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $33,261,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2020 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2021.

(2) $2,443,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.

(3) $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $425,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Seattle central college's expansion of allied health programs.

(4) $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.

(5) $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, and $1,610,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.

(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.

(7) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:

(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;

(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and

(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.

(8) $19,759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($20,194,000))$20,253,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(9) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.

(10) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(11) $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $157,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Wenatchee Valley college wildfire prevention program.

(12) The state board for community and technical colleges shall collaborate with a permanently registered Washington sector intermediary to integrate and offer related supplemental instruction for information technology apprentices by the 2020-21 academic year.

(13) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Puget Sound welcome back center at Highline College to create a grant program for internationally trained individuals seeking employment in the behavioral health field in Washington state.

(14) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for increased enrollments in the integrated basic education and skills training program. Funding will support approximately 120 additional full-time equivalent enrollments annually.

(15)(a) The state board must provide quality assurance reports on the ctcLink project at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(b) The state board must develop a technology budget using a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, funding sources, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project initiation to implementation. The budget must be updated at the frequency directed by the office of chief information officer for review and for posting on its information technology project dashboard.

(c) The office of the chief information officer may suspend the ctcLink project at any time if the office of the chief information officer determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated performance measures, implementation timelines, or budget estimates. Once suspension or termination occurs, the state board shall not make additional expenditures on the ctcLink project without approval of the chief information officer. The ctcLink project funded through the community and technical college innovation account created in RCW 28B.50.515 is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(16) $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education at North Seattle College.

(17) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Highline College to implement the Federal Way higher education initiative in partnership with the city of Federal Way and the University of Washington Tacoma campus.

(18) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Peninsula College to maintain the annual cohorts of the specified programs as follows:

(a) Medical assisting, 40 students;

(b) Nursing assistant, 60 students; and

(c) Registered nursing, 32 students.

(19) $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $338,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state labor education and research center at South Seattle College.

(20) $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Washington family and community and engagement trust and Everett Community College to continue and expand a civic education and leadership program for underserved adults and youth.

(21) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the aerospace and advanced manufacturing center of excellence hosted by Everett Community College to develop a semiconductor and electronics manufacturing branch in Vancouver.

(22) $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1893 (student assistance grants).

(23) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $348,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5800 (homeless college students).

(24) $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of guided pathways or similar programs designed to improve student success, including, but not limited to, academic program redesign, student advising, and other student supports.

(25) $132,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $24,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the state board to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(26) $784,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $779,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for legal costs related to the Wolf vs State Board for Community and Technical Colleges litigation.

(((30)))(27) $197,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2327 (sexual misconduct/postsec.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1502. 2020 c 357 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($340,784,000))

$340,744,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($358,083,000))

$354,446,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,606,000))

$1,595,000

University of Washington Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,546,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,731,000))

$36,595,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,087,000))

$3,080,000

Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$800,000

Biotoxin Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($612,000))

$611,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$256,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
(($272,000))

$266,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$50,906,000

Accident Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,907,000))

$7,850,000

Medical Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,507,000))

$7,457,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($810,097,000))

$806,152,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $41,010,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($41,913,000))$42,036,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for labor archives of Washington. The university shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(3) $8,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to maintain the number of residency slots available in Washington.

(4) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(5) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $251,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 and $1,550,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account—state appropriation are provided solely for ocean acidification monitoring, forecasting, and research and for operation of the Washington ocean acidification center. The center must continue to make quarterly progress reports to the Washington marine resources advisory council created under RCW 43.06.338.

(6) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.

(7) $1,549,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.

(8) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(9) $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,345,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the continued operations and expansion of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.

(10) $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $2,625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the institute for stem cell and regenerative medicine. Funds appropriated in this subsection must be dedicated to research utilizing pluripotent stem cells and related research methods.

(11) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided to the University of Washington to support youth and young adults experiencing homelessness in the university district of Seattle. Funding is provided for the university to work with community service providers and university colleges and departments to plan for and implement a comprehensive one-stop center with navigation services for homeless youth; the university may contract with the department of commerce to expand services that serve homeless youth in the university district.

(12) $600,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the psychiatry residency program at the University of Washington to offer additional residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education.

(13)(a) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a University of Washington study in the south Cascades to determine current wolf use and density, and to gather baseline data to understand the effects of wolf recolonization on predator-prey dynamics of species that currently have established populations in the area. The study objectives shall include:

(i) Determination of whether wolves have started to recolonize a 5,000 square kilometer study area in the south Cascades of Washington, and if so, an assessment of their distribution over the landscape as well as their health and pregnancy rates;

(ii) Baseline data collection, if wolves have not yet established pack territories in this portion of the state, that will allow for the assessment of how the functional densities and diets of wolves across the landscape will affect the densities and diets in the following predators and prey: Coyote, cougar, black bear, bobcat, red fox, wolverine, elk, white tailed deer, mule deer, moose, caribou, and snowshoe hare;

(iii) Examination of whether the microbiome of each species changes as wolves start to occupy suitable habitat; and

(iv) An assessment of the use of alternative wildlife monitoring tools to cost-effectively monitor size of the wolf population over the long-term.

(b) A report on the findings of the study shall be shared with the Washington department of fish and wildlife.

(14) $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $5,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to support the operations and teaching mission of the Harborview Medical Center and the University of Washington Medical Center.

(15) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the University of Washington's psychiatry integrated care training program.

(16) $400,000 of the geoduck aquaculture research account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington sea grant program at the University of Washington to complete a three-year study to identify best management practices related to shellfish production. The University of Washington must submit an annual report detailing any findings and outline the progress of the study, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, to the office of the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by December 1st of each year.

(17) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the University of Washington School of Dentistry to support its role as a major oral health provider to individuals covered by medicaid and the uninsured.

(18) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the pre-law pipeline and social justice program at the University of Washington Tacoma.

(19) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Bothell branch to develop series of online courses for school district staff related to behavioral health. The standards for the online courses must be consistent with any knowledge, skill, and performance standards related to mental health and well-being of public school students. Among other things, the online courses must:

(a) Teach participants relevant laws, including laws around physical restraint and isolation;

(b) Provide foundational knowledge in behavioral health, mental health, and mental illness;

(c) Describe how to assess, intervene upon, and refer behavioral health and substance use issues; and

(d) Teach approaches to promote health and positively influence student health behaviors.

(20) $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $110,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for core operations at forefront to achieve its mission of reducing suicide.

(21) $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $138,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to collaborate with the northwest Parkinson's foundation and the state department of veterans affairs to study Parkinson's diagnoses treatment and specialist care across ethnic and racial groups and to develop a pilot program that helps people with Parkinson's better access specialist care and community services.

(22) $256,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $226,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university's neurology department to create a telemedicine program to disseminate dementia care best practices to primary care practitioners using the project ECHO model. The program shall provide a virtual connection for providers and content experts and include didactics, case conferences, and an emphasis on practice transformation and systems-level issues that affect care delivery. The initial users of this program shall include referral sources in health care systems and clinics, such as the university's neighborhood clinics and Virginia Mason Memorial in Yakima with a goal of adding fifteen to twenty providers from smaller clinics and practices per year.

(23) $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $102,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university's center for international trade in forest products.

(24) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Latino center for health.

(25) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the Latino center for health to:

(a) Estimate the number of practicing Latino physicians in Washington including age and gender distributions;

(b) Create a profile of Latino physicians that includes their geographic distribution, medical and surgical specialties, training and certifications, and language access;

(c) Develop a set of policy recommendations to meet the growing needs of Latino communities in urban and rural communities throughout Washington. The center must provide the report to the university and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2020.

(26) To ensure transparency and accountability, in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium the University of Washington shall comply with any and all financial and accountability audits by the Washington state auditor including any and all audits of university services offered to the general public, including those offered through any public-private partnership, business venture, affiliation, or joint venture with a public or private entity, except the government of the United States. The university shall comply with all state auditor requests for the university's financial and business information including the university's governance and financial participation in these public-private partnerships, business ventures, affiliations, or joint ventures with a public or private entity. In any instance in which the university declines to produce the information to the state auditor, the university will provide the state auditor a brief summary of the documents withheld and a citation of the legal or contractual provision that prevents disclosure. The summaries must be compiled into a report by the state auditor and provided on a quarterly basis to the legislature.

(27) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university's school of public health to study home-sharing for privately-owned residential properties. The study must include:

(a) An analysis of home-sharing programs across the country, including population served, costs, duration of stays, and size of programs;

(b) An analysis of similar initiatives in Washington state and potential barriers to expansion;

(c) A review of best practices and policies; and

(d) Recommendations for the establishment and continuation of home-sharing programs.

(28) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to expand the project extension for community health care outcomes (ECHO) to include training related to people with autism and developmental disabilities. Project ECHO for autism and developmental disabilities must focus on supporting existing autism centers of excellence. The project will disseminate evidence-based diagnoses and treatments to increase access to medical services for people across the state.

(29) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to partner with the University of Washington and the Washington State University to provide staff support and facilitation services to the task force established in part 9 of this act.

(30) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and Seattle children's hospital in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to plan for and implement a two-year pilot program of school mental health education and consultations for students at middle schools, junior high, and high schools in one school district on east side of Cascades and one school district on west side of Cascades. The pilot program must:

(a) Develop and provide behavioral health trainings for school counselors, social workers, psychologists, nurses, teachers, administrators, and classified staff by January 1, 2020; and

(b) Beginning with the 2020-21 school year:

(i) Provide school counselors access to teleconsultations with psychologists and psychiatrists at Seattle children's hospital or the University of Washington department of psychiatry to support school staff in managing children with challenging behavior; and

(ii) Provide students access to teleconsultations with psychologists and psychiatrists at Seattle children's hospital or the University of Washington department of psychiatry to provide crisis management services when assessed as clinically appropriate.

(31) $213,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5903 (children's mental health).

(32) $50,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1517 (domestic violence).

(33)(a) $463,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.

(b) $63,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 in (a) of this subsection is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5116 (clean energy).

(34) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(35) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a firearm policy research program. The program will:

(a) Support investigations of firearm death and injury risk factors;

(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of state firearm laws and policies;

(c) Assess the consequences of firearm violence; and

(d) Develop strategies to reduce the toll of firearm violence to citizens of the state.

(36) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the Evans school of public affairs to complete the business plan for a publicly owned Washington state depository bank as directed by section 129, chapter 299, Laws of 2018.

(37) $350,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $139,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5330 (small forestland owners).

(38) $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $95,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the college of education to partner with school districts on a pilot program to improve the math scores of K-12 students.

(39) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for matching nonstate funding contributions for a study of the feasibility of constructing of a biorefinery in southwest Washington. No state moneys may be expended until nonstate funding contributions are received. The study must:

(a) Assess the supply of biomass, including poplar feedstock grown on low-value lands and hardwood sawmill residuals;

(b) Assess the potential for using poplar simultaneously for water treatment and as a biorefinery feedstock;

(c) Assess southwest Washington landowner interest in growing poplar feedstock;

(d) Evaluate options for locating a biorefinery in southwest Washington that considers potential for integration of future biorefineries with existing facilities such as power plants and pulp mills; and

(e) Result in a comprehensive technical and economic evaluation for southwest Washington biorefineries that will be used by biorefinery technology companies to develop their business plans and to attract potential investors.

(40) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Harry Bridges center for labor studies. The center shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(41) $400,000 of the geoduck aquaculture research account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington sea grant program crab team to continue work to protect against the impacts of invasive European green crab.

(((45)))(42) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for:

(a) Increased training in rural areas for sexual assault nurse examiners; and

(b) Expansion of web-based services for training of sexual assault nurse examiners to include webinars, live streamed trainings, and web-based consultations.

(((47)))(43) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1521 (government contracting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(48)))(44) $364,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2327 (sexual misconduct/postsec.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(51)))(45) $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6061 (telemedicine training). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(52)))(46) $1,549,000 of the economic development strategic reserve account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6139 (aerospace tech. innovation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(47) $141,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 6, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272).

Sec. 1503. 2020 c 357 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($222,642,000))

$222,508,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($233,649,000))

$228,750,000

Washington State University Building Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$792,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$33,995,000

((Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000))

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2020)
. . . .
$138,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2021)
. . . .
$138,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$30,954,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($522,358,000))

$517,275,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a rural economic development and outreach coordinator.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.

(4) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

(5) $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $7,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the continued development and operations of a medical school program in Spokane.

(6) $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $135,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.

(7) $29,152,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($29,793,000))$29,881,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(8) $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $376,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (2SHB 1713) (children's mental health).

(9) $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $580,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the development of an organic agriculture systems degree program located at the university center in Everett.

(10) Within the funds appropriated in this section, Washington State University shall:

(a) Review the scholarly literature on the short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use to assess if other states or private entities are conducting marijuana research in areas that may be useful to the state.

(b) Provide as part of its budget request for the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium:

(i) A list of intended state, federal, and privately funded marijuana research, including cost, duration, and scope;

(ii) Plans for partnerships with other universities, state agencies, or private entities, including entities outside the state, for purposes related to researching short-term and long-term effects of marijuana use.

(11) $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $585,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2017 (2SSB 5474) (elk hoof disease).

(12) $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $630,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the creation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(13) $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,370,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the creation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.

(14) General fund—state appropriations in this section are reduced to reflect a reduction in state-supported tuition waivers for graduate students. When reducing tuition waivers, the university will not change its practices and procedures for providing eligible veterans with tuition waivers.

(15) $1,119,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,154,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 36, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (renewable energy, tax incentives).

(16) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials.

(17) $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $20,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the office of clean technology at Washington State University to convene a sustainable aviation biofuels work group to further the development of sustainable aviation fuel as a productive industry in Washington. The work group must include members from the legislature and sectors involved in sustainable aviation biofuels research, development, production, and utilization. The work group must provide recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

(18) $113,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $60,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1517 (domestic violence).

(19) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $75,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to partner with the University of Washington and the Washington State University to provide staff support and facilitation services to the task force established in section 9 of this act.

(20) $264,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5903 (children's mental health).

(21) $37,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $16,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(22) $85,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to coordinate a work group and process to develop options and recommendations to improve consistency, simplicity, transparency, and accountability in higher education data systems. The work group and process must be collaborative and include representatives from relevant agencies and stakeholders, including but not limited to: The Washington student achievement council, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the employment security department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher education, the education data center, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington state institute for public policy, the joint legislative audit and review committee, and at least one representative from a nongovernmental organization that uses longitudinal data for research and decision making. The William D. Ruckelshaus center must facilitate meetings and discussions with stakeholders and provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019. The process must analyze and make recommendations on:

(a) Opportunities to increase postsecondary transparency and accountability across all institutions of higher education that receive state financial aid dollars while minimizing duplication of existing data reporting requirements;

(b) Opportunities to link labor market data with postsecondary data including degree production and postsecondary opportunities to help prospective postsecondary students navigate potential career and degree pathways;

(c) Opportunities to leverage existing data collection efforts across agencies and postsecondary sectors to minimize duplication, centralize data reporting, and create administrative efficiencies;

(d) Opportunities to develop a single, easy to navigate, postsecondary data system and dashboard to meet multiple state goals including transparency in postsecondary outcomes, clear linkages between data on postsecondary degrees and programs and labor market data, and linkages with P-20 data where appropriate. This includes a review of the efficacy, purpose, and cost of potential options for service and management of a statewide postsecondary dashboard; and

(e) Opportunities to increase state agency, legislative, and external researcher access to P-20 data systems in service to state educational goals.

(23) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university's soil health initiative and its network of long-term agroecological research and extension (LTARE) sites. The network must include a Mount Vernon REC site.

(((27)))(24)(a) $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the collaboration with the Washington state patrol, to produce a report focused on recommendations to inform a longitudinal study regarding bias in traffic stops. The report shall include the following information and any additional items identified in the collaboration:

(i) Analysis of traffic stops data for evidence of biased policing in stops, levels of enforcement, and searches;

(ii) Statewide survey of Washington state residents' perception of the Washington state patrol, with a focus on communities and individuals of color; and

(iii) The driving population, Washington state patrol crash data, Washington state patrol calls for service or assistance data, and any other potential data sources and appropriate geographic-level analysis.

(b) The framework shall outline any needed policy changes necessary to perform a longitudinal study, including public engagement. The report shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2020.

(((28)))(25) $130,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2327 (sexual misconduct/postsec.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(26) $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 6, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272).

Sec. 1504. 2020 c 357 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$55,128,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($57,943,000))

$56,856,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$16,794,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($129,865,000))

$128,778,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and at least $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.

(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(3) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(4) $10,472,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($10,702,000))$10,733,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(6) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for gathering and archiving time-sensitive histories and materials and planning for a Lucy Covington center.

(7) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($73,000))$17,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for a comprehensive analysis of the deep lake watershed involving land owners, ranchers, lake owners, one or more conservation districts, the department of ecology, and the department of natural resources.

(8) $21,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $11,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(((10)))(9) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2327 (sexual misconduct/postsec.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1505. 2020 c 357 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($54,520,000))

$54,365,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($57,179,000))

$56,301,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$76,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$19,076,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,924,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($134,775,000))

$133,742,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $11,803,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($12,063,000))$12,098,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(5) $221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $221,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the game on! program, which provides underserved middle and high school students with training in leadership and science, technology, engineering, and math. The program is expected to serve approximately five hundred students per year.

(6) $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $32,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(((11)))(7) $53,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2327 (sexual misconduct/postsec.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1506. 2020 c 357 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$30,208,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($31,303,000))

$30,839,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,450,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($67,043,000))

$66,579,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,590,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($3,669,000))$3,680,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(2) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.

(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the college is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, The Evergreen State College must provide the funding necessary to enable employees of the Washington state institute for public policy to receive the salary increases provided in part 9 of this act.

(5) $2,437,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($2,754,000))$2,528,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to initiate, sponsor, conduct, and publish research that is directly useful to policymakers and manage reviews and evaluations of technical and scientific topics as they relate to major long-term issues facing the state. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (5):

(a) $999,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2020 and $1,294,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided for administration and core operations.

(b) $1,388,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2020 and (($1,177,000))$1,061,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for ongoing and continuing studies on the Washington state institute for public policy's work plan.

(c) $50,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2020 and $25,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to evaluate the outcomes of resource and assessment centers licensed under RCW 74.15.311 and contracted with the department of children, youth, and families. By December 1, 2020, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the institute shall report the results of its evaluation to the appropriate legislative committees; the governor; the department of children, youth, and families; and the oversight board for children, youth, and families. For the evaluation, the institute shall collect data regarding:

(i) The type of placement children experience following placement at a resource and assessment center;

(ii) The number of placement changes that children experience following placement in a resource and assessment center compared with other foster children;

(iii) The length of stay in foster care that children experience following placement in a resource and assessment center compared with other foster children;

(iv) The likelihood that children placed in a resource and assessment center will be placed with siblings; and

(v) The length of time that licensed foster families accepting children placed in resource and assessment centers maintain their licensure compared to licensed foster families receiving children directly from child protective services.

(d) $115,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1391 (early achievers recommendations).

(e) $33,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1646 (juvenile rehab. confinement).

(f) (((i))) Notwithstanding other provisions in this subsection, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2019-21 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.

(6) $86,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2327 (sexual misconduct/postsec.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1507. 2020 c 357 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$78,664,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($82,923,000))

$81,724,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,424,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$13,831,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($176,842,000))

$175,643,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.

(2) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

(3) $16,291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($16,649,000))$16,698,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.

(4) $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $700,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the creation and implementation of an early childhood education degree program at the western on the peninsulas campus. The university must collaborate with Olympic college. At full implementation, the university is expected to grant approximately 75 bachelor's degrees in early childhood education per year at the western on the peninsulas campus.

(5) $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,306,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for Western Washington University to develop a new program in marine, coastal, and watershed sciences.

(6) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.

(7) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for campus connect to develop a student civic leaders initiative that will provide opportunities for students to gain work experience focused on addressing the following critical issues facing communities and campuses: Housing and food insecurities, mental health, civic education (higher education and K-12), breaking the prison pipeline, and the opioid epidemic. Students will:

(a) Participate in civic internships and receive wages to work on one or more of these critical issues on their campus and or in their community, or both;

(b) Receive training on civic education, civil discourse, and learn how to analyze policies that impact community issues; and

(c) Research issues and develop and implement strategies in teams to address them.

(8) $45,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $25,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the university to develop a plan for the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose medication in and around residence halls housing at least 100 students and for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose.

(((10)))(9) $87,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2327 (sexual misconduct/postsec.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11)))(10) $886,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the university to reduce tuition rates for four-year degree programs offered in partnership with Olympic college—Bremerton, Olympic college—Poulsbo, and Peninsula college—Port Angeles that are currently above state-funded resident undergraduate tuition rates. Tuition reductions resulting from this section must go into effect beginning in the 2020-21 academic year.

Sec. 1508. 2020 c 357 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
(($6,459,000))

$6,434,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($7,704,000))

$6,612,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,927,000))

$4,912,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$534,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($19,624,000))

$18,492,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $126,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the consumer protection unit.

(2) $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $174,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5800 (homeless college students).

(3) $150,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely to create a career connected learning statewide program inventory as required in RCW 28C.30.040(1) (f) through (g).

(((6)))(4) The student achievement council must ensure that all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW provide the data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs. This data must be promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible.

(((8)))(5) $208,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5197 (national guard ed. grants). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1509. 2020 c 357 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL—OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$273,435,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($288,093,000))

$290,727,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,038,000))

$11,999,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Education Legacy Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$93,488,000

Washington Opportunity Pathways Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($114,229,000))

$102,197,000

Aerospace Training Student Loan Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($216,000))

$215,000

Workforce Education Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($14,824,000))

$4,719,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$18,000

Health Professionals Loan Repayment and Scholarship

Program Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,720,000

State Educational Trust Fund Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000,000

State Financial Aid Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($805,861,000))

$786,318,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2158 (workforce education) is enacted by June 30, 2019, all references made in this section to the state need grant program are deemed made to the Washington college grant program.

(2) $255,327,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, $7,935,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $45,527,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, $6,000,000 of the state educational trust fund nonappropriated account—state appropriation, and $38,350,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state need grant and state work study programs, including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.

(3) $258,593,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, (($14,824,000))$1,079,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation, $32,112,000 of the education legacy trust fund—state appropriation, and (($56,950,000))$44,918,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Washington college grant program as provided in RCW 28B.92.200.

(4) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.

(5) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for the state need grant includes students with family incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits. Awards for students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent for students with family incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65 percent for students with family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI; 60 percent for students with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent MFI; and 50 percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI. If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2158 (workforce education) is enacted by June 30, 2019, then the eligibility and proration provisions of that bill supersede the provisions of this subsection.

(6) Of the amounts provided in subsection (2) of this section, $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided for the council to process an alternative financial aid application system pursuant to RCW 28B.92.010.

(7) Students who are eligible for the college bound scholarship shall be given priority for the state need grant program. These eligible college bound students whose family incomes are in the 0-65 percent median family income ranges must be awarded the maximum state need grant for which they are eligible under state policies and may not be denied maximum state need grant funding due to institutional policies or delayed awarding of college bound scholarship students. The council shall provide directions to institutions to maximize the number of college bound scholarship students receiving the maximum state need grant for which they are eligible with a goal of 100 percent coordination. Institutions shall identify all college bound scholarship students to receive state need grant priority. If an institution is unable to identify all college bound scholarship students at the time of initial state aid packaging, the institution should reserve state need grant funding sufficient to cover the projected enrollments of college bound scholarship students.

(8) $972,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020, (($1,165,000))$3,701,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, $15,849,000 of the education legacy trust account—state appropriation, and $18,929,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways account—state appropriation are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education shall not consider awards made by the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award amount under RCW 28B.118.010.

(9) $2,759,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 ((and)), $2,795,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021, and $3,640,000 of the workforce education investment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The council shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2020 and 2021 for this purpose.

(10) $2,536,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and (($4,432,000))$4,540,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely to meet state match requirements associated with the opportunity scholarship program. The legislature will evaluate subsequent appropriations to the opportunity scholarship program based on the extent that additional private contributions are made, program spending patterns, and fund balance.

(11) $3,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $3,800,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for expenditure into the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account. These amounts must be used to increase the number of licensed primary care health professionals to serve in licensed primary care health professional critical shortage areas. Contracts between the office and program recipients must guarantee at least three years of conditional loan repayments. The office of student financial assistance and the department of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the health professional loan repayment and scholarship fund for conditional loan repayment contracts with psychiatrists and with advanced registered nurse practitioners for work at one of the state-operated psychiatric hospitals. The office and department shall designate the state hospitals as health professional shortage areas if necessary for this purpose. The office shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to effectively incorporate three conditional loan repayments into the department's advanced psychiatric professional recruitment and retention strategies. The office may use these targeted amounts for other program participants should there be any remaining amounts after eligible psychiatrists and advanced registered nurse practitioners have been served. The office shall also work to prioritize loan repayments to professionals working at health care delivery sites that demonstrate a commitment to serving uninsured clients. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to maintain the current number and amount of awards for the program in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium on the basis of these contractual obligations.

(12) $850,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $750,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1973 (dual enrollment scholarship).

(13) $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,000,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1668 (Washington health corps). Within amounts provided in this subsection, the student achievement council, in consultation with the department of health, shall study the need, feasibility, and potential design of a grant program to provide funding to behavioral health students completing unpaid pregraduation internships and postgraduation supervised hours for licensure.

(14) Sufficient amounts are appropriated within this section to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1311 (college bound).

(15) $1,896,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,673,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1139 (educator workforce supply). Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, $1,650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $1,650,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for funding of the student teaching grant program, the teacher endorsement and certification help program, and the educator conditional scholarship and loan repayment programs under chapter 28B.102 RCW, including the pipeline for paraeducators program, the retooling to teach conditional loan programs, the teacher shortage conditional scholarship program, the career and technical education conditional scholarship program, and the federal student loan repayment in exchange for teaching service program.

(16) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for a state match associated with the rural jobs program. The legislature will evaluate appropriations in future biennia to the rural jobs program based on the extent that additional private contributions are made.

(17) $625,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5197 (national guard ed. grants). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(18) $1,500,000 of the state financial aid account—state appropriation is provided solely for passport to career program scholarship awards.

(19) $161,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6141 (higher education access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(20) $396,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6561 (undocumented student support). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 1510. 2020 c 357 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,270,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,300,000))

$2,279,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($55,511,000))

$55,441,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($211,000))

$210,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$176,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($60,468,000))

$60,376,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium the board shall not designate recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence or recognize them at award ceremonies as provided in RCW 28C.04.535.

(2) $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $240,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the health workforce council of the state workforce training and education coordinating board. In partnership with the office of the governor, the health workforce council shall continue to assess workforce shortages across behavioral health disciplines. The board shall create a recommended action plan to address behavioral health workforce shortages and to meet the increased demand for services now, and with the integration of behavioral health and primary care in 2020. The analysis and recommended action plan shall align with the recommendations of the adult behavioral health system task force and related work of the healthier Washington initiative. The board shall consider workforce data, gaps, distribution, pipeline, development, and infrastructure, including innovative high school, postsecondary, and postgraduate programs to evolve, align, and respond accordingly to our state's behavioral health and related and integrated primary care workforce needs.

(3) $260,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 294, Laws of 2018 (future of work task force).

(4) $28,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5166 (postsecondary religious acc.).

(5) $300,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the board to provide a one-time grant to an accredited university offering a doctorate in osteopathic medicine. The grant must be used to purchase up to twelve fully-equipped ((VSee)) telemedicine kits for student training purposes in rural and underserved communities.

Sec. 1511. 2020 c 357 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$9,001,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($9,275,000))

$9,128,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$590,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($18,900,000))

$18,753,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades ((nine))six through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus or online with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

(2) $149,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $99,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for migration to the state data center, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

Sec. 1512. 2020 c 357 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$14,463,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($14,581,000))

$13,901,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$728,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($29,772,000))

$29,092,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus or online with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of one thousand eighty hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn twenty-four high school credits.

(2) $12,319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $12,319,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for operations, expenses, and direct service to students at the state school for the deaf referenced in RCW 72.40.015(2)(a).

(3) $73,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth to provide American sign language coaching to agency staff.

Sec. 1513. 2020 c 357 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,222,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,513,000))

$2,467,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,160,000))

$2,145,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$122,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($7,067,000))

$7,006,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $175,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the folk and traditional arts apprenticeship and jobs stimulation program.

(2) $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $96,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for the completion and maintenance of the my public art portal project.

(((4)))(3) $172,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $324,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for an arts-integration program that encourages kindergarten readiness in partnership with educational service districts, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the department of children, youth, and families.

Sec. 1514. 2020 c 357 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$3,709,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($3,818,000))

$3,739,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$230,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($7,757,000))

$7,678,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for general support and operations of the Washington state historical society.

(2) $109,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $94,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for supporting migration of the agency's servers to the cloud environment and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

Sec. 1515. 2020 c 357 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$2,751,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($2,841,000))

$2,907,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$214,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($5,806,000))

$5,872,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for general support and operations of the eastern Washington state historical society.

(2) $67,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2020 and $30,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2021 are provided solely for supporting migration to the state data center and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.

(End of part)

PART XVI

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1601. 2020 c 357 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT POOL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$9,107,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$12,309,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,427,000

General Fund—Private/local Appropriation
. . . .
$213,000

Other Appropriated Funds
. . . .
$65,139,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$94,195,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for expenditure into the information technology investment revolving account created in RCW 43.41.433. Funds in the account are provided solely for the information technology projects shown in LEAP omnibus documents IT-2019, dated April 25, 2019, and IT-2020, dated March 9, 2020, which is hereby incorporated by reference. To facilitate the transfer of moneys from other funds and accounts that are associated with projects contained in LEAP omnibus documents IT-2019, dated April 25, 2019, and IT-2020, dated March 9, 2020, the state treasurer is directed to transfer moneys from other funds and accounts to the information technology investment revolving account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management. To facilitate transfer of unused moneys originally from other funds and accounts that were deposited into the information technology revolving account as associated with these same projects, and that are not expended by June 30, 2021, the state treasurer is directed to transfer money from other funds and accounts out of the information technology investment revolving account and deposit into the fund or account of origin in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management. However, restricted federal funds and qualified employee benefit and pension funds may be transferred only to the extent permitted by law, and will otherwise remain outside the information technology investment account. The projects affected remain subject to the other provisions of this section.

(2) Agencies must apply to the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer to receive funding from the information technology investment revolving account. The office of financial management must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the receipt of each application and may not approve a funding request for ten business days from the date of notification.

(3) Allocations and allotments of information technology investment revolving account must be made for discrete stages of projects as determined by the technology budget approved by the office of the state chief information officer and office of financial management. Fifteen percent of total funding allocated by the office of financial management, or another amount as defined jointly by the office of financial management and the office of the state chief information officer, will be retained in the account, but remain allocated to that project. The retained funding will be released to the agency only after successful completion of that stage of the project. For the military department enhanced 911 next generation project and the one Washington project, the amount retained is increased to at least twenty percent of total funding allocated for any stage of that project.

(4)(a) Each project must have a technology budget. The technology budget must use a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, each fund source, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the entire project investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project onset through implementation and close out.

(b) As part of the development of a technology budget and at each request for funding, the agency shall submit detailed financial information to the office of financial management and the office of the state chief information officer. The technology budget must describe the total cost of the project by fiscal month to include and identify:

(i) Fund sources;

(ii) Full time equivalent staffing level to include job classification assumptions;

(iii) A discreet appropriation index and program index;

(iv) Object and subobject codes of expenditures; and

(v) Anticipated deliverables.

(c) If a project technology budget changes and a revised technology budget is completed, a comparison of the revised technology budget to the last approved technology budget must be posted to the dashboard, to include a narrative rationale on what changed, why, and how that impacts the project in scope, budget, and schedule.

(5)(a) Each project must have an investment plan that includes:

(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities;

(ii) The office of the state chief information officer staff assigned to the project;

(iii) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project;

(iv) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product;

(v) Ongoing maintenance and operations cost of the project post implementation and close out delineated by agency staffing, contracted staffing, and service level agreements; and

(vi) Financial budget coding to include at least discreet program index and subobject codes.

(6) Projects with estimated costs greater than one hundred million dollars from initiation to completion and implementation may be divided into discrete subprojects as determined by the office of the state chief information officer, except for the one Washington project which must be divided into the following discrete subprojects: Core financials, expanding financials and procurement, budget, and human resources. Each subproject must have a technology budget and investment plan as provided in this section.

(7)(a) The office of the state chief information officer shall maintain an information technology project dashboard that provides updated information each fiscal month on projects subject to this section. This includes, at least:

(i) Project changes each fiscal month;

(ii) Noting if the project has a completed market requirements document;

(iii) Financial status of information technology projects under oversight;

(iv) Coordination with agencies;

(v) Monthly quality assurance reports, if applicable;

(vi) Monthly office of the state chief information officer status reports;

(vii) Historical project budget and expenditures through fiscal year 2019;

(viii) Budget and expenditures each fiscal month; and

(ix) Estimated annual maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year.

(b) The dashboard must retain a roll up of the entire project cost, including all subprojects, that can be displayed the subproject detail.

(8) If the project affects more than one agency:

(a) A separate technology budget and investment plan must be prepared for each agency; and

(b) The dashboard must contain a statewide project technology budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.

(9) For any project that exceeds two million dollars in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:

(a) Quality assurance for the project must report independently to the office of the chief information officer;

(b) The office of the chief information officer must review, and, if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;

(c) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;

(d) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed; and

(e) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements.

(10) The office of the state chief information officer must evaluate the project at each stage and certify whether the project is planned, managed, and meeting deliverable targets as defined in the project's approved technology budget and investment plan.

(11) The office of the state chief information officer may suspend or terminate a project at any time if it determines that the project is not meeting or not expected to meet anticipated performance and technology outcomes. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall unallot any unused funding and shall not make any expenditure for the project without the approval of the office of financial management. The office of the state chief information officer must report on July 1 and December 1 each calendar year, beginning July 1, 2020, any suspension or termination of a project in the previous six month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(12) The office of the state chief information officer, in consultation with the office of financial management, may identify additional projects to be subject to this section, including projects that are not separately identified within an agency budget. The office of the state chief information officer must report on July 1 and December 1 each calendar year, beginning July 1, 2020, any additional projects to be subjected to this section that were identified in the previous six month period to the legislative fiscal committees.

(13) Any cost to administer or implement this section for projects listed in subsection (1) of this section, must be paid from the information technology investment revolving account. For any other information technology project made subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section, the cost to implement this section must be paid from the funds for that project.

(14) The information technology feasibility study of the Washington state gambling commission is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review in this section.

(15) The learning management system project of the department of enterprise services is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review in this section.

(16) The gambling self-exclusion program project of the Washington state gambling commission is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review in this section.

(17) The facilities portfolio management tool project of the office of financial management is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review in this section.

(18) The logging and monitoring project of the consolidated technology services agency is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review in this section.

Sec. 1602. 2020 c 357 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,179,075,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($1,224,915,000))

$1,205,579,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,273,000))

$7,596,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$46,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($277,000))

$89,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$566,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,411,182,000))

$2,392,981,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1603. A new section is added to 2020 c 357 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$152,528,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State Appropriation

$5,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$152,533,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 1604. 2020 c 357 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,052,000))

$1,730,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($55,000))

$38,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,924,000))

$4,585,000

Sec. 1605. 2020 c 357 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS

The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2020 or fiscal year 2021, unless otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.

These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:

(1) Gerardo Rodarte Gonzalez, claim number 99970260. . . .$24,385

(2) Edward Bushnell, claim number 99970261. . . .$153,357

(3) Shaun Beveridge, claim number 99970262. . . .$56,514

(4) Brandon Wheeler, claim number 9991001053. . . .$123,464

(5) Johnathan Paine, claim number 9991001583. . . .$22,246

(6) Michael Welsh, claim number 9991001600. . . .$5,000

(7) Douglas Bartlett, claim number 9991001646. . . .$5,500

(8) Brian Minniear, claim number 9991001941. . . .$111,956

(9) Thomas Carey, claim number 9991001917. . . .$122,431

(10) Clayton Nicholas, claim number 9991003704. . . .$15,014

(11) Corey Ellis, claim number 9991003458. . . .$3,830

(12) Sean Tuley, claim number 9991003888. . . .$47,901

(13) Juan Morales Padilla, claim number 9991003289. . . .$3,700

(14) Dillon Standberg, claim number 9991004467. . . .$2,201

(15) Frank Butler, claim number 9991004743. . . .$20,000

Sec. 1606. 2020 c 357 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(2) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$73,000,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
(($75,800,000))

$78,800,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($148,800,000))

$151,800,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$1,545,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$13,855,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$15,400,000

(4) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges' retirement system:

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2020)
. . . .
$400,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$400,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$800,000

Sec. 1607. 2020 c 357 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS AND RESERVE OFFICERS—CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

There is appropriated for state contributions to the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund:

Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'

Administrative Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($15,532,000))

$10,132,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($15,532,000))

$10,132,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount provided in this section is the maximum amount that may be expended. In addition, the office of financial management must reduce the allotment of the amount provided in this section if allotment of the full appropriation will put the account into deficit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1608. A new section is added to 2020 c 357 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—MEDICAID FRAUD PENALTY ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,405,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,405,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the medicaid fraud penalty account created in RCW 74.09.215.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1609. A new section is added to 2020 c 357 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONS ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the business and professions account created in RCW 43.24.150.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1610. A new section is added to 2020 c 357 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$2,463,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$2,463,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the disaster response account created in RCW 38.52.105 for national guard costs to provide security to the state capitol campus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1611. A new section is added to 2020 c 357 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION FUND

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$82,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$82,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the unemployment compensation fund created in RCW 50.16.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1612. A new section is added to 2020 c 357 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—JUDICIAL STABILIZATION TRUST ACCOUNT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2021)
. . . .
$1,910,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$1,910,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the judicial stabilization trust account created in RCW 43.79.505.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1613. A new section is added to 2020 c 357 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—CORONAVIRUS LOCAL FISCAL RECOVERY FUND

General Fund—Federal Appropriation (ARPA)
. . . .
$438,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$438,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for distribution to nonentitlement units of local government pursuant to section 9901, section 603(a)(2), American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(End of part)

PART XVII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1701. 2020 c 357 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premium distributions
. . . .
(($10,883,000))

$10,001,000

General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorney

distributions
. . . .
(($7,618,000))

$8,165,000

General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and

education distributions
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$3,559,000

General Fund Appropriation for public utility

district excise tax distributions
. . . .
(($65,249,000))

$64,274,000

Death Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution to counties for publicly funded

autopsies
. . . .
(($3,464,000))

$3,557,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for

harbor improvement revenue distributions
. . . .
$140,000

Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for

distribution to "timber" counties
. . . .
(($79,337,000))

$67,172,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($103,457,000))

$102,364,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($40,310,000))

$40,451,000

City-County Assistance Appropriation
. . . .
(($35,507,000))

$43,279,000

Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise tax distribution
. . . .
(($67,362,000))

$73,676,000

Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account

Appropriation for distribution to local taxing

jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended

revenue redistributions effect of sourcing law

changes
. . . .
$1,937,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Confederated Tribes of the Colville

Reservation
. . . .
$8,364,000

Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation

for the Spokane Tribe of Indians
. . . .
$5,728,000

Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor

profits distribution
. . . .
$98,876,000

General Fund Appropriation for other tax

distributions
. . . .
(($80,000))

$89,000

General Fund Appropriation for Marijuana Excise Tax

distributions
. . . .
$30,000,000

General Fund Appropriation for Habitat Conservation

Program distributions
. . . .
(($5,754,000))

$4,867,000

General Fund Appropriation for payment in-lieu of

taxes to counties under Department of Fish and

Wildlife program
. . . .
(($4,040,000))

$3,830,000

Puget Sound Taxpayer Accountability Account

Appropriation for distribution to counties in

amounts not to exceed actual deposits into the

account and attributable to those counties'

share pursuant to RCW 43.79.520. If a county

eligible for distributions under RCW 43.79.520

has not adopted a sales and use tax under RCW

82.14.460 before July 1, 2019, then to prevent

these distributions from supplanting existing

local funding for vulnerable populations, the

distributions are subject to the procedural

requirements in this section. Before the county

may receive distributions, it must provide a

final budget for the distributions, submit the

final budget to the department of commerce, and

publish the final budget on its web site. To

develop this final budget, under RCW 36.40.040

the county must develop and hold hearings on a

preliminary budget that is separate from other

appropriations ordinances or resolutions, and

it must consult stakeholders, including

community service organizations, and must

consider input received during this process.

Before holding a hearing on the preliminary

budget, the county must notify local

governments in the county that are within the

borders of the regional transit authority, and

legislators whose districts are within those

borders. The county must then adopt a final

budget under RCW 36.40.080 for the

distributions that is separate from other

appropriations ordinances or resolutions. After

the county submits its final budget for the

distributions to the department of commerce,

the department must notify the state treasurer,

who may then make the distributions to the

county.
. . . .
(($28,683,000))

$16,999,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($607,516,000))

$587,328,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 1702. 2020 c 357 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to the

basic health plan trust account, the lesser of

the amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540

or this amount for fiscal year 2020,

$213,000,000 and this amount for fiscal year

2021, (($213,000,000))$263,000,000
. . . .
(($426,000,000))

$476,000,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, the lesser of the amount

determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or this

amount for fiscal year 2020, $152,000,000 and

this amount for fiscal year 2021,

(($152,000,000))$202,000,000
. . . .
(($304,000,000))

$354,000,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to

the clean up settlement account as repayment of

the loan provided in section 3022(2), chapter

2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess. (ESB 6074, 2012

supplemental capital budget), in an amount not

to exceed the actual amount of the total

remaining principal and interest of the loan,

$620,000 for fiscal year 2020 and $640,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$1,260,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the annual base payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2020
. . . .
$90,000,000

Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the

state general fund, in an amount not to exceed

the actual amount of the annual base payment to

the tobacco settlement account for fiscal year

2021
. . . .
$90,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the statewide tourism

marketing account, $1,500,000 for fiscal year

2020 and $1,500,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$3,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales

and use tax account, for fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$1,937,000

((General Fund: For transfer to the

manufacturing and warehousing jobs

centers account for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$6,727,000))

Criminal Justice Treatment Account: For transfer to

the home security fund, for fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$4,500,000

State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the state general fund, $8,000,000 for fiscal

year 2020 and $8,000,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$16,000,000

Disaster Response Account: For transfer to the state

general fund, $13,726,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$13,726,000

General Fund: For transfer to the fair fund under

RCW 15.76.115, $2,000,000 for fiscal year 2020

and $2,000,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$4,000,000

Energy Freedom Account: For transfer to the general

fund, $1,000,000 or as much thereof that

represents the balance in the account for

fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$1,000,000

Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer

to the state general fund, $3,500,000 for

fiscal year 2020 and $3,500,000 for fiscal year

2021
. . . .
$7,000,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to

the geoduck aquaculture research account,

$400,000 for fiscal year 2020 and $400,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$800,000

Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the

education legacy trust account, $80,000,000

for fiscal year 2020 and $80,000,000 for fiscal

year 2021
. . . .
$160,000,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account: For transfer

to the clean up settlement account as

repayment of the loan provided in section

3022(2), chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

(ESB 6074, 2012 supplemental capital budget),

in an amount not to exceed the actual amount of

the total remaining principal and interest of

the loan, $620,000 for fiscal year 2020 and

$640,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$1,260,000

Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account: For

transfer to the aquatic lands enhancement

account, $160,000 for fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$160,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration

Account: For transfer to the water pollution

control revolving account, $4,500,000 for

fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$4,500,000

Oil Spill Response Account: For transfer to the oil

spill prevention account for the military

department to continue assisting local

emergency planning committees statewide with

hazardous materials plans that meet minimum

federal requirements, $520,000 for fiscal year

2020 and $520,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$1,040,000

General Fund: For transfer to the sea cucumber dive

fishery account, in an amount not to exceed the

actual amount to correct the cash deficit for

fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$4,000

General Fund: For transfer to the sea urchin diver

fishery account, in an amount not to exceed the

actual amount to correct the cash deficit for

fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$1,000

((Gambling Revolving Account: For transfer to

the state general fund as repayment of

the loan pursuant to Engrossed

Substitute House Bill No. 2638 (sports

wagering/compacts), $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$6,000,000))

General Fund: For transfer to the home security

fund, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$4,500,000

Child Care Facility Revolving Account: For transfer

to the general fund, $1,500,000 for fiscal year

2021
. . . .
$1,500,000

General Fund: For transfer to the economic

development strategic reserve account,

$1,000,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$1,000,000

General Fund: For transfer to the community

preservation and development authority account,

$1,500,000 for fiscal year 2020
. . . .
$1,500,000

Budget Stabilization Account: For transfer to the

state general fund for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$1,820,376,000

School Employees' Insurance Account: For transfer to

the state general fund as repayment of the

loan pursuant to section 704, chapter 299, Laws

of 2018 (operating budget--supplemental),

$24,060,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$24,060,000

General Fund: For transfer to the workforce

education investment account, $75,000,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$75,000,000

(End of part)

PART XVIII

MISCELLANEOUS

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 1801. RCW 43.88.058 and 2018 c 208 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter, expenditures for the following foster care, adoption support and related services, and child protective services must be forecasted and budgeted as maintenance level costs:

(1) Behavioral rehabilitation services placements;

(2) Social worker and related staff to receive, refer, and respond to screened-in reports of child abuse or neglect, except in fiscal year 2021;

(3) Court-ordered parent-child and sibling visitations delivered by contractors; and

(4) Those activities currently being treated as maintenance level costs for budgeting or forecasting purposes on June 7, 2018, including, but not limited to: (a) Adoption support and other adoption-related expenses; (b) foster care maintenance payments; (c) child-placing agency management fees; (d) support goods such as clothing vouchers; (e) child aides; and (f) child care for children in foster or relative placements when the caregiver is at work or in school.

Sec. 1802. 2019 c 415 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several amounts specified in parts I through IX of this act, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries, wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2019, and ending June 30, 2021, except as otherwise provided, out of the several funds of the state hereinafter named.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this act.

(a) "ARPA" means funds attributable to the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(b) "CRF" means funds attributable to the coronavirus relief fund created by section 5001, the coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act, P.L. 116-136, division A.

(c) "CRRSA" means funds attributable to the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(d) "CRRSA/ESSER" means funds attributable to the elementary and secondary school emergency relief fund, as modified by the coronavirus response and relief supplemental appropriations act, P.L. 116-260, division M.

(e) "Fiscal year 2020" or "FY 2020" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020.

(((b)))(f) "Fiscal year 2021" or "FY 2021" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2021.

(((c)))(g) "FMAP" means federal medical assistance percentage, including funds attributable to the temporary increase of medicaid FMAP by section 6008, the families first coronavirus response act, P.L. 116-127, division F.

(h) "FTE" means full time equivalent.

(((d)))(i) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(((e)))(j) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

Sec. 1803. 2021 c 3 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE—RENTAL ASSISTANCE AND HOUSING

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$365,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$365,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $325,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRRSA) is provided solely for the department to administer an emergency rental and utility assistance program pursuant to P.L. 116-260, the federal consolidated appropriations act. The department shall distribute funding in the form of grants to local housing providers. In making distributions, the department must consider the number of unemployed persons and renters in each jurisdiction served by the provider as well as account for any funding that jurisdiction, including cities within each county, received directly from the federal government. A provider may use up to 9.5 percent of their grant award for administrative costs and the remainder must be used for financial assistance as defined in P.L. 116-260. The department may retain up to 0.5 percent of the funding provided in this subsection to administer the program.

(2)(a) $30,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for the department to administer an eviction rental assistance program. The department shall distribute funding in the form of grants to local housing providers. In making distributions, the department must consider the number of unemployed persons and renters in each jurisdiction served by the provider. To be eligible for the program, households must, at a minimum, have an income at or below 80 percent of the area median income and must have a missed or partially paid rent payment. Rental payments made through the program will be provided directly to landlords. The department may establish additional eligibility criteria to target these resources to households most likely to become homeless if they do not receive rental assistance.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $16,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for local housing providers to subgrant with community organizations that serve historically disadvantaged populations within their jurisdiction. Subgrants may be used for program outreach and assisting community members in applying for assistance under this subsection and subsection (1) of this section.

(3) $4,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for the department to assist homeowners at risk of foreclosure pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW. Funding must be used for activities to prevent mortgage or tax lien foreclosures, housing counselors, foreclosure prevention hotlines, low-income legal services, mediation, and other activities that promote homeownership. The department may contract with other state agencies to carry out these activities.

(4) $1,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for a contract with resolution Washington for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs to provide citizens with low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation. This funding must be prioritized for resolution services relating to evictions.

(5) $1,500,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for the department to contract with the office of civil legal aid to provide services relating to evictions, housing, and utilities.

(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for the department to contract with the office of the attorney general for legal work relating to the eviction moratorium extended in the governor's proclamation 20-19.5.

(7)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation (CRF) is provided solely for a program to provide grants to eligible landlords who have encountered a significant financial hardship due to loss of rental income from elective nonpayor tenants during the state's eviction moratorium pursuant to the governor's proclamation.

(b) To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, a landlord must:

(i) Apply for a grant or have a property manager or property management company apply for a grant on behalf of a landlord;

(ii) Be the sole investor in the property from which they are seeking rental arrears;

(iii) Be the owner of no more than ((four))six dwelling units from which they receive rental payments; and

(iv) ((Not contract with a property manager or property management company for duties or activities related to the tenancy or dwelling unit; and

(v))) Have an elective nonpayor tenant who is in arrears in rent or utilities or both.

(c) Eligible landlords may receive a grant of up to 80 percent of the total amount of rent in arrears. The department must prioritize landlords who have an income at or below 100 percent of the area median income and who demonstrate a loss of rental income, to the extent that funds are available.

(d) The department may inspect the property and the landlord's records related to an application under the program, including the use of a third-party inspector as needed to investigate fraud, to assist in making its application review, and to determine eligibility.

(e) A landlord who receives a grant under this section is prohibited from:

(i) Taking any legal action against the tenant for damages attributable to the same tenancy; or

(ii) Pursuing collection, or authorizing another entity to pursue collection on the landlord's behalf, against the tenant for damages attributable to the same tenancy.

(8) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Dwelling unit" has the meaning defined in RCW 59.18.030.

(ii) "Elective nonpayor" means a tenant who has been determined to not be eligible for the federal or state emergency rental assistance program or has not applied for the federal or state emergency rental assistance program.

(iii) "Landlord" has the meaning defined in RCW 59.18.030.

(iv) "Owner" has the meaning defined in RCW 59.18.030.

(v) "Rent" has the meaning defined in RCW 59.18.030.

(vi) "Tenant" has the meaning defined in RCW 59.18.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1804. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1805. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1806. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---