BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No later than December 1, 2021, the Washington state criminal justice training commission, the Washington state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and organizations representing state and local law enforcement officers shall develop a written model policy on the use of vascular neck restraints.

(2) The commission shall provide training for law enforcement officers on the proper use of vascular neck restraints. A minimum of 50 percent of peace officers employed within any law enforcement agency must be properly trained and certified in the use of vascular neck restraints.

(3) By June 1, 2022, every state, county, and municipal law enforcement agency shall adopt and implement a vascular neck restraint policy. The policy adopted may, but need not, be the model policy developed under subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---