BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

No agency may adopt a rule for the enforcement of a gubernatorial order issued pursuant to RCW 43.06.220 unless the agency first receives approval for the rule from the legislature under a concurrent resolution.

--- END ---