BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that Washingtonians have been patient and vigilant in the long fight against COVID-19 while experiencing severe hardships as a result of limitations on social events, business, travel, worship, and a variety of other activities. While the people must be commended for their endurance in the face of a historic trial, it is time for Washington's government to demonstrate that it trusts Washingtonians to conduct their affairs with a sense of individual responsibility and due consideration for others. The legislature emphatically believes that the people of Washington have shown that they are rising to the challenges of COVID-19, that they care for their communities, and that businesses and other facilities in this state are equipped and ready to serve their customers and patrons in a safe manner.

(2) By this act, the legislature determines that the businesses, facilities, institutions, and all other places or organizations whose activities would be limited or restricted under the governor's "Healthy Washington-Roadmap to Recovery" plan, which was announced on January 5, 2021, must be allowed to immediately and safely reopen or resume under the provisions of "Phase 2" of the "Healthy Washington-Roadmap to Recovery" plan, as those provisions existed on the effective date of this section.

(3) The legislature intends to regularly review the best available public health data to determine whether additional actions should be taken after the effective date of this section. The legislature further intends to take actions including, but not limited to, reverting to different phases of restrictions, in the event that the legislature determines that public health is deteriorating or that other considerations demand that the approach to reopening Washington must be changed.

(4) In the event that the best available public health data shows that public health is improving, the legislature intends to take additional actions to remove any remaining restrictions as Washington transitions out of a state of emergency.

(5) This section expires January 10, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---