BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.12.320 and 2001 c 253 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may make agreements with persons, political subdivisions of this state, or the United States or its agencies or instrumentalities, regarding fish, shellfish, and wildlife-oriented recreation and the propagation, protection, conservation, and control of fish, shellfish, and wildlife.

(2) The director may make written agreements with the owners or lessees of real or personal property to provide for the use of the property for fish, shellfish, and wildlife-oriented recreation. The director may adopt rules governing the conduct of persons in or on the real property.

(3) The director may accept compensation for fish, shellfish, and wildlife losses or gifts or grants of personal property for use by the department.

(4) The commission may indemnify the United States and its agencies as a condition of securing federal funds for purposes of fish, shellfish, and wildlife projects.

--- END ---