BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

Prior to July 1, 2036, a port district may not prohibit trucks with a model year 2006 or older from operating on port district property. Additionally, a port district may not penalize, or otherwise discriminate against, the operation of trucks on port district property that fail to meet emissions standards or related engine standards set by the district.

--- END ---