BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the COVID-19 pandemic is causing a sustained global economic slowdown, and an economic downturn throughout Washington state with unprecedented numbers of layoffs and reduced work hours for a significant percentage of our workforce. Many of the state's workforce has been impacted by these layoffs and substantially reduced work hours and have suffered economic hardship, disproportionately affecting low and moderate-income workers resulting in lost wages and the inability to pay for basic household expenses, including rent. Hundreds of thousands of tenants in Washington are unable to consistently pay their rent, reflecting the continued financial precariousness of many renters in the state. Before the COVID-19 pandemic, nonpayment of rent was the leading cause of evictions within the state. Because the COVID-19 pandemic has led to an inability for tenants to consistently pay rent, the likelihood of evictions has increased, as well as life, health, and safety risks to a significant percentage of the state's tenants. As a result, the governor has issued a temporary moratorium on evictions as of March 2020, with multiple extensions and other related actions, to reduce housing instability and enable tenants to stay in their homes.

Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature with this act to increase tenant protections during the public health emergency, provide legal representation for qualifying tenants in eviction cases, establish an eviction resolution pilot program to address nonpayment of rent eviction cases before any court filing, and ensure tenants and landlords have adequate opportunities to access state and local rental assistance programs to reimburse landlords for unpaid rent and preserve tenancies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply to sections 3 and 4 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Dwelling unit" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 59.18.030, and includes a manufactured/mobile home or a mobile home lot as defined in RCW 59.20.030.

(2) "Eviction moratorium" refers to the governor of the state of Washington's proclamation 20.19-5, proclaiming a moratorium on certain evictions for all counties throughout Washington state on December 31, 2020, and any subsequent orders extending or amending such proclamation until it expires or is terminated by the governor of the state of Washington.

(3) "Landlord" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 59.18.030 and 59.20.030.

(4) "Public health emergency" refers to the governor of the state of Washington's proclamation 20-05, proclaiming a state of emergency for all counties throughout Washington state on February 29, 2020, and any subsequent orders extending or amending such proclamation due to COVID-19 until the proclamation expires or is terminated by the governor of the state of Washington.

(5) "Rent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 59.18.030.

(6) "Tenant" refers to any individual renting a dwelling unit or lot primarily for living purposes, including any individual with a tenancy subject to this chapter or chapter 59.20 RCW or any individual residing in transient lodging, such as a hotel or motel or camping area as their primary dwelling, for 30 days or more prior to March 1, 2020. "Tenant" does not include any individual residing in a hotel or motel or camping area as their primary dwelling for more than 30 days after March 1, 2020, if the hotel or motel or camping area has provided the individual with a seven-day eviction notice, which must include the following language: "For no-cost legal assistance, please call 2-1-1 or the Northwest Justice Project CLEAR Hotline outside King County (888) 201-1014 weekdays between 9:15 a.m. – 12:15 p.m., or (888) 387-7111 for seniors (age 60 and over). You may find additional resource information at http://www.washingtonlawhelp.org." "Tenant" also does not include occupants of homeless mitigation sites or a person entering onto land without permission of the landowner or lessor. For purposes of this subsection, any local government provision of solid waste or hygiene services to unsanctioned encampments does not constitute permission to occupy land.

TENANT PROTECTIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For rent that accrued between March 1, 2020, and the governor's eviction moratorium expiration date, a tenant's nonpayment of rent must not be a factor in any housing decision affecting a tenant's right or ability to occupy a rental dwelling unit. This subsection applies equally to tenants and prospective tenants.

(2) A landlord may not charge or impose any late fees or other charges against any tenant for the nonpayment of rent that became due during the public health emergency.

(3)(a) A landlord may not deny, discourage application for, or otherwise make unavailable any rental dwelling unit based on a tenant's or prospective tenant's medical history including, but not limited to, the tenant's or prospective tenant's prior or current exposure or infection to the COVID-19 virus.

(b) A landlord may not inquire about, consider, or require disclosure of a tenant's or prospective tenant's medical records or history, unless such disclosure is necessary to evaluate a reasonable accommodation request or reasonable modification request under RCW 49.60.222.

(c) A violation of this subsection (3) constitutes a violation of chapter 49.60 RCW.

(4) A landlord in violation of this section is liable in a civil action for up to four and one-half times the monthly rent of the real property at issue, as well as court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. A court must impose this penalty in an amount necessary to deter future violations, payable to the tenant bringing the action.

REPAYMENT PLANS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If a tenant has remaining unpaid rent that accrued between March 1, 2020, and the end of the public health emergency, the landlord must offer the tenant a reasonable schedule for repayment of the unpaid rent that does not exceed monthly payments equal to one-third of the monthly rental charges during the period of accrued debt. If a tenant fails to accept the terms of a reasonable repayment plan within 14 days of the landlord's offer, the landlord may proceed with an unlawful detainer action as set forth in RCW 59.12.030(3) but subject to any requirements under the eviction resolution pilot program established under section 7 of this act. If the tenant defaults on any rent owed under a repayment plan, the landlord may apply for reimbursement from the landlord mitigation program as authorized under RCW 43.31.605(1)(d) or proceed with an unlawful detainer action as set forth in RCW 59.12.030(3) but subject to any requirements under the eviction resolution pilot program established under section 7 of this act. The court must consider the tenant's circumstances, including decreased income or increased expenses due to COVID-19, and the repayment plan terms offered during any unlawful detainer proceeding.

(2) Any repayment plan entered into under this section must:

(a) Not require payment until 30 days after the repayment plan is offered to the tenant;

(b) Cover rent only and not any late fees, attorneys' fees, or any other fees and charges;

(c) Allow for payments from any source of income as defined in RCW 59.18.255(5) or from pledges by nonprofit organizations, churches, religious institutions, or governmental entities;

(d) Not include provisions or be conditioned on: The tenant's compliance with the rental agreement, payment of attorneys' fees, court costs, or other costs related to litigation if the tenant defaults on the rental agreement; a requirement that the tenant apply for governmental benefits or provide proof of receipt of governmental benefits; or the tenant's waiver of any rights to a notice under RCW 59.12.030 or related provisions before a writ of restitution is issued.

(3) It is a defense to an eviction under RCW 59.12.030(3) that a landlord did not offer a repayment plan in conformity with this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.31.605 and 2020 c 315 s 8 and 2020 c 169 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the availability of funds for this purpose, the landlord mitigation program is created and administered by the department. The department shall have such rule-making authority as the department deems necessary to administer the program.

(b) The following types of claims related to landlord mitigation for renting private market rental units to low-income tenants using a housing subsidy program are eligible for reimbursement from the landlord mitigation program account:

(i) Up to one thousand dollars for improvements identified in RCW 59.18.255(1)(a). In order to be eligible for reimbursement under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the landlord must pay for the first five hundred dollars for improvements, and rent to the tenant whose housing subsidy program was conditioned on the real property passing inspection. Reimbursement under this subsection (1)(b)(i) may also include up to fourteen days of lost rental income from the date of offer of housing to the applicant whose housing subsidy program was conditioned on the real property passing inspection until move in by that applicant;

(ii) Reimbursement for damages as reflected in a judgment obtained against the tenant through either an unlawful detainer proceeding, or through a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction after a hearing;

(iii) Reimbursement for damages established pursuant to subsection (2) of this section; and

(iv) Reimbursement for unpaid rent and unpaid utilities, provided that the landlord can evidence it to the department's satisfaction.

(c) Claims related to landlord mitigation for an unpaid judgment for rent, unpaid judgments resulting from the tenant's failure to comply with an installment payment agreement identified in RCW 59.18.610, late fees, attorneys' fees, and costs after a court order pursuant to RCW 59.18.410(3), including any unpaid portion of the judgment after the tenant defaults on the payment plan pursuant to RCW 59.18.410(3)(c), are eligible for reimbursement from the landlord mitigation program account and are exempt from any postjudgment interest required under RCW 4.56.110. Any claim for reimbursement made pursuant to RCW 59.18.410(3)(e)(ii) must be accompanied by a court order staying the writ of restitution pursuant to RCW 59.18.410(3). Any claim for reimbursement under this subsection (1)(c) is not an entitlement.

(i) The department shall provide for a form on its website for tenants and landlords to apply for reimbursement funds for the landlord pursuant to this subsection (1)(c).

(ii) The form must include: (A) Space for the landlord and tenant to provide names, mailing addresses, phone numbers, date of birth for the tenant, and any other identifying information necessary for the department to process payment; (B) the landlord's statewide vendor identification number and how to obtain one; (C) name and address to whom payment must be made; (D) the amount of the judgment with instructions to include any other supporting documentation the department may need to process payment; (E) instructions for how the tenant is to reimburse the department under (c)(iii) of this subsection; (F) a description of the consequences if the tenant does not reimburse the department as provided in this subsection (1)(c); (G) a signature line for the landlord and tenant to confirm that they have read and understood the contents of the form and program; and (H) any other information necessary for the operation of the program. If the tenant has not signed the form after the landlord has made good faith efforts to obtain the tenant's signature, the landlord may solely submit the form but must attest to the amount of money owed and sign the form under penalty of perjury.

(iii) When a landlord has been reimbursed pursuant to this subsection (1)(c), the tenant for whom payment was made shall reimburse the department by depositing the amount disbursed from the landlord mitigation program account into the court registry of the superior court in which the judgment was entered. The tenant or other interested party may seek an ex parte order of the court under the unlawful detainer action to order such funds to be disbursed by the court. Upon entry of the order, the court clerk shall disburse the funds and include a case number with any payment issued to the department. If directed by the court, a clerk shall issue any payments made by a tenant to the department without further court order.

(iv) The department may deny an application made by a tenant who has failed to reimburse the department for prior payments issued pursuant to this subsection (1)(c).

(v) With any disbursement from the account to the landlord, the department shall notify the tenant at the address provided within the application that a disbursement has been made to the landlord on the tenant's behalf and that failure to reimburse the account for the payment through the court registry may result in a denial of a future application to the account pursuant to this subsection (1)(c). The department may include any other additional information about how to reimburse the account it deems necessary to fully inform the tenant.

(vi) The department's duties with respect to obtaining reimbursement from the tenant to the account are limited to those specified within this subsection (1)(c).

(vii) If at any time funds do not exist in the landlord mitigation program account to reimburse claims submitted under this subsection (1)(c), the department must create and maintain a waitlist and distribute funds in the order the claims are received pursuant to subsection (6) of this section. Payment of any claims on the waitlist shall be made only from the landlord mitigation program account. The department shall not be civilly or criminally liable and may not have any penalty or cause of action of any nature arise against it regarding the provision or lack of provision of funds for reimbursement.

(d) Claims related to landlord mitigation for (i) unpaid rent that accrued between March 1, 2020, and the end of the public health emergency and the tenant has vacated or abandoned the tenancy or (ii) remaining unpaid rent if a tenant defaults on a repayment plan entered into under section 4 of this act are eligible for reimbursement from the landlord mitigation program account subject to the program requirements under this section.

(2) In order for a claim under subsection (1)(b)(iii) of this section to be eligible for reimbursement from the landlord mitigation program account, a landlord must:

(a) Have ensured that the rental property was inspected at the commencement of the tenancy by both the tenant and the landlord or landlord's agent and that a detailed written move-in property inspection report, as required in RCW 59.18.260, was prepared and signed by both the tenant and the landlord or landlord's agent;

(b) Make repairs and then apply for reimbursement to the department;

(c) Submit a claim on a form to be determined by the department, signed under penalty of perjury; and

(d) Submit to the department copies of the move-in property inspection report specified in (a) of this subsection and supporting materials including, but not limited to, before repair and after repair photographs, videos, copies of repair receipts for labor and materials, and such other documentation or information as the department may request.

(3) The department shall make reasonable efforts to review a claim within ten business days from the date it received properly submitted and complete claims to the satisfaction of the department. In reviewing a claim pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, and determining eligibility for reimbursement, the department must receive documentation, acceptable to the department in its sole discretion, that the claim involves a private market rental unit rented to a low-income tenant who is using a housing subsidy program.

(4) Claims pursuant to subsection (1)(b) and (d) of this section related to a tenancy must total at least five hundred dollars in order for a claim to be eligible for reimbursement from the program. While claims or damages may exceed five thousand dollars, total reimbursement from the program may not exceed five thousand dollars per tenancy.

(5) Damages, beyond wear and tear, that are eligible for reimbursement include, but are not limited to: Interior wall gouges and holes; damage to doors and cabinets, including hardware; carpet stains or burns; cracked tiles or hard surfaces; broken windows; damage to household fixtures such as disposal, toilet, sink, sink handle, ceiling fan, and lighting. Other property damages beyond normal wear and tear may also be eligible for reimbursement at the department's discretion.

(6) All reimbursements for eligible claims shall be made on a first-come, first-served basis, to the extent of available funds. The department shall use best efforts to notify the tenant of the amount and the reasons for any reimbursements made.

(7) The department, in its sole discretion, may inspect the property and the landlord's records related to a claim, including the use of a third-party inspector as needed to investigate fraud, to assist in making its claim review and determination of eligibility.

(8) A landlord in receipt of reimbursement from the program pursuant to subsection (1)(b) and (d) of this section is prohibited from:

(a) Taking legal action against the tenant for damages or any remaining unpaid rent attributable to the same tenancy; or

(b) Pursuing collection, or authorizing another entity to pursue collection on the landlord's behalf, of a judgment against the tenant for damages or any remaining unpaid rent attributable to the same tenancy.

(9) A landlord denied reimbursement under subsection (1)(b)(iii) of this section may seek to obtain a judgment from a court of competent jurisdiction and, if successful, may resubmit a claim for damages supported by the judgment, along with a certified copy of the judgment. The department may reimburse the landlord for that portion of such judgment that is based on damages reimbursable under the landlord mitigation program, subject to the limitations set forth in this section.

(10) Determinations regarding reimbursements shall be made by the department in its sole discretion.

(11) The department must establish a website that advertises the landlord mitigation program, the availability of reimbursement from the landlord mitigation program account, and maintains or links to the agency rules and policies established pursuant to this section.

(12) Neither the state, the department, or persons acting on behalf of the department, while acting within the scope of their employment or agency, is liable to any person for any loss, damage, harm, or other consequence resulting directly or indirectly from the department's administration of the landlord mitigation program or determinations under this section.

(13)(a) A report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the effectiveness of the program and recommended modifications shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2021. In preparing the report, the department shall convene and solicit input from a group of stakeholders to include representatives of large multifamily housing property owners or managers, small rental housing owners in both rural and urban markets, a representative of tenant advocates, and a representative of the housing authorities.

(b) The report shall include discussion of the effectiveness of the program as well as the department's recommendations to improve the program, and shall include the following:

(i) The number of total claims and total amount reimbursed to landlords by the fund;

(ii) Any indices of fraud identified by the department;

(iii) Any reports by the department regarding inspections authorized by and conducted on behalf of the department;

(iv) An outline of the process to obtain reimbursement for improvements and for damages from the fund;

(v) An outline of the process to obtain reimbursement for lost rent due to the rental inspection and tenant screening process, together with the total amount reimbursed for such damages;

(vi) An evaluation of the feasibility for expanding the use of the mitigation fund to provide up to ninety-day no interest loans to landlords who have not received timely rental payments from a housing authority that is administering section 8 rental assistance;

(vii) Any other modifications and recommendations made by stakeholders to improve the effectiveness and applicability of the program.

(14) As used in this section:

(a) "Housing subsidy program" means a housing voucher as established under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437 as of January 1, 2018, or other housing subsidy program including, but not limited to, valid short-term or long-term federal, state, or local government, private nonprofit, or other assistance program in which the tenant's rent is paid either partially by the program and partially by the tenant, or completely by the program directly to the landlord;

(b) "Low-income" means income that does not exceed eighty percent of the median income for the standard metropolitan statistical area in which the private market rental unit is located; and

(c) "Private market rental unit" means any unit available for rent that is owned by an individual, corporation, limited liability company, nonprofit housing provider, or other entity structure, but does not include housing acquired, or constructed by a public housing agency under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437 as it existed on January 1, 2018.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.31.615 and 2019 c 356 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The landlord mitigation program account is created in the custody of the state treasury. All transfers and appropriations by the legislature, repayments, private contributions, and all other sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the landlord mitigation program under this chapter to reimburse landlords for eligible claims related to private market rental units during the time of their rental to low-income tenants using housing subsidy programs as defined in RCW 43.31.605, for any unpaid judgment issued within an unlawful detainer action after a court order pursuant to RCW 59.18.410(3) as described in RCW 43.31.605(1)(c), for any unpaid rent as described in RCW 43.31.605(1)(d), and for the administrative costs identified in subsection (2) of this section. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) Administrative costs associated with application, distribution, and other program activities of the department may not exceed twenty percent of the annual funds available for the landlord mitigation program. Reappropriations must not be included in the calculation of the annual funds available for determining the administrative costs.

EVICTION RESOLUTION PILOT PROGRAM

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The administrative office of the courts shall contract with dispute resolution centers as described under chapter 7.75 RCW within or serving each county to establish a court-based eviction resolution pilot program operated in accordance with Washington supreme court order no. 25700-B-639 and any standing judicial order of the individual superior court.

(2) The eviction resolution pilot program must be used to facilitate the resolution of nonpayment of rent cases between a landlord and tenant before the landlord files an unlawful detainer action.

(3) Prior to filing an unlawful detainer action for nonpayment of rent, the landlord must provide a notice as required under RCW 59.12.030(3) and an additional notice to the tenant informing them of the eviction resolution pilot program. The landlord must retain proof of service or mailing of the additional notice. The additional notice to the tenant must provide at least the following information regarding the eviction resolution pilot program:

(a) Contact information for the local dispute resolution center;

(b) Contact information for the county's housing justice project or, if none, a statewide organization providing housing advocacy services for low-income residents;

(c) The following statement: "The Washington state office of the attorney general has this notice in multiple languages on its website. You will also find information there on how to find a lawyer or advocate at low or no cost and any available resources to help you pay your rent. Alternatively, you may find additional information to help you at http://www.washingtonlawhelp.org";

(d) The name and contact information of the landlord, the landlord's attorney, if any, and the tenant; and

(e) The following statement: "Failure to respond to this notice within 14 days may result in the filing of a summons and complaint for an unlawful detainer action with the court."

(4) At the time of service or mailing of the pay or vacate notice and additional notice to the tenant, a landlord must also send copies of these notices to:

(a) The local housing justice project or other designee of the office of civil legal aid; and

(b) The local dispute resolution center serving the area where the property is located.

(5) The administrative office of the courts must establish program participation requirements for both the landlord and tenant consistent with any standing judicial order in effect. A landlord must be issued a certification of participation by the appropriate dispute resolution center before the landlord may file an unlawful detainer action for nonpayment of rent with the court.

(6) The administrative office of the courts may also establish and produce any other notice forms and requirements as necessary to implement the eviction resolution pilot program.

(7) Any superior court, in collaboration with the dispute resolution center that is located within or serving the same county, participating in the eviction resolution pilot program must report annually to the administrative office of the courts beginning January 1, 2022, until January 1, 2023, on the following:

(a) The number of unlawful detainer actions for nonpayment of rent that were subject to program requirements;

(b) The number of referrals made to dispute resolution centers;

(c) The number of nonpayment of rent cases resolved by the program;

(d) How many instances the tenant had legal representation either at the conciliation stage or formal mediation stage;

(e) The number of certifications issued by dispute resolution centers and filed by landlords with the court; and

(f) Any other information that relates to the efficacy of the pilot program.

(8) By July 1, 2022, until July 1, 2023, the administrative office of the courts must provide a report to the legislature summarizing the report data shared by the superior courts and dispute resolution centers under subsection (7) of this section.

(9) This section expires July 1, 2023.

RIGHT TO COUNSEL

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the court must appoint an attorney for an indigent tenant at any show cause hearing or scheduled trial. The office of civil legal aid is responsible for implementation of this subsection as provided in section 9 of this act, and the state shall pay the costs of legal services provided by an attorney appointed pursuant to this subsection. Prioritization on the provision of legal representation services must be in those counties in which the most evictions occur, as determined by the office of civil legal aid.

(2) For purposes of this section, "indigent" means any person who, at any stage of a court proceeding, is:

(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance: Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, medical care services under RCW 74.09.035, pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or supplemental security income; or

(b) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of 200 percent or less of the current federally established poverty level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 2.53 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Moneys appropriated by the legislature for legal services provided by an attorney appointed pursuant to section 8 of this act must be administered by the office of civil legal aid established under RCW 2.53.020. The office of civil legal aid must enter into contracts with attorneys and agencies for the provision of legal services under section 8 of this act to remain within appropriated amounts.

(2) The legislature recognizes that the office of civil legal aid needs time to properly implement the right to attorney legal representation for indigent tenants under and consistent with section 8 of this act. Within 90 days after the effective date of this section, the office of civil legal aid must submit to the appropriate legislative committees a plan to fully implement the tenant representation program under and consistent with section 8 of this act within 12 months of the effective date of this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 59.18.057 and 2020 c 315 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every ((fourteen-day))14-day notice served pursuant to RCW 59.12.030(3) must be in substantially the following form:

"TO:

AND TO:

ADDRESS:

FOURTEEN-DAY NOTICE TO PAY RENT OR VACATE THE PREMISES

You are receiving this notice because the landlord alleges you are not in compliance with the terms of the lease agreement by failing to pay rent and/or utilities and/or recurring or periodic charges that are past due.

(1) Monthly rent due for (list month(s)): $ (dollar amount)

AND/OR

(2) Utilities due for (list month(s)): $ (dollar amount)

AND/OR

(3) Other recurring or periodic charges identified in the lease for (list month(s)): $ (dollar amount)

TOTAL AMOUNT DUE: $ (dollar amount)

Note - payment must be made pursuant to the terms of the rental agreement or by nonelectronic means including, but not limited to, cashier's check, money order, or other certified funds.

You must pay the total amount due to your landlord within fourteen (14) days after service of this notice or you must vacate the premises. Any payment you make to the landlord must first be applied to the total amount due as shown on this notice. Any failure to comply with this notice within fourteen (14) days after service of this notice may result in a judicial proceeding that leads to your eviction from the premises.

The Washington state Office of the Attorney General has this notice in multiple languages as well as information on available resources to help you pay your rent, including state and local rental assistance programs, on its website at www.atg.wa.gov/landlord-tenant. ((You will also find information there on how to find a lawyer or advocate at low or no cost and any available resources to help you pay your rent.

Alternatively, for no-cost legal assistance for low-income renters))State law provides you the right to legal representation and to an appointed lawyer at court if you are a qualifying low-income renter. For additional resources, call 2-1-1 or the Northwest Justice Project CLEAR Hotline outside King County (888) 201-1014 weekdays between 9:15 a.m. – 12:15 p.m., or (888) 387-7111 for seniors (age 60 and over). You may find additional information to help you at http://www.washingtonlawhelp.org. Free or low-cost mediation services to assist in nonpayment of rent disputes before any judicial proceedings occur are also available at dispute resolution centers throughout the state. You can find your nearest dispute resolution center at https://www.resolutionwa.org.

State law also provides you the right to receive interpreter services at court.

OWNER/LANDLORD:___________DATE:______________

WHERE TOTAL AMOUNT DUE IS TO BE PAID: ___(owner/landlord name)___

___________(address)________"

(2) Upon expiration of the eviction resolution pilot program established under section 7 of this act:

(a) The landlord must also provide the notice required in this section to the dispute resolution center located within or serving the county in which the dwelling unit is located. It is a defense to an eviction under RCW 59.12.030 that a landlord did not provide additional notice under this subsection.

(b) Dispute resolution centers are encouraged to notify the housing justice project or northwest justice project located within or serving the county in which the dispute resolution center is located, as appropriate, once notice is received from the landlord under this subsection.

(3) The form required in this section does not abrogate any additional notice requirements to tenants as required by federal, state, or local law.

Sec. 11. RCW 59.18.365 and 2020 c 315 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The summons must contain the names of the parties to the proceeding, the attorney or attorneys if any, the court in which the same is brought, the nature of the action, in concise terms, and the relief sought, and also the return day; and must notify the defendant to appear and answer within the time designated or that the relief sought will be taken against him or her. The summons must contain a street address for service of the notice of appearance or answer and, if available, a facsimile number for the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, if represented. The summons must be served and returned in the same manner as a summons in other actions is served and returned.

(2) A defendant may serve a copy of an answer or notice of appearance by any of the following methods:

(a) By delivering a copy of the answer or notice of appearance to the person who signed the summons at the street address listed on the summons;

(b) By mailing a copy of the answer or notice of appearance addressed to the person who signed the summons to the street address listed on the summons;

(c) By facsimile to the facsimile number listed on the summons. Service by facsimile is complete upon successful transmission to the facsimile number listed upon the summons;

(d) As otherwise authorized by the superior court civil rules.

(3) The summons for unlawful detainer actions for tenancies covered by this chapter shall be substantially in the following form:

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE

STATE OF WASHINGTON

IN AND

FOR . . . . . . COUNTY

Plaintiff/

Landlord/

Owner,















NO.

vs.

EVICTION SUMMONS

(Residential)

Defendant/

Tenant/

Occupant.

THIS IS AN IMPORTANT LEGAL DOCUMENT TO EVICT YOU.

YOUR WRITTEN

RESPONSE MUST BE RECEIVED BY: 5:00 p.m., on . . . . . . . . .

TO: . . . . . . . . . . . . (Defendant's Name)

. . . . . . . . . . . . (Defendant's Address)

GET HELP: If you do not respond by the deadline above, you will lose your right to defend yourself or be represented by a lawyer if you cannot afford one in court and could be evicted.((If you cannot afford a lawyer))The court will appoint a lawyer to represent you if you are indigent as defined in section 8 of this act and are unable to afford a lawyer. For additional resources, you may call 2-1-1 or the Northwest Justice Project CLEAR Hotline outside King County (888) 201-1014 weekdays between 9:15 a.m. – 12:15 p.m., or (888) 387-7111 for seniors (age 60 and over). ((They can refer you to free or low-cost legal help.)) You may find additional information to help you at http://www.washingtonlawhelp.org. Free or low-cost mediation services to assist in nonpayment of rent disputes before any judicial proceedings occur are also available at dispute resolution centers throughout the state. You can find your nearest dispute resolution center at https://www.resolutionwa.org.

HOW TO RESPOND: Phone calls to your Landlord or your Landlord's lawyer are not a response. You may respond with a "notice of appearance." This is a letter that includes the following:

(1) A statement that you are appearing in the court case

(2) Names of the landlord(s) and the tenant(s) (as listed above)

(3) Your name, your address where legal documents may be sent, your signature, phone number (if any), and case number (if the case is filed)

This case □ is / □ is not filed with the court. If this case is filed, you need to also file your response with the court by delivering a copy to the clerk of the court at: . . . . . . . . . . . (Clerk's Office/Address/Room number/Business hours of court clerk)

WHERE TO RESPOND: You must mail, fax, or hand deliver your response letter to your Landlord's lawyer, or if no lawyer is named in the complaint, to your Landlord. If you mail the response letter, you must do it 3 days before the deadline above. Request receipt of a proof of mailing from the post office. If you hand deliver or fax it, you must do it by the deadline above. The address is:

. . . . . . . . . (Attorney/Landlord Name)

. . . . . . . . . (Address)

. . . . . . . . . (Fax - required if available)

COURT DATE: If you respond to this Summons, you will be notified of your hearing date in a document called an "Order to Show Cause." This is usually mailed to you. If you get notice of a hearing, you must go to the hearing. If you do not show up, your landlord can evict you. Your landlord might also charge you more money. If you move before the court date, you must tell your landlord or the landlord's attorney.

LANDLORD ACCESS TO RENTAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 43.185C RCW to read as follows:

The department must authorize landlords an opportunity to apply to the following programs, if feasible, and establish application and eligibility requirements and any conditions on the receipt of funds as the department deems appropriate:

(1) Rental assistance provided through the consolidated homeless grant program;

(2) Rental assistance provided through the emergency solutions grant program; and

(3) Any rental assistance program funded through receipt of any federal COVID-19 relief funds.

OTHER TENANT PROTECTIONS

Sec. 13. RCW 59.12.040 and 2010 c 8 s 19007 are each amended to read as follows:

Any notice provided for in this chapter shall be served either (1) by delivering a copy personally to the person entitled thereto; or (2) if he or she be absent from the premises unlawfully held, by leaving there a copy, with some person of suitable age and discretion, and sending a copy through the mail addressed to the person entitled thereto at his or her place of residence; or (3) if the person to be notified be a tenant, or an unlawful holder of premises, and his or her place of residence is not known, or if a person of suitable age and discretion there cannot be found then by affixing a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place on the premises unlawfully held, and also delivering a copy to a person there residing, if such a person can be found, and also sending a copy through the mail addressed to the tenant, or unlawful occupant, at the place where the premises unlawfully held are situated. Service upon a subtenant may be made in the same manner: PROVIDED, That in cases where the tenant or unlawful occupant, shall be conducting a hotel, inn, lodging house, boarding house, or shall be renting rooms while still retaining control of the premises as a whole, that the guests, lodgers, boarders, or persons renting such rooms shall not be considered as subtenants within the meaning of this chapter, but all such persons may be served by affixing a copy of the notice to be served in two conspicuous places upon the premises unlawfully held; and such persons shall not be necessary parties defendant in an action to recover possession of said premises. Service of any notice provided for in this chapter may be had upon a corporation by delivering a copy thereof to any officer, agent, or person having charge of the business of such corporation, at the premises unlawfully held, and in case no such officer, agent, or person can be found upon such premises, then service may be had by affixing a copy of such notice in a conspicuous place upon said premises and by sending a copy through the mail addressed to such corporation at the place where said premises are situated. Proof of any service under this section may be made by the affidavit of the person making the same in like manner and with like effect as the proof of service of summons in civil actions. When a copy of notice is sent through the mail, as provided in this section, service shall be deemed complete when such copy is deposited in the United States mail in the county in which the property is situated properly addressed with postage prepaid: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That when service is made by mail one additional day shall be allowed before the commencement of an action based upon such notice. ((RCW 59.18.375 may also apply to notice given under this chapter.))

Sec. 14. RCW 59.18.230 and 2020 c 315 s 6 and 2020 c 177 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any provision of a lease or other agreement, whether oral or written, whereby any section or subsection of this chapter is waived except as provided in RCW 59.18.360 and shall be deemed against public policy and shall be unenforceable. Such unenforceability shall not affect other provisions of the agreement which can be given effect without them.

(b) Any agreement, whether oral or written, between a landlord and tenant, or their representatives, and entered into pursuant to an unlawful detainer action under this chapter that requires the tenant to pay any amount in violation of RCW 59.18.283 or the statutory judgment amount limits under RCW 59.18.410 (1) or (2), or waives any rights of the tenant under RCW 59.18.410 or any other rights afforded under this chapter except as provided in RCW 59.18.360 is void and unenforceable. A landlord may not threaten a tenant with eviction for failure to pay nonpossessory charges limited under RCW 59.18.283.

(2) No rental agreement may provide that the tenant:

(a) Agrees to waive or to forgo rights or remedies under this chapter; or

(b) Authorizes any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out of the rental agreement; or

(c) Agrees to pay the landlord's attorneys' fees, except as authorized in this chapter; or

(d) Agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any liability of the landlord arising under law or to indemnify the landlord for that liability or the costs connected therewith; or

(e) And landlord have agreed to a particular arbitrator at the time the rental agreement is entered into; or

(f) Agrees to pay late fees for rent that is paid within five days following its due date. If rent is more than five days past due, the landlord may charge late fees commencing from the first day after the due date until paid. Nothing in this subsection prohibits a landlord from serving a notice to pay or vacate at any time after the rent becomes due.

(3) A provision prohibited by subsection (2) of this section included in a rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord deliberately uses a rental agreement containing provisions known by him or her to be prohibited, the tenant may recover actual damages sustained by him or her, statutory damages not to exceed ((five hundred dollars))$500, costs of suit, and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(4) The common law right of the landlord of distress for rent is hereby abolished for property covered by this chapter. Any provision in a rental agreement creating a lien upon the personal property of the tenant or authorizing a distress for rent is null and void and of no force and effect. Any landlord who takes or detains the personal property of a tenant without the specific written consent of the tenant to such incident of taking or detention, and who, after written demand by the tenant for the return of his or her personal property, refuses to return the same promptly shall be liable to the tenant for the value of the property retained, actual damages, and if the refusal is intentional, may also be liable for damages of up to ((five hundred dollars))$500 per day but not to exceed ((five thousand dollars))$5,000, for each day or part of a day that the tenant is deprived of his or her property. The prevailing party may recover his or her costs of suit and a reasonable attorneys' fee.

In any action, including actions pursuant to chapters 7.64 or 12.28 RCW, brought by a tenant or other person to recover possession of his or her personal property taken or detained by a landlord in violation of this section, the court, upon motion and after notice to the opposing parties, may waive or reduce any bond requirements where it appears to be to the satisfaction of the court that the moving party is proceeding in good faith and has, prima facie, a meritorious claim for immediate delivery or redelivery of said property.

Sec. 15. RCW 59.20.040 and 1999 c 359 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall regulate and determine legal rights, remedies, and obligations arising from any rental agreement between a landlord and a tenant regarding a mobile home lot and including specified amenities within the mobile home park, mobile home park cooperative, or mobile home park subdivision, where the tenant has no ownership interest in the property or in the association which owns the property, whose uses are referred to as a part of the rent structure paid by the tenant. All such rental agreements shall be unenforceable to the extent of any conflict with any provision of this chapter. Chapter 59.12 RCW shall be applicable only in implementation of the provisions of this chapter and not as an alternative remedy to this chapter which shall be exclusive where applicable: PROVIDED, That the provision of RCW 59.12.090, 59.12.100, and 59.12.170 shall not apply to any rental agreement included under the provisions of this chapter. RCW 59.18.055 ((and 59.18.370)), section 8 of this act, 59.18.365, 59.18.370, and 59.18.380 through 59.18.410 shall be applicable to any action of forcible entry or detainer or unlawful detainer arising from a tenancy under the provisions of this chapter, except when a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model or a tenancy in a mobile home lot is abandoned. Rentals of mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models themselves are governed by the residential landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. This act does not apply to assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, to nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, to adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW, or to continuing care retirement communities registered under chapter 18.390 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. RCW 59.18.375 (Forcible entry or detainer or unlawful detainer actions—Payment of rent into court registry—Writ of restitution—Notice) and 2008 c 75 s 2, 2006 c 51 s 2, & 1983 c 264 s 13 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. Sections 2 through 4 of this act supersede any other provisions within chapter 59.18 or 59.12 RCW, or chapter 59.20 RCW as applicable, that conflict with sections 2 through 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---