BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.01 RCW to read as follows:

The department must implement cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least a portion of credit card and other financial transaction costs as part of charges imposed for driver and vehicle fee transactions. The department must develop a method of tracking the amount of credit card and other financial cost recovery revenues. The department must notify the state treasurer of these amounts and the state treasurer must deposit these revenues in the agency financial transaction account created in section 2 of this act on a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.01 RCW to read as follows:

The agency financial transaction account is created in the state treasury. Receipts directed by law to the account from cost recovery charges for credit card and other financial transaction fees must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for paying credit card and financial transaction fees, and other related costs incurred by state agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2021.

--- END ---