BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.01.020 and 1969 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person of the age of ((eighteen))18 years or over shall be eligible to donate blood, including donation through apheresis, in any voluntary and noncompensatory blood program without the necessity of obtaining parental permission or authorization.

(2) Any person between the ages of 16 and 17 years old shall be eligible to donate blood, including donation through apheresis, in any voluntary and noncompensatory blood program after obtaining parental or legal guardian permission or authorization.

--- END ---