BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. INTENT.The legislature recognizes that student completion rates for workforce training certification and degree programs at community and technical colleges are far lower than desirable to ensure that students may utilize the opportunities of postsecondary education to lift themselves and their families out of poverty and to meet our state's student achievement council road map goals, including for 70 percent of Washington residents to have a postsecondary certification or degree to meet workforce needs. The legislature recognizes that first-generation college-attending students, students with disabilities, and underrepresented minority students face far greater obstacles to apply, remain in school, and complete programs. This disparate impact greatly affects our state's commitment to equity.

The legislature recognizes that offering tuition financial support to first-generation and underrepresented minority students is necessary for students to enroll and attend college but must also be accompanied by proven supports for them to complete their degrees or workforce training programs.

The legislature recognizes that there are mentorship and advising programs based on strong evidence that have been proven to be successful in greatly increasing retention and degree or workforce training completion rates for first-generation students, underrepresented minority students, students with disabilities, and for all students at community and technical colleges. It is the legislature's intent that successful programs such as guided pathways be implemented at all community and technical colleges with the goal of doubling completion rates (as measured by completion in six years) for students in the next eight years. To accomplish this goal, the legislature intends to achieve full implementation of research-based programs to improve student outcomes, such as guided pathways. The legislature affirms that all students receiving Washington college grants, college bound scholarships, or federal Pell grants should receive the supports, including mentoring, that have been proven to increase completion rates.

The legislature further finds that research establishes that students from underrepresented minorities are far more likely to complete degrees or workforce training certification programs if the faculty and staff of the college reflect the diversity of the student body. Therefore, the legislature intends for the state's community and technical colleges to develop and implement plans to increase faculty and staff diversity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. FINDINGS.The legislature finds that there is a need to expand investments in community and technical colleges for the purpose of guaranteeing both equitable access and educational success for all residents of the state, particularly for students from communities of color and low-income communities. The legislature finds further that equality of opportunity for all students requires investments to support services that are critical to: The success of students of color and low-income students; provide systemwide equity initiatives intended to make community and technical college campuses welcoming, benevolent places; overcome the digital divide for all students; and provide qualified and available counseling throughout the community and technical college system. The legislature also finds that a more full-time, stable, fairly compensated, and diverse community and technical college faculty is necessary to enhance student success and to improve the mentoring available for a diverse student body. The legislature also finds that resources for student aid and workforce investment need to be adequate to meet the needs of all students in the state, particularly those from families of color and low-income families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. DIVERSITY, EQUITY, AND INCLUSION STRATEGIC PLAN.(1) Beginning July 30, 2022, all community and technical colleges must submit, on a biennial basis, strategic plans to the state board for community and technical colleges for achieving diversity, equity, and inclusion of all races on their campuses.

(2) Colleges must create their strategic plans using an inclusive process of stakeholders including, but not limited to, classified staff, faculty, administrative exempt staff, students, and community organizations. Colleges are encouraged to use campus climate surveys to develop and update strategic plans for diversity, equity, and inclusion of all races.

(3) In addition to planning, each community and technical college shall include in its diversity program opportunities for students from historically marginalized communities to form student-based organizations, and to use community-based organizations, that permit students to work together to mentor and assist one another in navigating the educational system and to access trained mentors using evidence-based mentoring strategies.

(4) Each community and technical college shall establish a culturally appropriate outreach program. The outreach program may include communities of color, students with disabilities, neurodiverse communities, and low-income communities and be designed to assist potential students to understand the opportunities available in the community and technical college system. The outreach program may assist students with navigating the student aid system. Outreach programs may include partnerships with appropriate community-based organizations and use research and supports from the student achievement council.

(5) The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop a model faculty diversity program designed to provide for the retention and recruitment of faculty from all racial, ethnic, and cultural backgrounds. The faculty diversity program must be based on proven practices in diversity hiring processes.

(6) Each community and technical college shall conspicuously post on its website and include in the strategic plans, programs, and reports definitions for key terms including: Diversity, equity, inclusion, culturally competent, culturally appropriate, historically marginalized communities, communities of color, low-income communities, and community organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. STUDENT SUCCESS SUPPORT PROGRAMS AND GUIDED PATHWAYS IMPLEMENTATION.(1) Within existing resources, each community and technical college shall fully implement guided pathways. At a minimum, guided pathways implementation must include:

(a) Comprehensive mapping of student educational pathways with student end goals in mind. These must include transparent and clear career paths that are tightly aligned to the skills sought by employers. Pathways must align course sequences to show clear paths for students, alignment with K-12 and university curriculum, and skill sets needed to enter the workforce;

(b) Dedicated advising and career counseling that helps students make informed program choices and develop completion plans. Advising services may include processes that help students explore possible career and educational choices while also emphasizing early planning. Advising must be culturally competent and with an emphasis on helping historically underserved, low-income, and students of color navigate their education;

(c) Data analysis of student learning as well as program and service outcomes. Data must be used to inform program development, the creation and further refinement of student pathways, and to provide opportunities for early intervention to help students succeed; and

(d) A student success support infrastructure using programs that the state board for community and technical colleges finds have been effective in closing equity gaps among historically underserved student populations and improve student completion rates. The student success support program must be based on research or documented evidence of success at institutions with comparable student populations. In tandem with guided pathways implementation, student success support programs may include evidence-based elements such as:

(i) Equity competent academic advising services;

(ii) Equity competent career development programming;

(iii) Clear information regarding financial aid and financial literacy; and

(iv) Inclusive curriculum and teaching practices.

(2) Each community and technical college shall post on its website and include in the guided pathways program documentation and reports definitions for key terms including: Diversity, equity, inclusion, culturally competent, culturally appropriate, historically marginalized communities, communities of color, low-income communities, and community organizations.

(3)(a) The Washington state institute for public policy, in consultation with the workforce education investment accountability and oversight board under RCW 28C.18.200, shall complete an evaluation of the guided pathways model. To the extent possible, the institute shall complete a preliminary report that evaluates the effect of the guided pathways model on early student outcomes including, but not limited to, student retention and persistence, college level English and math within the first year, and graduation and transfer rates. The preliminary report must review the implementation of the guided pathways model in Washington and any available evidence of the effectiveness of the guided pathways model. The preliminary report must be submitted by December 15, 2023.

(b) The Washington state institute for public policy shall complete a final report that evaluates the effect of the guided pathways on longer-term student outcomes including, but not limited to, degree completion, time to degree, transfer to four-year institutions, employment, and earnings, to the extent possible. The final report must be submitted by December 15, 2029.

(c) Both the preliminary and final reports must consider differences in outcomes by racial and ethnic subgroups and socioeconomic status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. TENURE-TRACK FACULTY.(1) The legislature recognizes that student outcomes and success, especially for first generation, underserved students, may be significantly improved by increasing the number of full-time faculty at community and technical colleges.

(a) The legislature's goal is that community and technical colleges increase the numbers of full-time tenured positions by adding 200 new full-time tenure-track positions in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(b) This goal is best accomplished through converting part-time faculty positions to full-time tenure-track positions and by hiring new full-time faculty through processes identified in each college's diversity, equity, and inclusion of all races strategic plan described in section 3 of this act. If specific funding for the purpose of conversion assignments proposed in this section is not provided in the omnibus appropriations act, the conversion assignments proposed must be delayed until such time as specific funding is provided.

(c) The college board must collect data and assess the impact of the 200 additional full-time tenure-track faculty on student completion rates. The college board must convene representatives of faculty, staff, and administration to report on outcomes as a result of increasing full-time tenure-track faculty. In consultation with representatives of faculty, staff, and administration, the college board must make recommendations about future steps to increase full-time tenure-track faculty that incorporate faculty diversity and historically underserved communities. The college board must report the results of its assessment, along with next step recommendations, to the legislature by December 15, 2023. The college board shall conspicuously post on its website and include in the report definitions for key terms including: Diversity, equity, inclusion, culturally competent, culturally appropriate, historically marginalized communities, communities of color, low-income communities, and community organizations.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. MENTAL HEALTH COUNSELOR PILOT PROGRAM.(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the college board shall administer a pilot program to increase student access to mental health counseling and services.

(2) The college board, in collaboration with the selection committee, shall select community or technical colleges to participate in the pilot program. At least half of the participating colleges must be located outside of the Puget Sound area. For purposes of this section, "Puget Sound area" means Snohomish, King, Pierce, and Thurston counties. Each participating college must receive a grant to implement one or more strategies to increase student access to mental health counseling and services, including substance use disorder counseling and services.

(3)(a) A selection committee consisting of the following shall assist with the application selection process:

(i) One community or technical college president;

(ii) One community or technical college vice president for student services or student instruction;

(iii) Two faculty counselors employed at a community or technical college; and

(iv) One community or technical college student.

(b) The selection committee may consult with representatives of an entity within a college or university that has expertise in suicide prevention and the department of health in developing selection criteria.

(4) Community and technical colleges wishing to participate in the pilot program shall apply to the college board. Applicants must identify opportunities for expanding on-campus mental health counseling and services. Applicants must also show a commitment to further develop partnerships by engaging external community providers, including those who provide crisis services and substance use disorder treatment and counseling. Applications that demonstrate plans to include one or more of the following strategies recommended by the community and technical college counselors task force must be prioritized:

(a) Improve equity, diversity, and inclusion of all races in counseling services, such as by diversifying the counselor workforce by adopting equity-centered recruiting, training, and retention practices or by providing equity training and awareness for all counselors;

(b) Meet mental health needs of students through an all-campus effort;

(c) Engage students to help increase mental health and counseling awareness and promote help-seeking behavior through student groups and other methods;

(d) Increase the visibility of counseling services on campus;

(e) Increase or expand external partnerships with community service providers;

(f) Adopt the use of telebehavioral health, especially in under resourced communities;

(g) Develop an assessment of counseling services to inform improvements and ensure counseling services are meeting student needs; or

(h) Implement counseling approaches grounded in theory that have evidence of being effective.

(5) Colleges selected to participate in the pilot program that use grant funding to hire additional mental health counselors must hire counselors who have specific graduate-level training for meeting the mental and behavioral health needs of students.

(6) Colleges selected to participate in the pilot program shall submit a joint report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by November 1, 2023. The report must include:

(a) Information on which colleges were selected for the pilot program, how much grant funding was received per college, and what strategies each implemented to increase student access to mental health counseling and services;

(b) Demographic data of students accessing mental health counseling and services, including those students who are considered underrepresented or traditionally have limited access to mental health counseling and services;

(c) Whether the mental health counseling and services provided are meeting the demand of students in terms of type and availability, and whether the various types of mental health counseling and services are being provided by community providers versus on-campus services;

(d) Information and data on the effectiveness, including cost-effectiveness, of each strategy used to increase student access to mental health counseling and services, including substance use disorder counseling and services, such as the number of additional students served, reduced wait times for counseling appointments, or other data that reflects expanded access; and

(e) Lessons learned and recommendations for improving student access to mental health counseling and services at community and technical colleges and to community providers, including whether there were any strategies implemented that proved more effective than others in increasing access.

(7) Colleges selected for the pilot program shall conspicuously post on their websites and include in the report to the legislature the definitions for key terms including: Diversity, equity, inclusion, culturally competent, culturally appropriate, historically marginalized communities, communities of color, low-income communities, and community organizations.

(8) The pilot program expires July 1, 2025.

(9) This section expires January 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. MINIMUM COUNSELOR STANDARDS.(1) It is the intent of the legislature to provide clear minimum standards to ensure qualified faculty counselors while also providing flexibility to allow for differences in criteria required by hiring institutions. Within existing resources, and beginning September 1, 2021, the college board shall adopt rules regarding the minimum hiring standards for a faculty counselor. At a minimum, these must include:

(a) A graduate or professional degree in a related field;

(b) Completion of appropriate graduate coursework; and

(c) Standards established by the state board for community and technical colleges.

(2) The requirements and standards imposed through this section do not apply to an individual employed by a college district as a counselor before September 1, 2021. Counselors who began employment at one college district prior to September 1, 2021, and moved employment to a different college district after that date may carry the exemptions from the requirements and standards imposed through this section to their new place of employment.

Sec. 8. RCW 28B.96.010 and 2020 c 326 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Eligible student" means a student who:

(a) Is a resident student;

(b) Demonstrates financial need as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(c) Has indicated they will attend an institution of higher education or is making satisfactory progress in a program, as defined in rule by the office, at an institution of higher education;

(d) Fills out the Washington application for state financial aid; and

(e) Does not qualify for federally funded student financial aid because of their citizenship status.

(2) "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.92.030.

(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance created in RCW 28B.76.090.

(4) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received an undocumented student support loan.

(5) "Resident student" means:

(a) A financially independent student who has had a domicile in the state of Washington for the period of one year immediately prior to the time of commencement of the first day of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution and has in fact established a bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than educational;

(b) A dependent student, if one or both of the student's parents or legal guardians have maintained a bona fide domicile in the state of Washington for at least one year immediately prior to commencement of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution;

(c) Any student:

(i) Who has spent at least seventy-five percent of both his or her junior and senior years in high schools in this state;

(ii) Whose parents or legal guardians have been domiciled in the state for a period of at least one year within the five-year period before the student graduates from high school; and

(iii) Who enrolls in a public institution of higher education within six months of leaving high school, for as long as the student remains continuously enrolled for three quarters or two semesters in any calendar year; or

(d) Any person((:

(i) Who has completed the full senior year of high school and obtained a high school diploma, both at a Washington public high school or private high school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or a person who has received the equivalent of a diploma;

(ii) Who has lived in Washington for at least three years immediately prior to receiving the diploma or its equivalent;

(iii) Who has continuously lived in the state of Washington after receiving the diploma or its equivalent and until such time as the individual is admitted to an institution of higher education; and

(iv) Who provides to the institution an affidavit indicating that the individual will file an application to become a permanent resident at the earliest opportunity the individual is eligible to do so and a willingness to engage in any other activities necessary to acquire citizenship, including but not limited to citizenship or civics review courses))who meets the requirements under RCW 28B.15.012(2)(e).

Sec. 9. RCW 28B.15.012 and 2020 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever used in this chapter:

(1) The term "institution" shall mean a public university, college, or community or technical college within the state of Washington.

(2) The term "resident student" shall mean:

(a) A financially independent student who has had a domicile in the state of Washington for the period of one year immediately prior to the time of commencement of the first day of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution and has in fact established a bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than educational;

(b) A dependent student, if one or both of the student's parents or legal guardians have maintained a bona fide domicile in the state of Washington for at least one year immediately prior to commencement of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution;

(c) A student classified as a resident based upon domicile by an institution on or before May 31, 1982, who was enrolled at a state institution during any term of the 1982-1983 academic year, so long as such student's enrollment (excepting summer sessions) at an institution in this state is continuous;

(d) Any student who has spent at least seventy-five percent of both his or her junior and senior years in high schools in this state, whose parents or legal guardians have been domiciled in the state for a period of at least one year within the five-year period before the student graduates from high school, and who enrolls in a public institution of higher education within six months of leaving high school, for as long as the student remains continuously enrolled for three quarters or two semesters in any calendar year;

(e) Any person who has completed ((the full senior year of high school)) and obtained a high school diploma, ((both at a Washington public high school or private high school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW,)) or a person who has received the equivalent of a diploma; ((who has lived in Washington for at least three years immediately prior to receiving the diploma or its equivalent;)) who has continuously lived in the state of Washington ((after receiving the diploma or its equivalent and until such time as))for at least a year before the individual is admitted to an institution of higher education under subsection (1) of this section; and who provides to the institution an affidavit indicating that the individual will file an application to become a permanent resident at the earliest opportunity the individual is eligible to do so and a willingness to engage in any other activities necessary to acquire citizenship, including but not limited to citizenship or civics review courses;

(f) Any person who has lived in Washington, primarily for purposes other than educational, for at least one year immediately before the date on which the person has enrolled in an institution, and who holds lawful nonimmigrant status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. (a)(15) (E)(iii), (H)(i), or (L), or who holds lawful nonimmigrant status as the spouse or child of a person having nonimmigrant status under one of those subsections, or who, holding or having previously held such lawful nonimmigrant status as a principal or derivative, has filed an application for adjustment of status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1255(a);

(g) A student who is on active military duty stationed in the state or who is a member of the Washington national guard;

(h) A student who is on active military duty or a member of the Washington national guard who meets the following conditions:

(i) Entered service as a Washington resident;

(ii) Has maintained a Washington domicile; and

(iii) Is stationed out-of-state;

(i) A student who is the spouse or a dependent of a person defined in (g) of this subsection. If the person defined in (g) of this subsection is reassigned out-of-state, the student maintains the status as a resident student so long as the student is either:

(i) Admitted to an institution before the reassignment and enrolls in that institution for the term the student was admitted; or

(ii) Enrolled in an institution and remains continuously enrolled at the institution;

(j) A student who is the spouse or a dependent of a person defined in (h) of this subsection;

(k) A student who is eligible or entitled to transferred federal post-9/11 veterans educational assistance act of 2008 (38 U.S.C. Sec. 3301 et seq.) benefits based on the student's relationship as a spouse, former spouse, or child to an individual who is on active duty in the uniformed services;

(l) A student who resides in the state of Washington and is the spouse or a dependent of a person who is a member of the Washington national guard;

(m) A student who has separated from the uniformed services with any period of honorable service after at least ninety days of active duty service; is eligible for educational assistance benefits under Title 38 U.S.C.; and enters an institution of higher education in Washington within three years of the date of separation;

(n) A student who is on terminal, transition, or separation leave pending separation, or release from active duty, from the uniformed services with any period of honorable service after at least ninety days of active duty service and is eligible for educational assistance benefits under Title 38 U.S.C.;

(o) A student who is entitled to veterans administration educational assistance benefits based on the student's relationship as a spouse, former spouse, or child to an individual who has separated from the uniformed services with any period of honorable service after at least ninety days of active duty service, and who enters an institution of higher education in Washington within three years of the service member's date of separation;

(p) A student who is the spouse or child to an individual who has separated from the uniformed services with at least ten years of honorable service and at least ninety days of active duty service, and who enters an institution of higher education in Washington within three years of the service member's date of separation;

(q) A student who has separated from the uniformed services who was discharged due to the student's sexual orientation or gender identity or expression;

(r) A student who is entitled to veterans administration educational assistance benefits based on the student's relationship with a deceased member of the uniformed services who died in the line of duty;

(s) A student who is entitled to federal vocational rehabilitation and employment services for veterans with service-connected disabilities under 38 U.S.C. Sec. 3102(a);

(t) A student who is defined as a covered individual in 38 U.S.C. Sec. 3679(c)(2) as it existed on July 28, 2019, or such subsequent date as the student achievement council may determine by rule;

(u) A student of an out-of-state institution of higher education who is attending a Washington state institution of higher education pursuant to a home tuition agreement as described in RCW 28B.15.725;

(v) A student who meets the requirements of RCW 28B.15.0131 or 28B.15.0139: PROVIDED, That a nonresident student enrolled for more than six hours per semester or quarter shall be considered as attending for primarily educational purposes, and for tuition and fee paying purposes only such period of enrollment shall not be counted toward the establishment of a bona fide domicile of one year in this state unless such student proves that the student has in fact established a bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than educational;

(w) A student who resides in Washington and is on active military duty stationed in the Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington; or

(x) A student who resides in Washington and is the spouse or a dependent of a person defined in (w) of this subsection. If the person defined in (w) of this subsection moves from Washington or is reassigned out of the Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington, the student maintains the status as a resident student so long as the student resides in Washington and is either:

(i) Admitted to an institution before the reassignment and enrolls in that institution for the term the student was admitted; or

(ii) Enrolled in an institution and remains continuously enrolled at the institution.

(3)(a) A student who qualifies under subsection (2)(k), (m), (n), (o), (p), (q), (r), (s), or (t) of this section and who remains continuously enrolled at an institution of higher education shall retain resident student status.

(b) Nothing in subsection (2)(k), (m), (n), (o), (p), (q), (r), (s), or (t) of this section applies to students who have a dishonorable discharge from the uniformed services, or to students who are the spouse or child of an individual who has had a dishonorable discharge from the uniformed services, unless the student is receiving veterans administration educational assistance benefits.

(4) The term "nonresident student" shall mean any student who does not qualify as a "resident student" under the provisions of this section and RCW 28B.15.013. Except for students qualifying under subsection (2)(e) or (u) of this section, a nonresident student shall include:

(a) A student attending an institution with the aid of financial assistance provided by another state or governmental unit or agency thereof, such nonresidency continuing for one year after the completion of such semester or quarter. This condition shall not apply to students from Columbia, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, or Washington county, Oregon participating in the border county pilot project under RCW 28B.76.685, 28B.76.690, and 28B.15.0139.

(b) A person who is not a citizen of the United States of America, unless the person meets and complies with all applicable requirements in this section and RCW 28B.15.013 and is one of the following:

(i) A lawful permanent resident;

(ii) A temporary resident;

(iii) A person who holds "refugee-parolee," "conditional entrant," or U or T nonimmigrant status with the United States citizenship and immigration services;

(iv) A person who has been issued an employment authorization document by the United States citizenship and immigration services that is valid as of the date the person's residency status is determined;

(v) A person who has been granted deferred action for childhood arrival status before, on, or after June 7, 2018, regardless of whether the person is no longer or will no longer be granted deferred action for childhood arrival status due to the termination, suspension, or modification of the deferred action for childhood arrival program; or

(vi) A person who is otherwise permanently residing in the United States under color of law, including deferred action status.

(5) The term "domicile" shall denote a person's true, fixed and permanent home and place of habitation. It is the place where the student intends to remain, and to which the student expects to return when the student leaves without intending to establish a new domicile elsewhere. The burden of proof that a student, parent or guardian has established a domicile in the state of Washington primarily for purposes other than educational lies with the student.

(6) The term "dependent" shall mean a person who is not financially independent. Factors to be considered in determining whether a person is financially independent shall be set forth in rules adopted by the student achievement council and shall include, but not be limited to, the state and federal income tax returns of the person and/or the student's parents or legal guardian filed for the calendar year prior to the year in which application is made and such other evidence as the council may require.

(7) The term "active military duty" means the person is serving on active duty in:

(a) The armed forces of the United States government; or

(b) The Washington national guard; or

(c) The coast guard, merchant mariners, or other nonmilitary organization when such service is recognized by the United States government as equivalent to service in the armed forces.

(8) The term "active duty service" means full-time duty, other than active duty for training, as a member of the uniformed services of the United States. Active duty service as a national guard member under Title 32 U.S.C. for the purpose of organizing, administering, recruiting, instructing, or training and active service under 32 U.S.C. Sec. 502(f) for the purpose of responding to a national emergency is recognized as active duty service.

(9) The term "uniformed services" is defined by Title 10 U.S.C.; subsequently structured and organized by Titles 14, 33, and 42 U.S.C.; consisting of the United States army, United States marine corps, United States navy, United States air force, United States coast guard, United States public health service commissioned corps, and the national oceanic and atmospheric administration commissioned officer corps.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1 through 7 of this act are each added to chapter 28B.50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act may be known and cited as the our colleges our future act of 2021.

--- END ---