BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that a postsecondary credential such as a degree, apprenticeship, or certificate is increasingly necessary to obtain a job that offers a good salary and advancement opportunities and that increasing the number of students in Washington who obtain such a credential is essential to the state's economic success. The legislature also recognizes that equity gaps remain among postsecondary students and that those gaps particularly impact students from historically marginalized communities.

The legislature finds that developing and maintaining a culture of belonging and support for students, faculty, and staff at institutions of higher education is essential to student success, and that faculty and staff play a key role. The legislature therefore seeks to ensure that public institutions of higher education provide faculty and staff, as well as students, with training to give them tools to address matters related to antiracism, diversity, equity, and inclusion.

The legislature further finds it necessary to regularly analyze the impact of that training on the campus community and to identify any measures needed to increase diversity, equity, and inclusion. Accordingly, the legislature intends that each public institution of higher education assess the learning, working, and living environment on campus that students, faculty, and staff experience to better understand the evolving state of diversity, equity, and inclusion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each institution of higher education must:

(a) Provide professional development, either existing or new, focused on diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism for faculty and staff. This program must be developed in partnership with the institution's administration, faculty, staff, and student leadership groups. Efforts should be made to ensure the program is developed and delivered by individuals with innate and acquired experience and expertise in the field of diversity, equity, and inclusion. The content framework for professional development must be posted on each institution's public website for parents and community members. The professional development must begin in the 2022-23 academic year;

(b) Create an evaluation for professional development participants. The evaluations must, at minimum, capture a participant's level of satisfaction with the professional development opportunity, the degree to which the learning objectives were achieved, and how the knowledge gained may be applied to their work;

(c)(i) Share completed evaluations of program participants annually with either the state board for community and technical colleges or the council of presidents, depending on the institution; and (ii) submit curriculum and other pertinent information regarding the program beginning July 1, 2023, and, subsequently, if there is a meaningful change or by request of the reporting entity.

(2) The purpose of each professional development program curriculum must be rooted in eliminating structural racism against all races and promoting diversity, equity, and inclusion while improving outcomes for students from historically marginalized communities. Institutions of higher education may further develop a curriculum that is reflective of the needs of the campus community.

(3) Beginning with the 2022-23 academic year, every new faculty and staff member at an institution of higher education must participate in the program, regardless of whether they are a full-time or part-time employee. All faculty and staff participating in the professional development program must complete an evaluation. Other faculty and staff may participate in the professional development program as needed or required by their institution. Each institution must develop a goal of at least 80 percent of their total faculty and staff completing the professional development program over a two-year period and report on their goal's progress in the report established in subsection (4) of this section. Each institution may determine how to show progress towards their goal.

(4) By December 31, 2024, and biennially thereafter, the state board for community and technical colleges and the council of presidents must each develop a report on the professional development programs pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and submit them to the higher education committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036. Each report may be combined with the reports required in sections 3 and 4 of this act.

(5) The state board for community and technical colleges and the council of presidents may conduct further analysis of the professional development programs through participant evaluation data, use of focus groups, or other methods to determine promising practices. The state board for community and technical colleges and the council of presidents must post a list of model standards and promising practices for professional development on their public websites for parents and community members.

(6) The institutions of higher education shall adopt rules as necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this section, not in conflict with this chapter, and in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The four-year institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall conduct a campus climate assessment to understand the current state of diversity, equity, and inclusion in the learning, working, and living environment on campus for students, faculty, and staff. The assessment should occur, at minimum, every five years. Institutions of higher education shall use the results of the campus climate assessment to inform the professional development, established in section 2 of this act, and program, established in section 4 of this act. Institutions may use an existing campus climate assessment to meet this requirement.

(b) The state board for community and technical colleges shall conduct a campus climate assessment of community and technical colleges to understand the current state of diversity, equity, and inclusion in the learning, working, and living environment on each campus for students, faculty, and staff. The assessment should occur, at minimum, every five years. The state board for community and technical colleges shall use the results of the campus climate assessment to inform the professional development, established in section 2 of this act, and program, established in section 4 of this act. The state board for community and technical colleges may use an existing campus climate assessment to meet this requirement.

(2) The design of an existing or new campus climate assessment must involve, at minimum, students, college and university diversity officers, faculty, and staff. The campus climate assessment must include, at minimum, an evaluation of student and employee attitudes and awareness of campus diversity, equity, and inclusion issues. The campus climate assessment may not be standardized or uniform and must be designed for the unique and diverse community it is assessing. College and university diversity officers may be consulted in the development of recommendations.

(3) Institutions of higher education must, at minimum, conduct annual listening and feedback sessions for diversity, equity, and inclusion for the entire campus community during periods between campus climate assessments.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2022, the institutions of higher education shall report findings or progress in completing their campus climate assessment and, when applicable, information on their listening and feedback sessions annually to either the state board for community and technical colleges or the council of presidents. The institutions of higher education must also publish annually on the institution's public website the results of either the campus climate assessment or listening and feedback sessions.

(5) By December 31, 2024, and biennially thereafter, the state board for community and technical colleges and the council of presidents must each develop a report on campus climate assessment results and other relevant information received by the institutions of higher education and submit it to the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036. Each report must include a summary of each campus climate assessment on diversity, equity, and inclusion or other related work. Each report may be combined reports required in sections 2 and 4 of this act.

(6) The state board for community and technical colleges may require colleges to repeat their campus climate assessment. The council of presidents may also request state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College to repeat their campus climate assessment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each institution of higher education must:

(a) Provide a program, either existing or new, on diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism to students beginning with the 2024-25 academic year. Institutions of higher education may expand the focus of its program to reflect the needs of the campus community. This program must be developed in partnership with the institution's administration, faculty, staff, and student leadership groups. Efforts should be made to ensure the program is developed and delivered by individuals with innate and acquired experience and expertise in the field of diversity, equity, and inclusion. The content framework for each program must be posted on each institution's public website for parents and community members; and

(b) Create an evaluation for program participants. The evaluation must, at minimum, capture a participant's level of satisfaction with the program and how they will apply the program to their education.

(2) The purpose of each program must be rooted in eliminating structural racism against all races and promoting diversity, equity, and inclusion while improving outcomes for students from historically marginalized communities. Institutions of higher education may further develop a curriculum that is reflective of the needs of the campus community.

(3) During the 2024-25 academic year, all students at institutions of higher education must participate in the program, regardless of whether they are a full-time or part-time student. Beginning with the 2025-26 academic year, the program is only required for students who are new or have transferred to the institution and have not yet participated in a required diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism program at an institution of higher education.

(4) The state board for community and technical colleges and the council of presidents may conduct further analysis of the programs, through participant evaluation data, use of focus groups, or other methods to determine promising practices. The state board for community and technical colleges and the council of presidents must post a list of model standards and promising practices for programs on their public websites for parents and community members.

(5) By December 31, 2026, and biennially thereafter, the state board for community and technical colleges and the council of presidents must each develop a report on the student programs established in subsection (1) of this section and submit them to the higher education committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036. Each report may be combined with reports required in sections 2 and 3 of this act.

(6) The institutions of higher education shall adopt rules as necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this section, not in conflict with this chapter, and in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

(7) For purposes of this section, "student" or "students" does not include nonmatriculated students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

--- END ---