BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department shall develop a home study training program which trains those not affiliated with the department or child-placing agencies to conduct home studies for the placement of children in foster care.

(b) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement the home study training program.

(2) The department shall develop a process for those who have completed the home study training program to be able to conduct home studies for the department or child-placing agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The court shall develop a preadoption study training program which trains those not affiliated with the court to conduct preadoption studies.

(b) The court may adopt rules as necessary to implement the preadoption study training program.

(2) The court shall develop a process for those who have completed the preadoption study training program to be able to conduct preadoption studies for the court.

--- END ---