BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 54.28.040 and 2017 c 323 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before May 1st of each calendar year through calendar year 2018, the department of revenue must compute the tax imposed by this chapter for the last preceding calendar year and notify the district of the amount thereof, which shall be payable on or before the following June 1st.

(2) For tax reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 2018, taxpayers must report the taxes due under RCW 54.28.020 and 54.28.025 on returns as prescribed by the department of revenue. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2), taxes imposed in RCW 54.28.020 and 54.28.025 are due for a taxpayer at the same time as the taxpayer's payment of taxes imposed under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW. The department of revenue may allow taxpayers to report and pay the taxes due under RCW 54.28.020 and 54.28.025 on an annual basis, even if they report taxes imposed under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW more frequently than annually. In such cases, the taxes imposed in RCW 54.28.020 and 54.28.025 are due ((at the same time as the taxes under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for the taxpayer's final reporting period for the calendar year))on or before February 25th of the year immediately following the end of the year for which the taxes are being reported and paid.

(3) The department of revenue may require persons to report such information as needed by the department to administer this chapter.

(4)(a) Upon receipt of the amount of each tax imposed the department of revenue shall deposit the same with the state treasurer, who must deposit four percent of the revenues received under RCW 54.28.020(1) and 54.28.025(1) and all revenues received under RCW 54.28.020(2) and 54.28.025(2) in the general fund of the state and must distribute the remainder in the manner hereinafter set forth. The state treasurer must send a duplicate copy of each transmittal to the department of revenue.

(b) The state treasurer must distribute the taxes collected by the department under this chapter monthly at the same time distributions of local sales and use taxes are made in accordance with chapter 82.14 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 54.28.055 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 28 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the department of revenue must instruct the state treasurer to distribute the amount collected under RCW 54.28.025(1) ((on the first business day of July)) as follows:

(a) Fifty percent to the state general fund for the support of schools; and

(b) Twenty-two percent to the counties, twenty-three percent to the cities, three percent to the fire protection districts, and two percent to the library districts.

(2) Each county, city, fire protection district, and library district must receive a percentage of the amount for distribution to counties, cities, fire protection districts, and library districts, respectively, in the proportion that the population of such district residing within the impacted area bears to the total population of all such districts residing within the impacted area. For the purposes of this chapter, the term "library district" includes only regional libraries, rural county library districts, intercounty rural library districts, and island library districts as those terms are defined in RCW 27.12.010. The population of a library district, for purposes of such a distribution, does not include any population within the library district and the impact area that also is located within a city or town.

(3) Distributions under this section must be adjusted as follows:

(a) If any distribution pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section cannot be made, then that share must be prorated among the state and remaining local districts.

(b) The department of revenue must instruct the state treasurer to adjust distributions under this section, in whole or in part, to account for each county's, city's, fire protection district's, and library district's proportionate share of amounts previously distributed under this section and subsequently refunded to a public utility district under RCW 82.32.060.

(4) All distributions directed by this section to be made on the basis of population must be calculated in accordance with population data as last determined by the office of financial management.

Sec. 3. RCW 79.64.110 and 2019 c 415 s 985 and 2019 c 309 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any moneys derived from the lease of state forestlands or from the sale of valuable materials, oils, gases, coal, minerals, or fossils from those lands, except as provided in RCW 79.64.130, or the appraised value of these resources when transferred to a public agency under RCW 79.22.060, except as provided in RCW 79.22.060(4), must be distributed as follows:

(a) For state forestlands acquired through RCW 79.22.040 or by exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040:

(i) The expense incurred by the state for administration, reforestation, and protection, not to exceed twenty-five percent, which rate of percentage shall be determined by the board, must be returned to the forest development account created in RCW 79.64.100. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the board may increase the twenty-five percent limitation up to twenty-seven percent.

(ii) Any balance remaining must be paid to the county in which the land is located or, for counties participating in a land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as determined by the board. Payments made under this subsection are to be paid, distributed, and prorated, except as otherwise provided in this section, to the various funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment. However, in order to test county flexibility in distributing state forestland revenue, a county may in its discretion pay, distribute, and prorate payments made under this subsection of moneys derived from state forestlands acquired by exchange between July 28, 2019, and June 30, 2020, for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040, within the same county, in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment for the former state forestlands that were subject to the exchange.

(iii) Any balance remaining, paid to a county with a population of less than sixteen thousand, must first be applied to the reduction of any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of the county during the year of payment.

(iv) With regard to moneys remaining under this subsection (1)(a), within seven working days of receipt of these moneys, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed to the counties. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment date.

(b) For state forestlands acquired through RCW 79.22.010 or by exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010, except as provided in RCW 79.64.120:

(i) Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development account.

(ii) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools, to the county in which the land is located or, for counties participating in a land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as determined by the board, and according to the relative proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in the county. The portion to be distributed to the state general fund shall be based on the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 (1) and (2) and the levy rate for any ((maintenance and operation special)) school district enrichment levies. With regard to the portion to be distributed to the counties, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed within seven working days of receipt of the money. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment date. The money distributed to the county must be paid, distributed, and prorated to the various other funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment.

(2) A school district may transfer amounts deposited in its debt service fund pursuant to this section into its capital projects fund as authorized in RCW 28A.320.330.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.04.051 and 2020 c 109 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in RCW 82.04.050 and including for the purposes of the taxes imposed in chapter 82.08 RCW in addition to the taxes imposed in this chapter, the term "services rendered in respect to" means, in the context of constructing, building, repairing, improving, and decorating buildings or other structures, those services that are directly related to the constructing, building, repairing, improving, and decorating of buildings or other structures and that are performed by a person who is responsible for the performance of the constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activity. The term does not include services such as engineering, architectural, surveying, flagging, accounting, legal, consulting, land development or management, or administrative services provided to the consumer of, or person responsible for performing, the constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating services.

(2) A contract or agreement under which a person is responsible for both services that would otherwise be subject to tax as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) and also constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activities that would otherwise be subject to tax under another section of this chapter is subject to the tax that applies to the predominant activity under the contract or agreement.

(3) Unless otherwise provided by law, a contract or agreement under which a person is responsible for activities that are subject to tax as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2), and a subsequent contract or agreement under which the same person is responsible for constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activities subject to tax under another section of this chapter, shall not be combined and taxed as a single activity if at the time of the first contract or agreement it was not contemplated by the parties, as evidenced by the facts, that the same person would be awarded both contracts.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Land development or management" means site identification, zoning, permitting, and other preconstruction regulatory services provided to the consumer of the constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating services. This includes, but is not limited to, acting as an owner's representative during any design or construction period, including recommending a contractor, monitoring the budget and schedule, approving invoices, and interacting on the behalf of the consumer with the person who has control over the work itself or responsible for the performance of the work.

(b) "Responsible for the performance" means that the person is obligated to perform the activities, either personally or through a third party. A person who reviews work for a consumer, retailer, or wholesaler but does not supervise or direct the work is not responsible for the performance of the work. A person who is financially obligated for the work, such as a bank, but who does not have control over the work itself is not responsible for the performance of the work.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.04.220 and 2019 c 8 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected from every person that has a substantial nexus with this state, as provided in RCW 82.04.067, a tax for the act or privilege of engaging in business activities. The tax is measured by the application of rates against value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, as the case may be.

(2)(a) A person who establishes or reestablishes a substantial nexus with this state ((in))after the first day of the current calendar year under the provisions of RCW 82.04.067 is subject to the tax imposed under this chapter for the current calendar year only on business activity occurring on and after the date that the person established or reestablished a substantial nexus with this state in the current calendar year. ((This subsection does not apply to a person who also had a substantial nexus with this state))

(b) The provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply to a person who met any of the criteria in RCW 82.04.067(1) (a) through (c) during the immediately preceding calendar year ((under RCW 82.04.067)), and such person is taxable under this chapter for the current calendar year in its entirety.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.04.2404 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(2) For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials" means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, and compound semiconductor wafers.

(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(4) Any person who has claimed the preferential tax rate under this section must reimburse the department for fifty percent of the amount of the tax preference under this section, if((:

(a) The))the number of persons employed by the person claiming the tax preference is less than ninety percent of the person's three-year employment average for the three years immediately preceding the year in which the preferential tax rate is claimed((; or

(b) The person is subject to a review under section 501(4)(a), chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and such person does not meet performance criteria in section 501(4)(a), chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess)).

(5) This section expires December 1, 2028.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.04.260 and 2020 c 165 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;

(c)(i) Except as provided otherwise in (c)(iii) of this subsection, from July 1, 2025, until January 1, 2036, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:

(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;

(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2025, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products; and

(e) Wood biomass fuel; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. For the purposes of this section, "wood biomass fuel" means a liquid or gaseous fuel that is produced from lignocellulosic feedstocks, including wood, forest, or field residue and dedicated energy crops, and that does not include wood treated with chemical preservations such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was two hundred fifty thousand dollars or less; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(b) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent through June 30, 2019, and 0.9 percent beginning July 1, 2019.

(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(8)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW ((43.145.010))70A.380.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter ((43.200))70A.384 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.

(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;

(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007, through March 31, 2020; and

(iii) Beginning April 1, 2020, 0.484 percent, subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (11). The tax rate in this subsection (11)(a)(iii) applies to all business activities described in this subsection (11)(a).

(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.2904 percent through March 31, 2020; and

(ii) Beginning April 1, 2020, the following rates, which are subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (11):

(A) The rate under RCW 82.04.250(1) on the business of making retail sales of tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and

(B) 0.484 percent on all other business activities described in this subsection (11)(b).

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(d)(i) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534. However, this requirement does not apply to persons reporting under the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (11), so long as that rate remains 0.484 percent, or under any of the tax rates in (b)(ii)(A) and (B) of this subsection (11), so long as those tax rates remain the rate imposed pursuant to RCW 82.04.250(1) and 0.484 percent, respectively.

(ii) Nothing in (d)(i) of this subsection (11) may be construed as affecting the obligation of a person reporting under a tax rate provided in this subsection (11) to file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534: (A) Pursuant to another provision of this title as a result of claiming a tax credit or exemption; or (B) pursuant to (d)(i) of this subsection (11) as a result of claiming the tax rates in (a)(ii) or (b)(i) of this subsection (11) for periods ending before April 1, 2020.

(e)(i) After March 31, 2021, the tax rates under (a)(iii) and (b)(ii) of this subsection (11) must be reduced to 0.357 percent provided the conditions in RCW 82.04.2602 are met. The effective date of the rates authorized under this subsection (11)(e) must occur on the first day of the next calendar quarter that is at least sixty days after the department receives the last of the two written notices pursuant to RCW 82.04.2602 (3) and (4).

(ii) Both a significant commercial airplane manufacturer separately and the rest of the aerospace industry as a whole, receiving the rate of 0.357 percent under this subsection (11)(e) are subject to the aerospace apprenticeship utilization rates required under RCW 49.04.220 by April 1, 2026, or five years after the effective date of the 0.357 percent rate authorized under this subsection (11)(e), whichever is later, as determined by the department of labor and industries.

(iii) The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this subsection (11)(e).

(f)(i) Except as provided in (f)(ii) of this subsection (11), this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(f)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850. This subsection (11)(f)(ii) continues to apply during the time that a person is subject to the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (11).

(g) For the purposes of this subsection, "a significant commercial airplane manufacturer" means a manufacturer of commercial airplanes with at least fifty thousand full-time employees in Washington as of January 1, 2021.

(12)(a) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.

(b) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; or (iii) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1); as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.

(c) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; or (iv) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, wood products, or products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.

(d) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.

(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.

(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.

(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(v) "Timber products" means:

(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;

(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and

(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.

(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.

(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(g) Nothing in this subsection (12) may be construed to affect the taxation of any activity defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (b) or (c), defined as a wholesale sale in RCW 82.04.060(2), or taxed under RCW 82.04.280(1)(g).

(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent until July 1, 2024, and 0.484 percent thereafter.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (14) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.04.261 and 2019 c 336 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12), a surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12). Except as otherwise provided in this section, the surcharge is equal to 0.052 percent. The surcharge is added to the rates provided in RCW 82.04.260(12) (a), (b), (c), and (d).

(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section must be deposited into the forest and fish support account created in RCW 76.09.405, with any receipts above eight million dollars per biennium specifically used as additional funding for tribal participation grants.

(3)(a) The surcharge imposed under this section is suspended if:

(i) Before July 1, 2024, receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million five hundred thousand dollars during any fiscal biennium;

(ii) Between July 1, 2024, ((and July))through June 30, 2029, receipts from the surcharge total at least nine million dollars during any fiscal biennium; and

(iii) After ((July))June 30, 2029, the receipts from the surcharge total at least nine million five hundred thousand dollars during any fiscal biennium.

(b) The suspension of the surcharge under this subsection (3) takes effect on the first day of the calendar month that is at least thirty days after the end of the month during which the department determines that receipts from the surcharge total the values specified in this subsection (3) during the fiscal biennium. The surcharge is imposed again at the beginning of the following fiscal biennium.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2045.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.04.2907 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 5 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of receiving income from royalties, the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income from royalties multiplied by the rate ((provided in RCW 82.04.290(2)(a)))of 1.5 percent.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "gross income from royalties" means compensation for the use of intangible property, including charges in the nature of royalties, regardless of where the intangible property will be used. For purposes of this subsection, "intangible property" includes copyrights, patents, licenses, franchises, trademarks, trade names, and similar items. "Gross income from royalties" does not include compensation for any natural resource, the licensing of prewritten computer software to the end user, or the licensing of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services to the end user as defined in RCW 82.04.190(11).

Sec. 10. RCW 82.08.0531 and 2019 c 8 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this chapter and chapters 82.04 and 82.12 RCW, a marketplace facilitator is deemed to be an agent of any marketplace seller making retail sales through the marketplace facilitator's marketplace.

(2) Beginning October 1, 2018, marketplace facilitators subject to a tax collection obligation under RCW 82.08.052 (1) or (2) must collect and remit to the department retail sales tax on all taxable retail sales made or facilitated by the marketplace facilitator, whether in its own right or as an agent of a marketplace seller, regardless of whether the marketplace seller is subject to a tax collection obligation under RCW 82.08.052 (1) or (2). Beginning January 1, 2020, the collection obligation of a marketplace facilitator under this chapter also applies to any other taxes and fees, as defined under RCW 82.02.260, that are imposed on a retail sale made or facilitated by the marketplace facilitator, whether in its own right or as an agent of a marketplace seller, regardless of whether the marketplace seller has a tax collection obligation under RCW 82.08.052 (1) or (2).

(3) In addition to other applicable recordkeeping requirements, the department may require a marketplace facilitator to provide or make available to the department any information the department determines is reasonably necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter and chapter 82.13 RCW. Such information may include documentation of sales made by marketplace sellers through the marketplace facilitator's marketplace . The department may prescribe by rule the form and manner for providing this information.

(4)(a) Beginning July 1, 2019, to ensure that marketplace sellers have the necessary information to timely and accurately file their excise tax returns with the department pursuant to RCW 82.32.045, a marketplace facilitator must, at a minimum, provide each of its marketplace sellers with access, through a written report or other means, to gross sales information for all Washington sales made as an agent of the marketplace seller under this section during the immediately preceding month. Marketplace facilitators must provide such access within fifteen calendar days following the end of each month.

(b) If a marketplace seller does not receive the gross sales information for all Washington sales through a marketplace facilitator, as required under (a) of this subsection (4), the marketplace seller may determine its business and occupation tax liability under chapter 82.04 RCW based on a reasonable method of estimating Washington sales as may be required or approved by the department.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "Washington sales" means any sale sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730, regardless of whether the sale is a retail sale.

(5) If a marketplace facilitator has fully complied with the requirements of subsection (4)(a) of this section, the marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW for failure to collect the correct amount of tax to the extent that the marketplace facilitator can show to the department's satisfaction that the error was due to incorrect information given to the marketplace facilitator by the marketplace seller, unless the marketplace facilitator and marketplace seller are affiliated persons. Where the marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability under this subsection (5), the marketplace seller is solely liable for the amount of uncollected tax due.

(6)(a) Subject to the limits in (b) and (c) of this subsection (6), a marketplace facilitator that has fully complied with the requirements of subsection (4)(a) of this section is relieved of liability under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW for the failure to collect tax on taxable retail sales to the extent that the marketplace facilitator can show to the department's satisfaction that:

(i) The taxable retail sale was made through the marketplace facilitator's marketplace;

(ii) The taxable retail sale was made solely as the agent of a marketplace seller, and the marketplace facilitator and marketplace seller are not affiliated persons; and

(iii) The failure to collect sales tax was not due to an error in sourcing the sale under RCW 82.32.730.

(b) Liability relief for a marketplace facilitator under (a) of this subsection (6) for a calendar year is limited as follows:

(i) For calendar year 2018, the liability relief may not exceed ten percent of the total tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW on taxable retail sales facilitated by the marketplace facilitator as agent of a marketplace seller and sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 during the same calendar year.

(ii) For calendar year 2019, the liability relief may not exceed five percent of the total tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW on taxable retail sales by the marketplace facilitator as agent of a marketplace seller and sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 during the same calendar year.

(iii) The provisions of this subsection (6) do not apply to retail sales made after December 31, 2019.

(c) For purposes of this subsection (6), a retail sale is deemed to be facilitated by a marketplace facilitator when the marketplace facilitator either:

(i) Accepts the order for the product;

(ii) Communicates to the marketplace seller the buyer's offer to purchase the product;

(iii) Accepts the buyer's payment for the product; or

(iv) Delivers or arranges for delivery of the product.

(d) Where the marketplace facilitator ((or referrer)) is relieved of liability under this subsection (6), the marketplace seller is also relieved of liability for the amount of uncollected tax due, subject to the limitations in subsection (7) of this section.

(e) The department may by rule determine the manner in which a taxpayer may claim the liability relief provided under this subsection.

(7) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a marketplace seller obligated to collect the taxes imposed under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW is not required to collect such taxes on all taxable retail sales through a marketplace operated by a marketplace facilitator if the marketplace seller has obtained documentation from the marketplace facilitator indicating that the marketplace facilitator is registered with the department and will collect all applicable taxes due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW on all taxable retail sales made on behalf of the marketplace seller through the marketplace operated by the marketplace facilitator . The documentation required by this subsection (7) must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by or acceptable to the department. This subsection (7) does not relieve a marketplace seller from liability for uncollected taxes due under this chapter or chapter 82.12 RCW resulting from a marketplace facilitator's failure to collect the proper amount of tax due when the error was due to incorrect information given to the marketplace facilitator by the marketplace seller.

(8) No class action may be brought against a marketplace facilitator in any court of this state on behalf of purchasers arising from or in any way related to an overpayment of sales or use tax collected by the marketplace facilitator, regardless of whether that claim is characterized as a tax refund claim. Nothing in this subsection affects a purchaser's right to seek a refund from the department as provided under chapter 82.32 RCW.

(9) Nothing in this section affects the obligation of any purchaser to remit sales or use tax and any other applicable taxes and fees, as to any applicable taxable transaction in which the seller or the seller's agent does not collect and remit sales tax.

Sec. 11. RCW 82.08.956 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1002 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of hog fuel used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel. This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(a) "Hog fuel" means wood waste and other wood residuals including forest derived biomass. "Hog fuel" does not include firewood or wood pellets; and

(b) "Biofuel" ((has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010))means a liquid or gaseous fuel derived from organic matter intended for use as a transportation fuel including, but not limited to, biodiesel, renewable diesel, ethanol, renewable natural gas, and renewable propane.

(3) If a taxpayer who claimed an exemption under this section closes a facility in Washington for which employment positions were reported under RCW 82.32.605, resulting in a loss of jobs located within the state, the department must declare the amount of the tax exemption claimed under this section for the previous two calendar years to be immediately due.

(4) This section expires June 30, 2024.

Sec. 12. RCW 82.08.9651 and 2020 c 139 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing takes place. For the purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).

(2) A person claiming the exemption under this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(3) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW.

(4) Any person who has claimed the exemption under this section must reimburse the department for fifty percent of the amount of the tax preference under this section, if((:

(a) The))the number of persons employed by the person claiming the tax preference is less than ninety percent of the person's three-year employment average for the three years immediately preceding the year in which the exemption is claimed((; or

(b) The person is subject to a review under section 501(4)(a), chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and such person does not meet performance criteria in section 501(4)(a), chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess)).

(5) This section expires December 1, 2028.

Sec. 13. RCW 82.08.9999 and 2019 c 287 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning August 1, 2019, with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after the qualification period start date:

(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply as provided in (b) of this subsection to sales or leases of new or used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles that:

(i) Are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel; or

(ii) Use at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and are capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power; and

(iii)(A) Have a vehicle selling price plus trade-in property of like kind for purchased vehicles that:

(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed forty-five thousand dollars; or

(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed thirty thousand dollars; or

(B) Have a fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles that:

(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed forty-five thousand dollars; or

(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed thirty thousand dollars;

(b)(i) The exemption in this section is applicable for up to the amounts specified in (b)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection of:

(A) The total amount of the vehicle's selling price, for sales made; or

(B) The total lease payments made plus any additional selling price of the leased vehicle if the original lessee purchases the leased vehicle before the qualification period end date, for lease agreements signed.

(ii) Based on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed of the vehicle if the vehicle is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed:

(A) From the qualification period start date until July 31, 2021, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is twenty-five thousand dollars;

(B) From August 1, 2021, until July 31, 2023, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is twenty thousand dollars;

(C) From August 1, 2023, until July 31, 2025, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is fifteen thousand dollars.

(iii) If the vehicle is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is sixteen thousand dollars.

(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. A person claiming the exemption must also submit itemized information to the department for all vehicles for which an exemption is claimed that must include the following: Vehicle make; vehicle model; model year; whether the vehicle has been sold or leased; date of sale or start date of lease; length of lease; sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles; and the total amount qualifying for the incentive claimed for each vehicle, in addition to the future monthly amount to be claimed for each leased vehicle. This information must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(3)(a) The department of licensing must maintain and publish a list of all vehicle models qualifying for the tax exemptions under this section or RCW 82.12.9999 until the expiration date of this section, and is authorized to issue final rulings on vehicle model qualification for these criteria. A seller is not responsible for repayment of the tax exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 for a vehicle if the department of licensing's published list of qualifying vehicle models on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed includes the vehicle model and the department of licensing subsequently removes the vehicle model from the published list, and, if applicable, the vehicle meets the qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).

(b) The department of revenue retains responsibility for determining whether a vehicle meets the applicable qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).

(4) On the last day of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, must transfer from the electric vehicle account to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar amount that would otherwise have been deposited into the general fund during the prior calendar quarter but for the exemption provided in this section. Information provided by the department to the state treasurer must be based on the best available data, except that the department may provide estimates of taxes exempted under this section until such time as retailers are able to report such exempted amounts on their tax returns.

(5) By the last day of October 2019, and every six months thereafter until this section expires, based on the best available data, the department must report the following information to the transportation committees of the legislature: The cumulative number of vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 by month of purchase or lease start and vehicle make and model; the dollar amount of all state retail sales and use taxes exempted on or after the qualification period start date, under this section and RCW 82.12.9999; and estimates of the future costs of leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999.

(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Clean alternative fuel" means natural gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, effective January 1, 2019, and the rules of the Washington state department of ecology.

(b) "Fair market value" has the same meaning as "value of the article used" in RCW 82.12.010.

(c) "New vehicle" has the same meaning as "new motor vehicle" in RCW 46.04.358.

(d) "Qualification period end date" means August 1, 2025.

(e) "Qualification period start date" means ((July 28))August 1, 2019.

(f) "Used vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.660.

(7)(a) Sales of vehicles delivered to the buyer or leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed after the qualification period end date do not qualify for the exemption under this section.

(b) All leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section before the qualification period end date must continue to receive the exemption as described under subsection (1)(b) of this section on any lease payments due through the remainder of the lease before August 1, 2028.

(8) This section expires August 1, 2028.

(9) This section is supported by the revenues generated in RCW 46.17.324, and therefore takes effect only if RCW 46.17.324 is enacted by June 30, 2019.

Sec. 14. RCW 82.12.956 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1003 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of hog fuel for production of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Hog fuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.956; and

(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW ((43.325.010))82.08.956.

(3) This section expires June 30, 2024.

Sec. 15. RCW 82.12.9651 and 2020 c 139 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).

(2) A person claiming the exemption under this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(3) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW.

(4) Any person who has claimed the exemption under this section must reimburse the department for fifty percent of the amount of the tax preference under this section, if((:

(a) The))the number of persons employed by the person claiming the tax preference is less than ninety percent of the person's three-year employment average for the three years immediately preceding the year in which the exemption is claimed((; or

(b) The person is subject to a review under section 501(4)(a), chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and such person does not meet performance criteria in section 501(4)(a), chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess)).

(5) This section expires December 1, 2028.

Sec. 16. RCW 82.14.532 and 2019 c 273 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the requirements of chapter 35.107 RCW and RCW 81.104.170, a project is eligible for a sales and use tax remittance under the authority of this chapter on:

(a) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to construction or rehabilitation of a qualifying project located in a city; and

(b) The sales or use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of a qualifying project located in a city during the course of the constructing or rehabilitating.

(2)(a) A qualifying project owner claiming a remittance under this section must pay all applicable state and local sales and use taxes imposed or authorized under RCW 82.08.020, 82.12.020, and this chapter on all purchases and uses qualifying for the remittance.

(b) The amount of the remittance is one hundred percent of the local sales and use taxes paid ((under an ordinance enacted under the authority of this chapter for purchases or uses qualifying under subsection (1) of this section, if the))on purchases and uses qualifying under subsection (1) of this section, with respect to taxes imposed by the city and any other taxing authorities ((imposing taxes under the authority of this chapter))that have authorized the use of the remittance ((to the city legislative authority)) as provided under RCW ((35.107.050))35.107.040. A city authorizing a remittance under this subsection must notify the department of an approved qualifying project within 60 days of the city's approval of the project. Such notice must include the information required under RCW 35.107.040(2) (a) through (c).

(3) After the qualifying project has been operationally complete for eighteen months, but not more than thirty-six months, and after all state and local sales and use taxes for purchases and uses qualifying under subsection (1) of this section have been paid, a qualifying project owner who submits an application for a building permit for that qualifying project prior to July 1, 2027, may apply to the department for a remittance of local sales and use taxes.

(4) A qualifying project owner requesting a remittance under this section must obtain certification from the governing authority of a city verifying that the qualifying project has satisfied the criteria in RCW 35.107.050.

(5) A qualifying project owner must specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases or uses for which the exemption is claimed. The qualifying project owner must retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to determine whether the qualifying project owner is entitled to an exemption under this section, including invoices, proof of tax paid, and construction contracts.

(6) The department must determine eligibility under this section based on information provided by the qualifying project owner, which is subject to audit verification by the department.

(7)(a) A person otherwise eligible for a remittance under this section that transfers the ownership of the qualifying project before the requirements in subsection (3) of this section are met may assign the right to the remittance under this section to the subsequent owner of the qualifying project.

(b) Persons applying for the remittance as an assignee must provide the department the following documentation in a form and manner as provided by the department:

(i) The agreement that transfers the right to the remittance to the assignee;

(ii) Proof of payment of sales and use tax on the qualifying project; and

(iii) Any other documentation the department requires.

(8) The definitions in RCW 35.107.020 apply to this section.

Sec. 17. RCW 82.29A.090 and 2002 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Bimonthly))Monthly the state treasurer ((shall))must make distribution from the local leasehold excise tax account to the counties and cities the amount of tax collected on behalf of each county or city.

(2) ((Earnings accrued through July 31, 2002, shall be disbursed to counties and cities proportionate to the amount of tax collected annually on behalf of each county or city.

(3) After July 31, 2002, bimonthly))Monthly the state treasurer ((shall))must disburse earnings from the local leasehold excise tax account to the counties or cities proportionate to the amount of tax collected on behalf of each county or city.

(((4)))(3) The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this section without appropriation.

Sec. 18. RCW 82.32.330 and 2011 c 174 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner whatever a return or tax information;

(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to, or part of, the return so filed;

(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts, deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii) whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or other imposition, or offense. However, data, material, or documents that do not disclose information related to a specific or identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter requires any person possessing data, material, or documents made confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from such data, material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;

(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;

(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address, telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and

(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer, agent, employee, or representative.

(2) Returns and tax information are confidential and privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or tax information.

(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:

(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:

(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under this title or chapter 83.100 RCW is a party in the proceeding;

(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in the proceeding; or

(iii) Brought by the department under RCW 18.27.040 or 19.28.071;

(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the director prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person, at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such other person. However, tax information not received from the taxpayer must not be so disclosed if the director determines that such disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil or criminal liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other government agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with respect to such information unless such information is required to be disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of any court;

(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer against whom a warrant under RCW 82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for a period of at least ten working days. The department is not required to disclose any information under this subsection if a taxpayer has entered a deferred payment arrangement with the department for the payment of a warrant that has not been filed and is making payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness within twelve months;

(d) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;

(e) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of industry or the professions;

(f) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and employees;

(g) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was sought;

(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;

(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the United States department of justice, including the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms and explosives, the department of defense, the immigration and customs enforcement and the customs and border protection agencies of the United States department of homeland security, the United States coast guard, the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United States department of treasury, and the United States department of transportation, or any authorized representative of these federal agencies, for official purposes;

(j) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW 82.32.410;

(k) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing address, revenue tax registration numbers, reseller permit numbers and the expiration date and status of such permits, North American industry classification system or standard industrial classification code of a taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This subsection may not be construed as giving authority to the department to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any commercial purpose;

(l) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as a public record available for inspection and copying under the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW or is ((a document)) maintained by a court of record and is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;

(m) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food stamp fraud by retailers;

(n) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property;

(o) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person has succeeded;

(p) Disclosing real estate excise tax affidavit forms filed under RCW 82.45.150 in the possession of the department, including real estate excise tax affidavit forms for transactions exempt or otherwise not subject to tax;

(q) Disclosing to local taxing jurisdictions the identity of sellers granted relief under RCW 82.32.430(5)(b)(i) and the period for which relief is granted;

(r) Disclosing such return or tax information to the court in respect to the department's application for a subpoena under RCW 82.32.117;

(s) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted liability under RCW 83.100.120 return or tax information pertaining to that person's liability for tax under chapter 83.100 RCW;

(t) Disclosing such return or tax information to the streamlined sales tax governing board, member states of the streamlined sales tax governing board, or authorized representatives of such board or states, for the limited purposes of:

(i) Conducting on behalf of member states sales and use tax audits of taxpayers; or

(ii) Auditing certified service providers or certified automated systems providers; ((or))

(u) Disclosing any such return or tax information when the disclosure is specifically authorized under any other section of the Revised Code of Washington;

(v) Disclosing to an individual to whom the department has issued an assessment under RCW 82.32.145 for unpaid trust fund taxes of a defunct or insolvent entity, return or tax information of that entity pertaining to those unpaid trust fund taxes; or

(w) Disclosing any such return or tax information pursuant to a federal grand jury subpoena or subpoena issued by a United States attorney, only to be used in the criminal investigation and related court proceedings, or in the court proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was sought.

(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity, or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only when the person under investigation and the person in possession of data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals, financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials, or documents.

(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under this subsection (4), the department must, through written correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence must clearly identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge brought under (c) of this subsection.

(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for injunctive relief. The court must limit or deny the request of the department if the court determines that:

(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;

(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or

(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the petitioner.

(d) The department must reimburse reasonable expenses for the production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.

(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.

(5) Service of a subpoena issued under RCW 82.32.117 does not constitute a disclosure of return or tax information under this section. Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this section, a person served with a subpoena under RCW 82.32.117 may disclose the existence or content of the subpoena to that person's legal counsel.

(6) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as provided under subsection (3) (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), ((or)) (m), (v), and (w) of this section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the state, such person must forfeit such office or employment and is incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for a period of two years thereafter.

Sec. 19. RCW 82.32.534 and 2017 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) Beginning in calendar year 2018, every person claiming a tax preference that requires an annual tax performance report under this section must file a complete annual report with the department. The report is due by May 31st of the year following any calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference that requires a report under this section.

(ii) If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, the first annual tax performance report must be filed by May 31st of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the investment project is certified by the department as operationally complete, and an annual tax performance report must be filed by May 31st of each of the seven succeeding calendar years.

(iii) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual reports under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.

(b) The report must include information detailing employment and wages for employment positions in Washington for the year that the tax preference was claimed. However, persons engaged in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes may report employment((,))and wage((, and benefit)) information per job at the manufacturing site for the year that the tax preference was claimed. The report must not include names of employees. The report must also detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions for the year that the tax preference was claimed. In lieu of reporting employment and wage data required under this subsection, taxpayers may instead opt to allow the employment security department to release the same employment and wage information from unemployment insurance records to the department and the joint legislative audit and review committee. This option is intended to reduce the reporting burden for taxpayers, and each taxpayer electing to use this option must affirm that election in accordance with procedures approved by the employment security department.

(c) Persons receiving the benefit of the tax preference provided by RCW 82.16.0421 or claiming any of the tax preferences provided by RCW 82.04.2909, 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5) must indicate on the annual report the quantity of product produced in this state during the time period covered by the report.

(d) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report filed under this section must also include employment((,))and wage((, and benefit)) information for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year for which a tax preference was claimed.

(2)(a) As part of the annual report, the department and the joint legislative audit and review committee may request additional information necessary to measure the results of, or determine eligibility for, the tax preference.

(b) The report must include the amount of the tax preference claimed for the calendar year covered by the report. For a person that claimed an exemption provided in RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, the report must include the amount of tax exempted under those sections in the prior calendar year for each general area or category of research and development for which exempt machinery and equipment and labor and services were acquired in the prior calendar year.

(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2)(a) of this section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.

(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a tax preference that requires an annual report under this section but fails to submit a complete report by the due date or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare:

(i) Thirty-five percent of the amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable;

(ii) An additional fifteen percent of the amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable if the person has previously been assessed under this subsection (4) for failure to submit a report under this section for the same tax preference; and

(iii) If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, the amount immediately due under this subsection is twelve and one-half percent of the deferred tax. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee, the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.

(b) The department may not assess interest or penalties on amounts due under this subsection.

(5) The department must use the information from this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must report these statistics to the legislature each year by December 31st.

(6) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes the state and its departments and institutions.

(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only the tax preferences requiring a report under this section.

Sec. 20. RCW 82.32.805 and 2020 c 139 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every new tax preference expires on the first day of the calendar year that is subsequent to the calendar year that is ten years from the effective date of the tax preference. With respect to any new property tax exemption, the exemption does not apply to taxes levied for collection beginning in the calendar year that is subsequent to the calendar year that is ten years from the effective date of the tax preference.

(b) If a new tax preference applies to both a state tax and a corresponding local tax that the department administers, such as a state and local sales and use tax exemption, the expiration of that new tax preference under this subsection applies to both the state and local tax.

(c) A future amendment that expands a tax preference does not extend the tax preference beyond the period provided in this subsection unless an extension is expressly and unambiguously stated in the amendment.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if legislation creating a new tax preference includes an expiration date for the new tax preference or an exemption from this section in its entirety or from the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, whether or not such exemption is codified.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any existing tax preference that is amended to clarify an ambiguity or correct a technical inconsistency. Future enacted legislation intended to make such clarifications or corrections must explicitly indicate this intent.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "New tax preference" means a tax preference that initially takes effect after August 1, 2013, or a tax preference in effect as of August 1, 2013, that is expanded or extended after August 1, 2013, even if the expanding or extending amendment includes any other change to the tax preference.

(b) "Tax preference" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.136.021 with respect to any state tax administered by the department, except does not include the Washington estate and transfer tax in chapter 83.100 RCW.

(5) The department must provide written notice to the office of the code reviser of a ten-year expiration date required under this section for a new tax preference.

Sec. 21. RCW 84.40.130 and 2012 c 59 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If any person or corporation fails or refuses to deliver to the assessor, on or before the date specified in RCW 84.40.040, a list of the taxable personal property which is required to be listed under this chapter, unless it is shown that such failure is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect, there must be added to the amount of tax assessed against the taxpayer on account of such personal property five percent of the amount of such tax, not to exceed fifty dollars per calendar day, if the failure is for not more than one month, with an additional five percent for each additional month or fraction thereof during which such failure continues not exceeding twenty-five percent in the aggregate. Such penalty must be collected in the same manner as the tax to which it is added and distributed in the same manner as other property tax interest and penalties.

(2) If any person or corporation willfully gives a false or fraudulent list, schedule or statement required by this chapter, or, with intent to defraud, fails or refuses to deliver any list, schedule or statement required by this chapter, such person or corporation is liable for the additional tax properly due or, in the case of willful failure or refusal to deliver such list, schedule or statement, the total tax properly due; and in addition such person or corporation is liable for a penalty of one hundred percent of such additional tax or total tax as the case may be. Such penalty is in lieu of the penalty provided for in subsection (1) of this section. A person or corporation giving a false list, schedule or statement is not subject to this penalty if it is shown that the misrepresentations contained therein are entirely attributable to reasonable cause. The taxes and penalties provided for in this subsection must be recovered in an action in the name of the state of Washington on the complaint of the county assessor or the county legislative authority and must, when collected, be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the current expense fund. The provisions of this subsection are additional and supplementary to any other provisions of law relating to recovery of property taxes.

(((3)(a) The county legislative authority may authorize the assessor to waive penalties otherwise due under this section for assessment years 2011 and prior for a person or corporation failing or refusing to deliver to the assessor a list of taxable personal property, if all of the following circumstances are met:

(i) On or before July 1, 2012, the taxpayer files with the assessor:

(A) A correct list and statement of the taxable personal property required to be listed under this chapter; and

(B) A completed application for penalty waiver in the form and manner prescribed by the assessor; and

(ii) On or before September 1, 2012, the taxpayer remits full payment to the county of the entire balance due on all tax liabilities for which a penalty waiver under this section is requested, other than the penalty amount eligible for waiver under this section.

(b) A taxpayer receiving penalty relief under this subsection (3) may not seek a refund or otherwise challenge the amount of any tax liability paid under (a)(ii) of this subsection (3). Personal property listed under (a)(i) of this subsection (3) is subject to verification by the assessor, and any unreported or misreported property discovered by the assessor remains subject to taxes, penalties, and interest.))

Sec. 22. RCW 84.52.0531 and 2019 c 410 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with taxes levied for collection in 2020, the maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school district for enrichment levies under RCW 84.52.053 is equal to the lesser of two dollars and fifty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed value of property in the school district or the maximum per-pupil limit. This maximum dollar amount shall be reduced accordingly as provided under RCW 43.09.2856(2).

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) For the purpose of this section, "inflation" means((, for any school year, the rate of the yearly increase of the previous calendar year's annual average))the percentage change in the seasonally adjusted consumer price index for all urban consumers, Seattle area, for the most recent 12-month period as of September 25th of the year before the taxes are payable, using the official current base compiled by the United States bureau of labor statistics((, United States department of labor)).

(b) "Maximum per-pupil limit" means:

(i) Two thousand five hundred dollars, as increased by inflation beginning with property taxes levied for collection in 2020, multiplied by the number of average annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year, for school districts with fewer than forty thousand annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year; or

(ii) Three thousand dollars, as increased by inflation beginning with property taxes levied for collection in 2020, multiplied by the number of average annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year, for school districts with forty thousand or more annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year.

(c) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.

(3) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the enrollments of the nonhigh students attending the high school shall only be counted by the nonhigh school districts for purposes of funding under this section.

(4) For school districts participating in an innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080, enrollments of students attending the academy shall be adjusted so that each participant district receives its proportional share of student enrollments for purposes of funding under this section.

(5) Beginning with propositions for enrichment levies for collection in calendar year 2020 and thereafter, a district must receive approval of an enrichment levy expenditure plan under RCW 28A.505.240 before submission of the proposition to the voters.

(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

(7) Beginning with taxes levied for collection in 2018, enrichment levy revenues must be deposited in a separate subfund of the school district's general fund pursuant to RCW 28A.320.330, and for the 2018-19 school year are subject to the restrictions of RCW 28A.150.276 and the audit requirements of RCW 43.09.2856.

(8) Funds collected from levies for transportation vehicles, construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities as established in RCW 84.52.053 are not subject to the levy limitations in subsections (1) through (5) of this section.

Sec. 23. RCW 84.52.080 and 2010 c 106 s 314 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county assessor must extend the taxes upon the tax rolls in the form prescribed in this section. The rate percent necessary to raise the amounts of taxes levied for state and county purposes, and for purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be computed upon the assessed value of the property of the county. The rate percent necessary to raise the amount of taxes levied for any taxing district within the county must be computed upon the assessed value of the property of the district. All taxes assessed against any property must be added together and extended on the rolls in a column headed consolidated or total tax. In extending any tax, whenever the tax amounts to a fractional part of a cent greater than one-half of a cent it must be rounded up to one cent, and whenever it amounts to one-half of a cent or less it must be dropped. The amount of all taxes must be entered in the proper columns, as shown by entering the rate percent necessary to raise the consolidated or total tax and the total tax assessed against the property.

(2) For the purpose of computing the rate necessary to raise the amount of any excess levy in a taxing district entitled to a distribution under RCW 84.33.081, other than the state, the county assessor must add the district's timber assessed value, as defined in RCW 84.33.035, to the assessed value of the property. However, for school districts ((maintenance and operations))enrichment levies, only one-half of the district's timber assessed value or eighty percent of the timber roll of the district in calendar year 1983 as determined under chapter 84.33 RCW, whichever is greater, must be added to the assessed value of the property.

(3) Upon the completion of such tax extension, it is the duty of the county assessor to make in each assessment book, tax roll or list a certificate in the following form:

I, . . . . . ., assessor of . . . . . . county, state of Washington, do hereby certify that the foregoing is a correct list of taxes levied on the real and personal property in the county of . . . . . . for the year two thousand . . . . . .

Witness my hand this . . . . day of . . . . . ., 20. . .

. . . ., County Assessor

(4) The county assessor must deliver the tax rolls to the county treasurer, on or before the fifteenth day of January, taking a receipt from the treasurer. At the same time, the county assessor must provide the county auditor with an abstract of the tax rolls showing the total amount of taxes collectible in each of the taxing districts.

Sec. 24. RCW 84.36.385 and 2020 c 209 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A claim for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 as now or hereafter amended, may be made and filed at any time during the year for exemption from taxes payable the following year and thereafter and solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue. However, an exemption from tax under RCW 84.36.381 continues for no more than six years unless a renewal application is filed as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) A person granted an exemption under RCW 84.36.381 must inform the county assessor of any change in status affecting the person's entitlement to the exemption on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

(3) Each person exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 in 1993 and thereafter must file with the county assessor a renewal application not later than December 31st of the year the assessor notifies such person of the requirement to file the renewal application. Renewal applications must be on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

(4) At least once every six years, the county assessor must notify those persons receiving an exemption from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 of the requirement to file a renewal application. The county assessor may also require a renewal application following an amendment of the income requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.381.

(5) If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet the qualifications as set forth in RCW 84.36.381, as now or hereafter amended, the claim or exemption must be denied but such denial is subject to appeal under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010 and in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If the applicant had received exemption in prior years based on erroneous information, the taxes must be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW 84.40.130 for a period of not to exceed five years.

(6) The department and each local assessor is hereby directed to publicize the qualifications and manner of making claims under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, through communications media, including such paid advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of the qualifications, method of making applications, the penalties for not reporting a change in status, and availability of further information must be included on or with property tax statements and revaluation notices for all residential property including mobile homes, except rental properties.

(7) The department must authorize an option for electronic filing of applications and renewal applications for the exemption under RCW 84.36.381.

(8) Beginning August 1, 2019, and by March 1st every fifth year thereafter, the department must publish updated income thresholds. The adjusted thresholds must be rounded up to the nearest one thousand dollars. If the income threshold adjustment is negative, the income threshold for the prior year continues to apply. The department must adjust income thresholds for each county to reflect the most recent year available of estimated county median household incomes, including preliminary estimates or projections, as published by the office of financial management. For the purposes of this subsection, "county median household income" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 84.36.383.

(9) Beginning with the adjustment made by March 1, 2024, as provided in subsection (8) of this section, and every second adjustment thereafter, if an income threshold in a county is not adjusted based on percentage of county median income, then the income threshold must be adjusted based on the growth of the seasonally adjusted consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) for the prior twelve month period as published by the United States bureau of labor statistics. In no case may the adjustment be greater than one percent. The adjusted thresholds must be rounded to the nearest one dollar. If the income threshold adjustment is negative, the income threshold for the prior year continues to apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25. RCW 82.25.045 (Shipped or transported outside state—Tax credit) and 2019 c 445 s 109 are each repealed.

--- END ---