BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Any superior court, in collaboration with the dispute resolution center that is located within or serving the same county, participating in the eviction resolution pilot program as established by order number 25700-B-639 of the Washington supreme court and in conjunction with any standing order of the superior court must report annually to the administrative office of the courts beginning January 1, 2022, until January 1, 2023, on the following:

(a) The number of unlawful detainer actions for nonpayment of rent that were subject to program requirements;

(b) The number of referrals made to dispute resolution centers;

(c) The number of unlawful detainer actions resolved by the program;

(d) How many instances the tenant had legal representation either at the conciliation stage or formal mediation stage;

(e) The number of certifications issued by dispute resolution centers and filed by landlords with the court; and

(f) Any other information that relates to the efficacy of the pilot program.

(2) By July 1, 2022, until July 1, 2023, the administrative office of the courts must provide a report to the legislature summarizing the report data shared by the superior courts and dispute resolution centers under subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---