BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.117 RCW to read as follows:

(1) January of each year will be known as Americans of Chinese descent history month. Each January is designated as a time for people of this state to commemorate the contributions of Americans of Chinese descent to the history and heritage of Washington state and the United States.

(2) Public schools are encouraged to designate time for appropriate activities in commemoration of Americans of Chinese descent history month and the lives, history, achievements, and contributions of Americans of Chinese descent.

--- END ---