BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must develop a personal protective equipment database of vendors from which the department or other public entities in Washington state have purchased or contracted for personal protective equipment.

(2) Before a vendor is added to the personal protective equipment vendor database, the department must have either purchased personal protective equipment from the vendor or received documentation adequate to demonstrate that the vendor sold such equipment to at least one other public entity in Washington state.

(3) The department may check a vendor's state business license and United States food and drug administration registrations, or any other source prior to including the vendor in the database. The department has the authority to approve or deny any request to be included in the database or to remove a vendor from the database.

(4) The department may require vendors to notify the department with any information they deem necessary to ensure the information listed on the database remains accurate.

(5) The department must publish the database of personal protective equipment vendors by product type on a website that is accessible to the public, and make any necessary updates to the vendor list at least once a quarter.

(6) For purposes of this section, "personal protective equipment" means an item or items used to protect the eyes, face, head, body, arms, hands, legs, or feet such as goggles, safety glasses, helmets, headcovers, gloves, gowns, rubber slickers, disposable coveralls, shoe covers, biohazard waste bags, safety shoes, protective shields, face masks, respirators, surgical masks, face shields, thermometers, disinfectant sprays, disinfectant wipes, hand sanitizers, and barriers.

(7) Inclusion in the database does not constitute an express or implied warranty, guarantee, or approval of any product or any vendor and neither the department nor the state of Washington may be held liable by any person or entity for any purchase from any vendor included in the database or for the use of any product or the information included in the database.

--- END ---