BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.05.742 and 2020 c 8 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning with the 2022 plan year, individuals are limited to a single enrollment in medical, dental, and vision plans ((among))in either the school employees' benefits board ((and))or the public employees' benefits board ((plans. However, individuals may be enrolled in both public employees' benefits board and school employees' benefits board plans as long as those enrollments are across different types of plans, such as medical, dental, and vision)). The school employees' benefits board and the public employees' benefits board shall adopt policies to reflect this single enrollment requirement.

--- END ---