BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.09.310 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advisory committee" means the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities advisory committee established in RCW 46.09.340.

(2) "Board" means the recreation and conservation funding board established in RCW 79A.25.110.

(3) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in the business of selling off-road vehicles at wholesale or retail in this state.

(4) "Direct supervision" means that the supervising adult must be in a position, on another wheeled all-terrain vehicle or specialty off-highway vehicle or motorbike or, if on the ground, within a reasonable distance of the unlicensed operator, to provide close support, assistance, or direction to the unlicensed operator.

(5) "Emergency management" means the carrying out of emergency functions related to responding and recovering from emergencies and disasters, and to aid victims suffering from injury or damage, resulting from disasters caused by all hazards, whether natural, technological, or human caused, and to provide support for search and rescue operations for persons and property in distress.

(6) "Highway," for the purpose of this chapter only, means the entire width between the boundary lines of every roadway publicly maintained by the state department of transportation or any county or city with funding from the motor vehicle fund. A highway is generally capable of travel by a conventional two-wheel drive passenger automobile during most of the year and in use by such vehicles.

(7) "Nonhighway road" means any road owned or managed by a public agency, a primitive road, or any private road for which the owner has granted an easement for public use for which appropriations from the motor vehicle fund were not used for (a) original construction or reconstruction in the last twenty-five years; or (b) maintenance in the last four years.

(8) "Nonhighway road recreation facilities" means recreational facilities that are adjacent to, or accessed by, a nonhighway road and intended primarily for nonhighway road recreational users.

(9) "Nonhighway road recreational user" means a person whose purpose for consuming fuel on a nonhighway road or off-road is primarily for nonhighway road recreational purposes, including, but not limited to, hunting, fishing, camping, sightseeing, wildlife viewing, picnicking, driving for pleasure, kayaking/canoeing, and gathering berries, firewood, mushrooms, and other natural products.

(10) "Nonhighway vehicle" means any motorized vehicle including an ORV when used for recreational purposes on nonhighway roads, trails, or a variety of other natural terrain.

Nonhighway vehicle does not include:

(a) Any vehicle designed primarily for travel on, over, or in the water;

(b) Snowmobiles or any military vehicles; or

(c) Any vehicle eligible for a motor vehicle fuel tax exemption or rebate under chapter 82.38 RCW while an exemption or rebate is claimed. This exemption includes but is not limited to farm, construction, and logging vehicles.

(11) "Nonmotorized recreational facilities" means recreational trails and facilities that are adjacent to, or accessed by, a nonhighway road and intended primarily for nonmotorized recreational users.

(12) "Nonmotorized recreational user" means a person whose purpose for consuming fuel on a nonhighway road or off-road is primarily for nonmotorized recreational purposes including, but not limited to, walking, hiking, backpacking, climbing, cross-country skiing, snowshoeing, mountain biking, horseback riding, and pack animal activities.

(13) "Off-road vehicle" or "ORV" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.365.

(14) "Organized competitive event" means any competition, advertised in advance through written notice to organized clubs or published in local newspapers, sponsored by recognized clubs, and conducted at a predetermined time and place.

(((14)))(15) "ORV recreation facilities" include, but are not limited to, ORV trails, trailheads, campgrounds, ORV sports parks, and ORV use areas, designated for ORV use by the managing authority.

(((15)))(16) "ORV recreational user" means a person whose purpose for consuming fuel on nonhighway roads or off-road is primarily for ORV recreational purposes, including but not limited to riding an all-terrain vehicle, motorcycling, or driving a four-wheel drive vehicle or dune buggy.

(((16)))(17) "ORV sports park" means a facility designed to accommodate competitive ORV recreational uses including, but not limited to, motocross racing, four-wheel drive competitions, and flat track racing. Use of ORV sports parks can be competitive or noncompetitive in nature.

(((17)))(18) "ORV trail" means a multiple-use corridor designated by the managing authority and maintained for recreational use by motorized vehicles.

(((18)))(19) "Primitive road" means a linear route managed for use by four-wheel drive or high-clearance vehicles that is generally not maintained or paved, a road designated by a county as primitive under RCW 36.75.300, or a road designated by a city or town as primitive under a local ordinance.

(((19)))(20) "Wheeled all-terrain vehicle" means (a) any motorized nonhighway vehicle with handlebars that is fifty inches or less in width, has a seat height of at least twenty inches, weighs less than one thousand five hundred pounds, and has four tires having a diameter of thirty inches or less, or (b) a utility-type vehicle designed for and capable of travel over designated roads that travels on four or more low-pressure tires of twenty psi or less, has a maximum width less than seventy-four inches, has a maximum weight less than two thousand pounds, has a wheelbase of one hundred ten inches or less, and satisfies at least one of the following: (i) Has a minimum width of fifty inches; (ii) has a minimum weight of at least nine hundred pounds; or (iii) has a wheelbase of over sixty-one inches.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.09.442 and 2021 c 216 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any wheeled all-terrain vehicle operated within this state must display a metal tag to be affixed to the rear of the wheeled all-terrain vehicle. The initial metal tag must be issued with an original off-road vehicle registration and, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, upon payment of the initial vehicle license fee under RCW 46.17.350(1)(s). The metal tag must be replaced every seven years at a cost of two dollars. Revenue from replacement metal tags must be deposited into the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account. The department must design the metal tag, which must:

(a) Be the same size as a motorcycle license plate;

(b) Have the words "RESTRICTED VEHICLE" listed at the top of the tag;

(c) Contain designated identification through a combination of letters and numbers;

(d) Leave space at the bottom left corner of the tag for an off-road tab issued under subsection (2) of this section; and

(e) Leave space at the bottom right corner of the tag for an on-road tab, when required, issued under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) Except as provided in subsections (6)(b) and (7) of this section, a person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle must have a current and proper off-road vehicle registration, with the appropriate off-road tab, ((and)) pay the annual vehicle license fee as provided in RCW 46.17.350(1)(s), which must be deposited into the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account, and comply with equipment requirements as provided in RCW 46.09.470. The off-road tab must be issued annually by the department upon payment of initial and renewal vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1)(s), except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(3) Except as provided in subsections (6)(a) and (7) of this section, a person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle upon a public roadway must have a current and proper on-road vehicle registration, with the appropriate on-road tab, which must be of a bright color that can be seen from a reasonable distance, ((and)) pay the annual vehicle license fee as provided in RCW 46.17.350(1)(r), and comply with the on-road equipment and declaration requirements for wheeled all-terrain vehicles as provided in RCW 46.09.457. The on-road tab must be issued annually by the department upon payment of initial and renewal vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1)(r), except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2017, for purposes of subsection (3) of this section, a special year tab issued pursuant to chapter 46.19 RCW to a person with a disability may be displayed on a wheeled all-terrain vehicle in lieu of an on-road tab.

(5) A wheeled all-terrain vehicle may not be registered for commercial use.

(6)(a) A wheeled all-terrain vehicle registration and a metal tag are not required under this chapter for a wheeled all-terrain vehicle that meets the definition in RCW 46.09.310(((19)))(20), is owned by a resident of another state, and has a vehicle registration and metal tag or license plate issued in accordance with the laws of the other state allowing for on-road travel in that state. This exemption applies only to the extent that: (i) A similar exemption or privilege is granted under the laws of that state for wheeled all-terrain vehicles registered in Washington, and (ii) the other state has equipment requirements for on-road use that meet or exceed the requirements listed in RCW 46.09.457. The department may publish on its website a list of states that meet the exemption requirements under this subsection. The exemption in this subsection does not apply to a wheeled all-terrain vehicle owned by a resident of a state that borders Washington and that does not impose a retail sales and use tax on the sales or use of wheeled all-terrain vehicles.

(b) Off-road operation in Washington state of a wheeled all-terrain vehicle owned by a resident of another state and meeting the definition in RCW 46.09.310(((19)))(20) is governed in the same manner as for other off-road vehicles under RCW 46.09.420(4).

(7)(a) No fee is required with an application for an original ORV registration or the renewal of an ORV registration, if the vehicle is also properly registered or permitted in another state to a resident of the state, and, at the time of application, the resident presents the following documents issued by the other state: (i) The resident's unexpired driver's license; and (ii) the current registration or permit for the off-road vehicle.

(b) The department must issue a metal tag and either the off-road tab, on-road tab, or both, as appropriate, following the ORV registration under (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.09.457 and 2016 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may operate a wheeled all-terrain vehicle upon any public roadway of this state, not including nonhighway roads and trails, subject to RCW 46.09.455 and the following equipment and declaration requirements:

(a) A person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle on a public roadway as authorized under RCW 46.09.455 must comply with the following equipment requirements:

(i) Headlights meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.030 and 46.37.040 and used at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a highway;

(ii) One tail lamp meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.525 and used at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a highway; however, a utility-type vehicle, as described under RCW 46.09.310, must have two tail lamps meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.070(1) and to be used at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a highway;

(iii) A stop lamp meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200;

(iv) Reflectors meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.060;

(v) During hours of darkness, as defined in RCW 46.04.200, turn signals meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200. Outside of hours of darkness, the operator must comply with RCW 46.37.200 or 46.61.310;

(vi) A mirror attached to either the right or left handlebar, which must be located to give the operator a complete view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of the vehicle; however, a utility-type vehicle, as described under RCW 46.09.310(((19)))(20), must have two mirrors meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.400;

(vii) A windshield meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.430, unless the operator wears glasses, goggles, or a face shield while operating the vehicle, of a type conforming to rules adopted by the Washington state patrol;

(viii) A horn or warning device meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.380;

(ix) Brakes in working order;

(x) A spark arrester and muffling device meeting the requirements of RCW 46.09.470; and

(xi) For utility-type vehicles, as described under RCW 46.09.310(((19)))(20), seat belts meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.510.

(b) A person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle upon a public roadway must provide a declaration that includes the following:

(i) Documentation of a safety inspection to be completed by a licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair shop in the state of Washington that must outline the vehicle information and certify under oath that all wheeled all-terrain vehicle equipment as required under this section meets the requirements outlined in state and federal law. A person who makes a false statement regarding the inspection of equipment required under this section is guilty of false swearing, a gross misdemeanor, under RCW 9A.72.040;

(ii) Documentation that the licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair shop did not charge more than fifty dollars per safety inspection and that the entire safety inspection fee is paid directly and only to the licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair shop;

(iii) A statement that the licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair shop is entitled to the full amount charged for the safety inspection;

(iv) A vehicle identification number verification that must be completed by a licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair shop in the state of Washington;

(v) A release, on a form to be supplied by the department, signed by the owner of the wheeled all-terrain vehicle and verified by the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director that releases the state, counties, cities, and towns from any liability; and

(vi) A statement that outlines that the owner understands that the original wheeled all-terrain vehicle was not manufactured for on-road use and that it has been modified for use on public roadways.

(2) This section does not apply to emergency services vehicles, vehicles used for emergency management purposes, or vehicles used in the production of agricultural and timber products on and across lands owned, leased, or managed by the owner or operator of the wheeled all-terrain vehicle or the operator's employer.

--- END ---