BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.720 and 2020 c 88 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Inspections and tests under this section must be performed by ((a))either:

(a) A contractor or engineer with the following qualifications:

(((a)))(i) For inspection and testing of fire dampers, smoke dampers, and combination fire and smoke dampers, such inspector must have a current and valid certification to inspect and test fire dampers, smoke dampers, and combination fire and smoke dampers and hold certification from the international certification board as a fire life safety 1 or fire and smoke damper technician through a program accredited by the American national standards institute under the ISO/IEC 17024 standard((.));

(((b)))(ii) For inspection and testing of smoke control systems, such inspector must have a current and valid certification from the international certification board as a fire life safety 2 or smoke control system technician through a program accredited by the American national standards institute under the ISO/IEC 17024 standard; or

(b) An individual meeting the national fire protection association definition of a qualified person who has received training equivalent to the national fire protection association standards for inspection and testing of fire dampers, smoke dampers, combination fire and smoke dampers, and smoke control systems.

(2) A building engineer or other person knowledgeable with the building system must be available in person or by phone to the inspector during the inspection and testing in order to provide building and systems access and information.

(3) If an inspection reveals compliance with the requirements of this section, the inspector shall issue a certificate of compliance, which includes the name of the inspector and the inspector's employer; the name of the building owner and address of the property; the location of all smoke dampers, fire dampers, combination fire and smoke dampers, and smoke control systems inspected or tested; and the date of the inspection or test.

(4) In the event an inspection or test reveals deficiencies in smoke dampers, fire dampers, combination fire and smoke dampers, or smoke control systems, the inspector shall prepare a deficiency report for the building owner identifying the nature of the deficiency and the reasons for noncompliance. The building owner shall, within one hundred twenty days of the date of the inspection, take necessary steps to ensure the defective equipment is replaced or repaired and reinspected to ensure that the deficiency is corrected and is in compliance with the requirements of all applicable standards pursuant to chapter 88, Laws of 2020. The authority having jurisdiction shall have the authorization to extend the compliance period. The building owner shall provide documentation of when and how the deficiencies were corrected. If the building owner does not correct the deficiency within ((one hundred twenty))120 days of the date of the inspection, the local authority may issue a citation as described in RCW 19.27.740.

(5) In addition to identifying the location and nature of a deficiency, the report shall contain the name of the inspector and the inspector's employer; the name of the building owner; address of the property; the location of all fire dampers, smoke dampers, combination fire and smoke dampers, and smoke control systems inspected or tested; and the date of the inspection or test.

(6) Tests and inspections of fire dampers, smoke dampers, combination fire and smoke dampers, and smoke control systems shall be conducted in accordance with the technical specifications and required time periods specified by national fire protection association standards 80, 90a, 90b, 92, and 105, as applicable.

--- END ---