BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.230.170 and 2011 c 203 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The study of (i) the Constitution of the United States and (ii) the Constitution of the state of Washington shall be a condition prerequisite to graduation from the public and private high schools of this state.

(b) The study of the history and negative effects of communism, including the number of deaths under communist leaders, shall be a condition prerequisite to graduation from the public high schools of this state.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide by rule for the implementation of this section.

(3)(a) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt a rule permitting students who meet the criteria in RCW 28A.230.122 to meet the prerequisite in subsection (1)(a) of this section through noncredit-based study.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt a rule permitting students who take the heritage guide to the Constitution to meet the prerequisite in subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section through noncredit-based study.

--- END ---