BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.85.211 and 2008 c 23 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All real estate brokers and managing brokers shall furnish proof as prescribed by rule of the director that they have successfully completed at least the required minimum number of ((thirty))30 clock hours of instruction every two years in real estate courses approved by the director to renew their licenses. The director may adopt rules to limit the number of hours of distance education courses that may be used for license renewal. Up to ((fifteen))15 clock hours of instruction in excess of the required ((thirty))30 clock hours acquired within the immediately preceding two-year period may be carried forward for credit in a subsequent two-year period. Examinations shall not be required to fulfill any part of the education requirement in this section.

(2) For active license renewals, six hours of the required 30 hours of instruction in subsection (1) of this section must be focused on fair housing education and prevention of unfair practices with respect to real estate transactions, facilities, or services as specified in RCW 49.60.222. For every subsequent renewal, three hours of the required 30 hours of instruction in subsection (1) of this section must be focused on fair housing education and prevention of unfair practices with respect to real estate transactions, facilities, or services as specified in RCW 49.60.222.

(3) The department shall provide more specific training concepts within fair housing education by the requirements specified in subsection (2) of this section with the input of associations that represent real estate brokers and agents, the Washington state commission on African American affairs, the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs, the governor's office of Indian affairs, the Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs, the Washington state human rights commission, the governor's committee on disability issues and employment, the Washington state LGBTQ commission, and the Washington state housing finance commission.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.85.101 and 2008 c 23 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The minimum requirements for an individual to receive a broker's license are that the individual:

(a) Is ((eighteen))18 years of age or older;

(b) Has a high school diploma or its equivalent;

(c) Except as provided in RCW 18.85.141, has furnished proof, as the director may require, that the applicant has successfully completed ((ninety))90 hours of instruction in real estate. Instruction must include courses as prescribed by the director including fundamentals, which shall include three hours of instruction on fair housing and consumer protection issues, and practices. Each course must be completed within two years before applying for the broker's license examination and be approved by the director. The applicant must pass a course examination, approved by the director for each course used to satisfy the broker's license requirement; and

(d) Has passed the broker's license examination.

(2) The broker's license may be renewed upon completion of continuing education courses and payment of the renewal fee as prescribed by the director. The education requirements for the first renewal of the broker's license must include ((ninety))90 hours of courses as prescribed by the director, including real estate law, which shall include three hours of instruction on fair housing and consumer protection issues, advance practices, and continuing education.

(3) The broker is licensed to one firm at a time and is supervised by a designated or managing broker.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect June 1, 2022.

--- END ---