BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.72.100 and 2003 c 111 s 1811 are each amended to read as follows:

The person proposing the measure shall print blank petitions upon single sheets of paper of good writing quality (including but not limited to newsprint) not less than ((eleven))eight and one-half inches in width and not less than ((fourteen))11 inches in length. Text must be printed in at least 10-point font. Each petition at the time of circulating, signing, and filing with the secretary of state must consist of not more than one sheet with numbered lines for not more than ((twenty))20 signatures, with the prescribed warning and title, be in the form required by RCW 29A.72.110, 29A.72.120, or 29A.72.130, and have a readable, full, true, and correct copy of the proposed measure printed on the reverse side of the petition. Language and punctuation intended to be deleted from within the current law as part of the measure must be set forth in full, enclosed by double parentheses, and struck through with a solid line; new language to be inserted into law as part of the measure must be underlined.

--- END ---