BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the use of racially derogatory or discriminatory school mascots, logos, or team names in public schools is antithetical to their mission of providing an equal education to all, and contrary to the goal of making schools safe and respectful learning environments.

(2) The legislature therefore, recognizing that no school has a cognizable interest in retaining a racially derogatory or discriminatory school mascot, logo, or team name, intends to prohibit the inappropriate use of Native American names, symbols, or images for those purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided otherwise by this section, beginning January 1, 2022, public schools may not use Native American names, symbols, or images as school mascots, logos, or team names.

(2) This section does not apply to public schools located within, or with enrollment boundaries that include a portion of, "Indian country," as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151, or public schools in a county that contains all or part of a tribal reservation or tribal trust lands, if the tribe or tribes having regulatory jurisdiction over the territory within that boundary have:

(a) Been consulted by the appropriate school, district, or both. Consultations under this subsection (2)(a) must include summaries of completed and ongoing district and school actions required by RCW 28A.320.170; and

(b) Authorized the use of the name, symbol, or image as a mascot, logo, or team name through an appropriate enactment or resolution.

(3) A public school may use uniforms or other materials after January 1, 2022, bearing Native American names, symbols, or images as mascots, logos, or team names if the uniforms or materials were purchased before January 1, 2022, and if:

(a) The school selects a new mascot, logo, or team name by December 31, 2021, to take effect in the 2021-22 school year;

(b) Except as provided otherwise by this subsection (3)(b), the school does not purchase or acquire any uniforms or materials that include the discontinued Native American name, symbol, or image. However, a school using the discontinued Native American name, symbol, or image may, until January 1, 2023, purchase or acquire a number of uniforms equal to up to twenty percent of the total number of uniforms used by a team, band, or cheer squad at that school during the 2021-22 school year solely to replace damaged or lost uniforms;

(c) The school does not purchase, create, or acquire any yearbook, newspaper, program, or other similar material that includes or bears the discontinued Native American name, symbol, or image; and

(d) The school does not purchase, construct, or acquire a marquee, sign, or other new or replacement fixture that includes or bears the discontinued Native American name, symbol, or image.

--- END ---