BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife shall each undergo a public process to collect information related to electric-assisted bicycle use on nonmotorized natural surface trails and closed roads open to nonmotorized recreation to determine where such use may occur, and which classes of electric-assisted bicycles are acceptable on such trails and roads under the agencies' management.

The public processes shall include, but not be limited to, input from tribes, individuals with disabilities, representatives of natural resource conservation organizations, and representatives of outdoor recreation interests representing horseback riding, traditional and electric-assisted mountain biking, hiking, and hunting. The department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife must report their findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2022.

--- END ---