BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. The legislature finds that the assets in the local law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system benefits improvement account, when combined with the excess funding in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement fund, are sufficient to fund a benefit improvement for members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 without increasing the short-term cost for members, employers, or the state. As such, it is the intent of the legislature to increase the retirement allowance for active members with more than 15 years of service and to provide a one-time payment to retired members.

Sec. 102. RCW 41.26.802 and 2019 c 366 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prior to May 13, 2019, this section required certain transfers to be made to the local public safety enhancement account. After May 13, 2019, except for the transfer in subsection (2) of this section, no further transfers will be made to the local public safety enhancement account pursuant to this section.

(2) On July 1, 2019, the state treasurer shall transfer the sum of three hundred million dollars from the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement fund to the local law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system benefits improvement account.

(3) On July 1, 2021, the state treasurer shall transfer the sum of the total available balance of the local law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system benefits improvement account from the local law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system benefits improvement account to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement fund. The amount transferred under this subsection goes toward the benefit enhancements in RCW 41.26.420(2).

Sec. 103. RCW 41.26.420 and 1993 c 517 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.26.530, a member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement allowance equal to two percent of such member's final average salary for each year of service.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2022, active members with more than 15 years of service credit shall receive a retirement allowance as follows:

(a) Two percent of such member's final average salary for the first 15 years of service;

(b) Two and one-half percent of such member's final average salary for years of service above 15 and up to 26; and

(c) Two percent of such member's final average salary for years of service above 26.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW under the subchapter heading "Plan 2" to read as follows:

(1) Law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirees with at least 15 years of service credit, and the beneficiary of a retiree with at least 15 years of service credit that is eligible for benefits under the plan 2 provisions of this chapter, on the effective date of this section shall be eligible to receive the plan 2 lump sum defined benefit pursuant to the conditions established in this section.

(2) A law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 beneficiary that was eligible for a death benefit under RCW 41.26.048 and the plan 2 provisions of this chapter, on the effective date of this section shall be eligible to receive the plan 2 lump sum defined benefit pursuant to the conditions established in this section.

(3) The lump sum defined benefit is $20,000 per eligible member or survivor, payable on January 3, 2022. In the case of multiple survivor beneficiaries, the lump sum defined benefit shall be divided equally.

(4) If a member dies after the effective date of this section but before distribution of the lump sum defined benefit created in this section occurs, the distribution shall be made according to the member's beneficiary designation under this chapter.

(5) The lump sum defined benefit created in this section is subject to RCW 41.26.053.

Sec. 105. RCW 41.45.0604 and 2007 c 280 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Not later than July 31, 2008, and every even-numbered year thereafter, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board shall adopt contribution rates for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 as provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a).

(b) For the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, contribution rates for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 may not exceed the rates adopted by the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board on July 22, 2020.

(2) The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board shall immediately notify the directors of the office of financial management and department of retirement systems of the state, employer, and employee rates adopted. Thereafter, the director shall collect those rates adopted by the board. The rates shall be effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative modifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. The legislature intends to improve the actuarial soundness of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 while also continuing the state commitment to maintain the actuarial soundness of benefits promised to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 by merging the assets, liabilities, and membership of both plans into a new merged plan with two benefit tiers.

The legislature further intends that this merger of assets, liabilities, and membership, and any administrative changes necessary to implement the merger, be accomplished in a way that does not impact benefits provided to members of either the teachers' retirement system plan 1 or the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1.

The legislature further intends that the merger of assets, liabilities, and membership of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 be administered in a way consistent with plan qualification requirements in the federal internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. A retirement system is hereby created for the purpose of merging the assets, liabilities, and membership of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1.

This retirement system shall be known as the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan, and by this name all of its business shall be transacted and all of its funds invested and all of its cash, securities, and other property held.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. The assets, liabilities, and membership of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 are hereby merged with the teachers' retirement system plan 1 into the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan. The merged plan shall consist of two tiers based on benefits and prior plan membership.

(1)(a)(i) All liabilities of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 as defined in chapter 41.32 RCW and as funded pursuant to chapter 41.45 RCW are made liabilities of the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan. This includes all benefits payable to the teachers' retirement system plan 1 members pursuant to chapter 41.32 RCW. All pension benefits, including survivor benefits, payable to members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 pursuant to chapter 41.32 RCW must be paid from the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan fund established in RCW 41.50.075(6).

(ii) The membership and benefits of the former teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be administered as a separate tier within the merged system, and members of this tier will not be eligible for the benefits of the other tier.

(b)(i) All liabilities of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW and as funded pursuant to chapter 41.45 RCW, are made liabilities of the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan. All pension benefits, including survivor benefits, payable to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 pursuant to chapter 41.26 RCW must be paid from the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan fund established in RCW 41.50.075(6).

(ii) The membership and benefits of the former law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 shall be administered as a separate tier within the merged system, and members of this tier will not be eligible for the benefits of the other tier.

(c) All liabilities for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 medical benefits provided pursuant to RCW 41.26.150 remain liabilities of employers, as defined in RCW 41.26.030(11)(a).

(d) All assets of both plans are merged as described in RCW 41.50.075.

(2) This merger is contingent on the receipt of a favorable private letter ruling and determination letter from the federal internal revenue service as described in section 301 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. The merger of assets, liabilities, and membership of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 in section 203 of this act does not impact the disability boards established in RCW 41.26.110 (as recodified by this act) or any official action of those boards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. Sections 206 through 220 of this act apply only to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 1 tier of the retirement system created in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest credited thereon.

(2) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be available on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's future benefits during the period of retirement.

(3) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present monetary value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary value of future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among active and retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement, withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.

(4) "Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be computed and upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be based.

(5) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit described herein.

(6)(a) "Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically disabled as determined by the department, except a person who is disabled and in the full time care of a state institution, who is:

(i) A natural born child;

(ii) A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter;

(iii) A posthumous child;

(iv) A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter; or

(v) An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable under this chapter.

(b) A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of twenty years and eleven months while attending any high school, college, or vocational or other educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which it is located, including the summer vacation months and all other normal and regular vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which the child returns to school.

(7) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.

(8) "Director" means the director of the department.

(9) "Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county disability board or the city disability board established in section 220 of this act.

(10) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability retirement. The definition contained in this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(11) "Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.

(12) "Domestic partners" means two adults who have registered as domestic partners under RCW 26.60.020.

(13) "Employee" means any law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in subsections (16) and (18) of this section.

(14) "Employer" means the legislative authority of any city, town, county, or district or the elected officials of any municipal corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or firefighter, any authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of RCW 41.26.150 (as recodified by this act), any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the firefighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over 20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or firefighters as defined in this chapter.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an "employer." The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an "employer," but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an "employer" under this chapter.

(15)(a) "Final average salary" means (i) for a member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed, computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests pursuant to RCW 41.26.090 (as recodified by this act), the basic salary payable to such member at the time of vesting.

(b) In calculating final average salary under (a) of this subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include:

(i) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer; and

(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or a local government employer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases.

(16) "Firefighter" means:

(a) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member of a fire department of an employer and who is serving in a position which requires passing a civil service examination for firefighter, and who is actively employed as such;

(b) Anyone who is actively employed as a full time firefighter where the fire department does not have a civil service examination;

(c) Supervisory firefighter personnel;

(d) Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire protection districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031;

(e) The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section), if such individual has five years previous membership in a retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW;

(f) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil service examination for firefighter;

(g) Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW; and

(h) Any person who is employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis by an employer as an emergency medical technician that meets the requirements of RCW 18.71.200 or 18.73.030(12), and whose duties include providing emergency medical services as defined in RCW 18.73.030.

(17) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, but not including the Washington state patrol. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a limited authority law enforcement agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor and cannabis board, and the state department of corrections. A general authority law enforcement agency under this chapter does not include a government contractor.

(18) "Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with the following qualifications:

(a) No person who is serving in a position that is basically clerical or secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be considered a law enforcement officer;

(b) Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a different title pursuant to county charter, who have successfully completed a civil service examination for deputy sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those persons serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;

(c) Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police department which have been specifically created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by city charter provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be considered city police officers;

(d) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section) if that individual has five years previous membership in the retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW; and

(e) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The provisions of this subsection (18)(e) shall not apply to any public safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(19) "Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150 (as recodified by this act).

(a) Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own behalf, for

(i) Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is required by the attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii) Necessary hospital services, other than board and room, furnished by the hospital.

(b) Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered "other medical expenses", provided that they have not been considered as "hospital expenses".

(i) The fees of the following:

(A) A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;

(C) A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii) The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily resides in the member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member or the member's spouse.

(iii) The charges for the following medical services and supplies:

(A) Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;

(B) Diagnostic X-ray and laboratory examinations;

(C) X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D) Anesthesia and oxygen;

(E) Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F) Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G) Professional ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H) Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within ninety days after the accident;

(I) Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J) Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;

(K) Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;

(L) An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(20) "Member" means any firefighter, law enforcement officer, or other person as would apply under subsections (16) or (18) of this section whose membership is transferred to the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system on or after March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and firefighter who is employed in that capacity on or after such date.

(21) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(22) "Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(23) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24) "Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the retirement system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.

(25) "Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system fund" as provided for herein.

(26) "Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system" provided herein.

(27) "Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of employment for an employer as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also include service in the armed forces of the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190 (as recodified by this act). Credit shall be allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.

(a) For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also include (i) such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension act, and (ii) such other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular member under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160, or 41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such prior act.

(b) A member who is employed by two employers at the same time shall only be credited with service to one such employer for any month during which the member rendered such dual service.

(28) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(29) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(30) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(31) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.

(32) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member. "Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member except as provided in RCW 41.26.162 (as recodified by this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. The term "minimum medical and health standards" means minimum medical and health standards adopted by the department under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208. (1) Notwithstanding section 206 of this act, all firefighters and law enforcement officers employed as such on or after March 1, 1970, on a full time fully compensated basis in this state shall be members of the retirement system established by this chapter with respect to all periods of service as such, to the exclusion of any pension system existing under any prior act.

(2) Any employee serving as a law enforcement officer or firefighter on March 1, 1970, who is then making retirement contributions under any prior act shall have his or her membership transferred to the system established by this chapter as of such date. Upon retirement for service or for disability, or death, of any such employee, his or her retirement benefits earned under this chapter shall be computed and paid. In addition, his or her benefits under the prior retirement act to which he or she was making contributions at the time of this transfer shall be computed as if he or she had not transferred. For the purpose of such computations, the employee's creditability of service and eligibility for service or disability retirement and survivor and all other benefits shall continue to be as provided in such prior retirement act, as if transfer of membership had not occurred. The excess, if any, of the benefits so computed, giving full value to survivor benefits, over the benefits payable under this chapter shall be paid whether or not the employee has made application under the prior act. If the employee's prior retirement system was the Washington public employees' retirement system, payment of such excess shall be made by that system; if the employee's prior retirement system was the statewide city employees' retirement system, payment of such excess shall be made by the employer which was the member's employer when his or her transfer of membership occurred: PROVIDED, That any death in line of duty lump sum benefit payment shall continue to be the obligation of that system as provided in RCW 41.44.210; in the case of all other prior retirement systems, payment of such excess shall be made by the employer which was the member's employer when his or her transfer of membership occurred.

(3) All funds held by any firefighters' or police officers' relief and pension fund shall remain in that fund for the purpose of paying the obligations of the fund. The municipality shall continue to levy the dollar rate as provided in RCW 41.16.060, and this dollar rate shall be used for the purpose of paying the benefits provided in chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW. The obligations of chapter 41.20 RCW shall continue to be paid from whatever financial sources the city has been using for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law after February 19, 1974, no law enforcement officer or firefighter, may become eligible for coverage in the pension system established by this chapter, until the individual has met and has been certified as having met minimum medical and health standards: PROVIDED, That an elected sheriff or an appointed chief of police or fire chief, shall not be required to meet the age standard: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in cities and towns having not more than two law enforcement officers and/or not more than two firefighters and if one or more of such persons do not meet the minimum medical and health standards as required by the provisions of this chapter, then such person or persons may join any other pension system that the city has available for its other employees: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That for one year after February 19, 1974, any such medical or health standard now existing or hereinafter adopted, insofar as it establishes a maximum age beyond which an applicant is to be deemed ineligible for coverage, shall be waived as to any applicant for employment or reemployment who is otherwise eligible except for his or her age, who has been a member of any one or more of the retirement systems created by chapter 41.20 RCW and who has restored all contributions which he or she has previously withdrawn from any such system or systems.

(2) This section shall not apply to persons who initially establish membership in the retirement system on or after July 1, 1979.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210. By July 31, 1971, the department of retirement systems shall adopt minimum medical and health standards for membership coverage into the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system act. In adopting such standards the department of retirement systems shall consider existing standards recommended by the international association of chiefs of police and the international association of firefighters, and shall adopt equal or higher standards, together with appropriate standards and procedures to insure uniform compliance with this chapter. The standards when adopted shall be published and distributed to each employer, and each employer shall adopt certification procedures and such other procedures as are required to insure that no law enforcement officer or firefighter receives membership coverage unless and until he or she has actually met minimum medical and health standards: PROVIDED, That an elected sheriff or an appointed chief of police, fire chief, or director of public safety shall not be required to meet the age standard. The department of retirement systems may amend the minimum medical and health standards as experience indicates, even if the standards as so amended are lower or less rigid than those recommended by the international associations mentioned above. The cost of the medical examination contemplated by this section is to be paid by the employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211. Nothing in sections 207, 209, and 210 of this act shall apply to any firefighters or law enforcement officers who are employed as such on or before August 1, 1971, as long as they continue in such employment; nor to promotional appointments after becoming a member in the police or fire department of any employer nor to the reemployment of a law enforcement officer or firefighter by the same or a different employer within six months after the termination of his or her employment, nor to the reinstatement of a law enforcement officer or firefighter who has been on military or disability leave, disability retirement status, or leave of absence status. Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to prevent any employer from adopting higher medical and health standards than those which are adopted by the department of retirement systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212. (1) A two hundred fourteen thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as if in fact such spouse or domestic partner had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to such member's legal representatives.

(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only when death occurs: (a) As a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment; or (b) as a result of an occupational disease or infection that arises naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2010, and every year thereafter, the department shall determine the following information:

(i) The index for the 2008 calendar year, to be known as "index A;"

(ii) The index for the calendar year prior to the date of determination, to be known as "index B;" and

(iii) The ratio obtained when index B is divided by index A.

(b) The value of the ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment to the original death benefit and shall be applied beginning every July 1st. In no event, however, shall the annual adjustment:

(i) Produce a benefit which is lower than two hundred fourteen thousand dollars;

(ii) Exceed three percent in the initial annual adjustment; or

(iii) Differ from the previous year's annual adjustment by more than three percent.

(c) For the purposes of this section, "index" means, for any calendar year, that year's average consumer price index — Seattle, Washington area for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213. (1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right of a person to a retirement allowance, disability allowance, or death benefit, to the return of accumulated contributions, the retirement, disability or death allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, and the moneys in the fund created under this chapter, are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other process of law whatsoever, whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned and shall be unassignable.

(2) On the written request of any person eligible to receive benefits under this section, the department may deduct from such payments the premiums for life, health, or other insurance. The request on behalf of any child or children shall be made by the legal guardian of such child or children. The department may provide for such persons one or more plans of group insurance, through contracts with regularly constituted insurance carriers or health care service contractors.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214. No bond of any kind shall be required of a claimant appealing to the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court from a decision of the director affecting such claimant's right to retirement or disability benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215. (1) The annual compensation taken into account in calculating retiree benefits under this system shall not exceed the limits imposed by section 401(a)(17) of the federal internal revenue code for qualified trusts.

(2) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, persons who fail to:

(1) Establish allowable membership service not previously credited;

(2) Restore all or a part of that previously credited membership service represented by withdrawn contributions; or

(3) Restore service credit represented by a lump sum payment in lieu of benefits, before the deadline established by statute, may do so under the conditions set forth in RCW 41.50.165.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217. A member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under RCW 41.26.120 (as recodified by this act), 41.26.125 (as recodified by this act), 41.26.130 (as recodified by this act), or 41.26.470 if the disability is the result of criminal conduct by the member committed after April 21, 1997.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218. Any employer, member or beneficiary who shall knowingly make false statements or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of the retirement system in an attempt to defraud the retirement system, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219. (1) At the time of retirement, plan 1 members may purchase an optional actuarially equivalent life annuity benefit from the LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan fund established in RCW 41.50.075. A minimum payment of twenty-five thousand dollars is required.

(2) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing an annuity under this section must pay all of the cost with an eligible rollover, direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan.

(a) The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all eligible rollovers and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

(b) "Eligible retirement plan" means a tax qualified plan offered by a governmental employer.

(3) Plan 1 members whose retirement was effective prior to the effective date of this section, may purchase an annuity under this section between January 1, 2022, and June 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220. (1) All claims for disability shall be acted upon and either approved or disapproved by either type of disability board authorized to be created in this section.

(a) Each city having a population of twenty thousand or more shall establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by those cities and composed of the following five members: Two members of the city legislative body to be appointed by the mayor; one active or retired firefighter employed by or retired from the city to be elected by the firefighters employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; one active or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from the city to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; and one member from the public at large who resides within the city to be appointed by the other four members designated in this subsection. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city are eligible for election. Each of the elected members shall serve a two year term. If there are either no firefighters or law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law enforcement officers or firefighters eligible to vote. The members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms: PROVIDED, That cities of the first class only, shall retain existing firefighters' pension boards established pursuant to RCW 41.16.020 and existing boards of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police department as established pursuant to RCW 41.20.010 which such boards shall have authority to act upon and approve or disapprove claims for disability.

(b) Each county shall establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by or retired from an employer within the county and not employed by a city in which a disability board is established. The county disability board so created shall be composed of five members to be chosen as follows: One member of the legislative body of the county to be appointed by the county legislative body; one member of a city or town legislative body located within the county which does not contain a city disability board established pursuant to (a) of this subsection to be chosen by a majority of the mayors of such cities and towns within the county which does not contain a city disability board; one active firefighter or retired firefighter employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected by the firefighters employed or retired from an employer within the county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is established and who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; one law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed in or retired from an employer within the county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is established and who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; and one member from the public at large who resides within the county but does not reside within a city in which a city disability board is established, to be appointed by the other four members designated in this subsection. However, in counties with a population less than sixty thousand, the member of the disability board appointed by a majority of the mayors of the cities and towns within the county that do not contain a city disability board must be a resident of one of the cities and towns but need not be a member of a city or town legislative body. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed by or retired from an employer within the county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is established are eligible for election. All members appointed or elected pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms. If there are no firefighters under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law enforcement officers eligible to vote. If there are no law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible representative shall be elected by the firefighters eligible to vote.

(2) The members of both the county and city disability boards shall not receive compensation for their service upon the boards but the members shall be reimbursed by their respective county or city for all expenses incidental to such service as to the amount authorized by law.

(3) The disability boards authorized for establishment by this section shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, and make all such determinations as specified in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221. Sections 222 through 240 of this act apply only to the teachers' retirement system plan 1 tier of the retirement system created in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222. As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all regular annuity contributions and, except for the purpose of withdrawal at the time of retirement, any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2) with regular interest thereon.

(2) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of such mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by the director and regular interest.

(3) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(4) "Annual increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.

(5) "Annuity" means the moneys payable per year during life by reason of accumulated contributions of a member.

(6) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(7) "Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation between a member and an employer.

(8) "Creditable service" means membership service plus prior service for which credit is allowable.

(9) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.

(10) "Dependent" means receiving one-half or more of support from a member.

(11) "Director" means the director of the department.

(12) "Disability allowance" means monthly payments during disability.

(13) "Earnable compensation" means:

(a) All salaries and wages paid by an employer to an employee member of the retirement system for personal services rendered during a fiscal year. In all cases where compensation includes maintenance the employer shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not paid in money.

(b) For an employee member of the retirement system teaching in an extended school year program, two consecutive extended school years, as defined by the employer school district, may be used as the annual period for determining earnable compensation in lieu of the two fiscal years.

(c) "Earnable compensation" also includes the following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be considered earnable compensation and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(ii) If a leave of absence, without pay, is taken by a member for the purpose of serving as a member of the state legislature, and such member has served in the legislature five or more years, the salary which would have been received for the position from which the leave of absence was taken shall be considered as compensation earnable if the employee's contribution thereon is paid by the employee. In addition, where a member has been a member of the state legislature for five or more years, earnable compensation for the member's two highest compensated consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to exceed thirty-six hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive years, regardless of whether or not legislative service was rendered during those two years.

(d) For members employed less than full time under written contract with a school district, or community college district, in an instructional position, for which the member receives service credit of less than one year in all of the years used to determine the earnable compensation used for computing benefits due under RCW 41.32.497 (as recodified by this act), 41.32.498 (as recodified by this act), and 41.32.520 (as recodified by this act), the member may elect to have earnable compensation defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345 (as recodified by this act). For the purposes of this subsection, the term "instructional position" means a position in which more than seventy-five percent of the member's time is spent as a classroom instructor (including office hours), a librarian, a psychologist, a social worker, a nurse, a physical therapist, an occupational therapist, a speech language pathologist or audiologist, or a counselor. Earnable compensation shall be so defined only for the purpose of the calculation of retirement benefits and only as necessary to insure that members who receive fractional service credit under RCW 41.32.270 (as recodified by this act) receive benefits proportional to those received by members who have received full-time service credit.

(e) "Earnable compensation" does not include:

(i) Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;

(ii) Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of two hundred forty hours as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041.

(14) "Employed" or "employee" means a person who is providing services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(15) "Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district, or any agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an employer. The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an employer, but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an employer under this chapter.

(16) "Fiscal year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June 30th of the following year.

(17) "Former state fund" means the state retirement fund in operation for teachers under chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.

(18) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

(19) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a postretirement adjustment.

(20) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(21) "Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than sixty percent of index A.

(22) "Local fund" means any of the local retirement funds for teachers operated in any school district in accordance with the provisions of chapter 163, Laws of 1917 as amended.

(23) "Member" means any teacher included in the membership of the retirement system who has not been removed from membership under RCW 41.32.878 or 41.32.768. Also, any other employee of the public schools who, on July 1, 1947, had not elected to be exempt from membership and who, prior to that date, had by an authorized payroll deduction, contributed to the member reserve.

(24) "Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined contribution portion of plan 3.

(25) "Member reserve" means the fund in which all of the accumulated contributions of members are held.

(26) "Membership service" means service rendered subsequent to the first day of eligibility of a person to membership in the retirement system: PROVIDED, That where a member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service is rendered.

(27) "Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from the pension reserve.

(28) "Pension reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an actuarial reserve adequate to meet present and future pension liabilities of the system and from which all pension obligations are to be paid.

(29) "Prior service" means service rendered prior to the first date of eligibility to membership in the retirement system for which credit is allowable.

(30) "Prior service contributions" means contributions made by a member to secure credit for prior service.

(31) "Public school" means any institution or activity operated by the state of Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof employing teachers, except the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(32) "Regular contributions" means the amounts required to be deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to the member's individual account in the member reserve.

(33) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(34) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer while a member.

(35) "Retirement allowance" means monthly payments based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional benefits payable in lieu thereof.

(36) "Retirement system" means the Washington state teachers' retirement system.

(37) "Separation from service or employment" occurs when a person has terminated all employment with an employer. Separation from service or employment does not occur, and if claimed by an employer or employee may be a violation of RCW 41.32.055, when an employee and employer have a written or oral agreement to resume employment with the same employer following termination. Mere expressions or inquiries about postretirement employment by an employer or employee that do not constitute a commitment to reemploy the employee after retirement are not an agreement under this section.

(38) "Service" means the time during which a member has been employed by an employer for compensation.

(a) If a member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service is rendered.

(b) As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470 (as recodified by this act).

(c) As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470 (as recodified by this act).

(39) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(40) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(41) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(42) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.

(43) "Substitute teacher" means:

(a) A teacher who is hired by an employer to work as a temporary teacher, except for teachers who are annual contract employees of an employer and are guaranteed a minimum number of hours; or

(b) Teachers who either (i) work in ineligible positions for more than one employer or (ii) work in an ineligible position or positions together with an eligible position.

(44) "Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged by a public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory capacity. The term includes state, educational service district, and school district superintendents and their assistants and all employees certificated by the superintendent of public instruction; and in addition thereto any full time school doctor who is employed by a public school and renders service of an instructional or educational nature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223. For the purposes of this chapter, the terms spouse, marriage, marital, husband, wife, widow, widower, next of kin, and family shall be interpreted as applying equally to state registered domestic partnerships or individuals in state registered domestic partnerships as well as to marital relationships and married persons, and references to dissolution of marriage shall apply equally to state registered domestic partnerships that have been terminated, dissolved, or invalidated, to the extent that such interpretation does not conflict with federal law. Where necessary to implement chapter 521, Laws of 2009, gender-specific terms such as husband and wife used in any statute, rule, or other law shall be construed to be gender neutral, and applicable to individuals in state registered domestic partnerships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224. Substitute teachers may apply to the department to receive service credit or credit for earnable compensation or both after the end of the last day of instruction of the school year during which the service was performed.

(1) The application must:

(a) Include a list of the employers the substitute teacher has worked for;

(b) Include proof of hours worked and compensation earned; and

(c) Be made prior to retirement.

(2) If the department accepts the substitute teacher's application for service credit, the substitute teacher may obtain service credit by paying the required contribution to the retirement system. The employer must pay the required employer contribution upon notice from the department that the substitute teacher has made contributions under this section.

(3) The department shall charge interest prospectively on employee contributions that are submitted under this section more than six months after the end of the school year, for which the substitute teacher is seeking service credit. The interest rate charged to the employee shall take into account interest lost on employer contributions delayed for more than six months after the end of the school year.

(4) Each employer shall quarterly notify each substitute teacher it has employed during the school year of the number of hours worked by, and the compensation paid to, the substitute teacher.

(5) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

(6) If a substitute teacher as defined in section 222 of this act applies to the department under this section for credit for earnable compensation earned from an employer the substitute teacher must make contributions for all periods of service for that employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225. The department is empowered within the limits of this chapter and, with regard to restoration of service credit under RCW 41.50.165(2), to decide on all questions of eligibility covering membership, service credit, and benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226. (1) Any teacher, as defined under section 222 of this act, who is first employed by a public school on or after June 7, 1984, shall become a member of the retirement system if otherwise eligible.

(2) Any person who before June 7, 1984, has established service credit under chapter 41.40 RCW while employed in an educational staff associate position and who is employed in such a position on or after June 7, 1984, has the following options:

(a) To remain a member of the public employees' retirement system notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 41.32.240 (as recodified by this act) or 41.32.780; or

(b) To irrevocably elect to join the retirement system under this chapter and to receive service credit for previous periods of employment in any position included under section 222 of this act. This service credit and corresponding employee contribution shall be computed as though the person had then been a member of the retirement system under this chapter. All employee contributions credited to a member under chapter 41.40 RCW for service now to be credited to the retirement system under this chapter shall be transferred to the system and the member shall not receive any credit nor enjoy any rights under chapter 41.40 RCW for those periods of service. The member shall pay any difference between the employee contributions made under chapter 41.40 RCW and transferred under this subsection and what would have been required under this chapter, including interest as set by the director. The member shall be given until July 1, 1989, to make the irrevocable election permitted under this section. The election shall be made by submitting written notification as required by the department requesting credit under this section and by remitting any necessary proof of service or payments within the time set by the department.

Any person, not employed as an educational staff associate on June 7, 1984, may, before June 30 of the fifth school year after that person's return to employment as a teacher, request and establish membership and credit under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227. This section designates charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW as employers and charter school employees as members, and applies only if the department of retirement systems receives determinations from the internal revenue service and the United States department of labor that participation does not jeopardize the status of these retirement systems as governmental plans under the federal employees' retirement income security act and the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228. The deductions from salaries of members of the retirement system for their contributions to the system are not considered diminution of pay and every member is conclusively presumed to consent thereto as a condition of employment. All contributions to the member reserve shall be credited to the individual for whose account the deductions from salary were made. Regular interest shall be credited to each member's account at least annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229. A retired teacher upon returning to service in the public schools of Washington may elect to again become a member of the retirement system: PROVIDED, That if such a retired teacher elects to be restored to membership he or she must establish two full years of service credit before he or she will be eligible to retire under the provision of a formula other than the one in effect at the time of his or her previous retirement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where any such right to again retire is exercised to become effective before a member has established two full years of service credit he or she may elect to retire only under the provisions of the formula in effect at the time of his or her previous retirement: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not apply to any individual who has returned to service as of September 27, 1973.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230. (1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right of a person to a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance, or disability allowance, to the return of contributions, any optional benefit or death benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter and the moneys in the various funds created by this chapter shall be unassignable, and are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal or other local tax, and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other process of law whatsoever whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned.

(2) This section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance who is eligible:

(a) Under RCW 41.05.080 from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of the state of Washington or its political subdivisions;

(b) Under a group health care benefit plan approved pursuant to RCW 28A.400.350 or 41.05.065 from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom, of the amount or amounts of subscription payments, premiums, or contributions to any person, firm, or corporation furnishing or providing medical, surgical, and hospital care or other health care insurance; or

(c) Under this system from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom for payment of dues and other membership fees to any retirement association composed of retired teachers and/or public employees pursuant to a written agreement between the director and the retirement association.

Deductions under (a) and (b) of this subsection shall be made in accordance with rules that may be adopted by the director.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 231. (1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or organization as the member has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If no such designated person or persons are still living at the time of the member's death, the member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal representatives.

(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of employment; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 232. A member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under RCW 41.32.540 (as recodified by this act), 41.32.550 (as recodified by this act), 41.32.790, or 41.32.880 if the disability is the result of criminal conduct by the member committed after April 21, 1997.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 233. (1) Any person who shall knowingly make false statements or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of the retirement system, except under subsection (2) of this section, in any attempt to defraud such system as a result of such act, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Any person who shall knowingly make false statements or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of the retirement systems related to a member's separation from service and qualification for a retirement allowance under RCW 41.32.480 (as recodified by this act) in any attempt to defraud that system as a result of such an act, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 234. RCW 43.01.044 shall not result in any increase in retirement benefits. The rights extended to state officers and employees under RCW 43.01.044 are not intended to and shall not have any effect on retirement benefits under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 235. (1) The annual compensation taken into account in calculating retiree benefits under this system shall not exceed the limits imposed by section 401(a)(17) of the federal internal revenue code for qualified trusts.

(2) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 236. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, persons who fail to:

(1) Establish allowable membership service not previously credited;

(2) Restore all or a part of that previously credited membership service represented by withdrawn contributions; or

(3) Restore service credit represented by a lump sum payment in lieu of benefits, before the deadline established by statute, may do so under the conditions set forth in RCW 41.50.165.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 237. Those members subject to this chapter who became disabled in the line of duty and who received or are receiving benefits under Title 51 RCW or a similar federal workers' compensation program shall receive or continue to receive service credit subject to the following:

(1) No member may receive more than one month's service credit in a calendar month.

(2) No service credit under this section may be allowed after a member separates or is separated without leave of absence.

(3) Employer contributions shall be paid by the employer at the rate in effect for the period of the service credited.

(4) Employee contributions shall be collected by the employer and paid to the department at the rate in effect for the period of service credited.

(5) Contributions shall be based on the regular compensation which the member would have received had the disability not occurred. If contribution payments are made retroactively, interest shall be charged at the rate set by the director on both employee and employer contributions. Service credit shall not be granted until the employee contribution has been paid.

(6) The service and compensation credit shall not be granted for a period to exceed twenty-four consecutive months.

(7) Should the legislature revoke the service credit authorized under this section or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled to receive the credit as a matter of contractual right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 238. A member who has not purchased service credit under the provisions of RCW 41.32.813 or 41.32.868 may elect under this section to apply service credit earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools solely for the purpose of determining the time at which the member may retire. The benefit shall be actuarially reduced to recognize the difference between the age a member would have first been able to retire based on service in the state of Washington and the member's retirement age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 239. (1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 41.32.480 (as recodified by this act), 41.32.765, or 41.32.875 may, at the time of filing a written application for retirement with the department, apply to the department to make a one-time purchase of up to five years of additional service credit.

(2) To purchase additional service credit under this section, a member shall pay the actuarial equivalent value of the resulting increase in the member's benefit.

(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing additional service credit under this section may pay all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover, direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

(4) Additional service credit purchased under this section is not membership service and shall be used exclusively to provide the member with a monthly annuity that is paid in addition to the member's retirement allowance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 240. A member may purchase additional benefits subject to the following:

(1) The member shall pay all reasonable administrative and clerical costs; and

(2) The member shall make a member reserve contribution to be actuarially converted to a monthly benefit at the time of retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 241. (1) The state investment board has the full power to invest, reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money in the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan fund.

All investment and operating costs of the state investment board and the state treasurer associated with these funds shall be paid under RCW 43.08.190, 43.33A.160, 43.79A.040, and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, the earnings from the investment of the funds shall be retained by the funds.

(2) All investments made by the state investment board shall be made with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care under RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policy established by the state investment board.

(3) As deemed appropriate by the state investment board, money in the funds may be commingled for investment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 242. A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW under the subchapter heading "Plan 1" to read as follows:

(1) The assets of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement fund transferred to the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan fund by RCW 41.50.075 shall fund the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 lump sum defined benefit created by this section.

(2) Law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 1 active members, term-vested members, retirees, and survivors eligible for benefits under the plan 1 provisions of this chapter on the effective date of this section shall be eligible to receive the plan 1 lump sum defined benefit pursuant to the conditions established in this section.

(3) The lump sum defined benefit is $20,000 per member or survivor, payable on January 3, 2022, or the member's retirement date, whichever is later. In the case of multiple survivor beneficiaries, the lump sum defined benefit shall be divided equally.

(4) If a member is active or term-vested, interest on the lump sum defined benefit as determined by the director of retirement systems shall accumulate from January 3, 2022, until distribution to the participant upon retirement from service or for disability. For the purposes of this section, a "term-vested member" is a member who has rendered five years of service, has not withdrawn his or her member contributions, and who has not applied for retirement.

(5) If a member dies after the effective date of this section but before distribution of the lump sum defined benefit created in this section occurs, the distribution shall be made according to the member's beneficiary designation under this chapter.

(6) The lump sum defined benefit created in this section is subject to RCW 41.26.053.

(7) If section 203 of this act is held to be invalid, recipients of the lump sum defined benefit provided by this section shall no longer be entitled to this benefit and shall be required to return any funds received according to the provisions of RCW 41.50.135, 41.50.136, 41.50.137, and 41.50.138.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. A new section is added to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The merger of the assets, liabilities, and membership of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 in section 203 of this act may not impact benefits for members of these plans. Specifically, each member of each of these plans is entitled to receive benefits immediately after the merger on the effective date of this section that are equal to the benefits the member would have been entitled to receive immediately before the merger in accordance with plan terms. If the director determines that any provision of this act directly impacts benefits for members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 or benefits for members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, then the department is instructed to administer this act in a way that neither reduces, nor grants additional benefits, for members of those plans. The department may also conduct rule making for this purpose as provided in RCW 41.50.050.

(2) The department must submit a request for both a private letter ruling and a determination letter from the federal internal revenue service indicating the qualified status of the merged plan that results from the merger of assets, liabilities, and membership in section 203 of this act.

Sec. 302. RCW 41.50.110 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 951 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in chapters 2.10, 2.12, 28B.10, 41.26, 41.32, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 43.43, and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems expense fund.

(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and report to each employer, as defined in RCW 28B.10.400, 41.26.030, 41.32.010, section 206 of this act, section 232 of this act, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional share of the entire expense of the administration of the retirement system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium or fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's members bears to the total salaries of all members in the entire system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.

(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined in RCW 28B.10.400, 41.26.030, 41.32.010, section 206 of this act, section 232 of this act, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of each month for the amount due for that month to the department of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be made on a percentage rate of salary established by the department. However, the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.

(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs or savings in administering the department.

(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the retirement system expense fund.

(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.

(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.

(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(4) shall be paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(7) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the department of retirement systems' expense fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, state contributions to the judicial retirement system may be made in part by appropriations from the department of retirement systems expense fund.

Sec. 401. RCW 41.26.030 and 2020 c 107 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest credited thereon.

(2) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be available on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's future benefits during the period of retirement.

(3) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present monetary value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary value of future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among active and retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement, withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.

(4)(((a) "Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be computed and upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be based.

(b))) "Basic salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay. In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of having such member's basic salary be the greater of:

(((i)))(a) The basic salary the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature; or

(((ii)))(b) Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required because basic salary under (((b)(i)))(a) of this subsection is greater than basic salary under (((b)(ii) of)) this subsection (4)(b) shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions.

(5)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit described herein.

(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(6)(a) "Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically disabled as determined by the department, except a person who is disabled and in the full time care of a state institution, who is:

(i) A natural born child;

(ii) A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter;

(iii) A posthumous child;

(iv) A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter; or

(v) An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable under this chapter.

(b) A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of twenty years and eleven months while attending any high school, college, or vocational or other educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which it is located, including the summer vacation months and all other normal and regular vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which the child returns to school.

(7) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.

(8) "Director" means the director of the department.

(9) (("Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county disability board or the city disability board established in RCW 41.26.110.

(10) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability retirement. The definition contained in this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(11) "Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.

(12))) "Domestic partners" means two adults who have registered as domestic partners under RCW 26.60.020.

(((13)))(10) "Employee" means any law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in subsections (((17)))(14) and (((19)))(16) of this section.

(((14)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative authority of any city, town, county, district, or regional fire protection service authority or the elected officials of any municipal corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or firefighter, any authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of RCW 41.26.150, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the firefighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over 20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or firefighters as defined in this chapter.

(b)))(11)(a) "Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to the extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or firefighter:

(i) The legislative authority of any city, town, county, district, public corporation, or regional fire protection service authority established under RCW 35.21.730 to provide emergency medical services as defined in RCW 18.73.030;

(ii) The elected officials of any municipal corporation;

(iii) The governing body of any other general authority law enforcement agency;

(iv) A four-year institution of higher education having a fully operational fire department as of January 1, 1996; or

(v) The department of social and health services or the department of corrections when employing firefighters serving at a prison or civil commitment center on an island.

(((c)))(b) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an "employer." The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an "employer," but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an "employer" under this chapter.

(((15)(a) "Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed, computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of vesting.

(b)))(12)(a) "Final average salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly average of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty service credit months of service prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of final average salary.

(((c)))(b) In calculating final average salary under (((a) or (b) of)) this subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include:

(i) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer; and

(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or a local government employer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases.

(((16)))(13) "Fire department" includes a fire station operated by the department of social and health services or the department of corrections when employing firefighters serving a prison or civil commitment center on an island.

(((17)))(14) "Firefighter" means:

(a) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member of a fire department of an employer and who is serving in a position which requires passing a civil service examination for firefighter, and who is actively employed as such;

(b) Anyone who is actively employed as a full time firefighter where the fire department does not have a civil service examination;

(c) Supervisory firefighter personnel;

(d) ((Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire protection districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of this subsection (17)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;

(e) The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section), if such individual has five years previous membership in a retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (17)(e) shall not apply to plan 2 members;

(f))) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil service examination for firefighter;

(((g)))(e) Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW; and

(((h)))(f) Any person who is employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis by an employer as an emergency medical technician that meets the requirements of RCW 18.71.200 or 18.73.030(12), and whose duties include providing emergency medical services as defined in RCW 18.73.030.

(((18)))(15) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, but not including the Washington state patrol. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a limited authority law enforcement agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor and cannabis board, and the state department of corrections. A general authority law enforcement agency under this chapter does not include a government contractor.

(((19)))(16) "Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with the following qualifications:

(a) No person who is serving in a position that is basically clerical or secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be considered a law enforcement officer;

(b) Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a different title pursuant to county charter, who have successfully completed a civil service examination for deputy sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those persons serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;

(c) Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police department which have been specifically created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by city charter provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be considered city police officers;

(d) ((The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section) if that individual has five years previous membership in the retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (19)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members; and

(e))) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The provisions of this subsection (((19)(e)))(16)(d) shall not apply to any public safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(((20) "Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.

(a) Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own behalf, for

(i) Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is required by the attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii) Necessary hospital services, other than board and room, furnished by the hospital.

(b) Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered "other medical expenses," provided that they have not been considered as "hospital expenses".

(i) The fees of the following:

(A) A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;

(C) A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii) The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily resides in the member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member or the member's spouse.

(iii) The charges for the following medical services and supplies:

(A) Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;

(B) Diagnostic X-ray and laboratory examinations;

(C) X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D) Anesthesia and oxygen;

(E) Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F) Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G) Professional ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H) Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within ninety days after the accident;

(I) Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J) Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;

(K) Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;

(L) An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(21)))(17) "Member" means any firefighter, law enforcement officer, or other person as would apply under subsection (((17)))(14) or (((19)))(16) of this section whose membership is transferred to the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system on or after March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and firefighter who is employed in that capacity on or after such date.

(((22) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(23)))(18) "Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977.

(((24)))(19) "Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(((25)))(20) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(((26)))(21) "Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the retirement system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.

(((27)))(22) "Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system fund" as provided for ((herein))in this chapter.

(((28)))(23) "Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system" provided ((herein))in this chapter.

(((29)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of employment for an employer as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also include service in the armed forces of the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit shall be allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.

(i) For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also include (A) such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension act, and (B) such other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular member under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160, or 41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such prior act.

(ii) A member who is employed by two employers at the same time shall only be credited with service to one such employer for any month during which the member rendered such dual service.

(b)))(24) "Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for ninety or more hours per calendar month which shall constitute a service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours per calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for less than seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service credit month.

Members of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a state elective position may elect to continue to be members of this retirement system.

Service credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the total number of service credit months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a service credit year of service as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.

If a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during any calendar month, the individual shall receive one service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered; or one-half service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is rendered.

(((30)))(25) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(((31)))(26) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(((32)))(27) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(((33)))(28) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.

(((34)))(29) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member. "Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member except as provided in RCW 41.26.162 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 402. RCW 41.26.547 and 2007 c 304 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member of plan 2 who was a member of the public employees' retirement system while employed providing emergency medical services for a city, town, county, or district and whose job was relocated from another department of a city, town, county, or district to a fire department, or a member of the public employees' retirement system who is eligible for membership in plan 2 under RCW 41.26.030(((4)(h))), has the following options:

(a) Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or

(b) Leave any service credit earned as a member of the public employees' retirement system in the public employees' retirement system, and have all future service earned in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, becoming a dual member under the provisions of chapter 41.54 RCW; or

(c) Make an election no later than June 30, 2013, filed in writing with the department of retirement systems, to transfer service credit previously earned as an emergency medical technician for a city, town, county, or district in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2 to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.26.030. Service credit that a member elects to transfer from the public employees' retirement system to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under this section shall be transferred no earlier than five years after the effective date the member elects to transfer except under subsection (3) of this section, and only after the member earns five years of service credit as a firefighter following the effective date the member elects to transfer except under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) A member of plan 1 who was a member of the public employees' retirement system while employed providing emergency medical services for a city, town, county, or district and whose job was relocated from another department of a city, town, county, or district to a fire department has the following options:

(a) Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or

(b) Leave any service credit earned as a member of the public employees' retirement system in the public employees' retirement system, and have all future service earned in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system ((plan 1))tier 1 of the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan.

(3)(a) A member who elects to transfer service credit under subsection (1)(c) of this section shall make the payments required by this subsection prior to having service credit earned as an emergency medical technician for a city, town, county, or district under the public employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2 transferred to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2. However, in no event shall service credit be transferred earlier than five years after the effective date the member elects to transfer, or prior to the member earning five years of service credit as a firefighter following the effective date the member elects to transfer, except under (e) of this subsection.

(b) A member who elects to transfer service credit under this subsection shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the difference between the contributions the employee paid to the public employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2 and the contributions that would have been paid by the employee had the employee been a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, plus interest on this difference as determined by the director. This payment must be made no later than five years from the effective date of the election made under subsection (1)(c) of this section and must be made prior to retirement, except under (e) of this subsection.

(c) For a period of service transferred by a member eligible for membership in plan 2 under RCW 41.26.030(((4)(h))), the employer shall pay an amount sufficient to ensure that the contribution level to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system will not increase due to this transfer. This payment must be made within five years of the completion of the employee payment in (b) of this subsection.

(d) No earlier than five years after the effective date the member elects to transfer service credit under this section and upon completion of the payment required in (b) of this subsection except under (e) of this subsection, the department shall transfer from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2 to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2: (i) All of the employee's applicable accumulated contributions plus interest and an equal amount of employer contributions; and (ii) all applicable months of service, as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((14)(b))), credited to the employee under this chapter for service as an emergency services provider for a city, town, county, or district as though that service was rendered as a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.

(e) If a member who elected to transfer pursuant to this section dies or retires for disability prior to five years from their election date, the member's benefit is calculated as follows:

(i) All of the applicable service credit, accumulated contributions, and interest is transferred to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 and used in the calculation of a benefit.

(ii) If a member's obligation under (b) of this subsection has not been paid in full at the time of death or disability retirement, the member, or in the case of death the surviving spouse or eligible minor children, have the following options:

(A) Pay the bill in full;

(B) If a continuing monthly benefit is chosen, have the benefit actuarially reduced to reflect the amount of the unpaid obligation under (b) of this subsection; or

(C) Continue to make payment against the obligation under (b) of this subsection, provided that payment in full is made no later than five years from the member's original election date.

(f) Upon transfer of service credit, contributions, and interest under this subsection, the employee is permanently excluded from membership in the public employees' retirement system for all service transfers related to their time served as an emergency medical technician for a city, town, county, or district under the public employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2.

Sec. 403. RCW 41.32.005 and 1995 c 239 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 41.32.010 through 41.32.067 shall apply to members of ((plan 1,)) plan 2((,)) and plan 3.

Sec. 404. RCW 41.32.010 and 2018 c 257 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1)(a) "Accumulated contributions" for plan 1 members, means the sum of all regular annuity contributions and, except for the purpose of withdrawal at the time of retirement, any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2) with regular interest thereon.

(b) "Accumulated contributions" for plan 2 members, means the sum of all contributions standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest thereon.

(2) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of such mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by the director and regular interest.

(3) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(4) "Annual increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.

(5) "Annuity" means the moneys payable per year during life by reason of accumulated contributions of a member.

(6) "Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the member's average earnable compensation of the highest consecutive sixty service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW 41.32.810(2).

(7)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(8) "Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation between a member and an employer.

(9) "Creditable service" means membership service plus prior service for which credit is allowable. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(10) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.

(11) "Dependent" means receiving one-half or more of support from a member.

(12) "Director" means the director of the department.

(13) "Disability allowance" means monthly payments during disability. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(14)(a) "Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members, means:

(i) All salaries and wages paid by an employer to an employee member of the retirement system for personal services rendered during a fiscal year. In all cases where compensation includes maintenance the employer shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not paid in money.

(ii) For an employee member of the retirement system teaching in an extended school year program, two consecutive extended school years, as defined by the employer school district, may be used as the annual period for determining earnable compensation in lieu of the two fiscal years.

(((iii) "Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members also includes the following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be considered earnable compensation and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(B) If a leave of absence, without pay, is taken by a member for the purpose of serving as a member of the state legislature, and such member has served in the legislature five or more years, the salary which would have been received for the position from which the leave of absence was taken shall be considered as compensation earnable if the employee's contribution thereon is paid by the employee. In addition, where a member has been a member of the state legislature for five or more years, earnable compensation for the member's two highest compensated consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to exceed thirty-six hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive years, regardless of whether or not legislative service was rendered during those two years.

(iv) For members employed less than full time under written contract with a school district, or community college district, in an instructional position, for which the member receives service credit of less than one year in all of the years used to determine the earnable compensation used for computing benefits due under RCW 41.32.497, 41.32.498, and 41.32.520, the member may elect to have earnable compensation defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "instructional position" means a position in which more than seventy-five percent of the member's time is spent as a classroom instructor (including office hours), a librarian, a psychologist, a social worker, a nurse, a physical therapist, an occupational therapist, a speech language pathologist or audiologist, or a counselor. Earnable compensation shall be so defined only for the purpose of the calculation of retirement benefits and only as necessary to insure that members who receive fractional service credit under RCW 41.32.270 receive benefits proportional to those received by members who have received full-time service credit.

(v) "Earnable compensation" does not include:

(A) Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;

(B) Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of two hundred forty hours as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041.))

(b) "Earnable compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.

"Earnable compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following actual or imputed payments which, except in the case of (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a position or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be considered earnable compensation, to the extent provided above, and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of having such member's earnable compensation be the greater of:

(A) The earnable compensation the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature; or

(B) Such member's actual earnable compensation received for teaching and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions.

(c) In calculating earnable compensation under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include:

(i) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer; and

(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary reductions.

(15)(a) "Eligible position" for plan 2 members from June 7, 1990, through September 1, 1991, means a position which normally requires two or more uninterrupted months of creditable service during September through August of the following year.

(b) "Eligible position" for plan 2 and plan 3 on and after September 1, 1991, means a position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more months of at least seventy hours of earnable compensation during September through August of the following year.

(c) For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define "position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one position.

(d) The elected position of the superintendent of public instruction is an eligible position.

(16) "Employed" or "employee" means a person who is providing services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(17) "Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district, or any agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an employer. The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an employer, but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an employer under this chapter. For the purposes of retirement plan membership, this subsection includes tribal schools who have chosen to participate in the retirement system and satisfied the requirements of RCW 28A.715.010(7).

(18) "Fiscal year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June 30th of the following year.

(19) "Former state fund" means the state retirement fund in operation for teachers under chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.

(20) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

(21) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a postretirement adjustment.

(22) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(23) "Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than sixty percent of index A.

(24) "Local fund" means any of the local retirement funds for teachers operated in any school district in accordance with the provisions of chapter 163, Laws of 1917 as amended.

(25) "Member" means any teacher included in the membership of the retirement system who has not been removed from membership under RCW 41.32.878 or 41.32.768. Also, any other employee of the public schools who, on July 1, 1947, had not elected to be exempt from membership and who, prior to that date, had by an authorized payroll deduction, contributed to the member reserve.

(26) "Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined contribution portion of plan 3.

(27) "Member reserve" means the fund in which all of the accumulated contributions of members are held.

(28) (("Membership service" means service rendered subsequent to the first day of eligibility of a person to membership in the retirement system: PROVIDED, That where a member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service is rendered. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(29))) "Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from the pension reserve.

(((30)))(29) "Pension reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an actuarial reserve adequate to meet present and future pension liabilities of the system and from which all pension obligations are to be paid.

(((31) "Plan 1" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(32)))(30) "Plan 2" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977, and prior to July 1, 1996.

(((33)))(31) "Plan 3" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 3 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first become members of the system on and after July 1, 1996, or who transfer under RCW 41.32.817.

(((34) "Prior service" means service rendered prior to the first date of eligibility to membership in the retirement system for which credit is allowable. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(35) "Prior service contributions" means contributions made by a member to secure credit for prior service. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(36)))(32) "Public school" means any institution or activity operated by the state of Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof employing teachers, except the University of Washington and Washington State University. For the purposes of retirement plan membership, this subsection includes tribal schools who have chosen to participate in the retirement system and satisfied the requirements of RCW 28A.715.010(7).

(((37) "Regular contributions" means the amounts required to be deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to the member's individual account in the member reserve. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(38)))(33) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(((39)))(34) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer while a member.

(((40)(a) "Retirement allowance" for plan 1 members, means monthly payments based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional benefits payable in lieu thereof.

(b)))(35) "Retirement allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means monthly payments to a retiree or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(((41)))(36) "Retirement system" means the Washington state teachers' retirement system.

(((42)))(37) "Separation from service or employment" occurs when a person has terminated all employment with an employer. Separation from service or employment does not occur, and if claimed by an employer or employee may be a violation of RCW 41.32.055, when an employee and employer have a written or oral agreement to resume employment with the same employer following termination. Mere expressions or inquiries about postretirement employment by an employer or employee that do not constitute a commitment to reemploy the employee after retirement are not an agreement under this section.

(((43)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members means the time during which a member has been employed by an employer for compensation.

(i) If a member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service is rendered.

(ii) As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(iii) As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(b)))(38)(a) "Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which earnable compensation is earned subject to the following conditions:

(i) A member employed in an eligible position or as a substitute shall receive one service credit month for each month of September through August of the following year if he or she earns earnable compensation for eight hundred ten or more hours during that period and is employed during nine of those months, except that a member may not receive credit for any period prior to the member's employment in an eligible position except as provided in RCW 41.32.812 and 41.50.132.

(ii) Any other member employed in an eligible position or as a substitute who earns earnable compensation during the period from September through August shall receive service credit according to one of the following methods, whichever provides the most service credit to the member:

(A) If a member is employed either in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher for nine months of the twelve-month period between September through August of the following year but earns earnable compensation for less than eight hundred ten hours but for at least six hundred thirty hours, he or she will receive one-half of a service credit month for each month of the twelve-month period;

(B) If a member is employed in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher for at least five months of a six-month period between September through August of the following year and earns earnable compensation for six hundred thirty or more hours within the six-month period, he or she will receive a maximum of six service credit months for the school year, which shall be recorded as one service credit month for each month of the six-month period;

(C) All other members employed in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher shall receive service credit as follows:

(I) A service credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is earned for ninety or more hours;

(II) A half-service credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours; and

(III) A quarter-service credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is earned for less than seventy hours.

(iii) Any person who is a member of the teachers' retirement system and who is elected or appointed to a state elective position may continue to be a member of the retirement system and continue to receive a service credit month for each of the months in a state elective position by making the required member contributions.

(iv) When an individual is employed by two or more employers the individual shall only receive one month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered.

(v) As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470 (as recodified by this act). For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:

(A) Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(C) Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(D) More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter service credit month;

(E) Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit month.

(vi) As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470 (as recodified by this act).

(((vii)))(b) The department shall adopt rules implementing this subsection.

(((44)))(39) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(((45)))(40) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(((46)))(41) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(((47)))(42) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.

(((48)))(43) "Substitute teacher" means:

(a) A teacher who is hired by an employer to work as a temporary teacher, except for teachers who are annual contract employees of an employer and are guaranteed a minimum number of hours; or

(b) Teachers who either (i) work in ineligible positions for more than one employer or (ii) work in an ineligible position or positions together with an eligible position.

(((49)))(44) "Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged by a public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory capacity. The term includes state, educational service district, and school district superintendents and their assistants and all employees certificated by the superintendent of public instruction; and in addition thereto any full time school doctor who is employed by a public school and renders service of an instructional or educational nature.

Sec. 501. RCW 41.45.010 and 2009 c 561 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature to provide a dependable and systematic process for funding the benefits provided to members and retirees of the public employees' retirement system, chapter 41.40 RCW; the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW; the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement systems, chapter 41.26 RCW; the school employees' retirement system, chapter 41.35 RCW; the public safety employees' retirement system, chapter 41.37 RCW; and the Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter 43.43 RCW.

The funding process established by this chapter is intended to achieve the following goals:

(1) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2, and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 as provided by law;

(2) ((To fully amortize the total costs of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, not later than June 30, 2024;

(3))) To fully amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the ((teachers'))merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement ((system)) plan ((1)) within a rolling ten-year period, using methods and assumptions that balance needs for increased benefit security, decreased contribution rate volatility, and affordability of pension contribution rates;

(((4)))(3) To establish long-term employer contribution rates which will remain a relatively predictable proportion of the future state budgets; and

(((5)))(4) To fund, to the extent feasible, all benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working lives of those members so that the cost of those benefits are paid by the taxpayers who receive the benefit of those members' service.

Sec. 502. RCW 41.45.020 and 2006 c 365 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Council" means the pension funding council created in RCW 41.45.100.

(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3)(a) "Law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1" ((and "law))means the benefits and funding provisions for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 benefit tier in chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act).

(b) "Law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2" means the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.26 RCW.

(4) "Public employees' retirement system plan 1," "public employees' retirement system plan 2," and "public employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.40 RCW.

(5)(a) "Teachers' retirement system plan 1((,))" (("teachers'))means the benefits and funding provisions for the teachers' retirement system plan 1 benefit tier in chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act).

(b) "Teachers' retirement system plan 2," and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.

(6) "School employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.35 RCW.

(7) "Washington state patrol retirement system" means the retirement benefits provided under chapter 43.43 RCW.

(8) "Unfunded liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of a retirement system.

(9) "Actuary" or "state actuary" means the state actuary employed under chapter 44.44 RCW.

(10) "State retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030.

(11) "Classified employee" means a member of the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(12) "Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as defined in RCW 41.32.010(((15)))(25).

(13) "Select committee" means the select committee on pension policy created in RCW 41.04.276.

(14) "Actuarial value of assets" means the value of pension plan investments and other property used by the actuary for the purpose of an actuarial valuation.

(15) "Public safety employees' retirement system plan 2" means the benefits and funding provisions established under chapter 41.37 RCW.

(16) "Normal cost" means the portion of the actuarial present value of projected benefits and expenses that is allocated to a period, typically twelve months, under the actuarial cost method.

Sec. 503. RCW 41.45.035 and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 922 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2001, the following long-term economic assumptions shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW 41.45.030:

(a) The growth in inflation assumption shall be 3.5 percent;

(b) The growth in salaries assumption, exclusive of merit or longevity increases, shall be 4.5 percent;

(c) The investment rate of return assumption shall be 8 percent;

(d) The growth in system membership assumption shall be 1.25 percent for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2. The assumption shall be .90 percent for the teachers' retirement system and the teachers' retirement systems plan 1 benefit tier of the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan; and

(e) From July 1, 2016, until July 1, 2017, the growth in system membership for the teachers' retirement system and the teachers' retirement systems plan 1 benefit tier of the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan shall be 1.25 percent. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this growth rate assumption in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2009, the growth in salaries assumption for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the teachers' retirement systems plan 1 benefit tier of the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan, the school employees' retirement system, plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, and the Washington state patrol retirement system, exclusive of merit or longevity increases, shall be the sum of:

(a) The growth in inflation assumption in subsection (1)(a) of this section; and

(b) The productivity growth assumption of 0.5 percent.

(3) The following investment rate of return assumptions for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, ((plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'))the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement ((system))plan, and the Washington state patrol retirement system, shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW 41.45.030:

(a) Beginning July 1, 2013, the investment rate of return assumption shall be 7.9 percent.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, the investment rate of return assumption shall be 7.8 percent.

(c) Beginning July 1, 2017, the investment rate of return assumption shall be 7.7 percent.

(d) For valuation purposes, the state actuary shall only use the assumptions in (a) through (c) of this subsection after the effective date in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(e) By June 1, 2017, the state actuary shall submit to the council information regarding the experience and financial condition of each state retirement system, and make recommendations regarding the long-term investment rate of return assumptions set forth in this subsection. The council shall review this and such other information as it may require.

(4)(a) Beginning with actuarial studies done after July 1, 2003, changes to plan asset values that vary from the long-term investment rate of return assumption shall be recognized in the actuarial value of assets over a period that varies up to eight years depending on the magnitude of the deviation of each year's investment rate of return relative to the long-term rate of return assumption. Beginning with actuarial studies performed after July 1, 2004, the actuarial value of assets shall not be greater than one hundred thirty percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date or less than seventy percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date. Beginning April 1, 2004, the council, by affirmative vote of four councilmembers, may adopt changes to this asset value smoothing technique. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

(b) The state actuary shall periodically review the appropriateness of the asset smoothing method in this section and recommend changes to the council as necessary. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 504. RCW 41.45.050 and 2020 c 103 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Employers of members of the public employees' retirement system, the TRS 1 benefit tier of the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the Washington state patrol retirement system, and the higher education retirement plans shall make contributions to those systems and plans based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070.

(2) The state shall make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070. The state treasurer shall transfer the required contributions each month on the basis of salary data provided by the department.

(3) The department shall bill employers, and the state shall make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, using the combined rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 regardless of the level of appropriation provided in the biennial budget. Any member of an affected retirement system may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding, require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

(4) The contributions received for the public employees' retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining public employees' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(5) The contributions received for the teachers' retirement system shall be allocated between the plan 1 fund and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining teachers' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the plan 1 fund.

(6) The contributions received for the school employees' retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining school employees' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(7) The contributions received for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 shall be deposited in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 fund.

(8) The contributions received for the public safety employees' retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the plan 2 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the plan 2 fund. All remaining public safety employees' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(9) The contributions received for the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund shall be deposited in the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund and amounts received from each institution accounted for separately and shall only be used to make benefit payments to the beneficiaries of that institution's plan.

Sec. 505. RCW 41.45.060 and 2020 c 103 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state actuary shall provide preliminary actuarial valuation results based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035.

(2) Not later than July 31, 2008, and every two years thereafter, consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes to:

(a) ((A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1;

(b))) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system; and

(((c)))(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the school employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system for funding both those systems and the public employees' retirement system plan 1.

The council may adopt annual rate changes for any plan for any rate-setting period. The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:

(a) ((To fully amortize the total costs of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 not later than June 30, 2024;

(b))) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2, and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section; and

(((c)))(b) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the ((teachers' retirement system plan 1))merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan in accordance with RCW 41.45.070, 41.45.150, and this section.

(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate a combined plan 2 and 3 normal cost, a Washington state patrol retirement system normal cost, and a public safety employees' retirement system normal cost.

(5) A modified entry age normal cost method, as set forth in this chapter, shall be used to calculate employer contributions to the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the ((teachers' retirement system plan 1))merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan.

(6) The employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system and the school employees' retirement system shall equal the sum of:

(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3 normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus

(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus

(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.

(7) The employer contribution rate for the public safety employees' retirement system shall equal the sum of:

(a) The amount required to pay the normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus

(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus

(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.

(8) The employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system shall equal the sum of:

(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3 normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155 and the amounts in (b) and (c) of this subsection; plus

(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in ((plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system))the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus

(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.

(9) The employer contribution rate for each of the institutions of higher education for the higher education supplemental retirement benefits must be sufficient to fund, as a level percentage of pay, a portion of the projected cost of the supplemental retirement benefits for the institution beginning in 2035, with the other portion supported on a pay-as-you-go basis, either as direct payments by each institution to retirees, or as contributions to the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund. Contributions must continue until the council determines that the institution for higher education supplemental retirement benefit liabilities are satisfied.

(10) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the office of financial management and department of retirement systems of the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative modifications.

(11) The director shall collect those rates adopted by the council. The rates established in RCW 41.45.062, or by the council, shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

(12) The state actuary shall prepare final actuarial valuation results based on the economic assumptions, asset value smoothing technique, and contribution rates included in or adopted under RCW 41.45.030, 41.45.035, and this section.

Sec. 506. RCW 41.45.070 and 2009 c 561 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060 ((or 41.45.054)), the department shall also charge employers of public employees' retirement system, the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan, teachers' retirement system, school employees' retirement system, public safety employees' retirement system, or Washington state patrol retirement system members an additional supplemental rate to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of those systems. Except as provided in subsections (6), (7), and (9) of this section, the supplemental contribution rates required by this section shall be calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes additional benefits.

(2) In addition to the basic member, employer, and state contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.0604 for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, the department shall also establish supplemental rates to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, these supplemental rates shall be calculated by the actuary retained by the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' board and the state actuary through the process provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a) and the state treasurer shall transfer the additional required contributions regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes the additional benefits.

(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2009, the supplemental rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 ((and the teachers' retirement system plan 1)) shall be calculated as the level percentage of all system pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit over a fixed ten-year period, using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The supplemental rate to fund benefit increases provided to active members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in the public employees' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the public safety employees' retirement system.

(b) The supplemental rate to fund benefit increases provided to active members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 benefit tier of the retirement plan established in chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), shall be charged to all system employers in the teachers' retirement system.

(4) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active and retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2, the school employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, or the Washington state patrol retirement system shall be calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit, as calculated under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, 41.45.0631, or 41.45.067.

(5) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees. Beginning July 1, 2009, the supplemental rate charged under this section to fund increases in the automatic postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to fund the cost of the automatic adjustments over a fixed ten-year period, using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The supplemental rate to fund increases in the automatic postretirement adjustments for active members or retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in the public employees' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the public safety employees' retirement system. The supplemental rate to fund increases in automatic postretirement adjustments for active members or retired members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in the teachers' retirement system.

(6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of 1998.

(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW; section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341, Laws of 1998.

(8) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to members and survivors pursuant to chapter 94, Laws of 2006.

(9) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of the additional benefits granted to members of the teachers' retirement system and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in sections 2, 4, 6, and 8, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 until September 1, 2008. A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of the additional benefits granted to members of the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 under sections 9 and 10, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 until July 1, 2008.

Sec. 507. RCW 41.45.150 and 2011 c 362 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2015, maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of the employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010

2011

2012

2013

2014

2015

1.25%

1.25%

3.75%

4.50%

5.25%

6.00%

(2) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015, maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of the employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010

2011

2012

2013

2014

2015

1.25%

1.25%

3.75%

4.50%

5.25%

6.00%

(3) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015, maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of the employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements for the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010

2011

2012

2013

2014

2015

2.04%

2.04%

6.50%

7.50%

8.50%

9.50%

(4) Beginning July 1, 2015, and ending September 1, 2021, a minimum 3.50 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system equals one hundred percent of the actuarial accrued liability.

(5) Beginning September 1, 2015, and ending September 1, 2021, a minimum 3.50 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system equals one hundred percent of the actuarial accrued liability.

(6)(a) Beginning September 1, 2015, and ending August 31, 2021, a minimum 5.75 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system((,)). This rate is to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. ((This minimum contribution rate))

(b) Beginning September 1, 2021, a minimum contribution rate of 0.44 percent is established to amortize Plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009, and shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system equals one hundred percent of the actuarial accrued liability.

(7) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state actuary shall review the appropriateness of the minimum contribution rates and recommend to the council any adjustments as may be needed due to material changes in benefits or actuarial assumptions, methods, or experience. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 601. RCW 6.15.020 and 2011 c 162 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to ensure the well-being of its citizens by protecting retirement income to which they are or may become entitled. For that purpose generally and pursuant to the authority granted to the state of Washington under 11 U.S.C. Sec. 522(b)(2), the exemptions in this section relating to retirement benefits are provided.

(2) Unless otherwise provided by federal law, any money received by any citizen of the state of Washington as a pension from the government of the United States, whether the same be in the actual possession of such person or be deposited or loaned, shall be exempt from execution, attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever, and when a debtor dies, or absconds, and leaves his or her family any money exempted by this subsection, the same shall be exempt to the family as provided in this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law.

(3) The right of a person to a pension, annuity, or retirement allowance or disability allowance, or death benefits, or any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any citizen of the state of Washington under any employee benefit plan, and any fund created by such a plan or arrangement, shall be exempt from execution, attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever. This subsection shall not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW if otherwise permitted by federal law. This subsection shall permit benefits under any such plan or arrangement to be payable to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant in such plan to the extent expressly provided for in a qualified domestic relations order that meets the requirements for such orders under the plan, or, in the case of benefits payable under a plan described in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 403(b) or 408 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction that provides for maintenance or support. This subsection does not prohibit actions against an employee benefit plan, or fund for valid obligations incurred by the plan or fund for the benefit of the plan or fund.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the term "employee benefit plan" means any plan or arrangement that is described in RCW 49.64.020, including any Keogh plan, whether funded by a trust or by an annuity contract, and in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a) or 403(a) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended; or that is a tax-sheltered annuity or a custodial account described in section 403(b) of such code or an individual retirement account or an individual retirement annuity described in section 408 of such code; or a Roth individual retirement account described in section 408A of such code; or a medical savings account or a health savings account described in sections 220 and 223, respectively, of such code; or a retirement bond described in section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984. The term "employee benefit plan" shall not include any employee benefit plan that is established or maintained for its employees by the government of the United States, by the state of Washington under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW or RCW 41.50.770, or by any agency or instrumentality of the government of the United States.

(5) An employee benefit plan shall be deemed to be a spendthrift trust, regardless of the source of funds, the relationship between the trustee or custodian of the plan and the beneficiary, or the ability of the debtor to withdraw or borrow or otherwise become entitled to benefits from the plan before retirement. This subsection shall not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law. This subsection shall permit benefits under any such plan or arrangement to be payable to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant in such plan to the extent expressly provided for in a qualified domestic relations order that meets the requirements for such orders under the plan, or, in the case of benefits payable under a plan described in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 403(b) or 408 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction that provides for maintenance or support.

(6) Unless prohibited by federal law, nothing contained in subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section shall be construed as a termination or limitation of a spouse's community property interest in an employee benefit plan held in the name of or on account of the other spouse, who is the participant or the account holder spouse. Unless prohibited by applicable federal law, at the death of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse, the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse may transfer or distribute the community property interest of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse in the participant or account holder spouse's employee benefit plan to the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's estate, testamentary trust, inter vivos trust, or other successor or successors pursuant to the last will of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse or the law of intestate succession, and that distributee may, but shall not be required to, obtain an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, including a nonjudicial binding agreement or order entered under chapter 11.96A RCW, to confirm the distribution. For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, the distributee of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's community property interest in an employee benefit plan shall be considered a person entitled to the full protection of subsection (3) of this section. The nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's consent to a beneficiary designation by the participant or account holder spouse with respect to an employee benefit plan shall not, absent clear and convincing evidence to the contrary, be deemed a release, gift, relinquishment, termination, limitation, or transfer of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's community property interest in an employee benefit plan. For purposes of this subsection, the term "nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse" means the spouse of the person who is a participant in an employee benefit plan or in whose name an individual retirement account is maintained. As used in this subsection, an order of a court of competent jurisdiction entered under chapter 11.96A RCW includes an agreement, as that term is used under RCW 11.96A.220.

Sec. 602. RCW 28A.150.410 and 2018 c 266 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Through the 2017-18 school year, the legislature shall establish for each school year in the appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW 28A.150.260. For the purposes of this section, the staff allocations for classroom teachers, teacher-librarians, guidance counselors, and student health services staff under RCW 28A.150.260 are considered allocations for certificated instructional staff.

(2) Through the 2017-18 school year, salary allocations for state-funded basic education certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions, and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.

(3) Through the 2017-18 school year, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a master's degree; or

(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(4) Beginning in the 2007-08 school year and through the 2017-18 school year, the calculation of years of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, and psychologists regulated under Title 18 RCW may include experience in schools and other nonschool positions as occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, or psychologists. The calculation shall be that one year of service in a nonschool position counts as one year of service for purposes of this chapter, up to a limit of two years of nonschool service. Nonschool years of service included in calculations under this subsection shall not be applied to service credit totals for purposes of any retirement benefit under chapter 41.32, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.35, or 41.40 RCW, or any other state retirement system benefits.

(5) By the 2018-19 school year, the minimum state allocation for salaries for certificated instructional staff in the basic education program must be increased to provide a statewide average allocation of sixty-four thousand dollars adjusted for inflation from the 2017-18 school year.

(6) By the 2018-19 school year, the minimum state allocation for salaries for certificated administrative staff in the basic education program must be increased to provide a statewide average allocation of ninety-five thousand dollars adjusted for inflation from the 2017-18 school year.

(7) By the 2018-19 school year, the minimum state allocation for salaries for classified staff in the basic education program must be increased to provide a statewide average allocation of forty-five thousand nine hundred twelve dollars adjusted by inflation from the 2017-18 school year.

(8) For school year 2018-19, a district's minimum state allocation for salaries is the greater of the district's 2017-18 state salary allocation, adjusted for inflation, or the district's allocation based on the state salary level specified in subsections (5) through (7) of this section, and as further specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(9) Beginning with the 2018-19 school year, state allocations for salaries for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff must be adjusted for regional differences in the cost of hiring staff. Adjustments for regional differences must be specified in the omnibus appropriations act for each school year through at least school year 2022-23. For school years 2018-19 through school year 2022-23, the school district regionalization factors are based on the median single-family residential value of each school district and proximate school district median single-family residential value as described in RCW 28A.150.412.

(10) Beginning with the 2023-24 school year and every four years thereafter, the minimum state salary allocations and school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff must be reviewed and rebased, as provided under RCW 28A.150.412, to ensure that state salary allocations continue to align with staffing costs for the state's program of basic education.

(11) For the purposes of this section, "inflation" has the meaning provided in RCW 28A.400.205 for "inflationary adjustment index."

Sec. 603. RCW 28A.400.391 and 1993 c 386 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every group disability insurance policy, health care service contract, health maintenance agreement, and health and welfare benefit plan obtained or created to provide benefits to employees of school districts and their dependents shall contain provisions that permit retired and disabled employees to continue medical, dental, or vision coverage under the group policy, contract, agreement, or plan until September 30, 1993, or until the employee becomes eligible for federal medicare coverage, whichever occurs first. The terms and conditions for election and maintenance of such continued coverage shall conform to the standards established under the federal consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1985, as amended. The period of continued coverage provided under this section shall run concurrently with any period of coverage guaranteed under the federal consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1985, as amended.

(2) This section applies to:

(a) School district employees who retired or lost insurance coverage due to disability after July 28, 1991;

(b) School district employees who retired or lost insurance coverage due to disability within the eighteen-month period ending on July 28, 1991; and

(c) School district employees who retired or lost insurance coverage due to disability prior to January 28, 1990, and who were covered by their employing district's insurance plan on January 1, 1991.

(3) For the purposes of this section "retired employee" means an employee who separates from district service and is eligible at the time of separation from service to receive, immediately following separation from service, a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), or 41.40 RCW.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt administrative rules to implement this section.

Sec. 604. RCW 28A.625.150 and 1990 c 33 s 520 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of directors of any school district may establish a commendable employee service and recognition award program for certificated and classified school employees. The program shall be designed to recognize exemplary service, special achievements, or outstanding contributions by an individual in the performance of his or her duties as an employee of the school district. The board of directors of the school district shall determine the extent and type of any nonmonetary award. The value of any nonmonetary award shall not be deemed salary or compensation for the purposes of RCW 28A.400.200 or chapter 41.32 RCW or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act).

Sec. 605. RCW 28B.15.380 and 2019 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall exempt the following students from the payment of all tuition fees and services and activities fees:

(1) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 ((or)), 41.24 ((RCW)), or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire department in this state, or was a highway worker while either employed by a general contractor or subcontractor, on a transportation project or employed by a transportation agency: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the exemption only if they begin their course of study at a state-supported college or university within ten years of their graduation from high school; and

(2) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 ((or)), 41.24 ((RCW)), or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire department in this state, or was a highway worker while either employed by a general contractor or subcontractor, on a transportation project or employed by a transportation agency.

(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall report to the education data center on the annual cost of tuition fees and services and activities fees waived for surviving spouses and children under this section. The education data center shall consolidate the reports of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature.

(4) As used in this section, "transportation agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government in this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the construction and maintenance of the highways and roads within the state of Washington. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a transit agency having as one of its functions the highway maintenance, including but not limited to the state department of transportation. A transportation agency under this section does not include a government contractor.

Sec. 606. RCW 28B.15.520 and 2015 c 55 s 217 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the community and technical colleges:

(1) May waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and activities fees for students nineteen years of age or older who are eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 through 28B.15.015, who enroll in a course of study or program which will enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate, but who are not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405;

(2)(a) Shall waive all of tuition fees and services and activities fees for:

(i) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 ((or)), 41.24 RCW, or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this state: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the waiver only if they begin their course of study at a community or technical college within ten years of their graduation from high school; and

(ii) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 ((or)), 41.24 RCW, or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this state.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "totally disabled" means a person who has become totally and permanently disabled for life by bodily injury or disease, and is thereby prevented from performing any occupation or gainful pursuit.

(c) The governing boards of the community and technical colleges shall report to the state board for community and technical colleges on the annual cost of tuition fees and services and activities fees waived for surviving spouses and children under (a) of this subsection. The state board for community and technical colleges shall consolidate the reports of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature; and

(3) May waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential for:

(a) Nonresident students enrolled in a community or technical college course of study or program which will enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate but who are not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405. The waiver shall be in effect only for those courses which lead to a high school diploma or certificate; and

(b) Up to forty percent of the students enrolled in the regional education program for deaf students, subject to federal funding of such program.

Sec. 607. RCW 28B.50.874 and 2008 c 229 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

When the state system of community and technical colleges assumes administrative control of the vocational-technical institutes, personnel employed by the vocational-technical institutes shall:

(1) Suffer no reduction in compensation, benefits, seniority, or employment status. After September 1, 1991, classified employees shall continue to be covered by chapter 41.56 RCW and faculty members and administrators shall be covered by this chapter (( 28B.50 RCW));

(2) To the extent applicable to faculty members, any faculty currently employed on a "continuing contract" basis under RCW 28A.405.210 be awarded tenure pursuant to RCW 28B.50.851 through 28B.50.873, except for any faculty members who are provisional employees under RCW 28A.405.220;

(3) Be eligible to participate in the health care and other insurance plans provided by the health care authority and the public employees' benefits board pursuant to chapter 41.05 RCW;

(4) Be eligible to participate in old age annuities or retirement income plans under the rules of the state board for community and technical colleges pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400 or the teachers' retirement system plan 1 for personnel employed before July 1, 1977, or plan 2 for personnel employed after July 1, 1977, under chapter 41.32 RCW or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act); however, no affected vocational-technical institute employee shall be required to choose from among any available retirement plan options prior to six months after September 1, 1991;

(5) Have transferred to their new administrative college district all accrued sick and vacation leave and thereafter shall earn and use all such leave under the rule established pursuant to RCW 28B.50.551;

(6) Be eligible to participate in the deferred compensation plan and programs pursuant to RCW 41.05.123, 41.05.300 through 41.05.360, and 41.05.295 under the applicable rules.

An exclusive bargaining representative certified to represent a bargaining unit covering employees of a vocational technical institute on September 1, 1991, shall remain the exclusive representative of such employees thereafter until and unless such representative is replaced or decertified in accordance with state law.

Any collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 30, 1991, shall remain in effect as it applies to employees of vocational technical institutes until its expiration or renewal date or until renegotiated or renewed in accordance with chapter 28B.52 or 41.56 RCW. After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement, all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement, as it applies to employees of vocational-technical institutes, shall remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from the termination date stated in the agreement. The board of trustees and the employees may mutually agree to continue the terms and conditions of the agreement beyond the one year extension. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to deny any employee right granted under chapter 28B.52 or 41.56 RCW. Labor relations processes and agreements covering faculty members of vocational technical institutes after September 1, 1991, shall be governed by chapter 28B.52 RCW. Labor relations processes and agreements covering classified employees of vocational technical institutes after September 1, 1991, shall continue to be governed by chapter 41.56 RCW.

Sec. 608. RCW 35.21.935 and 2015 c 288 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any city or town may establish the position of warrant officer.

(2) If any city or town establishes the position of warrant officer, the position shall be maintained by the city or town within the city or town police department. The number and qualifications of warrant officers shall be fixed by ordinance and their compensation shall be paid by the city or town. The chief of police of the city or town must establish training requirements consistent with the job description of warrant officer established in that city or town. Training requirements must be approved by the criminal justice training commission.

(3) Warrant officers shall be vested only with the special authority identified in ordinance, which may include the authority to make arrests authorized by warrants and other authority related to service of civil and criminal process.

(4) Process issuing from any court that is directed to a police department in which a warrant officer position is maintained may be served or enforced by the warrant officer, if within the warrant officer's authority as identified in ordinance.

(5) Warrant officers shall not be entitled to death, disability, or retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.26 RCW or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act) on the basis of service as a warrant officer as described in this section.

Sec. 609. RCW 35A.21.380 and 2015 c 288 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any code city may establish the position of warrant officer.

(2) If any code city establishes the position of warrant officer, the position shall be maintained by the city within the city police department. The number and qualifications of warrant officers shall be fixed by ordinance, and their compensation shall be paid by the city. The chief of police of the city must establish training requirements consistent with the job description of warrant officer established in that city. Training requirements must be approved by the criminal justice training commission.

(3) Warrant officers shall be vested only with the special authority identified in ordinance, which may include the authority to make arrests authorized by warrants and other authority related to service of civil and criminal process.

(4) Process issuing from any court that is directed to a police department in which a warrant officer position is maintained may be served or enforced by the warrant officer, if within the warrant officer's authority as identified in ordinance.

(5) Warrant officers shall not be entitled to death, disability, or retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.26 RCW or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act) on the basis of service as a warrant officer as described in this section.

Sec. 610. RCW 41.04.205 and 2018 c 260 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 41.04.180, the employees, with their dependents, of any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state shall be eligible to participate in any insurance or self-insurance program for employees administered under chapter 41.05 RCW if the legislative authority of any such county, municipality, or other political subdivisions of this state determines, subject to collective bargaining under applicable statutes, a transfer to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under chapter 41.05 RCW should be made. In the event of a special district employee transfer pursuant to this section, members of the governing authority shall be eligible to be included in such transfer if such members are authorized by law as of June 25, 1976 to participate in the insurance program being transferred from and subject to payment by such members of all costs of insurance for members.

(2) When the legislative authority of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision determines to so transfer, the state health care authority shall:

(a) Establish the conditions for participation; and

(b) Have the sole right to reject the application, except a group application from a county or other political subdivision of the state with fewer than five thousand employees must be approved.

Approval of the application by the state health care authority shall effect a transfer of the employees involved to the insurance, self-insurance, or health care program applied for.

(3) Any application of this section to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26 ((RCW))or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act) is subject to chapter 41.56 RCW.

(4) Until December 31, 2019, school districts may voluntarily transfer to the public employees' benefits board, except that all eligible employees in a bargaining unit of a school district may transfer only as a unit and all nonrepresented employees in a district may transfer only as a unit.

Sec. 611. RCW 41.04.270 and 2006 c 309 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.28, 41.32, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW, on and after March 19, 1976, any member or former member who (a) receives a retirement allowance earned by the former member as deferred compensation from any public retirement system authorized by the general laws of this state, or (b) is eligible to receive a retirement allowance from any public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030, but chooses not to apply, or (c) is the beneficiary of a disability allowance from any public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030 shall be estopped from becoming a member of or accruing any contractual rights whatsoever in any other public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030: PROVIDED, That (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not apply to persons who have accumulated less than fifteen years service credit in any such system.

(2) Nothing in this section is intended to apply to any retirement system except those listed in RCW 41.50.030 and the city employee retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma, and Spokane. Subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply to a dual member as defined in RCW 41.54.010.

Sec. 612. RCW 41.04.350 and 1979 ex.s. c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no employee of the state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions or any institution supported in total or in part by the state or any of its political subdivisions, other than employees covered by chapters 41.26, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), and 43.43 RCW, shall be compelled to retire solely on the basis of age prior to attaining seventy years of age.

(2) All compulsory retirement provisions relating to public employees, other than employees covered by chapters 41.26, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), and 43.43 RCW, may be waived for individuals attaining seventy years of age by the individual's employer.

Sec. 613. RCW 41.04.393 and 2006 c 309 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Retirement benefits paid under chapter 41.26, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW to beneficiaries of public safety officers who die in the line of duty shall be paid in accordance with Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 101(h) as amended by the Fallen Hero Survivor Benefit Fairness Act of 2001.

Sec. 614. RCW 41.04.400 and 1984 c 184 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the purpose of RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 to govern the retirement rights of persons whose employment status is altered when: (1) Two or more units of local government of this state, at least one of which is a first-class city with its own retirement system, enter into an agreement for the consolidated performance of a governmental service, activity, or undertaking; (2) the service, activity, or undertaking is to be performed either by one of the participating local governmental units or by a newly established separate legal entity; and (3) the employees of the participating local governmental units are not all members of the same Washington public retirement system.

RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 are not intended to and do not govern retirement rights of any members of the retirement systems established by chapter 41.16, 41.18, 41.20, ((or)) 41.26, or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act) RCW, or of employees described in RCW 35.58.265, 35.58.390, or 70.08.070. To the extent there is any conflict between RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 and RCW 41.04.110, the provisions of RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 shall govern.

Sec. 615. RCW 41.04.440 and 2007 c 492 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The sole purpose of RCW 41.04.445 and 41.04.450 is to allow the members of the retirement systems created in chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, 41.34, and 43.43 RCW to enjoy the tax deferral benefits allowed under 26 U.S.C. 414(h). Chapter 227, Laws of 1984 does not alter in any manner the provisions of RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 which require that the member contribution rates shall be set so as to provide fifty percent of the cost of the respective retirement plans.

(2) Should the legislature revoke any benefit allowed under 26 U.S.C. 414(h), no affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such benefit as a matter of contractual right.

Sec. 616. RCW 41.04.445 and 2007 c 492 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section applies to all members who are:

(a) Judges under the retirement system established under chapter 2.10, 2.12, or 2.14 RCW;

(b) Employees of the state under the retirement system established by chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), chapter 41.32, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW;

(c) Employees of school districts under the retirement system established by chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), chapter 41.32, or 41.40 RCW, except for substitute teachers as defined by RCW 41.32.010;

(d) Employees of educational service districts under the retirement system established by chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), chapter 41.32, or 41.40 RCW; or

(e) Employees of community college districts under the retirement system established by chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), chapter 41.32, or 41.40 RCW.

(2) Only for compensation earned after the effective date of the implementation of this section and as provided by section 414(h) of the federal internal revenue code, the employer of all the members specified in subsection (1) of this section shall pick up only those member contributions as required under:

(a) RCW 2.10.090(1);

(b) RCW 2.12.060;

(c) RCW 2.14.090;

(d) RCW 41.32.263 (as recodified by this act);

(e) RCW 41.32.350 (as recodified by this act);

(f) RCW 41.40.330 (1) and (3);

(g) RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067;

(h) RCW 41.34.070; and

(i) ((RCW 43.43.300; and

(j))) RCW 41.34.040.

(3) Only for the purposes of federal income taxation, the gross income of the member shall be reduced by the amount of the contribution to the respective retirement system picked up by the employer.

(4) All member contributions to the respective retirement system picked up by the employer as provided by this section, plus the accrued interest earned thereon, shall be paid to the member upon the withdrawal of funds or lump sum payment of accumulated contributions as provided under the provisions of the retirement systems.

(5) At least forty-five days prior to implementing this section, the employer shall provide:

(a) A complete explanation of the effects of this section to all members; and

(b) Notification of such implementation to the director of the department of retirement systems.

Sec. 617. RCW 41.04.450 and 2007 c 492 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Employers of those members under chapters 41.26, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, and 41.40 RCW who are not specified in RCW 41.04.445 may choose to implement the employer pick up of all member contributions without exception under RCW ((41.26.080(1)(a),)) 41.26.450, 41.40.330(1), 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 and chapter 41.34 RCW. If the employer does so choose, the employer and members shall be subject to the conditions and limitations of RCW 41.04.445 (3), (4), and (5) and 41.04.455.

(2) An employer exercising the option under this section may later choose to withdraw from and/or reestablish the employer pick up of member contributions only once in a calendar year following forty-five days prior notice to the director of the department of retirement systems.

Sec. 618. RCW 41.04.803 and 2012 c 236 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Chapter 236, Laws of 2012 is curative and remedial and is applicable to any future determination of eligibility for membership in a retirement system under chapters 41.26, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, and 41.40 RCW.

(2) Chapter 236, Laws of 2012 does not apply to or contravene any prior final decision of the state supreme court regarding the interpretation of the statutes addressed in chapter 236, Laws of 2012.

Sec. 619. RCW 41.05.011 and 2019 c 411 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(2) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.055 and the school employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.740.

(3) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan whereby employees and school employees may pay for certain employment related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

(4) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(5) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in ((RCW 41.26.030))section 206 of this act, members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.

(6)(a) "Employee" for the public employees' benefits board program includes all employees of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature. Pursuant to contractual agreement with the authority, "employee" may also include: (i) Employees of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state and members of the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after February 20, 1970, if the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state submits application materials to the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (ii) employees of employee organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option of each such employee organization; (iii) through December 31, 2019, employees of a school district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350; (iv) employees of a tribal government, if the governing body of the tribal government seeks and receives the approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and (g); (v) employees of the Washington health benefit exchange if the governing board of the exchange established in RCW 43.71.020 seeks and receives approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (g) and (n); and (vi) through December 31, 2019, employees of a charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW. "Employee" does not include: Adult family home providers; unpaid volunteers; patients of state hospitals; inmates; employees of the Washington state convention and trade center as provided in RCW 41.05.110; students of institutions of higher education as determined by their institution; and any others not expressly defined as employees under this chapter or by the authority under this chapter.

(b) Effective January 1, 2020, "school employee" for the school employees' benefits board program includes:

(i) All employees of school districts and charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW;

(ii) Represented employees of educational service districts; and

(iii) Effective January 1, 2024, all employees of educational service districts.

(7) "Employee group" means employees of a similar employment type, such as administrative, represented classified, nonrepresented classified excluding such employees in educational service districts until December 31, 2023, confidential, represented certificated, or nonrepresented certificated excluding such employees in educational service districts until December 31, 2023, within a school employees' benefits board organization.

(8)(a) "Employer" for the public employees' benefits board program means the state of Washington.

(b) "Employer" for the school employees' benefits board program means school districts and educational service districts and charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW.

(9) "Employer group" means those counties, municipalities, political subdivisions, the Washington health benefit exchange, tribal governments, employee organizations representing state civil service employees, and through December 31, 2019, school districts, charter schools, and through December 31, 2023, educational service districts obtaining employee benefits through a contractual agreement with the authority to participate in benefit plans developed by the public employees' benefits board.

(10)(a) "Employing agency" for the public employees' benefits board program means a division, department, or separate agency of state government, including an institution of higher education; a county, municipality, or other political subdivision; and a tribal government covered by this chapter.

(b) "Employing agency" for the school employees' benefits board program means school districts, educational service districts, and charter schools.

(11) "Faculty" means an academic employee of an institution of higher education whose workload is not defined by work hours but whose appointment, workload, and duties directly serve the institution's academic mission, as determined under the authority of its enabling statutes, its governing body, and any applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(12) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees and school employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee or school employee contributions from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(13) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(14) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan whereby state and school employees may reduce their salary before taxes to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

(15) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction plan.

(16) "Plan year" means the time period established by the authority.

(17) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby public employees may pay their share of group health plan premiums with pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

(18) "Public employee" has the same meaning as employee and school employee.

(19) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:

(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 ((or)), 41.40 ((RCW)), or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act) as of September 30, 1993;

(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district, educational service district, or charter school on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, ((or)) 41.40 ((RCW)), or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act);

(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district, educational service district, or charter school due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, ((or)) 41.40 ((RCW)), or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act).

(20) "Salary" means a state or school employee's monthly salary or wages.

(21) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis to participate in the dependent care assistance program, medical flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

(22) "School employees' benefits board organization" means a public school district or educational service district or charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW that is required to participate in benefit plans provided by the school employees' benefits board.

(23) "School year" means school year as defined in RCW 28A.150.203(11).

(24) "Seasonal employee" means a state employee hired to work during a recurring, annual season with a duration of three months or more, and anticipated to return each season to perform similar work.

(25) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from employment with an employer as defined in:

(a) RCW 41.32.010(17) on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or

(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;

and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(33), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.

(26) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with state and federal funds by the department of social and health services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(27) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal government, that has government offices principally located in this state.

Sec. 620. RCW 41.05.320 and 2018 c 260 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Elected officials and permanent employees and school employees are eligible to participate in the salary reduction plan and reduce their salary by agreement with the authority. The authority may adopt rules to: (a) Limit the participation of employing agencies and their employees in the plan; and (b) permit participation in the plan by temporary employees and school employees.

(2) Persons eligible under subsection (1) of this section may enter into salary reduction agreements with the state.

(3)(a) An eligible person may become a participant of the salary reduction plan for a full plan year with annual benefit plan selection for each new plan year made before the beginning of the plan year, as determined by the authority, or upon becoming eligible.

(b) Once an eligible person elects to participate in the salary reduction plan and determines the amount his or her gross salary shall be reduced and the benefit plan for which the funds are to be used during the plan year, the agreement shall be irrevocable and may not be amended during the plan year except as provided in (c) of this subsection. Prior to making an election to participate in the salary reduction plan, the eligible person shall be informed in writing of all the benefits and reductions that will occur as a result of such election.

(c) The authority shall provide in the salary reduction plan that a participant may enroll, terminate, or change his or her election after the plan year has begun if there is a significant change in a participant's status, as provided by 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 and the regulations adopted under that section and defined by the authority.

(4) The authority shall establish as part of the salary reduction plan the procedures for and effect of withdrawal from the plan by reason of retirement, death, leave of absence, or termination of employment. To the extent possible under federal law, the authority shall protect participants from forfeiture of rights under the plan.

(5) Any reduction of salary under the salary reduction plan shall not reduce the reportable compensation for the purpose of computing the state retirement and pension benefits earned by the employee or school employee pursuant to chapters 41.26, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, and 43.43 RCW.

Sec. 621. RCW 41.16.145 and 2007 c 218 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The amount of all benefits payable under the provisions of RCW 41.16.080, 41.16.120, 41.16.130, 41.16.140 and 41.16.230 shall be increased annually as hereafter in this section provided. The local pension board shall meet subsequent to March 31st but prior to June 30th of each year for the purposes of adjusting benefit allowances payable pursuant to the aforementioned sections. The local board shall determine the increase in the consumer price index between January 1st and December 31st of the previous year and increase in dollar amount the benefits payable subsequent to July 1st of the year in which said board makes such determination by a dollar amount proportionate to the increase in the consumer price index: PROVIDED, That regardless of the change in the consumer price index, such increase shall be at least two percent each year such adjustment is made.

Each year effective with the July payment all benefits specified herein, shall be increased by this section. This benefit increase shall be paid monthly as part of the regular pension payment and shall be cumulative. The increased benefits authorized by this section shall not affect any benefit payable under the provisions of this chapter (( 41.16 RCW)) in which the benefit payment is attached to a current salary of the rank held at time of retirement. A beneficiary of benefit increases provided for pursuant to this section is hereby authorized to appeal a decision on such increases or the failure of the local pension board to order such increased benefits or the amount of such benefits to the ((Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system retirement board provided for in RCW 41.26.050))department.

For the purpose of this section the term "consumer price index" shall mean, for any calendar year, the consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.

Sec. 622. RCW 41.18.104 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 44 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The amount of all benefits payable under the provisions of RCW 41.18.040, 41.18.080, 41.18.100 and 41.18.200 as now or hereafter amended, shall be increased annually as hereafter in this section provided. The local pension board shall meet subsequent to March 31st but prior to June 30th of each year for the purpose of adjusting benefit allowances payable pursuant to the aforementioned sections. The local board shall determine the increase in the consumer price index between January 1st and December 31st of the previous year and increase in dollar amount the benefits payable subsequent to July 1st of the year in which said board makes such determination by a dollar amount proportionate to the increase in the consumer price index: PROVIDED, That regardless of the change in the consumer price index, such increase shall be at least two percent each year such adjustment is made.

Each year effective with the July payment all benefits specified herein, shall be increased as authorized by this section. This benefit increase shall be paid monthly as part of the regular pension payment and shall be cumulative. The increased benefits authorized by this section shall not affect any benefit payable under the provisions of this chapter (( 41.18 RCW)) in which the benefit payment is attached to a current salary of the rank held at time of retirement. A beneficiary of benefit increases provided for pursuant to this section is hereby authorized to appeal a decision on such increases or the failure of the local pension board to order such increased benefits or the amount of such benefits to the ((Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system retirement board provided for in RCW 41.26.050))department.

For the purpose of this section the term

"Consumer price index" shall mean, for any calendar year, the consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.

Sec. 623. RCW 41.20.175 and 2012 c 117 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

A former employee of a fire department of a city of the first class who (1) was a member of the firefighters' pension system created by chapter((s)) 41.16 or 41.18 RCW, and (2) is now employed within the police department of such city, will be regarded as having received membership service credit for such service to the fire department in the city's police and relief pension system at the time he or she recovers such service credit by paying withdrawn contributions to the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.26.030(((28)))(22) and section 206 of this act.

Sec. 624. RCW 41.24.400 and 2007 c 492 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any municipality may make provision by appropriate legislation and payment of fees required by RCW 41.24.030(1) solely for the purpose of enabling any reserve officer to enroll under the retirement pension provisions of this chapter or fees required under RCW 41.24.030(1) to pay for the costs of extending the relief provisions of this chapter to its reserve officers.

(2) A reserve officer is not eligible to receive a benefit under the retirement provisions of this chapter for service under chapter 41.26, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, or 41.40 RCW.

(3) Every municipality shall make provisions for the collection and payment of the fees required under this chapter, and shall continue to make provisions for all reserve officers who come under this chapter as long as they continue to be employed as reserve officers.

(4) Except as provided under RCW 41.24.450, a reserve officer is not eligible to receive a benefit under the relief provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 625. RCW 41.50.075 and 2020 c 103 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Two funds are hereby created and established in the state treasury to be known as the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement fund, and the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement fund which shall consist of all moneys paid into them in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW, whether such moneys take the form of cash, securities, or other assets. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, and the plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.

(b) Pursuant to the merger of assets and liabilities in section 203 of this act, the plan 1 fund in this subsection shall be closed and all moneys paid to the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan fund.

(2)(a) All of the assets of the Washington state teachers' retirement system shall be credited according to the purposes for which they are held, to two funds to be maintained in the state treasury, namely, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund and the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 2 and 3.

(b) Pursuant to the merger of assets and liabilities in section 203 of this act, the plan 1 fund in this subsection shall be closed and all moneys paid to the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan fund.

(3) There is hereby established in the state treasury two separate funds, namely the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3.

(4) There is hereby established in the state treasury the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the school employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3.

(5) There is hereby established in the state treasury the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2 fund. The plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2.

(6)(a)(i) There is hereby established in the state treasury the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund. The higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of each of the higher education retirement plans.

(ii) The fund in this subsection (6) was originally created under chapter 47, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981).

(b) The office of financial management must create individual accounts for each institution of higher education within the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund. For fiscal year 2021, the office of financial management must transfer all the assets of the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund into the individual accounts for each institution that will be used to manage the accounting for each benefit plan. The higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund will include all the amounts in the individual accounts created in this subsection.

(7) There is hereby established in the state treasury the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan fund. This fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan, including any funds transferred from the former plan 1 funds under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Sec. 626. RCW 43.84.092 and 2020 c 354 s 11, 2020 c 221 s 5, 2020 c 148 s 3, 2020 c 103 s 7, and 2020 c 18 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community ((trust))services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan fund, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, ((the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,)) the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, ((the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account,)) the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 627. RCW 43.84.092 and 2020 c 221 s 5, 2020 c 148 s 3, 2020 c 103 s 7, and 2020 c 18 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community ((trust))services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan fund, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, ((the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,)) the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, ((the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account,)) the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 628. RCW 41.33.020 and 2012 c 117 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

The terms and provisions of the plan are as follows:

(1) Each political subdivision of the state employing members of the teachers' retirement system and the members of the teachers' retirement system, after the approval of this plan by the legislature, and by the eligible employees through a referendum as provided in RCW 41.48.030 (3) and (4), shall be deemed to have accepted and agreed to be bound by the following terms and conditions in consideration of extension of the existing agreement between the secretary of health, education, and welfare and the governor to make the protection of the federal old age and survivors insurance program available and applicable to such employees.

(2) As used in this plan the terms quoted below shall have the meanings assigned thereto in this section.

"Political subdivision" means any political subdivision, or instrumentality of one or more subdivisions, or proprietary enterprise acquired, purchased or originated by one or more such subdivisions after December, 1950, which employs members of the teachers' retirement system. The state, its agencies, instrumentalities, and institutions of higher learning shall be grouped and considered as a single political subdivision.

"Employee" means any person who is a member of the teachers' retirement system and is employed by a political subdivision.

"Wages" shall have the meaning given in RCW 41.48.020(((1)))(6) and section 209 of the social security act (42 U.S.C.A. Sec. 409).

"State" where not otherwise clearly indicated by the context, means the commissioner of employment security or other officer designated by the governor to administer the plan at the state level for all participating political subdivisions.

(3) The terms and conditions of this plan are intended and shall be construed to be in conformity with the requirements of the federal social security act as amended and with the requirements of chapter 41.48 RCW, and particularly RCW 41.48.050, as amended by chapter 4, Laws of 1955 extraordinary session.

(4) The rights and benefits accruing to employees from membership in the teachers' retirement system shall in no way be altered or impaired by this plan or by the additional and supplementary OASI coverage which such employees may receive hereunder, other than the elimination of (1), (2) and (3) of section 52, chapter 80, Laws of 1947 and RCW 41.32.520 (as recodified by this act) as each are amended, with the exception of that part of (1) which permits a widow or widower without a child or children under age eighteen to receive a monthly payment of fifty dollars at age fifty, provided that the member had fifteen or more years of Washington membership service credit at date of death.

(5) There shall be no additional cost to or involvement of the state or a political subdivision with respect to OASI coverage of members of the teachers' retirement system until this plan has been approved by the legislature.

(6) Each employee to whom OASI coverage is made applicable under this plan pursuant to an extension or modification under RCW 41.48.030 of the existing agreement between the secretary of health, education, and welfare and the governor shall be required to pay into the OASI contribution account established by RCW 41.48.060 during the period of such coverage contributions with respect to his or her wages in an amount equal to the employee tax imposed by the federal insurance contributions act (section 3101, Internal Revenue Code of 1954), in consideration of the employee's retention in service by the political subdivision. The subdivision shall withhold such contributions from the wages paid to the employee; and shall remit the contributions so withheld in each calendar quarter to the state for deposit in the contribution account not later than the twentieth calendar day of the month following that quarter.

(7) Each political subdivision shall pay into the contribution account with respect to the wages of its employees during the period of their OASI coverage pursuant to this plan contributions in an amount equal to the employer tax imposed by the federal insurance contributions act (section 3111, Internal Revenue Code of 1954), from the fund of the subdivision from which such employees' wages are paid. The subdivision shall remit such contributions to the state for deposit in the contribution account on a quarterly basis, not later than the twentieth calendar day of the month following each calendar quarter.

(8) If any political subdivision other than that comprising the state, its agencies, instrumentalities, and institutions of higher learning fails to remit as provided herein employer contributions or employee contributions, or any part of either, such delinquent contributions may be recovered with interest at the rate of six percent per annum by action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the political subdivision; or such delinquent contributions may at the request of the governor be deducted from any moneys payable to such subdivision by the state.

(9) Each political subdivision shall be charged with a share of the cost of administration of this plan by the state, to be computed as that proportion of the overall cost of administration which its total annual contributions bear to the total annual contributions paid by all subdivisions on behalf of employees covered by the plan. The state shall compute the share of cost allocable to each subdivision and bill the subdivision therefor at the end of each fiscal year. The subdivision shall within ninety days thereafter remit its share of the cost to the state for deposit in the general fund of the state.

(10) Each political subdivision shall submit to the state, through the employment security department, P.O. Box 367, Olympia, Washington, or such other officer or agency as the governor may subsequently designate, on forms furnished by the state, not later than the twentieth calendar day of the month following the end of each calendar quarter, the following information:

A. The social security account number of each employee;

B. The name of each employee;

C. The amount of wages subject to contributions as required hereunder paid to each employee during the quarter;

D. The total amount of wages subject to contributions paid to all employees during the quarter;

E. The total amount of employee contributions withheld and remitted for the quarter; and

F. The total amount of employer contributions paid by the subdivision for the quarter.

(11) Each political subdivision shall furnish in the same manner as provided in subsection (10) of this section, upon reasonable notice, such other and further reports or information as the governor may from time to time require. Each subdivision shall comply with such requirements as the secretary of health, education, and welfare or the governor may from time to time establish with respect to any or all of the reports or information which are or may be provided for under subsection (10) of this section or this subsection in order to assure the correctness and verification thereof.

(12) The governing body of each political subdivision shall designate an officer of the subdivision to administer such accounting, reporting, and other functions as will be required for the effective operation of this plan within the subdivision, as provided herein. The commissioner of employment security or such other officer as the governor may designate, shall perform or supervise those functions with respect to employees of the subdivision comprising the state, its agencies, instrumentalities, and institutions of higher learning; and shall serve as the representative of the participating political subdivisions in the administration of this plan with the secretary of health, education, and welfare.

(13) The legislature shall designate the first day of any month beginning with January, 1956, as the effective date of OASI coverage for such employees, except that after January 1, 1958, the effective date may not be prior to the first day of the current year.

The employer's contribution for any retroactive coverage shall be transferred by the board of trustees from the teachers' retirement pension reserve to the official designated by the governor to administer the plan at the state level.

Each employee's contributions for any retroactive coverage shall be transferred by the board of trustees from his or her accumulated contributions in the teachers' retirement fund, to the official designated above. Each employee, if he or she so desires, may, within one year from the date of transfer, reimburse his or her accumulated contributions for the amount so transferred.

(14) The governor may terminate the operation of this plan in its entirety with respect to any political subdivision, in his or her discretion, if he or she finds that the subdivision has failed to comply substantially with any requirement or provision of this plan. The plan shall not be so terminated until reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing thereon have been given to the subdivision under such conditions, consistent with the provisions of the social security act, as shall have been established in regulations by the governor.

Sec. 629. RCW 41.35.010 and 2018 c 257 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest thereon.

(2) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be adopted by the director.

(3) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(4) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly installments.

(5)(a) "Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means the member's average compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2).

(b) In calculating average final compensation under (a) of this subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include any compensation forgone by a member during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary reductions.

(6) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(7) "Classified employee" means an employee of a school district or an educational service district who is not eligible for membership in the teachers' retirement system established under chapter 41.32 ((RCW))or 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act).

(8)(a) "Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States internal revenue code, but shall exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.

(b) "Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement, which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be considered compensation earnable to the extent provided in this subsection, and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;

(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the member shall have the option of having such member's compensation earnable be the greater of:

(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature; or

(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater than compensation earnable under this (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;

(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not arise.

(9) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.

(10) "Director" means the director of the department.

(11) "Eligible position" means any position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more months of service a year for which regular compensation for at least seventy hours is earned by the occupant thereof. For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define "position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one position.

(12) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(13) "Employer," for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means a school district, an educational service district, or tribal school that has chosen to participate in the retirement system and has satisfied the requirements of RCW 28A.715.010(7). Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an employer. The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an employer, but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an employer under this chapter.

(14) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.

(15) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

(16) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a postretirement adjustment.

(17) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(18) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (22) of this section.

(19) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being separated from membership.

(20) "Member" means any employee included in the membership of the retirement system, as provided for in RCW 41.35.030.

(21) "Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined contribution portion of plan 3.

(22) "Membership service" means all service rendered as a member.

(23) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly installments.

(24) "Plan 2" means the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the public employees' retirement system on and after October 1, 1977, and transferred to the Washington school employees' retirement system under RCW 41.40.750.

(25) "Plan 3" means the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on and after September 1, 2000, or who transfer from plan 2 under RCW 41.35.510.

(26) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(27) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer while a member.

(28) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.

(29) "Retirement allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means monthly payments to a retiree or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(30) "Retirement system" means the Washington school employees' retirement system provided for in this chapter.

(31) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated all employment with an employer.

(32) "Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means periods of employment by a member in an eligible position or positions for one or more employers for which compensation earnable is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any calendar month shall constitute one service credit month except as provided in RCW 41.35.180. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is not service.

Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.

(a) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be full-time service.

(b) A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered.

(c) For purposes of plan 2 and 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:

(i) Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(ii) Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(iii) Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(iv) More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter service credit month; and

(v) Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit month.

(33) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one.

(34) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(35) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(36) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.

(37) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(38) "Substitute employee" means a classified employee who is employed by an employer exclusively as a substitute for an absent employee.

Sec. 630. RCW 41.45.203 and 2007 c 492 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The required employer contribution rate in support of teachers' retirement system members employed as supreme court justices, court of appeals judges, and superior court judges who elect to participate under RCW 41.32.584(1) (as recodified by this act), or who are newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall equal the teachers' retirement system employer contribution rate established under this chapter.

(2) The required contribution rate for members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 employed as supreme court justices, court of appeals judges, and superior court judges who elect to participate under RCW 41.32.584(1) (as recodified by this act), or who are newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall be the deductions established under RCW 41.50.235 plus three and seventy-six one-hundredths percent of pay.

Sec. 631. RCW 41.50.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As soon as possible but not more than one hundred and eighty days after March 19, 1976, there is transferred to the department of retirement systems, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all powers, duties, and functions of:

(a) The Washington public employees' retirement system;

(b) The Washington state teachers' retirement system;

(c) The Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system;

(d) The Washington state patrol retirement system;

(e) The Washington judicial retirement system; ((and))

(f) The merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan; and

(g) The state treasurer with respect to the administration of the judges' retirement fund imposed pursuant to chapter 2.12 RCW.

(2) On July 1, 1996, there is transferred to the department all powers, duties, and functions of the deferred compensation committee.

(3) The department shall administer chapter 41.34 RCW.

(4) The department shall administer the Washington school employees' retirement system created under chapter 41.35 RCW.

(5) The department shall administer the Washington public safety employees' retirement system created under chapter 41.37 RCW.

(6) The department shall administer the collection of employer contributions and initial prefunding of the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefits, also referred to as the annuity or retirement income plans created under chapter 28B.10 RCW.

Sec. 632. RCW 41.50.033 and 2019 c 64 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall determine when interest, if provided by a plan, shall be credited to accounts in the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, or the Washington state patrol retirement system. The amounts to be credited and the methods of doing so shall be at the director's discretion, except that if interest is credited, it shall be done at least quarterly.

(2) Interest as determined by the director under this section is "regular interest" as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, 41.26.030, section 206 of this act, and 43.43.120.

(3) The legislature affirms that the authority of the director under RCW 41.40.020 and 41.50.030 includes the authority and responsibility to establish the amount and all conditions for regular interest, if any. The legislature intends chapter 493, Laws of 2007 to be curative, remedial, and retrospectively applicable.

Sec. 633. RCW 41.50.060 and 2004 c 242 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may delegate the performance of such powers, duties, and functions, other than those relating to rule making, to employees of the department, but the director shall remain and be responsible for the official acts of the employees of the department.

The director shall be responsible for the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the judicial retirement system, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan, the public safety employees' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system. The director shall also be responsible for the deferred compensation program.

Sec. 634. RCW 41.50.080 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The state investment board shall provide for the investment of all funds of the Washington public employees' retirement system, the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, the Washington state patrol retirement system, the Washington judicial retirement system, the Washington public safety employees' retirement system, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, and the judges' retirement fund, pursuant to RCW 43.84.150, and may sell or exchange investments acquired in the exercise of that authority.

Sec. 635. RCW 41.50.112 and 2000 c 247 s 1107 are each amended to read as follows:

Employers, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, section 206 of this act, 41.34.020, 41.35.010, and 41.40.010, must report all member data to the department in a format designed and communicated by the department. Employers failing to comply with this reporting requirement shall be assessed an additional fee as defined under RCW 41.50.110(5).

Sec. 636. RCW 41.50.150 and 2004 c 242 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The employer of any employee whose retirement benefits are based in part on excess compensation, as defined in this section, shall, upon receipt of a billing from the department, pay into the appropriate retirement system the present value at the time of the employee's retirement of the total estimated cost of all present and future benefits from the retirement system attributable to the excess compensation. The state actuary shall determine the estimated cost using the same method and procedure as is used in preparing fiscal note costs for the legislature. However, the director may in the director's discretion decline to bill the employer if the amount due is less than fifty dollars. Accounts unsettled within thirty days of the receipt of the billing shall be assessed an interest penalty of one percent of the amount due for each month or fraction thereof beyond the original thirty-day period.

(2) "Excess compensation," as used in this section, includes the following payments, if used in the calculation of the employee's retirement allowance:

(a) A cash out of unused annual leave in excess of two hundred forty hours of such leave. "Cash out" for purposes of this subsection means:

(i) Any payment in lieu of an accrual of annual leave; or

(ii) Any payment added to salary or wages, concurrent with a reduction of annual leave;

(b) A cash out of any other form of leave;

(c) A payment for, or in lieu of, any personal expense or transportation allowance to the extent that payment qualifies as reportable compensation in the member's retirement system;

(d) The portion of any payment, including overtime payments, that exceeds twice the regular daily or hourly rate of pay; and

(e) Any termination or severance payment.

(3) This section applies to the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030 and to retirements occurring on or after March 15, 1984. Nothing in this section is intended to amend or determine the meaning of any definition in chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.40, 41.35, 41.37, or 43.43 RCW or to determine in any manner what payments are includable in the calculation of a retirement allowance under such chapters.

(4) An employer is not relieved of liability under this section because of the death of any person either before or after the billing from the department.

Sec. 637. RCW 41.50.152 and 2004 c 242 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as limited by subsection (3) of this section, the governing body of an employer under chapter 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, or 41.40 RCW shall comply with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section prior to executing a contract or collective bargaining agreement with members under chapter 41.32, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.35, 41.37, or 41.40 RCW which provides for:

(a) A cash out of unused annual leave in excess of two hundred forty hours of such leave. "Cash out" for purposes of this subsection means any payment in lieu of an accrual of annual leave or any payment added to regular salary, concurrent with a reduction of annual leave;

(b) A cash out of any other form of leave;

(c) A payment for, or in lieu of, any personal expense or transportation allowance;

(d) The portion of any payment, including overtime payments, that exceeds twice the regular rate of pay; or

(e) Any other termination or severance payment.

(2) Any governing body entering into a contract that includes a compensation provision listed in subsection (1) of this section shall do so only after public notice in compliance with the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW. This notification requirement may be accomplished as part of the approval process for adopting a contract in whole, and does not require separate or additional open public meetings. At the public meeting, full disclosure shall be made of the nature of the proposed compensation provision, and the employer's estimate of the excess compensation billings under RCW 41.50.150 that the employing entity would have to pay as a result of the proposed compensation provision. The employer shall notify the department of its compliance with this section at the time the department bills the employer under RCW 41.50.150 for the pension impact of compensation provisions listed in subsection (1) of this section that are adopted after July 23, 1995.

(3) The requirements of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to the adoption of a compensation provision listed in subsection (1) of this section if the compensation would not be includable in calculating benefits under chapter 41.32, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.35, 41.37, or 41.40 RCW for the employees covered by the compensation provision.

Sec. 638. RCW 41.50.255 and 2004 c 242 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

The director is authorized to pay from the interest earnings of the trust funds of the public employees' retirement system, the merged LEOFF 1/TRS 1 retirement plan, the teachers' retirement system, the Washington state patrol retirement system, the Washington judicial retirement system, the judges' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, or the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system lawful obligations of the appropriate system for legal expenses and medical expenses which expenses are primarily incurred for the purpose of protecting the appropriate trust fund or are incurred in compliance with statutes governing such funds.

The term "legal expense" includes, but is not limited to, legal services provided through the legal services revolving fund, fees for expert witnesses, travel expenses, fees for court reporters, cost of transcript preparation, and reproduction of documents.

The term "medical costs" includes, but is not limited to, expenses for the medical examination or reexamination of members or retirees, the costs of preparation of medical reports, and fees charged by medical professionals for attendance at discovery proceedings or hearings.

The director may also pay from the interest earnings of the trust funds specified in this section costs incurred in investigating fraud and collecting overpayments, including expenses incurred to review and investigate cases of possible fraud against the trust funds and collection agency fees and other costs incurred in recovering overpayments. Recovered funds must be returned to the appropriate trust funds.

Sec. 639. RCW 41.50.500 and 2004 c 242 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 41.50.500 through 41.50.650, 41.50.670 through 41.50.720, and 26.09.138.

(1) "Benefits" means periodic retirement payments or a withdrawal of accumulated contributions.

(2) "Disposable benefits" means that part of the benefits of an individual remaining after the deduction from those benefits of any amount required by law to be withheld. The term "required by law to be withheld" does not include any deduction elective to the member.

(3) "Dissolution order" means any judgment, decree, or order of spousal maintenance, property division, or court-approved property settlement incident to a decree of divorce, dissolution, invalidity, or legal separation issued by the superior court of the state of Washington or a judgment, decree, or other order of spousal support issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state or country, that has been registered or otherwise made enforceable in this state.

(4) "Mandatory benefits assignment order" means an order issued to the department of retirement systems pursuant to RCW 41.50.570 to withhold and deliver benefits payable to an obligor under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.32, 41.40, 41.35, 41.37, or 43.43 RCW.

(5) "Obligee" means an ex spouse or spouse to whom a duty of spousal maintenance or property division obligation is owed.

(6) "Obligor" means the spouse or ex spouse owing a duty of spousal maintenance or a property division obligation.

(7) "Periodic retirement payments" means periodic payments of retirement allowances, including but not limited to service retirement allowances, disability retirement allowances, and survivors' allowances. The term does not include a withdrawal of accumulated contributions.

(8) "Property division obligation" means any outstanding court-ordered property division or court-approved property settlement obligation incident to a decree of divorce, dissolution, or legal separation.

(9) "Standard allowance" means a benefit payment option selected under RCW 2.10.146(1)(a), 41.26.460(1)(a), 41.32.785(1)(a), 41.40.188(1)(a), 41.40.660(1), 41.40.845(1)(a), 41.37.170, or 41.35.220 that ceases upon the death of the retiree. Standard allowance also means the benefit allowance provided under RCW 2.10.110, 2.10.130, 43.43.260, 41.26.100 (as recodified by this act), 41.26.130(1)(a) (as recodified by this act), or chapter 2.12 RCW. Standard allowance also means the maximum retirement allowance available under RCW 41.32.530(1) (as recodified by this act) following member withdrawal of accumulated contributions, if any.

(10) "Withdrawal of accumulated contributions" means a lump sum payment to a retirement system member of all or a part of the member's accumulated contributions, including accrued interest, at the request of the member including any lump sum amount paid upon the death of the member.

Sec. 640. RCW 41.50.670 and 2004 c 242 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this chapter regarding mandatory assignment of benefits to enforce a spousal maintenance obligation shall abridge the right of an obligee to direct payments of retirement benefits to satisfy a property division obligation ordered pursuant to a court decree of dissolution or legal separation or any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation as provided in RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, 41.26.053, ((41.26.162,)) 41.32.052, 41.35.100, 41.34.070(4), 41.40.052, 43.43.310, 41.37.090, or 26.09.138, as those statutes existed before July 1, 1987, and as those statutes exist on and after July 28, 1991. The department shall pay benefits under this chapter in a lump sum or as a portion of periodic retirement payments as expressly provided by the dissolution order. A dissolution order may not order the department to pay a periodic retirement payment or lump sum unless that payment is specifically authorized under the provisions of chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.34, 41.40, 41.37, or 43.43 RCW, as applicable.

(2) The department shall pay directly to an obligee the amount of periodic retirement payments or lump sum payment, as appropriate, specified in the dissolution order if the dissolution order filed with the department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section includes a provision that states in the following form:

If . . . . . . (the obligor) receives periodic retirement payments as defined in RCW 41.50.500, the department of retirement systems shall pay to . . . . . . (the obligee) . . . . . . dollars from such payments or . . . percent of such payments. If the obligor's debt is expressed as a percentage of his or her periodic retirement payment and the obligee does not have a survivorship interest in the obligor's benefit, the amount received by the obligee shall be the percentage of the periodic retirement payment that the obligor would have received had he or she selected a standard allowance.

If . . . . . . (the obligor) requests or has requested a withdrawal of accumulated contributions as defined in RCW 41.50.500, or becomes eligible for a lump sum death benefit, the department of retirement systems shall pay to . . . . . . (the obligee) . . . . . . dollars plus interest at the rate paid by the department of retirement systems on member contributions. Such interest to accrue from the date of this order's entry with the court of record.

(3) This section does not require a member to select a standard allowance upon retirement nor does it require the department to recalculate the amount of a retiree's periodic retirement payment based on a change in survivor option.

(4) A court order under this section may not order the department to pay more than seventy-five percent of an obligor's periodic retirement payment to an obligee.

(5) Persons whose court decrees were entered between July 1, 1987, and July 28, 1991, shall also be entitled to receive direct payments of retirement benefits to satisfy court-ordered property divisions if the dissolution orders comply or are modified to comply with this section and RCW 41.50.680 through 41.50.720 and, as applicable, RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, 41.26.053, 41.32.052, 41.35.100, 41.34.070, 41.40.052, 43.43.310, 41.37.090, and 26.09.138.

(6) The obligee must file a copy of the dissolution order with the department within ninety days of that order's entry with the court of record.

(7) A division of benefits pursuant to a dissolution order under this section shall be based upon the obligor's gross benefit prior to any deductions. If the department is required to withhold a portion of the member's benefit pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402 and the sum of that amount plus the amount owed to the obligee exceeds the total benefit, the department shall satisfy the withholding requirements under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402 and then pay the remainder to the obligee. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to amounts withheld pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402(i).

Sec. 641. RCW 41.50.700 and 2003 c 294 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except under subsection (3) of this section and RCW 41.26.460(5), 41.32.530(5) (as recodified by this act), 41.32.785(5), 41.32.851(4), 41.35.220(4), 41.40.188(5), 41.40.660(5), 41.40.845(4), 43.43.271(4), and 41.34.080, the department's obligation to provide direct payment of a property division obligation to an obligee under RCW 41.50.670 shall cease upon the death of the obligee or upon the death of the obligor, whichever comes first. However, if an obligor dies and is eligible for a lump sum death benefit, the department shall be obligated to provide direct payment to the obligee of all or a portion of the withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order that complies with RCW 41.50.670.

(2) The direct payment of a property division obligation to an obligee under RCW 41.50.670 shall be paid as a deduction from the member's periodic retirement payment. An obligee may not direct the department to withhold any funds from such payment.

(3) The department's obligation to provide direct payment to a nonmember ex spouse from a preretirement divorce meeting the criteria of RCW ((41.26.162(2) or)) 43.43.270(2) may continue for the life of the member's surviving spouse qualifying for benefits under RCW 41.26.160 (as recodified by this act), 41.26.161 (as recodified by this act), or 43.43.270(2). Upon the death of the member's surviving spouse qualifying for benefits under RCW 41.26.160 (as recodified by this act), 41.26.161 (as recodified by this act), or 43.43.270(2), the department's obligation under this subsection shall cease. The department's obligation to provide direct payment to a nonmember ex spouse qualifying for a continued split benefit payment under RCW 41.26.162(3) (as recodified by this act) shall continue for the life of that nonmember ex spouse.

Sec. 642. RCW 41.50.790 and 2004 c 242 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall designate an obligee as a survivor beneficiary of a member under RCW 2.10.146, 41.26.460, 41.32.530 (as recodified by this act), 41.32.785, 41.32.851, 41.35.220, 41.40.188, 41.40.660, 41.37.170, or 41.40.845 if the department has been served by registered or certified mail with a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500 at least thirty days prior to the member's retirement. The department's duty to comply with the dissolution order arises only if the order contains a provision that states in substantially the following form:

When . . . . . . (the obligor) applies for retirement the department shall designate . . . . . . (the obligee) as survivor beneficiary with a . . . . . . survivor benefit.

The survivor benefit designated in the dissolution order must be consistent with the survivor benefit options authorized by statute or administrative rule.

(2) The obligee's entitlement to a survivor benefit pursuant to a dissolution order filed with the department in compliance with subsection (1) of this section shall cease upon the death of the obligee.

(3)(a) A subsequent dissolution order may order the department to divide a survivor benefit between a survivor beneficiary and an alternate payee. In order to divide a survivor benefit between more than one payee, the dissolution order must:

(i) Be ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction following notice to the survivor beneficiary;

(ii) Contain a provision that complies with subsection (1) of this section designating the survivor beneficiary;

(iii) Contain a provision clearly identifying the alternate payee or payees; and

(iv) Specify the proportional division of the benefit between the survivor beneficiary and the alternate payee or payees.

(b) The department will calculate actuarial adjustment for the court-ordered survivor benefit based upon the life of the survivor beneficiary.

(c) If the survivor beneficiary dies, the department shall terminate the benefit. If the alternate payee predeceases the survivor beneficiary, all entitlement of the alternate payee to a benefit ceases and the entire benefit will revert to the survivor beneficiary.

(d) For purposes of this section, "survivor beneficiary" means:

(i) The obligee designated in the provision of dissolution filed in compliance with subsection (1) of this section; or

(ii) In the event of more than one dissolution order, the obligee named in the first decree of dissolution received by the department.

(e) For purposes of this section, "alternate payee" means a person, other than the survivor beneficiary, who is granted a percentage of a survivor benefit pursuant to a dissolution order.

(4) The department shall under no circumstances be held liable for not designating an obligee as a survivor beneficiary under subsection (1) of this section if the dissolution order or amendment thereto is not served on the department by registered or certified mail at least thirty days prior to the member's retirement.

(5) If a dissolution order directing designation of a survivor beneficiary has been previously filed with the department in compliance with this section, no additional obligation shall arise on the part of the department upon filing of a subsequent dissolution order unless the subsequent dissolution order:

(a) Specifically amends or supersedes the dissolution order already on file with the department; and

(b) Is filed with the department by registered or certified mail at least thirty days prior to the member's retirement.

(6) The department shall designate a court-ordered survivor beneficiary pursuant to a dissolution order filed with the department before June 6, 1996, only if the order:

(a) Specifically directs the member or department to make such selection;

(b) Specifies the survivor option to be selected; and

(c) The member retires after June 6, 1996.

Sec. 643. RCW 41.54.010 and 2007 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Base salary" means salaries or wages earned by a member of a system during a payroll period for personal services and includes wages and salaries deferred under provisions of the United States internal revenue code, but shall exclude overtime payments, nonmoney maintenance compensation, and lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, any form of severance pay, any bonus for voluntary retirement, any other form of leave, or any similar lump sum payment; except that forms of payment which are excluded under this subsection shall be included in base salary when reportable to the department in all of a dual member's retirement systems, and when none of the dual member's retirement systems are the Washington state patrol retirement system.

(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of retirement systems.

(4) "Dual member" means a person who (a) is or becomes a member of a system on or after July 1, 1988, (b) has been a member of one or more other systems, and (c) has never been retired for service from a retirement system and is not receiving a disability retirement or disability leave benefit from any retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030 or subsection (6) of this section.

(5) "Service" means the same as it may be defined in each respective system. For the purposes of RCW 41.54.030, military service granted under RCW 41.40.170(3) or 43.43.260 may only be based on service accrued under chapter 41.40 or 43.43 RCW, respectively.

(6) "System" means the retirement systems established under chapters 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.32, 41.40, 41.44, 41.35, 41.37, and 43.43 RCW; plan 2 of the system established under chapter 41.26 RCW; and the city employee retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma, and Spokane.

Sec. 644. RCW 41.54.040 and 2004 c 242 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The allowances calculated under RCW 41.54.030, 41.54.032, and 41.54.034 shall be paid separately by each respective current and prior system. Any deductions from such separate payments shall be according to the provisions of the respective systems.

(2) Postretirement adjustments, if any, shall be applied by the respective systems based on the payments made under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to ensure that where a dual member has service in a system established under chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act), 41.32, 41.40, 41.44, 41.35, 41.37, or 43.43 RCW; service in plan 2 of the system established under chapter 41.26 RCW; and service under the city employee retirement system for Seattle, Tacoma, or Spokane, the additional cost incurred as a result of the dual member receiving a benefit under this chapter shall be borne by the retirement system incurring the additional cost.

Sec. 645. RCW 51.32.050 and 2010 c 261 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Where death results from the injury the expenses of burial not to exceed two hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018 shall be paid.

(2)(a) Where death results from the injury, a surviving spouse of a deceased worker eligible for benefits under this title shall receive monthly for life or until remarriage payments according to the following schedule:

(i) If there are no children of the deceased worker, sixty percent of the wages of the deceased worker;

(ii) If there is one child of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-two percent of the wages of the deceased worker;

(iii) If there are two children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-four percent of the wages of the deceased worker;

(iv) If there are three children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-six percent of the wages of the deceased worker;

(v) If there are four children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-eight percent of the wages of the deceased worker; or

(vi) If there are five or more children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, seventy percent of the wages of the deceased worker.

(b) Where the surviving spouse does not have legal custody of any child or children of the deceased worker or where after the death of the worker legal custody of such child or children passes from such surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such child or children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse shall be made to the person or persons having legal custody of such child or children. The amount of such payments shall be five percent of the monthly benefits payable as a result of the worker's death for each such child but such payments shall not exceed twenty-five percent. Such payments on account of such child or children shall be subtracted from the amount to which such surviving spouse would have been entitled had such surviving spouse had legal custody of all of the children and the surviving spouse shall receive the remainder after such payments on account of such child or children have been subtracted. Such payments on account of a child or children not in the legal custody of such surviving spouse shall be apportioned equally among such children.

(c) Payments to the surviving spouse of the deceased worker shall cease at the end of the month in which remarriage occurs: PROVIDED, That a monthly payment shall be made to the child or children of the deceased worker from the month following such remarriage in a sum equal to five percent of the wages of the deceased worker for one child and a sum equal to five percent for each additional child up to a maximum of five such children. Payments to such child or children shall be apportioned equally among such children. Such sum shall be in place of any payments theretofore made for the benefit of or on account of any such child or children. If the surviving spouse does not have legal custody of any child or children of the deceased worker, or if after the death of the worker, legal custody of such child or children passes from such surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such child or children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse shall be made to the person or persons having legal custody of such child or children.

(d) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this subsection (2) ((of this section)):

(i) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER

PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993

105%

June 30, 1994

110%

June 30, 1995

115%

June 30, 1996

120%

(ii) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1, 2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars per month for a surviving spouse and an additional ten dollars per month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children. However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection (2)(d)(ii) is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the deceased worker as determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment due to the surviving spouse shall be equal to the greater of the monthly wages of the deceased worker or the minimum benefit set forth in this section on June 30, 2008.

(e) In addition to the monthly payments provided for in ((subsection (2)))(a) through (c) of this ((section))subsection, a surviving spouse or child or children of such worker if there is no surviving spouse, or dependent parent or parents, if there is no surviving spouse or child or children of any such deceased worker shall be forthwith paid a sum equal to one hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, any such children, or parents to share and share alike in said sum.

(f) Upon remarriage of a surviving spouse the monthly payments for the child or children shall continue as provided in this section, but the monthly payments to such surviving spouse shall cease at the end of the month during which remarriage occurs. However, after September 8, 1975, an otherwise eligible surviving spouse of a worker who died at any time prior to or after September 8, 1975, shall have an option of:

(i)(A) Receiving, once and for all, a lump sum of twenty-four times the monthly compensation rate in effect on the date of remarriage allocable to the spouse for himself or herself pursuant to ((subsection (2)))(a)(i) of this ((section))subsection and subject to any modifications specified under ((subsection (2)))(d) of this ((section))subsection and RCW 51.32.075(3) or fifty percent of the then remaining annuity value of his or her pension, whichever is the lesser: PROVIDED, That if the injury occurred prior to July 28, 1991, the remarriage benefit lump sum available shall be as provided in the remarriage benefit schedules then in effect;

(B) If a surviving spouse is the surviving spouse of a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26 RCW or the state patrol retirement system under chapter 43.43 RCW, the surviving spouse may receive a lump sum of thirty-six times the monthly compensation rate in effect on the date of remarriage allocable to the spouse for himself or herself pursuant to ((subsection (2)))(a)(i) of this ((section))subsection and RCW 51.32.075(3) or fifty percent of the remaining annuity value of his or her pension provided under this chapter, whichever is the lesser: PROVIDED, That if the injury occurred prior to July 28, 1991, the lump sum benefit shall be as provided in the remarriage benefit schedules then in effect; or

(ii) If a surviving spouse does not choose the option specified in ((subsection (2)))(f)(i) of this ((section))subsection to accept the lump sum payment, the remarriage of the surviving spouse of a worker shall not bar him or her from claiming the lump sum payment authorized in ((subsection (2)))(f)(i) of this ((section))subsection during the life of the remarriage, or shall not prevent subsequent monthly payments to him or to her if the remarriage has been terminated by death or has been dissolved or annulled by valid court decree provided he or she has not previously accepted the lump sum payment.

(g) If the surviving spouse during the remarriage should die without having previously received the lump sum payment provided in ((subsection (2)))(f)(i) of this ((section))subsection, his or her estate shall be entitled to receive the sum specified under ((subsection (2)))(f)(i) of this ((section))subsection or fifty percent of the then remaining annuity value of his or her pension whichever is the lesser.

(h) The effective date of resumption of payments under ((subsection (2)))(f)(ii) of this ((section))subsection to a surviving spouse based upon termination of a remarriage by death, annulment, or dissolution shall be the date of the death or the date the judicial decree of annulment or dissolution becomes final and when application for the payments has been received.

(i) If it should be necessary to increase the reserves in the reserve fund or to create a new pension reserve fund as a result of the amendments in chapter 45, Laws of 1975-'76 2nd ex. sess., the amount of such increase in pension reserve in any such case shall be transferred to the reserve fund from the supplemental pension fund.

(3) If there is a child or children and no surviving spouse of the deceased worker or the surviving spouse is not eligible for benefits under this title, a sum equal to thirty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker shall be paid monthly for one child and a sum equivalent to fifteen percent of such wage shall be paid monthly for each additional child, the total of such sum to be divided among such children, share and share alike: PROVIDED, That benefits under this subsection or subsection (4) of this section shall not exceed the lesser of sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the time of his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, as follows:

AFTER

PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993

105%

June 30, 1994

110%

June 30, 1995

115%

June 30, 1996

120%

(4) In the event a surviving spouse receiving monthly payments dies, the child or children of the deceased worker shall receive the same payment as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) If the worker leaves no surviving spouse or child, but leaves a dependent or dependents, a monthly payment shall be made to each dependent equal to fifty percent of the average monthly support actually received by such dependent from the worker during the twelve months next preceding the occurrence of the injury, but the total payment to all dependents in any case shall not exceed the lesser of sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the time of his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER

PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993

105%

June 30, 1994

110%

June 30, 1995

115%

June 30, 1996

120%

If any dependent is under the age of eighteen years at the time of the occurrence of the injury, the payment to such dependent shall cease when such dependent reaches the age of eighteen years except such payments shall continue until the dependent reaches age twenty-three while permanently enrolled at a full time course in an accredited school. The payment to any dependent shall cease if and when, under the same circumstances, the necessity creating the dependency would have ceased if the injury had not happened.

(6) For claims filed prior to July 1, 1986, if the injured worker dies during the period of permanent total disability, whatever the cause of death, leaving a surviving spouse, or child, or children, the surviving spouse or child or children shall receive benefits as if death resulted from the injury as provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this section. Upon remarriage or death of such surviving spouse, the payments to such child or children shall be made as provided in subsection (2) of this section when the surviving spouse of a deceased worker remarries.

(7) For claims filed on or after July 1, 1986, every worker who becomes eligible for permanent total disability benefits shall elect an option as provided in RCW 51.32.067.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 41.26.005 (Provisions applicable to "plan 1" and "plan 2.") and 1992 c 72 s 2, 1991 c 35 s 12, 1989 c 273 s 10, 1985 c 102 s 5, 1979 ex.s. c 249 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 18;

(2) RCW 41.26.040 (System created—Membership—Funds) and 2012 c 117 s 39, 1991 c 35 s 15, 1989 c 273 s 11, 1979 ex.s. c 45 s 1, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 7, 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 44, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 4;

(3) RCW 41.26.075 (Provisions applicable to plan 1) and 1992 c 72 s 3 & 1991 c 35 s 101;

(4) RCW 41.26.080 (Funding total liability of plan 1 system) and 2007 c 492 s 8, 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 907, 1991 c 35 s 17, 1989 c 273 s 13, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 8;

(5) RCW 41.26.105 (Purchase of actuarially equivalent life annuity benefit upon retirement—Purchase by past retirees) and 2016 c 222 s 2;

(6) RCW 41.26.270 (Declaration of policy respecting benefits for injury or death—Civil actions abolished) and 1989 c 12 s 13, 1987 c 185 s 13, 1985 c 102 s 4, & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 14; and

(7) RCW 41.26.3903 (Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 209) and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 45.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702. RCW 41.26.090, 41.26.100, 41.26.110, 41.26.115, 41.26.120, 41.26.125, 41.26.130, 41.26.140, 41.26.150, 41.26.160, 41.26.161, 41.26.162, 41.26.164, 41.26.170, 41.26.190, 41.26.192, 41.26.194, 41.26.197, 41.26.199, 41.26.200, 41.26.211, 41.26.221, 41.26.240, 41.26.250, 41.26.260, 41.26.281, 41.26.3901, and 41.26.3902 are each recodified as sections in chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703. RCW 41.32.215 (Provisions applicable to plan 1) and 1992 c 72 s 5 & 1991 c 35 s 103 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704. RCW 41.32.240, 41.32.260, 41.32.263, 41.32.267, 41.32.270, 41.32.300, 41.32.310, 41.32.330, 41.32.340, 41.32.345, 41.32.350, 41.32.380, 41.32.390, 41.32.470, 41.32.480, 41.32.483, 41.32.485, 41.32.4851, 41.32.4872, 41.32.489, 41.32.4931, 41.32.4945, 41.32.497, 41.32.498, 41.32.4986, 41.32.500, 41.32.510, 41.32.520, 41.32.522, 41.32.523, 41.32.530, 41.32.540, 41.32.550, 41.32.555, 41.32.570, 41.32.581, 41.32.584, and 41.32.587 are each recodified as sections in chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 803 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 41.20.061 (Increase in presently payable benefits for service or disability authorized); and

(2) RCW 41.20.086 (Increase in certain presently payable death benefits authorized).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. (1) The merger of the assets, liabilities, and membership of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 as provided in section 203 of this act must be administered so as to comply with the internal revenue code, Title 26 U.S.C., and specifically with plan qualification requirements imposed on governmental plans by section 401(a) of the internal revenue code.

Any section or provision of this act that is susceptible to more than one construction must be interpreted so as to meet this requirement.

(2) If the federal internal revenue service issues a determination letter stating that any section of this act is in conflict with the plan qualification requirements for governmental plans in section 401(a) of the internal revenue code, and the conflict cannot be resolved through administrative action or statutory change, then sections 201 through 703 of this act are null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803. Sections 201 through 241 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804. Section 402 of this act expires July 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805. Section 626 of this act expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806. Section 627 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 807. Except for section 627 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---