BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that substance use disorder is a disease and should be treated using a public health, rather than a criminal justice-centered, approach. Existing laws criminalizing the possession of drugs have been ineffective in reducing drug use and preventing substance use disorder. These laws cause significant harm to individuals who use drugs by disrupting and further destabilizing their lives. It also contributes to an increased risk of death, the spread of infectious diseases, mass incarceration, the separation of families, and barriers to accessing housing, employment, and other vital services. Furthermore, even though research shows that drugs are used and sold at similar levels across all races, laws criminalizing the use of drugs have disproportionately impacted minority communities.

This act takes the important first step of reducing the crime of possession from a felony to a gross misdemeanor and institutes greater opportunities for treatment. In coordination with this act, the legislature intends to increase funding for programs that have a proven track record of assisting individuals to break free from substance use dependency. These programs include LEAD (law enforcement assisted diversion/let everyone advance with dignity program); HOST (homeless outreach stabilization transition teams); peer-run clubhouses; opioid treatment network; project for psychiatric outreach for the homeless; mobile opioid treatment grant; peer support programs; and family navigators.

The purpose of this act is to save lives and to help transform Washington's approach to drug use from one based on criminalization and stigma to one based on science and compassion.

PART I

POSSESSION AND USE OF CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES, COUNTERFEIT SUBSTANCES, AND LEGEND DRUGS

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.4011 and 2003 c 53 s 332 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to create, deliver, or knowingly possess a counterfeit substance.

(2) ((Any))Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any person who violates this section with respect to:

(a) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug, or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(b) A counterfeit substance which is methamphetamine, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(c) Any other counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(d) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule IV, except flunitrazepam, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(e) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) A violation of this section involving possession is a gross misdemeanor. Where a case is legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall divert the case for treatment if the alleged violation involving possession is the person's first or second violation. On a person's third and subsequent violation involving possession, the prosecutor is encouraged to divert the case for treatment.

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.4013 and 2017 c 317 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly possess a controlled substance unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this chapter.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014, any person who violates this section is guilty of a ((class C felony))gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) Where a case is legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall divert the case for treatment if the alleged violation is the person's first or second violation of this section. On a person's third and subsequent violation of this section, the prosecutor is encouraged to divert the case for treatment.

(4)(a) The possession, by a person twenty-one years of age or older, of useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products in amounts that do not exceed those set forth in RCW 69.50.360(3) is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(b) The possession of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products being physically transported or delivered within the state, in amounts not exceeding those that may be established under RCW 69.50.385(3), by a licensed employee of a common carrier when performing the duties authorized in accordance with RCW 69.50.382 and 69.50.385, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(((4)))(5)(a) The delivery by a person twenty-one years of age or older to one or more persons twenty-one years of age or older, during a single twenty-four hour period, for noncommercial purposes and not conditioned upon or done in connection with the provision or receipt of financial consideration, of any of the following marijuana products, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provisions of Washington state law:

(i) One-half ounce of useable marijuana;

(ii) Eight ounces of marijuana-infused product in solid form;

(iii) Thirty-six ounces of marijuana-infused product in liquid form; or

(iv) Three and one-half grams of marijuana concentrates.

(b) The act of delivering marijuana or a marijuana product as authorized under this subsection (((4)))(5) must meet one of the following requirements:

(i) The delivery must be done in a location outside of the view of general public and in a nonpublic place; or

(ii) The marijuana or marijuana product must be in the original packaging as purchased from the marijuana retailer.

(((5)))(6) No person under twenty-one years of age may possess, manufacture, sell, or distribute marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrates, regardless of THC concentration. This does not include qualifying patients with a valid authorization.

(((6)))(7) The possession by a qualifying patient or designated provider of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or plants in accordance with chapter 69.51A RCW is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.412 and 2019 c 64 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to use drug paraphernalia to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, or prepare((, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body)) a controlled substance other than marijuana. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) It is unlawful for any person to deliver, possess with intent to deliver, or manufacture with intent to deliver drug paraphernalia, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, or prepare((, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body)) a controlled substance other than marijuana. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(3) Any person eighteen years of age or over who violates subsection (2) of this section by delivering drug paraphernalia to a person under eighteen years of age who is at least three years his or her junior is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(4) It is unlawful for any person to place in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication any advertisement, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that the purpose of the advertisement, in whole or in part, is to promote the sale of objects designed or intended for use as drug paraphernalia. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(5) It is lawful for any person over the age of eighteen to possess sterile hypodermic syringes and needles for the purpose of reducing blood-borne diseases.

Sec. 5. RCW 69.41.030 and 2019 c 55 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((It))Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or knowingly possess any legend drug ((except)).

(2) The sale, delivery, or possession of a legend drug does not constitute a violation of this section upon the order or prescription of a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission, a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW to the extent permitted by drug therapy guidelines or protocols established under RCW 18.64.011 and authorized by the commission and approved by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the Washington medical commission, or any of the following professionals in any province of Canada that shares a common border with the state of Washington or in any state of the United States: A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, a licensed physician assistant, a licensed osteopathic physician assistant, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or warehouse operator, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend drug is in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic that is under contract with the health care authority from selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter prohibits possession or delivery of legend drugs by an authorized collector or other person participating in the operation of a drug take-back program authorized in chapter 69.48 RCW.

(((2)))(3)(a) A violation of this section involving the sale, delivery, or possession with intent to sell or deliver is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) A violation of this section involving possession is a misdemeanor. Where a case is legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall divert the case for treatment if the alleged violation involving possession is the person's first or second violation. On a person's third and subsequent violation involving possession, the prosecutor is encouraged to divert the case for treatment.

Sec. 6. RCW 69.41.030 and 2020 c 80 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((It))Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or knowingly possess any legend drug ((except)).

(2) The sale, delivery, or possession of a legend drug does not constitute a violation of this section upon the order or prescription of a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission, a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW to the extent permitted by drug therapy guidelines or protocols established under RCW 18.64.011 and authorized by the commission and approved by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the Washington medical commission, or any of the following professionals in any province of Canada that shares a common border with the state of Washington or in any state of the United States: A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, a licensed physician assistant, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or warehouse operator, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend drug is in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic that is under contract with the health care authority from selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter prohibits possession or delivery of legend drugs by an authorized collector or other person participating in the operation of a drug take-back program authorized in chapter 69.48 RCW.

(((2)))(3)(a) A violation of this section involving the sale, delivery, or possession with intent to sell or deliver is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) A violation of this section involving possession is a misdemeanor. Where a case is legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall divert the case for treatment if the alleged violation involving possession is the person's first or second violation. On a person's third and subsequent violation involving possession, the prosecutor is encouraged to divert the case for treatment.

PART II

SUBSTANCE USE RECOVERY SERVICES ADVISORY COMMITTEE

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall establish the substance use recovery services advisory committee to make recommendations for implementation of a substance use recovery services plan.

(2) The authority must, in consultation with the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and an organization that represents the interests of people who have been directly impacted by substance use and the criminal legal system, appoint members to the advisory committee who have relevant background related to the needs of persons with substance use disorder. The membership of the advisory committee must include, but is not limited to, experts in the etiology and stabilization of substance use disorders, including expertise in medication-assisted treatment and other innovative medication therapies; experts in mental health and trauma and their comorbidity with substance use disorders; people who are currently using controlled substances outside the legal authority of prescription or valid practitioner order; experts in the relationship between social determinants of health, including housing and substance use disorder; experts in drug user health and harm reduction; representatives of city and county governments; a representative of urban police chiefs; a representative of rural county sheriffs; a representative of the interests of rural communities; a representative of fire chiefs; experts in peer support services; experts in substance use disorder recovery support services; experts in diversion from the criminal legal system to community-based care for people with complex behavioral health needs; experts in reducing racial disparity in exposure to the criminal legal system; an academic researcher with an expertise in drug policy and program evaluation; a substance use disorder professional; a representative of public defenders; a representative of prosecutors; a representative of the criminal justice training commission; a nongovernmental immigration attorney with expertise in the immigration consequences of drug possession and use crimes and findings of substance use disorder; recovery housing providers; low-barrier housing providers; representatives of racial justice organizations, including organizations promoting antiracism and equity in health care; a representative of a local health jurisdiction with expertise in overdose prevention and harm reduction; representatives of the interests of tribes; at least three adults in recovery from substance use disorder, including individuals with previous contact with the criminal legal system due to substance use; at least three youths in recovery from substance use disorder, including youths with previous criminal legal system contact due to substance use; and at least three family members of persons with substance use disorder. The advisory committee shall be reflective of the community of individuals living with substance use disorder, including people who are Black, indigenous, and people of color, and individuals who can represent the unique needs of rural communities.

(3) The advisory committee must make recommendations and provide perspectives to the authority regarding:

(a) Reforms to state laws that align with the goal of treating substance use disorder as a disease, rather than a criminal behavior;

(b) Current regional capacity for existing public and private programs providing substance use disorder assessments, each of the American society of addiction medicine levels of care, and recovery support services;

(c) Barriers to accessing the existing health system for those populations chronically exposed to criminal legal system responses relating to complex behavioral health conditions and the consequences of trauma, and possible innovations that could reduce those barriers and improve the quality and accessibility of care for those populations;

(d) Evidence-based, research-based, and promising treatment and recovery services appropriate for target populations, to include, but not be limited to, field-based outreach and engagement, case management, mental and physical health care, contingency management, medication-assisted treatment and other innovative medication therapies, peer support services, family education, housing, job training and employment programs, and treatments that have not traditionally been covered by insurance;

(e) Workforce needs for the behavioral health services sector, including wage and retention challenges;

(f) Options for leveraging existing integrated managed care, medicaid waiver, American Indian or Alaska Native fee-for-service behavioral health benefits, and private insurance service capacity for substance use disorders, including but not limited to coordination with managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative services organizations, the Washington health benefit exchange, accountable communities of health, and the office of the insurance commissioner;

(g) Framework and design assistance for jurisdictions to assist in compliance with the requirements of RCW 10.31.110 for diversion of individuals with complex behavioral health conditions to community-based care whenever possible and appropriate, and identifying resource gaps that impede jurisdictions in fully realizing the potential impact of this approach;

(h) The design of a referral mechanism for referring people with substance use disorder or problematic behaviors resulting from drug use into the supportive services described in this section, including intercepting individuals who likely would otherwise be referred into the criminal legal system, with the express intention of ensuring that decriminalization of possession of personal use amounts does not inadvertently contribute to increased racial disparity among those who continue to be exposed to the criminal legal system due to income instability and involvement in the illicit economy to meet basic needs;

(i) The design of ongoing qualitative and quantitative research about the types of services desired by people with substance use disorders and barriers they experience in accessing existing and recommended services; and

(j) Proposing a funding framework in which, over time, resources are shifted from punishment sectors to community-based care interventions such that community-based care becomes the primary strategy for addressing and resolving public order issues related to behavioral health conditions.

(4) The authority shall submit a summary report of the substance use recovery services plan and recommended changes to the law to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2022. The authority shall submit an interim report on the progress of the advisory committee to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(5) This section expires December 31, 2023.

PART III

RESENTENCING AND RELEASE OF PERSONS IMPACTED BY STATE V. BLAKE

Sec. 8. RCW 2.24.010 and 2013 c 27 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There may be appointed in each county or judicial district, by the judges of the superior court having jurisdiction therein, one or more court commissioners for said county or judicial district. Each such commissioner shall be a citizen of the United States and shall hold the office during the pleasure of the judges making the appointment.

(2)(a) There may be appointed ((in counties with a population of more than four hundred thousand,)) by the presiding judge of the superior court having jurisdiction ((therein)), one or more attorneys to act as criminal commissioners to assist the superior court in disposing of adult criminal cases. Such criminal commissioners shall have power, authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with the superior court and the judges thereof, in adult criminal cases, to preside over arraignments, preliminary appearances, initial extradition hearings, and noncompliance proceedings pursuant to RCW 9.94A.6333 or 9.94B.040; accept pleas if authorized by local court rules; appoint counsel; make determinations of probable cause; set, amend, and review conditions of pretrial release; set bail; set trial and hearing dates; authorize continuances; accept waivers of the right to speedy trial; and authorize and issue search warrants and orders to intercept, monitor, or record wired or wireless telecommunications or for the installation of electronic taps or other devices to include, but not be limited to, vehicle global positioning system or other mobile tracking devices with all the powers conferred upon the judge of the superior court in such matters. Criminal commissioners also shall have the authority to conduct resentencing hearings and to vacate convictions pursuant to State v. Blake, No. 96873-0 (Feb. 25, 2021).

(b) The county legislative authority must approve the creation of criminal commissioner positions.

Sec. 9. RCW 2.24.040 and 2009 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Such court commissioner shall have power, authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with the superior court and the judge thereof, in the following particulars:

(1) To hear and determine all matters in probate, to make and issue all proper orders therein, and to issue citations in all cases where same are authorized by the probate statutes of this state.

(2) To grant and enter defaults and enter judgment thereon.

(3) To issue temporary restraining orders and temporary injunctions, and to fix and approve bonds thereon.

(4) To act as referee in all matters and actions referred to him or her by the superior court as such, with all the powers now conferred upon referees by law.

(5) To hear and determine all proceedings supplemental to execution, with all the powers conferred upon the judge of the superior court in such matters.

(6) To hear and determine all petitions for the adoption of children and for the dissolution of incorporations.

(7) To hear and determine all applications for the commitment of any person to the hospital for the insane, with all the powers of the superior court in such matters: PROVIDED, That in cases where a jury is demanded, same shall be referred to the superior court for trial.

(8) To hear and determine all complaints for the commitments of minors with all powers conferred upon the superior court in such matters.

(9) To hear and determine ex parte and uncontested civil matters of any nature.

(10) To grant adjournments, administer oaths, preserve order, compel attendance of witnesses, and to punish for contempts in the refusal to obey or the neglect of the court commissioner's lawful orders made in any matter before the court commissioner as fully as the judge of the superior court.

(11) To take acknowledgments and proofs of deeds, mortgages and all other instruments requiring acknowledgment under the laws of this state, and to take affidavits and depositions in all cases.

(12) To provide an official seal, upon which shall be engraved the words "Court Commissioner," and the name of the county for which he or she may be appointed, and to authenticate his official acts therewith in all cases where same is necessary.

(13) To charge and collect, for his or her own use, the same fees for the official performance of official acts mentioned in subsections (4) and (11) of this section as are provided by law for referees and notaries public.

(14) To hear and determine small claims appeals as provided in chapter 12.36 RCW.

(15) In adult criminal cases, to preside over arraignments, preliminary appearances, initial extradition hearings, and noncompliance proceedings pursuant to RCW 9.94A.6333 or 9.94B.040; accept pleas if authorized by local court rules; appoint counsel; make determinations of probable cause; set, amend, and review conditions of pretrial release; set bail; set trial and hearing dates; authorize continuances; ((and)) accept waivers of the right to speedy trial; and conduct resentencing hearings and to vacate convictions pursuant to State v. Blake, No. 96873-0 (Feb. 25, 2021).

Sec. 10. RCW 9.94A.728 and 2018 c 166 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the sentence except as follows:

(a) An offender may earn early release time as authorized by RCW 9.94A.729;

(b) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections officer or officers;

(c)(i) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:

(A) The offender has a medical condition that is serious and is expected to require costly care or treatment;

(B) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or she is currently physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition or is expected to be so at the time of release; and

(C) It is expected that granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in a cost savings to the state.

(ii) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an extraordinary medical placement.

(iii) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's medical care, in which case, an alternative type of monitoring shall be utilized. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.

(iv) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement under this subsection (1)(c) at any time.

(v) Persistent offenders are not eligible for extraordinary medical placement;

(d) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or other extraordinary circumstances;

(e) No more than the final twelve months of the offender's term of confinement may be served in partial confinement for aiding the offender with: Finding work as part of the work release program under chapter 72.65 RCW; or reestablishing himself or herself in the community as part of the parenting program in RCW 9.94A.6551. This is in addition to that period of earned early release time that may be exchanged for partial confinement pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(d);

(f) No more than the final six months of the offender's term of confinement may be served in partial confinement as home detention as part of the graduated reentry program developed by the department under RCW 9.94A.733;

(g) The governor may pardon any offender;

(h) The department may release an offender from confinement any time within ten days before a release date calculated under this section;

(i) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as provided in RCW 9.94A.870;

(j) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed under RCW 9.94A.540; and

(k) Any person convicted of one or more crimes committed prior to the person's eighteenth birthday may be released from confinement pursuant to RCW 9.94A.730.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an offender entitled to vacation of a conviction or the recalculation of his or her offender score pursuant to State v. Blake, No. 96873-0 (Feb. 25, 2021), may be released from confinement pursuant to a court order if the offender has already served a period of confinement that exceeds his or her new standard range. This provision does not create an independent right to release from confinement prior to resentencing.

(3) Offenders residing in a juvenile correctional facility placement pursuant to RCW 72.01.410(1)(a) are not subject to the limitations in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. The State v. Blake reimbursement account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for state and local government costs resulting from the supreme court's decision in State v. Blake and to reimburse individuals for legal financial obligations paid in connection with sentences that have been invalidated as a result of the decision in State v. Blake.

PART IV

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 1 through 5, and 7 through 11 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---