BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the department of ecology destroyed the opportunity to create quality jobs in Washington when it denied required permits for the Kalama manufacturing and marine export facility based on a flawed emissions analysis. However, the legislature also recognizes that products containing olefins, the substances that would have ultimately been created from methanol produced by the canceled plant, will be manufactured elsewhere and remain widely distributed in commerce in Washington. The problem is that Washington will not realize the economic benefits of contributing to the creation of these products, because the state concluded that the manufacturing process does not comply with Washington's rules for reducing global emissions. Therefore, to maintain consistency with the department of ecology's considered judgment about the global environmental destructiveness of methanol manufacturing, the legislature finds that products that contain olefins derived from methanol manufactured from natural gas should be prohibited in Washington in order to help the state achieve its emissions goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. No manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use products, or components of products, that contain olefins derived from methanol manufactured from natural gas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70A RCW.

--- END ---