BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.360.040 and 2017 c 336 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The secretary shall issue a certification as a medical assistant-certified to any person who has satisfactorily completed a medical assistant training program approved by the secretary, passed an examination approved by the secretary, and met any additional qualifications established under RCW 18.360.030.

(b) The secretary shall issue an interim certification to any person who has met all of the qualifications in (a) of this subsection, except for the passage of the examination. A person holding an interim permit possesses the full scope of practice of a medical assistant-certified. The interim permit expires upon passage of the examination or after one year, whichever occurs first, and may not be renewed.

(2)(a) The secretary shall issue a certification as a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician to any person who meets the qualifications for a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician established under RCW 18.360.030.

(b) In order to allow sufficient time for the processing of a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician certification, applicants for that credential who have completed their training program are allowed to continue to work at dialysis facilities, under the level of supervision required for the training program, for a period of up to 120 days after filing their application, to facilitate patient continuity of care.

(3) The secretary shall issue a certification as a medical assistant-phlebotomist to any person who meets the qualifications for a medical assistant-phlebotomist established under RCW 18.360.030.

(4) The secretary shall issue a certification as a forensic phlebotomist to any person who meets the qualifications for a forensic phlebotomist established under RCW 18.360.030.

(5)(a) The secretary shall issue a registration as a medical assistant-registered to any person who has a current endorsement from a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice.

(b) In order to be endorsed under this subsection (5), a person must:

(i) Be endorsed by a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice that meets the qualifications established under RCW 18.360.030; and

(ii) Have a current attestation of his or her endorsement to perform specific medical tasks signed by a supervising health care practitioner filed with the department. A medical assistant-registered may only perform the medical tasks listed in his or her current attestation of endorsement.

(c) A registration based on an endorsement by a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice is not transferable to another health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice.

(d) An applicant for registration as a medical assistant-registered who applies to the department within seven days of employment by the endorsing health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice may work as a medical assistant-registered for up to sixty days while the application is processed. The applicant must stop working on the sixtieth day of employment if the registration has not been granted for any reason.

(6) A certification issued under subsections (1) through (3) of this section is transferable between different practice settings. A certification under subsection (4) of this section is transferable between law enforcement agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---