BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.305 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, the state board of education shall be comprised of two nonpartisan members from each congressional district of the state, not including any congressional district at large, elected by the voters of each congressional district in the state.

(2) In the event that an even number of congressional districts exists in the state, an additional member shall be selected by an organization that represents approved private K-12 schools in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.305 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If any new and additional congressional district is created, except a congressional district at large, two persons shall be elected at the next general election at which state board of education members are elected to serve as members of the state board of education. At the first such election one member of the state board of education shall be elected for a term of four years.

(2) The terms of office of members of the state board of education who are elected from the various congressional districts shall not be affected by the creation of either new or new and additional districts. In such an event, each board member may continue to serve in office for the balance of the term for which he or she was elected or appointed: PROVIDED, That the board member continues to reside within the boundaries of the congressional district as they existed at the time of his or her election or appointment. Vacancies that occur in a board member position during the balance of any such term shall be filled under section 3 of this act by a successor who resides within the boundaries of the congressional district from which the member whose office was vacated was elected as they existed at the time of his or her election. At the election immediately preceding expiration of the term of office of each board member provided for in this subsection following the creation of either new or new and additional congressional districts, and thereafter, a successor shall be elected from the congressional district that corresponds in number with the congressional district from which the incumbent was appointed or elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.305 RCW to read as follows:

If there is a vacancy upon the state board of education, from any cause whatever, it is the duty of the remaining members of the board to fill that vacancy by appointment, and the person appointed continues in office until his or her successor has been elected and has qualified. At the next general election following the date of the occurrence of the vacancy, a successor shall be elected to hold office for the unexpired term of the member whose office was vacated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28A.305 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An election shall be held at the general election after the effective date of this section to elect members to the state board of education. Members shall take office on the second Monday of January following the election, on which date the terms of all members of the state board of education holding office on the effective date of this section shall expire. Of the initial members elected under this section, members elected from even-numbered congressional districts shall serve four-year terms and members elected from odd-numbered congressional districts shall serve two-year terms. Newly elected members of the state board of education shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified. Members who are elected subsequently shall be elected to four-year terms of office and shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29A.60.280.

(2) This section shall not apply to members selected under section 1(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28A.305.011 (Board membership--Terms--Compensation) and 2006 c 263 s 105 & 2005 c 497 s 101; and

(2) RCW 28A.305.021 (Election of board members--Restrictions) and 2005 c 497 s 102.

--- END ---