BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9A.48 RCW to read as follows:

When any person is found guilty of violating RCW 9A.48.090 or 9A.48.105 committed against property owned by the state of Washington under the jurisdiction of the department of transportation, the court must order a mandatory 30-day period of community restitution to require the removal of graffiti from the building, structure, or property where the offense was committed, unless the court finds that such an order is not practical. The community restitution must be imposed consecutively to any other community restitution the court imposes for the offense.

--- END ---