BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.80.050 and 2012 c 261 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A discover pass or a day-use permit are not required within a state park for persons who have a valid camper registration, or annual natural investment permit, issued by the state parks and recreation commission.

(2) ((The))In consultation with the director of the department of fish and wildlife and the commissioner of public lands, the director of the state parks and recreation commission must ((provide up to twelve days a))designate up to 12 days per calendar year where entry to ((state parks))a recreation site or lands is free. At least three of those days must be on weekends. When practicable, the free access days should be timed to correspond with any similar free access days planned by the national park service for national parks located in the general region of high volume state parks.

--- END ---