BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.64.257 and 2013 c 19 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall not prevent a medicare-approved dialysis center or facility operating a medicare-approved home dialysis program, or a manufacturer of commercially available dialysate and dialysis devices used by home dialysis patients, or a manufacturer's agent acting on behalf of such manufacturer, from selling, delivering, possessing, or dispensing directly to its dialysis patients, ((in case or full shelf lots,)) if prescribed by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW, dialysis devices and those legend drugs, in case or full shelf lots, determined by the commission pursuant to rule.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.41.032 and 2016 c 148 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall not prevent a medicare-approved dialysis center or facility operating a medicare-approved home dialysis program, or a manufacturer of commercially available dialysate used by home dialysis patients, or a manufacturer's agent acting on behalf of such manufacturer, from selling, delivering, possessing, or dispensing directly to its dialysis patients, in case or full shelf lots, if prescribed by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW, those legend drugs determined by the commission pursuant to rule.

--- END ---