BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

"The Evergreen State" is designated as the official nickname of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed as creating a requirement for any entity to update or revise any existing materials, documents, or publications.

--- END ---