BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.4011 and 2021 c 311 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for:

(a) Any person to create or deliver a counterfeit substance; or

(b) Any person to knowingly possess a counterfeit substance.

(2) Any person who violates subsection (1)(a) of this section with respect to:

(a) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug, or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(b) A counterfeit substance which is methamphetamine, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(c) Any other counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(d) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule IV, except flunitrazepam, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(e) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) A violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section is a ((misdemeanor))class C felony. The prosecutor is encouraged to divert such cases for assessment, treatment, or other services for a person's first two violations under this subsection.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.4013 and 2021 c 311 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly possess a controlled substance unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this chapter.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014, any person who violates this section is guilty of a ((misdemeanor))class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) The prosecutor is encouraged to divert cases under this section for assessment, treatment, or other services for a person's first two violations.

(4)(a) The possession, by a person twenty-one years of age or older, of useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products in amounts that do not exceed those set forth in RCW 69.50.360(3) is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(b) The possession of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products being physically transported or delivered within the state, in amounts not exceeding those that may be established under RCW 69.50.385(3), by a licensed employee of a common carrier when performing the duties authorized in accordance with RCW 69.50.382 and 69.50.385, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(5)(a) The delivery by a person twenty-one years of age or older to one or more persons twenty-one years of age or older, during a single twenty-four hour period, for noncommercial purposes and not conditioned upon or done in connection with the provision or receipt of financial consideration, of any of the following marijuana products, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provisions of Washington state law:

(i) One-half ounce of useable marijuana;

(ii) Eight ounces of marijuana-infused product in solid form;

(iii) Thirty-six ounces of marijuana-infused product in liquid form; or

(iv) Three and one-half grams of marijuana concentrates.

(b) The act of delivering marijuana or a marijuana product as authorized under this subsection (5) must meet one of the following requirements:

(i) The delivery must be done in a location outside of the view of general public and in a nonpublic place; or

(ii) The marijuana or marijuana product must be in the original packaging as purchased from the marijuana retailer.

(6) No person under twenty-one years of age may possess, manufacture, sell, or distribute marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrates, regardless of THC concentration. This does not include qualifying patients with a valid authorization.

(7) The possession by a qualifying patient or designated provider of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or plants in accordance with chapter 69.51A RCW is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

Sec. 3. RCW 10.31.115 and 2021 c 311 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For all individuals who otherwise would be subject to arrest for possession of a counterfeit substance under RCW 69.50.4011, possession of a controlled substance under RCW 69.50.4013, possession of 40 grams or less of marijuana under RCW 69.50.4014, or possession of a legend drug under RCW 69.41.030(2)(b), in lieu of jail booking and referral to the prosecutor, law enforcement ((shall))may offer a referral to assessment and services available pursuant to RCW 10.31.110 or other program or entity responsible for receiving referrals in lieu of legal system involvement, which may include the recovery navigator program established under RCW 71.24.115.

(2) If law enforcement agency records reflect that an individual has been diverted to referral for assessment and services twice or more previously, officers may, but are not required to, make additional diversion efforts.

(3) Nothing in this section precludes prosecutors from diverting or declining to file any charges for possession offenses that are referred under RCW 69.50.4011, 69.50.4013, 69.50.4014, or 69.41.030(2)(b) in the exercise of their discretion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2021 c 311 s 15;

(2) 2021 c 311 s 16; and

(3) 2021 c 311 s 29 (uncodified).

--- END ---