BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.39.007 and 1999 c 336 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 74.39.007, 74.39.050, ((74.39.060,)) 74.39.070, 43.190.060, and section 1, chapter 336, Laws of 1999 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Self-directed care" means the process in which an adult person, who is prevented by a functional disability from performing a manual function related to health care that an individual would otherwise perform for himself or herself, chooses to direct and supervise a paid personal aide to perform those tasks.

(2) "Personal aide" means an individual, working privately or as an individual provider ((under contract or agreement with the department of social and health services))as defined in RCW 74.39A.240, who acts at the direction of an adult person with a functional disability living in his or her own home and provides that person with health care services that a person without a functional disability can perform.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 74.39.060 (Personal aide providers—Registration) and 1999 c 336 s 4 are each repealed.

--- END ---