BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.310 RCW to read as follows:

State funding shall be provided to each educational service district for the employer cost of school employees' benefits that are provided to employees of an educational service district that are covered by a collective bargaining agreement.

--- END ---