BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.064 and 2013 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be in the counties of Benton and Franklin jointly, seven judges of the superior court; in the county of Clallam, three judges of the superior court; in the county of Jefferson, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Snohomish, ((fifteen))17 judges of the superior court; in the counties of Asotin, Columbia and Garfield jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Cowlitz, five judges of the superior court; in the counties of Klickitat and Skamania jointly, one judge of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The additional judicial positions created in section 1 of this act are effective only if Snohomish county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents its approval of the additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial positions as provided by state law and the state Constitution.

(2) The judicial positions created in section 1 of this act are effective July 1, 2022.

--- END ---