BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.18.057 and 2021 c 115 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every 14-day notice served pursuant to RCW 59.12.030(3) must be in substantially the following form:

"TO:

AND TO:

ADDRESS:

FOURTEEN-DAY NOTICE TO PAY RENT OR VACATE THE PREMISES

((You are receiving this notice because the))Your landlord ((alleges you are not in compliance with the terms of the lease agreement by failing to pay))claims you violated your lease agreement because you did not pay the following rent and/or utilities and/or recurring or periodic charges that are past due.

(1) Monthly rent due for (list month(s)): $ (dollar amount)

AND/OR

(2) Utilities due for (list month(s)): $ (dollar amount)

AND/OR

(3) Other recurring or periodic charges identified in the lease for (list month(s)): $ (dollar amount)

TOTAL AMOUNT DUE: $ (dollar amount)

Note - payment must be made pursuant to the terms of the rental agreement or by nonelectronic means including, but not limited to, cashier's check, money order, or other certified funds.

You must pay the total amount due to your landlord within fourteen (14) days after service of this notice or you must vacate the premises. Any payment you make to the landlord must first be applied to the total amount due as shown on this notice. ((Any failure to comply with this notice))If you do not pay the full amount due within fourteen (14) days after service of this notice ((may result in a judicial proceeding that leads to your eviction)), your landlord may start a court case to evict you from the premises.

The Washington state Office of the Attorney General has this notice in multiple languages as well as information on available resources to help you pay your rent, including state and local rental assistance programs, on its website at www.atg.wa.gov/landlord-tenant.

((State law provides you the right to legal representation and the court may be able to appoint a lawyer to represent you without cost to you if you are a qualifying low-income renter. If you believe you are a qualifying low-income renter and would like an attorney appointed to represent you))If you are a qualifying low-income renter and either you have been served with a summons or a complaint (a lawsuit) has been filed in court, or both, the court may be able to appoint a lawyer to represent you without cost to you. To find out what help is available, please contact the Eviction Defense Screening Line at 855-657-8387 or apply online at https://nwjustice.org/apply-online. For additional resources, call 2-1-1 or the Northwest Justice Project CLEAR Hotline outside King County (888) 201-1014 weekdays between 9:15 a.m. – 12:15 p.m., or (888) 387-7111 for seniors (age 60 and over). You may find additional information ((to help you))and self-help resources at http://www.washingtonlawhelp.org. Free or low-cost mediation services ((to assist in nonpayment of rent disputes before any judicial proceedings occur are also available)) at dispute resolution centers ((throughout the state))can help with disputes about past due rent before going to court. You can find your nearest dispute resolution center at https://www.resolutionwa.org.

((State law also provides you))You have the right to ((receive))free interpreter services at court.

OWNER/LANDLORD:___________DATE:______________

WHERE TOTAL AMOUNT DUE IS TO BE PAID: ___(owner/landlord name)___

___________(address)________"

(2) Upon expiration of the eviction resolution pilot program established under RCW 59.18.660:

(a) The landlord must also provide the notice required in this section to the dispute resolution center located within or serving the county in which the dwelling unit is located. It is a defense to an eviction under RCW 59.12.030 that a landlord did not provide additional notice under this subsection.

(b) Dispute resolution centers are encouraged to notify the housing justice project or northwest justice project located within or serving the county in which the dispute resolution center is located, as appropriate, once notice is received from the landlord under this subsection.

(3) The form required in this section does not abrogate any additional notice requirements to tenants as required by federal, state, or local law.

Sec. 2. RCW 59.18.365 and 2021 c 115 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The summons must contain the names of the parties to the proceeding, the attorney or attorneys if any, the court in which the same is brought, the nature of the action, in concise terms, and the relief sought, and also the return day; and must notify the defendant to appear and answer within the time designated or that the relief sought will be taken against him or her. The summons must contain a street address for service of the notice of appearance or answer and, if available, a facsimile number for the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, if represented. The summons must be served and returned in the same manner as a summons in other actions is served and returned.

(2) A defendant may serve a copy of an answer or notice of appearance by any of the following methods:

(a) By delivering a copy of the answer or notice of appearance to the person who signed the summons at the street address listed on the summons;

(b) By mailing a copy of the answer or notice of appearance addressed to the person who signed the summons to the street address listed on the summons;

(c) By facsimile to the facsimile number listed on the summons. Service by facsimile is complete upon successful transmission to the facsimile number listed upon the summons;

(d) As otherwise authorized by the superior court civil rules.

(3) The summons for unlawful detainer actions for tenancies covered by this chapter shall be substantially in the following form:

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE

STATE OF WASHINGTON

IN AND

FOR . . . . . . COUNTY

Plaintiff/

Landlord/

Owner,















NO.

vs.

EVICTION SUMMONS

(Residential)

Defendant/

Tenant/

Occupant.

((THIS IS AN IMPORTANT LEGAL DOCUMENT TO EVICT YOU.

YOUR WRITTEN

RESPONSE MUST BE RECEIVED BY: 5:00 p.m., on . . . . . . . . .))

TO: . . . . . . . . . . . . (Defendant's Name)

. . . . . . . . . . . . (Defendant's Address)

IMPORTANT! THIS IS A LEGAL NOTICE TO EVICT YOU.

DEADLINE! YOUR WRITTEN RESPONSE MUST BE RECEIVED BY: 5:00 p.m., on . . . . . . . . .

GET HELP: If you do not respond by the deadline above, you could be evicted. You will lose your right to defend yourself or be represented by a lawyer if you cannot afford one in court ((and could be evicted)). The court may ((be able to)) appoint a lawyer to represent you ((without))at no cost to you if you are low-income and are unable to afford a lawyer. If you believe you are a qualifying low-income renter and ((would like an attorney))want a lawyer appointed to represent you, please ((contact)):

(1) Call the Eviction Defense Screening Line at 855-657-8387; or ((apply))

(2) Apply online at https://nwjustice.org/apply-online. ((For additional resources, you may call 2-1-1 or the Northwest Justice Project CLEAR Hotline outside King County (888) 201-1014 weekdays between 9:15 a.m. – 12:15 p.m., or (888) 387-7111 for seniors (age 60 and over). You may find additional information to help you))Learn more about the eviction process, rent assistance, and your rights at http://www.washingtonlawhelp.org. Free or low-cost mediation services ((to assist in nonpayment of rent disputes before any judicial proceedings occur are also available)) at dispute resolution centers ((throughout the state))can help with disputes about past due rent before going to court. You can find your nearest dispute resolution center at https://www.resolutionwa.org.

HOW TO RESPOND: You must respond in writing. Phone calls to your Landlord or your Landlord's lawyer are not a response. You may respond with a "notice of appearance." This is ((a))any letter that includes the following:

(1) A statement that you are appearing in the court case

(2) Names of the landlord(s) and the tenant(s) (((as)) listed above(()))

(3) Your name, ((your)) address where you can receive legal documents ((may be sent)), your signature, phone number (if any), and case number (if the case is filed)

This case □ is / □ is not filed with the court. If this case is filed, you ((need to also))must file your response with the court clerk by ((delivering a copy to the clerk of the court))the deadline above. Deliver a copy to the Superior Court Clerk's office at: . . . . . . . . . . . (Clerk's Office/Address/Room number/Business hours of court clerk)

WHERE TO RESPOND: To your landlord or their lawyer. You must mail, fax, or hand deliver your response letter to your Landlord's lawyer, or if no lawyer is named in the complaint, to your Landlord. If you mail the response letter, you must do it 3 days before the deadline above. Request receipt of a proof of mailing from the post office. If you hand deliver or fax it, you must do it by the deadline above. The address is:

. . . . . . . . . (((Attorney/))Landlord/Lawyer's Name)

. . . . . . . . . (Address)

. . . . . . . . . (Fax - required if available)

COURT DATE: If you respond to this Summons, you will be notified of your hearing date in a document called an "Order to Show Cause." This is usually mailed to you. If you ((get notice of a hearing))receive an Order to Show Cause, you must go to the hearing. If you do not show up, your landlord can evict you. Your landlord might also charge you more money. If you move before the court date, you must tell your landlord or the landlord's ((attorney))lawyer.

Sec. 3. RCW 59.18.630 and 2021 c 115 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The eviction moratorium instituted by the governor of the state of Washington's proclamation 20-19.6 shall end on June 30, 2021.

(2))) If a tenant has remaining unpaid rent that accrued between March 1, 2020, and six months following ((the expiration of the eviction moratorium or)) the end of the public health emergency, ((whichever is greater,)) the landlord must offer the tenant a reasonable schedule for repayment of the unpaid rent that does not exceed monthly payments equal to one-third of the monthly rental charges during the period of accrued debt. ((If a tenant fails to accept the terms of a reasonable repayment plan within 14 days of the landlord's offer, the landlord may proceed with an unlawful detainer action as set forth in RCW 59.12.030(3) but subject))Subject to any additional requirements under the eviction resolution pilot program established under RCW 59.18.660, the landlord may proceed with an unlawful detainer action as set forth in RCW 59.12.030(3) and issue a 14-day pay or vacate notice only upon expiration of 14 days after the repayment plan is offered and the tenant's failure to accept the offer. If the tenant defaults on any rent owed under a repayment plan, the landlord may apply for reimbursement from the landlord mitigation program as authorized under RCW 43.31.605(1)(d) or proceed with an unlawful detainer action as set forth in RCW 59.12.030(3) but subject to any requirements under the eviction resolution pilot program established under RCW 59.18.660. The court must consider the tenant's circumstances, including decreased income or increased expenses due to COVID-19, and the repayment plan terms offered during any unlawful detainer proceeding.

(((3)))(2) Any repayment plan entered into under this section must:

(a) Not require payment until 30 days after the repayment plan is offered to the tenant;

(b) Cover rent only and not any late fees, attorneys' fees, or any other fees and charges;

(c) Allow for payments from any source of income as defined in RCW 59.18.255(5) or from pledges by nonprofit organizations, churches, religious institutions, or governmental entities; and

(d) Not include provisions or be conditioned on: The tenant's compliance with the rental agreement, payment of attorneys' fees, court costs, or other costs related to litigation if the tenant defaults on the rental agreement; a requirement that the tenant apply for governmental benefits or provide proof of receipt of governmental benefits; or the tenant's waiver of any rights to a notice under RCW 59.12.030 or related provisions before a writ of restitution is issued.

(((4)))(3) It is a defense to an eviction under RCW 59.12.030(3) that a landlord did not offer a repayment plan in conformity with this section.

(((5)))(4) To the extent available funds exist for rental assistance from a federal, state, local, private, or nonprofit program, the tenant or landlord may continue to seek rental assistance to reduce and/or eliminate the unpaid rent balance.

Sec. 4. RCW 59.18.640 and 2021 c 115 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the court must appoint an attorney for an indigent tenant in an unlawful detainer proceeding under this chapter and chapters 59.12 and 59.20 RCW. The office of civil legal aid is responsible for implementation of this subsection as provided in RCW 2.53.050, and the state shall pay the costs of legal services provided by an attorney appointed pursuant to this subsection. In implementing this section, the office of civil legal aid shall assign priority to providing legal representation to indigent tenants in those counties in which the most evictions occur and to indigent tenants who are disproportionately at risk of eviction.

(2) Upon request, a court before which an unlawful detainer proceeding is pending that involves an indigent tenant defendant eligible for appointment of an attorney under this section must allow and facilitate virtual representation of the tenant by the appointed attorney as well as virtual participation by the tenant.

(3) For purposes of this section, "indigent" means any person who, at any stage of a court proceeding, is:

(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance: Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, medical care services under RCW 74.09.035, pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or supplemental security income; or

(b) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of 200 percent or less of the current federally established poverty level.

Sec. 5. RCW 59.18.660 and 2021 c 115 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the administrative office of the courts shall contract with dispute resolution centers as described under chapter 7.75 RCW within or serving each county to establish a court-based eviction resolution pilot program operated in accordance with Washington supreme court order no. 25700-B-639 ((and))or any standing judicial order of the individual superior court.

(2) The eviction resolution pilot program must be used to facilitate the resolution of nonpayment of rent cases between a landlord and tenant before the landlord files an unlawful detainer action.

(3) Prior to filing an unlawful detainer action for nonpayment of rent, the landlord must provide a notice as required under RCW 59.12.030(3) and an additional notice to the tenant informing them of the eviction resolution pilot program. The landlord must retain proof of service or mailing of the additional notice. The additional notice to the tenant must provide at least the following information regarding the eviction resolution pilot program:

(a) Contact information for the local dispute resolution center;

(b) Contact information for the county's housing justice project or, if none, a statewide organization providing housing advocacy services for low-income residents;

(c) The following statement: "The Washington state office of the attorney general has this notice in multiple languages on its website. You will also find information there on how to find a lawyer or advocate at low or no cost and any available resources to help you pay your rent. Alternatively, you may find additional information to help you at http://www.washingtonlawhelp.org";

(d) The name and contact information of the landlord, the landlord's attorney, if any, and the tenant; and

(e) The following statement: "Failure to respond to this notice within 14 days may result in the filing of a summons and complaint for an unlawful detainer action with the court."

Alternatively, the landlord may use the "ERPP Notice and Resource Information" form, which includes rental assistance information, accessible on the Washington state office of the attorney general's website at www.atg.wa.gov/landlord-tenant, to satisfy the additional notice requirement under this subsection (3).

(4) At the time of service or mailing of the pay or vacate notice and additional notice to the tenant, a landlord must also send copies of these notices to the local dispute resolution center serving the area where the property is located.

(5) A landlord must secure a certification of participation with the eviction resolution program by the appropriate dispute resolution center before an unlawful detainer action for nonpayment of rent may be heard by the court.

(6) The administrative office of the courts may also establish and produce any other notice forms and requirements as necessary to implement the eviction resolution pilot program.

(7) Any superior court, in collaboration with the dispute resolution center that is located within or serving the same county, participating in the eviction resolution pilot program must report annually to the administrative office of the courts beginning January 1, 2022, until January 1, 2023, on the following:

(a) The number of unlawful detainer actions for nonpayment of rent that were subject to program requirements;

(b) The number of referrals made to dispute resolution centers;

(c) The number of nonpayment of rent cases resolved by the program;

(d) How many instances the tenant had legal representation either at the conciliation stage or formal mediation stage;

(e) The number of certifications issued by dispute resolution centers and filed by landlords with the court; and

(f) Any other information that relates to the efficacy of the pilot program.

(8) By July 1, 2022, until July 1, 2023, the administrative office of the courts must provide a report to the legislature summarizing the report data shared by the superior courts and dispute resolution centers under subsection (7) of this section.

(9) This section expires July 1, 2023.

Sec. 6. RCW 59.18.410 and 2021 c 115 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If at trial the verdict of the jury or, if the case is tried without a jury, the finding of the court is in favor of the landlord and against the tenant, judgment shall be entered for the restitution of the premises; and if the proceeding is for unlawful detainer after neglect or failure to perform any condition or covenant of a lease or agreement under which the property is held, or after default in the payment of rent, the judgment shall also declare the forfeiture of the lease, agreement, or tenancy. The jury, or the court, if the proceedings are tried without a jury, shall also assess the damages arising out of the tenancy occasioned to the landlord by any forcible entry, or by any forcible or unlawful detainer, alleged in the complaint and proved at trial, and, if the alleged unlawful detainer is based on default in the payment of rent, find the amount of any rent due, and the judgment shall be rendered against the tenant liable for the forcible entry, forcible detainer, or unlawful detainer for the amount of damages thus assessed, for the rent, if any, found due, and late fees if such fees are due under the lease and do not exceed seventy-five dollars in total. The court may award statutory costs. The court may also award reasonable attorneys' fees as provided in RCW 59.18.290.

(2) When the tenant is liable for unlawful detainer after a default in the payment of rent, execution upon the judgment shall not occur until the expiration of five court days after the entry of the judgment. Before entry of a judgment or until five court days have expired after entry of the judgment, the tenant or any subtenant, or any mortgagee of the term, or other party interested in the continuance of the tenancy, may pay into court or to the landlord the amount of the rent due, any court costs incurred at the time of payment, late fees if such fees are due under the lease and do not exceed seventy-five dollars in total, and attorneys' fees if awarded, in which event any judgment entered shall be satisfied and the tenant restored to his or her tenancy. If the tenant seeks to restore his or her tenancy after entry of a judgment, the tenant may tender the amount stated within the judgment as long as that amount does not exceed the amount authorized under subsection (1) of this section. If a tenant seeks to restore his or her tenancy and pay the amount set forth in this subsection with funds acquired through an emergency rental assistance program provided by a governmental or nonprofit entity, the tenant shall provide a copy of the pledge of emergency rental assistance provided from the appropriate governmental or nonprofit entity and have an opportunity to exercise such rights under this subsection, which may include a stay of judgment and provision by the landlord of documentation necessary for processing the assistance. The landlord shall accept any pledge of emergency rental assistance funds provided to the tenant from a governmental or nonprofit entity before the expiration of any pay or vacate notice for nonpayment of rent for the full amount of the rent owing under the rental agreement. The landlord shall accept any written pledge of emergency rental assistance funds provided to the tenant from a governmental or nonprofit entity after the expiration of the pay or vacate notice if the pledge will contribute to the total payment of both the amount of rent due, including any current rent, and other amounts if required under this subsection. The landlord shall suspend any court action for seven court days after providing necessary payment information to the nonprofit or governmental entity to allow for payment of the emergency rental assistance funds. By accepting such pledge of emergency rental assistance, the landlord is not required to enter into any additional conditions not related to the provision of necessary payment information and documentation. If a judgment has been satisfied, the landlord shall file a satisfaction of judgment with the court. A tenant seeking to exercise rights under this subsection shall pay an additional fifty dollars for each time the tenant was reinstated after judgment pursuant to this subsection within the previous twelve months prior to payment. If payment of the amount specified in this subsection is not made within five court days after the entry of the judgment, the judgment may be enforced for its full amount and for the possession of the premises.

(3)(a) Following the entry of a judgment in favor of the landlord and against the tenant for the restitution of the premises and forfeiture of the tenancy due to nonpayment of rent, the court, at the time of the show cause hearing or trial, or upon subsequent motion of the tenant but before the execution of the writ of restitution, may stay the writ of restitution upon good cause and on such terms that the court deems fair and just for both parties. In making this decision, the court shall consider evidence of the following factors:

(i) The tenant's willful or intentional default or intentional failure to pay rent;

(ii) Whether nonpayment of the rent was caused by exigent circumstances that were beyond the tenant's control and that are not likely to recur;

(iii) The tenant's ability to timely pay the judgment;

(iv) The tenant's payment history;

(v) Whether the tenant is otherwise in substantial compliance with the rental agreement;

(vi) Hardship on the tenant if evicted; and

(vii) Conduct related to other notices served within the last six months.

(b) The burden of proof for such relief under this subsection (3) shall be on the tenant. If the tenant seeks relief pursuant to this subsection (3) at the time of the show cause hearing, the court shall hear the matter at the time of the show cause hearing or as expeditiously as possible so as to avoid unnecessary delay or hardship on the parties.

(c) In any order issued pursuant to this subsection (3):

(i) The court shall not stay the writ of restitution more than ninety days from the date of order, but may order repayment of the judgment balance within such time. If the payment plan is to exceed thirty days, the total cumulative payments for each thirty-day period following the order shall be no less than one month of the tenant's share of the rent, and the total amount of the judgment and all additional rent that is due shall be paid within ninety days.

(ii) Within any payment plan ordered by the court, the court shall require the tenant to pay to the landlord or to the court one month's rent within five court days of issuance of the order. If the date of the order is on or before the fifteenth of the month, the tenant shall remain current with ongoing rental payments as they become due for the duration of the payment plan; if the date of the order is after the fifteenth of the month, the tenant shall have the option to apportion the following month's rental payment within the payment plan, but monthly rental payments thereafter shall be paid according to the rental agreement.

(iii) The sheriff may serve the writ of restitution upon the tenant before the expiration of the five court days of issuance of the order; however, the sheriff shall not execute the writ of restitution until after expiration of the five court days in order for payment to be made of one month's rent as required by (c)(ii) of this subsection. In the event payment is made as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection for one month's rent, the court shall stay the writ of restitution ex parte without prior notice to the landlord upon the tenant filing and presenting a motion to stay with a declaration of proof of payment demonstrating full compliance with the required payment of one month's rent. Any order staying the writ of restitution under this subsection (3)(c)(iii) shall require the tenant to serve a copy of the order on the landlord by personal delivery, first-class mail, facsimile, or email if agreed to by the parties.

(A) If the tenant has satisfied (c)(ii) of this subsection by paying one month's rent within five court days, but defaults on a subsequent payment required by the court pursuant to this subsection (3)(c), the landlord may enforce the writ of restitution after serving a notice of default in accordance with RCW 59.12.040 informing the tenant that he or she has defaulted on rent due under the lease agreement or payment plan entered by the court. Upon service of the notice of default, the tenant shall have three calendar days from the date of service to vacate the premises before the sheriff may execute the writ of restitution.

(B) If the landlord serves the notice of default described under this subsection (3)(c)(iii), an additional day is not included in calculating the time before the sheriff may execute the writ of restitution. The notice of default must be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF DEFAULT FOR RENT AND/OR PAYMENT PLAN ORDERED BY COURT

NAME(S)

ADDRESS

CITY, STATE, ZIP

THIS IS NOTICE THAT YOU ARE IN DEFAULT OF YOUR RENT AND/OR PAYMENT PLAN ORDERED BY THE COURT. YOUR LANDLORD HAS RECEIVED THE FOLLOWING PAYMENTS:

DATE

AMOUNT

DATE

AMOUNT

DATE

AMOUNT

THE LANDLORD MAY SCHEDULE YOUR PHYSICAL EVICTION WITHIN THREE CALENDAR DAYS OF SERVICE OF THIS NOTICE. TO STOP A PHYSICAL EVICTION, YOU ARE REQUIRED TO PAY THE BALANCE OF YOUR RENT AND/OR PAYMENT PLAN IN THE AMOUNT OF $. . . . ..

PAYMENT MAY BE MADE TO THE COURT OR TO THE LANDLORD. IF YOU FAIL TO PAY THE BALANCE WITHIN THREE CALENDAR DAYS, THE LANDLORD MAY PROCEED WITH A PHYSICAL EVICTION FOR POSSESSION OF THE UNIT THAT YOU ARE RENTING.

DATE

SIGNATURE

LANDLORD/AGENT

NAME

ADDRESS

PHONE

(iv) If a tenant seeks to satisfy a condition of this subsection (3)(c) by relying on an emergency rental assistance program provided by a government or nonprofit entity and provides an offer of proof, the court shall stay the writ of restitution as necessary to afford the tenant an equal opportunity to comply.

(v) The court shall extend the writ of restitution as necessary to enforce the order issued pursuant to this subsection (3)(c) in the event of default.

(d) ((A tenant who has been served with three or more notices to pay or vacate for failure to pay rent as set forth in RCW 59.12.040 within twelve months prior to the notice to pay or vacate upon which the proceeding is based may not seek relief under this subsection (3).

(e)))(i) In any application seeking relief pursuant to this subsection (3) by either the tenant or landlord, the court shall issue a finding as to whether the tenant is low-income, limited resourced, or experiencing hardship to determine if the parties would be eligible for disbursement through the landlord mitigation program account established within RCW 43.31.605(1)(c). In making this finding, the court may include an inquiry regarding the tenant's income relative to area median income, household composition, any extenuating circumstances, or other factors, and may rely on written declarations or oral testimony by the parties at the hearing.

(ii) After a finding that the tenant is low-income, limited resourced, or experiencing hardship, the court may issue an order: (A) Finding that the landlord is eligible to receive on behalf of the tenant and may apply for reimbursement from the landlord mitigation program; and (B) directing the clerk to remit, without further order of the court, any future payments made by the tenant in order to reimburse the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 43.31.605(1)(c)(iii). In accordance with RCW 43.31.605(1)(c), such an order must be accompanied by a copy of the order staying the writ of restitution. Nothing in this subsection (3)(((e)))(d) shall be deemed to obligate the department of commerce to provide assistance in claim reimbursement through the landlord mitigation program if there are not sufficient funds.

(iii) If the department of commerce fails to disburse payment to the landlord for the judgment pursuant to this subsection (3)(((e)))(d) within thirty days from submission of the application, the landlord may renew an application for a writ of restitution pursuant to RCW 59.18.370 and for other rent owed by the tenant since the time of entry of the prior judgment. In such event, the tenant may exercise rights afforded under this section.

(iv) Upon payment by the department of commerce to the landlord for the remaining or total amount of the judgment, as applicable, the judgment is satisfied and the landlord shall file a satisfaction of judgment with the court.

(v) Nothing in this subsection (3)(((e)))(d) prohibits the landlord from otherwise applying for reimbursement for an unpaid judgment pursuant to RCW 43.31.605(1)(c) after the tenant defaults on a payment plan ordered pursuant to (c) of this subsection.

(((vi) For the period extending one year beyond the expiration of the eviction moratorium, if a tenant demonstrates an ability to pay in order to reinstate the tenancy by means of disbursement through the landlord mitigation program account established within RCW 43.31.605(1)(c):

(A) Any restrictions imposed under (d) of this subsection do not apply in determining if a tenant is eligible for reinstatement under this subsection (3); and

(B) Reimbursement on behalf of the tenant to the landlord under RCW 43.31.605(1)(c) may include up to three months of prospective rent to stabilize the tenancy as determined by the court.))

(4) If a tenant seeks to stay a writ of restitution issued pursuant to this chapter, the court may issue an ex parte stay of the writ of restitution provided the tenant or tenant's attorney submits a declaration indicating good faith efforts were made to notify the other party or, if no efforts were made, why notice could not be provided prior to the application for an ex parte stay, and describing the immediate or irreparable harm that may result if an immediate stay is not granted. The court shall require service of the order and motion to stay the writ of restitution by personal delivery, mail, facsimile, or other means most likely to afford all parties notice of the court date.

(5) In all other cases the judgment may be enforced immediately. If a writ of restitution shall have been executed prior to judgment no further writ or execution for the premises shall be required.

(6) This section also applies if the writ of restitution is issued pursuant to a final judgment entered after a show cause hearing conducted in accordance with RCW 59.18.380.

--- END ---