BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city within such county, that purchases a hotel, as defined in RCW 19.48.010, with public funds for purposes of providing emergency housing or emergency shelter must limit the use and occupancy of such housing and shelters to the following:

(a) Persons with disabilities experiencing homelessness;

(b) Families experiencing homelessness including, but not limited to, pregnant women;

(c) Persons aged 60 years or more experiencing homelessness; or

(d) Other persons subject to the following conditions:

(i) Payment of no more than 30 percent of their annual median income toward rent or providing at least 24 hours of community service; and

(ii) Stays are limited for no longer than 90 days except between November and February.

(2) Each planning county and each city within such county must provide employment, mental health, drug counseling service, and job training opportunities and services at each emergency housing and shelter described under subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---