BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.103.010 and 2020 c 297 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 28B.103.020 and 28B.103.030.

(1) "Eligible student" means a member of the Washington national guard who attends an institution of higher education that is located in this state and accredited by the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges, or an institution that is located in this state that provides approved training under the Montgomery GI Bill, and who meets any additional selection criteria adopted by the office and all of the following participation requirements:

(a) ((Has not achieved a baccalaureate or higher degree from any postsecondary institution))Enrolled in courses or programs that lead to a postsecondary degree or certificate;

(b) Is an active drilling member in good standing in the Washington national guard as specified in rules adopted by the office for implementation of the Washington national guard postsecondary education grant;

(c) Has completed and submitted an application for student aid approved by the office;

(d) Is a resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012; and

(e) Agrees to fulfill his or her service obligation.

(2) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means either to render service in the Washington national guard in lieu of monetary repayment, or to be relieved of the service obligation under rules adopted by the office.

(3) "Grant" means the Washington national guard postsecondary education grant as established in RCW 28B.103.020.

(4) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance created in RCW 28B.76.090.

(5) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a Washington national guard postsecondary education grant under this chapter.

(6) "Service obligation" means serving in the Washington national guard for a time period of at least one year of service in the Washington national guard for each year the student receives a Washington national guard postsecondary education grant.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.103.020 and 2020 c 297 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington national guard postsecondary education grant program is established. The program shall be administered by the office. In administering the program, the powers and duties of the office shall include, but need not be limited to:

(1) With the assistance of the Washington military department, the selection of eligible students to receive the Washington national guard postsecondary education grant as follows:

(a) An eligible student may receive a grant under this section to help pay for postsecondary education program costs as approved by the office. ((Awards shall be valued as follows))Grants may not:

(i) ((The difference between the student's tuition and required fees, less the value of any federal and state funded grant, scholarship, or waiver assistance the students [student] receives; and

(ii) Five hundred dollars for books and materials))Exceed the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, plus $500 for books and supplies;

(ii) Exceed the student's cost of attendance, when combined with all other public and private grants, scholarships, and waiver assistance the student receives; or

(iii) Result in reduction of a participant's federal or other state financial aid.

(b) The Washington military department shall ensure that data needed to identify eligible recipients are promptly transmitted to the office.

(c) The annual amount of each Washington national guard postsecondary education grant may vary, but may not exceed the annual cost of undergraduate tuition fees and services and activities fees at the University of Washington, plus an allowance for books and supplies.

(d) Washington national guard postsecondary (([education]))education grant eligibility may not extend beyond five years or one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of the program in which the student is enrolled or the credit or clock-hour equivalent;

(2) The award of grants funded by federal and state funds, private donations, or repayments from any participant who does not complete the participant's service obligation;

(3) The adoption of necessary rules and policies, including establishing a priority for eligible students attending an institution of higher education located in this state that is accredited by the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges;

(4) The adoption of participant selection criteria. The criteria may include but need not be limited to requirements for: Satisfactory academic progress, enrollment in courses or programs that lead to a baccalaureate degree or an associate degree or a certificate, and satisfactory participation as a member of the Washington national guard;

(5) With the assistance of the Washington military department, the notification of participants of their additional service obligation or required repayment of the Washington national guard postsecondary education grant; and

(6) The collection of repayments from participants who do not meet the service obligations.

--- END ---