BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.58A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any provider licensed under Title 18 RCW or facility licensed under Title 70 RCW that provides abortion services shall provide the following information to the department of health during the month following provision of the service:

(a) The number of failed abortions resulting in a live birth;

(b) The number of patients who became unintentionally sterile following an abortion; and

(c) The average length of stay in the hospital for patients due to complications from an abortion.

(2) The facility or provider shall report the information required in subsection (1) of this section in conjunction with all other abortion data required by the department in rule.

(3) The department shall include data collected pursuant to this section in any publicly available report on abortion statistics in a form that does not identify the facility, patient, or provider.

--- END ---