BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. As of July 2019, almost 22 percent of the population of Washington state was under 18 years of age. The legislature finds that it is critical to invest in both the formal and informal education of the youth of the state. While there are existing youth development programs in the state, it is in the best interest of the state to sponsor youth agriculture education and development programs by voluntary grassroots advocacy organizations and career and technical student organizations focusing on agricultural education. In addition to science, technology, engineering, mathematics, and robotics, this youth development program must focus on animal husbandry and agricultural education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 15.76 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Voluntary, grassroots organizations representing the social and economic interest of farm and ranch families at the local, state, and national levels may sponsor youth development programs to promote participation in agricultural fairs, youth shows, and exhibitions and education in science, technology, engineering, mathematics, and robotics as well as animal husbandry and agricultural education. The youth development program must incorporate civics, civil society, and participation in government into its programming.

(2) It is in the public interest to support youth participation in youth development programs as described in subsection (1) of this section, programs authorized in RCW 36.50.010, and membership in the Washington FFA association, which is the agricultural education career and technical student organization recognized by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The legislature will appropriate funds to fulfill the enrollment fees owed to the programs by participants as a state allocation as defined in RCW 15.76.110.

(3) In order to receive appropriated funds, after the annual enrollment period, the program must submit a roster of enrolled youth to the department in order to receive a reimbursement of all enrollment fees. Any other fees submitted for reimbursement must be done before the end of the fiscal year.

Sec. 3. RCW 15.76.110 and 2018 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Agricultural fair" means a fair or exhibition which is intended to promote agriculture and support rural economic development by including a balanced variety of exhibits of livestock and agricultural products, as well as related arts and manufactures; including products of the farm home and educational contests, displays, and demonstrations designed to train youth and to promote the welfare of farm people and rural living.

(2) "Department" means the state department of agriculture.

(3) "Director" means the director of agriculture.

(4) "Commission" means the fairs commission created by this chapter.

(5) "State allocations" means allocations from the state fair fund.

(6) "Youth development program" means programs designed to educate youth in agriculture, animal husbandry, food preservation, civic engagement, science, technology, engineering, mathematics, mechanics, and other skills to promote healthy living, leadership, and engagement including, but not limited to, programs under section 2 of this act, programs authorized in RCW 36.50.010, and membership in the Washington FFA association.

Sec. 4. RCW 15.76.115 and 2021 c 245 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The fair fund is created in the custody of the state treasury.

(2)(a) All moneys received by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this fund and from RCW 67.16.105 shall be deposited into the fund. Each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer into the fair fund from the general fund an amount appropriated in the omnibus operating appropriations act equal to:

(((a)))(i) $2,000,000 for fiscal year 2021;

(((b)))(ii) $2,750,000 in each fiscal year 2022 and 2023;

(((c)))(iii) $3,500,000 in each fiscal year 2024 and 2025; and

(((d)))(iv) $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter.

(((e)))(b) To support inclusiveness at fair events, a portion of the additional funds provided to fairs as a result of chapter 245, Laws of 2021 must be prioritized to be spent on educational programs and outreach that are reflective of the diversity within a fair's local population.

(3) Expenditures from the fund may be used only for assisting fairs in the manner provided in this chapter, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. Only the director of agriculture or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

(4) The director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund, subject to the availability of appropriations for this specific purpose, for the purpose of reimbursing the enrollment fees owed to the youth development programs under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5. RCW 15.76.140 and 2018 c 280 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before any agricultural fair may become eligible for state allocations it must have conducted two successful consecutive annual fairs immediately preceding application for such allocations, and have its application therefor approved by the director.

(2) The director may waive the requirement in subsection (1) of this section if:

(a) A county fair reorganizing as an area fair has, through a current or predecessor organization, received an allocation from the fair fund as a county fair for at least two years; or

(b) A fair is not held due to a natural disaster such as a flood or wildfire.

(3) Youth development programs are not subject to the eligibility requirements in this section and may receive funds to fulfill the enrollment fees owed to the youth development programs under section 2 of this act subject to the availability of appropriations for this specific purpose.

Sec. 6. RCW 15.76.150 and 2018 c 280 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Using the department's forms, the board of trustees of any fair or youth show may apply to the department for allocations from the state fair fund.

(2)(a) The director may allocate ((ninety-five))95 percent of the state fair fund, including its interest income under RCW 43.79A.040, to applicant agricultural fairs, distributed according to merit as measured by a merit rating to be set up by the director. This merit rating must take into account such factors as area and population served, open and/or youth participation, attendance, gate receipts, number and type of exhibits, premiums paid, community support, evidence of successful achievement of the aims and purposes of the fair, extent of improvements made to grounds and facilities from year to year, and overall condition and appearance of grounds and facilities.

(b) The department may use up to ((ten))10 percent of the amount allocated in (a) of this subsection for special assistance to any participating fair or fairs.

(c) The department may use the remaining five percent of money in the state fair fund for expenses incurred in the administration of this chapter, which may include the fair commission expenses approved by the director.

(3) The division and payment of funds authorized in this section shall occur at such times as the director may prescribe.

(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund, subject to the availability of appropriations for this specific purpose, for the purpose of reimbursing the enrollment fees owed to the youth development programs under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---