BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.020 and 2021 c 264 s 21 and 2021 c 263 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(3) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;

(4) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(5) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;

(6) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;

(7) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder;

(8) "Behavioral health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health, substance use disorder, or co-occurring disorder services to persons with behavioral health disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to: Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section; community mental health service delivery systems or community behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025; licensed or certified behavioral health agencies under RCW 71.24.037; facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW; approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section; secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities as defined in this section; and correctional facilities operated by state and local governments;

(9) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105;

(10) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;

(11) "Community behavioral health agency" has the same meaning as "licensed or certified behavioral health agency" defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(12) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;

(13) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization;

(14) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;

(15) "Department" means the department of health;

(16) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county, by an entity appointed by the county, or by the authority in consultation with a federally recognized Indian tribe or after meeting and conferring with an Indian health care provider, to perform the duties specified in this chapter;

(17) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;

(18) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;

(19) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(5);

(20) "Director" means the director of the authority;

(21) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;

(22) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(23) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;

(24) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;

(25) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;

(26) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.05.820;

(27) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a behavioral health facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;

(28) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;

(29) "In need of assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment" ((means that a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder: (a) Has been committed by a court to detention for involuntary behavioral health treatment during the preceding thirty-six months; (b) is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient treatment without an order for less restrictive alternative treatment, based on a history of nonadherence with treatment or in view of the person's current behavior; (c) is likely to benefit from less restrictive alternative treatment; and (d) requires less restrictive alternative treatment to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled within a reasonably short period of time))refers to a person who meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment established under RCW 71.05.148;

(30) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;

(31) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;

(32) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(33) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130;

(34) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585. This term includes: Treatment pursuant to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320; treatment pursuant to a conditional release under RCW 71.05.340; and treatment pursuant to an assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment order under RCW 71.05.148;

(35) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;

(36) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;

(37) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder;

(38) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;

(39) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(40) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;

(41) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW;

(42) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders;

(43) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(44) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;

(45) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;

(46) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;

(47) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;

(48) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;

(49) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;

(50) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;

(51) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health;

(52) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;

(53) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;

(54) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(55) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;

(56) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for behavioral health disorders, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;

(57) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, which is designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and must meet department residential treatment facility standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or involuntary placement facility;

(58) "Video," unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology. "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment;

(59) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.020 and 2021 c 264 s 23 and 2021 c 263 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(3) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;

(4) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(5) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;

(6) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;

(7) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder;

(8) "Behavioral health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health, substance use disorder, or co-occurring disorder services to persons with behavioral health disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to: Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section; community mental health service delivery systems or community behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025; licensed or certified behavioral health agencies under RCW 71.24.037; facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW; approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section; secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities as defined in this section; and correctional facilities operated by state and local governments;

(9) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105;

(10) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;

(11) "Community behavioral health agency" has the same meaning as "licensed or certified behavioral health agency" defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(12) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;

(13) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization;

(14) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;

(15) "Department" means the department of health;

(16) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county, by an entity appointed by the county, or by the authority in consultation with a federally recognized Indian tribe or after meeting and conferring with an Indian health care provider, to perform the duties specified in this chapter;

(17) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;

(18) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;

(19) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(5);

(20) "Director" means the director of the authority;

(21) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;

(22) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(23) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;

(24) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration from safe behavior evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;

(25) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;

(26) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.05.820;

(27) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a behavioral health facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;

(28) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;

(29) "In need of assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment" ((means that a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder: (a) Has been committed by a court to detention for involuntary behavioral health treatment during the preceding thirty-six months; (b) is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient treatment without an order for less restrictive alternative treatment, based on a history of nonadherence with treatment or in view of the person's current behavior; (c) is likely to benefit from less restrictive alternative treatment; and (d) requires less restrictive alternative treatment to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled within a reasonably short period of time))refers to a person who meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment established under RCW 71.05.148;

(30) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;

(31) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;

(32) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(33) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130;

(34) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585. This term includes: Treatment pursuant to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320; treatment pursuant to a conditional release under RCW 71.05.340; and treatment pursuant to an assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment order under RCW 71.05.148;

(35) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;

(36) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused harm, substantial pain, or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of harm to themselves or others; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;

(37) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder;

(38) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;

(39) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(40) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;

(41) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW;

(42) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders;

(43) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(44) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;

(45) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;

(46) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;

(47) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;

(48) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;

(49) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;

(50) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;

(51) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health;

(52) "Severe deterioration from safe behavior" means that a person will, if not treated, suffer or continue to suffer severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress, and this distress is associated with significant impairment of judgment, reason, or behavior;

(53) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;

(54) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;

(55) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(56) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;

(57) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for behavioral health disorders, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;

(58) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, which is designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and must meet department residential treatment facility standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or involuntary placement facility;

(59) "Video," unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology. "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment;

(60) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.05.148 and 2019 c 446 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

((This section establishes a process for initial evaluation and filing of a petition for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment, but however does not preclude the filing of a petition for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment following a period of inpatient detention in appropriate circumstances:))

(1) ((The designated crisis responder))A person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence in response to a petition filed under this section that:

(a) The person has a behavioral health disorder;

(b) Based on a clinical determination and in view of the person's treatment history and current behavior, at least one of the following is true:

(i) The person is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision and the person's condition is substantially deteriorating; or

(ii) The person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in grave disability or a likelihood of serious harm to the person or to others;

(c) The person has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for his or her behavioral health disorder, in that at least one of the following is true:

(i) The person's behavioral health disorder has, at least twice within the last 36 months, been a substantial factor in necessitating hospitalization, or receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a state correctional facility or local correctional facility, not including any period during which the person was hospitalized or incarcerated immediately preceding the filing of the petition;

(ii) The person's behavioral health disorder has, at least twice within the last 36 months, been a substantial factor in necessitating emergency medical care, a substantial factor necessitating hospitalization for behavioral health-related medical conditions including overdose, infected abscesses, sepsis, endocarditis, or other maladies, or a substantial factor in behavior which resulted in the person's incarceration in a state or local correctional facility; or

(iii) The person's behavioral health disorder has resulted in one or more violent acts, threats, or attempts to cause serious physical harm to themselves or another within the last 48 months, not including any period in which the person was hospitalized or incarcerated immediately preceding the filing of the petition;

(d) The person has been offered an opportunity to participate in a treatment plan, and the person continues to not engage in treatment;

(e) Participation in an assisted outpatient treatment program would be the least restrictive alternative necessary to ensure the person's recovery and stability; and

(f) The person will benefit from assisted outpatient treatment.

(2) The following individuals may directly file a petition for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that a person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment:

(a) The director of a hospital where the person is hospitalized;

(b) The director of a behavioral health service provider providing behavioral health care or residential services to the person;

(c) The person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional or one who has evaluated the person;

(d) A designated crisis responder;

(e) A release planner from a corrections facility; or

(f) An emergency room physician.

(3) A court order for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment may be effective for up to 18 months. The petitioner must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, ((and))to determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate ((evaluation and)) treatment ((at a mental health facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program)).

(((2)))(4) The ((designated crisis responder))petitioner must ((investigate and evaluate the))allege specific facts ((alleged and))based on personal observation, evaluation, or investigation, and must consider the reliability or credibility of any person providing information((. The designated crisis responder may spend up to forty-eight hours to complete the investigation, provided that the person may not be held for investigation for any period except as authorized by RCW 71.05.050 or 71.05.153))material to the petition.

(((3) If the designated crisis responder finds that the person is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment, they may file a petition requesting the court to enter an order for up to ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment.))(5) The petition must include:

(a) A statement of the circumstances under which the person's condition was made known and ((stating that there is evidence, as a result of the designated crisis responder's))the basis for the opinion, from personal observation or investigation, that the person is in need of assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment((, and stating the)). The petitioner must state which specific facts ((known as a result of))come from personal observation ((or investigation, upon which the designated crisis responder bases))and specify what other sources of information the petitioner has relied upon to form this belief;

(b) A declaration from a physician, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or the person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, who has examined the person no more than 10 days prior to the submission of the petition and who is willing to testify in support of the petition, or who alternatively has made appropriate attempts to examine the person within the same period but has not been successful in obtaining the person's cooperation, and who is willing to testify to the reasons they believe that the person meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment. If the declaration is provided by the person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, it must be cosigned by a supervising physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner who certifies that they have reviewed the declaration;

(c) The declarations of additional witnesses, if any, supporting the petition for assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment;

(((c) A designation of retained counsel for the person or, if counsel is appointed, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person;))

(d) The name of an agency, provider, or facility which ((agreed))agrees to ((assume the responsibility of providing))provide less restrictive alternative treatment if the petition is granted by the court; and

(e) ((A summons to appear in court at a specific time and place within five judicial days for a probable cause hearing, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section))If the person is detained in a state hospital, inpatient treatment facility, jail, or correctional facility at the time the petition is filed, the anticipated release date of the person and any other details needed to facilitate successful reentry and transition into the community.

(((4) If the person is in the custody of jail or prison at the time of the investigation, a petition for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment may be used to facilitate continuity of care after release from custody or the diversion of criminal charges as follows:

(a) If the petition is filed in anticipation of the person's release from custody, the summons may be for a date up to five judicial days following the person's anticipated release date, provided that a clear time and place for the hearing is provided; or

(b) The hearing may be held prior to the person's release from custody, provided that (i) the filing of the petition does not extend the time the person would otherwise spend in the custody of jail or prison; (ii) the charges or custody of the person is not a pretext to detain the person for the purpose of the involuntary commitment hearing; and (iii) the person's release from custody must be expected to swiftly follow the adjudication of the petition. In this circumstance, the time for hearing is shortened to three judicial days after the filing of the petition.

(5)))(6) The petition must be served upon the ((person and the person's counsel with a notice of applicable rights))prosecuting attorney for the county. Proof of service must be filed with the court. The prosecuting attorney shall review the petition. If appropriate, the prosecutor shall consult with the petitioner to conform the contents of the petition with the requirements of law. The prosecutor may decline to proceed with a petition which does not meet legal requirements. When appropriate, the prosecutor shall schedule the petition for a hearing and cause the petition, notice of rights, the name, business address, and telephone number of appointed counsel, and summons to appear to be served upon the person and their guardian, if any. Information about appointed counsel need not be provided if the prosecutor has knowledge that the person has retained counsel. Proof of service must be filed with the court and all papers in the court file must be provided to the person's designated attorney.

(7) If the petition involves a person whom the prosecutor knows, or has reason to know, is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the prosecutor shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible.

(((6)))(8) A petition for assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment filed under this section ((must))shall be adjudicated under RCW 71.05.240.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence in response to a petition filed under this section that:

(a) The adolescent has a behavioral health disorder;

(b) Based on a clinical determination and in view of the adolescent's treatment history and current behavior, at least one of the following is true:

(i) The adolescent is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision and the adolescent's condition is substantially deteriorating; or

(ii) The adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in grave disability or a likelihood of serious harm to the adolescent or to others;

(c) The adolescent has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for his or her behavioral health disorder, in that at least one of the following is true:

(i) The adolescent's behavioral health disorder has, at least twice within the last 36 months, been a substantial factor in necessitating hospitalization, or receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a state correctional facility or local correctional facility, not including any period during which the adolescent was hospitalized or incarcerated immediately preceding the filing of the petition;

(ii) The person's behavioral health disorder has, at least twice within the last 36 months, been a substantial factor in necessitating emergency medical care, a substantial factor necessitating hospitalization for behavioral health-related medical conditions including overdose, infected abscesses, sepsis, endocarditis, or other maladies, or a substantial factor in behavior which resulted in the person's incarceration in a state or local correctional facility; or

(iii) The adolescent's behavioral health disorder has resulted in one or more violent acts, threats, or attempts to cause serious physical harm to themselves or another within the last 48 months, not including any period in which the adolescent was hospitalized or incarcerated immediately preceding the filing of the petition;

(d) The adolescent has been offered an opportunity to participate in a treatment plan, and the adolescent continues to not engage in treatment;

(e) Participation in an assisted outpatient treatment program would be the least restrictive alternative necessary to ensure the adolescent's recovery and stability; and

(f) The adolescent will benefit from assisted outpatient treatment.

(2) The following individuals may directly file a petition for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that an adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment:

(a) The director of a hospital where the adolescent is hospitalized;

(b) The director of a behavioral health service provider providing behavioral health care or residential services to the adolescent;

(c) The adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional or one who has evaluated the person;

(d) A designated crisis responder;

(e) A release planner from a juvenile detention or rehabilitation facility; or

(f) An emergency room physician.

(3) A court order for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that the adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment may be effective for up to 18 months. The petitioner must personally interview the adolescent, unless the adolescent refuses an interview, to determine whether the adolescent will voluntarily receive appropriate treatment.

(4) The petitioner must allege specific facts based on personal observation, evaluation, or investigation, and must consider the reliability or credibility of any person providing information material to the petition.

(5) The petition must include:

(a) A statement of the circumstances under which the adolescent's condition was made known and the basis for the opinion, from personal observation or investigation, that the adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment. The petitioner must state which specific facts come from personal observation and specify what other sources of information the petitioner has relied upon to form this belief;

(b) A declaration from a physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner, or the adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, who has examined the adolescent no more than 10 days prior to the submission of the petition and who is willing to testify in support of the petition, or who alternatively has made appropriate attempts to examine the adolescent within the same period but has not been successful in obtaining the adolescent's cooperation, and who is willing to testify to the reasons they believe that the adolescent meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment. If the declaration is provided by the adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, it must be cosigned by a supervising physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner who certifies that they have reviewed the declaration;

(c) The declarations of additional witnesses, if any, supporting the petition for assisted outpatient treatment;

(d) The name of an agency, provider, or facility which provide less restrictive alternative treatment if the petition is granted by the court; and

(e) If the adolescent is detained in a state hospital, inpatient treatment facility, or juvenile detention or rehabilitation facility at the time the petition is filed, the anticipated release date of the adolescent and any other details needed to facilitate successful reentry and transition into the community.

(6) The petition must be served upon the prosecuting attorney for the county. Proof of service must be filed with the court. The prosecuting attorney shall review the petition. If appropriate, the prosecutor shall consult with the petitioner to conform the contents of the petition with the requirements of law. The prosecutor may decline to proceed with a petition which does not meet legal requirements. When appropriate, the prosecutor shall schedule the petition for a hearing and cause the petition, notice of rights, the name, business address, and telephone number of appointed counsel, and summons to appear to be served upon the adolescent and their guardian, if any. Information about appointed counsel need not be provided if the prosecutor has knowledge that the adolescent has retained counsel. Proof of service must be filed with the court and all papers in the court file must be provided to the adolescent's designated attorney.

(7) If the petition involves an adolescent whom the prosecutor knows, or has reason to know, is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the prosecutor shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible.

(8) A petition for assisted outpatient treatment filed under this section shall be adjudicated under RCW 71.34.740.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.05.150 and 2021 c 264 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, ((or that a person is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment;)) the designated crisis responder may, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention ((or involuntary outpatient treatment)), if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention under this section ((or a petition for involuntary outpatient behavioral health treatment under RCW 71.05.148)). Before filing the petition, the designated crisis responder must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility, crisis stabilization unit, triage facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. As part of the assessment, the designated crisis responder must attempt to ascertain if the person has executed a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW. The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.

(2)(a) A superior court judge may issue a warrant to detain a person with a behavioral health disorder to a designated evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program, for a period of not more than one hundred twenty hours for evaluation and treatment upon request of a designated crisis responder, subject to (d) of this subsection, whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the judge that:

(i) There is probable cause to support the petition; and

(ii) The person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily.

(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the order.

(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person.

(d) A court may not issue an order to detain a person to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is an available secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the person.

(e) If the court does not issue an order to detain a person pursuant to this subsection (2), the court shall issue an order to dismiss the initial petition.

(3) The designated crisis responder shall then serve or cause to be served on such person((,))and his or her guardian((, and conservator)), if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such person the designated crisis responder shall file the return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, and the designated attorney. The designated crisis responder shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held within one hundred twenty hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. The person shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise interfere with the evaluation.

(4) The designated crisis responder may notify a peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. At the time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a petition for initial detention.

(5) Tribal court orders for involuntary commitment shall be recognized and enforced in accordance with superior court civil rule 82.5.

(6) In any investigation and evaluation of an individual under ((RCW 71.05.150))this section or RCW 71.05.153 in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the individual is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider regarding whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible but no later than three hours subject to the requirements in RCW 70.02.230(2)(ee) and (3). A designated crisis responder may restrict the release of information as necessary to comply with 42 C.F.R. Part 2.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.05.150 and 2021 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, ((or that a person is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment;)) the designated crisis responder may, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention ((or involuntary outpatient treatment)), if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention under this section ((or a petition for involuntary outpatient behavioral health treatment under RCW 71.05.148)). Before filing the petition, the designated crisis responder must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility, crisis stabilization unit, triage facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. As part of the assessment, the designated crisis responder must attempt to ascertain if the person has executed a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW. The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.

(2)(a) A superior court judge may issue a warrant to detain a person with a behavioral health disorder to a designated evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program, for a period of not more than one hundred twenty hours for evaluation and treatment upon request of a designated crisis responder whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the judge that:

(i) There is probable cause to support the petition; and

(ii) The person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily.

(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the order.

(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person.

(d) If the court does not issue an order to detain a person pursuant to this subsection (2), the court shall issue an order to dismiss the initial petition.

(3) The designated crisis responder shall then serve or cause to be served on such person((,))and his or her guardian((, and conservator)), if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such person the designated crisis responder shall file the return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, and the designated attorney. The designated crisis responder shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held within one hundred twenty hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. The person shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise interfere with the evaluation.

(4) The designated crisis responder may notify a peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. At the time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a petition for initial detention.

(5) Tribal court orders for involuntary commitment shall be recognized and enforced in accordance with superior court civil rule 82.5.

(6) In any investigation and evaluation of an individual under ((RCW 71.05.150))this section or RCW 71.05.153 in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the individual is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider regarding whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible but no later than three hours subject to the requirements in RCW 70.02.230(2)(ee) and (3). A designated crisis responder may restrict the release of information as necessary to comply with 42 C.F.R. Part 2.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.05.156 and 2018 c 291 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

A designated crisis responder who conducts an evaluation for imminent likelihood of serious harm or imminent danger because of being gravely disabled under RCW 71.05.153 must also evaluate the person under RCW 71.05.150 for likelihood of serious harm or grave disability that does not meet the imminent standard for emergency detention((, and to determine whether the person is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment)).

Sec. 8. RCW 71.05.201 and 2020 c 302 s 24 and 2020 c 256 s 304 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If a designated crisis responder decides not to detain a person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or forty-eight hours have elapsed since a designated crisis responder received a request for investigation and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the person detained, an immediate family member or guardian ((or conservator)) of the person, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe, may petition the superior court for the person's initial detention.

(2) A petition under this section must be filed within ten calendar days following the designated crisis responder investigation or the request for a designated crisis responder investigation. If more than ten days have elapsed, the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator may request a new designated crisis responder investigation.

(3)(a) The petition must be filed in the county in which the designated crisis responder investigation occurred or was requested to occur and must be submitted on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts for this purpose. The petition must be accompanied by a sworn declaration from the petitioner, and other witnesses if desired, describing why the person should be detained for evaluation and treatment. The description of why the person should be detained may contain, but is not limited to, the information identified in RCW 71.05.212.

(b) The petition must contain:

(i) A description of the relationship between the petitioner and the person; and

(ii) The date on which an investigation was requested from the designated crisis responder.

(4) The court shall, within one judicial day, review the petition to determine whether the petition raises sufficient evidence to support the allegation. If the court so finds, it shall provide a copy of the petition to the designated crisis responder agency with an order for the agency to provide the court, within one judicial day, with a written sworn statement describing the basis for the decision not to seek initial detention and a copy of all information material to the designated crisis responder's current decision.

(5) Following the filing of the petition and before the court reaches a decision, any person, including a mental health professional, may submit a sworn declaration to the court in support of or in opposition to initial detention.

(6) The court shall dismiss the petition at any time if it finds that a designated crisis responder has filed a petition for the person's initial detention under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or that the person has voluntarily accepted appropriate treatment.

(7) The court must issue a final ruling on the petition within five judicial days after it is filed. After reviewing all of the information provided to the court, the court may enter an order for initial detention ((or an order instructing the designated crisis responder to file a petition for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment)) if the court finds that: (a) There is probable cause to support a petition for detention ((or assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment)); and (b) the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily. The court shall transmit its final decision to the petitioner.

(8) If the court enters an order for initial detention, it shall provide the order to the designated crisis responder agency and issue a written order for apprehension. The designated crisis responder agency serving the jurisdiction of the court must collaborate and coordinate with law enforcement regarding apprehensions and detentions under this subsection, including sharing of information relating to risk and which would assist in locating the person. A person may not be detained to jail pursuant to a written order issued under this subsection. An order for detention under this section should contain the advisement of rights which the person would receive if the person were detained by a designated crisis responder. An order for initial detention under this section expires one hundred eighty days from issuance.

(9) Except as otherwise expressly stated in this chapter, all procedures must be followed as if the order had been entered under RCW 71.05.150. RCW 71.05.160 does not apply if detention was initiated under the process set forth in this section.

(10) For purposes of this section, "immediate family member" means a spouse, domestic partner, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, or sibling.

Sec. 9. RCW 71.05.212 and 2020 c 256 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a designated crisis responder or professional person is conducting an evaluation under this chapter, consideration shall include all reasonably available information from credible witnesses and records regarding:

(a) Prior recommendations for evaluation of the need for civil commitments when the recommendation is made pursuant to an evaluation conducted under chapter 10.77 RCW;

(b) Historical behavior, including history of one or more violent acts;

(c) Prior determinations of incompetency or insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and

(d) Prior commitments under this chapter.

(2) Credible witnesses may include family members, landlords, neighbors, or others with significant contact and history of involvement with the person. If the designated crisis responder relies upon information from a credible witness in reaching his or her decision to detain the individual, then he or she must provide contact information for any such witness to the prosecutor. The designated crisis responder or prosecutor shall provide notice of the date, time, and location of the probable cause hearing to such a witness.

(3) Symptoms and behavior of the respondent which standing alone would not justify civil commitment may support a finding of grave disability or likelihood of serious harm, or a finding that the person is in need of assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment, when:

(a) Such symptoms or behavior are closely associated with symptoms or behavior which preceded and led to a past incident of involuntary hospitalization, severe deterioration, or one or more violent acts;

(b) These symptoms or behavior represent a marked and concerning change in the baseline behavior of the respondent; and

(c) Without treatment, the continued deterioration of the respondent is probable.

(4) When conducting an evaluation for offenders identified under RCW 72.09.370, the designated crisis responder or professional person shall consider an offender's history of judicially required or administratively ordered antipsychotic medication while in confinement.

(((5) The authority, in consultation with tribes and coordination with Indian health care providers and the American Indian health commission for Washington state, shall establish written guidelines by June 30, 2021, for conducting culturally appropriate evaluations of American Indians or Alaska Natives.))

Sec. 10. RCW 71.05.212 and 2020 c 302 s 28 and 2020 c 256 s 305 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a designated crisis responder or professional person is conducting an evaluation under this chapter, consideration shall include all reasonably available information from credible witnesses and records regarding:

(a) Prior recommendations for evaluation of the need for civil commitments when the recommendation is made pursuant to an evaluation conducted under chapter 10.77 RCW;

(b) Historical behavior, including history of one or more violent acts;

(c) Prior determinations of incompetency or insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and

(d) Prior commitments under this chapter.

(2) Credible witnesses may include family members, landlords, neighbors, or others with significant contact and history of involvement with the person. If the designated crisis responder relies upon information from a credible witness in reaching his or her decision to detain the individual, then he or she must provide contact information for any such witness to the prosecutor. The designated crisis responder or prosecutor shall provide notice of the date, time, and location of the probable cause hearing to such a witness.

(3) Symptoms and behavior of the respondent which standing alone would not justify civil commitment may support a finding of grave disability or likelihood of serious harm, or a finding that the person is in need of assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment, when:

(a) Such symptoms or behavior are closely associated with symptoms or behavior which preceded and led to a past incident of involuntary hospitalization, severe deterioration from safe behavior, or one or more violent acts;

(b) These symptoms or behavior represent a marked and concerning change in the baseline behavior of the respondent; and

(c) Without treatment, the continued deterioration of the respondent is probable.

(4) When conducting an evaluation for offenders identified under RCW 72.09.370, the designated crisis responder or professional person shall consider an offender's history of judicially required or administratively ordered antipsychotic medication while in confinement.

(((5) The authority, in consultation with tribes and coordination with Indian health care providers and the American Indian health commission for Washington state, shall establish written guidelines by June 30, 2021, for conducting culturally appropriate evaluations of American Indians or Alaska Natives.))

Sec. 11. RCW 71.05.230 and 2020 c 302 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

A person detained for one hundred twenty ((hour))hours of evaluation and treatment may be committed for not more than fourteen additional days of involuntary intensive treatment or ninety additional days of a less restrictive alternative treatment. A petition may only be filed if the following conditions are met:

(1) The professional staff of the facility providing evaluation services has analyzed the person's condition and finds that the condition is caused by a behavioral health disorder and results in: (a) A likelihood of serious harm; or (b) the person being gravely disabled; ((or (c) the person being in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment;)) and are prepared to testify those conditions are met; and

(2) The person has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment and the professional staff of the facility has evidence that he or she has not in good faith volunteered; and

(3) The facility providing intensive treatment is certified to provide such treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745; and

(4)(a)(i) The professional staff of the facility or the designated crisis responder has filed a petition with the court for a fourteen day involuntary detention or a ninety day less restrictive alternative. The petition must be signed by:

(A) One physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(B) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or mental health professional.

(ii) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced registered nurse practitioner instead of a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner. The persons signing the petition must have examined the person.

(b) If involuntary detention is sought the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled and that there are no less restrictive alternatives to detention in the best interest of such person or others. The petition shall state specifically that less restrictive alternative treatment was considered and specify why treatment less restrictive than detention is not appropriate. If an involuntary less restrictive alternative is sought, the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm((,))or is gravely disabled((, or is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment,)) and shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services; and

(5) A copy of the petition has been served on the detained person, his or her attorney, and his or her guardian ((or conservator)), if any, prior to the probable cause hearing; and

(6) The court at the time the petition was filed and before the probable cause hearing has appointed counsel to represent such person if no other counsel has appeared; and

(7) The petition reflects that the person was informed of the loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed for mental health treatment; and

(8) At the conclusion of the initial commitment period, the professional staff of the agency or facility or the designated crisis responder may petition for an additional period of ((either)) ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment ((or ninety days of involuntary intensive treatment)) as provided in RCW 71.05.290; and

(9) If the hospital or facility designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary treatment, the outpatient facility so designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment has agreed to assume such responsibility.

Sec. 12. RCW 71.05.240 and 2021 c 264 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a petition is filed for ((fourteen day))up to 14 days of involuntary treatment ((or ninety)), 90 days of less restrictive alternative treatment, or 18 months of less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.148, the court shall hold a probable cause hearing within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the initial detention ((of such person as determined in))under RCW 71.05.180, or at a time ((determined))scheduled under RCW 71.05.148.

(2) If the petition is for mental health treatment, the court or the prosecutor at the time of the probable cause hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the person both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.230 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the person is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section.

(3) If the person or his or her attorney alleges, prior to the commencement of the hearing, that the person has in good faith volunteered for treatment, the petitioner must show, by preponderance of the evidence, that the person has not in good faith volunteered for appropriate treatment. In order to qualify as a good faith volunteer, the person must abide by procedures and a treatment plan as prescribed by a treatment facility and professional staff.

(4)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, at the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that ((such))a person detained for behavioral health treatment, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed ((fourteen))14 days in a facility licensed or certified to provide treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745.

(b) A court may only order commitment to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if there is an available facility with adequate space for the person.

(c) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that ((such))a person detained for behavioral health treatment, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for up to ninety days.

(d) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that ((such))a person subject to a petition under RCW 71.05.148, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, is in need of assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment((, and that the person does not present a likelihood of serious harm and is not gravely disabled)), the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for up to ((ninety days))18 months.

(5) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the behavioral health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the treatment recommendations of the behavioral health service provider.

(6) The court shall notify the person orally and in writing that if involuntary treatment is sought beyond the ((fourteen-day))14-day inpatient ((or ninety-day)), 90-day less restrictive treatment, or 18-month less restrictive treatment period, the person has the right to a full hearing or jury trial under RCW 71.05.310. If the commitment is for mental health treatment, the court shall ((also)) notify the person orally and in writing that the person is barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047.

(7) If the court does not issue an order to detain or commit a person under this section, the court shall issue an order to dismiss the petition.

(8) Nothing in this section precludes the court from subsequently modifying the terms of an order for less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.590(3).

Sec. 13. RCW 71.05.240 and 2021 c 264 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a petition is filed for ((fourteen day))up to 14 days of involuntary treatment ((or ninety)), 90 days of less restrictive alternative treatment, or 18 months of less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.148, the court shall hold a probable cause hearing within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the initial detention ((of such person as determined in))under RCW 71.05.180, or at a time ((determined))scheduled under RCW 71.05.148.

(2) If the petition is for mental health treatment, the court or the prosecutor at the time of the probable cause hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the person both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.230 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the person is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section.

(3) If the person or his or her attorney alleges, prior to the commencement of the hearing, that the person has in good faith volunteered for treatment, the petitioner must show, by preponderance of the evidence, that the person has not in good faith volunteered for appropriate treatment. In order to qualify as a good faith volunteer, the person must abide by procedures and a treatment plan as prescribed by a treatment facility and professional staff.

(4)(a) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that ((such))a person detained for behavioral health treatment, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed fourteen days in a facility licensed or certified to provide treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745.

(b) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that ((such))a person detained for behavioral health treatment, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for up to ninety days.

(c) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that ((such))a person subject to a petition under RCW 71.05.148, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, is in need of assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment((, and that the person does not present a likelihood of serious harm and is not gravely disabled)), the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for up to ((ninety days))18 months.

(5) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the behavioral health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the treatment recommendations of the behavioral health service provider.

(6) The court shall notify the person orally and in writing that if involuntary treatment is sought beyond the ((fourteen-day))14-day inpatient ((or ninety-day)), 90-day less restrictive treatment, or 18-month less restrictive treatment period, such person has the right to a full hearing or jury trial under RCW 71.05.310. If the commitment is for mental health treatment, the court shall also notify the person orally and in writing that the person is barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047.

(7) If the court does not issue an order to detain or commit a person under this section, the court shall issue an order to dismiss the petition.

(8) Nothing in this section precludes the court from subsequently modifying the terms of an order for less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.590(3).

Sec. 14. RCW 71.05.245 and 2018 c 291 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In making a determination of whether a person is gravely disabled, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is in need of assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment in a hearing conducted under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320, the court must consider the symptoms and behavior of the respondent in light of all available evidence concerning the respondent's historical behavior.

(2) Symptoms or behavior which standing alone would not justify civil commitment may support a finding of grave disability or likelihood of serious harm, or a finding that the person is in need of assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment, when: (a) Such symptoms or behavior are closely associated with symptoms or behavior which preceded and led to a past incident of involuntary hospitalization, severe deterioration, or one or more violent acts; (b) these symptoms or behavior represent a marked and concerning change in the baseline behavior of the respondent; and (c) without treatment, the continued deterioration of the respondent is probable.

(3) In making a determination of whether there is a likelihood of serious harm in a hearing conducted under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320, the court shall give great weight to any evidence before the court regarding whether the person has: (a) A recent history of one or more violent acts; or (b) a recent history of one or more commitments under this chapter or its equivalent provisions under the laws of another state which were based on a likelihood of serious harm. The existence of prior violent acts or commitments under this chapter or its equivalent shall not be the sole basis for determining whether a person presents a likelihood of serious harm.

For the purposes of this subsection "recent" refers to the period of time not exceeding three years prior to the current hearing.

Sec. 15. RCW 71.05.280 and 2020 c 302 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

At the expiration of the fourteen-day period of intensive treatment, a person may be committed for further treatment pursuant to RCW 71.05.320 if:

(1) Such person after having been taken into custody for evaluation and treatment has threatened, attempted, or inflicted: (a) Physical harm upon the person of another or himself or herself, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (b) as a result of a behavioral health disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm; or

(2) Such person was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or she attempted or inflicted physical harm upon the person of another or himself or herself, or substantial damage upon the property of others, and continues to present, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, a likelihood of serious harm; or

(3) Such person has been determined to be incompetent and criminal charges have been dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4), and has committed acts constituting a felony, and as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a substantial likelihood of repeating similar acts.

(a) In any proceeding pursuant to this subsection it shall not be necessary to show intent, willfulness, or state of mind as an element of the crime;

(b) For any person subject to commitment under this subsection where the charge underlying the finding of incompetence is for a felony classified as violent under RCW 9.94A.030, the court shall determine whether the acts the person committed constitute a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030; or

(4) Such person is gravely disabled((; or

(5) Such person is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment)).

Sec. 16. RCW 71.05.320 and 2021 c 264 s 10 and 2021 c 263 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, if the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280 have been proven and that the best interests of the person or others will not be served by a less restrictive treatment which is an alternative to detention, the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department for a further period of intensive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment.

(b) If the order for inpatient treatment is based on a substance use disorder, treatment must take place at an approved substance use disorder treatment program. The court may only enter an order for commitment based on a substance use disorder if there is an available approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the person.

(c) If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for one hundred eighty-day treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745.

(2) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280 have been proven, but finds that treatment less restrictive than detention will be in the best interest of the person or others, then the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department or to a less restrictive alternative for a further period of less restrictive treatment not to exceed ((ninety))90 days from the date of judgment. If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed ((one hundred eighty))180 days from the date of judgment. If the court has made an affirmative special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b), the court shall appoint a multidisciplinary transition team as provided in subsection (6)(a)(i) of this section. ((If the court or jury finds that the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(5) have been proven, and provide the only basis for commitment, the court must enter an order for less restrictive alternative treatment for up to ninety days from the date of judgment and may not order inpatient treatment.))

(3) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment entered under subsection (2) of this section must name the behavioral health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the behavioral health service provider.

(4) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the expiration of the period of commitment imposed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section unless the superintendent or professional person in charge of the facility in which he or she is confined, or in the event of a less restrictive alternative, the designated crisis responder, files a new petition for involuntary treatment on the grounds that the committed person:

(a) During the current period of court ordered treatment: (i) Has threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of another, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (ii) as a result of a behavioral health disorder or developmental disability presents a likelihood of serious harm; or

(b) Was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or she attempted or inflicted serious physical harm upon the person of another, and continues to present, as a result of a behavioral health disorder or developmental disability, a likelihood of serious harm; or

(c)(i) Is in custody pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and as a result of a behavioral health disorder or developmental disability continues to present a substantial likelihood of repeating acts similar to the charged criminal behavior, when considering the person's life history, progress in treatment, and the public safety.

(ii) In cases under this subsection where the court has made an affirmative special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b), the commitment shall continue for up to an additional one hundred eighty-day period whenever the petition presents prima facie evidence that the person continues to suffer from a behavioral health disorder or developmental disability that results in a substantial likelihood of committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior, unless the person presents proof through an admissible expert opinion that the person's condition has so changed such that the behavioral health disorder or developmental disability no longer presents a substantial likelihood of the person committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior. The initial or additional commitment period may include transfer to a specialized program of intensive support and treatment, which may be initiated prior to or after discharge from the state hospital; or

(d) Continues to be gravely disabled((; or

(e) Is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment)).

If the conduct required to be proven in (b) and (c) of this subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial under this chapter, it shall not be necessary to prove such conduct again.

If less restrictive alternative treatment is sought, the petition shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services.

(5) A new petition for involuntary treatment filed under subsection (4) of this section shall be filed and heard in the superior court of the county of the facility which is filing the new petition for involuntary treatment unless good cause is shown for a change of venue. The cost of the proceedings shall be borne by the state.

(6)(a) The hearing shall be held as provided in RCW 71.05.310, and if the court or jury finds that the grounds for additional confinement as set forth in this section are present, subject to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order the committed person returned for an additional period of treatment not to exceed ((one hundred eighty))180 days from the date of judgment, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section. ((If the court's order is based solely on the grounds identified in subsection (4)(e) of this section, the court may enter an order for less restrictive alternative treatment not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment, and may not enter an order for inpatient treatment.)) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the behavioral health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the behavioral health service provider.

(i) In cases where the court has ordered less restrictive alternative treatment and has previously made an affirmative special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b), the court shall appoint a multidisciplinary transition team to supervise and assist the person on the order for less restrictive treatment, which shall include a representative of the community behavioral health agency providing treatment under RCW 71.05.585, and a specially trained supervising community corrections officer. The court may omit the appointment of a community corrections officer if it makes a special finding that the appointment of a community corrections officer would not facilitate the success of the person, or the safety of the person and the community under (a)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) The role of the transition team shall be to facilitate the success of the person on the less restrictive alternative order by monitoring the person's progress in treatment, compliance with court-ordered conditions, and to problem solve around extra support the person may need or circumstances which may arise that threaten the safety of the person or the community. The transition team may develop a monitoring plan which may be carried out by any member of the team. The transition team shall meet according to a schedule developed by the team, and shall communicate as needed if issues arise that require the immediate attention of the team.

(iii) The department of corrections shall collaborate with the department to develop specialized training for community corrections officers under this section. The lack of a trained community corrections officer must not be the cause of delay to entry of a less restrictive alternative order.

(b) At the end of the ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day period of commitment, or one-year period of commitment if subsection (7) of this section applies, the committed person shall be released unless a petition for an additional ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day period of continued treatment is filed and heard in the same manner as provided in this section. Successive ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and pursuant to the same procedures as the original ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day commitment.

(7) An order for less restrictive treatment entered under subsection (6) of this section may be for up to one year when the person's previous commitment term was for intensive inpatient treatment in a state hospital.

(8) No person committed ((as provided in))under this section may be detained unless a valid order of commitment is in effect. No order of commitment ((can))under this section may exceed ((one hundred eighty))180 days in length except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(9) Nothing in this section precludes the court from subsequently modifying the terms of an order for less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.590(3).

Sec. 17. RCW 71.05.320 and 2021 c 264 s 11 and 2021 c 263 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280 have been proven and that the best interests of the person or others will not be served by a less restrictive treatment which is an alternative to detention, the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department for a further period of intensive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment.

If the order for inpatient treatment is based on a substance use disorder, treatment must take place at an approved substance use disorder treatment program. If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for one hundred eighty-day treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745.

(2) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280 have been proven, but finds that treatment less restrictive than detention will be in the best interest of the person or others, then the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department or to a less restrictive alternative for a further period of less restrictive treatment not to exceed ((ninety))90 days from the date of judgment. If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed ((one hundred eighty))180 days from the date of judgment. If the court has made an affirmative special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b), the court shall appoint a multidisciplinary transition team as provided in subsection (6)(a)(i) of this section.(( If the court or jury finds that the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(5) have been proven, and provide the only basis for commitment, the court must enter an order for less restrictive alternative treatment for up to ninety days from the date of judgment and may not order inpatient treatment.))

(3) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment entered under subsection (2) of this section must name the behavioral health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the behavioral health service provider.

(4) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the expiration of the period of commitment imposed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section unless the superintendent or professional person in charge of the facility in which he or she is confined, or in the event of a less restrictive alternative, the designated crisis responder, files a new petition for involuntary treatment on the grounds that the committed person:

(a) During the current period of court ordered treatment: (i) Has threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of another, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (ii) as a result of a behavioral health disorder or developmental disability presents a likelihood of serious harm; or

(b) Was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or she attempted or inflicted serious physical harm upon the person of another, and continues to present, as a result of a behavioral health disorder or developmental disability, a likelihood of serious harm; or

(c)(i) Is in custody pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and as a result of a behavioral health disorder or developmental disability continues to present a substantial likelihood of repeating acts similar to the charged criminal behavior, when considering the person's life history, progress in treatment, and the public safety.

(ii) In cases under this subsection where the court has made an affirmative special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b), the commitment shall continue for up to an additional one hundred eighty-day period whenever the petition presents prima facie evidence that the person continues to suffer from a behavioral health disorder or developmental disability that results in a substantial likelihood of committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior, unless the person presents proof through an admissible expert opinion that the person's condition has so changed such that the behavioral health disorder or developmental disability no longer presents a substantial likelihood of the person committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior. The initial or additional commitment period may include transfer to a specialized program of intensive support and treatment, which may be initiated prior to or after discharge from the state hospital; or

(d) Continues to be gravely disabled((; or

(e) Is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment)).

If the conduct required to be proven in (b) and (c) of this subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial under this chapter, it shall not be necessary to prove such conduct again.

If less restrictive alternative treatment is sought, the petition shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services.

(5) A new petition for involuntary treatment filed under subsection (4) of this section shall be filed and heard in the superior court of the county of the facility which is filing the new petition for involuntary treatment unless good cause is shown for a change of venue. The cost of the proceedings shall be borne by the state.

(6)(a) The hearing shall be held as provided in RCW 71.05.310, and if the court or jury finds that the grounds for additional confinement as set forth in this section are present, the court may order the committed person returned for an additional period of treatment not to exceed ((one hundred eighty))180 days from the date of judgment, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section. ((If the court's order is based solely on the grounds identified in subsection (4)(e) of this section, the court may enter an order for less restrictive alternative treatment not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment, and may not enter an order for inpatient treatment.)) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the behavioral health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the behavioral health service provider.

(i) In cases where the court has ordered less restrictive alternative treatment and has previously made an affirmative special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b), the court shall appoint a multidisciplinary transition team to supervise and assist the person on the order for less restrictive treatment, which shall include a representative of the community behavioral health agency providing treatment under RCW 71.05.585, and a specially trained supervising community corrections officer. The court may omit the appointment of a community corrections officer if it makes a special finding that the appointment of a community corrections officer would not facilitate the success of the person, or the safety of the person and the community under (a)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) The role of the transition team shall be to facilitate the success of the person on the less restrictive alternative order by monitoring the person's progress in treatment, compliance with court-ordered conditions, and to problem solve around extra support the person may need or circumstances which may arise that threaten the safety of the person or the community. The transition team may develop a monitoring plan which may be carried out by any member of the team. The transition team shall meet according to a schedule developed by the team, and shall communicate as needed if issues arise that require the immediate attention of the team.

(iii) The department of corrections shall collaborate with the department to develop specialized training for community corrections officers under this section. The lack of a trained community corrections officer must not be the cause of delay to entry of a less restrictive alternative order.

(b) At the end of the ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day period of commitment, or one-year period of commitment if subsection (7) of this section applies, the committed person shall be released unless a petition for an additional ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day period of continued treatment is filed and heard in the same manner as provided in this section. Successive ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and pursuant to the same procedures as the original ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day commitment.

(7) An order for less restrictive treatment entered under subsection (6) of this section may be for up to one year when the person's previous commitment term was for intensive inpatient treatment in a state hospital.

(8) No person committed ((as provided in))under this section may be detained unless a valid order of commitment is in effect. No order of commitment ((can))under this section may exceed ((one hundred eighty))180 days in length except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(9) Nothing in this section precludes the court from subsequently modifying the terms of an order for less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.590(3).

Sec. 18. RCW 71.05.365 and 2019 c 325 s 3008 are each amended to read as follows:

When a person has been involuntarily committed for treatment to a hospital for a period of ((ninety))90 or ((one hundred eighty))180 days, and the superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital determines that the person no longer requires active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care, the behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, or agency providing oversight of long-term care or developmental disability services that is responsible for resource management services for the person must work with the hospital to develop an individualized discharge plan, including whether a petition should be filed for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment, and arrange for a transition to the community in accordance with the person's individualized discharge plan within ((fourteen))14 days of the determination.

Sec. 19. RCW 71.05.585 and 2021 c 264 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Less restrictive alternative treatment, at a minimum, includes the following services:

(a) Assignment of a care coordinator;

(b) An intake evaluation with the provider of the less restrictive alternative treatment;

(c) A psychiatric evaluation, a substance use disorder evaluation, or both;

(d) A schedule of regular contacts with the provider of the treatment services for the duration of the order;

(e) A transition plan addressing access to continued services at the expiration of the order;

(f) An individual crisis plan;

(g) Consultation about the formation of a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW; and

(h) Notification to the care coordinator assigned in (a) of this subsection if reasonable efforts to engage the client fail to produce substantial compliance with court-ordered treatment conditions.

(2) Less restrictive alternative treatment may additionally include requirements to participate in the following services:

(a) Medication management;

(b) Psychotherapy;

(c) Nursing;

(d) Substance use disorder counseling;

(e) Residential treatment;

(f) Partial hospitalization;

(g) Support for housing, benefits, education, and employment; and

(((g)))(h) Periodic court review.

(3) If the person was provided with involuntary medication under RCW 71.05.215 or pursuant to a judicial order during the involuntary commitment period, the less restrictive alternative treatment order may authorize the less restrictive alternative treatment provider or its designee to administer involuntary antipsychotic medication to the person if the provider has attempted and failed to obtain the informed consent of the person and there is a concurring medical opinion approving the medication by a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician or physician assistant in consultation with an independent mental health professional with prescribing authority.

(4) Less restrictive alternative treatment must be administered by a provider that is certified or licensed to provide or coordinate the full scope of services required under the less restrictive alternative order and that has agreed to assume this responsibility.

(5) The care coordinator assigned to a person ordered to less restrictive alternative treatment must submit an individualized plan for the person's treatment services to the court that entered the order. An initial plan must be submitted as soon as possible following the intake evaluation and a revised plan must be submitted upon any subsequent modification in which a type of service is removed from or added to the treatment plan.

(6) A care coordinator may disclose information and records related to mental health services pursuant to RCW 70.02.230(2)(k) for purposes of implementing less restrictive alternative treatment.

(7) For the purpose of this section, "care coordinator" means a clinical practitioner who coordinates the activities of less restrictive alternative treatment. The care coordinator coordinates activities with the designated crisis responders that are necessary for enforcement and continuation of less restrictive alternative orders and is responsible for coordinating service activities with other agencies and establishing and maintaining a therapeutic relationship with the individual on a continuing basis.

Sec. 20. RCW 10.77.175 and 2021 c 263 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Conditional release planning should start at admission and proceed in coordination between the department and the person's managed care organization, or behavioral health administrative services organization if the person is not eligible for medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW. If needed, the department shall assist the person to enroll in medical assistance in suspense status under RCW 74.09.670. The state hospital liaison for the managed care organization or behavioral health administrative services organization shall facilitate conditional release planning in collaboration with the department.

(2) Less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order, at a minimum, includes the following services:

(a) Assignment of a care coordinator;

(b) An intake evaluation with the provider of the conditional treatment;

(c) A psychiatric evaluation or a substance use disorder evaluation, or both;

(d) A schedule of regular contacts with the provider of the less restrictive alternative treatment services for the duration of the order;

(e) A transition plan addressing access to continued services at the expiration of the order;

(f) An individual crisis plan;

(g) Consultation about the formation of a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW; ((and))

(h) Appointment of a transition team under RCW 10.77.150; (([and]))and

(i) Notification to the care coordinator assigned in (a) of this subsection and to the transition team as provided in RCW 10.77.150 if reasonable efforts to engage the client fail to produce substantial compliance with court-ordered treatment conditions.

(3) Less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order may additionally include requirements to participate in the following services:

(a) Medication management;

(b) Psychotherapy;

(c) Nursing;

(d) Substance use disorder counseling;

(e) Residential treatment;

(f) Partial hospitalization;

(g) Support for housing, benefits, education, and employment; and

(((g)))(h) Periodic court review.

(4) Nothing in this section prohibits items in subsection (2) of this section from beginning before the conditional release of the individual.

(5) If the person was provided with involuntary medication under RCW 10.77.094 or pursuant to a judicial order during the involuntary commitment period, the less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to the conditional release order may authorize the less restrictive alternative treatment provider or its designee to administer involuntary antipsychotic medication to the person if the provider has attempted and failed to obtain the informed consent of the person and there is a concurring medical opinion approving the medication by a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician or physician assistant in consultation with an independent mental health professional with prescribing authority.

(6) Less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order must be administered by a provider that is certified or licensed to provide or coordinate the full scope of services required under the less restrictive alternative order and that has agreed to assume this responsibility.

(7) The care coordinator assigned to a person ordered to less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order must submit an individualized plan for the person's treatment services to the court that entered the order. An initial plan must be submitted as soon as possible following the intake evaluation and a revised plan must be submitted upon any subsequent modification in which a type of service is removed from or added to the treatment plan.

(8) A care coordinator may disclose information and records related to mental health treatment under RCW 70.02.230(2)(k) for purposes of implementing less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order.

(9) For the purpose of this section, "care coordinator" means a representative from the department of social and health services who coordinates the activities of less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order. The care coordinator coordinates activities with the person's transition team that are necessary for enforcement and continuation of the conditional release order and is responsible for coordinating service activities with other agencies and establishing and maintaining a therapeutic relationship with the individual on a continuing basis.

Sec. 21. RCW 71.05.590 and 2021 c 264 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Either an agency or facility designated to monitor or provide services under a less restrictive alternative order or conditional release, or a designated crisis responder, may take action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must determine that:

(a) The person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the ((court)) order;

(b) Substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred;

(c) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further evaluation, intervention, or treatment; or

(d) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

(2) Actions taken under this section must include a flexible range of responses of varying levels of intensity appropriate to the circumstances and consistent with the interests of the individual and the public in personal autonomy, safety, recovery, and compliance. Available actions may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To counsel or advise the person as to their rights and responsibilities under the court order, and to offer ((appropriate)) incentives to motivate compliance;

(b) To increase the intensity of outpatient services provided to the person by increasing the frequency of contacts with the provider, referring the person for an assessment for assertive community services, or by other means;

(c) To request a court hearing for review and modification of the court order. The request must be ((made to or by))directed to the court with jurisdiction over the order and specify the circumstances that give rise to the request and what modification is being sought. The county prosecutor shall assist the ((agency or facility in))entity requesting ((this))the hearing and ((issuing))issue an appropriate summons to the person. This subsection does not limit the inherent authority of a treatment provider to alter conditions of treatment for clinical reasons, and is intended to be used only when court intervention is necessary or advisable to secure the person's compliance and prevent decompensation or deterioration;

(d) To ((cause))detain the person ((to be transported by a peace officer, designated crisis responder, or other means to the))for up to 12 hours for evaluation at an agency ((or)), facility ((monitoring or)) providing services under the court order, ((or to a)) triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, emergency department, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility with available space, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program with available space. The ((person may be detained at the facility for up to twelve hours for the)) purpose of ((an))the evaluation is to determine whether modification, revocation, or commitment proceedings are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the person and prevent decompensation, deterioration, or physical harm. Temporary detention for evaluation under this subsection is intended to occur only following a pattern of noncompliance or the failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement, and may occur only when ((in the)), based on clinical judgment ((of a designated crisis responder or the professional person in charge of an agency or facility designated to monitor less restrictive alternative services)), temporary detention is appropriate. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder may request assistance from a peace officer for the purposes of temporary detention under this subsection (2)(d). This subsection does not limit the ability or obligation of the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder to pursue revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section in appropriate circumstances; and

(e) To initiate revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section ((or, if the current commitment is solely based on the person being in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment as defined in RCW 71.05.020, initiate initial inpatient detention procedures under subsection (7) of this section)).

(3) A court may supervise a person on an order for less restrictive alternative treatment or a conditional release. While the person is under the order, the court may:

(a) Require appearance in court for periodic reviews; and

(b) Modify the order after considering input from the agency or facility designated to provide or facilitate services. The court may not remand the person into inpatient treatment except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, but may take actions under subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section.

(4) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services or designated crisis responder when a person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of court ordered treatment or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm.

(5)(a) ((Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a))A designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may, upon their own motion or ((notification by))upon request of the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care ((order)), cause a person ((subject to a court order under this chapter)) to be ((apprehended and taken into custody and temporary detention))detained in an evaluation and treatment facility, ((an)) available secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility with adequate space, or ((an)) available approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space((,)) in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment((. Proceedings under this subsection (5) may be initiated without ordering the apprehension and))for the purpose of a hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order under this chapter. The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a petition for revocation within 24 hours and serve the person, their guardian, if any, and their attorney. A hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order may be scheduled without detention of the person.

(b) ((Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a))A person detained under this subsection (5) must be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the ((person should be returned to the hospital or facility from which he or she had been released))order for less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be revoked, modified, or retained. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within five days of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may ((modify or rescind the order at any time prior to commencement of))withdraw its petition for revocation at any time before the court hearing.

(c) ((The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a revocation petition and order of apprehension and detention with the court of the county where the person is currently located or being detained. The designated crisis responder shall serve the person and their attorney, guardian, and conservator, if any. The))A person detained under this subsection (5) has the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as in any involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section. There is no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings is the county where the petition is filed. Notice of the filing must be provided to the court that originally ordered commitment, if different from the court where the petition for revocation is filed, within two judicial days of the person's detention.

(d) ((Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the))The issues for the court to determine are whether: (i) The person adhered to the terms and conditions of the ((court)) order; (ii) substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the above conditions apply, whether it is appropriate for the court ((should))to reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order, or order the ((person's))person to continue detention for inpatient treatment. The person may waive the court hearing and allow the court to enter a stipulated order upon the agreement of all parties. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period must be for ((fourteen))14 days from the revocation hearing if the ((outpatient))less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.160 or 71.05.230. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment and the ((outpatient))less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.290 or 71.05.320, the number of days remaining on the ((outpatient)) order must be converted to days of inpatient treatment ((authorized in the original court order)). A court may not ((issue an order to)) detain a person for inpatient treatment ((in))to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program under this subsection unless there is a ((secure withdrawal management and stabilization)) facility or ((approved substance use disorder treatment)) program available ((and)) with adequate space for the person.

(6) In determining whether or not to take action under this section the designated crisis responder, agency, or facility must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.212 and the court must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.245 as they apply to the question of whether to enforce, modify, or revoke a court order for involuntary treatment.

(((7)(a) If the current commitment is solely based on the person being in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment as defined in RCW 71.05.020, a designated crisis responder may initiate inpatient detention procedures under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 when appropriate. A designated crisis responder or the secretary may, upon their own motion or notification by the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care to a person subject to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.320 subsequent to an order for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment entered under RCW 71.05.148, order the person to be apprehended and taken into custody and temporary detention for inpatient evaluation in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or in an approved substance use disorder treatment program, in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment. Proceedings under this subsection may be initiated without ordering the apprehension and detention of the person.

(b) A person detained under this subsection may be held for evaluation for up to one hundred twenty hours, excluding weekends and holidays, pending a court hearing. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within one hundred twenty hours of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary may modify or rescind the order at any time prior to commencement of the court hearing.

(c) The issues for the court to determine are whether to continue the detention of the person for inpatient treatment or whether the court should reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative order or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. To continue detention after the one hundred twenty hour period, the court must find that the person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, that no such alternatives are in the best interest of the person or others.

(d) A court may not issue an order to detain a person for inpatient treatment in a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder program under this subsection unless there is a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and with adequate space for the person.))

Sec. 22. RCW 71.05.590 and 2021 c 264 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Either an agency or facility designated to monitor or provide services under a less restrictive alternative order or conditional release, or a designated crisis responder, may take action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must determine that:

(a) The person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the ((court)) order;

(b) Substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred;

(c) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further evaluation, intervention, or treatment; or

(d) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

(2) Actions taken under this section must include a flexible range of responses of varying levels of intensity appropriate to the circumstances and consistent with the interests of the individual and the public in personal autonomy, safety, recovery, and compliance. Available actions may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To counsel or advise the person as to their rights and responsibilities under the court order, and to offer ((appropriate)) incentives to motivate compliance;

(b) To increase the intensity of outpatient services provided to the person by increasing the frequency of contacts with the provider, referring the person for an assessment for assertive community services, or by other means;

(c) To request a court hearing for review and modification of the court order. The request must be ((made to or by))directed to the court with jurisdiction over the order and specify the circumstances that give rise to the request and what modification is being sought. The county prosecutor shall assist ((the agency or facility in))entity requesting ((this))the hearing and ((issuing))issue an appropriate summons to the person. This subsection does not limit the inherent authority of a treatment provider to alter conditions of treatment for clinical reasons, and is intended to be used only when court intervention is necessary or advisable to secure the person's compliance and prevent decompensation or deterioration;

(d) To ((cause))detain the person ((to be transported by a peace officer, designated crisis responder, or other means to the))for up to 12 hours for evaluation at an agency ((or)), facility ((monitoring or)) providing services under the court order, ((or to a)) triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, emergency department, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program. The ((person may be detained at the facility for up to twelve hours for the)) purpose of ((an))the evaluation is to determine whether modification, revocation, or commitment proceedings are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the person and prevent decompensation, deterioration, or physical harm. Temporary detention for evaluation under this subsection is intended to occur only following a pattern of noncompliance or the failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement, and may occur only when ((in the)), based on clinical judgment ((of a designated crisis responder or the professional person in charge of an agency or facility designated to monitor less restrictive alternative services)), temporary detention is appropriate. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder may request assistance from a peace officer for the purposes of temporary detention under this subsection (2)(d). This subsection does not limit the ability or obligation of the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder to pursue revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section in appropriate circumstances; and

(e) To initiate revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section ((or, if the current commitment is solely based on the person being in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment as defined in RCW 71.05.020, initial inpatient detention procedures under subsection (7) of this section)).

(3) A court may supervise a person on an order for less restrictive alternative treatment or a conditional release. While the person is under the order, the court may:

(a) Require appearance in court for periodic reviews; and

(b) Modify the order after considering input from the agency or facility designated to provide or facilitate services. The court may not remand the person into inpatient treatment except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, but may take actions under subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section.

(4) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services or designated crisis responder when a person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of court ordered treatment or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm.

(5)(a) ((Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a))A designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may, upon their own motion or ((notification by))upon request of the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care ((order)), cause a person ((subject to a court order under this chapter)) to be ((apprehended and taken into custody and temporary detention))detained in an evaluation and treatment facility, ((in a)) secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or ((in an)) approved substance use disorder treatment program((,)) in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment((. Proceedings under this subsection (5) may be initiated without ordering the apprehension and))for the purpose of a hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order under this chapter. The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a petition for revocation within 24 hours and serve the person, their guardian, if any, and their attorney. A hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order may be scheduled without detention of the person.

(b) ((Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a))A person detained under this subsection (5) must be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the ((person should be returned to the hospital or facility from which he or she had been released))order for less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be revoked, modified, or retained. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within five days of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may ((modify or rescind the order at any time prior to commencement of))withdraw its petition for revocation at any time before the court hearing.

(c) ((The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a revocation petition and order of apprehension and detention with the court of the county where the person is currently located or being detained. The designated crisis responder shall serve the person and their attorney, guardian, and conservator, if any. The))A person detained under this subsection (5) has the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as in any involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section. There is no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings is the county where the petition is filed. Notice of the filing must be provided to the court that originally ordered commitment, if different from the court where the petition for revocation is filed, within two judicial days of the person's detention.

(d) ((Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the))The issues for the court to determine are whether: (i) The person adhered to the terms and conditions of the ((court)) order; (ii) substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the above conditions apply, whether it is appropriate for the court ((should))to reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order or order the ((person's))person to continue detention for inpatient treatment. The person may waive the court hearing and allow the court to enter a stipulated order upon the agreement of all parties. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period must be for ((fourteen))14 days from the revocation hearing if the ((outpatient))less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.160 or 71.05.230. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment and the ((outpatient))less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.290 or 71.05.320, the number of days remaining on the ((outpatient)) order must be converted to days of inpatient treatment ((authorized in the original court order)).

(6) In determining whether or not to take action under this section the designated crisis responder, agency, or facility must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.212 and the court must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.245 as they apply to the question of whether to enforce, modify, or revoke a court order for involuntary treatment.

(((7)(a) If the current commitment is solely based on the person being in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment as defined in RCW 71.05.020, a designated crisis responder may initiate inpatient detention procedures under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 when appropriate. A designated crisis responder or the secretary may, upon their own motion or notification by the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care to a person subject to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.320 subsequent to an order for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment entered under RCW 71.05.148, order the person to be apprehended and taken into custody and temporary detention for inpatient evaluation in an evaluation and treatment facility, in a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or in an approved substance use disorder treatment program, in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment. Proceedings under this subsection may be initiated without ordering the apprehension and detention of the person.

(b) A person detained under this subsection may be held for evaluation for up to one hundred twenty hours, excluding weekends and holidays, pending a court hearing. The designated crisis responder or the secretary may modify or rescind the order at any time prior to commencement of the court hearing.

(c) The issues for the court to determine are whether to continue the detention of the person for inpatient treatment or whether the court should reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative order or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. To continue detention after the one hundred twenty hour period, the court must find that the person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, that no such alternatives are in the best interest of the person or others.))

Sec. 23. RCW 71.05.595 and 2018 c 291 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

A court order for less restrictive alternative treatment for a person found to be in need of assisted outpatient ((behavioral health)) treatment must be terminated prior to the expiration of the order when, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the less restrictive alternative treatment provider, (1) the person is prepared to accept voluntary treatment, or (2) the outpatient treatment ordered is no longer necessary to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled within a reasonably short period of time.

Sec. 24. RCW 71.24.045 and 2021 c 263 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The behavioral health administrative services organization contracted with the authority pursuant to RCW 71.24.381 shall:

(a) Administer crisis services for the assigned regional service area. Such services must include:

(i) A behavioral health crisis hotline for its assigned regional service area;

(ii) Crisis response services twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week, three hundred sixty-five days a year;

(iii) Services related to involuntary commitments under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW;

(iv) Tracking of less restrictive alternative orders issued within the region by superior courts, and providing notification to a managed care organization in the region when one of its enrollees receives a less restrictive alternative order so that the managed care organization may ensure that the person is connected to services and that the requirements of RCW 71.05.585 are complied with. If the person receives a less restrictive alternative order and is returning to another region, the behavioral health administrative services organization shall notify the behavioral health administrative services organization in the home region of the less restrictive alternative order so that the home behavioral health administrative services organization may notify the person's managed care organization or provide services if the person is not enrolled in medicaid and does not have other insurance which can pay for those services;

(v) Additional noncrisis behavioral health services, within available resources, to individuals who meet certain criteria set by the authority in its contracts with the behavioral health administrative services organization. These services may include services provided through federal grant funds, provisos, and general fund state appropriations;

(vi) Care coordination, diversion services, and discharge planning for nonmedicaid individuals transitioning from state hospitals or inpatient settings to reduce rehospitalization and utilization of crisis services, as required by the authority in contract; and

(vii) Regional coordination, cross-system and cross-jurisdiction coordination with tribal governments, and capacity building efforts, such as supporting the behavioral health advisory board, the behavioral health ombuds, and efforts to support access to services or to improve the behavioral health system;

(b) Administer and provide for the availability of an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services to ensure access to treatment, investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services provided as required under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(c) Coordinate services for individuals under RCW 71.05.365;

(d) Administer and provide for the availability of resource management services, residential services, and community support services as required under its contract with the authority;

(e) Contract with a sufficient number, as determined by the authority, of licensed or certified providers for crisis services and other behavioral health services required by the authority;

(f) Maintain adequate reserves or secure a bond as required by its contract with the authority;

(g) Establish and maintain quality assurance processes;

(h) Meet established limitations on administrative costs for agencies that contract with the behavioral health administrative services organization; and

(i) Maintain patient tracking information as required by the authority.

(2) The behavioral health administrative services organization must collaborate with the authority and its contracted managed care organizations to develop and implement strategies to coordinate care with tribes and community behavioral health providers for individuals with a history of frequent crisis system utilization.

(3) The behavioral health administrative services organization shall:

(a) Assure that the special needs of minorities, older adults, individuals with disabilities, children, and low-income persons are met;

(b) Collaborate with local government entities to ensure that policies do not result in an adverse shift of persons with mental illness into state and local correctional facilities; and

(c) Work with the authority to expedite the enrollment or reenrollment of eligible persons leaving state or local correctional facilities and institutions for mental diseases.

(4) The behavioral health administrative services organization shall employ an assisted outpatient treatment program coordinator to oversee system coordination and legal compliance for assisted outpatient treatment under RCW 71.05.148 and section 4 of this act.

Sec. 25. RCW 71.24.045 and 2021 c 263 s 17 and 2021 c 202 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The behavioral health administrative services organization contracted with the authority pursuant to RCW 71.24.381 shall:

(a) Administer crisis services for the assigned regional service area. Such services must include:

(i) A behavioral health crisis hotline for its assigned regional service area;

(ii) Crisis response services twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week, three hundred sixty-five days a year;

(iii) Services related to involuntary commitments under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW;

(iv) Tracking of less restrictive alternative orders issued within the region by superior courts, and providing notification to a managed care organization in the region when one of its enrollees receives a less restrictive alternative order so that the managed care organization may ensure that the person is connected to services and that the requirements of RCW 71.05.585 are complied with. If the person receives a less restrictive alternative order and is returning to another region, the behavioral health administrative services organization shall notify the behavioral health administrative services organization in the home region of the less restrictive alternative order so that the home behavioral health administrative services organization may notify the person's managed care organization or provide services if the person is not enrolled in medicaid and does not have other insurance which can pay for those services;

(v) Additional noncrisis behavioral health services, within available resources, to individuals who meet certain criteria set by the authority in its contracts with the behavioral health administrative services organization. These services may include services provided through federal grant funds, provisos, and general fund state appropriations;

(vi) Care coordination, diversion services, and discharge planning for nonmedicaid individuals transitioning from state hospitals or inpatient settings to reduce rehospitalization and utilization of crisis services, as required by the authority in contract; and

(vii) Regional coordination, cross-system and cross-jurisdiction coordination with tribal governments, and capacity building efforts, such as supporting the behavioral health advisory board and efforts to support access to services or to improve the behavioral health system;

(b) Administer and provide for the availability of an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services to ensure access to treatment, investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services provided as required under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(c) Coordinate services for individuals under RCW 71.05.365;

(d) Administer and provide for the availability of resource management services, residential services, and community support services as required under its contract with the authority;

(e) Contract with a sufficient number, as determined by the authority, of licensed or certified providers for crisis services and other behavioral health services required by the authority;

(f) Maintain adequate reserves or secure a bond as required by its contract with the authority;

(g) Establish and maintain quality assurance processes;

(h) Meet established limitations on administrative costs for agencies that contract with the behavioral health administrative services organization; and

(i) Maintain patient tracking information as required by the authority.

(2) The behavioral health administrative services organization must collaborate with the authority and its contracted managed care organizations to develop and implement strategies to coordinate care with tribes and community behavioral health providers for individuals with a history of frequent crisis system utilization.

(3) The behavioral health administrative services organization shall:

(a) Assure that the special needs of minorities, older adults, individuals with disabilities, children, and low-income persons are met;

(b) Collaborate with local government entities to ensure that policies do not result in an adverse shift of persons with mental illness into state and local correctional facilities; and

(c) Work with the authority to expedite the enrollment or reenrollment of eligible persons leaving state or local correctional facilities and institutions for mental diseases.

(4) The behavioral health administrative services organization shall employ an assisted outpatient treatment program coordinator to oversee system coordination and legal compliance for assisted outpatient treatment under RCW 71.05.148 and section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. Sections 1, 2, and 27 of this act take effect July 1, 2022.

Sec. 27. 2021 c 264 s 24 (uncodified) and 2021 c 263 s 21 (uncodified) are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Sections 4 and 28, chapter 302, Laws of 2020, sections 13 and 14, chapter 263, Laws of 2021, ((and, until July 1, 2022, section 22, chapter 264, Laws of 2021 and, beginning July 1, 2022,)) section 23, chapter 264, Laws of 2021, and sections 2 and 10, chapter ... (this act), Laws of 2022 take effect when monthly single-bed certifications authorized under RCW 71.05.745 fall below 200 reports for 3 consecutive months.

(2) The health care authority must provide written notice of the effective date of sections 4 and 28, chapter 302, Laws of 2020, sections 13 and 14, chapter 263, Laws of 2021, ((and sections 22 and))section 23, chapter 264, Laws of 2021, and sections 2 and 10, chapter ... (this act), Laws of 2022 to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28. Sections 5, 12, 16, and 21 of this act expire July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29. Sections 6, 13, 17, and 22 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30. Section 24 of this act expires October 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31. Section 25 of this act takes effect October 1, 2022.

--- END ---